BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that accountability
for meeting high standards of student achievement should be expected
from individual students, schools, school districts, and educators, as
well as state officials and the legislature. However, the legislature
further finds that the state and the overall system of public schools
should be expected to demonstrate that the necessary instruction,
support, and resources are being provided to students to enable them to
meet the higher standards before consequences are imposed on individual
students. Therefore the legislature intends to create the Washington
state report card for education based on statewide goals for improving
academic achievement, increasing high school graduation, reducing the
achievement gap, increasing per pupil funding, and reducing class size.
The Washington state report card for education will serve as a
mechanism to hold the state and the system of public schools
accountable for their performance on the statewide goals, each of which
must be reached before students are held individually accountable for
their performance on the Washington assessment of student learning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state report card for education is comprised of
the following statewide goals for the improvement of academic
achievement and state support of education for all students in public
schools:
(a) Seventy-five percent of students meet the state standards on
the reading, writing, mathematics, and science content areas of the
high school Washington assessment of student learning on the first
attempt;
(b) Eighty-five percent of students graduate from high school with
a high school diploma within four years of entering the ninth grade;
(c) Less than a ten percentage point gap exists between the percent
of all students and the percent of any subgroup of students who meet
the state standards on the reading, writing, mathematics, and science
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning on the first attempt. For the purposes of this section,
"subgroups of students" is defined as white, Asian/Pacific Islander,
American Indian, Hispanic, Black, and low income;
(d) The statewide average per pupil operating expenditure by
Washington state school districts for kindergarten through twelfth
grade education, from all revenue sources, exceeds the combined
weighted average per pupil operating expenditure for kindergarten
through twelfth grade education by school districts in the states of
California, Colorado, Connecticut, Maryland, Massachusetts, New Jersey,
Virginia, and Washington; and
(e) The formula adopted by the legislature for distribution of
basic education funds under RCW 28A.150.260 reflects the following
ratios at a minimum: (i) Seventy-eight certificated instructional
staff to one thousand annual average full-time equivalent students
enrolled in grades kindergarten through four; and (ii) forty-seven
certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average full-time equivalent students enrolled in grades five through twelve. The
legislature assumes that the staffing ratios in this section, adjusted
by assumed educational staff associates, specialist teachers, and daily
planning and preparation time, provide sufficient resources when
combined with student achievement funds under RCW 28A.505.220 to permit
a statewide average class size of fifteen students per core classroom
teacher in grades kindergarten through four and twenty-five students
per core classroom teacher in grades five through twelve.
(2) The state board of education shall submit a report to the
governor, the house of representatives, and the senate by December 1st
of each year indicating the performance on each of the goals of the
Washington state report card for education for the previous school
year.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "report card year" means the
school year in which the state board of education's report under this
section indicates that each of the goals of the Washington state report
card for education was met or exceeded for the previous school year.
(4) The graduating class of students whose first attempt at taking
the high school Washington assessment of student learning occurs in the
report card year shall be the first graduating class required to earn
a certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061 or a
certificate of individual achievement under RCW 28A.155.045 for high
school graduation. Each graduating class thereafter must also meet the
requirements of RCW 28A.655.061 or 28A.155.045.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2006 c 115 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (((10))) (9) of this section, one or more
objective alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate
achievement of state academic standards. The objective alternative
assessments for each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the
skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the
Washington assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section and section 2 of this
act, a certificate of academic achievement shall be obtained by most
students at about the age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students
have successfully met the state standard in the content areas included
in the certificate. With the exception of students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, acquisition of the certificate is
required for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class ((of 2008)) identified in
section 2(4) of this act, with the exception of students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who meets the state standards
on the reading, writing, ((and)) mathematics, and science content areas
of the high school Washington assessment of student learning shall earn
a certificate of academic achievement. If a student does not
successfully meet the state standards in one or more content areas
required for the certificate of academic achievement, then the student
may retake the assessment in the content area up to four times at no
cost to the student. If the student successfully meets the state
standards on a retake of the assessment then the student shall earn a
certificate of academic achievement. Once objective alternative
assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection (((10))) (9) of this
section, a student may use the objective alternative assessments to
demonstrate that the student successfully meets the state standards for
that content area if the student has retaken the Washington assessment
of student learning at least once. If the student successfully meets
the state standards on the objective alternative assessments then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(4) ((Beginning with the graduating class of 2010, a student must
meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content
areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the Washington
assessment of student learning or the objective alternative assessments
in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(5))) The state board of education may not require the acquisition
of the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(((6))) (5) A student may retain and use the highest result from
each successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(((7))) (6) Beginning in ((2006)) the report card year as defined
in section 2 of this act, school districts must make available to
students the following options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(((8))) (7) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of
the high school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall
pay for retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(((9) Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall pilot
opportunities for retaking the high school assessment beginning in the
2004-05 school year.)) (8) Beginning no later than ((September 2006))
the school year immediately following the report card year as defined
in section 2 of this act, opportunities to retake the assessment at
least twice a year shall be available to each school district.
(((10))) (9)(a) The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop options for implementing objective
alternative assessments, which may include an appeals process, for
students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic standards.
The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable in rigor to
the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the
Washington assessment of student learning and be objective in its
determination of student achievement of the state standards. Before
any objective alternative assessments in addition to those authorized
in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a student to
demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content
area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally
approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(b) A student's score on the mathematics portion of the preliminary
scholastic assessment test (PSAT), the scholastic assessment test
(SAT), or the American college test (ACT) may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the mathematics standards for the
certificate of academic achievement. The state board of education
shall identify the scores students must achieve on the mathematics
portion of the PSAT, SAT, or ACT to meet or exceed the state standard
for mathematics. The state board of education shall identify the first
scores by December 1, 2006, and thereafter may increase but not
decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state
standard for mathematics.
(((11))) (10) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives
and senate education committees shall obtain information and
conclusions from recognized, independent, national assessment experts
regarding the validity and reliability of the high school Washington
assessment of student learning for making individual student high
school graduation determinations.
(((12))) (11) To help assure continued progress in academic
achievement as a foundation for high school graduation and to assure
that students are on track for high school graduation, each school
district shall prepare plans for students as provided in this
subsection (((12))) (11).
(a) Student learning plans are required for all eighth through
twelfth grade students who were not successful on any or all of the
content areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during
the previous school year. The plan shall include the courses,
competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the student to meet
state academic standards and stay on track for graduation. ((This
requirement shall be phased in as follows:
(i) Beginning no later than the 2004-05 school year ninth grade
students as described in this subsection (12)(a) shall have a plan.
(ii) Beginning no later than the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter eighth grade students as described in this subsection
(12)(a) shall have a plan.
(iii))) (i) The parent or guardian shall be notified, preferably
through a parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was unsuccessful, strategies to help them improve their student's
skills, and the content of the student's plan.
(((iv))) (ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported
to the student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments
to the plan made as necessary.
(b) ((Beginning with the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter,)) All fifth grade students who were not successful in one
or more of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment
of student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of a student described in this
subsection (((12))) (11)(b) shall be notified, preferably through a
parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them improve their
student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.655.065 and 2006 c 115 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature has made a commitment to rigorous academic
standards for receipt of a high school diploma. The primary way that
students will demonstrate that they meet the standards in reading,
writing, mathematics, and science is through the Washington assessment
of student learning. Only objective assessments that are comparable in
rigor to the state assessment are authorized as an alternative
assessment. Before seeking an alternative assessment, the legislature
expects students to make a genuine effort to meet state standards,
through retaking the Washington assessment of student learning; regular
and consistent attendance at school; and participation in extended
learning and other assistance programs.
(2) Under RCW 28A.655.061, beginning in the ((2006-07)) school year
immediately following the report card year as defined in section 2 of
this act, the superintendent of public instruction shall implement
objective alternative assessment methods as provided in this section
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state standards in
content areas in which the student has not yet met the standard on the
high school Washington assessment of student learning. A student may
access an alternative if the student meets applicable eligibility
criteria in RCW 28A.655.061 and other eligibility criteria established
by the superintendent of public instruction, including but not limited
to attendance criteria and participation in the remediation or
supplemental instruction contained in the student learning plan
developed under RCW 28A.655.061. A school district may waive
attendance and/or remediation criteria for special, unavoidable
circumstances.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "applicant" means a student
seeking to use one of the alternative assessment methods in this
section.
(4) One alternative assessment method shall be a combination of the
applicant's grades in applicable courses and the applicant's highest
score on the high school Washington assessment of student learning, as
provided in this subsection. The superintendent of public instruction
shall determine which high school courses are applicable to the
alternative assessment method and shall issue guidelines to school
districts.
(a) Using guidelines prepared by the superintendent of public
instruction, a school district shall identify the group of students in
the same school as the applicant who took the same high school courses
as the applicant in the applicable content area. From the group of
students identified in this manner, the district shall select the
comparison cohort that shall be those students who met or slightly
exceeded the state standard on the Washington assessment of student
learning.
(b) The district shall compare the applicant's grades in high
school courses in the applicable content area to the grades of students
in the comparison cohort for the same high school courses. If the
applicant's grades are equal to or above the mean grades of the
comparison cohort, the applicant shall be deemed to have met the state
standard on the alternative assessment.
(c) An applicant may not use the alternative assessment under this
subsection (4) if there are fewer than six students in the comparison
cohort.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop an
alternative assessment method that shall be an evaluation of a
collection of work samples prepared and submitted by the applicant, as
provided in this subsection and, for career and technical applicants,
the additional requirements of subsection (6) of this section.
(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
guidelines for the types and number of work samples in each content
area that may be submitted as a collection of evidence that the
applicant has met the state standard in that content area. Work
samples may be collected from academic, career and technical, or
remedial courses and may include performance tasks as well as written
products. The superintendent shall submit the guidelines for approval
by the state board of education.
(b) The superintendent shall develop protocols for submission of
the collection of work samples that include affidavits from the
applicant's teachers and school district that the samples are the work
of the applicant and a requirement that a portion of the samples be
prepared under the direct supervision of a classroom teacher. The
superintendent shall submit the protocols for approval by the state
board of education.
(c) The superintendent shall develop uniform scoring criteria for
evaluating the collection of work samples and submit the scoring
criteria for approval by the state board of education. Collections
shall be scored at the state level or regionally by a panel of
educators selected and trained by the superintendent to ensure
objectivity, reliability, and rigor in the evaluation. An educator may
not score work samples submitted by applicants from the educator's
school district. If the panel awards an applicant's collection of work
samples the minimum required score, the applicant shall be deemed to
have met the state standard on the alternative assessment.
(d) Using an open and public process that includes consultation
with district superintendents, school principals, and other educators,
the state board of education shall consider the guidelines, protocols,
scoring criteria, and other information regarding the collection of
work samples submitted by the superintendent of public instruction.
The collection of work samples may be implemented as an alternative
assessment after the state board of education has approved the
guidelines, protocols, and scoring criteria and determined that the
collection of work samples: (i) Will meet professionally accepted
standards for a valid and reliable measure of the grade level
expectations and the essential academic learning requirements; and (ii)
is comparable to or exceeds the rigor of the skills and knowledge that
a student must demonstrate on the Washington assessment of student
learning in the applicable content area. The state board shall make an
approval decision and determination no later than December 1, 2006, and
thereafter may increase the required rigor of the collection of work
samples.
(e) ((By September of 2006)) During the report card year, as
defined in section 2 of this act, the superintendent of public
instruction shall ((develop)) distribute informational materials for
parents, teachers, and students regarding the collection of work
samples and the status of its development as an alternative assessment
method. The materials shall provide specific guidance regarding the
type and number of work samples likely to be required, include examples
of work that meets the state learning standards, and describe the
scoring criteria and process for the collection. The materials shall
also encourage students ((in the graduating class of 2008)) to begin
creating a collection if they believe they may seek to use the
collection once it is implemented as an alternative assessment.
(6)(a) For students enrolled in a career and technical education
program approved under RCW 28C.04.110, the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop additional guidelines for a collection of
work samples that evidences that the collection:
(i) Is relevant to the student's particular career and technical
program;
(ii) Focuses on the application of academic knowledge and skills
within the program;
(iii) Includes completed activities or projects where demonstration
of academic knowledge is inferred; and
(iv) Is related to the essential academic learning requirements and
state standards that students must meet to earn a certificate of
academic achievement or certificate of individual achievement, but also
represents the knowledge and skills that successful individuals in the
career and technical field of the approved program are expected to
possess.
(b) To meet the state standard on the alternative assessment under
this subsection (6), an applicant must also attain the state or
nationally recognized certificate or credential associated with the
approved career and technical program.
(c) The superintendent shall consult with community and technical
colleges, employers, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, apprenticeship programs, and other regional and national experts
in career and technical education to create an appropriate collection
of work samples and other evidence of a career and technical student's
knowledge and skills on the state academic standards.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall study the
feasibility of using existing mathematics assessments in languages
other than English as an additional alternative assessment option. The
study shall include an estimation of the cost of translating the tenth
grade mathematics assessment into other languages and scoring the
assessments should they be implemented.
(8) By the end of the report card year, as defined in section 2 of
this act, the superintendent of public instruction shall implement:
(a) ((By June 1, 2006,)) A process for students to appeal the score
they received on the high school assessments; and
(b) ((By January 1, 2007,)) Guidelines and appeal processes for
waiving specific requirements in RCW 28A.655.061 pertaining to the
certificate of academic achievement and to the certificate of
individual achievement for students who: (i) Transfer to a Washington
public school in their junior or senior year with the intent of
obtaining a public high school diploma, or (ii) have special,
unavoidable circumstances.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to
implement this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.655.063 and 2006 c 115 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose,
school districts shall reimburse students for the cost of taking the
tests in RCW 28A.655.061(((10))) (9)(b) when the students take the
tests for the purpose of using the mathematics results as an objective
alternative assessment.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.155.045 and 2004 c 19 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
Beginning with the graduating class ((of 2008)) identified under
section 2 of this act, students served under this chapter, who are not
appropriately assessed by the high school Washington assessment system
as defined in RCW 28A.655.061, even with accommodations, may earn a
certificate of individual achievement. The certificate may be earned
using multiple ways to demonstrate skills and abilities commensurate
with their individual education programs. The determination of whether
the high school assessment system is appropriate shall be made by the
student's individual education program team. For these students, the
certificate of individual achievement is required for graduation from
a public high school, but need not be the only requirement for
graduation. When measures other than the high school assessment system
as defined in RCW 28A.655.061 are used, the measures shall be in
agreement with the appropriate educational opportunity provided for the
student as required by this chapter. The superintendent of public
instruction shall develop the guidelines for determining which students
should not be required to participate in the high school assessment
system and which types of assessments are appropriate to use.
When measures other than the high school assessment system as
defined in RCW 28A.655.061 are used for high school graduation
purposes, the student's high school transcript shall note whether that
student has earned a certificate of individual achievement.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny a student the
right to participation in the high school assessment system as defined
in RCW 28A.655.061, and, upon successfully meeting the high school
standard, receipt of the certificate of academic achievement.

--- END ---