BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.112.010 and 2006 c 338 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Biodiesel fuel" means the monoalkyl esters of long chain fatty
acids derived from plant or animal matter that meet the registration
requirements for fuels and fuel additives established by the federal
environmental protection agency and standards established by the
American society of testing and materials.
(2) "Diesel" means special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020, and
diesel fuel dyed in accordance with the regulations in 26 C.F.R. Sec.
48.4082-1T as of October 24, 2005.
(3) "Director" means the director of agriculture.
(4) "E85 motor fuel" means an alternative fuel that is a blend of
denatured ethanol and hydrocarbon that typically contains eighty-five
percent ethanol by volume, but at a minimum must contain seventy
percent ethanol by volume, and complies with ASTM specification
D5798-99.
(5) "Motor fuel" means any liquid product used for the generation
of power in an internal combustion engine used for the propulsion of a
motor vehicle upon the highways of this state, and any biodiesel fuel.
Motor fuels containing ethanol may be marketed if either (a) the base
motor fuel meets the applicable standards before the addition of the
ethanol or (b) the resultant blend meets the applicable standards after
the addition of the ethanol.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.112.120 and 2006 c 338 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2008, motor vehicle fuel licensees under chapter
82.36 RCW, other than motor vehicle fuel distributors, shall provide
evidence to the department of licensing that at least two percent of
total gasoline sold in Washington, measured on a quarterly basis, is
denatured ethanol.
(2) If the director of ecology determines that ethanol content
greater than two percent of the total gasoline sold in Washington will
not jeopardize continued attainment of the federal clean air act's
national ambient air quality standard for ozone pollution in Washington
and the director of agriculture determines and publishes this
determination in the Washington State Register that sufficient raw
materials are available within Washington to support economical
production of ethanol at higher levels, the director of agriculture may
require by rule that licensees provide evidence to the department of
licensing that denatured ethanol comprises between two percent and at
least ten percent of total gasoline sold in Washington, measured on a
quarterly basis.
(3) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section
shall take effect no sooner than one hundred eighty days after the
determination has been published in the Washington State Register.
(4) The director and the director of licensing shall each adopt
rules, in coordination with each other, for enforcing and carrying out
the purposes of this section.
(5) Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit the production,
sale, or use of motor fuel for use in federally designated flexibly
fueled vehicles capable of using ((up to eighty-five percent ethanol
fuel blends)) E85 motor fuel. Nothing in this section is intended to
limit the use of high octane gasoline not blended with ethanol for use
in aircraft.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.4334 and 2003 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts received from the retail sale, or for the distribution, of:
(a) Biodiesel fuel; or
(b) ((Alcohol fuel, if the alcohol fuel is at least eighty-five
percent of the volume of the fuel being sold or distributed)) E85 motor
fuel.
(2) For the purposes of this section and RCW 82.08.955 and
82.12.955, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Biodiesel fuel" means a mono alkyl ester of long chain fatty
acids derived from vegetable oils or animal fats for use in
compression-ignition engines and that meets the requirements of the
American society of testing and materials specification D 6751 in
effect as of January 1, 2003.
(b) (("Alcohol fuel" means any alcohol made from a product other
than petroleum or natural gas, which is used alone or in combination
with gasoline or other petroleum products for use as a fuel for motor
vehicles, farm implements and machines, or implements of husbandry.))
"E85 motor fuel" means an alternative fuel that is a blend of denatured
ethanol and hydrocarbon that typically contains eighty-five percent
ethanol by volume, but at a minimum must contain seventy percent
ethanol by volume, and complies with ASTM specification D5798-99.
(c) "Distribution" means any of the actions specified in RCW
82.36.020(2).
(3) This section expires July 1, 2009.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.08.955 and 2003 c 63 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
constructing structures, installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning,
decorating, altering, or improving of structures or machinery and
equipment, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of structures or machinery and equipment, if
the machinery, equipment, or structure is used directly for the retail
sale of a biodiesel ((or alcohol fuel)) blend or E85 motor fuel.
Structures and machinery and equipment that are used for the retail
sale of a biodiesel ((or alcohol fuel)) blend or E85 motor fuel and for
other purposes are exempt only on the portion used directly for the
retail sale of a biodiesel ((or alcohol fuel)) blend or E85 motor fuel.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of fuel
delivery vehicles or to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the vehicles including repair parts and replacement parts if
at least seventy-five percent of the fuel distributed by the vehicles
is a biodiesel ((or alcohol fuel)) blend or E85 motor fuel.
(3) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in RCW
82.04.4334 and this subsection apply.
(a) (("Alcohol fuel blend" means fuel that contains at least
eighty-five percent alcohol fuel by volume.
(b))) "Biodiesel blend" means fuel that contains at least twenty
percent biodiesel fuel by volume.
(b) "E85 motor fuel" means an alternative fuel that is a blend of
denatured ethanol and hydrocarbon that typically contains eighty-five
percent ethanol by volume, but at a minimum must contain seventy
percent ethanol by volume, and complies with ASTM specification
D5798-99.
(c) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities and tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement
parts that are integral and necessary for the delivery of biodiesel
((or alcohol fuel)) blends or E85 motor fuel into the fuel tank of a
motor vehicle.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2009.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.12.955 and 2003 c 63 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of eligible
machinery and equipment, or tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of machinery and equipment used directly for
the retail sale of a biodiesel or ((alcohol fuel blend)) E85 motor
fuel.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of fuel delivery vehicles including repair parts and replacement
parts and to services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the vehicles if at least seventy-five
percent of the fuel distributed by the vehicles is a biodiesel or
((alcohol fuel blend)) E85 motor fuel.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in RCW
82.04.4334 and 82.08.955 apply.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---