BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington state,
from its inception, has recognized the importance of maintaining
individual privacy. The legislature further finds that protecting the
confidentiality and privacy of an individual's personal information,
especially when collected from the individual without his or her
knowledge or consent, is critical to maintaining the safety and
well-being of its citizens. The legislature recognizes that inclusion
of identification devices that broadcast data or enable data or
information to be collected or scanned either secretly or remotely, or
both, will greatly magnify the potential risk to individual privacy,
safety, and economic well-being that can occur from unauthorized
interception and use of personal information. The legislature further
recognizes that these types of technologies, whether offered by the
private sector or issued by the government, can be pervasive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Identification device" means an item that uses radio frequency
identification technology or facial recognition technology.
(2) "Person" means a natural person who resides in Washington.
(3) "Personal information" has the same meaning as in RCW
19.255.010.
(4) "Data" means personal information, numerical values associated
with a person's facial features, or unique personal identifier numbers
stored on an identification device.
(5) "Radio frequency identification" means a technology that uses
radio waves to transmit data remotely to readers.
(6) "Facial recognition" means a technology that attaches numerical
values to a person's different facial features, creating a unique
faceprint, which can be checked against a database of existing persons'
faceprints.
(7) "Reader" means a scanning device that is capable of using radio
waves to communicate with an identification device and read the data
transmitted by that identification device.
(8) "Remotely" means that no physical contact between the
identification device and the reader is necessary in order to transmit
data.
(9) "Unique personal identifier number" means a randomly assigned
string of numbers or symbols that is encoded on the identification
device and is intended to identify the identification device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Except as provided in section 5 of this act,
a person that intentionally scans another person's identification
device remotely, without that person's prior knowledge and prior
consent, for the purpose of fraud, identity theft, or for any other
illegal purpose, shall be guilty of a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this
act, a person, governmental or business entity may not intentionally
scan a person's identification device remotely for any purpose without
that person's prior knowledge and consent.
(2) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 3 and 4 of this act shall not apply
to the following:
(1) The scanning of an identification device for triage or medical
care during a disaster and immediate hospitalization or immediate
outpatient care directly relating to a disaster;
(2) The scanning of an identification device by an emergency
responder or health care professional for reasons relating to the
health or safety of that person;
(3) The scanning of a person's identification device issued to a
patient for emergency purposes;
(4) The scanning of an identification device of a person pursuant
to court-ordered electronic monitoring;
(5) The scanning of an identification device of a person who is
incarcerated in a correctional institution, juvenile detention
facility, or mental health facility;
(6) The scanning of an identification device by law enforcement or
government personnel who need to read a lost identification device when
the owner is unavailable for notice, knowledge, or consent, or those
parties specifically authorized by law enforcement or government
personnel for the limited purpose of reading a lost identification
device when the owner is unavailable for notice, knowledge, or consent;
(7) The scanning of an identification device by law enforcement
personnel who need to read a person's identification device after an
accident in which the person is unavailable for notice, knowledge, or
consent;
(8) The scanning of an identification device by a person or entity
that in the course of operating its own identification device system
collects data from another identification device, provided that the
inadvertently received data comports with all of the following:
(a) The data is not disclosed to any other party;
(b) The data is not used for any purpose; and
(c) The data is not stored or is promptly destroyed;
(9) The scanning of a person's identification device in the course
of an act of good faith security research, experimentation, or
scientific inquiry, including, but not limited to, activities useful in
identifying and analyzing security flaws and vulnerabilities; and
(10) The scanning of an identification device by law enforcement
personnel who need to scan a person's identification device pursuant to
a search warrant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A governmental or business entity may
collect, use, and store data associated with a person for the purposes
of completing a sales transaction or providing a service.
(2) If a governmental or business entity intends to collect, use,
or retain the data associated with a person after a sales transaction
or service has been completed, the governmental or business entity
first must obtain express, opt-in consent from the person associated
with the data. The person's consent must be obtained either in writing
or electronically. In obtaining the person's consent, the governmental
or business entity shall unambiguously disclose that, by consenting,
the person agrees to have the governmental or business entity collect,
use, or retain data associated with them.
(3) A person may, at any time, opt out of the collection of data
through either written or electronic means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 3, 4, and 6 of this act do not
apply if a governmental or business entity issuing an identification
device to a person obtains that person's express, opt-in consent in
writing or electronically. In obtaining consent, the governmental or
business entity shall unambiguously disclose that, by consenting, that
person agrees to have the governmental or business entity collect, use,
or retain data gathered from the identification device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The office of the attorney general shall, on
an annual basis, make recommendations to the legislature on other
personally invasive technologies that may warrant further legislative
action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act is found to be
in conflict with federal law or regulations, the conflicting provision
of this act is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and that finding or determination shall not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 2 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---