BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to promote the
development of sustainable energy resources and smart energy
technologies and to improve system reliability by establishing utility-based sustainable energy trusts that can be used to reduce the cost of
deploying sustainable energy projects and smart energy technologies in
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(2) "Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, a port district formed
under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district formed under Title 57
RCW, that is authorized to and engaged in the business of distributing
electricity or natural gas to one or more retail customers in the
state.
(3) "Department" means the energy policy division of the department
of community, trade, and economic development.
(4) "Electric utility" means an investor-owned utility and
consumer-owned utility that is authorized to and engaged in the
business of distributing electricity to one or more retail customers in
the state.
(5) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by investors
that meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in
distributing electricity or natural gas to more than one retail
electric customer in the state.
(6) "Governing body" means the board of directors, city council, or
the commissioners of any consumer-owned utility.
(7) "Natural gas utility" means an investor-owned utility and
consumer-owned utility that is authorized to and engaged in the
business of distributing natural gas to one or more retail customers in
the state.
(8) "Smart energy" means the use of technology to allow electrical
networks to operate efficiently and to link small-scale sustainable
energy resources to the grid.
(9) "Sustainable energy resources" means solar energy, wind, ocean
thermal energy, wave or tidal energy, fuel cells, landfill gas and low
emission advanced biomass conversion technologies, high-efficiency
cogeneration with an efficiency level above seventy percent, and other
emerging energy technologies that significantly reduce pollution from
existing technologies and have significant potential for
commercialization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 All electric and natural gas utilities may
collect a monthly system benefits charge from all retail electricity
and natural gas customers served by the utility. The purpose of the
system benefits charge is to foster the growth, development, and
commercialization of sustainable energy resources of five megawatts or
less or smart energy technologies that are connected to the
distribution system of an electric utility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Before collecting a system benefits
charge, a consumer-owned utility must prepare and submit to its
governing board a sustainable energy trust proposal consisting of the
following: A list of proposed sustainable energy resource or smart
energy technology projects; a project management plan for each proposed
project containing technical milestones and stage-gates; the cost of
each project; the amount required to be collected through a system
benefits charge to develop each project; and the estimated time frame
for collecting the system benefits charge.
(2) Before collecting a system benefits charge, an investor-owned
utility must prepare and submit to the commission a sustainable energy
trust proposal consisting of the following: A list of proposed
sustainable energy resource or smart energy technology projects; a
project management plan for each proposed project containing technical
milestones and stage-gates; the cost of each project; the amount
required to be collected through a system benefits charge to develop
each project; and the estimated time frame for collecting the system
benefits charge.
(3) Consumer-owned and investor-owned utilities shall make
available upon request the list of proposed and approved projects and
the project management plans for each project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1)(a) Upon approval of the sustainable
energy trust proposal by the governing board, a consumer-owned utility
may collect a system benefits charge for a time approved by the
governing board.
(b) Upon approval of the sustainable energy trust proposal by the
commission, an investor-owned utility may collect a system benefits
charge for a time approved by the commission.
(2) The monthly system benefits charge shall be up to and no more
than one dollar and ninety cents per customer.
(3) Funds collected from the system benefits charge shall be used
by an electric or natural gas utility to develop sustainable energy
resource or smart energy technology projects as approved by a governing
board or the commission.
(4) Funds collected from the system benefits charge shall be
deposited in a sustainable energy trust account established and
maintained by the utility and separate from other accounts.
(5) Interest accrued to the account must be reinvested into the
sustainable energy trust account and spent on sustainable energy
resource or smart energy technology projects.
(6) No more than five percent of funds may be used by an electric
or natural gas utility for administrative purposes.
(7)(a) Beginning on November 1, 2007, each electric or natural gas
consumer-owned utility whose governing board has approved the
collection of a system benefits charge shall submit the approved
sustainable energy trust proposal to the department.
(b) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall utilize the information received in (a) of this subsection in the
biennial energy report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

--- END ---