BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a city or town that provides electric, natural gas, water,
or sewer services substantially upgrades or replaces their billing
system, the resulting system must be capable of accepting electronic
payment from residential customers. Additional fees or costs charged
to the customer may not exceed the actual cost of providing an
electronic payment option. The methodology related to electronic
payment shall not affect the terms and conditions of service.
(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Electronic payment" means an internet-based method of payment
that allows a customer, at the time of payment, to access an internet
web page and transmit text or data controlling the amount of the
payment, the date of the payment, and the account from which the
payment will be made.
(b) "Substantially" means a redesign or upgrade of more than
twenty-five percent of the code or database structures of the billing
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.67 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a city or town that provides sewer services substantially
upgrades or replaces their billing system, the resulting system must be
capable of accepting electronic payment from residential customers.
Additional fees or costs charged to the customer may not exceed the
actual cost of providing an electronic payment option. The methodology
related to electronic payment shall not affect the terms and conditions
of service.
(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Electronic payment" means an internet-based method of payment
that allows a customer, at the time of payment, to access an internet
web page and transmit text or data controlling the amount of the
payment, the date of the payment, and the account from which the
payment will be made.
(b) "Substantially" means a redesign or upgrade of more than
twenty-five percent of the code or database structures of the billing
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a city or town that provides electric, natural gas, water,
or sewer services substantially upgrades or replaces their billing
system, the resulting system must be capable of accepting electronic
payment from residential customers. Additional fees or costs charged
to the customer may not exceed the actual cost of providing an
electronic payment option. The methodology related to electronic
payment shall not affect the terms and conditions of service.
(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Electronic payment" means an internet-based method of payment
that allows a customer, at the time of payment, to access an internet
web page and transmit text or data controlling the amount of the
payment, the date of the payment, and the account from which the
payment will be made.
(b) "Substantially" means a redesign or upgrade of more than
twenty-five percent of the code or database structures of the billing
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a county that operates sewer or water services
substantially upgrades or replaces their billing system, the resulting
system must be capable of accepting electronic payment from residential
customers. Additional fees or costs charged to the customer may not
exceed the actual cost of providing an electronic payment option. The
methodology related to electronic payment shall not affect the terms
and conditions of service.
(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Electronic payment" means an internet-based method of payment
that allows a customer, at the time of payment, to access an internet
web page and transmit text or data controlling the amount of the
payment, the date of the payment, and the account from which the
payment will be made.
(b) "Substantially" means a redesign or upgrade of more than
twenty-five percent of the code or database structures of the billing
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a public utility district that provides electric, water,
or sewer services substantially upgrades or replaces their billing
system, the resulting system must be capable of accepting electronic
payment from residential customers. Additional fees or costs charged
to the customer may not exceed the actual cost of providing an
electronic payment option. The methodology related to electronic
payment shall not affect the terms and conditions of service.
(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Electronic payment" means an internet-based method of payment
that allows a customer, at the time of payment, to access an internet
web page and transmit text or data controlling the amount of the
payment, the date of the payment, and the account from which the
payment will be made.
(b) "Substantially" means a redesign or upgrade of more than
twenty-five percent of the code or database structures of the billing
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 57.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a district that operates sewer or water services
substantially upgrades or replaces their billing system, the resulting
system must be capable of accepting electronic payment from residential
customers. Additional fees or costs charged to the customer may not
exceed the actual cost of providing an electronic payment option. The
methodology related to electronic payment shall not affect the terms
and conditions of service.
(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Electronic payment" means an internet-based method of payment
that allows a customer, at the time of payment, to access an internet
web page and transmit text or data controlling the amount of the
payment, the date of the payment, and the account from which the
payment will be made.
(b) "Substantially" means a redesign or upgrade of more than
twenty-five percent of the code or database structures of the billing
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a gas company, electric company, or water company that
provides gas, electric, or water services substantially upgrades or
replaces their billing system, the resulting system must be capable of
accepting electronic payment from residential customers. Additional
fees or costs charged to the customer may not exceed the actual cost of
providing an electronic payment option. The methodology related to
electronic payment shall not affect the terms and conditions of
service.
(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Electronic payment" means an internet-based method of payment
that allows a customer, at the time of payment, to access an internet
web page and transmit text or data controlling the amount of the
payment, the date of the payment, and the account from which the
payment will be made.
(b) "Substantially" means a redesign or upgrade of more than
twenty-five percent of the code or database structures of the billing
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a telecommunications company that provides
telecommunications services substantially upgrades or replaces their
billing system, the resulting system must be capable of accepting
electronic payment from residential customers. Additional fees or
costs charged to the customer may not exceed the actual cost of
providing an electronic payment option. The methodology related to
electronic payment shall not affect the terms and conditions of
service.
(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Electronic payment" means an internet-based method of payment
that allows a customer, at the time of payment, to access an internet
web page and transmit text or data controlling the amount of the
payment, the date of the payment, and the account from which the
payment will be made.
(b) "Substantially" means a redesign or upgrade of more than
twenty-five percent of the code or database structures of the billing
system.

--- END ---