BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares it to be a clear
public purpose and governmental function to promote anaerobic digestion
as both a waste treatment technology and a sustainable energy-producing
technology. The legislature finds that anaerobic digester projects in
the state provide numerous environmental benefits; they reduce odors
from organic waste, control pathogens, minimize sludge production,
conserve nutrients, and reduce greenhouse gas emissions. In addition
to providing environmental benefits, anaerobic digestion produces power
using a clean, renewable resource. Encouraging the development of
anaerobic digestion power will reduce the state's reliance on other
fossil fuel-based sources to meet existing and projected load
requirements, which provides a substantial benefit to the citizens of
the state.
Despite the numerous environmental and energy-producing benefits
that result from anaerobic digester projects, many potential anaerobic
digester projects are not pursued in this state because of the high
capital costs for construction of such projects. Therefore, it is the
intent of the legislature to establish a clean streams grant program to
assist anaerobic digestion power producers by bringing down the cost of
the initial capital investment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Anaerobic digester project" means a facility that processes
animal manure or agricultural waste into biogas and dried manure using
microorganisms in a decomposition process within a closed, oxygen-free
container.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(4) "Power producer" means an individual or business that generates
power from an anaerobic digester located in the state, or an individual
or business that anticipates generation of power from an anaerobic
digester located in the state upon completion of the anaerobic digester
project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) In order to be eligible for a grant
under section 4 of this act, a person or entity that is in the process
of developing an anaerobic digester project in this state must, prior
to completion of the project, submit a call for subscriptions seeking
a power purchase agreement offer from an electric utility to purchase
power from the anaerobic digester project.
(2) Once a power purchase agreement offer has been made by a
potential purchaser, the power producer must ask their local electric
utility for transmission access to wheel the power from the generation
site to the potential purchaser who submitted the highest bid, if the
highest bid was not made by the local electric utility.
(3) If an agreement for transmission access cannot be reached
between the local electric utility and the power producer, the power
producer may send a written purchase request to the local electric
utility to request that the utility purchase the output of the
anaerobic digester project at the utility's avoided cost as required
under applicable federal law that obligates the utility to purchase
power from a qualifying facility.
(4) Once a power producer has secured a power purchase agreement
offer from a potential purchaser and has secured transmission access
for the power, the power producer may send a request to the department
to apply for a clean streams grant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department shall establish a clean
streams grant program to encourage the construction of anaerobic
digester projects in the state. A grant may be awarded to a producer
of anaerobic digester power that seeks assistance to pay for the
capital costs associated with their initial investment that have not
been satisfied by other funding sources.
(2) A power producer may apply for a clean streams grant by
submitting (a) the power purchase agreement offer between the power
producer and the purchaser, including the estimated revenue over the
life of the contract, and (b) a detailed analysis of the initial
capital investment cost of the anaerobic digester project.
(3) The department shall review applications from eligible power
producers. At a minimum, a power producer must meet the following
criteria in order to be eligible to participate in the grant program:
(a) The power producer is carrying original debt on the initial
capital investment in the anaerobic digester project that has not been
satisfied by other federal, state, or private funding sources;
(b) The power producer has secured a power purchase agreement offer
from a potential purchaser for the electricity; and
(c) The power producer was unable to secure sufficient revenue from
a potential purchaser to recover the initial capital investment over
the length of the power purchase agreement offer.
(4)(a) In determining the amount of the grant award, the department
shall review an applicant's power purchase agreement offer. Any grant
award determined by the department must supply the power producer with
no more than the power producer's cost to finance the initial capital
investment during the period of the power purchase agreement, minus the
revenue to be generated by the power purchase agreement offer between
the power producer and the potential purchaser, and minus any federal,
state, or private funding received for the anaerobic digester project.
(b) The grant award shall be based upon the annual electricity
output of the anaerobic digester project. The grant will be reviewed
annually. Upon review, the grant award may be adjusted to reflect
actual power produced for the previous year as compared to the
projected amount of power used to calculate the amount of the original
grant award.
(5) Once the department determines that a grant application
satisfies the criteria outlined in subsection (3) of this section, the
department shall, within sixty days, make a decision on whether to
offer a grant to the power purchaser. If the department decides to
extend a grant to a power producer, the grant award shall be contingent
on the power producer demonstrating actual production of power from the
anaerobic digester project.
(6) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement the
grant award process under this section.
(7) Availability of grant funding from the department is contingent
on the availability of specific appropriations. If appropriations are
insufficient to cover all anaerobic digestion projects applying for a
grant, the department may prioritize and prorate grant awards as
necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2007, the department shall survey all desktop
computers owned by the state and identify which desktop computers are
suitable for using power management software.
(2) After conducting the review under subsection (1) of this
section, the department shall purchase power management software for
all desktop computers owned by the state that have been identified by
the department as suitable for using power management software. The
power management software must be purchased according to the terms of
the master contract number T06-MST-002 effective July 7, 2006, or a
subsequent contract entered into by the state for power management
software that offers comparable or better energy efficiency savings.
(3) The department must install power management software on all
desktop computers as expeditiously as possible.
(4) When acquiring new desktop computers, the department must
purchase and install power management software at the time of
acquisition, unless power management software is not suitable for a
particular desktop computer's intended use.
(5) The department may retain any rebate moneys the state receives
for energy conservation resulting from utilization of the power
management software.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 By December 1st of each year, the department
of information services shall report to the legislature on the number
of licenses installed, the amount of estimated energy saved per
computer per year, as well as the amount and number of rebates received
by the state as a result of implementing the power management software.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 5 and 6 of this act expire July 1,
2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The clean streams and clear sky subaccount
is created in the state treasury as a subaccount of the energy freedom
account. Revenues to the subaccount shall consist of amounts
appropriated to the subaccount that represent energy savings generated
from use of power management software on state computers. All receipts
from appropriations made to the clean streams and clear sky subaccount
shall be deposited into the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount may
be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the subaccount
may be used only for projects and activities authorized under this
chapter and under the clear sky program established in chapter . . .
(Second Substitute House Bill No. 1036), Laws of 2007. No more than
fifty percent of the moneys in the subaccount shall be used for a
single program or technology.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.84.092 and 2006 c 337 s 11, 2006 c 311 s 23, 2006
c 171 s 10, 2006 c 56 s 10, and 2006 c 6 s 8 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the clean streams and clear sky subaccount of the
energy freedom account, the Columbia river basin water supply
development account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the emergency reserve fund, the energy
freedom account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account,
the federal forest revolving account, the freight mobility investment
account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll
lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public works
assistance account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the regional mobility grant
program account, the resource management cost account, the rural
Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement
and sidewalk account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 4 and 8 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---