BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that
increasing the state's investment in renewable energy resources will
provide a number of public benefits, including reducing greenhouse gas
emissions and other pollutants, increasing energy diversity and
security, and furthering economic development opportunities,
particularly in emerging energy technologies. Therefore, to further
these important goals, the legislature intends to establish renewable
energy targets for state agencies that will gradually increase the
state's reliance on renewable energy resources, in the hope that the
state can be a leader in investing in clean, renewable energy
technologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(3) "Eligible renewable energy resource" has the same meaning as in
RCW 19.285.030.
(4) "Pacific Northwest" means the states of Alaska, Idaho, Montana,
Oregon, and Washington, and the Canadian provinces of Alberta and
British Columbia.
(5) "Renewable energy credit" has the same meaning as in RCW
19.285.030.
(6) "State agency" means any state board, commission, bureau,
committee, department, institution, division, or tribunal in the
legislative, executive, or judicial branch of state government, and
includes all elective offices, the state legislature, institutions of
higher education created and supported by state government, and courts
that are fully supported by state government. It does not include
political subdivisions; units of local government; superior, district,
and municipal courts; school districts; municipal corporations; quasi-municipal corporations; special purpose districts; or local service
districts.
(7) "Sustainable energy project" means a project located at a state
facility that utilizes fuel cells, high-efficiency cogeneration with an
efficiency level above seventy percent, and other emerging energy
technologies that reduce air pollution from existing technologies and
have significant potential for commercialization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, each
state agency shall meet the following electricity consumption targets:
(a) The eligible renewable energy resource percentage of total
annual electric usage is at least twenty percent by January 1, 2010;
(b) The eligible renewable energy resource percentage of total
annual electric usage is at least sixty percent by January 1, 2012; and
(c) The eligible renewable energy resource percentage of total
annual electric usage is one hundred percent by January 1, 2014.
(2) These renewable energy targets shall not apply if the
department of general administration is unable to obtain enough
renewable energy resources or renewable energy credits from a facility
in the state or in the Pacific Northwest region to satisfy the targets.
(3) In acquiring resources to meet these renewable energy targets,
the director shall work with the department of general administration.
The director will identify for the department of general administration
the proportional amount of renewable energy resources that are already
included as part of each state agency's electric utility's base
resources, and the additional amount of renewable energy resources or
renewable energy credits necessary to satisfy the targets established
in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) In meeting the renewable energy targets, a state agency may
include the following resources:
(a) A state agency's proportionate amount of renewable energy
resources that are included in their electric utility's base resources;
(b) Direct purchases of renewable energy credits from a provider
other than the utility program;
(c) Eligible renewable energy resources; or
(d) The efficiency savings or reduction in carbon dioxide emissions
that results from a sustainable energy project.
(5) The department may use the annual fuel mixture disclosure data
submitted by all utilities in the state under chapter 19.29A or 19.285
RCW to determine the amount of eligible renewable energy resources in
their utility's base load.
(6) The department of general administration is authorized to
negotiate and purchase on behalf of state agencies renewable energy
credits. The department of general administration shall give priority
to renewable energy credits generated in Washington state. If no
renewable energy credits are available in the state, the department of
general administration may purchase renewable energy credits from the
Pacific Northwest region. The department of general administration
shall retire any renewable energy credit purchased to satisfy a target.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department shall establish a clear
sky program to encourage the development of sustainable energy
technologies such as fuel cells, high-efficiency cogeneration, and
other emerging energy technologies that significantly reduce air
pollution. The director may establish policies and procedures
necessary for processing, reviewing, and approving loan applications
made under this chapter.
(2) The department, in conjunction with the department of general
administration, may submit a request for proposals for potential
sustainable energy projects.
(3) The director may only approve a loan application submitted by
a state agency for a sustainable energy project if the project meets
the following criteria:
(a) The project will use fuel cells, high-efficiency cogeneration,
or an emerging energy technology that significantly reduces air
pollution;
(b) The project is located at a state facility;
(c) The project does not require continued state support; and
(d) The project will be owned by the state once the loan amount has
been satisfied.
(4) The director shall prioritize applications based on the
following criteria:
(a) The extent to which the project will result in carbon dioxide
reduction;
(b) The extent to which the project will result in economic
benefits for the citizens of the state; and
(c) The extent to which the project demonstrates an emerging
technology and assists that technology in moving towards
commercialization.
(5) The director may award a loan application to a state agency
that meets the eligibility criteria under this section.
(6) The director shall enter into agreements with approved state
agencies to fix the terms and rates of the loan award. The agreement
shall include provisions to protect the state's investment, including
a requirement that the state agency enter into contracts with any
partners that may be involved in the use of any funds provided under
this program, including services, facilities, infrastructure, or
equipment. Contracts with any partners shall become part of the
application record.
(7) Any energy efficiency savings generated through operations by
a loan recipient under this section must be used for loan payments
until the loan award has been satisfied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The clean streams and clear sky subaccount
is created as a subaccount of the energy freedom account. All receipts
from appropriations made to the clean streams and clear sky subaccount
shall be deposited into the subaccount. Expenditures from the
subaccount may be used only for projects and activities authorized
under this chapter and under the clean streams program established in
chapter . . . (Proposed Substitute House Bill No. 1035 (H-2146.3/07)),
Laws of 2007. In no circumstances shall more than fifty percent of the
moneys in the subaccount be used for a single program or technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2, 4, and 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---