BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
create a regional process for the siting of new electric transmission
lines related to the national energy policy act of 2005. This regional
process will facilitate the siting of new cross borders electric
transmission lines by providing a "one stop" licensing process. This
act calls for the creation of a legislative task force to establish an
interstate compact to assert jurisdiction over national interest
electric transmission corridors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 80.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A legislative task force on national interest electric
transmission corridors is established, with members as provided in this
subsection.
(i) The chair and the ranking minority member from the senate
water, energy and environment committee;
(ii) The chair and the ranking minority member from the house of
representatives technology, energy and communications committee;
(iii) The governor shall appoint five members representing the
energy facility site evaluation council, local governments, resource
agencies, or other persons with appropriate expertise.
(b) The task force shall choose its cochairs representing the
senate and house of representatives from among its legislative
membership.
(2)(a) The task force shall negotiate the terms of an interstate
compact that establishes a regional process for siting national
interest electric transmission corridors satisfactory to the national
energy policy act of 2005.
(b) In negotiating the terms of the compact, the task force shall
ensure that the compact reflects as close as possible the Washington
state energy facility site evaluation council model under this chapter
and its procedures to ensure appropriate adjudicative proceedings and
mitigation of environmental impacts.
(c) The task force shall negotiate the terms of the compact through
processes established and supported by the Pacific Northwest economic
region for which the state of Washington is a party as referenced in
RCW 43.147.010.
(3) Staff support for the task force members shall be provided from
respective committees and appropriate agencies appointed by the
governor.
(4) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The task force shall report its preliminary recommendations on
the compact to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January
1, 2008.
(6) The task force shall report its final recommendations on the
compact to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September
1, 2008.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---