BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 23B.19.040 and 1997 c 19 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this
title, a target corporation shall not for a period of five years
following the acquiring person's share acquisition time engage in a
significant business transaction unless:
(i) It is exempted by RCW 23B.19.030 ((or unless));
(ii) The significant business transaction or the purchase of shares
made by the acquiring person is approved prior to the acquiring
person's share acquisition time by a majority of the members of the
board of directors of the target corporation; or
(iii) At or subsequent to the acquiring person's share acquisition
time, such significant business transaction is approved by a majority
of the members of the board of directors of the target corporation and
authorized at an annual or special meeting of shareholders, and not by
written consent, by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the
outstanding voting shares, except shares beneficially owned by or under
the voting control of the acquiring person.
(b) If a good faith proposal for a significant business transaction
is made in writing to the board of directors of the target corporation
prior to the significant business transaction or prior to the share
acquisition time, the board of directors shall respond in writing,
within thirty days or such shorter period, if any, as may be required
by the exchange act setting forth its reasons for its decision
regarding the proposal. If a good faith proposal to purchase shares is
made in writing to the board of directors of the target corporation,
the board of directors, unless it responds affirmatively in writing
within thirty days or a shorter period, if any, as may be required by
the exchange act shall be deemed to have disapproved such share
purchase.
(2) Except for a significant business transaction approved under
subsection (1) of this section or exempted by RCW 23B.19.030, in
addition to any other requirement, a target corporation shall not
engage at any time in any significant business transaction described in
RCW 23B.19.020(15) (a) or (e) with any acquiring person of such a
corporation other than a significant business transaction that either
meets all of the conditions of (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection or
meets the conditions of (d) of this subsection:
(a) The aggregate amount of the cash and the market value as of the
consummation date of consideration other than cash to be received per
share by holders of outstanding common shares of such a target
corporation in a significant business transaction is at least equal to
the higher of the following:
(i) The highest per share price paid by such an acquiring person at
a time when the person was the beneficial owner, directly or
indirectly, of five percent or more of the outstanding voting shares of
a target corporation, for any shares of common shares of the same class
or series acquired by it: (A) Within the five-year period immediately
prior to the announcement date with respect to a significant business
transaction; or (B) within the five-year period immediately prior to,
or in, the transaction in which the acquiring person became an
acquiring person, whichever is higher plus, in either case, interest
compounded annually from the earliest date on which the highest per
share acquisition price was paid through the consummation date at the
rate for one-year United States treasury obligations from time to time
in effect; less the aggregate amount of any cash dividends paid, and
the market value of any dividends paid other than in cash, per share of
common shares since the earliest date, up to the amount of the
interest; and
(ii) The market value per share of common shares on the
announcement date with respect to a significant business transaction or
on the date of the acquiring person's share acquisition time, whichever
is higher; plus interest compounded annually from such a date through
the consummation date at the rate for one-year United States treasury
obligations from time to time in effect; less the aggregate amount of
any cash dividends paid, and the market value of any dividends paid
other than in cash, per share of common shares since the date, up to
the amount of the interest.
(b) The aggregate amount of the cash and the market value as of the
consummation date of consideration other than cash to be received per
share by holders of outstanding shares of any class or series of
shares, other than common shares, of the target corporation is at least
equal to the highest of the following, whether or not the acquiring
person has previously acquired any shares of such a class or series of
shares:
(i) The highest per share price paid by an acquiring person at a
time when the person was the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly,
of five percent or more of the outstanding voting shares of a resident
domestic corporation, for any shares of the same class or series of
shares acquired by it: (A) Within the five-year period immediately
prior to the announcement date with respect to a significant business
transaction; or (B) within the five-year period immediately prior to,
or in, the transaction in which the acquiring person became an
acquiring person, whichever is higher; plus, in either case, interest
compounded annually from the earliest date on which the highest per
share acquisition price was paid through the consummation date at the
rate for one-year United States treasury obligations from time to time
in effect; less the aggregate amount of any cash dividends paid, and
the market value of any dividends paid other than in cash, per share of
the same class or series of shares since the earliest date, up to the
amount of the interest;
(ii) The highest preferential amount per share to which the holders
of shares of the same class or series of shares are entitled in the
event of any voluntary liquidation, dissolution, or winding up of the
target corporation, plus the aggregate amount of any dividends declared
or due as to which the holders are entitled prior to payment of
dividends on some other class or series of shares, unless the aggregate
amount of the dividends is included in the preferential amount; and
(iii) The market value per share of the same class or series of
shares on the announcement date with respect to a significant business
transaction or on the date of the acquiring person's share acquisition
time, whichever is higher; plus interest compounded annually from such
a date through the consummation date at the rate for one-year United
States treasury obligations from time to time in effect; less the
aggregate amount of any cash dividends paid and the market value of any
dividends paid other than in cash, per share of the same class or
series of shares since the date, up to the amount of the interest.
(c) The consideration to be received by holders of a particular
class or series of outstanding shares, including common shares, of the
target corporation in a significant business transaction is in cash or
in the same form as the acquiring person has used to acquire the
largest number of shares of the same class or series of shares
previously acquired by the person, and the consideration shall be
distributed promptly.
(d) The significant business transaction is approved at an annual
meeting of shareholders, or special meeting of shareholders called for
such a purpose, no earlier than five years after the acquiring person's
share acquisition time, by a majority of the votes entitled to be
counted within each voting group entitled to vote separately on the
transaction. The votes of all outstanding shares entitled to vote
under this title or the articles of incorporation shall be entitled to
be counted under this subsection except that the votes of shares as to
which an acquiring person has beneficial ownership or voting control
may not be counted to determine whether shareholders have approved a
transaction for purposes of this subsection. The votes of shares as to
which an acquiring person has beneficial ownership or voting control
shall, however, be counted in determining whether a transaction is
approved under other sections of this title and for purposes of
determining a quorum.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to a target
corporation that on June 6, 1996, had a provision in its articles of
incorporation, adopted under RCW 23B.17.020(3)(d), expressly electing
not to be covered under RCW 23B.17.020, which is repealed by section 6,
chapter 155, Laws of 1996.
(4) A significant business transaction that is made in violation of
subsection (1) or (2) of this section and that is not exempt under RCW
23B.19.030 is void.

--- END ---