BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.45.030 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning ((April 1, 2004)) September 1, 2007, and every
((four)) two years thereafter, the state actuary shall submit to the
council information regarding the experience and financial condition of
each state retirement system, and make recommendations regarding the
long-term economic assumptions set forth in RCW 41.45.035. The council
shall review this and such other information as it may require.
(2) By ((May 31, 2004)) October 31, 2007, and every ((four)) two
years thereafter, the council, by affirmative vote of four
councilmembers, may adopt changes to the long-term economic assumptions
established in RCW 41.45.035. Any changes adopted by the council shall
be subject to revision by the legislature.
The council shall consult with the economic and revenue forecast
supervisor and the executive director of the state investment board,
and shall consider long-term historical averages, in reviewing possible
changes to the economic assumptions.
(3) The assumptions and the asset value smoothing technique
established in RCW 41.45.035, as modified in the future by the council
or legislature, shall be used by the state actuary in conducting all
actuarial studies of the state retirement systems, including actuarial
fiscal notes under RCW 44.44.040. The assumptions shall also be used
for the administration of benefits under the retirement plans listed in
RCW 41.45.020, pursuant to timelines and conditions established by
department rules.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.45.060 and 2005 c 370 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state actuary shall provide preliminary actuarial valuation
results based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing
technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted ((by the council)) under
RCW 41.45.030 or 41.45.035.
(2) Not later than ((September 30, 2002)) July 31, 2008, and every
two years thereafter, consistent with the economic assumptions and
asset value smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted
under RCW 41.45.030 or 41.45.035, the council shall adopt and may make
changes to:
(a) A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1;
(b) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the Washington
state patrol retirement system ((to be used in the ensuing biennial
period)); and
(c) ((A)) Basic employer contribution rates for the school
employees' retirement system and the public safety employees'
retirement system for funding both those systems and the public
employees' retirement system plan 1.
The council may adopt annual rate changes for any plan for any
rate-setting period. The contribution rates adopted by the council
shall be subject to revision by the legislature.
(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the
council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:
(a) To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
1 not later than June 30, 2024; and
(b) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2
and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety
employees' retirement system plan 2, and the school employees'
retirement system plans 2 and 3 in accordance with RCW 41.45.061,
41.45.067, and this section.
(4) The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate
a combined plan 2 and 3 employer contribution rate and a Washington
state patrol retirement system contribution rate.
(5) The council shall immediately notify the directors of the
office of financial management and department of retirement systems of
the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative
modifications.
(6) The director shall collect those rates adopted by the council.
The rates established in RCW 41.45.062, or by the council, shall be
subject to revision by the legislature.
(7) The state actuary shall prepare final actuarial valuation
results based on the economic assumptions, asset value smoothing
technique, and contribution rates included in or adopted under RCW
41.45.030, 41.45.035, and this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.45.0604 and 2003 c 92 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Not later than ((September 30, 2004)) July 31, 2008, and every
even-numbered year thereafter, the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' plan 2 retirement board shall adopt contribution rates for
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
2 as provided in RCW 41.26.720(1)(a).
(2) The law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
retirement board shall immediately notify the directors of the office
of financial management and department of retirement systems of the
state, employer, and employee rates adopted. Thereafter, the director
shall collect those rates adopted by the board. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative
modifications.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.45.061 and 2004 c 242 s 40 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The required contribution rate for members of the plan 2
teachers' retirement system shall be fixed at the rates in effect on
July 1, 1996, subject to the following:
(a) Beginning September 1, 1997, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, the employee contribution rate shall not exceed the
employer plan 2 and 3 rates adopted under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.054, and
41.45.070 for the teachers' retirement system;
(b) In addition, the employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall be
increased by fifty percent of the contribution rate increase caused by
any plan 2 benefit increase passed after July 1, 1996;
(c) In addition, the employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall
not be increased as a result of any distributions pursuant to section
309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998 and RCW 41.31A.020.
(2) The required contribution rate for members of the school
employees' retirement system plan 2 shall equal the school employees'
retirement system employer plan 2 and 3 contribution rate adopted under
RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.054, and 41.45.070, except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The member contribution rate for the school employees'
retirement system plan 2 shall be increased by fifty percent of the
contribution rate increase caused by any plan 2 benefit increase passed
after September 1, 2000.
(4) The required contribution rate for members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 shall be set at the same rate as
the employer combined plan 2 and plan 3 rate.
(5) The required contribution rate for members of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 shall
be set at fifty percent of the cost of the retirement system.
(6) The employee contribution rates for plan 2 under subsections
(3) and (4) of this section shall not include any increase as a result
of any distributions pursuant to RCW 41.31A.020 and 41.31A.030.
(7) The required plan 2 and 3 contribution rates for employers
shall be adopted in the manner described in RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.054,
and 41.45.070.
(8) The required contribution rate for members of the public safety
employees' retirement system plan 2 shall be set at fifty percent of
the cost of the retirement system.
(9) Concurrently with the adoption of employer contribution rates,
the state actuary shall calculate the required contribution rates for
plan 2 members, which are fixed in accordance with this section. Upon
adoption of employer contribution rates, the state actuary shall
immediately notify the directors of the office of financial management
and department of retirement systems of the required contribution rates
for members, which shall be effective for the ensuing rate-setting
period.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.45.0631 and 2006 c 94 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2001, the required contribution rate for members
of the Washington state patrol retirement system shall be two percent
or equal to the employer rate adopted under RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070
for the Washington state patrol retirement system, whichever is
greater. The employee contribution rate shall not, however, include
any increase as a result of distributions under RCW 43.43.270(2) for
survivors of members who became disabled under RCW 43.43.040(2) prior
to July 1, 2006. Concurrently with the adoption of the employer
contribution rate for the Washington state patrol retirement system,
the state actuary shall calculate the required contribution rate for
members, which is fixed in accordance with this section. The state
actuary shall immediately notify the directors of the office of
financial management and department of retirement systems of the
required contribution rate for members, which shall be effective for
the ensuing rate-setting period.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.45.110 and 2003 c 295 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The pension funding council shall solicit and administer a biennial
actuarial audit of the preliminary and final actuarial valuations used
for employer and member rate-setting purposes. This audit will be
conducted concurrent with the actuarial valuation performed by the
state actuary. At least once in each six-year period, the pension
funding council shall solicit and administer an actuarial audit of the
results of the experience study required in RCW 41.45.090. Upon
receipt of the results of the preliminary actuarial audits required by
this section, and at least thirty days prior to adopting contribution
rates, the pension funding council shall submit the results to the
select committee on pension policy.

--- END ---