BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.212 and 1989 c 353 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of licensing shall notify the public of the
requirements of RCW 46.30.020 through 46.30.040 at the time of new
vehicle registration and when the department sends a registration
renewal notice.
(2) When the department sends a vehicle license renewal notice to
a registered owner who has previously failed to respond to a random
sampling program request under section 3 of this act, it shall also
provide notice of the requirement for proof of meeting the financial
responsibility requirements and payment of the fifty-dollar penalty
imposed under section 3 of this act in order to renew the license.
(3) The department shall not renew a vehicle license due for
renewal January 1, 2009, or after for a registered owner who has
previously failed to respond to a random sampling program request under
section 3 of this act, unless the applicant provides proof of meeting
the financial responsibility requirements for operating a motor vehicle
as provided in RCW 46.30.020 and pays the fifty-dollar penalty imposed
under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.210 and 2001 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the application and proper fee for original
vehicle license, the director shall make a recheck of the application
and in the event that there is any error in the application it may be
returned to the county auditor or other agent to effectively secure the
correction of such error, who shall return the same corrected to the
director.
(2) Application for the renewal of a vehicle license shall be made
to the director or his agents, including county auditors, by the
registered owner on a form prescribed by the director. The application
must be accompanied by the payment of such license fees and excise tax
as may be required by law. Such application shall be handled in the
same manner and the fees transmitted to the state treasurer in the same
manner as in the case of an original application. Any such application
which upon validation becomes a renewal certificate need not have
entered upon it the name of the lien holder, if any, of the vehicle
concerned.
(3) Persons expecting to be out of the state during the normal
renewal period of a vehicle license may secure renewal of such vehicle
license and have license plates or tabs preissued by making application
to the director or his agents upon forms prescribed by the director.
The application must be accompanied by such license fees, and excise
tax as may be required by law.
(4) Every applicant for renewal of a vehicle license due for
renewal January 1, 2009, or after, who has previously failed to respond
to a random sampling program request under section 3 of this act, shall
provide current proof of financial responsibility to operate a vehicle
as required in RCW 46.30.020 and pay the fifty-dollar penalty imposed
under section 3 of this act. The department may adopt rules regarding
valid proof of financial responsibility for persons renewing a vehicle
license and establish conditions under which the penalty imposed under
section 3 of this act will not be assessed when a failure to respond to
a random sampling request is beyond the control of the applicant.
Conditions for not assessing the penalty may include, but are not
limited to, delays caused by extended hospitalization or illness of the
applicant.
(5) Application for the annual renewal of a vehicle license number
plate to the director or the director's agents shall not be required
for those vehicles owned, rented, or leased by the state of Washington,
or by any county, city, town, school district, or other political
subdivision of the state of Washington or a governing body of an Indian
tribe located within this state and recognized as a governmental entity
by the United States department of the interior.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.29 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a random sampling program to
determine if registered vehicle owners meet the financial
responsibility requirements to operate a vehicle as required in RCW
46.30.020.
(2) The department shall select no more than three percent of
registered vehicles per year in monthly increments and send the
registered owner of each vehicle selected a form requesting that the
owner provide proof of financial responsibility to operate a vehicle as
required in RCW 46.30.020 for a randomly selected date during the last
registration period.
(3) If the registered owner fails to provide proof of financial
responsibility to operate a vehicle as required in RCW 46.30.020, as
requested by the department, within forty-five days of the date shown
on the request, the registered owner shall be assessed a penalty of
fifty dollars to be collected before the registered owner may renew the
vehicle registration.
(4) The department shall administer and collect the fifty-dollar
penalty. The department shall deduct an amount equal to the
administration and collection expenses. The department shall deposit
any remaining proceeds under this subsection to the financial
responsibility education account created in section 4 of this act for
use in public information campaigns to educate the public regarding the
financial responsibility requirements under this chapter and chapter
46.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.29 RCW
to read as follows:
The financial responsibility education account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. After the deduction of administration
and collection expenses incurred by the department, all receipts from
the fifty-dollar penalty imposed under section 3 of this act must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for public information campaigns to educate the public regarding
the financial responsibility requirements under this chapter and
chapter 46.30 RCW. Only the director of the department of licensing or
the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditure.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.30.040 and 1991 sp.s. c 25 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who knowingly provides false evidence of financial
responsibility to a law enforcement officer ((or)), to a court, or to
the department of licensing on an application for renewal of a vehicle
license, including an expired or canceled insurance policy, bond, or
certificate of deposit is guilty of a misdemeanor.

--- END ---