BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The sum of four million dollars is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, from the general
fund to the mobile home park relocation fund, to be used for payment of
mobile home relocation expenses under the mobile home relocation
assistance program.

--- END ---