BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) There are students with disabilities throughout the state of
Washington who have attended four years of high school but whose
individualized education programs prescribe the continuation of special
education and related services beyond the fourth year of high school;
(2) Through their participation in the public schools and the
community, students with disabilities frequently become identified with
and connected to a group of peers who will graduate in four years and
participate in a high school graduation ceremony;
(3) A high school graduation ceremony is an important rite of
passage for all students regardless of their abilities or limitations;
(4) There is significant value in recognizing students' attendance
and accomplishments in their individualized education programs; and
(5) There is significant value in allowing students with
disabilities to participate in high school graduation ceremonies and
activities with their peers, regardless of their continuing enrollment
in special education and related services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2007, each school district that operates a high
school shall permit any student meeting the following criteria to
participate in commencement exercises with the student's graduating
class and be recognized for their accomplishments:
(a) The student is receiving services under this chapter;
(b) The student's individualized education program prescribes
continued special education or related services beyond the fourth year
of high school; and
(c) The student has attended four years of high school.
(2) A student's participation in commencement exercises under this
section shall not affect the student's possible future receipt of a
high school diploma, a certificate of individual achievement under RCW
28A.155.045, or a certificate of academic achievement under RCW
28A.655.061.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act shall be known as "Kevin's law" in
honor of Kevin Britt.

--- END ---