BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the goal of
Washington's education reform is for all students to meet rigorous
academic standards so that they are prepared for success in college,
work, and life. Educators know that not all students learn at the same
rate or in the same way. Some students will take longer to meet the
state's standards for high school graduation. Older students who
cannot graduate with their peers need an appropriate learning
environment and flexible programming that enables them simultaneously
to earn a diploma, work, and pursue other training options. Providing
learning options in locations in addition to high schools will
encourage older students to complete their diplomas. The legislature
further finds that the state's commitment to providing a basic
education for all public school students under the age of twenty-one
should continue until a student earns a diploma. Therefore the
legislature intends to expand high school completion programs at
community and technical colleges for older students who have not yet
received a diploma but are eligible for state basic education support.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.535 and 1991 c 238 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
A community or technical college may issue a high school diploma or
certificate, subject to rules ((and regulations promulgated)) adopted
by the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of
education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In accordance with this section, each community or technical
college shall make available courses or a program of study, on the
college campus, designed to enable students under the age of twenty-one
who have completed all state and local high school graduation
requirements except the certificate of academic achievement or
certificate of individual achievement to complete their high school
education and obtain a high school diploma.
(a) Colleges may make courses or programs under this section
available by entering into contracts with local school districts to
deliver the courses or programs. Colleges that offer courses or
programs under contract shall be reimbursed for each enrolled eligible
student as provided in the contract, and the high school diploma shall
be issued by the local school district;
(b) Colleges may deliver courses or programs under this section
directly. Colleges that deliver courses or programs directly shall be
reimbursed for each enrolled eligible student as provided in section 4
of this act, and the high school diploma shall be issued by the
college; or
(c) Colleges may make courses or programs under this section
available through a combination of contracts with local school
districts, collaboration with educational service districts, and direct
service delivery. Colleges may also make courses or programs under
this section available for students at locations in addition to the
college campus but not on a high school campus.
(2) Regardless of the service delivery method chosen, colleges
shall ensure that all eligible students have an opportunity to enroll
in a course or program under this section.
(3) Colleges shall not require students enrolled under this section
to pay tuition or services and activities fees, however this waiver of
tuition and services and activities fees shall be in effect only for
those courses that lead to a high school diploma.
(4) Nothing in this section or section 4 of this act precludes a
community or technical college from offering courses or a program of
study for students other than eligible students as defined by section
4 of this act to obtain a high school diploma, nor is intended to
restrict diploma completion programs offered by school districts or
educational service districts. Community and technical colleges and
school districts are encouraged to consult with educational service
districts in the development and delivery of programs and courses
required under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section and section 3 of this act,
"eligible student" means a student who has completed all state and
local high school graduation requirements except the certificate of
academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of
individual achievement under RCW 28A.155.045, and who is less than age
twenty-one as of September 1st of the academic year the student enrolls
at a community and technical college under this section.
(2) An eligible student may enroll in courses or a program of study
made available by a community or technical college under section 3 of
this act for the purpose of obtaining a high school diploma.
(3) For eligible students in courses or programs delivered directly
by the community or technical college under section 3 of this act and
only for enrollment in courses that lead to a high school diploma, the
superintendent of public instruction shall transmit to the college an
amount per each full-time equivalent college student at statewide
uniform rates. The amount shall be the sum of (a), (b), (c), and (d)
of this subsection, as applicable.
(a) The superintendent shall separately calculate and allocate
moneys appropriated for basic education under RCW 28A.150.260 for
purposes of making payments under this section. The calculations and
allocations shall be based upon the estimated statewide annual average
per full-time equivalent high school student allocations under RCW
28A.150.260, excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable
rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(b) The superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to the per
funded student state allocation for the learning assistance program
under chapter 28A.165 RCW for each full-time equivalent college student
or a pro rata amount for less than full-time enrollment.
(c) The superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to the per
full-time equivalent student allocation for the student achievement
program under RCW 28A.505.210 for each full-time equivalent college
student or a pro rata amount for less than full-time enrollment.
(d) For eligible students who meet eligibility criteria for the
state transitional bilingual instruction program under chapter 28A.180
RCW, the superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to the per
student state allocation for the transitional bilingual instruction
program or a pro rata amount for less than full-time enrollment.
(4) The superintendent may adopt rules establishing enrollment
reporting, recordkeeping, and accounting requirements necessary to
ensure accountability for the use of basic education, learning
assistance, and transitional bilingual program funds under this
section.
(5) All school districts shall provide information about the high
school completion option under section 3 of this act to students in
grades ten, eleven, and twelve and the parents or guardians of those
students.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.230.120 and 2003 c 234 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School districts shall issue diplomas to students signifying
graduation from high school upon the students' satisfactory completion
of all local and state graduation requirements. Districts shall grant
students the option of receiving a final transcript in addition to the
regular diploma. Students who satisfactorily complete all local and
state graduation requirements except the certificate of academic
achievement under RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual
achievement under RCW 28A.155.045 may participate in high school
graduation ceremonies.
(2) School districts or schools of attendance shall establish
policies and procedures to notify senior students of the transcript
option and shall direct students to indicate their decisions in a
timely manner. School districts shall make appropriate provisions to
assure that students who choose to receive a copy of their final
transcript shall receive such transcript after graduation.
(3)(a) A school district may issue a high school diploma to a
person who:
(i) Is an honorably discharged member of the armed forces of the
United States;
(ii) Was scheduled to graduate from high school in the years 1940
through 1955; and
(iii) Left high school before graduation to serve in World War II
or the Korean conflict.
(b) A school district may issue a diploma to or on behalf of a
person otherwise eligible under (a) of this subsection notwithstanding
the fact that the person holds a high school equivalency certification
or is deceased.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt a form for
a diploma application to be used by a veteran or a person acting on
behalf of a deceased veteran under this subsection (3). The
superintendent of public instruction shall specify what constitutes
acceptable evidence of eligibility for a diploma.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2006 c 115 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045, acquisition of the certificate is required for graduation
from a public high school but is not the only requirement for
graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once
objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection
(10) of this section, a student may use the objective alternative
assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully meets the
state standards for that content area if the student has retaken the
Washington assessment of student learning at least once. If the
student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2010, a student must
meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content
areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the Washington
assessment of student learning or the objective alternative assessments
in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) Beginning in 2006, school districts must make available to
students the following options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall pilot
opportunities for retaking the high school assessment beginning in the
2004-05 school year. Beginning no later than September 2006,
opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year shall be
available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process, for students to
demonstrate achievement of the state academic standards. The objective
alternative assessments shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning and be objective in its determination of
student achievement of the state standards. Before any objective
alternative assessments in addition to those authorized in RCW
28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a student to
demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content
area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally
approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(b) A student's score on the mathematics portion of the preliminary
scholastic assessment test (PSAT), the scholastic assessment test
(SAT), or the American college test (ACT) may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the mathematics standards for the
certificate of academic achievement. The state board of education
shall identify the scores students must achieve on the mathematics
portion of the PSAT, SAT, or ACT to meet or exceed the state standard
for mathematics. The state board of education shall identify the first
scores by December 1, 2006, and thereafter may increase but not
decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state
standard for mathematics.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for students as provided in this subsection (12).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year. The plan shall include the courses,
competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the student to meet
state academic standards and stay on track for graduation. If
applicable, the plan shall also include the high school completion
option created under section 3 of this act. This requirement shall be
phased in as follows:
(i) Beginning no later than the 2004-05 school year ninth grade
students as described in this subsection (12)(a) shall have a plan.
(ii) Beginning no later than the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter eighth grade students as described in this subsection
(12)(a) shall have a plan.
(iii) The parent or guardian shall be notified, preferably through
a parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was unsuccessful, strategies to help them improve their student's
skills, and the content of the student's plan.
(iv) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.
(b) Beginning with the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter, all fifth grade students who were not successful in one or
more of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment of
student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of a student described in this
subsection (12)(b) shall be notified, preferably through a parent
conference, of the student's results on the Washington assessment of
student learning, actions the school intends to take to improve the
student's skills in any content area in which the student was
unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them improve their
student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.15.520 and 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the community colleges may:
(1) Waive all or a portion of tuition fees and services and
activities fees for:
(a) Students nineteen years of age or older who are eligible for
resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 through
28B.15.015 ((and)), who enroll in a course of study or program which
will enable them to finish their high school education and obtain a
high school diploma or certificate, but who are not eligible students
as defined by section 4 of this act; and
(b) Children of any law enforcement officer or fire fighter who
lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty
while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full time or
volunteer fire department in this state: PROVIDED, That such persons
may receive the waiver only if they begin their course of study at a
community college within ten years of their graduation from high
school;
(2) Waive all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees
differential for:
(a) Nonresident students enrolled in a community college course of
study or program which will enable them to finish their high school
education and obtain a high school diploma or certificate but who are
not eligible students as defined by section 4 of this act. The waiver
shall be in effect only for those courses which lead to a high school
diploma or certificate; and
(b) Up to forty percent of the students enrolled in the regional
education program for deaf students, subject to federal funding of such
program.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2006 c 161 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(3) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2009-10, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2008-09 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
under RCW 28C.04.610.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
under section 3 of this act for the purpose of obtaining a high school
diploma.
(8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the University
of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases beginning
in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to assist needy
low and middle income resident law students.
(((8))) (9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09,
institutions of higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten
percent of all revenues received as a result of graduate academic
school tuition increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through
academic year 2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident
graduate academic students.

--- END ---