BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.120.080 and 2000 c 171 s 72 are each amended to
read as follows:
Without limiting the other provisions of this chapter, the
following specific rights and prohibitions shall govern the relation
between the motor fuel refiner-supplier and the motor fuel retailers:
(1) The parties shall deal with each other in good faith.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter and without limiting its
general application, it shall be an unfair or deceptive act or practice
or an unfair method of competition and therefore unlawful and a
violation of this chapter for any person to:
(a) Require a motor fuel retailer to purchase or lease goods or
services of the motor fuel refiner-supplier or from approved sources of
supply unless and to the extent that the motor fuel refiner-supplier
satisfies the burden of proving that such restrictive purchasing
agreements are reasonably necessary for a lawful purpose justified on
business grounds, and do not substantially affect competition:
PROVIDED, That this provision shall not apply to the initial inventory
of the motor fuel franchise. In determining whether a requirement to
purchase or lease goods or services constitutes an unfair or deceptive
act or practice or an unfair method of competition the courts shall be
guided by the decisions of the courts of the United States interpreting
and applying the anti-trust laws of the United States.
(b) Discriminate between motor fuel retailers in the charges
offered or made for royalties, goods, services, equipment, rentals,
advertising services, or in any other business dealing, unless and to
the extent that the motor fuel refiner-supplier satisfies the burden of
proving that any classification of or discrimination between motor fuel
retailers is reasonable, is based on motor fuel franchises granted at
materially different times and such discrimination is reasonably
related to such difference in time or on other proper and justifiable
distinctions considering the purposes of this chapter, and is not
arbitrary.
(c) Sell, rent, or offer to sell to a motor fuel retailer any
product or service for more than a fair and reasonable price.
(d) Require a motor fuel retailer to assent to a release,
assignment, novation, or waiver which would relieve any person from
liability imposed by this chapter.
(e) Threaten, harass, or coerce or attempt to coerce a motor fuel
retailer for the purpose of compelling the retailer to refrain from
purchasing or selling alternative motor fuel from a person or firm
other than the refiner-supplier.
(3) Any provision of a franchise that prohibits a motor fuel
retailer from purchasing or selling an alternative motor fuel from a
person or firm other than the refiner-supplier, or limits the quantity
of motor fuel to be purchased from the other person or firm, or any
provision of a franchise which directly or indirectly discourages a
motor fuel retailer from purchasing or selling alternative motor fuels
from other persons or firms, is null and void as it pertains to that
particular alternative motor fuel if the refiner-supplier does not
supply or offer to supply to the motor fuel retailer alternative motor
fuel. Nothing in this subsection grants to any motor fuel retailer any
rights, authority, or obligation with respect to the permissible uses
of the premises or facilities owned, leased, or controlled by a
refiner-supplier under the terms of the franchise.

--- END ---