BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.105.032 and 1999 c 241 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created the Washington state information services
board. The board shall be composed of fifteen members. Eight members
shall be appointed by the governor, one of whom shall be a
representative of higher education, one of whom shall be a
representative of an agency under a statewide elected official other
than the governor, one of whom must have direct experience using the
software projects overseen by the board or reasonably expects to use
the new software developed under the oversight of the board, and two of
whom shall be representatives of the private sector. One member shall
represent the judicial branch and be appointed by the chief justice of
the supreme court. One member shall be the superintendent of public
instruction or shall be appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction. Two members shall represent the house of representatives
and shall be selected by the speaker of the house of representatives
with one representative chosen from each caucus of the house of
representatives; two members shall represent the senate and shall be
appointed by the president of the senate with one representative chosen
from each caucus of the senate. One member shall be the director who
shall be a voting member of the board. These members shall constitute
the membership of the board with full voting rights. Members of the
board shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority. The
board shall select a chairperson from among its members.
Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner that the original
appointments were made.
A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum
for the transaction of business.
Members of the board shall be compensated for service on the board
in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

--- END ---