BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) State agencies that own and operate
refueling stations shall provide the following information to the
legislature by December 31, 2009:
(a) At which refueling sites it is practicable to offer alternative
fuels for use by other state agencies and, if it is not practicable,
why not. They must specify what practical limitations exist at each
refueling site that make offering alternative fuel more or less
difficult. Include a priority list on which stations would be most
feasible to offer alternative fuels, as well as what types of
alternative fuels are feasible at each refueling location;
(b) At which refueling sites it is practicable to offer alternative
fuels for public use, and why or why not. They must specify what
practical limitations exist at each refueling site that make offering
alternative fuel more or less difficult. Include a priority list on
which stations would be most feasible to offer alternative fuels to the
public, as well as what types of alternative fuels are feasible at each
refueling location. Include any concerns for offering alternative
fuels to the public including, but not limited to, liability and tax
issues;
(c) Details of the agency's plans for renovating existing refueling
stations or construction of new refueling stations and the associated
costs;
(d) The cost to reconfigure existing refueling stations or
construction of new refueling stations to include alternative fuels,
and to offer alternative fuels at those stations to other state
agencies.
(2) For purposes of this section, "alternative fuels" include, but
are not limited to biodiesel, ethanol (E85), hydrogen, and liquid
natural gas.

--- END ---