BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.120.010 and 1989 c 11 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advertisement" means any written or printed communication or
any communication by means of ((recorded telephone messages or spoken
on radio, television,)) telecommunications technologies, electronic
voice, text, or data transmissions, broadcast media, or similar
communication media published in connection with an offer or sale of a
franchise.
(2) "Affiliate" means any person, firm, or corporation who controls
or is controlled by any motor fuel refiner-supplier, and includes any
subsidiary or affiliated corporation in which the motor fuel refiner-
supplier or its shareholders, officers, agents, or employees hold or
control more than twenty-five percent of the voting shares.
(3) "Alcohol fuel" means any alcohol made from a product other than
petroleum or natural gas that is used alone or in combination with
gasoline or other petroleum products for use as a fuel in self-propelled motor vehicles.
(4) "Biodiesel fuel" means the monoalkyl esters of long chain fatty
acids derived from plant or animal matter that meet the registration
requirements for fuels and fuel additives established by the federal
environmental protection agency and standards by the American society
of testing and materials.
(5) "Community interest" means a continuing financial interest
between the motor fuel refiner-supplier and motor fuel retailer in the
operation of the franchise business.
(((4))) (6) "Motor fuel" means gasoline or diesel fuel of a type
distributed for use in self-propelled motor vehicles and includes
gasohol.
(((5))) (7) "Motor fuel franchise" means any oral or written
contract, either expressed or implied, between a motor fuel refiner-supplier and motor fuel retailer under which the motor fuel retailer is
supplied motor fuel for resale to the public under a trademark owned or
controlled by the motor fuel refiner-supplier or for sale on commission
or for a fee to the public, or any agreements between a motor fuel
refiner-supplier and motor fuel retailer under which the retailer is
permitted to occupy premises owned, leased, or controlled by the
refiner-supplier for the purpose of engaging in the retail sale of
motor fuel under a trademark owned or controlled by the motor fuel
refiner-supplier supplied by the motor fuel refiner-supplier.
(((6))) (8) "Motor fuel refiner-supplier" means any person, firm,
or corporation, including any affiliate of the person, firm, or
corporation, engaged in the refining of crude oil into petroleum who
supplies motor fuel for sale, consignment, or distribution through
retail outlets.
(((7))) (9) "Motor fuel retailer" means a person, firm, or
corporation that resells motor fuel entirely at one or more retail
motor fuel outlets pursuant to a motor fuel franchise entered into with
a refiner-supplier.
(((8))) (10) "Offer or offer to sell" includes every attempt or
offer to dispose of or solicitation of an offer to buy a franchise or
an interest in a franchise.
(((9))) (11) "Person" means a natural person, corporation,
partnership, trust, or other entity and in the case of an entity, it
shall include any other entity which has a majority interest in such an
entity or effectively controls such other entity as well as the
individual officers, directors, and other persons in act of control of
the activities of each such entity.
(((10))) (12) "Price" means the net purchase price, after
adjustment for commission, brokerage, rebate, discount, services or
facilities furnished, or other such adjustment.
(((11))) (13) "Publish" means publicly to issue or circulate by
((newspaper, mail, radio, or television)) using print media, electronic
voice, text, or data transmissions, or other broadcast media or
otherwise to disseminate to the public.
(((12))) (14) "Retail motor fuel outlet" means any location where
motor fuel is distributed for purposes other than resale.
(((13))) (15) "Sale or sell" includes every contract of sale,
contract to sell, or disposition of a franchise.
(((14))) (16) "Trademark" means any trademark, trade name, service
mark, or other identifying symbol or name.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.120.080 and 2000 c 171 s 72 are each amended to
read as follows:
Without limiting the other provisions of this chapter, the
following specific rights and prohibitions shall govern the relation
between the motor fuel refiner-supplier and the motor fuel retailers:
(1) The parties shall deal with each other in good faith.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter and without limiting its
general application, it shall be an unfair or deceptive act or practice
or an unfair method of competition and therefore unlawful and a
violation of this chapter for any person to:
(a) Require a motor fuel retailer to purchase or lease goods or
services of the motor fuel refiner-supplier or from approved sources of
supply unless and to the extent that the motor fuel refiner-supplier
satisfies the burden of proving that such restrictive purchasing
agreements are reasonably necessary for a lawful purpose justified on
business grounds, and do not substantially affect competition:
PROVIDED, That this provision shall not apply to the initial inventory
of the motor fuel franchise. In determining whether a requirement to
purchase or lease goods or services constitutes an unfair or deceptive
act or practice or an unfair method of competition the courts shall be
guided by the decisions of the courts of the United States interpreting
and applying the anti-trust laws of the United States.
(b) Discriminate between motor fuel retailers in the charges
offered or made for royalties, goods, services, equipment, rentals,
advertising services, or in any other business dealing, unless and to
the extent that the motor fuel refiner-supplier satisfies the burden of
proving that any classification of or discrimination between motor fuel
retailers is reasonable, is based on motor fuel franchises granted at
materially different times and such discrimination is reasonably
related to such difference in time or on other proper and justifiable
distinctions considering the purposes of this chapter, and is not
arbitrary.
(c) Sell, rent, or offer to sell to a motor fuel retailer any
product or service for more than a fair and reasonable price.
(d) Require a motor fuel retailer to assent to a release,
assignment, novation, or waiver which would relieve any person from
liability imposed by this chapter.
(e) Prohibit or in any way prevent a motor fuel retailer from
offering and selling, consistent with all other applicable federal or
state laws, any of the following fuels for use in self-propelled motor
vehicles:
(i) Compressed natural gas;
(ii) Liquefied natural gas;
(iii) Liquefied petroleum gas;
(iv) Hydrogen;
(v) Electricity;
(vi) Methanol, ethanol, and other alcohol fuel;
(vii) Biodiesel;
(viii) Mixtures containing methanol, ethanol, other alcohol fuel,
or biodiesel, mixed with diesel, gasoline, or other fuels;
(ix) Fuels other than alcohol fuel that are derived from biological
materials; and
(x) Any other fuel the secretary of the United States department of
energy determines by regulation to be an alternative fuel within the
meaning of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 13211(2) until the legislature acts to add
the fuel to the list in this subsection or to clearly reject the fuel
from being added to the list in this subsection.
(f) Discriminate between motor fuel retailers based on a motor fuel
retailer's decision to offer and sell, consistent with all other
applicable federal or state laws, any of the following fuels for use in
self-propelled motor vehicles:
(i) Compressed natural gas;
(ii) Liquefied natural gas;
(iii) Liquefied petroleum gas;
(iv) Hydrogen;
(v) Electricity;
(vi) Methanol, ethanol, and other alcohol fuel;
(vii) Biodiesel;
(viii) Mixtures containing methanol, ethanol, other alcohol fuel,
or biodiesel mixed with gasoline or other fuels;
(ix) Fuels other than alcohol fuel that are derived from biological
materials; and
(x) Any other fuel the secretary of the United States department of
energy determines by regulation to be an alternative fuel within the
meaning of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 13211(2) until the legislature acts to add
the fuel to the list in this subsection or to clearly reject the fuel
from being added to the list in this subsection.
(g) In addition to other remedies available under this chapter,
violations of (e) or (f) of this subsection shall be subject to a civil
penalty of not less than five thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies prospectively only and not
retroactively. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
invalidate actions taken by motor fuel refiner-suppliers and motor fuel
retailers prior to the effective date of this section.

--- END ---