BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.50.060 and 2006 c 196 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall apply to the construction
of energy facilities which includes the new construction of energy
facilities and the reconstruction or enlargement of existing energy
facilities where the net increase in physical capacity or dimensions
resulting from such reconstruction or enlargement meets or exceeds
those capacities or dimensions set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (7) and (14).
No construction of such energy facilities may be undertaken, except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, after July 15, 1977, without first
obtaining certification in the manner provided in this chapter.
(2) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction,
reconstruction, or enlargement of a new or existing energy facility
that exclusively uses alternative energy resources and chooses to
receive certification under this chapter, regardless of the generating
capacity of the project. If a project using alternative energy
resources is first denied by a local government, the council shall not
accept an application for a similar project in a similar geographic
area for two years from the date of denial by the local government.
(3) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction of new
electrical transmission facilities or the modification of existing
electrical transmission facilities in a national interest electric
transmission corridor designated by the secretary.
(4) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to normal
maintenance and repairs which do not increase the capacity or
dimensions beyond those set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (7) and (14).
(5) Applications for certification of energy facilities made prior
to July 15, 1977 shall continue to be governed by the applicable
provisions of law in effect on the day immediately preceding July 15,
1977 with the exceptions of RCW 80.50.190 and 80.50.071 which shall
apply to such prior applications and to site certifications
prospectively from July 15, 1977.
(6) Applications for certification shall be upon forms prescribed
by the council and shall be supported by such information and technical
studies as the council may require.

--- END ---