BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person in this state has the right to choose any automobile
glass repair or replacement facility for the repair of a loss relating
to motor vehicle glass.
(2) An insurer or its third-party administrator shall not interfere
with the right established in this subsection.
(3) After a person making a claim for a loss that only involves
glass informs an insurer or third-party administrator that the person
has chosen an automobile glass repair or replacement facility to
conduct the repairs, the insurer or third-party administrator shall not
recommend that a different automobile glass repair or replacement
facility be chosen to conduct the repairs.
(4) An insurer or its third-party administrator processing a claim
for a loss that only involves glass shall:
(a) Verbally inform the person making the claim of loss of the
right established under this section at the same time any information
about the automobile glass repair or replacement facility is discussed;
and
(b) Verbally inform the person making the claim of loss that the
third-party administrator is an entity separate from the insurer and
that the third-party administrator has a financial arrangement to
process automobile glass claims on the insurer's behalf.
(5)(a) If an insurer or an insurer's third-party administrator owns
an interest in an automobile glass repair or replacement facility, the
insurer or the third-party administrator shall post the following
notice in each of the automobile glass repair or replacement
facilities:
THIS AUTOMOBILE GLASS REPAIR OR REPLACEMENT FACILITY IS OWNED IN
WHOLE OR IN PART BY (NAME OF INSURER OR INSURER'S THIRD-PARTY
ADMINISTRATOR). YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED THAT YOU ARE ENTITLED UNDER
WASHINGTON LAW TO SEEK REPAIRS AT ANY AUTOMOBILE GLASS REPAIR OR
REPLACEMENT FACILITY OF YOUR CHOICE.
(b) The notice required by this subsection (3) must be prominently
posted, in not less than eighteen-point font, in a location where it is
likely to be seen and read by a customer. If the automobile glass
repair or replacement facility is mobile, the insurer or its
third-party administrator must verbally provide the notice required by
this subsection (3) to the person making the claim prior to
commencement of the repair or replacement.

--- END ---