BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the
state's best fiscal interest to ensure that community infrastructure
projects are ready to proceed when applying for and receiving public
works board approved construction loans. Many jurisdictions use
portions of their construction loans to pay for nonconstruction
activities, such as planning and preconstruction, to get ready for
construction. This means some of the construction phase takes place at
the end of the loan agreement, and requires jurisdictions to request
loan extensions. The legislature recognizes this type of financing
strategy slows down the expenditure of funds, limits the amount of
funding available for construction loans, and increases the amount
requested for reappropriation.
The legislature finds that from fiscal years 2002 to 2005, the
public works board had one hundred two construction loan extension
requests. Creating an opportunity to make more projects ready to
proceed benefits the state and local jurisdictions by ensuring that
construction loan funds will be spent on construction activities in a
more timely manner, thereby increasing the amount of funds available
for new construction loans through quicker repayment of the loans.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.155.050 and 2005 c 488 s 925 and 2005 c 425 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
((fifteen)) twenty-five percent of the biennial capital budget
appropriation to the public works board from this account may be
expended or obligated for preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or
loans for capital facility planning under this chapter; of this amount,
not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation
may be expended for emergency loans and not more than one percent of
the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for capital
facility planning loans. For the 2005-2007 biennium, moneys in the
account may be used for grants for projects identified in section 138,
chapter 488, Laws of 2005.
(2) The job development fund is hereby established in the state
treasury. Up to fifty million dollars each biennium from the public
works assistance account may be transferred into the job development
fund. Money in the job development fund may be used solely for job
development fund program grants, administrative expenses related to the
administration of the job development fund program created in RCW
43.160.230, and for the report prepared by the joint legislative audit
and review committee pursuant to RCW 44.28.801(2). Moneys in the job
development fund may be spent only after appropriation. The board
shall prepare a prioritized list of proposed projects of up to fifty
million dollars as part of the department's 2007-09 biennial budget
request. The board may provide an additional alternate job development
fund project list of up to ten million dollars. The legislature may
remove projects from the list recommended by the board. The
legislature may not change the prioritization of projects recommended
for funding by the board, but may add projects from the alternate list
in order of priority, as long as the total funding does not exceed
fifty million dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.155.050 and 2005 c 488 s 925 are each amended to
read as follows:
The public works assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
((fifteen)) twenty-five percent of the biennial capital budget
appropriation to the public works board from this account may be
expended or obligated for preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or
loans for capital facility planning under this chapter; of this amount,
not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation
may be expended for emergency loans and not more than one percent of
the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for capital
facility planning loans. For the 2005-2007 biennium, moneys in the
account may be used for grants for projects identified in section 138,
chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act expires June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act takes effect June 30,
2011.

--- END ---