BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that
chapter 42.52 RCW shall not be read to limit a legislator's use of
public resources to only investigating facts surrounding an issue or
dispute involving constituents and a government office or government
official, or between constituents.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.52.160 and 1996 c 213 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may employ or use any
person, money, or property under the officer's or employee's official
control or direction, or in his or her official custody, for the
private benefit or gain of the officer, employee, or another.
(2) This section does not prohibit the use of public resources to
benefit others as part of a state officer's or state employee's
official duties.
(3) The appropriate ethics boards may adopt rules providing
exceptions to this section for occasional use of the state officer or
state employee, of de minimis cost and value, if the activity does not
result in interference with the proper performance of public duties.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, a de minimis
cost includes letters or electronic communication by a legislator
advocating a personal position when gathering facts and investigating
issues or disputes involving constituents and a government office or
government official, or between constituents. All such letters and
electronic communications are subject to public disclosure.

--- END ---