BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.402 and 2005 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Improving the health of children in Washington state is an
investment in a productive and successful next generation. The health
of ((the)) children ((of Washington state)) is critical to their
success in school and throughout their lives((.));
(b) Healthy children are ready to learn. In order to provide
students with the opportunity to become responsible citizens, to
contribute to their own economic well-being and to that of their
families and communities, and to enjoy productive and satisfying lives,
the state recognizes the importance that access to appropriate health
services and improved health brings to the children of Washington
state. In addition, fully immunized children are themselves protected,
and in turn protect others, from contracting communicable diseases;
(c) Children with health insurance coverage have better health
outcomes than those who lack coverage. Children without health
insurance coverage are more likely to be in poor health and more likely
to delay receiving, or go without, needed health care services;
(((b) Access to preventive and well-child health services for
children is a cost-effective investment of both public and private
dollars that improves the health of children and of our communities at
large; and
(c))) (d) Health care coverage for children in Washington state is
the product of critical efforts in both the private and public sectors
to help children succeed. Private health insurance coverage is
complemented by public programs that meet needs of low-income children
whose parents are not offered health insurance coverage through their
employer or who cannot otherwise afford the costs of coverage. In
((2004)) 2006, thirty-five percent of children in Washington state had
some form of public health coverage. Washington state is making
progress in its efforts to increase the number of children with health
care coverage. Yet, even with ((the)) these efforts of both ((the))
private and public sectors, ((too)) many children in Washington state
continue to lack health insurance coverage. ((In 2004, almost one
hundred)) In 2006, over seventy thousand children were uninsured.
Almost two-thirds of these children are low income; and
(e) Improved health outcomes for the children of Washington state
are the expected result of improved access to health care coverage.
Linking children with a medical home that provides preventive and well
child health services and referral to needed specialty services,
linking children with needed behavioral health and dental services,
more effectively managing childhood diseases, improving nutrition, and
increasing physical activity are key to improving children's health.
Care should be provided in appropriate settings by efficient providers,
consistent with high quality care and at an appropriate stage, soon
enough to avert to the need for overly expensive treatment.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature that:
(a) All children in the state of Washington have health care
coverage by 2010. This should be accomplished by building upon and
strengthening the successes of private health insurance coverage and
publicly supported children's health insurance programs in Washington
state. Access to coverage should be streamlined and efficient, with
reductions in unnecessary administrative costs and mechanisms to
expeditiously link children with a medical home;
(b) The state, in collaboration with parents, schools, communities,
health plans, and providers, take steps to improve health outcomes for
the children of Washington state by linking children with a medical
home, identifying health improvement goals for children, and linking
innovative purchasing strategies to those goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Consistent with the goals established in RCW 74.09.402, through
the program authorized in this section, the department shall provide
affordable health care coverage to children under the age of nineteen
who reside in Washington state and whose family income at the time of
enrollment is not greater than two hundred fifty percent of the federal
poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by
the federal department of health and human services, and effective
January 1, 2009, to children whose family income is not greater than
three hundred percent of the federal poverty level. In administering
the program, the department shall take such actions as may be necessary
to ensure the receipt of federal financial participation under the
medical assistance program, as codified at Title XIX of the federal
social security act, the state children's health insurance program, as
codified at Title XXI of the federal social security act, and any other
federal funding sources that are now available or may become available
in the future.
(2) The department shall accept applications for enrollment for
children's health care coverage; establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods, as may be necessary; and determine eligibility
based on current family income. The department shall make eligibility
determinations within the time frames for establishing eligibility for
children on medical assistance, as defined by RCW 74.09.510. No
premium subsidy may be paid with respect to any child whose current
family income is greater than two hundred fifty percent of the federal
poverty level. The application and annual renewal processes shall be
designed to minimize administrative barriers for applicants and
enrolled clients, and to minimize gaps in eligibility for families who
are eligible for coverage. If a change in family income results in a
change in program eligibility, the department shall transfer the family
members to the appropriate programs and notify the family with respect
to any change in premium obligation, without a break in eligibility.
The department shall use the same eligibility redetermination and
appeals procedures as those provided for children on medical assistance
programs.
(3) To ensure continuity of care and ease of understanding for
families and health care providers, and to maximize the efficiency of
the program, the amount, scope, and duration of health care services
provided to children under this section shall be the same as that
provided to children under medical assistance, as defined in RCW
74.09.520.
(4) The primary mechanism for purchasing health care coverage under
this section shall be through contracts with managed health care
systems as defined in RCW 74.09.522. However, the department shall
make every effort within available resources to purchase health care
coverage for uninsured children whose families have access to dependent
coverage through an employer-sponsored health plan or another source
when it is cost-effective for the state to do so, and the purchase is
consistent with requirements of Title XIX and Title XXI of the federal
social security act. To the extent allowable under federal law, the
department shall require families to enroll in available employer-sponsored coverage, as a condition of participating in the program
established under this act, when it is cost-effective for the state to
do so. Families who enroll in available employer-sponsored coverage
under this act shall be accounted for separately in the annual report
required by RCW 74.09.053.
(5)(a) To reflect appropriate parental responsibility, the
department shall develop a schedule of premiums for children's health
care coverage due to the department from families with income greater
than two hundred percent of the federal poverty level. The amount of
the premium shall be based upon family income and shall not exceed the
premium limitations in Title XXI of the federal social security act.
Premiums shall not be imposed on children in households at or below two
hundred percent of the federal poverty level as articulated in RCW
74.09.055.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, the department shall offer families
whose income is greater than two hundred fifty percent of the federal
poverty level the opportunity to purchase health care coverage for
their children through the programs administered under this section
without a premium subsidy from the state. Effective January 1, 2009,
the opportunity to purchase health care coverage shall be offered to
families whose income is greater than three hundred percent of the
federal poverty level. The amount paid by the family shall be in an
amount equal to the rate paid by the state to the managed health care
system for coverage of the child, including any associated and
administrative costs to the state of providing coverage for the child.
(6) The department shall undertake a proactive, targeted outreach
and education effort with the goal of enrolling children in health
coverage and improving the health literacy of youth and parents. The
department shall collaborate with the department of health, local
public health jurisdictions, the office of superintendent of public
instruction, the department of early learning, health educators, health
care providers, health carriers, and parents in the design and
development of this effort. The outreach and education effort shall
include the following components:
(a) Broad dissemination of information about the availability of
coverage, including media campaigns;
(b) Assistance with completing applications, and community-based
outreach efforts to help people apply for coverage. Community-based
outreach efforts should be targeted to the populations least likely to
be covered;
(c) Use of existing systems, such as enrollment information from
the free and reduced price lunch program, the department of early
learning child care subsidy program, and the early childhood education
and assistance program, to identify children who may be eligible but
not enrolled in coverage;
(d) Contracting with community-based organizations and government
entities to support community-based outreach efforts to help families
apply for coverage. These efforts should be targeted to the
populations least likely to be covered. The department shall provide
informational materials for use by government entities and community-based organizations in their outreach activities, and should identify
any available federal matching funds to support these efforts;
(e) Development and dissemination of materials to engage and inform
parents and families statewide on issues such as: The benefits of
health insurance coverage; the appropriate use of health services,
including primary care provided by health care practitioners licensed
under chapters 18.71, 18.57, 18.36A, and 18.79 RCW, and emergency
services; the value of a medical home, well-child services and
immunization, and other preventive health services with linkages to
department of health child profile efforts; identifying and managing
chronic conditions such as asthma and diabetes; and the value of good
nutrition and physical activity;
(f) An evaluation of the outreach and education efforts, based upon
clear outcome measures that are included in contracts with entities
that undertake components of the outreach and education effort;
(g) A feasibility study and implementation plan to develop online
application capability that is integrated with the department's
automated client eligibility system, and to develop data linkages with
the office of superintendent of public instruction for free and reduced
price lunch enrollment information and the department of early learning
for child care subsidy program enrollment information. The department
shall submit a feasibility study on the implementation of the
requirements in this subsection to the governor and legislature by July
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that parents have a responsibility to:
(a) Enroll their children in affordable health coverage;
(b) Ensure that their children receive appropriate well-child
preventive care;
(c) Link their child with a medical home; and
(d) Understand and act upon the health benefits of good nutrition
and physical activity.
(2) The legislature intends that the programs and outreach and
education efforts established in section 2(6) of this act, as well as
partnerships with the public and private sectors, provide the support
and information needed by parents to meet the responsibilities set
forth in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department, in collaboration with the department of health,
health carriers, local public health jurisdictions, children's health
care providers including pediatricians, family practitioners, and
pediatric subspecialists, parents, and other purchasers, shall identify
explicit performance measures that indicate that a child has an
established and effective medical home, such as:
(a) Childhood immunization rates;
(b) Well child care utilization rates, including the use of
validated, structured developmental assessment tools that include
behavioral and oral health screening;
(c) Care management for children with chronic illnesses;
(d) Emergency room utilization; and
(e) Preventive oral health service utilization.
Performance measures and targets for each performance measure must
be reported to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2007.
(2) Beginning in calendar year 2009, targeted provider rate
increases shall be linked to quality improvement measures established
under this section. The department, in conjunction with those groups
identified in subsection (1) of this section, shall develop parameters
for determining criteria for increased payment or other incentives for
those practices and health plans that incorporate evidence-based
practice and improve and achieve sustained improvement with respect to
the measures in both fee for service and managed care. (3) The
department shall provide an annual report to the governor and the
legislature related to provider performance on these measures,
beginning in September 2010 and annually thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
It is the goal of Washington state to ensure that:
(1) By 2010, all K-12 districts have school health advisory
committees that advise school administration and school board members
on policies, environmental changes, and programs needed to support
healthy food choice and physical activity and childhood fitness.
Districts shall include school nurses or other school personnel as
advisory committee members.
(2) By 2010, only healthy food and beverages provided by schools
during school hours or for school-sponsored activities shall be
available on school campuses. Minimum standards for available food
items, except food served as part of a United States department of
agriculture meal program, include:
(a) Not more than thirty-five percent of its total calories from
fat;
(b) Not more than ten percent of its total calories from saturated
fat; and
(c) Not more than thirty-five percent of its total weight or
fifteen grams sugar per food item composed of sugar, including
naturally occurring and added sugar.
(3) By 2010, all students in grades one through eight should have
at least thirty minutes of quality physical education per school day.
(4) By 2010, all student health and fitness instruction shall be
conducted by appropriately certified instructors.
(5) By 2010, any district waiver or exemption policy from physical
education requirements for high school students should be based upon
meeting both health and fitness curricula concepts as well as
alternative means of engaging in physical activity, but should
acknowledge students' interest in pursuing their academic interests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) There is hereby established a select
interim legislative task force on comprehensive school health reform.
The task force shall consist of two members of each caucus of the
senate, and two members of each caucus of the house of representatives.
The task force shall review and make recommendations on policies,
environmental changes, and programs needed to support healthy schools,
including but not limited to food choice, physical activity, and
childhood fitness. The task force shall also review the delivery of
health care services in the schools by school personnel providing
health services. The task force may establish technical advisory
committees related to nutrition, fitness, and child health.
(2) The task force shall submit its findings and recommendations to
the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives
by October 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
When the department of social and health services has determined
that it is cost-effective to enroll a child participating in a medical
assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW in an employer-sponsored
health plan, the carrier shall permit the enrollment of the participant
who is otherwise eligible for coverage in the health plan without
regard to any open enrollment restrictions. The request for special
enrollment shall be made by the department or participant within sixty
days of the department's determination that the enrollment would be
cost-effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 74.09.405 (Children's health program -- Purpose) and 1990 c
296 s 1;
(2) RCW 74.09.415 (Children's health program established) and 2005
c 279 s 2, 2002 c 366 s 2, 1998 c 245 s 144, & 1990 c 296 s 2;
(3) RCW 74.09.425 (Children's health care accessibility -- Community
action) and 1990 c 296 s 4;
(4) RCW 74.09.435 (Children's health program -- Biennial evaluation)
and 1990 c 296 s 5; and
(5) RCW 74.09.450 (Children's health insurance program -- Intent--Department duties) and 1999 c 370 s 1.

--- END ---