BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
heating oil used to heat a home.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "heating oil" means any
petroleum product used for space heating in oil-fired furnaces,
heaters, and boilers, including stove oil, diesel fuel, or kerosene.
"Heating oil" does not include petroleum products used as fuels in
motor vehicles, marine vessels, trains, buses, aircraft, or any off-highway equipment not used for space heating, or for industrial
processing or the generation of electrical energy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply with respect to
the use of heating oil used to heat a home.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "heating oil" means any
petroleum product used for space heating in oil-fired furnaces,
heaters, and boilers, including stove oil, diesel fuel, or kerosene.
"Heating oil" does not include petroleum products used as fuels in
motor vehicles, marine vessels, trains, buses, aircraft, or any off-highway equipment not used for space heating, or for industrial
processing or the generation of electrical energy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---