BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.520 and 2004 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A personal use shellfish and seaweed license is required for
all persons other than residents or nonresidents under fifteen years of
age to fish for, take, dig for, or possess seaweed or shellfish,
including razor clams, for personal use from state waters or offshore
waters including national park beaches.
(2) A razor clam license allows a person to harvest only razor
clams for personal use from state waters, including national park
beaches.
(3) The fees for annual personal use shellfish and seaweed licenses
are:
(a) For a resident fifteen years of age or older, seven dollars;
(b) For a nonresident fifteen years of age or older, twenty
dollars; and
(c) For a senior, five dollars.
(4) The fee for an annual razor clam license is five dollars and
fifty cents for residents and eleven dollars for nonresidents.
(5) The fee for a three-day razor clam license is three dollars and
fifty cents for both residents and nonresidents.
(6) A personal use shellfish and seaweed license or razor clam
license must be ((visible on the licensee)) in immediate possession of
the licensee and available for inspection while a licensee is
harvesting shellfish or seaweed. However, the license does not need to
be visible at all times.

--- END ---