BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 101 2006 c 372 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,095,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,397,000))
$6,401,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,529,000))
$12,533,000

Sec. 102 2006 c 372 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,916,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,393,000))
$14,447,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,389,000))
$28,443,000

Sec. 103 2006 c 372 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,834,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,298,000))
$21,340,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,277,000))
$50,300,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,051,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($117,556,000))
$117,621,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for court-appointed special
advocates in dependency matters. The administrator for the courts,
after consulting with the association of juvenile court administrators
and the association of court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad
litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer court-appointed
special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution of
funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally
accessible to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian
ad litem programs. The administrator for the courts shall not retain
more than six percent of total funding to cover administrative or any
other agency costs.
(2) $3,000,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for school district petitions to
juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and
28A.225.035. The office of the administrator for the courts shall
develop an interagency agreement with the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this
subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be
based on the number of petitions filed.
(3) $13,224,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to county juvenile
court administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children
in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The office of the
administrator for the courts shall not retain any portion of these
funds to cover administrative costs. The office of the administrator
for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula
shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition
processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average
per-petition processing costs.
(4) The distributions made under subsection (3) of this section and
distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made
pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate
reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of
service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.
(5) Each fiscal year during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a fiscal year
ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for
the purpose of distributing funds.
(6) $82,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $82,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1112 (creating an additional superior court position). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts in this subsection
shall lapse.
(7) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1854 (driving privilege) and Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5454 (court operations). If neither bill is enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $569,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the juror pay pilot and research
project.

Sec. 104 2006 c 372 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,083,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,232,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,705,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,987,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,007,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 may be used to
provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible
persons who are sixty years or older on matters authorized by RCW
2.53.030(2)(a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset
level.

Sec. 105 2006 c 372 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,593,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,473,000))
$18,937,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,099,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,210,000
Department of Personnel Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $721,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,398,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,010,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($121,777,000))
$122,241,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,472,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) $2,441,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,403,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the verification of initiative
and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and
candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $118,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29.27.072.
(4)(a) $2,028,004 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $2,382,772 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2005-07 biennium. The funding level
for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in
this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The
office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once
all criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection have been satisfactorily
documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(5) $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $173,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for the implementation of House Bill No.
1749 (county election procedures). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims in
Washington State Democratic Party, et al. v. Sam S. Reed, et al.,
United States District Court Western District of Washington at Tacoma
Cause No. C00-5419FDB and related appeal. The expenditure of this
appropriation is contingent on the release of all claims in the case
and related appeal, and total settlement costs shall not exceed the
appropriation in this subsection.
(7) $131,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for expenditures related to the
Farrakhan v. Locke litigation.

Sec. 106 2006 c 372 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,258,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($351,000))
$748,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,011,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,624,000))
$16,021,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $731,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $727,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for staff and related costs to
verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.
(3) The office shall report to the office of financial management
and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature detailed
information on risk-based auditing, its theory, and its application for
the audits performed on Washington state government. The report shall
include an explanation of how the office identifies, measures, and
prioritizes risk, the manner in which the office uses these factors in
the planning and execution of the audits of Washington state
government, and the methods and procedures used in the conduct of the
risk-based audits themselves. The report is due no later than December
1, 2005.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1064 (government performance).
(5) $16,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided for a review of special education excess cost
accounting and reporting requirements. The state auditor's office
shall coordinate this work with the joint legislative audit and review
committee's review of the special education excess cost accounting
methodology and expenditure reporting requirements. The state
auditor's review shall include an examination of whether school
districts are (a) appropriately implementing the excess cost accounting
methodology; (b) consistently charging special education expenses to
the special education and basic education programs; (c) appropriately
determining the percentage of expenditures that should be charged to
the special education and basic education programs; and (d)
appropriately and consistently reporting special education
expenditures. The results of this review will be included in the joint
legislative audit and review committee's report issued in January 2006.

Sec. 107 2006 c 372 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,724,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,844,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,428,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,307,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,315,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($191,627,000))
$195,503,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($210,536,000))
$214,412,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.

Sec. 108 2006 c 372 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,758,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,229,000))
$60,217,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($258,085,000))
$257,888,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,422,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,443,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,430,000
Tourism Development and Promotion Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,133,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,809,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,362,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,234,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,570,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,536,000
Homeless Families Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $616,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($462,905,000))
$462,696,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center for work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities. The
center shall not pay any increased indirect rate nor increases in other
indirect charges above the absolute amount paid during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium.
(2) $5,902,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for the justice assistance grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 2006 as follows:
(a) $2,064,000 to local units of government to continue
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;
(b) $330,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;
(c) $675,000 to the Washington state patrol for coordination,
investigative, and supervisory support to the multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces and for methamphetamine education and response;
(d) $20,000 to the department for tribal law enforcement;
(e) $345,000 to the department to continue domestic violence legal
advocacy;
(f) $60,000 to the department for community-based advocacy services
to victims of violent crime, other than sexual assault and domestic
violence;
(g) $351,000 to the department of social and health services,
division of alcohol and substance abuse, for juvenile drug courts in
eastern and western Washington;
(h) $626,000 to the department of social and health services to
continue youth violence prevention and intervention projects;
(i) $97,000 to the department to continue evaluation of this grant
program;
(j) $290,000 to the office of financial management for criminal
history records improvement;
(k) $580,000 to the department for required grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on justice assistance grant programs; and
(l) $464,000 to the department for distribution to small
municipalities.
These amounts represent the maximum justice assistance grant
expenditure authority for each program. No program may expend justice
assistance grant funds in excess of the amounts provided in this
subsection. If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this
subsection become available, whether from prior or current fiscal year
distributions, the department shall hold these moneys in reserve and
may not expend them without specific appropriation. These moneys shall
be carried forward and applied to the pool of moneys available for
appropriation for programs and projects in the succeeding fiscal year.
As part of its budget request for the succeeding year, the department
shall estimate and request authority to spend any justice assistance
grant funds.
(3) $3,600,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the justice assistance grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 2007 as follows:
(a) $2,013,000 to local units of government to continue
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;
(b) $330,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;
(c) $675,000 to the Washington state patrol for coordination,
investigative, and supervisory support to the multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces;
(d) $110,000 to the department to support the governor's council on
substance abuse;
(e) $97,000 to the department to continue evaluation of the justice
assistance grant program;
(f) $360,000 to the department for required grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on justice assistance grant programs; and
(g) $15,000 to the department for a tribal and local law
enforcement statewide summit.
(4) $1,658,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for multijurisdictional drug task forces.
The funding for this amount, and the amounts provided in subsection
(3)(a) and (b) of this section, will be distributed in a manner so that
all drug task forces funded in fiscal year 2004 will receive funding in
fiscal year 2007 at amounts similar to the amounts received in fiscal
year 2004.
(5) $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to fund domestic violence legal
advocacy, in recognition of reduced federal grant funding.
(6) $28,848,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for providing early childhood education
assistance. Of this amount, $1,497,000 is provided solely to increase
the number of children receiving education, and $1,052,000 is provided
solely for a targeted vendor rate increase.
(7) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall contract with a lender or contract collection agent to
act as a collection agent of the state. The lender or contract
collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and
deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected
shall be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest earned in the
account may be retained by the lender or contract collection agent, and
shall be considered a fee for processing payments on behalf of the
state. Repayments of loans granted under this chapter shall be made to
the lender or contract collection agent as long as the loan is
outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the chapter.
(8) $1,288,000 of the Washington housing trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No.
1074. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts in this
subsection shall lapse.
(9) $725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for food banks to obtain and
distribute additional nutritious food; and purchase equipment to
transport and store perishable products.
(10) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the community services block
grant program to help meet current service demands that exceed
available community action resources.
(11) $215,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for matching funds for a federal economic
development administration grant awarded to the city of Kent to conduct
a feasibility study and economic analysis for the establishment of a
center for advanced manufacturing.
(12) $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the department to compile a report on
housing stock in Washington state to identify areas of potentially high
risk for child lead exposure. This report shall include an analysis of
existing data regarding the ages of housing stock in specific regions
and an analysis of data regarding actual lead poisoning cases, which
shall be provided by the department of health's childhood lead
poisoning surveillance program.
(13) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the Cascade land conservancy to
develop and implement a plan for regional conservation within King,
Kittitas, Pierce, and Snohomish counties.
(14) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the support, including safety and
security costs, of the America's freedom salute to be held in the
Vancouver, Washington area.
(15) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to Snohomish county for a law
enforcement and treatment methamphetamine pilot program. $250,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $250,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are
provided solely to the Pierce county alliance's methamphetamine family
services treatment program and safe streets of Tacoma's methamphetamine
prevention service.
(16) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely for one pilot project to promote the study and implementation of
safe neighborhoods through community planning.
(17) $287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $288,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for Walla Walla community college
to establish the water and environmental studies center to provide
workforce education and training, encourage innovative approaches and
practices that address environmental and cultural issues, and
facilitate the Walla Walla watershed alliance role in promoting
communication leading to cooperative conservation efforts that
effectively address urban and rural water and environmental issues.
(18) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for work with the northwest food
processors association on the food processing cluster development
project.
(19) $140,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture
incubator project, which will support small farms in economic
development.
(20) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the department of community,
trade, and economic development as the final appropriation for the
youth assessment center in Pierce county for activities dedicated to
reducing the rate of incarceration of juvenile offenders.
(21) $235,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $235,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
small business incubator program. $250,000 must be distributed as
grants and must be matched by an equal amount of private funds.
(22) The department shall coordinate any efforts geared towards the
2010 Olympics with the regional effort being conducted by the Pacific
northwest economic region, a statutory committee.
(23) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for HistoryLink to expand its
free, noncommercial online encyclopedia service on state and local
history.
(24) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for Women's Hearth, a nonprofit
program serving the Spokane area's homeless and low-income women.
(25) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to the Pacific Science Center to host the
dead sea scrolls exhibition in September 2006.
(26) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for providing statewide sexual assault
services.
(27) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the Olympic loop of the great
Washington state birding trail.
(28) $529,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the department to provide to the department of
archeology and historic preservation through an interagency agreement.
The full amount of federal funding shall be transferred. The
department of community, trade, and economic development shall not
retain any portion for administrative purposes.
(29) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to assist the suburban cities association,
King county, and the cities of Seattle and Bellevue to comply with the
most acute buildable lands needs countywide. Of this amount, $50,000
is provided solely to the suburban cities association to fully fund a
buildable lands program manager position.
(30) $116,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for an increase to the statewide
coordination of the volunteer programs for court-appointed special
advocates.
(31) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the energy facilities siting and
evaluation council to make rules related to RCW 80.70.070, the carbon
dioxide mitigation statute.
(32) $712,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the department to provide each county
with an additional 0.5 FTE for prosecutors' victim/witness units.
(33) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the department to implement two
demonstration pilot projects related to transfer of development rights
in cooperation with Snohomish and Pierce county legislative
authorities. Projects may receive no more than $100,000.
(34) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the Seattle police department, and is
to be divided evenly between the weed and seed programs in southeast
Seattle and South Delridge/White Center to mitigate a one-year funding
lapse from the federal department of justice. This appropriation is
for the continuation of community police work and community building in
these areas.
(35) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to the Thurston county prosecutor's
office, for the Rochester weed and seed program to mitigate a one-year
funding lapse from the federal department of justice. This
appropriation is for the continuation of community police work and
community building in Rochester.
(36) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to the city of Poulsbo for the reopening
of the Poulsbo marine science center as an educational facility on the
Puget Sound marine environment.
(37) $544,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for an upgrade to discovery park's
daybreak star cultural center electrical system.
(38) $670,000 of the housing trust account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2418 (affordable housing program). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(39) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2498 (cluster-based economic development).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(40) $186,000 of the general fund--local appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2402 (energy facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(41) $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No.
3156 (low income persons). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((43))) (42) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for one-time backfill of the
federal reductions to the safe and drug free schools and communities
grant program.
(((44))) (43) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the developmental disabilities
council to contract for legal services for individuals with
developmental disabilities who are served or are entering the community
protection program in the department of social and health services
division of developmental disabilities. Funding shall be prioritized
for those individuals who do not have paid legal guardians, but is
available to all community protection clients, subject to available
funds.
(((45))) (44) $100,000 of the fiscal year 2006 general fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for tourism branding and marketing
associated with the January 2007 United States figure skating
championships in Spokane. It is the intent of the legislature to
provide an additional $500,000 during the 2007-09 fiscal biennium for
the payment of one-half of the hosting fee if Spokane is designated as
the host city of the 2009 world figure skating championships. The
funds provided under this section are contingent on an equal amount of
matching funds from nonstate sources.
(((46))) (45) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to the Pacific northwest economic
region as matching funds for use in the development and operation of a
regional tourism initiative in coordination with the department and
consistent with the governor's initiatives on marketing, tourism, and
trade. The department and the Pacific northwest economic region will
jointly establish appropriate deliverables. The first $25,000 of this
amount will be released when the Pacific northwest economic region has
secured at least $75,000 in funding from other public and private
sources. The final $25,000 of this amount will be released when the
Pacific northwest economic region has secured an additional $75,000 in
funding from other public and private sources. A minimum of 25 percent
of the matching funds raised by the Pacific northwest economic region
for the initiative shall be from private sources.
(((47))) (46) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the international trade
alliance of Spokane to partnership with other regional governments to
strengthen and diversify the regional economy.
(((48))) (47) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely to contract for a study that will
provide recommendations on a small harbor dredging cooperative among
the port districts of Pacific County and Wahkiakum County. The
recommendations shall include options for an organizational framework,
as well as the long-term financing of the cooperative.
(((49))) (48) $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely to the Pacific-Algona senior
center, a nonprofit food program serving low-income seniors.
(((50))) (49) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely to the northwest Korean sports and
cultural festival.
(((51))) (50) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to allow Washington state
tribes to continue participation in the Forest and Fish Report
currently out for public comment as a habitat conservation plan under
the endangered species act. In the event federal funding is
reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((52))) (51) $5,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided for Tacoma's international music festival.
(((53))) (52) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 ((is)) and $113,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Mimms
Academy in Tacoma to facilitate a pilot project concerning expelled and
suspended students.
(((54))) (53) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to the King county sexual assault
resource center to provide for a Spanish-speaking therapist position,
parent/child victim education, and prevention education.
(((55))) (54) $67,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for a study of methamphetamine
action teams and drug task forces as provided by Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6239, sections 110 and 204 (controlled substances).
The department shall report findings and recommendations to the
legislature by November 1, 2006. If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2006, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(((56))) (55) $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for distribution to Benton and
Franklin counties to continue the Benton-Franklin juvenile drug court
program. The counties shall provide an equivalent amount of matching
funds.
(((57))) (56) $7,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to the owners of the following
minor league baseball facilities for major and minor restoration and
repair of facilities projects: Tacoma Rainiers ($2,500,000); Spokane
Indians ($2,000,000); Tri-Cities Dust Devils ($1,000,000); Yakima Bears
($750,000); and Everett AquaSox ($750,000). The department shall not
retain any portion for administrative purposes.
(((58))) (57) $40,000 of the fiscal year 2006 general fund--state
appropriation and $1,510,000 of the fiscal year 2007 general fund--state appropriation are provided solely for the department to enter
into funding agreements with the mountains to sound greenway trust to
accomplish the following projects: Squak mountain trail upgrades;
Tiger mountain trailhead and trails upgrades; Rattlesnake mountain
trail and trailhead construction; greenway legacy planning; Snoqualmie
point view park construction; and state route 18/interstate 90
interchange protection.
(((59))) (58) $149,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to implement a human trafficking
task force as described in section 1 of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6652
(human trafficking), authorizing a task force through June 30, 2011, to
provide guidance in responding to the crime of human trafficking, and
in providing services to human trafficking victims.
(((60))) (59) $140,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Senate Bill
No. 5330 (economic development grants). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((61))) (60) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 ((and $197,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are)) is provided solely for the
long-term care ombudsman program within the department of community,
trade, and economic development to recruit and train volunteers to
serve in the adult family home setting.
(((62))) (61) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the Enumclaw loggers monument.

Sec. 109 2006 c 372 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $579,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($523,000))
$546,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,105,000))
$1,128,000

Sec. 110 2006 c 372 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,775,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,080,000))
$20,140,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,555,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,216,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,197,000))
$63,257,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the public works assistance account appropriation
is provided solely for an inventory and evaluation of the most
effective way to organize the state public infrastructure programs and
funds. The inventory and evaluation shall be delivered to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2005.
(2)(a) $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for an advisory council to study
residential services for persons with developmental disabilities. The
study shall identify a preferred system of services and a plan to
implement the system within four years. Recommendations shall be
provided on the services that best address client needs in different
regions of the state and on the preferred system by January 1, 2006.
The office of financial management may contract for specialized
services to complete the study.
(b) The advisory council shall consist of thirteen members.
Members appointed by the governor, include one representative from each
of the governor's office or the office of financial management, the
department of social and health services, the Washington state
disabilities council, two labor organizations, the community
residential care providers, residents of residential habilitation
centers, individuals served by community residential programs, and
individuals with developmental disabilities who reside or resided in
residential habilitation centers. The advisory council shall also
include two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives representing the majority and
minority caucuses and two members of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate representing the majority and minority
caucuses. Legislative members of the advisory group shall be
reimbursed in accordance with RCW 44.04.120, and nonlegislative members
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 44.04.120. Staff support shall be
provided by the department of social and health services, the
developmental disabilities council, the office of financial management,
the house of representatives office of program research, and senate
committee services.
(3) $1,041,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $706,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5441 (studying early
learning, K-12, and higher education). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided to the office of regulatory assistance and is
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) This amount is provided solely for the enhanced planning and
permit pilot program; and
(b) Regulatory assistance is to select two local government
planning and permitting offices to participate in an enhanced permit
assistance pilot program. Such enhancement may include, but is not
limited to:
(i) Creation of local and state interagency planning and permit
review teams;
(ii) Use of advanced online planning and permit applications;
(iii) Using loaned executives; and
(iv) Additional technical assistance and guidance for permit
applicants.
(5) $303,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $255,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1970 (government management). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(6) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Engrossed House Bill No. 1242 (budgeting outcomes and priorities). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) The department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife,
the department of natural resources, the conservation commission, and
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall make
recommendations to improve or eliminate monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery and watershed health. The agencies shall coordinate
with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and
consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of the report.
The agencies shall prepare a report detailing all new activity and
updating all previously identified activity within the comprehensive
monitoring strategy. The report shall identify the monitoring activity
being performed and include: The purpose of the monitoring activity,
when the activity started, who uses the information, how often it is
accessed, what costs are incurred by fund, what frequency is used to
collect data, what geographic location is used to collect data, where
the information is stored, and what is the current status and cost by
fund source of the data storage systems.
The agencies shall provide a status report summarizing progress to
the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and the office
of financial management by March 1, 2006. A final report to the
governor's monitoring forum, the office of financial management, and
the appropriate legislative fiscal committees shall be submitted no
later than September 1, 2006.
(8) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided to the office of financial management for the
purpose of contracting with the Washington State University and
University of Washington policy consensus center to provide project
coordination for the office of financial management, the department of
agriculture, the conservation commission, and the department of
community, trade, and economic development to work with farmers,
ranchers, and other interested parties to identify potential
agricultural pilot projects that both enhance farm income and improve
protection of natural resources.
(9) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the office of regulatory
assistance to implement activities supporting the governor's regulatory
improvement program including deployment of interagency permit teams,
a business portal, programmatic permits, and an alternative mitigation
program.
(((11))) (10) $46,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $131,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2353 (family child care
providers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((12))) (11) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the Washington state quality
award program to assist state agencies in obtaining the goals of the
Washington state quality award.
(((13))) (12) $66,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $134,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to establish and provide staff
support and technical assistance to the blue ribbon commission on
health care costs and access. The commission shall consist of the
governor or a designee, who shall serve as chair; two members from each
of the four caucuses of the legislature; the insurance commissioner or
a designee; the secretary of health; the administrator of the health
care authority; the assistant secretary for health and recovery
services in the department of social and health services; and the
assistant director for insurance services in the department of labor
and industries. By December 1, 2006, the commission shall recommend to
the governor and legislature a sustainable five-year plan for
substantially improving access to affordable health care for all
Washington residents.

Sec. 111 2006 c 372 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,595,000))
$29,702,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $103,000 of the administrative hearing
revolving account--state appropriation is provided solely to determine,
in collaboration with other state agencies, the best mechanism of
digital recording for the office of administrative hearings, the manner
of conversion from tape recording to digital recording, and the
purchase of digital recording devices.

Sec. 112 2006 c 372 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,302,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($92,647,000))
$92,471,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,627,000))
$5,377,000
Real Estate Excise Tax Grant Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $447,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($193,118,000))
$192,692,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, and $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1315 (modifying disclosure requirements for the purposes of
the real estate excise tax). If House Bill No. 1315 is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $7,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2006 and $2,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5101 (renewable energy). If Substitute Senate Bill No.
5101 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $114,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed House Bill No. 1241 (modifying vehicle licensing and
registration penalties).
(4) $1,390,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, and $1,240,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for the department to employ strategies to enhance
current revenue enforcement activities.
(5) $5,121 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2006 is provided solely to satisfy two claims to estate property,
pursuant to RCW 11.76.245.
(6) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $89,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2673 (local infrastructure).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $147,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2457 (tax relief/farm machinery). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $29,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No.
2466 (tax relief for aerospace) or for Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6604 (tax relief for aerospace). If neither of these bills are
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(9) $193,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No.
2671 (excise tax relief) or Substitute Senate Bill No. 6385 (excise tax
relief). If neither of these bills are enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $33,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 2640 (biotechnology product). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(11) $176,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2670 (hospital benefit zones). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 113 2006 c 372 s 138 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,362,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,213,000))
$1,218,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,581,000))
$2,586,000

Sec. 114 2006 c 372 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,196,000

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $180,000 of the OMWBE enterprises account
appropriation is provided solely for management of private sector
grants and coordination of support services to small businesses in the
state. It is the intent of the legislature that this amount be funded
from new grant revenues and business fees.))

Sec. 115 2006 c 372 s 147 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,739,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,720,000))
$1,723,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,832,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($159,863,000))
$160,072,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($176,161,000))
$176,373,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) As authorized under RCW 66.16.010, the liquor control board
shall add an equivalent surcharge of $0.42 per liter on all retail
sales of spirits, excluding licensee, military and tribal sales,
effective no later than July 1, 2005. The intent of this surcharge is
to generate additional revenues for the state general fund in the
2005-07 biennium.
(2) $154,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the lease of state vehicles from the department
of general administration's motor pool.
(3) $2,228,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for costs associated with the installation of a wide
area network that connects all of the state liquor stores and the
liquor control board headquarters.
(4) $186,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for an alcohol education staff coordinator and
associated alcohol educational resources targeted toward middle school
and high school students.
(5) $2,261,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for replacement of essential computer equipment,
improvement of security measures, and improvement to the core
information technology infrastructure.
(6) $2,800,000 of the liquor control board construction and
maintenance account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
certificate of participation to fund the expansion of the liquor
distribution center.
(7) $3,233,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for upgrades to material handling system and
warehouse management system software and equipment, and associated
staff to increase the liquor distribution center's shipping capacity.
(8) $2,746,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for additional state liquor store and retail
business analysis staff. The additional liquor store staff will be
deployed to those stores with the greatest potential for increased
customer satisfaction and revenue growth. The liquor control board,
using the new retail business analysis staff and, if needed, an
independent consultant, will analyze the impact of additional staff on
customer satisfaction and revenue growth and make recommendations that
will increase the effectiveness and efficiency of all the liquor
control board's retail-related activities. Using best practices and
benchmarks from comparable retail organizations, the analysis will
evaluate and make recommendations, at a minimum, on the following
issues: Optimal staffing levels and store locations and numbers of
stores (both state liquor stores and contract liquor stores); options
for an improved retail organizational structure; strategies to increase
the retail decision-making capacity; and resources required for
enhanced internal organizational support of the retail activities. In
support of this evaluation, a survey shall be employed to gauge
customer satisfaction with state and contract liquor store services.
A written evaluation with recommendations shall be submitted to the
governor and the legislative fiscal committees by October 1, 2006.
(9) $187,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $122,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 6097 (tobacco products enforcement). If Senate Bill No. 6097
is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) $1,435,000 of the liquor revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1379 (liquor retail plan). If Substitute House Bill No.
1379 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) $1,864,000 of the liquor revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6823 (distribution of beer and wine). If
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6823 is not enacted by June 30, 2006,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $575,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No.
6537 (direct wine sales). If Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6537 is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 116 2006 c 372 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,137,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,037,000))
$16,108,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($214,322,000))
$193,546,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,812,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,664,000))
$2,859,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,297,000))
$7,908,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,531,000))
$5,350,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,075,000))
$23,066,000
Military Department Rental and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $378,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($316,614,000))
$294,525,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($1,664,000)) $2,859,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation and (($6,297,000)) $7,908,000 of the disaster
response account -- federal appropriation may be spent only on disasters
declared by the governor and with the approval of the office of
financial management. The military department shall submit a report
quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative
fiscal committees detailing information on the disaster response
account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the
account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting
date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2005-07
biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) (($6,531,000)) $5,350,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--state appropriation and (($27,075,000)) $23,066,000 of the Nisqually
earthquake account -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
response and recovery costs associated with the February 28, 2001,
earthquake. The military department shall submit a report quarterly to
the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing earthquake recovery costs, including: (a)
Estimates of total costs; (b) incremental changes from the previous
estimate; (c) actual expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining
costs to be paid; and (e) estimates of future payments by biennium.
This information shall be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and
by amount paid on behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The
military department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office
of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2005-07 biennium based on current revenue and
expenditure patterns.
(3) (($173,613,000)) $152,033,573 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the
following conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) This amount shall not be allotted until a spending plan is
reviewed by the governor's domestic security advisory group and
approved by the office of financial management;
(c) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; incremental changes from the
previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security expenditures by
the state and local governments with this federal funding; and matching
or accompanying state or local expenditures; and
(d) The department shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing homeland security revenues and expenditures for
the previous fiscal year by county and legislative district.
(4) $867,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the Cowlitz county 911 communications
center for the purpose of purchasing or reimbursing the purchase of
interoperable radio communication technology to improve disaster
response in the Mount St. Helens area.
(5) No funds from sources other than fees from voice over internet
protocol (VOIP) providers may be used to implement technologies
specific to the integration of VOIP 911 with E-911. The military
department, in conjunction with the department of revenue, shall
propose methods for assuring the collection of an appropriate enhanced
911 excise tax from VOIP 911 providers and shall report their
recommendations to the legislature by November 1, 2005.
(6) $41,000 of the enhanced 911 account appropriation is provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2543 (911 advisory
committee). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7)(a) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the military department for
administration of competitive grants detailed in (b) of this subsection
and for implementation of one or more of the following activities
regarding emergency management: Development and coordination of
comprehensive emergency management plans; training of elected and
appointed officials on state laws, disaster command and response
structures, and the roles and responsibilities of officials before,
during, and after a disaster; and administrating periodic joint
emergency management training exercises involving the military
department and other state agencies. In addition, the military
department will study the feasibility of having regional disaster
medical assistance teams and urban search and rescue teams available
within the state to be deployed by the governor. The military
department will report the findings and recommendations to the
legislature by December 1, 2006.
(b) $1,600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the military department to allocate
grants to regional agencies, local governments, tribal governments,
regional incident management teams, and private organizations. The
grants shall be for one or more of the following purposes and
distributed on a competitive basis: Development and coordination of
comprehensive emergency management plans; training of elected and
appointed officials on state laws, ordinances, disaster command and
response structures, and the roles and responsibilities of officials
before, during, and after a disaster; administration of periodic joint
emergency management training exercises; and implementation of projects
that will strengthen emergency response, mitigation, preparation, and
coordination.
(8)(a) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the military department to: (i)
Initiate a health registry for veterans and military personnel
returning from Afghanistan, Iraq, or other countries in which depleted
uranium or other hazardous materials may be found; (ii) develop a plan
for outreach to and follow-up of military personnel; (iii) prepare a
report for service members concerning potential exposure to depleted
uranium and other toxic chemical substances and the precautions
recommended under combat and noncombat conditions while in a combat
zone; (iv) submit a report by October 1, 2006, to the joint veterans
and military affairs committee on the scope and adequacy of training
received by members of the Washington national guard on detecting
whether their service as eligible members is likely to entail, or to
have entailed, exposure to depleted uranium, including an assessment of
the feasibility and cost of adding predeployment training concerning
potential exposure to depleted uranium and other toxic chemical
substances; and (v) study the health effects of hazardous materials
exposure including, but not limited to, depleted uranium, as they
relate to military service and submit a report and recommendations to
the joint veterans and military affairs committee.
(b) By January 31, 2007, the joint veterans and military affairs
committee shall submit its recommendations, if any, to the appropriate
committees of the legislature.

Sec. 117 2006 c 372 s 152 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,571,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,590,000))
$1,605,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,169,000))
$3,184,000

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:))

Sec. 118 2006 c 372 s 154 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $745,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($728,000))
$845,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,037,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,527,000))
$2,644,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $184,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for information
technology operation and maintenance costs.

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 201 2006 c 372 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES. (1)
Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health
services shall initially be allotted as required by this act.
Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of
moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in
this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that
purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2006)) 2007,
unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year ((2006)) 2007 among
programs after approval by the director of financial management.
However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in
(b) of this subsection.
(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2006
caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the medical
assistance, long-term care, foster care, adoption support, and child
support programs, the department may transfer state moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose, ((other than family support
appropriations for the developmental disabilities program in section
205(1)(e) of this act and family reconciliation services appropriations
for the children and family services program in section 202(20) of this
act,)) after approval by the director of financial management.
(c) The department shall not transfer funds, ((and the director of
financial management shall not approve the transfer,)) unless the
transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum
extent possible, the expenditure of state funds ((and not federal
funds)). The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing ((seven days prior to approving)) of any
allotment modifications or transfers approved under this subsection.
((The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and
justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by
budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment
modifications or transfers.))
(4) The department is authorized to expend up to $4,700,000 of its
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 for any
reductions in federal funding in fiscal year 2006 for targeted case
management services for children who are in the care of the state. The
director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing seven
days prior to approving any allotment modifications under this
subsection.
(5) The department is authorized to develop an integrated health
care program designed to slow the progression of illness and disability
and better manage Medicaid expenditures for the aged and disabled
population. Under this Washington medicaid integration partnership
(WMIP) the department may combine and transfer such Medicaid funds
appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 209 of this act as may
be necessary to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons during the 2005-2007 biennium. The amount
of funding assigned to the pilot projects from each program may not
exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act for individuals
covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the health condition
of persons enrolled in the pilot, times the number of clients enrolled
in the pilot. In implementing the WMIP pilot projects, the department
may: (a) Withhold from calculations of "available resources" as set
forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the capitated rate for
individuals enrolled in the pilots; and (b) employ capitation financing
and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health care service
contractors licensed by the office of the insurance commissioner and
qualified to participate in both the medicaid and medicare programs.
The department shall conduct an evaluation of the WMIP, measuring
changes in participant health outcomes, changes in patterns of service
utilization, participant satisfaction, participant access to services,
and the state fiscal impact.
(6) In accordance with RCW 74.39A.300, the appropriations to the
department of social and health services in this act are sufficient to
implement the compensation and fringe benefits of the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers of home care
services.

Sec. 202 2006 c 372 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,266,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($287,602,000))
$285,981,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($433,829,000))
$435,032,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,345,000))
$1,000,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,405,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,860,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($699,000))
$711,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($993,406,000))
$992,655,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,271,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $2,271,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $1,584,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the category of services titled
"intensive family preservation services."
(2) $701,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $701,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $322,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-
affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(4) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a foster parent retention
program. This program is directed at foster parents caring for
children who act out sexually.
(5) The providers for the 31 HOPE beds shall be paid a $1,000 base
payment per bed per month, and reimbursed for the remainder of the bed
cost only when the beds are occupied.
(6) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures. The
department shall adjust adoption support benefits to account for the
availability of the new federal adoption support tax credit for special
needs children. The department shall report annually by October 1st to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the specific efforts
taken to contain costs.
(7) $4,661,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $12,666,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $7,443,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for reforms to the child protective
services and child welfare services programs, including improvement in
achieving face-to-face contact for children every 30 days, improved
timeliness of child protective services investigations, and education
specialist services. The department shall report by December 1st of
each year on the implementation status of the enhancements, including
the hiring of new staff, and the outcomes of the reform efforts. The
information provided shall include a progress report on items in the
child and family services review program improvement plan and areas
identified for improvement in the Braam lawsuit settlement.
(8) Within amounts appropriated in this section, priority shall be
given to proven intervention models, including evidence-based
prevention and early intervention programs identified by the Washington
institute for public policy and the department. The department shall
include information on the number, type, and outcomes of the evidence-based programs being implemented in its reports on child welfare reform
efforts.
(9) $177,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $228,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the state association of
children's advocacy centers. Funds may be used for (a) children's
advocacy centers that meet the national children's alliance
accreditation standards for full membership, and are members in good
standing; (b) communities in the process of establishing a center; and
(c) the state association of children's advocacy centers. A 50 percent
match will be required of each center receiving state funding.
(10) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a street youth program in
Spokane.
(11) $4,672,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,672,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for secure crisis residential
centers.
(12) $572,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for section 305 of Senate Bill No.
5763 (mental disorders treatment) for chemical dependency specialist
services.
(13) (($3,500,000)) $3,386,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 and (($1,500,000)) $1,449,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for ((Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 5922 (child neglect). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, these amounts shall lapse)) chapter 512, Laws of 2005.
(14) $1,345,000 of the domestic violence prevention account
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 374,
Laws of 2005.
(15) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the supervised visitation and safe
exchange center in Kent. The department shall not retain any portion
for administrative purposes.
(16) $450,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2002 (foster care support services). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $521,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $223,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for a statewide foster parent recruitment and retention
program pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 3115 (foster care
critical support). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) The department shall evaluate integrating a family assessment
component into its practice model for working with lower risk families
involved with child protective services. The department shall report
its findings to the joint task force on child safety for children in
child protective services or child welfare services by July 1, 2007.
(19) $3,700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $3,700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $6,200,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid treatment child care
(MTCC) program. The department shall contract for MTCC services. In
addition to referrals made by children's administration case workers,
the department shall authorize children referred to the MTCC program by
local public health nurses and case workers from the temporary
assistance for needy families (TANF) program, as long as the children
meet the eligibility requirements as outlined in the Washington state
plan for the MTCC program. Starting in June 2006, the department shall
report quarterly to the appropriate policy committees of the
legislature on the MTCC program and include monthly statewide and
regional information on: (a) The number of referrals; (b) the number
of authorized referrals and child enrollments; and (c) program
expenditure levels.
(20) $540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $2,476,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for the category of services titled "family
reconciliation services."
(21) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for continuum of care in Region 1.

Sec. 203 2006 c 372 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,031,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,615,000))
$80,456,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,668,000))
$6,463,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,385,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,516,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($449,000))
$451,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($210,762,000))
$211,400,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $706,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation is provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $6,156,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts
provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county
impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $1,020,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,030,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $5,345,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation are provided solely to implement
community juvenile accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws
of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection
may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants,
administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the
grants.
(4) $2,997,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely to implement alcohol and
substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on
a competitive basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision
of services approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for
evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and
shall assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) For the purposes of a pilot project, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall provide a block grant, rather than
categorical funding, for consolidated juvenile services, community
juvenile accountability act grants, the chemically dependent
disposition alternative, and the special sex offender disposition
alternative to the Pierce county juvenile court. To evaluate the
effect of decategorizing funding for youth services, the juvenile court
shall do the following:
(a) Develop intermediate client outcomes according to the risk
assessment tool (RAT) currently used by juvenile courts and in
coordination with the juvenile rehabilitation administration;
(b) Track the number of youth participating in each type of
service, intermediate outcomes, and the incidence of recidivism within
twenty-four months of completion of services;
(c) Track similar data as in (b) of this subsection with an
appropriate comparison group, selected in coordination with the
juvenile rehabilitation administration and the family policy council;
(d) Document the process for managing block grant funds on a
quarterly basis, and provide this report to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the family policy council; and
(e) Provide a process evaluation to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the family policy council by June 20, 2006, and a
concluding report by June 30, 2007. The court shall develop this
evaluation in consultation with the juvenile rehabilitation
administration, the family policy council, and the Washington state
institute for public policy.
(6) $319,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $678,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to establish a reinvesting in
youth pilot program. Participation shall be limited to three counties
or groups of counties, including one charter county with a population
of over eight hundred thousand residents and at least one county or
group of counties with a combined population of three hundred thousand
residents or less.
(a) Only the following intervention service models shall be funded
under the pilot program: (i) Functional family therapy; (ii)
multi-systemic therapy; and (iii) aggression replacement training.
(b) Subject to (c) of this subsection, payments to counties in the
pilot program shall be sixty-nine percent of the average service model
cost per youth times the number of youth engaged by the selected
service model. For the purposes of calculating the average service
model cost per engaged youth for a county, the following costs will be
included: Staff salaries, staff benefits, training, fees, quality
assurance, and local expenditures on administration.
(c) Distribution of moneys to the charter county with a population
of over eight hundred thousand residents shall be based upon the number
of youth that are engaged by the intervention service models, up to six
hundred thousand dollars for the biennium. The department may
distribute the remaining grant moneys to the other counties selected to
participate in the pilot program.
(d) The department shall provide recommendations to the legislature
by June 30, 2006, regarding a cost savings calculation methodology, a
funds distribution formula, and criteria for service model eligibility
for use if the reinvesting in youth program is continued in future
biennia.
(7) $602,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims in
Brown, et. al v. State of Washington, Pierce County Superior Court
Cause No. 04-2-11093-4. The expenditure of this appropriation is
contingent on the release of all claims in this case, and total
settlement costs shall not exceed the amount provided in this
subsection. If settlement is not executed by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 204 2006 c 372 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,292,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($283,039,000))
$278,587,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($344,331,000))
$338,930,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,970,000))
$6,100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($889,632,000))
$883,909,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $103,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for persons and services not
covered by the medicaid program. The department shall distribute this
amount among the regional support networks according to a formula that,
consistent with RCW 71.24.035(13), assures continuation of fiscal year
2003 levels of nonmedicaid service in each regional support network
area for the following service categories in the following priority
order: (i) Crisis and commitment services; (ii) community inpatient
services; and (iii) residential care services, including personal care
and emergency housing assistance. The formula shall also ensure that
each regional support network's combined state and federal allocation
is no less than the amount it was due under the fiscal year 2005
allocation methodology. The remaining amounts shall be distributed
based upon a formula that incorporates each regional support network's
percentage of the state's population.
(b) $100,959,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for persons and services not
covered by the medicaid program. Consistent with RCW 71.24.035(13),
these funds shall be distributed proportional to each regional support
network's percentage of the total state population.
(c) (($10,882,000)) $10,466,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 and (($10,922,000)) $10,504,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to increase
medicaid capitation rates (i) by three and one-half percent, for
regional support networks whose fiscal year 2006 capitation rates are
above the statewide population-weighted average; and (ii) to the
statewide population-weighted average, for regional support networks
whose fiscal year 2006 capitation rates are below that level. Regional
support networks may elect to receive all or a portion of the general
fund--state share of the funding for which they qualify under this
subsection (1)(c) as an increase in nonmedicaid rather than medicaid
funding. Regional support networks choosing to obtain funding in this
way must notify the department of their decision no later than June 1,
2006.
(d) $359,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to ensure that no regional support
network's combined state and federal allocation is less than the amount
it was due under the fiscal year 2006 allocation methodology.
(e) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for grants to hospitals that are unable to
receive disproportionate share hospital funding due to the federal
funding restrictions on "institutions for mental disease." These funds
shall be allocated among eligible hospitals proportional to the amount
the hospital would have received from the disproportionate share
hospital grants funded under section 209 of this 2006 act if the
federal funding restriction were not in effect.
(f) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for a contract with the national alliance
for the mentally ill of greater Seattle to assist people who are
recovering from a major mental illness to participate in development of
a group residence for women.
(g) $2,825,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to refund to regional support networks
fifty percent of the "liquidated damages" amount that was withheld from
payments to the regional support network during fiscal years 2002
through 2005 because the regional support network used more than its
allocated number of state hospital days of care. The payments directed
in this subsection (1)(g) are contingent upon agreement by the regional
support network that the funds shall be used only for mental health
services. The payments directed in this subsection do not apply to
regional support networks to which such refunds have been directed by
court order prior to the effective date of this 2006 act.
(h) The department shall refund to the regional support networks
100 percent of the "liquidated damages" that have been withheld from
payments to the regional support network during fiscal year 2006 for
periods prior to the effective date of this act. The payments directed
in this subsection (1)(h) do not apply to regional support networks to
which such refunds have been directed by court order prior to the
effective date of this act.
(i) $3,238,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the department and regional support
networks to contract for development and initial implementation of
high-intensity program for active community treatment (PACT) teams, and
other proven program approaches which the department concurs will
enable the regional support network to achieve significant reductions
during fiscal year 2008 and thereafter in the number of beds the
regional support network would otherwise need to use at the state
hospitals.
(j) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall average 222 per day
throughout fiscal year 2007. The number of nonforensic beds allocated
for use by regional support networks at western state hospital shall
average 727 during the first quarter of fiscal year 2007, 757 during
the second quarter of fiscal year 2007, and 777 during the third and
fourth quarters of fiscal year 2007. During fiscal year 2007, the
department shall not separately charge regional support networks for
use of state hospital beds for short-term commitments, or for persons
served in the program for adaptive living skills (PALS), but the days
of care provided for such commitments and in the PALS program shall
count against the regional support network's state hospital allocation.
The legislature intends to authorize separate charges for the PALS
program beginning in January 2008.
(k) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(l) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department
shall contract with the Clark county regional support network for
development and operation of a project demonstrating collaborative
methods for providing intensive mental health services in the school
setting for severely emotionally disturbed children who are medicaid
eligible. Project services shall be delivered by teachers and teaching
assistants who qualify as, or who are under the supervision of, mental
health professionals meeting the requirements of chapter 275-57 WAC.
The department shall increase medicaid payments to the regional support
network by the amount necessary to cover the necessary and allowable
costs of the demonstration, not to exceed the upper payment limit
specified for the regional support network in the department's medicaid
waiver agreement with the federal government after meeting all other
medicaid spending requirements assumed in this subsection. The
regional support network shall provide the required nonfederal share of
the increased medicaid payment provided for operation of this project.
(m) $3,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to establish a base community
psychiatric hospitalization payment rate. The base payment rate shall
be $400 per indigent patient day at hospitals that accept commitments
under the involuntary treatment act, and $550 per medicaid patient day
at free-standing psychiatric hospitals that accept commitments under
the involuntary treatment act. The department shall allocate these
funds among the regional support networks to reflect projected
expenditures at the enhanced payment level by hospital and region.
(n) At least $902,000 of the federal block grant funding
appropriated in this subsection shall be used for the continued
operation of the mentally ill offender pilot program.
(o) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for mental health services for
mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for
facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon
mentally ill offenders' release from confinement. These amounts shall
supplement, and not supplant, local or other funding or in-kind
resources currently being used for these purposes. The department is
authorized to transfer such amounts as are necessary, which are not to
exceed $418,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $418,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, to the economic services program for the purposes of
implementing section 12 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
1290 (community mental health) related to reinstating and facilitating
access to mental health services upon mentally ill offenders' release
from confinement.
(p) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for grants for innovative mental
health service delivery projects. Such projects may include, but are
not limited to, clubhouse programs and projects for integrated health
care and behavioral health services for general assistance recipients.
These amounts shall supplement, and not supplant, local or other
funding currently being used for activities funded under the projects
authorized in this subsection.
(q) The department is authorized to continue to expend federal
block grant funds, and special purpose federal grants, through direct
contracts, rather than through contracts with regional support
networks; and to distribute such funds through a formula other than the
one established pursuant to RCW 71.24.035(13).
(r) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(s) $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $4,500,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment. Coordination of these services will be done in partnership
between the mental health program and the aging and disability services
administration. The funds are not subject to the standard allocation
formula applied in accordance with RCW 71.24.035(13)(a).
(t) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided to continue performance-based incentive
contracts to provide appropriate community support services for
individuals with severe mental illness who have been discharged from
the state hospitals. These funds will be used to enhance community
residential and support services provided by regional support networks
through other state and federal funding.
(u) $539,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to assist with the one-time start-up costs
of two evaluation and treatment facilities. Funding for ongoing
program operations shall be from existing funds that would otherwise be
expended upon short-term treatment in state or community hospitals.
(v) $550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for enhancing rates to a facility
that (i) is a licensed nursing home; (ii) is considered to be an
"Institution for Mental Diseases" under centers for medicare and
medicaid services criteria; (iii) specializes in long-term
rehabilitation services for people with chronic mental illness who are
chronically medically-compromised; and (iv) provides services to a
minimum of 48 consumers funded by a regional support network. These
amounts shall be provided in coordination with and under the auspices
of a regional support network and shall enhance, and not supplant,
other funding or in-kind resources currently being used for these
purposes. These funds shall be used to cover costs incurred throughout
fiscal year 2006 and fiscal year 2007 and ensure adequate compensation
for extra medical care services, personal care services, and other
incidental costs that are not fully covered in the current rate paid to
the facility.
(w) $450,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the mental health division, in
collaboration with the children's administration and the juvenile
rehabilitation services administration, to establish a pilot program to
provide evidence-based mental health services to children. The mental
health service or services to be provided under the pilot program must
be selected from a list of evidence-based service options developed by
the department, in consultation with a broadly representative group of
individuals with expertise in children's mental health.
(i) The program site shall be selected through a request for
proposal (RFP) process, open to counties or groups of counties, and
shall be operational by December 2006.
(ii) Pilot site proposals shall be required to include: A
designated lead agency and a commitment to work with community
partners, including consumer/family representatives and representatives
of the local mental health, juvenile justice, and child welfare systems
and, at the applicant's discretion, may also include representatives of
other child-serving systems such as health care and education;
identification of areas of potential need based upon input from
community partners; identification of the service or services that the
pilot site would implement based upon community needs and resources;
and demonstration of a commitment to participate in efforts that will
ensure adherence to the chosen evidence-based practices and evaluate
outcomes of implementation of the evidence-based practices.
(iii) The department shall contract with the University of
Washington school of medicine's department of psychiatry and behavioral
sciences division of public behavioral health and justice to provide
support and assistance in all phases of the pilot program, including
initiating, implementing, training providers, providing quality
assurance, and monitoring implementation and outcomes.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,706,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($137,445,000))
$136,572,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($143,693,000))
$143,682,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,994,000))
$31,991,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $965,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($428,803,000))
$428,916,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state mental hospitals may use funds appropriated in this
subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $3,725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to operate at least one more
forensic ward at western state hospital than was operational in
December 2004, and to employ professional staff in addition to those
assigned in December 2004 to conduct outpatient evaluations of
competency to stand trial.
(c) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood on September 1 of each year for police services provided by
the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.
(d) $6,770,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $19,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to open on a temporary basis five
additional adult civil commitment wards at the state psychiatric
hospitals. The legislature intends for these wards to close, on a
phased basis, during the 2007-09 biennium as a result of targeted
investments in community services for persons who would otherwise need
care in the hospitals. To the extent that the department and regional
support networks are able to develop and implement cost-effective
approaches during fiscal year 2007 that would avert the need to open
one or more of the additional wards, the department is authorized to
use funds appropriated in this subsection for implementation of those
approaches. The department shall seek review and comment from the
legislative fiscal committees at least thirty days prior to proceeding
with implementation of any such alternative approach.

(3) CIVIL COMMITMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,499,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,276,000))
$42,714,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,904,000))
$83,342,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $643,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,726,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,395,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,765,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $40,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement the request for proposal process required
by House Bill No. 1290 (community mental health). If House Bill No.
1290 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, these amounts shall lapse.
(b) $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to develop and to train community
mental health staff in the use of the integrated chemical
dependency/mental health screening and assessment system and tool
required by section 601 of Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders
treatment). If section 601 of Senate Bill No. 5763 is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, these amounts shall lapse.
(c) Funds provided in this subsection may be used to issue a
request for proposals in accordance with RCW 71.24.320(2) only if
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6793 is enacted by June 30, 2006.

(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,577,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,183,000))
$4,473,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,881,000))
$6,780,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,000))
$21,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,660,000))
$17,851,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $164,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the institute for public policy to continue the
longitudinal analysis directed in chapter 334, Laws of 2001 (mental
health performance audit), and, to the extent funds are available
within these amounts, to build upon the evaluation of the impacts of
chapter 214, Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders).
(b) $2,032,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the purposes of complying with and
satisfaction of a final court order and judgment in Pierce County, et
al v. State of Washington and State of Washington Department of Social
and Health Services, et al, Thurston County Superior Court Cause No.
03-2-00918-8.
(c) $520,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims in
County of Spokane, a Washington municipal entity v. State of Washington
Department of Social and Health Services and Dennis Braddock, the
Secretary of the Department of Social and Health Services, in his
official capacity, Thurston County Superior Court Cause No. 03-2-01268-5. The expenditure of this amount is contingent on the release of all
claims in the case, and total settlement costs shall not exceed the
amount provided in this subsection. If the settlement is not executed
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(d) Funds provided in this subsection may be used to issue a
request for proposals in accordance with RCW 71.24.320(2) only if
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6793 is enacted by June 30, 2006.

Sec. 205 2006 c 372 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $296,430,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($312,856,000))
$319,012,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($503,419,000))
$515,395,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $904,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,113,747,000))
$1,131,879,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The entire health services account appropriation, $151,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006, $427,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and
$1,482,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for health care benefits for agency home care workers who are
employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours a week. The
state contribution to the cost of health care benefits per
participating worker per month shall be no greater than $449.00 in
fiscal year 2006 and $532.00 in fiscal year 2007.
(b) Individuals receiving family support or high school transition
payments as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental
payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW
74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.
(c) $516,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, (($1,917,000)) $2,920,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and (($2,433,000)) $2,434,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
community residential and support services. Funding in this subsection
shall be prioritized for (i) residents of residential habilitation
centers who are able to be adequately cared for in community settings
and who choose to live in those community settings; (ii) clients
without residential services who are at immediate risk of
institutionalization or in crisis; (iii) children who are aging out of
other state services; and (iv) current home and community-based waiver
program clients who have been assessed as having an immediate need for
increased services. The department shall ensure that the average cost
per day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not
exceed $300. In order to maximize the number of clients served and
ensure the cost-effectiveness of the waiver programs, the department
will strive to limit new client placement expenditures to 90 percent of
the budgeted daily rate. If this can be accomplished, additional
clients may be served with excess funds provided the total projected
carry-forward expenditures do not exceed the amounts estimated. The
department shall electronically report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the
number of persons served with these additional community services,
where they were residing, what kinds of services they were receiving
prior to placement, and the actual expenditures for all community
services to support these clients.
(d) $579,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, (($1,735,000)) $2,023,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and (($2,315,000)) $2,557,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
expanded community services for persons with developmental disabilities
who also have community protection issues. Funding in this subsection
shall be prioritized for (i) clients being diverted or discharged from
the state psychiatric hospitals; (ii) clients participating in the
dangerous mentally ill offender program; (iii) clients participating in
the community protection program; and (iv) mental health crisis
diversion outplacements. The department shall ensure that the average
cost per day for all program services other than start-up costs shall
not exceed (($300)) $325. In order to maximize the number of clients
served and ensure the cost-effectiveness of the waiver programs, the
department will strive to limit new client placement expenditures to 90
percent of the budgeted daily rate. If this can be accomplished,
additional clients may be served with excess funds if the total
projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed the amounts
estimated. The department shall implement the four new waiver programs
such that decisions about enrollment levels and the amount, duration,
and scope of services maintain expenditures within appropriations. The
department shall electronically report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the
number of persons served with these additional community services,
where they were residing, what kinds of services they were receiving
prior to placement, and the actual expenditures for all community
services to support these clients.
(e) $12,902,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, (($13,802,000)) $12,502,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and $8,579,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for family support
programs for individuals with developmental disabilities.
Of the amounts provided in this subsection (e), $900,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $1,600,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are
provided solely for the implementation of a flexible family support
pilot program for families who are providing care and support for
family members with developmental disabilities. The program shall
provide funding for support services such as respite care, training and
counseling, assistive technologies, transition services, and assistance
with extraordinary household expenses.
(i) To receive funding, an individual must: (A) Be eligible for
services from the division of developmental disabilities; (B) live with
his or her family; (C) not live independently or with a spouse; (D) not
receive paid services through the division, including medicaid personal
care and medicaid waiver services; and (E) have gross household income
of less than or equal to four hundred percent of the federal poverty
level.
(ii) The department shall determine individual funding awards based
on the following criteria: (A) Documented need for services, with
priority given to individuals in crisis or at immediate risk of needing
institutional services, individuals who transition from high school
without employment or day program opportunities, individuals cared for
by a single parent, and individuals with multiple disabilities; (B)
number and ages of family members and their relation to the individual
with developmental disabilities; (C) gross annual household income; and
(D) availability of state funds.
Funding awards may be made as one-time awards or on a renewable
basis. Renewable awards shall be for a period of twelve months for the
biennium. Awards shall be based upon the criteria provided in this
subsection, but shall be within the following limits: Maximum of
$4,000 per year for an individual whose gross annual household income
is up to 100 percent of the federal poverty level; maximum of $3,000
per year for an individual whose gross annual household income is up to
200 percent of the federal poverty level; maximum of $2,000 per year
for an individual whose gross annual household income is up to 300
percent of the federal poverty level; and maximum of $1,000 per year
for an individual whose gross annual household income is up to 400
percent of the federal poverty level. Of the amounts provided in this
subsection, $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for one-time awards.
(iii) Eligibility for, and the amount of, renewable awards and one-time awards shall be redetermined annually and shall correspond with
the application of the department's mini-assessment tool. At the end
of each award period, the department must redetermine eligibility for
funding, including increases or reductions in the level of funding, as
appropriate.
(iv) By November 1, 2006, the department shall provide
recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature on strategies for integrating state-funded family support
programs, including, if appropriate, the flexible family support pilot
program, into a single program. The department shall also provide a
status report on the flexible family support pilot program, which shall
include the following information: The number of applicants for
funding; the total number of awards; the number and amount of both
annual and one-time awards, broken down by household income levels; and
the purpose of the awards.
(v) The department shall manage enrollment and award levels so as
to not exceed the amounts appropriated for this purpose.
(f) $840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $3,060,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $1,500,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for employment and day services.
Priority consideration for this new funding shall be young adults with
developmental disabilities living with their family who need employment
opportunities and assistance after high school graduation. Services
shall be provided for both waiver and nonwaiver clients.
(g) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $2,000,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided for implementation of the administrative
rate standardization. These amounts are in addition to any vendor rate
increase adopted by the legislature.
(h) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for services to community clients
provided by licensed professionals at the state residential
habilitation centers. The division shall submit claims for
reimbursement for services provided to clients living in the community
with medical assistance or third-party health coverage, as appropriate,
and shall implement a system for billing clients without coverage. The
department shall provide a report by December 1, 2006, to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the number of clients
served, services provided, and expenditures and revenues associated
with those services.
(i) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $65,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for supplemental compensation increases for direct care
workers employed by home care agencies in recognition of higher labor
market cost pressures experienced by agencies subject to collective
bargaining obligations. In order for a specific home care agency to be
eligible for such increases, home care agencies shall submit the
following to the department:
(i) Proof of a legally binding, written commitment to increase the
compensation of agency home care workers; and
(ii) Proof of the existence of a method of enforcement of the
commitment, such as arbitration, that is available to the employees or
their representative, and proof that such a method is expeditious, uses
a neutral decision maker, and is economical for the employees.
(j) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $12,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase boarding home provider payment rates by 1.0
percent, effective July 1, 2006.
(k) $134,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $134,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase adult family home provider payment rates by
1.0 percent, effective July 1, 2006.
(l) $955,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $958,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for a rate increase for supported living providers of
15 cents per hour for King county, and 12 cents per hour for all other
counties.
(m) $778,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $580,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for additional case managers and support staff. The
department shall dedicate half of the amount provided in this
subsection to accelerate the implementation of the mini-assessment tool
on clients not currently receiving paid services, who are receiving
medicaid.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,623,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,826,000))
$78,127,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($153,807,000))
$158,854,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,237,000))
$13,220,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $457,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($320,950,000))
$327,281,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The developmental disabilities program is
authorized to use funds appropriated in this section to purchase goods
and supplies through direct contracting with vendors when the program
determines it is cost-effective to do so.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,312,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,924,000))
$1,915,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,014,000))
$3,490,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,000))
$19,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,267,000))
$7,736,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $578,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $578,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of developing
and implementing a consistent needs assessment instrument for use on
all clients with developmental disabilities. In developing the
instrument, the department shall develop a process for collecting data
on family income for minor children with developmental disabilities and
all individuals who are receiving state-only funded services. The
department shall ensure that this information is captured as part of
the client assessment process.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
((General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000))
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,238,000))
$17,227,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,268,000))
$17,240,000

Sec. 206 2006 c 372 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $610,082,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($663,865,000))
$665,532,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,312,062,000))
$1,313,841,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,949,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,888,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($317,000))
$319,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,610,163,000))
$2,613,611,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire health services account appropriation, $6,911,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006,
(($11,571,000)) $9,698,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and (($23,251,000)) $21,679,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits for
agency home care workers who are employed through state contracts for
at least twenty hours a week. The state contribution to the cost of
health care benefits per eligible participating worker per month shall
be no greater than $449.00 in fiscal year 2006 and $532.00 per month in
fiscal year 2007. The department, in consultation with the home care
quality authority and the health care authority, shall examine how the
state determines the appropriate level of health care costs when
establishing state contribution rates for all agency and individual
home care workers caring for state subsidized clients. The department
shall recommend options as to how equivalent benefits can be purchased
on behalf of home care workers in a more cost effective manner to the
office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of
the legislature by October 1, 2006.
(2) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $147.57 for
fiscal year 2006 and shall not exceed $156.41 for fiscal year 2007.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue certificates of capital authorization that result in up to $16
million of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in
fiscal year 2006; up to $16 million of increased asset value completed
and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2007; and up to $16 million of
increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year
2008.
(4) Adult day health services shall not be considered a duplication
of services for persons receiving care in long-term care settings
licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW.
(5) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not qualify
for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval
and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 600
persons at any time.
(b) The second waiver program shall include coverage of in-home
care. Enrollment in this second waiver shall not exceed 200 persons at
any time.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(d) If it is necessary to establish a waiting list for either
waiver because the budgeted number of enrollment opportunities has been
reached, the department shall track how the long-term care needs of
applicants assigned to the waiting list are met.
(6) $1,604,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $3,450,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $5,064,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase compensation for direct
care workers employed by home care agencies by 27 cents per hour on
July 1, 2005, and by an additional 23 cents per hour on July 1, 2006.
The amounts in this subsection also include the funds needed for the
employer share of unemployment and social security taxes on the amount
of the increase.
(7) $1,786,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,804,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
chore services program.
(8) The department shall establish waiting lists to the extent
necessary to assure that annual expenditures on the community options
program entry systems (COPES) program do not exceed appropriated
levels. In establishing and managing any such waiting list, the
department shall assure priority access to persons with the greatest
unmet needs, as determined by department assessment processes.
(9) $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $8,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $101,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to expand the number of boarding homes that receive
exceptional care rates for persons with Alzheimer's disease and related
dementias who might otherwise require nursing home care. The
department may expand the number of licensed boarding home facilities
that specialize in caring for such conditions by up to 85 beds in
fiscal year 2006 and up to 150 beds in fiscal year 2007.
(10) $305,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $377,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the senior farmer's market
nutrition program.
(11) $109,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $198,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1220 (long-term care financing). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for area agencies on aging, or
entities with which area agencies on aging contract, to provide a
kinship navigator for grandparents and other kinship caregivers of
children in both western and eastern Washington.
(a) Kinship navigator services shall include but not be limited to
assisting kinship caregivers with understanding and navigating the
system of services for children in out-of-home care while reducing
barriers faced by kinship caregivers when accessing services.
(b) In providing kinship navigator services, area agencies on aging
shall give priority to helping kinship caregivers maintain their
caregiving role by helping them access existing services and supports,
thus keeping children from entering foster care.
(13) $435,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $435,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for supplemental compensation increases for direct care
workers employed by home care agencies in recognition of higher labor
market cost pressures experienced by agencies subject to collective
bargaining obligations. In order for a specific home care agency to be
eligible for such increases, home care agencies shall submit the
following to the department:
(a) Proof of a legally binding, written commitment to increase the
compensation of agency home care workers; and
(b) Proof of the existence of a method of enforcement of the
commitment, such as arbitration, that is available to the employees or
their representative, and proof that such a method is expeditious, uses
a neutral decision maker, and is economical for the employees.
(14) $7,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $7,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for purposes of settling all claims in the class action
suit commonly known as Regency Pacific et al. v. Department of Social
and Health Services. The expenditure of this amount is contingent on
the release of all claims in the case, and total settlement costs shall
not exceed the amount provided in this subsection.
(15) $121,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $120,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2475
(individual providers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $57,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6630 (threatening individuals). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2006, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $4,493,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $4,478,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2333 (agency
home care workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $183,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $184,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for payments to a boarding home licensed under chapter
18.20 RCW on January 25, 2002, which contracts with the department to
provide assisted living services and which serves 20 or more clients
participating in the program for all-inclusive care.
(19) $10,090,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 and $10,090,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of House Bill
No. 2716 (nursing facility payment). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for area agencies on aging, or
entities with which area agencies on aging contract, to provide support
services through the kinship caregiver support program for grandparents
and other informal kinship caregivers of children throughout the state.
(21) $732,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $715,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase boarding home provider payment rates by 1.0
percent, effective July 1, 2006.
(22) $443,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $437,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase adult family home provider payment rates by
1.0 percent, effective July 1, 2006.

Sec. 207 2006 c 372 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($514,027,000))
$513,976,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($531,957,000))
$533,250,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,245,673,000))
$1,225,905,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,535,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,138,000))
$1,169,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,320,330,000))
$2,301,835,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $303,247,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006, $307,273,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007, and $905,232,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst
program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the
department shall:
(a) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Outcome data regarding job retention and wage progression
shall be reported quarterly to appropriate fiscal and policy committees
of the legislature for families who leave assistance, measured after 12
months, 24 months, and 36 months. The department shall also report the
percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance for
needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months; and
(b) Submit a report by October 1, 2005, to the fiscal committees of
the legislature containing a spending plan for the WorkFirst program.
The plan shall identify how spending levels in the 2005-2007 biennium
will be adjusted to stay within available federal grant levels and the
appropriated state-fund levels.
(2) $72,526,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($77,880,000)) $77,545,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for cash
assistance and other services to recipients in the general assistance--unemployable program. Within these amounts:
(a) The department may expend funds for services that assist
recipients to obtain employment and reduce their dependence on public
assistance, provided that expenditures for these services and cash
assistance do not exceed the funds provided. Mental health, substance
abuse, and vocational rehabilitation services may be provided to
recipients whose incapacity is not severe enough to qualify for
services through a regional support network, the alcoholism and drug
addiction treatment and support act, or the division of vocational
rehabilitation to the extent that those services are necessary to
eliminate or minimize barriers to employment;
(b) The department shall review the general assistance caseload to
identify recipients that would benefit from assistance in becoming
naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal
supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high
priority for naturalization funding through the department;
(c) The department shall identify general assistance recipients who
are or may be eligible to receive health care coverage or services
through the federal veteran's administration and assist recipients in
obtaining access to those benefits; and
(d) The department shall report by November of each year to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the progress and outcomes
of these efforts.
(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall increase the state supplemental payment by $10 per month
beginning in fiscal year 2006, and by an additional $2.06 per month
beginning in fiscal year 2007, for SSI clients who reside in nursing
facilities, residential habilitation centers, or state hospitals and
who receive a personal needs allowance and decrease other state
supplemental payments.
(4) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $10,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a subsidy rate increase for
child care providers. Of this amount, $500,000 per year shall be
targeted for child care providers in urban areas of region 1 and
$500,000 per year shall be targeted for one or more tiered-reimbursement pilot projects.

Sec. 208 2006 c 372 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND
SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,136,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,345,000))
$59,865,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($136,750,000))
$156,935,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $634,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,500,000))
$16,745,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,842,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,081,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($328,677,000))
$341,627,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $1,350,000 of the problem gambling account appropriation
are provided solely for the program established in Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1031 (problem gambling). If legislation creating the
account is not enacted by June 30, 2005, this amount shall lapse.
(2) $1,339,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,713,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the parent child assistance
program, including an expansion of services to southwestern Washington
and Skagit county. The department shall contract with the University
of Washington and community-based providers in Spokane, Yakima, Skagit
county, and southwestern Washington for the provision of this program.
For all contractors, indirect charges for administering the program
shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount. The amounts
provided in this subsection are sufficient to fund section 303 of
Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders treatment).
(3) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for vendor rate adjustments for
residential treatment providers for chemical dependency services.
(4) $465,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $934,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, $1,319,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, and
$700,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation are provided solely for vendor rate adjustments for
residential treatment providers. To the extent that a portion of this
funding is sufficient to maintain sufficient residential treatment
capacity, remaining amounts may then be used to provide vendor rate
adjustments to other types of providers as prioritized by the
department in order to maintain or increase treatment capacity.
(5) $1,916,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,278,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for integrated pilot programs as
required by section 203 of Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders
treatment). If section 203 of Senate Bill No. 5763 is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for intensive case management
pilot programs as required by section 220 of Senate Bill No. 5763
(mental disorders treatment). If section 220 of Senate Bill No. 5763
is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $159,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $140,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $161,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for development of the integrated chemical
dependency/mental health screening and assessment tool required by
section 601 of Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders treatment), and
associated training and quality assurance. If section 601 of Senate
Bill No. 5763 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $5,475,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, (($13,124,000)) $6,727,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and (($10,669,000)) $6,997,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to increase
capacity of chemical dependency treatment services for adult medicaid
eligible and general assistance-unemployable clients. The department
shall monitor the number and type of clients entering treatment, for
purposes of determining potential cost offsets.
(9) $1,967,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, (($2,523,000)) $1,361,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and (($1,496,000)) $1,109,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to increase
capacity of chemical dependency treatment services for minors who are
under 200 percent of the federal poverty level. The department shall
monitor the number and type of clients entering treatment, for purposes
of determining potential cost offsets.

Sec. 209 2006 c 372 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,462,447,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,550,541,000))
$1,582,226,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,001,987,000))
$3,926,067,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,000,000))
$15,039,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($677,288,000))
$678,654,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($123,000))
$124,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,709,386,000))
$7,666,557,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) The department shall continue to extend medicaid eligibility to
children through age 18 residing in households with incomes below 200
percent of the federal poverty level.
(3) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the department is authorized to disregard recoveries by
Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined
in RCW 48.104.030.
(4) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to continue podiatry services for medicaid-eligible adults.
(5) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to provide an adult dental benefit that is equivalent to the
benefit provided in the 2003-05 biennium.
(6) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The
public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the
required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the
payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules.
It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental
to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated
and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the
legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall
not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues
retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments.
(7) $2,221,000 of the health services account appropriation,
$5,402,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation, $1,590,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006, and
$1,591,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2007 are provided solely for grants to rural hospitals. The department
shall distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively
larger share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(8) $21,092,000 of the health services account appropriation and
$19,725,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided
solely for grants to nonrural hospitals. The department shall
distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively larger
share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(9) In response to the federal directive to eliminate
intergovernmental transfer transactions effective June 30, 2005, the
department is directed to implement the inpatient hospital certified
public expenditures program for the 2005-07 biennium. The program
shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated
by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or
state psychiatric institutions. Hospitals in the program shall be paid
and shall retain (a) one hundred percent of the federal portion of each
medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by the medical
assistance administration; and (b) one hundred percent of the federal
portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment
allowable under federal regulations. Medicaid fee-for-service claim
amounts shall be established by applying the department's ratio of
costs to charges payment methodology. The department shall provide
participating hospitals with the information and instructions needed by
the hospital to certify the public expenditures required to qualify for
the federal portions of both the medicaid inpatient fee-for-service
payments and the disproportionate share hospital payments. In the
event that any part of the program including, but not limited to,
allowable certified public expenditures, is disallowed by the federal
government, the department shall not seek recoupment of payments from
the hospitals, provided the hospitals have complied with the directions
of the department for participation in the program. The legislature
intends that hospitals in the program receive no less in combined state
and federal payments than they would have received under the
methodology that was in place during fiscal year 2005. The department
shall therefore make additional grant payments, not to exceed the
amounts specified in this subsection, to hospitals whose total payments
under the program would otherwise be less than the total state and
federal payments they would have received under the methodology in
effect during fiscal year 2005. Payments under these new state grant
and upper payment limit programs shall not exceed $54,054,000 from
general fund--state appropriations in fiscal year 2006, of which
$5,600,000 is appropriated in section 204(1) of this 2006 act and the
balance in this section; (($47,474,000)) $76,527,000 from general
fund--state appropriations in fiscal year 2007, of which $5,600,000 is
appropriated in section 204(1) of this 2006 act and the balance in this
section; and $11,328,000 from the general fund--federal appropriations
in this section.
(10) $4,077,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, (($4,847,000)) $330,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and (($70,100,000)) $65,529,000 of
the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
development and implementation of a replacement system for the existing
medicaid management information system.
(11) $188,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $225,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to contract for an independent
analysis of the medical assistance administration's current system for
establishing hospital inpatient payment rates, and for recommendations
on a new or updated system. The department shall submit an interim
report of study findings by December 1, 2005, and a final report by
November 15, 2006. The interim report shall include a comparison of
the strengths and weaknesses of the current rate-setting system
relative to those used by other state, federal, and private payers.
The final report shall include recommendations on the design and
implementation of a new or updated system that will promote equity
among hospitals, access to quality care and improved health outcomes
for patients, and cost-control and efficiency for taxpayers. The study
should make use of complete and current cost data from a wide variety
of hospitals, recognize unique aspects of hospital service delivery
structures and medicaid payment systems in Washington, recognize
impacts on productivity and quality of care that may result from
hospital compensation, recruitment, and retention policies, and provide
opportunities for comment and participation by key interest groups in
the identification and assessment of alternatives.
(12) Payment rates for hospital inpatient and outpatient services
shall be increased by an average of 1.3 percent effective July 1, 2005,
and by an average of an additional 1.3 percent effective July 1, 2006.
The inpatient increases shall be provided only on the portion of a
hospital's rate that excludes medical education and outlier costs, and
shall be allocated so that hospitals with lower costs of care
(excluding medical education and outlier costs) receive larger
percentage increases than those with higher costs of care. The
inpatient increases shall be allocated in three percentage increments,
with the lowest-cost hospitals receiving the largest percentage rate
increase, highest-cost hospitals receiving the smallest percentage
increase, and medium-cost hospitals receiving the average of the
highest and the lowest percentage rate increase. Increases shall not
be provided to those hospitals that are certified as critical access.
Sufficient funds are appropriated in this section for Healthy Options
contractors to increase hospital payment rates commensurate with the
increases in fee-for-service payment rates.
(13) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the department shall
provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if
eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.
(14) The medical assistance administration is authorized to use
funds appropriated in this section to purchase goods and supplies
through direct contracting with vendors when the administration
determines it is cost-effective to do so.
(15) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(16) By October 1, 2005, the department shall recommend to the
governor and legislature at least two pilot project designs which seem
likely to reduce avoidable emergency room utilization at no net cost to
the state within the projects' first eighteen months of operation.
(17) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department
shall participate in the health technology assessment program required
in section 213(6) of this act.
(18) The department is also required to participate in the joint
health purchasing project described in section 213(7) of this act.
(19) The department shall, within available resources, continue
operation of the medical care services care management pilot project
for clients receiving general assistance benefits in King and Pierce
counties. The project may use a full or partial capitation model that
includes a mechanism for shared savings. The department shall provide
a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1,
2006, on costs, savings, and any outcomes or quality measures
associated with the pilot programs during the first year of operation.
(20) By October 1, 2005, the department shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the potential fiscal and
programmatic costs and benefits associated with an expansion of managed
care pilot programs to SSI and other eligible medicaid elderly and
disabled persons.
(21) By November 15, 2006, the department of social and health
services, in consultation with the department of revenue and the health
care authority, shall report to the health care and fiscal committees
of the legislature on options for providing financial incentives for
private practice physicians to serve uninsured, medicare, and medicaid
patients. The report shall include an assessment of the relative costs
and effectiveness of strategies including, but not limited to, tax
credits and payment rate increases. The report shall further suggest
alternative mechanisms and thresholds for varying tax credits and
payment enhancements according to the extent to which a provider serves
uninsured, medicare, and medicaid patients.
(22) The department is directed to pursue all available
administrative remedies to dispute and reverse recent large retroactive
charges by the federal medicare program for payment of medicare part B
premiums on behalf of medicaid recipients, to the extent that such
premiums are for periods when medicare coverage was in fact never
provided the beneficiaries, and their care was instead fully covered by
the state medicaid program. The department shall report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2006, on the actions it
has taken to dispute and reverse these charges.
(23) $66,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $66,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2002
(foster care support services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(24) $255,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $2,107,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase the availability of family planning
services at the department of social and health services' community
service offices. Resources will be prioritized for those offices where
pregnancy rates are higher than the statewide average.
(25) $17,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $53,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $70,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for conducting a study of the employment status of
enrollees in the basic health plan and the medical assistance program,
pursuant to Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 3079 (health care
services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 210 2006 c 372 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,694,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,014,000))
$10,946,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($89,472,000))
$89,471,000

Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,792,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,000))
$33,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($113,003,000))
$112,936,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The division of vocational rehabilitation
shall maintain support for existing clubhouse programs at the 2003-2005
level.

Sec. 211 2006 c 372 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,675,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,860,000))
$41,279,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,376,000))
$61,788,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($810,000))
$836,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,452,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,793,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($300,000))
$246,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($139,266,000))
$143,069,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project through the governor's juvenile justice advisory committee.
(2) $2,452,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation, $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $1,791,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
family policy council.
(3) $2,245,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,589,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $3,834,000 of the general--fund federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement the 2005-07 home care
worker collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 212 2006 c 372 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,755,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,277,000))
$50,970,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,248,000))
$49,938,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($145,280,000))
$149,663,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $114,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 and $51,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for chapter 512, Laws of
2005.

Sec. 213 2006 c 372 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,779,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,032,000))
$3,067,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,321,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,145,000))
$7,180,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The commission shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing any changes in existing federal revenues for the
remainder of the current fiscal year and changes in projections of
federal revenue for the upcoming fiscal year.
(2) $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for a human rights commission investigator
to travel to Vancouver once a week to provide complaint intake,
outreach, and conduct investigations.

Sec. 214 2006 c 372 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,231,000))
$22,442,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,839,000))
$23,050,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) During the 2005-2007 biennium, the criminal justice training
commission is authorized to raise existing fees charged for firearms
certification for security guards in excess of the fiscal growth factor
established pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the
actual costs of conducting the certification programs and the
appropriation levels in this section.
(2) $100,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for support of the coalition of small
police agencies major crimes task force. The purpose of this task
force is to pool its resources and to establish an efficient and
cooperative approach in addressing major violent crimes.
(3) Amounts provided within this section are sufficient to
implement the provisions of section 2 of House Bill No. 1136
(electronic monitoring system).
(4) $163,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of section 4 of
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2805 (missing persons). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(5) The commission shall conduct a survey of local law enforcement
and state agencies to collect data projecting future cadet enrollments
for the 2007-2009 biennium. The commission shall report the findings
to the legislature by October 1, 2006.
(6)(a) $411,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6502 (victim information system). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for a contract with the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs to implement a statewide automated victim
information and notification system. This system shall be added to the
city and county jail booking and reporting system. The statewide
automated victim information and notification system shall:
(i) Automatically notify a registered victim via the victim's
choice of telephone, letter, or e-mail when any of the following events
affect an offender housed in any Washington state city or county jail
or department of corrections facility: (A) Is transferred or assigned
to another facility; (B) is transferred to the custody of another
agency outside the state; (C) is given a different security
classification; (D) is released on temporary leave or otherwise; (E) is
discharged; (F) has escaped; or (G) has been served with a protective
order that was requested by the victim;
(ii) Automatically notify a registered victim via the victim's
choice of telephone, letter, or e-mail when an offender has: (A) An
upcoming court event where the victim is entitled to be present, if the
court information is made available to the statewide automated victim
information and notification system administrator at the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs; (B) an upcoming parole,
pardon, or community supervision hearing; or (C) a change in the
offender's parole, probation, or community supervision status including
a change in the offender's supervision status or a change in the
offender's address;
(iii) Automatically notify a registered victim via the victim's
choice of telephone, letter, or e-mail when a sex offender has: (A)
Updated his or her profile information with the state sex offender
registry; or (B) become noncompliant with the state sex offender
registry;
(iv) Permit a registered victim to receive the most recent status
report for an offender in any Washington state city and county jail,
department of corrections, or sex offender registry by calling the
statewide automated victim information and notification system on a
toll-free telephone number or by accessing the statewide automated
victim information and notification system via a public web site. All
registered victims calling the statewide automated victim information
and notification system will be given the option to have live operator
assistance to help use the program on a twenty-four hour, three hundred
sixty-five day per year basis;
(v) Permit a crime victim to register, or registered victim to
update, the victim's registration information for the statewide
automated victim information and notification system by calling a toll-free telephone number or by accessing a public web site; and
(vi) Ensure that the offender information contained within the
statewide automated victim information and notification system is
updated frequently to timely notify a crime victim that an offender has
been released or discharged or has escaped.
(b) The purpose of the victim information and notification system
is to protect the public health, safety, and welfare generally.
Creation and implementation of the victim information and notification
system does not create a private right of action.
(c) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs will
not require automated victim information and notification systems in
existence and operational as of the effective date of this act to
participate in the statewide system.
(d) Any vendor that the association contracts with to provide the
statewide automated victim notification service must deliver the
service with a minimum of 99.95-percent availability and with less than
an average of one-percent notification errors as a result of the
vendor's technology.
(e) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2006, on the availability of federal grant
funds to operate the victim information system.
(7) $132,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6320 (sex offender information). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) $1,575,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of sections
103, 104, and 105 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6239
(controlled substances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 215 2006 c 372 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,561,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,681,000))
$7,671,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,519,000
Public Safety and Education Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,995,000))
$36,303,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,827,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,673,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($211,084,000))
$210,804,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,621,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($208,033,000))
$208,036,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,185,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,730,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,357,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($537,135,000))
$537,156,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $700,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$699,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the construction of a computer system to collect data from
self-insured employers and are contingent on the passage of Substitute
House Bill No. 1310 (workers compensation reporting) on mandatory
electronic data reporting by self-insured employers. If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(2) $29,283,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation, and $10,000,000 of the public safety and education
account--federal appropriation are provided solely for the crime
victims' compensation program, subject to the following conditions:
(a) Reimbursement shall be provided throughout the 2005-2007
biennium for full reimbursement of sexual assault forensic exams at
workers' compensation rates;
(b) Reimbursement shall be provided throughout fiscal year 2007 for
full reimbursement of mental health care at workers' compensation
rates; and
(c) In accordance with RCW 7.68.015, it is the policy of the state
that the department of labor and industries operate the crime victims'
compensation program within the amounts provided for this program in
this subsection.
(3) $200,000 of the accident account--state appropriation is
provided solely to reimburse the department of agriculture for the
agricultural worker pesticide handling and application training
program.
(4) $71,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation and
$71,000 of the accident account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the review of payment of medical bills and authorization for
medical procedures by self-insurers.
(5) The department is required to participate in the health
technology assessment program required in section 213(6) of this act.
(6) The department is also required to participate in the joint
health purchasing project described in section 213(7) of this act.
(7) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $8,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1393 (older mobile homes). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(8) $182,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$623,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to (a) expand services in the centers of occupational health and
education (COHE) in Spokane and Renton; (b) add two additional COHE
locations in the state; and (c) include Yakima county in the Spokane
COHE.
(9) $158,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$158,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1856 (annual audits of
the state industrial insurance fund). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) The department shall delay the costs associated with
implementation of phase II of its indirect cost allocation plan for the
public works administration account until July 1, 2007.
(11) $236,000 of the public safety and education account--state is
provided solely for fiscal year 2007 to implement House Bill No. 2612
(failure to secure a load). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $83,000 of the electrical license account--state is provided
solely for fiscal year 2007 to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1841
(electrical trainees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006 the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((14))) (13) The department shall prepare a report identifying
programs funded either directly or indirectly from state workers'
compensation funds. The report shall describe the amounts and
percentages of funds used to administer identified programs, as well as
the criteria used to make funding decisions. In consultation with the
workers' compensation advisory committee, the department shall also
develop recommendations for equitable, adequate, and stable funding
sources for identified programs. The department shall submit the
report and the recommendations to the house of representatives
committees on appropriations and commerce and labor, or their successor
committees, and the senate committees on ways and means and labor,
commerce, research and development, or their successor committees, by
December 1, 2006.
(((15))) (14) $61,000 of the electrical license account--state
appropriation and $55,000 of the plumbing certificate account--state
appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6225 (domestic water pumping systems). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((16))) (15) $26,000 of the accident account--state appropriation
and $5,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6185 (family and medical
leave act). If the bill not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 216 2006 c 372 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,917,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,982,000))
$2,063,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,919,000))
$4,000,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall participate in the health technology
assessment program required in section 213(6) of this act.
(b) The department shall participate in the joint health purchasing
project described in section 213(7) of this act.
(c) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided for the department to conduct a feasibility study
of a veterans' cemetery in eastern Washington. The study shall include
location, acquisition costs, projection of continued operations costs,
and revenue sources for acquisition and operations. A final report of
the findings shall be submitted no later than December 15, 2005.
(d) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5539 (veterans conservation corps). If Senate Bill No. 5539 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, these amounts shall lapse.

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,811,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,317,000))
$3,309,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($343,000))
$350,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,367,000))
$1,893,000
Veterans Estate Management Account--Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $651,000
Veterans' Innovations Program Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,500,000))
$11,025,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the development of a public service
announcement outreach campaign directed at returning veterans from
Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation Enduring Freedom.
(b) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the post traumatic stress
counseling program expansion to address the needs of veterans returning
from Iraq and Afghanistan.
(c) $2,000,000 of the veterans' innovations program account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to implement
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2754 (veterans' innovations program).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,283,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,946,000))
$6,630,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,114,000))
$36,507,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,830,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $187,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($76,360,000))
$77,437,000

Sec. 217 2006 c 372 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,835,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,954,000))
$71,290,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($477,467,000))
$466,007,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($104,867,000))
$106,083,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,521,000))
$1,522,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,975,000))
$54,695,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,579,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,917,000))
$2,918,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,179,000))
$16,182,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,099,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,693,000))
$3,694,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,852,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,798,000))
$1,951,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,806,000))
$1,606,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,306,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,942,000))
$43,951,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,684,000))
$52,685,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($913,867,000))
$906,648,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department or any successor agency is authorized to raise
existing fees charged for the clandestine drug lab program, the
drinking water program, radioactive materials license fees, X-ray
facility registration fees, shellfish commercial paralytic shellfish
poisoning fees, the water recreation program, the wastewater management
program, newborn specialty clinic fees, acute care hospitals,
psychiatric hospitals, child birth centers, correctional medical
facilities, alcoholism hospitals, and the midwifery program, in excess
of the fiscal growth factor pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary,
to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation
levels in this section. However, the department may not raise existing
fees charged for the midwifery program by more than twenty percent over
the biennium and from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, the annual
fees for new or renewed licenses shall be no greater than $450.
(2) $1,363,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2006
appropriation, $1,363,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2007
appropriation, and $676,000 of the general fund--local appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound
conservation and recovery plan and agency action items, DOH-01, DOH-02,
DOH-03, and DOH-04.
(3) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive,
and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not
anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require
expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated
unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services
authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(4) $383,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $317,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $600,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation are provided solely to assist counties in marine areas
complete on-site sewage system management plans and electronic data
bases to inventory on-site sewage systems.
(5) $60,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5470 (prescription importation). If Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5470 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $268,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 2266 (precursor drugs). If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2266 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $42,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1168 (prescription reimportation). If Second Substitute House Bill No.
1168 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(8) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $620,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the department to implement a
multi-year pilot project covering Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Grant,
Okanogan, Skagit, and Franklin counties for persons with household
income at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty level who are
ineligible for family planning services through the medicaid program.
Individuals who will be served under the pilot program include women
who have never been pregnant, are not currently pregnant, or are beyond
the family planning extension period allowed for first steps program
eligibility. It is anticipated that the pilot program will serve over
500 women. The department will provide a preliminary report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2006, and a
final report by January 1, 2007.
(9) $462,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely to support specialty clinics that provide treatment
services to children that are identified with one of the five heritable
or metabolic disorders added to the newborn screening panel by the
state board of health in 2003.
(10) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the farmers' market nutrition
program of the special supplemental nutrition program for women,
infants and children. It is anticipated that these funds will enable
the department to expand 2004 participation levels by 8,000 persons
annually.
(11) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the infertility prevention
project to implement effective prevention strategies designed to reduce
the prevalence of chlamydia and gonorrhea and their potentially
debilitating complications.
(12) With funds appropriated in this section, the medical advisory
committee to the early detection breast and cervical cancer screening
program shall study and recommend strategies for adopting emerging
technologies and best practices from the national, state, and local
levels in the field of early prevention and detection for breast and
cervical cancer, and assist the early detection breast and cervical
cancer screening program in implementing policy that follows the best
practices of high quality health care for clinical, diagnostic,
preventative, pathologic, radiological, and oncology services. The
committee will report its recommendations to the legislature by
December 15, 2006.
(13) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to develop and implement best practices in
preventative health care for children. The department and the kids get
care program of public health - Seattle and King county will work in
collaboration with local health care agencies to disseminate strategic
interventions that are focused on evidence-based best practices for
improving health outcomes in children and saving health-care costs.
(14) $48,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1075
(nursing quality commission). If Substitute House Bill No. 1075 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(15) $74,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1137
(physical therapy). If Substitute House Bill No. 1137 is not enacted
by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $109,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1546 (naturopathic
physicians). If House Bill No. 1546 is not enacted by June 30, 2005,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $80,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1689
(dental health services). If Substitute House Bill No. 1689 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(18) $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1605 (soil contamination). If
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1605 is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1951 (vision exams for children). If Substitute House Bill
No. 1951 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(20) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate
Bill No. 5049 (mold in residential units). If Engrossed Senate Bill
No. 5049 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(21) $26,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5311 (autism task force). If Senate Bill No. 5311 is not enacted
by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(22) $168,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for a two-year pilot project under which parents have
the option to choose vaccines which do not contain mercury.
(23) $750,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
is provided solely to add one or more combination vaccines to the
universal access to childhood immunizations program. The vaccine or
vaccines to be added shall be selected by the department after a
clinical and cost-effectiveness review by the state vaccine advisory
committee. The review shall consider at least the following criteria:
(a) The likelihood that use of the combination vaccine will increase
childhood immunization rates; (b) the vaccine's relative effectiveness,
and the prevalence and seriousness of the conditions it prevents; (c)
the relative cost of the vaccine, after accounting for the extent to
which it would replace some single injection antigens; and (d) the
extent to which the vaccine is mercury-free. The projected 2007-09
state cost of the combination vaccine or vaccines added pursuant to
this review shall not exceed $3,000,000.
(24) $151,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for a grant to the Kitsap county health
district. The funding shall be used to increase the number of women
who receive professional support after delivery through a home visit or
telephone call by the county health district. In order to receive the
funds, Kitsap county health district must provide an equal amount of
matching funds.
(((26))) (25) $324,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2342 (health care declarations). If Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2342 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((27))) (26) $432,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 and $21,000 of the health professions account
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2292 (health care liability reform) including
sections 105 through 112 of the bill. If Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2292 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((28))) (27) $96,000 of the health professions account
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2974 (health professions discipline). If Substitute House
Bill No. 2974 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(((29))) (28) The department of health shall evaluate alternative
models for funding the regulation of the health professions, including
charging an equivalent fee for all licensed, certified, and registered
health professions. The department will provide a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the potential fiscal and
programmatic benefits and challenges of such alternative models by
December 1, 2006.
(((30))) (29) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 2985 (foster care health unit). If Substitute House Bill No. 2985
is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((31))) (30) $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 and $183,000 of the health professions account
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 6194 (multicultural education/health). If Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 6194 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((32))) (31) $118,000 of the health professions account
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1850. If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
1850 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((33))) (32) $173,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the state board of health to
provide staff support to the governor's interagency committee on health
disparities, as provided in Senate Bill No. 6197. If Senate Bill No.
6197 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((34))) (33) $119,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the state board of health to
conduct health impact assessments, as provided in Senate Bill No. 6197.
If Senate Bill No. 6197 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((35))) (34) $327,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the department to conduct a
survey of health professional demographics and practice patterns, as
provided in Senate Bill No. 6193. If Senate Bill No. 6193 is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((36))) (35) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to develop and maintain a database
showing the statewide incidence and provenance of hepatitis C
infections, and to conduct a public information campaign on
transmission, prevention, detection, and treatment of the disease.
(((37))) (36) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the department to implement a
prostate cancer public awareness and education campaign. The campaign
shall place special emphasis on early education for men over forty,
African- American men, and men who are at high risk for prostate cancer
according to the guidelines of the American cancer society.
(((38))) (37) $130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6239 (controlled substances)
including sections 201 through 203 of the bill. If Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6239 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount provide in this subsection shall lapse.
(((39))) (38) Appropriations in this section assume savings
attributable to House Bill No. 2632 (HIV insurance coverage program).
(((40))) (39) $27,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2884 (reclaimed water). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, these funds shall be used solely for the department to
coordinate with the department of ecology or development and adoption
of rules relating to reclaimed water.

Sec. 218 2006 c 372 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS. The appropriations to the
department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the
programs and in the amounts specified herein. However, after May 1,
((2006)) 2007, after approval by the director of financial management
and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may
transfer general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year ((2006))
2007 between programs. The department shall not transfer funds, and
the director of financial management shall not approve the transfer,
unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to
the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds and not
federal funds. The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing ((seven days prior to approving any
deviations from appropriation levels. The written notification shall
include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along
with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both
before and after any allotment modifications or transfers)) of any
allotment modifications or transfers approved under this section.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,867,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($59,681,000))
$51,065,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,022,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,774,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $245,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($110,615,000))
$101,999,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $5,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($17,250,000)) $7,861,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for phase three
of the department's offender-based tracking system replacement project.
This amount is conditioned on the department satisfying the
requirements of section 902 of this act.
(b) $26,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1402 (offender travel or transfer). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(c) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for the fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the establishment and support of a
statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its
members representatives of community-based mental health treatment
programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors and
commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities. The
council will begin to investigate and promote cost-effective approaches
to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental
disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of
offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing,
employment, and job training needs.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $524,561,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($555,895,000))
$559,962,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,447,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,984,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,269,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,089,156,000))
$1,093,223,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the
department of corrections is authorized to enter into financial
contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the purposes
indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
This authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option
to purchase or lease-purchase work release beds in facilities
throughout the state for $8,561,000.
(b) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as recovery
of costs.
(c) The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership
program at the Washington corrections center for women at a level at
least equal to that provided in the 1995-97 biennium.
(d) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(e) During the 2005-07 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(f) The department shall participation in the health technology
assessment program required in section 213(6) of this act. The
department shall also participate in the joint health purchasing
project described in section 213(7) of this act.
(g) The Harborview medical center shall provide inpatient and
outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in department of
corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the average rate that
the department has negotiated with other community hospitals in
Washington state.
(h) $1,060,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of section 3 of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6319 (failure to register). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(i) $384,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6460 (crimes with sexual motivation). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(j) $91,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of section 2 of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6172 (possession of child pornography). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(k) $763,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of sections 102, 301,
and 302 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6239 (controlled
substances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,217,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($92,477,000))
$101,281,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,796,000))
$16,833,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $449,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($198,939,000))
$207,780,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) $268,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $484,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1402 (offender travel or transfer). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(c) $122,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $82,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1136 (electronic monitoring system). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(d) $59,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of section 4 of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6319 (failure to register). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(e) $666,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of section 303 of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6239 (controlled
substances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $838,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($882,000))
$887,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,723,000))
$1,728,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $110,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for
transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts
provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,289,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,662,000))
$39,095,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($75,951,000))
$76,384,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $130,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for
expenditures related to the Farrakhan v. Locke litigation.

Sec. 219 2006 c 372 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($260,228,000))
$260,256,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,966,000))
$31,974,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($200,541,000))
$200,625,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,866,000))
$16,869,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,491,000))
$24,497,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($534,212,000))
$534,341,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,087,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
This amount is provided to replace obsolete information technology
infrastructure.
(2) $12,735,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized for state choice administrative functions.
The department shall submit recommendations by September 1, 2007, to
the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees for options reducing the costs of the state choice
administrative functions for the 2007-2009 biennium. If these options
require any statutory changes, the department shall submit agency
request legislation to the appropriate legislative policy committees
and fiscal committees by December 15, 2007.
(3) $2,300,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to continue implementation of chapter 4, Laws
of 2003 2nd sp. sess. and for implementation costs relating to
Engrossed House Bill No. 2255 (unemployment insurance).
(4) $4,578,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from funds made available to
the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
These funds are authorized to provide direct services to unemployment
insurance claimants and providing job search review.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 301 2006 c 372 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,744,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,131,000))
$45,336,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,678,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,290,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,778,000
Flood Control Assistance Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,422,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,312,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,081,000
State Drought Preparedness Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving
Account (Water Supply Facilities)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $386,000
Vessel Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,876,000
Site Closure Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $656,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,085,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $357,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,153,000
State Toxics Control Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,319,000))
$84,426,000
State Toxics Control Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,424,000
Water Quality Permit Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,468,000
Underground Storage Tank Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,889,000
Environmental Excellence Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
Biosolids Permit Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $853,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,171,000
Air Pollution Control Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,206,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,078,000
Air Operating Permit Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,922,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,144,000
Oil Spill Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,079,000
Metals Mining Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $485,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,357,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $186,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($400,176,000))
$401,488,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,526,196 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $2,526,195 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, $366,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation,
$2,581,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation, $540,806
of the water quality account--state appropriation, $3,748,220 of the
water quality permit account--state appropriation, and $705,000 of the
oil spill prevention account are provided solely for the implementation
of the Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action
items DOE-01, DOE-02, DOE-04, DOE-06, DOE-07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.
(2) As described in section 129(7) of this act, the department
shall make recommendations and report on monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery.
(3) $4,054,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely for methamphetamine lab clean-up activities and for the
clean up of toxic waste, focusing on clean up within and around Puget
Sound.
(4) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound conservation and
recovery plan action item UW-02 through a contract with the University
of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(5) (($2,500,000)) $1,567,552 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and (($2,000,000)) $2,932,448 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided
solely for shoreline grants to local governments to implement
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6012 (shoreline management), chapter 262,
Laws of 2003.
(6) $156,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand the department's pilot
program for processing 401 water quality certification projects to a
statewide process and timeline to meet improved permit processing
accountability and timelines, which will result in 90 percent of
routine certifications occurring within 90 days of application, and
acknowledgement of receipt of the application being sent within 10
days.
(7) Fees approved by the department of ecology in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(8) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to support water measurement and
water storage components of the Columbia River Initiative Program.
(9) $509,000 of the freshwater aquatic algae control account--state
is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5699 (aquatic invasive species). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $250,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1605 (soil contamination). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount in this subsection shall
lapse.
(11) $200,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract with the state
conservation commission to provide statewide coordination and support
for coordinated resource management.
(12) The department shall assist the office of regulatory
assistance in implementing activities consistent with the governor's
regulatory improvement program. The department shall support and
provide expertise to facilitate, coordinate, and simplify citizen and
business interactions so as to improve state regulatory processes
involving state, local, and federal stakeholders.
(13) $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2884 (reclaimed water). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection is provided solely to
adopt rules in coordination with the department of health for all
aspects of reclaimed water including: Industrial and commercial uses,
land applications, direct recharge, wetland discharge, surface
percolation, constructed wetlands, stream flow augmentation, and
graywater use. The department must adopt the rules in a phased
approach: The first phase shall be proposed for adoption by June 1,
2007, and shall include the uses of constructed treatment wetlands; and
the second phase shall be adopted by December 31, 2010.
(14) $820,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6244 (oil spill prevention). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(15) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2860 (Columbia river basin). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((17))) (16) $340,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to support development of a wetland
mitigation program in Clark county. The program will engage local,
state, and federal agencies, private investors, property owners, and
others in the creation of one or more wetland banks and other measures
to protect habitat functions and values while accommodating urban
growth in the region.
(((18))) (17) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to develop a pilot water management
process that will include three federally recognized treaty Indian
tribes.
(((19))) (18) $130,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to support pesticide container
recycling activities in Washington.
(((20))) (19) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to Walla Walla county and Columbia
county conservation district for habitat conservation planning and
related endangered species act assurances for small irrigators and
landowners.
(((21))) (20) To maximize the use of amounts appropriated during
this biennium for the clean up of toxic waste, focusing on clean up
within and around Puget Sound, the department shall prioritize for this
purpose the use of existing staff, additional FTEs added this biennium,
temporary project staff, and contracted services.
(((22))) (21) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to the department to collaborate
with the Wenatchee watershed planning unit and Chelan county for
development of a regulatory strategy, as required by the federal clean
water act, to control total maximum daily loads of phosphorous to the
Wenatchee river. A technically sound plan for managing phosphorous and
restoring water quality in the Wenatchee river shall be provided to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by July 1, 2008.
(((23))) (22) $55,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to address air quality issues
for the Columbia river gorge in cooperation with the state of Oregon.
(((24))) (23) $67,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6861
(domestic water users). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((25))) (24) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the restoration of Long lake
located in Kitsap county in accordance with the plan approved by the
Kitsap county weed control board, the county commissioners, the
citizens for improving Long lake, and the department of ecology.
(((26))) (25) $150,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the contracting and production of
the second phase report for establishing sustainable statewide regional
CBRNE/Hazmat response capability. The report will, at a minimum
include, a cost-benefit analysis, analysis of sustainable funding
options, regional alignment and mutual aid agreements, and
administration requirements.
(((27))) (26) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for a pilot project that
demonstrates the value of long-term management plans for small forest
landowners.

Sec. 302 2006 c 372 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,687,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,334,000))
$38,986,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,738,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,109,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,805,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,702,000))
$35,507,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($122,549,000))
$120,006,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2005-07 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $191,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound
conservation and recovery plan and agency action item PRC-02.
(4) $185,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely to develop a plan for public education
and tourist orientation and interpretation at selected state park sites
along the route of the ice age floods from Spokane to the Pacific
ocean.
(5) Until July 1, 2007, the commission may not charge fees for
general park access or parking. Funding of $500,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $2,636,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided
solely to compensate the state parks and recreation commission for lost
revenue from general park access or parking fees.
(6) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for repair and maintenance costs at state
parks.
(7) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for employee retirement buyout costs.
(8) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for computer network hardware and
software, and for backup drives and tapes.

Sec. 303 2006 c 372 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,692,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,856,000))
$48,026,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,100,000))
$50,400,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,089,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $392,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,820,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,753,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,904,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,946,000))
$62,406,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,029,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,386,000))
$11,586,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,883,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,863,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $588,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,755,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,043,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $411,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $528,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($315,520,000))
$319,650,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) As described in section 129(7) of this act, the department
shall make recommendations and report on monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery.
(2) $1,556,714 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,556,713 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action items DFW-01 through DFW-06, DFW-08 through DFW-12, and DFW-16.
(3) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(4) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(5) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(6) $180,000 of the wildlife account -- state appropriation is
provided solely to test deer and elk for chronic wasting disease and to
document the extent of swan lead poisoning. Of this amount, $65,000 is
provided solely to document the extent of swan lead poisoning and to
begin environmental cleanup.
(7) The department shall provide quarterly status reports to the
office of financial management regarding the replacement of the
Washington interactive licensing system and the implementation of the
hydraulic permit management system.
(8) The department shall prepare a report detailing the hydraulic
permit approval program applications and project types. The department
shall coordinate with the office of financial management in determining
the contents of the report. At minimum, the report shall include
permits by applicant (name, state, local, federal, tribal entity,
etc.), project type (pamphlet, minor, medium, major, extension,
revision, etc.) and project location (county and water resource
inventory area). The department shall submit the report to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees no later than
September 1, 2006.
(9) $700,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely for environmental data quality and access projects in support of
state salmon recovery efforts. The department shall coordinate
planning and implementation of all activities with the department of
information services and the governor's salmon recovery office. The
department shall make certain that any activity using these funds is
consistent with recommendations to be submitted (per section 405,
chapter 488, Laws of 2005) in the joint report to the legislature and
office of financial management on December 1, 2006.
(10) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
Army Corps of Engineers.
(11) $72,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1211 (multiple season big
game permit). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this section shall lapse.
(12) $528,000 of the aquatic invasive species prevention account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No.
5699 (preventing and controlling aquatic invasive species and algae).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $703,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to purchase six purse seine and three gill
net licenses to meet the provisions of the United States/Canada salmon
treaty.
(14) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for chum salmon production at
Minter creek hatchery.
(15) $45,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $45,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the management of Canada goose
seasons to increase the number of hunting days in southwest Washington.
(16) $46,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to increase the number of courses providing the hunter
education training program created in RCW 77.32.155. The department
shall reduce the current backlog of applicants waiting to take the
training program and provide for a stable supply of training program
courses in order to avoid future backlogs.
(17) $481,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to continued operation of the Naselle Hatchery during
the 2005-07 biennium. This will increase production by 3 million
Chinook, 1 million Coho, and 30,000 trout.
(18) $223,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5227 (wildlife harvest
reports). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for federal match funding for the control
of predators that damage livestock, crops, and property.
(20) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the department to produce educational
materials discouraging activities that harm or disturb the spawning
beds of salmon and steelhead. Discouraged activities include, but are
not limited to, wading on spawning beds, driving motor vehicles on
spawning beds, use of high-powered jet or propeller-driven boats across
spawning beds, dragging anchors through spawning beds, digging or
removing gravel from spawning beds, or any other physical disturbance
capable of disturbing spawning fish or damaging or destroying nests of
incubating eggs.
(a) The educational materials produced by the department in
accordance with this subsection must include, at a minimum, brochures
that are to be disseminated to persons applying for fishing and boating
licenses statewide. The department must also distribute the brochures
widely to retail outlets that cater to outdoor recreation.
(b) The department shall work cooperatively with the tribal fishery
comanagers in the development of the educational materials under this
section.
(c) The department shall report to the legislature concerning the
effectiveness of this subsection after at least two spawning cycles of
salmon and steelhead have occurred.
(21) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, by December
1, 2006, the department shall:
(a) Submit a report detailing the reductions required by omnibus
appropriations acts since 1997 for activities supported by the state
wildlife fund; and
(b) Submit quarterly revenue and expenditure reports for the state
wildlife account based on current revenue forecasts to the office of
financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature((;
and)).
(22) The department shall assist the office of regulatory
assistance in implementing activities consistent with the governor's
regulatory improvement program. The department shall support and
provide expertise to facilitate, coordinate, and simplify citizen and
business interactions so as to improve state regulatory processes
involving state, local, and federal stakeholders.
(23) $408,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 ((is)) and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for fire suppression and
remediation activities on department lands and facilities that were
impacted during the 2005 and 2006 fire season. Funding shall be used
for fire suppression, winter feeding, seeding, planting vegetation,
fertilizing, weed control, and the establishment of water bars and
other erosion control measures.
(24) $266,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $214,000 of the state wildlife account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of the
Nemah, Mossyrock, Omak, Colville, Arlington, and Columbia Basin
hatcheries during the 2005-07 biennium. Funding shall be used to
offset the increased cost of utilities, fuel, fish feed, and mitigation
obligations previously funded from local sources. The department shall
consult with the appropriate natural resource and fiscal committees of
the legislature prior to submitting a 2007-09 budget proposal that
changes current hatchery operations, production, and/or maintenance to
the office of financial management. Unless specifically authorized by
the legislature, the department shall not close any hatchery facility
currently in operation.
(25) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5385 (invasive species council). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(26) $76,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to pay for the added level of fishery
sampling and monitoring in the upper Columbia river area as required
under the endangered species act and federal court orders.
(27) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for an interagency working group scoping
of a study of the sinking of ships as dive attractions. The department
of fish and wildlife shall, as approved by the office of financial
management, enter into an interagency agreement with the department of
natural resources, the state parks and recreation commission, the
department of ecology, and the department of community, trade, and
economic development to delineate elements of this study. The
department of fish and wildlife shall report to the office of financial
management and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later
than November 15, 2006.
(28) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to increase fish production levels on a
statewide basis at state-operated fish hatcheries. By July 31, 2006,
the department shall submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature an implementation plan that outlines in
specific detail how the amount provided in this subsection will be
spent in order to increase fish production. The plan will include
production implementation timelines, increased production goals, by
species, at identified hatcheries that will receive financial
assistance, and the amount to be retained by the department for
administration and overhead costs, including the purchase of any new
equipment. By July 31, 2007, the department shall submit to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature a report
documenting the increased production levels, using fiscal year 2006 as
the base year for comparison purposes. If the department is unable to
produce the implementation plan by July 31, 2006, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.
(29) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the department to prevent impacts to
native species by controlling the nonnative nutria population in Skagit
county.
(30) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the northwest straits commission to
remove lost and abandoned fishing nets and crab and shrimp pots that
may be dangerous to humans and that unintentionally trap and kill
endangered salmon and other aquatic species.
(31) $4,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1210 (temporary fishing
license). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(32) Within existing appropriations and utilizing all available
federal moneys allocated for the crab buy-back program, the department
shall develop and implement a crab buy-back program that allows
commercial crab fishers the opportunity to sell their licenses back to
the state and exit from the crabbing fishery. The department shall
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature its detailed implementation plan no later
than December 1, 2006.
(33) $660,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely to initiate a review of the hydraulic project approval
permit rules and to undergo a public process for adoption of new or
revised rules that my be needed. Upon completion, the department shall
complete a habitat conservation plan for the hydraulic project approval
program, and shall seek legislative review prior to adoption of new or
revised rules.
(34) $125,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided to implement Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5232 (turkey tags). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(35) $634,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for operations and fish production costs
at department-operated Mitchell act hatchery facilities.

Sec. 304 2006 c 372 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,473,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,999,000))
$93,486,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,215,000))
$22,111,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,276,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,697,000))
$54,842,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,001,000))
$4,026,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,447,000))
$2,450,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,451,000))
$8,966,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,332,000))
$86,537,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,828,000))
$2,830,000
Disaster Response Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,636,000))
$2,645,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,321,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,155,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $556,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,138,000
Agricultural College Trust Management
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,966,000))
$1,972,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($284,661,000))
$331,954,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) As described in section 129(7) of this act, the department
shall make recommendations and report on monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery.
(2) $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $1,652,050 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action items DNR-01 and
DNR-02.
(3) $138,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1896 (geoduck harvest). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount in the subsection shall lapse.
(4) $972,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($994,000)) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for deposit into
the agricultural college trust management account and are provided
solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State
University's agricultural college trust lands.
(5) $10,689,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, (($13,635,000)) $52,165,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and $5,000,000 of the disaster
response account -- state appropriation are provided solely for emergency
fire suppression. Of these amounts, up to $250,000 may be expended for
staff and other necessary resources to design and implement a fire
data-collection system that includes financial- and performance-management information for fires over 10 acres in size.
None of the general fund and disaster response account amounts
provided in this subsection may be used to fund agency indirect and
administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs
shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and
appropriations.
(6) $582,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for spartina control.
(7) Fees approved by the board of natural resources in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(8) $9,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $2,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of settling
those claims identified in U.S., et al. v. State of Washington, et al.
Subproceeding No. 89-3 (Shellfish), United States District Court for
the Western District of Washington at Seattle, Case No. C70-9213. The
expenditure of this appropriation is contingent on a settlement
agreement that includes the state of Washington as a party to the
agreement which is fully executed by June 29, 2007, and a consent
decree entered by June 29, 2007, by the United States District Court
for the Western District of Washington settling and releasing the
identified treaty claims to harvest shellfish previously negotiated in
the settlement agreement. By June 29, 2007, the release of claims
associated with the settlement agreement and consent decree must be
fully effective and there must be no unfulfilled contingencies that
could cause the settlement agreement or consent decree to be vacated at
some future date if not fulfilled. In the event that these
contingencies are not met, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(9) $2,155,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to meet its obligations with the
U.S. environmental protection agency for the clean-up of Commencement
Bay and other sites.
(10) The department shall not develop the Gull Harbor facility
without first submitting a master plan to the appropriate committees of
the legislature. The plan shall ensure continued public access to the
waterfront. The plan shall also examine alternative locations to the
Gull Harbor site that would colocate marine equipment for all state
agencies needing water access in Thurston county. The report shall be
submitted by December 1, 2006.
(11) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $500,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation are provided solely for a report on the future of
Washington forests. The purpose of the report is to examine economic,
recreational, and environmental trends influencing the forest products
industry and secondary manufacturing sectors in Washington state. The
department shall contract with the University of Washington college of
forestry resources. The college shall consult with the University of
Washington economics department for the section on investment returns
from granted lands. The report shall contain the following parts:
(a) An update of the 1992 timber supply study for Washington state
that was conducted by the University of Washington. The update may be
accomplished by reviewing the most recent similar data available in
existing reports, examining a sample of the original 1992 study sample
of lands, and through other existing data sources that may reveal
relevant trends and changes since 1992.
(b) An independent assessment of the economic contribution of the
forest products industry, and secondary manufacturing sectors, to the
state. This assessment will also examine some of the macroeconomic
trends likely to affect the industry in the future.
(c) A comparison of the competitive position of Washington's forest
products industry globally, and with other leading forest products
states, or regions, of the United States. This evaluation should
compare the relative tax burden for growing and harvesting timber
between the states or regions and the relative cost of adhering to
regulations, and identify the competitive advantages of each state or
region.
(d) An assessment of the trends and dynamics that commercial and
residential development play in the conversion of the state's forests
to nonforestry uses. The assessment will involve gathering relevant
data, reviewing that data, and analyzing the relationship between
development and the conversion of forest land uses.
(e) Recommendations on: (i) Policy changes that would enhance the
competitive position of Washington's forest products industry in
Washington state; (ii) policy changes that would, to the extent
possible, ensure that a productive forest land base continues to be
managed for forest products, recreation, and environmental and other
public benefits into the future; and (iii) policy changes that would
enhance the recreational opportunities on working forest lands in the
state.
(f) Based on the information derived from (a) through (d) of this
subsection, an assessment of the expected rate of return from state
granted lands. This section of the reports shall also review reports
prepared by the department over the past ten years that describe the
investment returns from granted lands. The review of these previous
reports shall compare and critique the methodology and indicators used
to report investment returns. The review shall recommend appropriate
measures of investment returns from granted lands.
(g) Analyze and recommend policies and programs to assist Cascade
foothills area landowners and communities in developing and
implementing innovative approaches to retaining traditional forestry
while at the same time accommodating new uses that strengthen the
economic and natural benefits from forest lands. For the purposes of
this section, the Cascade foothills area generally encompasses the
nonurbanized lands within the Cascade mountain range and drainages
lying between three hundred and three thousand feet above mean sea
level, and located within Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish, King, Pierce,
Thurston, and Lewis counties.
(12) $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to compensate the forest board
trust for a portion of the lease to the Crescent television improvement
district consistent with RCW 79.13.520.
(13) The department shall develop a multiyear work plan and
schedule for mapping all applicable areas of the state for landslide
hazards and earthquake hazards. The work plan and schedule shall be
based on a carryforward funding level, and shall be submitted to the
office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by June 30, 2006.
(14) $654,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for geologic hazard research, activities,
and mapping, including earthquake, landslide, and tsunami hazards.
(15) $397,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the department to work with
appropriate stakeholders and state agencies in determining how
privately owned lands, in combination with other land ownership such as
public and tribal lands, contribute to wildlife habitat. The
assessment will also determine how commercial forest, forest lands on
the urban fringe, and small privately-owned forest lands that are
managed according to Washington's forest and fish prescriptions, in
combination with other forest management activities, function as
wildlife habitat now and in the future.
(((17))) (16) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to establish a work group to study
existing legislation affecting the oil and natural gas industry, and to
make recommendations to that legal framework to improve the regulatory,
technical, environmental, and financial framework of the oil and gas
industry. The department shall report its recommendations to the
legislature by December 30, 2006.
(((18))) (17) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Senate Bill
No. 5179 (forest health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((19))) (18) $719,000 of the surface mining reclamation account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6175 (surface mining). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(19) $504,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for expenses related to removing the
hull of the S.S. Catala, shipwrecked on state-owned aquatic lands at
Damon Point State Park.

Sec. 305 2006 c 372 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,979,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,271,000))
$12,771,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,634,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,990,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $972,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,555,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,091,000))
$41,591,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action item WSDA-01.
(2) Fees and assessments approved by the department in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(3) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department, in
addition to the authority provided in RCW 17.26.007, may enter into
agreements with federal agencies to eradicate spartina from private
lands that may provide a source of reinfestation to public lands.
(4) $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for an economic impact study of
fairs in the state of Washington.
(5) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $13,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for indemnity payments for poultry
that are ordered by the department to be slaughtered or destroyed.
(6) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for market promotion and trade
barrier grants.
(7) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the small farm and direct
marketing program.
(8) $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $160,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to complete a database application
that would consolidate program information and enable the department to
more effectively respond to a food safety or animal disease emergency.
(9) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement the Washington wine
brand campaign.
(10) The department shall consult with affected agricultural
industries before fees for fruit and vegetable inspections may be
raised. The consultation shall include a review of current inspection
services, the cost of providing those services, and the discontinuation
of unnecessary services.
(11) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
3033 (animal identification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6508 (renewable fuel). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to support noxious weed boards.
(14) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the purchase of agricultural products
equipment. The department shall negotiate an appropriate agreement
with the agriculture industry for the use of the equipment.
(15) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for spartina eradication efforts.
(16) $26,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5385 (invasive species council). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No.
6377 (milk and milk products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 401 2006 c 372 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,601,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,753,000))
$36,220,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,364,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $596,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,628,000))
$4,591,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,388,000))
$3,438,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,895,000))
$2,923,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,157,000))
$1,171,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,560,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $313,000
Fingerprint Identification
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,270,000))
$6,271,000
Disaster Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,947,000))
$106,470,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of state
fire marshal to exclusively review K-12 construction documents for fire
and life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the
intent of this appropriation to provide these services only to those
districts that are located in counties without qualified review
capabilities.
(2) $145,000 of the aquatic invasive species enforcement account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5699 (aquatic invasive species).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $240,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed House Bill No. 1241 (vehicle licensing and registration). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $395,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of section 5 of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2805 (missing persons). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(5) If funding is provided through a federal grant or through a
memorandum of understanding with a local government, the Washington
state patrol's automatic fingerprint identification system shall be
capable of instantly accepting electronic latent search records from
any Washington state local law enforcement agency, to be implemented on
a timeline agreed to by the patrol and the agency granting the fund
source. The Washington state patrol shall notify the appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the legislature in writing upon the
receipt of such federal moneys or upon the effective date of a
memorandum of understanding with a local government.
(6) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6519 (sex offender registration). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(7) In accordance with RCW 10.97.100 and chapter 43.43 RCW, the
Washington state patrol is authorized to perform and charge fees for
criminal history and background checks for state and local agencies,
and nonprofit and other private entities and disseminate the records.
It is the policy of the state of Washington that the fees cover, as
nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs of the criminal
history and background check activities. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055,
during the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the Washington state patrol may
increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the increases
are necessary to fully fund the direct and indirect cost of criminal
history and background check activities.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
Sec. 501 2006 c 372 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) STATE AGENCY OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,452,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,151,000))
$17,376,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,090,000))
$23,088,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,693,000))
$54,081,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $10,835,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($10,980,000)) $10,990,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the
superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of
four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the
civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans
civic education award. The students selected for the award must
demonstrate understanding through completion of at least one of the
classroom-based civics assessment models developed by the
superintendent of public instruction, and through leadership in the
civic life of their communities. The superintendent shall select two
students from eastern Washington and two students from western
Washington to receive the award, and shall notify the governor and
legislature of the names of the recipients.
(b) $428,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($547,000)) $597,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the state board of education, including basic
education assistance activities.
(c) $509,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($504,000)) $554,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator
standards board. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the
Washington professional educator standards board shall pursue the
implementation of recent study recommendations including: (i) Revision
of teacher mathematics endorsement competencies and alignment of
teacher tests to the updated competencies, and (ii) development of
mathematics specialist endorsement.
(d) $607,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($592,000)) $992,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for increased
attorney general fees related to School Districts' Alliance for
Adequate Funding of Special Education et al. v. State of Washington et
al., Thurston County Superior Court Cause No. 04-2-02000-7 and other
education funding lawsuits.
(e) (($1,900,000)) $1,615,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation is for replacement of the apportionment system, which
includes the processes that collect school district budget and
expenditure information, staffing characteristics, and the student
enrollments that drive the funding process.
(f)(i) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction and the department of health to collaborate and
develop a work group to assess school nursing services in class I
school districts. The work group shall consult with representatives
from the following groups: School nurses, schools, students, parents,
teachers, health officials, and administrators. The work group shall:
(A) Study the need for additional school nursing services by
gathering data about current school nurse-to-student ratios in each
class I school district and assessing the demand for school nursing
services by acuity levels and the necessary skills to meet those
demands. The work group also shall recommend to the legislature best
practices in school nursing services, including a dedicated,
sustainable funding model that would best meet the current and future
needs of Washington's schools and contribute to greater academic
success of all students. The work group shall make recommendations for
school nursing services, and may examine school nursing services by
grade level. The work group shall assess whether funding for school
nurses should continue as part of basic education; and
(B) In collaboration with managed care plans that contract with the
department of social and health services medical assistance
administration to provide health services to children participating in
the medicaid and state children's health insurance program, identify
opportunities to improve coordination of and access to health services
for low-income children through the use of school nurse services. The
work group shall evaluate the feasibility of pooling school district
and managed care plan funding to finance school nurse positions in
school districts with high numbers of low-income children.
(ii) The office of superintendent of public instruction shall
report the work group's findings and plans for implementation to the
legislature by February 1, 2006.
(g) $78,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $228,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to provide direct services and
support to schools around an integrated, interdisciplinary approach to
instruction in conservation, natural resources, sustainability, and
human adaptation to the environment. Of this amount, $150,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided for
deposit in the Washington natural science, wildlife, and environmental
education partnership account for grants pursuant to RCW 28A.300.440.
Specific integration efforts will focus on science, math, and the
social sciences. Integration between basic education and career and
technical education, particularly agricultural and natural sciences
education, is to be a major element.
(h) $2,896,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the creation of a statewide data base
of longitudinal student information. This amount is conditioned on the
department satisfying the requirements in section 902, chapter 518,
Laws of 2005.
(i) $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for comprehensive cultural competence and
anti-bias education programs for educators and students. The office of
superintendent of public instruction shall administer grants to school
districts with the assistance and input of groups such as the
anti-defamation league and the Jewish federation of Seattle.
(j) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6219
(financial literacy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount in this section is provided solely for additional efforts at
promoting financial literacy of students. The effort will be
coordinated through the financial literacy public-private partnership.
(k) $64,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to conduct further evaluation of issues raised in
the recently completed joint legislative audit and review committee
report on the accounting of special education excess costs. Within the
amounts provided in this subsection, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction will convene a work group to evaluate modifying
or replacing the current 1077 methodology. This work group will
deliver a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
including the joint legislative audit and review committee, and the
office of financial management, by January 1, 2007. The work group
will take into consideration recommendations of the Washington learns
steering committee.
(l) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed House
Bill No. 2910 (environmental education). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,341,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,884,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,112,000))
$67,358,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($89,337,000))
$98,583,000

The appropriations in this subsection are provided solely for the
statewide programs specified in this subsection and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) A maximum of $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $2,541,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as
determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be
dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to
students, health education, and training for school staff.
(ii) A maximum of $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for the school
safety center in the office of the superintendent of public instruction
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(A) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(B) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(iii) A maximum of $100,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $100,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
a school safety training program provided by the criminal justice
training commission. The commission, in collaboration with the school
safety center advisory committee, shall provide the school safety
training for all school administrators and school safety personnel,
including school safety personnel hired after the effective date of
this section.
(iv) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely for the safety center advisory committee to develop and
distribute a pamphlet to promote internet safety for children,
particularly in grades seven through twelve. The pamphlet shall be
posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web site. To the
extent possible, the pamphlet shall be distributed in schools
throughout the state and in other areas accessible to youth, including
but not limited to libraries and community centers.
(v) $10,344,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for safe and drug free schools and communities grants for drug
and violence prevention activities and strategies and $800,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided
solely for one-time backfill of the federal reductions to the safe and
drug free schools and communities grant program.
(vi) A maximum of $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $146,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for a nonviolence
and leadership training program provided by the institute for community
leadership. The program shall provide a request for proposal process,
with up to 80 percent funding, for nonviolence leadership workshops
serving at least 12 school districts with direct programming in 36
elementary, middle, and high schools throughout Washington state.
(vii) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for a pilot youth suicide prevention and
information program. The office of superintendent of public
instruction will work with selected school districts and community
agencies in identifying effective strategies at preventing youth
suicide.
(viii) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6580 (school notification about sex and kidnapping
offenders), including section 2 of that act.
(ix) $45,000 of the general fund state--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the development of safe school
plan standards. By December 1, 2006, the Washington state school
safety center advisory committee, in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction shall prepare a report with: (1)
The recommended standards; (2) a potential implementation plan for
those standards statewide; and (3) detailed information on the costs
and other impacts on school districts from implementing the standards.
The development of standards shall address requirements for school
mapping and shall include a review of current research regarding safe
school planning.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
A maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for K-20
telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to
prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization
of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the
network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced
technical support for the network.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $787,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $799,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided solely for the special
services pilot projects. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall allocate these funds to the district or districts
participating in the pilot program according to the provisions of RCW
28A.630.015.
(ii) A maximum of $548,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,059,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for alternative
certification routes. Funds may be used by the professional educator
standards board to continue existing alternative-route grant programs
and to create new alternative-route programs in regions of the state
with service shortages. Of this amount, $511,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided for additional
conditional scholarships to candidates seeking an endorsement in
special education, math, science, and bilingual education.
(iii) A maximum of $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $31,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for operation of
the Cispus environmental learning center.
(iv) A maximum of (($1,224,000)) $2,448,000 of the general fund--state appropriation ((for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,224,000
of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are)) is
provided for in-service training and educational programs conducted by
the Pacific Science Center.
(v) A maximum of (($1,079,000)) $2,158,000 of the general fund--state appropriation ((for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,079,000
of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are)) is
provided for the Washington state leadership assistance for science
education reform (LASER) regional partnership coordinated at the
Pacific Science Center.
(vi) A maximum of $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $97,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided to support
vocational student leadership organizations.
(vii) A maximum of $146,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $146,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
the Washington civil liberties education program.
(viii) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
Washington state achievers scholarship program. The funds shall be
used to support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and
match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers
scholars.
(ix) (($1,911,000)) $2,119,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for the advanced placement fee program to
increase opportunities for low-income students and under-represented
populations to participate in advanced placement courses and to
increase the capacity of schools to provide advanced placement courses
to students.
(x) $5,532,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for comprehensive school reform demonstration projects to
provide grants to low-income schools for improving student achievement
through adoption and implementation of research-based curricula and
instructional programs.
(xi) (($24,490,000)) $33,526,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for 21st century learning center grants,
providing after-school and inter-session activities for students.
(xii) $383,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $294,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Lorraine Wojahn dyslexia
pilot reading program in up to five school districts.
(xiii) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for developing and disseminating
curriculum and other materials documenting women's role in World War
II.
(xiv) $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for incentive grants for districts to
develop preapprenticeship programs. Grant awards up to $10,000 each
shall be used to support the program's design, school/business/labor
agreement negotiations, and recruiting high school students for
preapprenticeship programs in the building trades and crafts.
(xv) $3,980,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the dissemination of the Navigation
101 curriculum to all districts, including the development and
dissemination of electronic student planning tools and the development
of a software package to use to analyze the impact of the
implementation of Navigation 101 on student performance, and grants to
at least one hundred school districts for the implementation of the
Navigation 101 program. The implementation grants will be limited to
a maximum of two years and the school districts selected shall
represent various regions of the state and reflect differences in
school district size and enrollment characteristics.
(xvi) $2,148,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for one-time grants to school
districts to offset extraordinary rate increases for natural gas and
heating oil.
(xvii) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed House
Bill No. 2579 (educational assessments). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(xviii) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a pilot
grant program related to serving students in staffed residential homes.
The pilot grant program will be established in at least five school
districts. The districts eligible for the pilot grant program shall be
limited to school districts with a concentration of students residing
in staffed residential homes greater than or equal to 1.3 full time
equivalent students per 1,000 K-12 public students. The amount of
funding for each pilot grant district shall be in proportion to the
degree of concentration of staffed residential home students residing
and served in each respective district, and other criteria as
determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
Funding in the pilot grant program shall not be considered part of the
basic education program.
(A) The pilot grant program is intended to: (I) Identify the
fiscal and educational challenges posed to districts that serve staffed
residential homes students; (II) provide resources to assist school
districts in developing best practices for addressing these challenges;
(III) address costs resulting from high concentrations of staffed
residential home students in some school districts; (IV) develop models
of collaboration between school districts and staffed residential
homes; and (V) gain additional information on the variety of
circumstances and needs present in the staffed residential home
population, including both special education and nonspecial education
eligible students.
(B) As a condition of the pilot grant program, the selected school
districts must meet the following criteria: (I) Jointly develop, with
staffed residential homes in their community, a model policy and plan
for collaboration and information sharing, which includes an agreed
upon routine of regular communication regarding each child's progress,
including for special education students the development and regular
updating of individualized education programs; (II) provide an annual
progress report regarding the implementation of the model policy and
plan and measured progress toward meeting the educational needs of
students in staffed residential homes; and (III) provide information
and data to the office of the superintendent of public instruction as
required for the study detailed in (D) of this subsection (c)(xviii).
(C) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, with the assistance of the department of social and
health services, to prepare a report to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature and the office of financial
management on: (I) The number of students residing at each staffed
residential home by school district; (II) the specific types of needs
of students residing at each staffed residential home; and (III) an
overview of the differences in the programs being offered at staffed
residential homes and the ranges of costs associated with these
programs; and (IV) a summary of the current types of collaboration
between school districts and staffed residential homes. This report
shall be submitted by November 30, 2006.
(D) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to report to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on
the results of the pilot grant program established in this subsection
(c)(xviii), including a description of the impact on the educational
services delivered to the students residing at each staffed residential
home. Based on the results of the pilot grant program, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction may make recommendations
regarding best practices for meeting the needs of students residing in
staffed residential homes, and fostering collaboration with staffed
residential homes. This report shall be submitted by June 30, 2007.
(E) For those students residing in staffed residential homes who
are special education eligible, school districts are eligible to pursue
safety net funding beyond the pilot grant program amounts so that the
combined basic education allocation, special education excess cost
allocation, pilot grant amount, and safety net grants recognize the
costs associated with serving staffed residential home students
potentially concentrated in a few school districts.
(F) For purposes of this subsection (c)(xviii), "staffed
residential home" means a home licensed by the department of social and
health services to provide twenty-four hour care for six or fewer
children or expectant mothers, which employs staff to care for them.

Sec. 502 2006 c 372 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,193,442,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,281,807,000))
$4,258,121,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,548,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,503,797,000))
$8,480,111,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2005-06 and
2006-07 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (d) through (f) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (c) through
(f) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) 49 certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding;
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of
the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established
under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district
documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater than 53.2
certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students. For any school district documenting a lower certificated
instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio
achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding ratio to employ additional classified
instructional assistants assigned to basic education classrooms in
grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a district's staff ratio under
this section, funds used by the district to employ additional
classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified
instructional assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be
determined using the 1989-90 school year as the base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students may use allocations generated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of that required to maintain the
minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ
additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) shall only be expended to reduce class
size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional
funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction with a waiver allowed for skills centers in current
operation that are not meeting this standard until the 2007-08 school
year, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent vocational
students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic
education and vocational enhancement allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(h) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2005-06 and 2006-07
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each three certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
sixty average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
11.21 percent in the 2005-06 school year and 13.02 percent in the 2006-07 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 14.07 percent in the
2005-06 school year and 15.99 percent in the 2006-07 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (h) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$9,112 per certificated staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a
maximum of $9,476 per certificated staff unit in the 2006-07 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $22,377 per certificated
staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a maximum of $23,272 per
certificated staff unit in the 2006-07 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $17,362 per certificated
staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a maximum of $18,056 per
certificated staff unit in the 2006-07 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $531.09 for the 2005-06 and
2006-07 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of (($12,992,000))
$12,813,000 outside the basic education formula during fiscal years
2006 and 2007 as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $513,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2006
and a maximum of $534,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2007;
(b) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,035,000 may be expended for the 2006 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,385,000 for the 2007 fiscal year. 20 percent of each fiscal year
amount may carry over from one year to the next;
(c) A maximum of $369,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies;
(d) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs; and
(e) $394,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for incentive grants to encourage
school districts to increase enrollment in vocational skills centers.
Up to $500 for each full-time equivalent student may be proportionally
distributed to a school district or school districts increasing skills
centers enrollment above the levels in the 2004-05 school year. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop
criteria for awarding incentive grants pursuant to this subsection.
The total amount allocated pursuant to this subsection shall be limited
to $1,244,000 for the 2005-07 biennium. Funds provided in this
subsection shall first be expended to provide incentive grants to
school districts increasing skills center enrollment during the school
year. If funds are available after making these allocations, funds may
be distributed for: (i) Increasing enrollment including allowing up to
an additional .2 full time equivalent student enrollment at skills
centers; (ii) increasing enrollment and capacity of summer vocational
programs at the skills centers.
(f) (($4,943,000)) $4,763,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for one-time
allocations for equipment replacement in vocational programs and skills
centers. The funding shall be allocated based on $75 per full time
equivalent vocational student and $125 per full time equivalent skills
center student.
(10) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 5.2 percent from the 2004-05 school year to the
2005-06 school year and 5.2 percent from the 2005-06 school year to the
2006-07 school year.
(11) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

Sec. 503 2006 c 372 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,336,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($241,576,000))
$239,542,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $470,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,543,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,043,000))
$1,035,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($318,968,000))
$316,926,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($190,375,000)) $187,678,000 is provided for a cost of living
adjustment of 1.2 percent effective September 1, 2005, and another 3.3
percent effective September 1, 2006, for state formula staff units.
The appropriations include associated incremental fringe benefit
allocations at rates of 10.57 percent for the 2005-06 school year and
12.38 percent for the 2006-07 school year for certificated staff and
10.57 percent for the 2005-06 school year and 12.49 percent for the
2006-07 school year for classified staff.
(a) The appropriations in this section include the increased
portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant
state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Increases for
general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this
act. Increases for special education result from increases in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act.
(b) The appropriations in this section provide cost of living and
incremental fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments as
follows:

School Year

2005-06 2006-07

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.27 $1.06

Highly Capable (per formula student) $2.96 $11.40

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $7.94 $30.52

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $1.69 $6.50

(c) The appropriations in this section include $251,000 for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,022,000 for fiscal year 2007 for salary increase
adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) (($129,905,000)) $129,248,000 is provided for adjustments to
insurance benefit allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance
benefit allocations is $582.47 per month for the 2005-06 and 2006-07
school years. The appropriations in this section provide for a rate
increase to $629.07 per month for the 2005-06 school year and $682.54
per month for the 2006-07 school year. The adjustments to health
insurance benefit allocations are at the following rates:

School Year

2005-06 2006-07

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.42 $0.91

Highly Capable (per formula student) $2.88 $6.16

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $7.54 $16.20

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $1.49 $3.21

(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

Sec. 504 2006 c 372 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $247,541,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($252,607,000))
$257,176,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $755,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,903,000))
$505,472,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $796,000 of this fiscal year 2006 appropriation
and a maximum of $828,000 of the fiscal year 2007 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $42.52 per weighted mile in the 2005-06 school
year and (($42.30)) $44.01 per weighted mile in the 2006-07 school year
exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of
this act. Included in the 2005-06 school year rate is ((a one-time))
an increase of $1.12 and included in the 2006-07 school year rate is an
increase of $1.71 to offset extraordinary increases in the price of
diesel fuel. Allocations for transportation of students transported
more than one radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as
determined by superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the
per mile reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the
formulas adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
Allocations for transportation of students living within one radius
mile shall be based on the number of enrolled students in grades
kindergarten through five living within one radius mile of their
assigned school multiplied by the per mile reimbursement rate for the
school year multiplied by 1.29.
(5) For busses purchased between July 1, 2005, and June 30, 2007,
the office of superintendent of public instruction shall provide
reimbursement funding to a school district only after the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was
purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or
a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote
based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195. The competitive specifications shall meet
federal motor vehicle safety standards, minimum state specifications as
established by rule by the superintendent, and supported options as
determined by the superintendent in consultation with the regional
transportation coordinators of the educational service districts.
(6) Beginning with the 2005-06 school year, the superintendent of
public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district
buses on the five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate
category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the
depreciation payment shall be based on the current state price. The
superintendent may include a weighting or other adjustment factor in
the averaging formula to ease the transition from the current-price
depreciation system to the average depreciation system. Prior to
making any depreciation payment in the 2005-06 school year, the
superintendent shall notify the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the legislature of the specific depreciation
formula to be used. The replacement cost shall be based on the lowest
bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year. A maximum of
$50,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation may be expended for
software programming costs associated with the implementation of this
subsection.

Sec. 505 2006 c 372 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,147,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,159,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($270,423,000))
$313,038,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($276,729,000))
$319,344,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for state matching money for federal
child nutrition programs.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the 2007 fiscal year appropriation are
provided for summer food programs for children in low-income areas.
(3) $47,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $59,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to reimburse school districts for
school breakfasts served to students enrolled in the free or reduced
price meal program pursuant to House Bill No. 1771 (requiring school
breakfast programs in certain schools). If House Bill No. 1771 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 506 2006 c 372 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $464,812,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($478,191,000))
$472,613,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($435,664,000))
$436,462,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,234,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,381,901,000))
$1,377,121,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall use the
excess cost methodology developed and implemented for the 2001-02
school year using the S-275 personnel reporting system and all related
accounting requirements to ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The S-275 and accounting changes in effect since the 2001-02
school year shall supercede any prior excess cost methodologies and
shall be required of all school districts.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
and federal funds to school districts based on two categories: The
optional birth through age two program for special education eligible
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers, and the mandatory special
education program for special education eligible students ages three to
twenty-one. A "special education eligible student" means a student
receiving specially designed instruction in accordance with a properly
formulated individualized education program.
(5)(a) For the 2005-06 and 2006-07 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers ages birth through two,
multiplied by the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
two enrollment, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
Each district's general fund -- state funded special education
enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent or 12.7 percent.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, $18,940,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation and $28,698,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided for safety net awards for districts with
demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts
provided in subsection (5) of this section. If safety net awards
exceed the amount appropriated in this subsection (8), the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the
state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal sources. Differences in
program costs attributable to district philosophy, service delivery
choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety
net awards.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(d) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor who shall be nonvoting
members of the committee; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund--state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(12) A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for projects to provide special education
students with appropriate job and independent living skills, including
work experience where possible, to facilitate their successful
transition out of the public school system. The funds provided by this
subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.
(13) A maximum of $100,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation shall be expended to create a special education ombudsman
program within the office of superintendent of public instruction. The
purpose of the program is to provide support to parents, guardians,
educators, and students with disabilities. The program will provide
information to help families and educators understand state laws,
rules, and regulations, and access training and support, technical
information services, and mediation services. The ombudsman program
will provide data, information, and appropriate recommendations to the
office of superintendent of public instruction, school districts,
educational service districts, state need projects, and the parent and
teacher information center.
(14) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-
cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(15) A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation may be expended by the superintendent for projects
related to use of inclusion strategies by school districts for
provision of special education services.
(16) $1,400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation shall be
expended for one-time grants to school districts for the start-up costs
of implementing web-based programs that assist schools in meeting state
and federal requirements regarding individualized education plans.
(17) The superintendent, consistent with the new federal IDEA
reauthorization, shall continue to educate school districts on how to
implement a birth-to-three program and review the cost effectiveness
and learning benefits of early intervention.
(18) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.

Sec. 507 2006 c 372 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT
ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $173,153,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($190,957,000))
$188,092,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($364,110,000))
$361,245,000

Sec. 508 2006 c 372 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,078,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,237,000))
$17,571,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,432,000))
$35,766,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $236,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($236,000)) $173,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to maintain at
least one certificated instructional staff and related support services
at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to
support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to
furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions
are included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for
juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 509 2006 c 372 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY
CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,900,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,974,000))
$6,919,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,918,000))
$13,863,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of $347.93 per funded
student for the 2005-06 school year and $351.98 per funded student for
the 2006-07 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded students
shall be a maximum of two percent of each district's full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $170,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.
(4) $90,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $90,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided for the Washington
destination imagination network and future problem-solving programs.

Sec. 510 2006 c 372 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,382,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,297,000))
$51,726,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,799,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($244,478,000))
$244,907,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) ASSESSMENT
(a) $21,946,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $21,491,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $18,560,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
the Washington assessments of student learning (WASL), including
development and implementation of retake assessments for high school
students who are not successful in one or more content areas of the
WASL and development of alternative assessments or appeals procedures
to implement the certificate of academic achievement. The
superintendent of public instruction shall report quarterly on the
progress on development of alternative assessments or appeals
procedures. Within these amounts, the superintendent of public
instruction shall contract for the early return of 10th grade student
WASL results, on or around June 10th of each year. $100,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided
solely to: (i) Investigate the use of existing mathematics assessments
in languages other than English as possible means of measuring tenth
grade essential academic learnings and standards, including examining
the content and rigor of the assessments as well as their reliability
and validity; (ii) estimate the cost of translating the tenth grade
mathematics WASL into other languages and scoring these assessments
should they be implemented; and (iii) develop recommendations for (i)
and (ii) of this subsection (a). Funds provided in this section are
sufficient to implement section 5 of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6475 (alternative assessment options).
(b) $1,327,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 3127 (education), including section 2 of that act. If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(c) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of section 4 of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6255 (student-centered planning)
regarding reimbursement of diagnostic assessments.
(2) MATH REMEDIATION
The purpose of this subsection (2) is to strengthen high school
student performance in meeting the state standards in mathematics.
(a) Included in the general fund--state amounts provided in
subsection (1) of this section is $2,350,000 which is provided solely
for the development of a new tenth grade mathematics assessment tool
that: (i) Presents the mathematics essential learnings in segments for
assessment; (ii) is comparable in content and rigor to the tenth grade
mathematics WASL when all segments are considered together; (iii) is
reliable and valid; and (iv) can be used to determine a student's
academic performance level.
(b) $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the development of WASL knowledge and
skill learning modules to assist students performing at tenth grade
Level 1 in mathematics.
(c) $330,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for development of mathematics knowledge
and skill learning modules to teach middle and high school students
specific skills that have been identified as areas of difficulty for
tenth grade students. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop materials for classroom use and for tutorial
learning activities.
(d) $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for development of web-based applications
of the curriculum and materials produced under (b) and (c) of this
subsection as well as mathematics knowledge and skill modules and
materials previously developed by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction. The products are to be designed as on-line courses
for students needing Level 1 instruction; learning modules accessible
to classroom teachers for incorporation into classroom instruction;
tutorials that can be used as WASL assessment skill refreshers and as
tutor-guided and parent-guided learning modules; and on-line practice
WASLs with supporting item scoring information and student response
examples.
(3) PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT
(a) $548,000 of the fiscal year 2006 general fund -- state
appropriation and $548,000 of the fiscal year 2007 general fund -- state
appropriation are provided solely for training of paraprofessional
classroom assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom
assistants as provided in RCW 28A.415.310.
(b) $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for mentor teacher assistance,
including state support activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and
28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in
this subsection may be used each fiscal year to operate a mentor
academy to help districts provide effective training for peer mentors.
Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be allocated to school
districts based on the number of first year beginning teachers.
(c) $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(d) $3,180,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($4,358,000)) $4,787,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for salary
bonuses, and mandatory fringe benefits, for teachers who attain
certification by the national board for professional teaching
standards, subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(i) Teachers who hold a valid certificate from the national board
during the 2005-06 or 2006-07 school years shall receive an annual
bonus not to exceed $3,500 in each of these school years in which they
hold a national board certificate.
(ii) The annual bonus shall be paid in a lump sum amount and shall
not be included in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW
41.32.010(10).
(e) $98,761,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(4) SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT
(a) $338,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $488,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a principal support program.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction may contract
with an independent organization to administer the program. The
program shall include: (i) Development of an individualized
professional growth plan for a new principal or principal candidate;
and (ii) participation of a mentor principal who works over a period of
between one and three years with the new principal or principal
candidate to help him or her build the skills identified as critical to
the success of the professional growth plan. Within the amounts
provided, $25,000 per year shall be used to support additional
participation of secondary principals.
(b) $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Each educational audit
shall include recommendations for best practices and ways to address
identified needs and shall be presented to the community in a public
meeting to seek input on ways to implement the audit and its
recommendations.
(c) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a high school and school
district improvement program modeled after the office of the
superintendent of public instruction's existing focused assistance
program in (b) of this subsection. The state funding for this
improvement program will match an equal amount committed by a nonprofit
foundation in furtherance of a jointly funded program.
(d) A maximum of $250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for summer
accountability institutes offered by the superintendent of public
instruction. The institutes shall provide school district staff with
training in the analysis of student assessment data, information
regarding successful district and school teaching models, research on
curriculum and instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve
instruction in reading, mathematics, language arts, social studies,
including civics, and guidance and counseling. The superintendent of
public instruction shall emphasize issues of high school reform and
mathematics instruction when offering summer institute programs
supported by funds provided in this subsection.
(e) $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $515,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for the evaluation of reading and
mathematics textbooks, other instructional materials, and diagnostic
tools to determine the extent to which they are aligned with the state
standards. A scorecard of the analysis shall be made available to
school districts. The superintendent shall also develop and
disseminate information on essential components of comprehensive,
school-based math and reading programs and shall develop and
disseminate grade level expectations for reading and math which shall
include professional development modules and web-based materials.
(f) $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the mathematics helping corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(i) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall not be
permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(ii) The school improvement specialists shall provide the
following:
(A) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(B) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(C) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(D) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(E) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(F) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(G) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(g) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the improvement of reading
achievement and implementation of research-based reading models. The
superintendent shall evaluate reading curriculum programs and other
instructional materials to determine the extent to which they are
aligned with state standards. A report of the analyses shall be made
available to school districts. The superintendent shall report to
districts the assessments that are available to screen and diagnose
reading difficulties, and shall provide training on how to implement a
reading assessment system. Resources may also be used to disseminate
grade level expectations and develop professional development modules
and web-based materials.
(h) $30,401,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the reading first program under Title I of the no child
left behind act.
(i) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided for the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to award five grants to parent, community, and school
district partnership programs that will meet the unique needs of
different groups of students in closing the achievement gap. The
legislature intends that the pilot programs will help students meet
state learning standards, achieve the skills and knowledge necessary
for college or the workplace, reduce the achievement gap, prevent
dropouts, and improve graduation rates. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop and publish the
criteria for awarding grants by July 2006.
(i) The pilot programs shall be designed in such a way as to be
supplemental to educational services provided in the district and shall
utilize a community partnership based approach to helping students and
their parents.
(ii) The grant recipients shall work in collaboration with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop
measurable goals and evaluation methodologies for the pilot programs.
$25,000 of this appropriation may be used by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to hold a statewide meeting to
disseminate successful strategies developed by the grantees.
(iii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
issue a report to the legislature in the 2007 session on the progress
of each of the pilot programs.
(5) STUDENT SUPPORTS
(a) $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for: (i) The meals for kids
program under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155; (ii) to eliminate
the co-pay for students eligible for reduced price lunch eating
breakfast; and (iii) for additional assistance for school districts
initiating a summer food service program.
(b) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for an early reading grant program for
community-based initiatives that develop prereading and early reading
skills through parental and community involvement, public awareness,
coordination of resources, and partnerships with local school
districts. Grant awards shall include funding for one-time start up
costs for local affiliates and a one-time partial payment of school
district dues to local affiliates of up to 30 percent of the per
student dues amount. Grant applications shall include:
(i) Strategies for parental involvement emphasizing ages birth to
five and outreach to diverse communities;
(ii) Evidence of collaboration with, and support from, local school
districts, and how the activities funded in the grant are complementary
to the reading improvement efforts of local school districts;
(iii) A plan for community participation and coordination of
resources including in-kind and financial support by public and private
sector partners;
(iv) Measurable goals and evaluation methodology to determine
impact;
(v) Integration of reading strategies from the Washington state
early learning and development benchmarks;
(vi) A plan for marketing and public relations;
(vii) Strategies for sustaining the program when grant funding is
no longer available; and
(viii) Evidence of district commitment to reading improvement,
aligned curriculum, progress monitoring, and time-on-task.
(c) $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps.
The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing
comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more
schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs. Grants
provided under this section may be used by school districts for
expenditures from September 2005 through August 31, 2007.
(d) $3,594,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,594,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
provide a continuum of care for children and families to help children
become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall
contain local plans designed collaboratively with community service
providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which
the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible.
Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.
(6) TECHNOLOGY
(a) $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate a process to
facilitate the evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses to
school districts which includes the following: Creation of a general
listing of the types of available online curriculum courses; a survey
conducted by each regional educational technology support center of
school districts in its region regarding the types of online curriculum
courses desired by school districts; a process to evaluate and
recommend to school districts the best online courses in terms of
curriculum, student performance, and cost; and assistance to school
districts in procuring and providing the courses to students.
(b) $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for the development and posting of web-based instructional tools, assessment data, and other information that
assists schools and teachers implementing higher academic standards.

Sec. 511 2006 c 372 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,205,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,608,000))
$57,546,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,741,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($172,058,000))
$167,996,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $759.58 per
eligible bilingual student in the 2005-06 school year and $770.40 in
the 2006-07 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to 1.5 percent of the school
year allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section,
and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, solely for the central provision of assessments as
provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are
provided solely to develop a system for the tracking of current and
former transitional bilingual program students.
(5) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I Part C and English
language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III
of the elementary and secondary education act.

Sec. 512 2006 c 372 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,018,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,626,000))
$64,421,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,605,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $553,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $348,351,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($503,153,000))
$502,948,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $184.69 per funded student for the
2005-06 school year and $187.97 per funded student for the 2006-07
school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided under
section 504 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the following as appropriate:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12
for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch in the prior school year; and
(ii) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch exceeded forty percent, subtract forty percent from
the district's percentage and multiply the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school
year.
(d) In addition to amounts allocated in (b) and (c) of this
subsection, an additional amount shall be allocated to a school
district for each school year in which the district's allocation is
less than the amount the district received for the general fund--state
learning assistance program allocation in the 2004-05 school year. The
amount of the allocation in this section shall be sufficient to
maintain the 2004-05 school year allocation.
(2) Increases in a school district's allocation above the 2004-05
school year level shall be directed to grades nine through ten for the
2006-07 school year.
(3) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(4) Small school districts are encouraged to make the most
efficient use of the funding provided by using regional educational
service district cooperatives to hire staff, provide professional
development activities, and implement reading and mathematics programs
consistent with research-based guidelines provided by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(5) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund -- state or education legacy trust
funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(6) School districts are encouraged to coordinate the use of these
funds with other federal, state, and local sources to serve students
who are below grade level and to make efficient use of resources in
meeting the needs of students with the greatest academic deficits.

Sec. 513 2006 c 372 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--PROMOTING ACADEMIC
SUCCESS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,842,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,879,000))
$20,812,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $189,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,910,000))
$24,843,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The amounts appropriated in this section are provided solely
for remediation for students who have not met standard in one or more
content areas of the WASL in the spring of their tenth grade year and
on each retake thereafter. The funds may be used for extended learning
activities, including summer school, before and after school, Saturday
classes, skill seminars, assessment preparation, and in-school or out-of-school tutoring. Extended learning activities may occur on the
school campus, via the internet, or at other locations and times that
meet student needs. Funds allocated under this section shall not be
considered basic education funding. Amounts allocated under this
section shall fund new extended learning opportunities, and shall not
supplant funding for existing programs and services.
(2) School district allocations for promoting academic success
programs shall be calculated as follows:
(a) A portion of the district's student units shall be the number
of content area assessments (reading, writing, and mathematics) on
which students were more than one standard error of measurement from
meeting standard on the Washington assessment of student learning for
the current class of eleventh grade students.
(b) The other portion of the district's student units shall be the
number of content area assessments (reading, writing, and mathematics)
on which students were less than one standard error of measurement from
meeting standard but did not meet standard on the Washington assessment
of student learning for the current class of eleventh grade students.
Districts with at least one but less than 20 student units combining
the student units generated from this subsection and (a) of this
subsection shall be counted as having 20 student units for the purposes
of the allocations in (d) and (e)(i) of this subsection.
(c) The legislature recognizes that professional development and
planning for teachers is an important component of high quality
extended learning activities. Accordingly, a one-time funding amount
equal to 12 hours of certificated instructional staff units per 13.0
student units, as calculated in (a) and (b) of this subsection, is
provided in this section to ensure that extended learning activities
are of high quality and aligned to the state's essential academic
learning requirements.
(d) Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries and
benefits shall be determined using formula-generated staff units
calculated pursuant to this subsection. Ninety-four hours of
certificated instructional staff units are allocated per 13.0 student
units as calculated under (a) of this subsection and thirty-four hours
of certificated instructional staff units are allocated per 13.0
student units as calculated under (b) of this subsection. Allocations
for salaries and benefits for the staff units calculated under this
subsection shall be calculated in the same manner as provided under
section 503 of this act. Salary and benefit increase funding for staff
units generated under this section is included in section 504 of this
act.
(e) The following additional allocations are provided per student
unit, as calculated in (a) and (b) of this subsection:
(i) $12.50 for maintenance, operations, and transportation;
(ii) $12.00 for pre- and post-remediation assessments;
(iii) $17.00 per reading remediation student unit;
(iv) $8.00 per mathematics remediation student unit; and
(v) $8.00 per writing remediation student unit.
(f) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute
school year allocations according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.
(3) School districts shall report annually to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction on the use of these funds,
including the types of assistance selected by students, the number of
students receiving each type of assistance, and the impact on WASL test
scores.
(4) $708,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,408,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for additional one-time
allocations to offer remedial programs for students in the class of
2007 or other students who have not achieved success on the tenth grade
WASL. The formula for distributing the allocations to school districts
shall include amounts for students in the class of 2007 who register to
retake the WASL and want remedial assistance, and other factors as
determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
Before making the allocations from the funding provided in this
subsection, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall consult with the office of financial management to ensure that
the proposed allocations will achieve efficient and effective program
delivery and that they are one-time in nature.
(5) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided for competitive innovation grants awarded to
schools and school districts for implementing high school remediation
programs that are unique in program delivery, program accessibility,
program content, or a combination of these factors and that serve
students who have not achieved success on the tenth grade WASL.
(6) School districts may carry over from one year to the next up to
20 percent of funds allocated under this program; however, carryover
funds shall be expended for promoting academic success programs, and
may be used to provide extended learning programs for students beyond
their eleventh grade year who want continued remedial assistance to
pass the WASL.

Sec. 514 2006 c 372 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT
PROGRAM
Student Achievement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($630,537,000))
$630,313,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $300.00 per FTE student for the 2005-06 school year and $375.00 per FTE student for the 2006-07 school year.
For the purposes of this section, FTE student refers to the annual
average full-time equivalent enrollment of the school district in
grades kindergarten through twelve for the prior school year, as
reported to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by
August 31st of the previous school year.
(2) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection (2).
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute the
school year allocation according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

Sec. 515 2006 c 372 s 518 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,504,000))
$32,799,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,784,000))
$33,079,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $29,941,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for providing early childhood education
assistance. Of this amount, $1,497,000 is provided solely to increase
the number of children receiving education and $2,146,000 is provided
solely for a targeted vendor rate increase.
(2) $525,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for an early reading grant program for
community-based initiatives that develop prereading and early reading
skills through parental and community involvement, public awareness,
coordination of resources, and partnerships with local school
districts. If Substitute House Bill No. 2836 (reading achievement
account) is enacted by June 30, 2006, this amount shall be deposited in
the reading achievement account. Grant awards shall include funding
for one-time start up costs for local affiliates and a one-time partial
payment of school district dues to local affiliates of up to 30 percent
of the per student dues amount. Grant applications shall include:
(a) Strategies for parental involvement emphasizing ages birth to
five and outreach to diverse communities;
(b) Evidence of collaboration with, and support from, local school
districts, and how the activities funded in the grant are complementary
to the reading improvement efforts of local school districts;
(c) A plan for community participation and coordination of
resources including in-kind and financial support by public and private
sector partners;
(d) Measurable goals and evaluation methodology to determine
impact;
(e) Integration of reading strategies from the Washington state
early learning and development benchmarks;
(f) A plan for marketing and public relations;
(g) Strategies for sustaining the program when grant funding is no
longer available; and
(h) Evidence of district commitment to reading improvement, aligned
curriculum, progress monitoring, and time-on-task.
(3) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the child care career and wage ladder
program created by chapter 507, Laws of 2005.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
Sec. 601 2006 c 372 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $337,629,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($352,714,000))
$352,614,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,209,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,143,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,748,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($714,347,000))
$714,247,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $165,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $165,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item UW-01.
(2) $300,000 of the general fund -- private/local appropriation is
provided solely for shellfish biotoxin monitoring as specified in
chapter 263, Laws of 2003 (SSB 6073, shellfish license fee).
(3)(a) $3,057,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $7,691,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy
for 360 new enrollments at the Seattle campus, 325 new enrollments at
the Tacoma campus, and 275 new enrollments at the Bothell campus. By
December 15th of each year of the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the
university shall report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees the number of new student FTEs by campus
enrolled with the funding provided in this subsection.
(b) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for 150 additional high-demand student
enrollments. The university shall make it a priority to expand access
to baccalaureate programs in engineering, math, and science. By
December 15, 2006, the university shall report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees the number
of new student FTEs enrolled with the funding provided in this
subsection.
(4) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 949 through 980 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding during the 2005-2007 biennium. This increase
in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition revenues
that will be generated and retained by the university as a result of
the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of this act.
Given these increases in core funding, the University of Washington
shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving
the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that are ranked in the top twenty
nationally;
(e) Sustain the quality of its research programs as measured by the
national ranking for federal research grants received; and
(f) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before November 1, 2006, the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating board
shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to the
governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to December 1, 2006.
(5) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to assist the transition of University of
Washington-Tacoma and University of Washington-Bothell from branch
campuses serving upper-division students, to four-year campuses serving
freshmen, sophomores, and upper-division students. Funds may be used
to develop curricula, recruit new faculty, and expand student services.
Consistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board, UW-Tacoma and UW-Bothell may begin enrolling lower-division students beginning in fiscal year 2007.
(6) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for research on labor and economic
issues in Washington state through the Harry Bridges center.
(7) $146,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $296,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for the
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the Burke Museum to enhance the
museum's public outreach capabilities.
(8) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for the
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the institute for learning and
brain sciences (ILABS) to develop a partnership, linking ILABS to
policymakers, private sectors and user-groups.
(9) The University of Washington medical center shall provide
inpatient and outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in
department of corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the
average rate that the department of corrections has negotiated with
other community hospitals in Washington state.
(10) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Olympic natural resources
center.
(11) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $450,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to maintain the autism center at
the University of Washington-Tacoma campus. The facility will continue
to function as a satellite facility to the autism center at the
University of Washington medical center in Seattle and provide clinical
service and professional training.
(12) $2,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to increase the university's capacity to
conduct research in the life science fields.
(13) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for improvements to the Pacific Northwest
seismic network.
(14) $1,008,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for extraordinary natural gas cost
expenses.
(15) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the university to implement a
department of global health. The school of medicine and the school of
public health and community medicine will jointly form and operate the
department. The focus will be establishing sustainable improvements in
global health through public health policy, practice, and medical care.
(16) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to pay for operations and maintenance
costs of the bioengineering and genome sciences buildings that will
come on line during the 2005-07 biennium.
(17) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to expand the Washington search for young
scholars program at the Robinson center at the University of
Washington.
(((19))) (18) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for math engineering science
achievement (MESA) Washington to establish centers throughout the
state.
(19) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to
identify and carry out, or otherwise appropriately support, a process
to identify issues that have led to conflict around land use
requirements and property rights, and explore practical and effective
ways to resolve or reduce that conflict.

Sec. 602 2006 c 372 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $206,511,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($213,500,000))
$213,520,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,162,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($431,466,000))
$431,486,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $210,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $210,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item WSU-01.
(2)(a) $2,741,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $6,900,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy
for 430 new enrollments at the Pullman campus, 450 new enrollments at
the Vancouver campus, and 25 new enrollments at the Tri-Cities campus.
By December 15th of each year of the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the
university shall report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees the number of new student FTEs by campus
enrolled with the funding provided in this subsection.
(b) $1,174,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for 80 additional high demand student
enrollments. The university shall make it a priority to expand
baccalaureate and graduate level access to nursing programs and to
expand baccalaureate programs in engineering and construction
management. By December 15, 2006, the university shall report to the
office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees
the number of new student FTEs enrolled with the funding provided in
this subsection.
(3) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 949 through 980 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding during the 2005-2007 biennium. This increase
in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition revenues
that will be generated and retained by the university as a result of
the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of this act.
Given these increases in core funding, Washington State University
shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving
the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that are ranked in the top twenty
nationally;
(e) Sustain the quality of its research programs as measured by the
national ranking for federal research grants received; and
(f) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before November 1, 2006 the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating board
shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to the
governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to December 1, 2006.
(4) $507,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,014,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand the entering class
of veterinary medicine students by 16 resident student FTEs each
academic year during the 2005-2007 biennium.
(5) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to assist the transition of Washington
State University-Vancouver from a branch campus serving only upper-division students, to a four-year campus serving freshmen, sophomores,
and upper-division students. Funds may be used to develop curricula,
recruit new faculty, and expand student services. Consistent with the
recommendations of the higher education coordinating board, WSU-Vancouver may begin enrolling lower-division students beginning in
fiscal year 2007.
(6) The university shall give consideration to reprioritizing
agricultural research funding to allow for expansion of the center for
precision agricultural systems and development of the biologically
intensive and organic agriculture program.
(7) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to study the cost of complying
with vehicle licensing and registration laws. Funding is subject to
the passage of House Bill No. 1241 (modifying vehicle licensing and
registration penalties). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5101
(providing incentives to support renewable energy). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(9) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to conduct research on
alternatives for controlling ghost shrimp in Willapa bay.
(10) $716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for extraordinary natural gas cost
expenses.
(11) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to assist the Washington State University
(WSU) Tri-Cities in planning the transition from a branch campus
serving upper-division students, to a four-year campus serving
freshmen, sophomores, and upper-division students. Funds may be used
to develop curricula, recruit new faculty, and expand student services.
WSU Tri-Cities may begin enrolling lower-division students beginning in
Fall 2007.
(12) $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the university to operate the
AgWeatherNet system.
(13) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the center for sustaining agriculture
and natural resources to create a biologically intensive and organic
agriculture program.
(((15))) (14) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for allocation to a private
nonprofit medical and scientific research institute to be located in
Spokane for the purposes of developing and implementing new medical
treatment therapies involving systems biology, genomics, and
nanotechnology. The allocation shall be matched by the nonprofit
institute by an equal amount of funds from nonstate sources. The
university shall not retain any of these funds for administrative
purposes.
(((16))) (15) $98,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to establish a biofuels consumer
education and outreach program at the Washington State University
extension energy program.
(16) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to
identify and carry out, or otherwise appropriately support, a process
to identify issues that have led to conflict around land use
requirements and property rights, and explore practical and effective
ways to resolve or reduce that conflict.

Sec. 603 2006 c 372 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,671,000))
$45,586,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,006,000))
$46,980,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,461,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,241,000))
$99,130,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,147,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $4,314,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy
for 650 new enrollments. By December 15th of each year of the 2005-07
fiscal biennium, the university shall report to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees the number of new
student FTEs by campus enrolled with the funding provided in this
subsection.
(2) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 949 through 980 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding during the 2005-2007 biennium. This increase
in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition revenues
that will be generated and retained by the university as a result of
the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of this act.
Given these increases in core funding, Central Washington University
shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving
the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that receive national accreditation;
and
(e) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before November 1, 2006, the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating board
shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to the
governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to December 1, 2006.
(3) For the 2006-07 and 2007-08 academic years, the legislature
hereby increases the limit on total gross authorized operating fees
revenue waived, exempted, or reduced by Central Washington University
pursuant to RCW 28B.15.910 to eleven percent.
(4) $206,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for extraordinary natural gas cost
expenses.

Sec. 604 2006 c 372 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $156,449,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($162,843,000))
$162,968,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,075,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,910,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($395,278,000))
$395,403,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $299,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $308,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for the western interstate commission for higher
education.
(2) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for higher education student child care matching
grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(3) $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for the benefit of students who participate in
college assistance migrant programs (CAMP) operating in Washington
state. To ensure timely state aid, the board may establish a date
after which no additional grants would be available for the 2005-06 and
2006-07 academic years. The board shall disperse grants in equal
amounts to eligible post-secondary institutions so that state money in
all cases supplements federal CAMP awards.
(4) $124,901,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006, $134,506,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007, $28,400,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2006, and $31,654,000 of the education
legacy trust appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are for the state need
grant program. After April 1st of each fiscal year, uncommitted funds
from the annual appropriation for the state need grant program may be
transferred to the state work study or educational opportunity grant
programs and up to one percent may be transferred to the state
education trust account as authorized in RCW 28B.92.140.
Of the amounts provided in this subsection, up to $500,000 is to
implement House Bill No. 1345 (part-time student financial aid). The
board may not expend more than the amount provided in this subsection
to implement the bill.
(5) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for the implementation of Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1050 (foster care endowed scholarship program). The purpose
of the program is to help students who are or were in foster care
attend an institution of higher education in the state of Washington.
(6) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for the
fiscal year 2007 are to support the future teachers' conditional
scholarship and loan repayment program. Of this amount, $500,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided
solely to expand the program by up to 70 additional slots for
prospective teachers in special education, bilingual education,
secondary mathematics, and secondary science.
(7) $17,048,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $17,048,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, $863,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation
for fiscal year 2006, and $1,993,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are for the state work study
program. After April 1st of each fiscal year, uncommitted funds from
the annual appropriation for the state work study program may be
transferred to the state need grant or educational opportunity grant
programs. In addition to the administrative allowance in section
609(2) of this act, four percent of the general fund -- state amount and
the education legacy trust amounts in this subsection may be
transferred to and expended for state work study program
administration.
(8) $2,867,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,867,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for educational opportunity grants pursuant to
chapter 233, Laws of 2003 (ESB 5676). The board may deposit sufficient
funds from its appropriation into the state education trust fund as
established in RCW 28B.92.140 to provide a one-year renewal of the
grant for each new recipient of the educational opportunity grant
award. After April 1st of each fiscal year, uncommitted funds from the
annual appropriation for the educational opportunity grant program may
be transferred to the state work study or state need grant programs.
(9) $2,384,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,361,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are to implement the Washington scholars program. Any
Washington scholars program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each
year may be transferred by the board to the Washington award for
vocational excellence. Amounts provided in this subsection are
sufficient for the higher education coordinating board to select three
Washington scholars in fiscal year 2006 and two Washington scholars in
fiscal year 2007 from each legislative district under the provisions of
RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150.
(10) $794,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $847,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are to implement Washington award for vocational
excellence program. Any Washington award for vocational program moneys
not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the board
to the Washington scholars program.
(11) $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for community scholarship matching grants of
$2,000 each and up to a total of $46,000 per year in grants for
nonprofit community organizations with preference given to
organizations affiliated with scholarship America to administer the
scholarship matching grants. To be eligible for the matching grant, a
nonprofit community organization organized under section 501(c)(3) of
the internal revenue code must demonstrate that it has raised $2,000 in
new moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
section. An organization may receive more than one $2,000 matching
grant and preference shall be given to organizations affiliated with
scholarship America.
(12) Subject to state need grant service requirements pursuant to
chapter 28B.119 RCW, $4,325,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 is for the Washington promise
scholarship program. The Washington promise scholarship program is
terminated following fiscal year 2006. No Washington promise
scholarship awards may be offered to students beyond the graduating
high school class of 2004. Unexpended funds remaining after June 30,
2006, may be transferred to the state education trust account
authorized in RCW 28B.92.140.
(13) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for one-time costs associated with
stabilizing the GEAR-UP scholarship program.
(14) $3,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for the health professions loan repayment and
scholarship program.
(15) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for the Washington center scholarship program.
(16) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the board to contract with the
Washington leadership 1000 scholarship fund. The funds shall be used
to support, develop, and implement the leadership 1000 scholarship
program which matches private benefactors with selected economically
disadvantaged students who would otherwise be unable to attend college
after depleting all other sources of scholarship and financial aid.
(17) By December 1st of each fiscal year, the board shall submit a
report to the legislature detailing the outcomes from the previous year
and a progress report on the current year for each of the student aid
programs listed in this section: (a) The number of students served;
(b) the award amount provided to students by sector; (c) the total
amount spent; and (d) an explanation for any variation between the
amount listed in the subsections and the amount expended.

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 701 2006 c 372 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT
LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $640,544,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($683,019,000))
$679,329,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,924,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $539,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,395,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,583,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,334,004,000))
$1,330,359,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
deposit into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account. The
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 shall be deposited in the debt-limit
general fund bond retirement account by June 30, 2006.

Sec. 702 2006 c 372 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,588,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,743,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($130,909,000))
$131,001,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($182,240,000))
$182,332,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 703 2006 c 372 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,357,000))
$957,000
State Building Construction Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,080,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,000))
$86,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,324,000))
$3,936,000

Sec. 704 2006 c 372 s 705 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,000,000))
$9,000,000

The sum of (($8,000,000)) $9,000,000 is appropriated from the
disaster response account for the purpose of making allocations to the
Washington state patrol for fire mobilizations costs or to the
department of natural resources for fire suppression costs.

Sec. 705 2006 c 372 s 706 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--FIRE CONTINGENCY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

The appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: The appropriations ((is)) are
provided solely for deposit into the disaster response account for the
purposes specified in section 705 of this act.

Sec. 706 2006 c 372 s 707 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS. The following sums, or so much thereof as may
be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise
indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations
for sundry claims. These appropriations are to be disbursed on
vouchers approved by the director of financial management, except as
otherwise provided, as follows:
(1) Reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of
self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110:
(a) Kirk F. Schultz, claim number SCJ 2006-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,312
(b) Scott A. King, claim number SCJ 2006-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,922
(c) Mark D. Huckaba, claim number SCJ 2006-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
(d) James D. Brittain, claim number SCJ 2006-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
(e) Jain E. Johnson, claim number SCJ 2007-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,250
(f) Sandra J. Ciske, claim number SCJ 2007-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,168
(g) Matthew R. Young, claim number SCJ 2007-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,185
(2) Payment from the state wildlife account for damage to crops by
wildlife pursuant to RCW 77.36.050:
(a) For deposit into the self-insurance liability account for
reimbursement of payment made to Circle S Landscape, claim number SCG
2004-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,926
(b) ((Venture Farms, claim number SCG 2005-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,448
(c))) Patrick O'Hagen, claim number SCG 2006-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,673
(((d))) (c) Patrick O'Hagen, claim number SCG 2006-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,389
(((e))) (d) Swampapple Enterprises, Inc., claim number
SCG 2006-04 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,574
(((f))) (e) Wilbur H. Mundy, claim number SCG 2006-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,307
(((g))) (f) Sam Kayser, claim number SCG 2006-08 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,108
(((h))) (g) Richard Cordell, claim number SCG 2006-09 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,076
(h) Ralland L. Wallace, claim number SCG 2006-06 . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,393
(i) Sulfer Creek Ranches, claim number SCG 2007-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,602
(3) Payment for reinterment of human remains from historic graves
pursuant to RCW 68.60.050:
Darrin Erdahl, claim number SCO 2006-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000

Sec. 707 2005 c 518 s 707 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING
IMPACT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($792,000))
$604,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($837,000))
$649,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
distribution to counties to pay for the costs of implementing chapter
176, Laws of 2004, which makes amendments to the special sex offender
sentencing alternative.

Sec. 708 2006 c 372 s 712 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--ENERGY FREEDOM ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,000,000))
$20,500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
deposit into the energy freedom account. If Engrossed Third Substitute
House Bill No. 2939 (energy freedom) is not enacted by June 30, 2006,
the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 2006 c 372 s 713 (uncodified) is repealed.

Sec. 710 2006 c 372 s 715 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PERSONNEL LITIGATION
SETTLEMENT--RETROSPECTIVE PAYMENTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,813,000))
$11,039,976
Special Personnel Litigation Revolving
Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,689,000))
$9,954,024
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,502,000))
$20,994,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of
funding the retrospective payments for the settlement of litigation
involving compensation differentials among personnel classes, W.P.E.A.
v. State of Washington.
(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and
accounts, the ((state treasurer)) office of financial management shall
transfer or direct the transfer of sufficient moneys from each
dedicated fund or account, including local funds of state agencies and
institutions of higher education, to the special personnel litigation
revolving account in accordance with ((LEAP)) OFM document number
((2006-S11)) 2007-S01 dated ((March 3,)) December 19, 2006. Agencies
and institutions of higher education with local funds will deposit
sufficient money to the special personnel litigation revolving account
from their local funds as directed by the office of financial
management. The office of financial management will direct the
transfer of funds in the amount of the settlement to the administrator
of the settlement on the date required by the court order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PERSONNEL LITIGATION
SETTLEMENT--PROSPECTIVE PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,000
Special Personnel Litigation Revolving Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,459,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of
funding the prospective provisions in the settlement agreement,
settling all claims in the litigation involving compensation
differentials among personnel classes, W.P.E.A. v. State of Washington.
(2) Appropriations or spending authority is provided to agencies in
accordance with OFM document number 2007-S02 dated December 19, 2006.
This funding is to be used in each agency's payroll process to pay the
increased salaries for specified job classes as required in the
settlement agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PUBLIC SAFETY AND EDUCATION
ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the public safety and education account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EQUAL JUSTICE ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the equal justice account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,700,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--TOBACCO PREVENTION AND CONTROL
ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the tobacco prevention and control account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--BUDGET STABILIZATION ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the budget stabilization account. If Z-0366/07
(budget stabilization account) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
appropriation in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EDUCATION LEGACY TRUST ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the education legacy trust account.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 801 2006 c 372 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,561,000))
$6,644,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,292,000))
$44,282,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,568,000))
$3,757,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and
education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,252,000))
$3,979,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,000))
$41,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly
funded autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,969,000))
$2,044,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation
for harbor improvement revenue
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($147,000))
$133,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($83,325,000))
$77,023,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,650,000))
$53,953,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,315,000))
$21,381,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for
liquor excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,512,000))
$41,525,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for
liquor profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,818,000))
$68,911,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for
local government financial assistance
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,100,000))
$26,020,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($368,547,000))
$349,693,000
The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 802 2006 c 372 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,050,000))
$1,913,000
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2005-07 biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 803 2006 c 372 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,367,000))
$1,276,000
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2005-07 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 804 2006 c 372 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing
fees distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,644,000))
$2,292,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood
control funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,000))
$67,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal
forest reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,500,000))
$84,071,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,212,000))
$86,430,000
The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 805 2006 c 372 s 805 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS. For transfers in this section
to the state general fund, pursuant to RCW 43.135.035(5), the state
expenditure limit shall be increased by the amount of the transfer.
The increase shall occur in the fiscal year in which the transfer
occurs.

State Convention and Trade Center Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$5,150,000 for fiscal year 2006 and $5,150,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000
General Fund: For transfer to the tourism
development and promotion account, $150,000
for fiscal year 2006 and $150,000 for fiscal
year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Financial Services Regulation Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $778,000 for
fiscal year 2006 and $779,000 for fiscal
year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,557,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For
transfer to the drinking water
assistance account, $8,400,000 for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,400,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer
to the health services account, in an
amount not to exceed the actual balance
of the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $185,823,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $45,000,000 for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
tobacco prevention and control account . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,086,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
water quality account . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,885,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
violence reduction and drug enforcement
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,932,000
Public Employees' and Retirees' Insurance Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$40,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 and
$45,000,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,000,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$2,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Secretary of State's Revolving Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $250,000
for fiscal year 2006 and $250,000 for
fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $9,500,000
for fiscal year 2006 and $7,000,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,500,000
General Fund: For transfer to the water quality
account, $318,000 for fiscal year 2006 and
$319,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $637,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the
water quality account . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,500,000
Water Quality Account: For transfer to the
water pollution control revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,534,000))
$11,034,000
Pollution Liability Insurance Trust Account: For
transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance repayment
account, an amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,800,000
Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control
Account: For transfer to the state general
fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 and
$1,000,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to
the public facility construction loan revolving
account, $4,500,000 for fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to
the disaster response account, $3,000,000 for
fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Natural Resources Equipment Revolving Fund: For
transfer to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account,
$1,500,000 for fiscal year 2006 and $1,500,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Education Legacy Trust Account: For transfer
to the student achievement account,
$35,555,000 for fiscal
year 2006 and $103,046,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,601,000

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 182
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 79
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 122
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 96
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING . . . . . . . . . . . . 172
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 109
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 88
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 117
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 77
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 55
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 66
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 71
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 78
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 77
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 86
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 101
GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 184
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 79
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
BUDGET STABILIZATION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 195
DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 194
EDUCATION LEGACY TRUST ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 195
ENERGY FREEDOM ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 192
EQUAL JUSTICE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 194
FIRE CONTINGENCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 191
FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 190
PERSONNEL LITIGATION SETTLEMENT--PROSPECTIVE PAYMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 193
PERSONNEL LITIGATION SETTLEMENT--RETROSPECTIVE PAYMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 193
PUBLIC SAFETY AND EDUCATION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 194
SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING IMPACT . . . . . . . . . . . . 192
TOBACCO PREVENTION AND CONTROL ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 195
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 108
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 125
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 189, 190
COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 197
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 198
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 198
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 196
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 199
SUNDRY CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 191
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 128
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 157
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 138
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 155
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 167
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 155
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 156
PROMOTING ACADEMIC SUCCESS . . . . . . . . . . . . 168
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 148
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 146
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 171
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 1
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 179
--- END ---