BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington is home to some of the world's
most innovative companies, researchers, entrepreneurs, and workers.
Talent and creativity exist in all areas of Washington, but economic
experience around the world shows that economic impact can be
particularly large where talent and resources are densely concentrated.
All over the world, small, specific areas are becoming focal points for
economic change and leadership. These areas have name recognition,
attract some of the best talent, and provide a strong sense of
community among the people who work there. Washington is home to some
of these areas now and needs to have more of them in the future. It is
the intent of the legislature that Washington support the
identification and promotion of innovation partnership zones to advance
Washington's position in the world economy. Washington is a national
leader in economic strategy based on clusters of industries, promoting
the connections among firms, suppliers, customers, and public
resources. Washington's innovation partnership zone strategy is an
extension of that policy to promote research-based firms and industries
in specific areas that become globally recognized as hubs of innovation
and expertise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall designate innovation partnership zones on
the basis of the following criteria:
(a) Innovation partnership zones must have three types of
institutions operating within their boundaries, or show evidence of
planning and local partnerships that will lead to dense concentrations
of these institutions:
(i) Research capacity in the form of a university or community
college fostering commercially valuable research, nonprofit
institutions creating commercially applicable innovations, or a
national laboratory;
(ii) Dense proximity of globally competitive firms in a
research-based industry or industries or of individual firms with
innovation strategies linked to (a)(i) of this subsection. A globally
competitive firm may be signified through international organization
for standardization 9000 or 1400 certification, or other recognized
evidence of international success; and
(iii) Training capacity either within the zone or readily
accessible to the zone. The training capacity requirement may be met
by the same institution as the research capacity requirement, to the
extent both are associated with an educational institution in the
proposed zone.
(b) The proposed innovation partnership zone must have identifiable
boundaries that contain dense concentrations of leading companies,
research capacity, and skills, or otherwise show evidence of planning
and partnerships that will produce such concentrations in an identified
time period. This may be provided through evidence of identifiable
innovation partnership zone boundaries cited in previous planning
documents. Innovation partnership zone proposals must be able to
describe the boundaries of the zone using commonly available data and
maps.
(c) Innovation partnership zones must be small enough and distinct
enough so that workers and companies have a unique affinity for the
area within the zone. Innovation partnership zones may already possess
a distinct identity or they may provide evidence of marketing efforts
to create a distinct name and identity for the area within the zone's
boundaries.
(d) The innovation partnership zone must include unused or
otherwise potentially available property to allow for future expansion.
Innovation partnership zones need not possess vacant land to meet this
requirement. Local zoning and economic conditions must provide
evidence that capacity for expansion exists. Such plans shall be
consistent with the goals and requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW and
city and county comprehensive plans and development regulations.
(e) The innovation partnership zone administrator must be an
economic development council, port, workforce development council,
city, or county.
(2) On October 1st of each year, the director shall designate
innovation partnership zones on the basis of applications that meet the
legislative criteria, estimated economic impact of the zone, and
evidence of forward planning for the zone. The director will designate
an innovation partnership zone administrator in the local area.
(3) Innovation partnership zones are eligible for funds and other
resources as provided by the legislature or at the discretion of the
governor.
(4) If the innovation partnership zone meets the other requirements
of the fund sources, then the zone is eligible for the following funds
relating to:
(a) The local infrastructure financing tools program;
(b) The sales and use tax for public facilities in rural counties;
and
(c) Job skills.
(5) An applicant for designation as an innovation partnership zone
shall show evidence of support from a research institution, an
educational institution, a company with operations within the zone, a
workforce development council, and an economic development council,
port, or chamber of commerce.
(6) An innovation partnership zone shall be designated as a zone
for a four-year period. At the end of the four-year period, the zone
must reapply for the designation through the department.
(7) The department shall convene annual information sharing events
for innovation partnership zone administrators and other interested
parties.
(8) An innovation partnership zone shall provide performance
measures as required by the director, including but not limited to
private investment measures, job creation measures, and measures of
innovation such as licensing of ideas in research institutions,
patents, or other recognized measures of innovation.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.102.070 and 2006 c 181 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
The use of local infrastructure financing under this chapter is
subject to the following conditions:
(1) No funds may be used to finance, design, acquire, construct,
equip, operate, maintain, remodel, repair, or reequip public facilities
funded with taxes collected under RCW 82.14.048;
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection no funds may be
used for public improvements other than projects identified within the
capital facilities, utilities, housing, or transportation element of a
comprehensive plan required under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(b) Funds may be used for public improvements that are historical
preservation activities as defined in RCW 39.89.020;
(c) Funds may be used for innovation partnership zones, as provided
under section 2 of this act;
(3) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using local infrastructure financing are expected to encourage
private development within the revenue development area and to increase
the fair market value of real property within the revenue development
area;
(4) A sponsoring local government, participating local government,
or participating taxing district has entered or expects to enter into
a contract with a private developer relating to the development of
private improvements within the revenue development area or has
received a letter of intent from a private developer relating to the
developer's plans for the development of private improvements within
the revenue development area;
(5) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the
revenue development area, as a result of the public improvements, will
be consistent with the county-wide planning policy adopted by the
county under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive
plan and development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(6) The governing body of the sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, must make a finding that local
infrastructure financing:
(a) Is not expected to be used for the purpose of relocating a
business from outside the revenue development area, but within this
state, into the revenue development area; and
(b) Will improve the viability of existing business entities within
the revenue development area;
(7) The governing body of the sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, finds that the public improvements
proposed to be financed in whole or in part using local infrastructure
financing are reasonably likely to:
(a) Increase private residential and commercial investment within
the revenue development area;
(b) Increase employment within the revenue development area;
(c) Improve the viability of any existing communities that are
based on mixed-use development within the revenue development area; and
(d) Generate, over the period of time that the local option sales
and use tax will be imposed under RCW 82.14.475, state excise tax
allocation revenues and state property tax allocation revenues derived
from the revenue development area that are equal to or greater than the
respective state contributions made under this chapter;
(8) The sponsoring local government may only use local
infrastructure financing in areas deemed in need of economic
development or redevelopment within boundaries of the sponsoring local
government.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.14.370 and 2004 c 130 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a rural county may impose a sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is
in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
county. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.08 percent of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the
case of a use tax, except that for rural counties with population
densities between sixty and one hundred persons per square mile, the
rate shall not exceed 0.04 percent before January 1, 2000.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.
(3)(a) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used to
finance public facilities serving economic development purposes in
rural counties or for innovation partnership zones, as provided under
section 2 of this act. The public facility must be listed as an item
in the officially adopted county overall economic development plan, or
the economic development section of the county's comprehensive plan, or
the comprehensive plan of a city or town located within the county for
those counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040. For those counties that
do not have an adopted overall economic development plan and do not
plan under the growth management act, the public facility must be
listed in the county's capital facilities plan or the capital
facilities plan of a city or town located within the county.
(b) In implementing this section, the county shall consult with
cities, towns, and port districts located within the county and the
associate development organization serving the county to ensure that
the expenditure meets the goals of chapter 130, Laws of 2004 and the
requirements of (a) of this subsection. Each county collecting money
under this section shall report to the office of the state auditor, no
later than October 1st of each year, a list of new projects from the
prior fiscal year, showing that the county has used the funds for those
projects consistent with the goals of chapter 130, Laws of 2004 and the
requirements of (a) of this subsection. Any projects financed prior to
June 10, 2004, from the proceeds of obligations to which the tax
imposed under subsection (1) of this section has been pledged shall not
be deemed to be new projects under this subsection.
(c) For the purposes of this section, (i) "public facilities" means
bridges, roads, domestic and industrial water facilities, sanitary
sewer facilities, earth stabilization, storm sewer facilities,
railroad, electricity, natural gas, buildings, structures,
telecommunications infrastructure, transportation infrastructure, or
commercial infrastructure, and port facilities in the state of
Washington; and (ii) "economic development purposes" means those
purposes which facilitate the creation or retention of businesses and
jobs in a county.
(4) No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 1998.
No tax may be collected under this section by a county more than
twenty-five years after the date that a tax is first imposed under this
section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "rural county" means a county
with a population density of less than one hundred persons per square
mile or a county smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles as
determined by the office of financial management and published each
year by the department for the period July 1st to June 30th.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act expires June 30, 2039.

--- END ---