BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar
amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2009, out of the several funds specified in this act.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Fiscal year 2008" or "FY 2008" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2008.
(b) "Fiscal year 2009" or "FY 2009" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2009.
(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion
of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not
expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill
the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (88-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,773,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,122,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,895,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Cancer Research Facility Grant (01-S-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $667,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $667,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Fox Theater Project (01-S-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,091,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,091,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
West Central Community Center (01-S-016)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Coastal Erosion Grants (01-S-019)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $316,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $316,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(04-4-003)

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,075,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,231,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
State Games (04-4-850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Japanese American Memorial (04-4-951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
PBS Digital Upgrade (04-4-958)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Highline School District Aircraft Noise Mitigation (03-H-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the Highline
school district, the port of Seattle, and the federal aviation
administration each matching the appropriation in section 150, chapter
26, Laws of 2003, 1st sp. sess.
(2) This reappropriation does not commit the state to make future
appropriations for this program.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,699,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
City of Woodland Infrastructure Development (04-4-959)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The project must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) The reappropriation is provided solely for allocation by the
department to the city of Woodland for infrastructure development,
including drainage improvements and a dike access road.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $301,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Account (04-4-002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Expenditures of the appropriation shall comply with RCW
70.119A.170.
(2)(a) The state building construction account reappropriation is
provided solely to provide assistance to counties, cities, and special
purpose districts to identify, acquire, and rehabilitate public water
systems that have water quality problems or have been allowed to
deteriorate to a point where public health is an issue. Eligibility is
confined to applicants that already own at least one group A public
water system and that demonstrate a track record of sound drinking
water utility management. Funds may be used for: Planning, design,
and other preconstruction activities; system acquisition; and capital
construction costs.
(b) The state building construction account reappropriation must be
jointly administered by the department of health, the public works
board, and the department of community, trade, and economic development
using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program as an
administrative model. In order to expedite the use of these funds and
minimize administration costs, this reappropriation must be
administered by guidance, rather than rule. Projects must generally be
prioritized using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program
criteria. All financing provided through this program must be in the
form of grants that must partially cover project costs. The maximum
grant to any eligible entity may not exceed twenty-five percent of the
funds allocated to the appropriation in section 201, chapter 277, Laws
of 2004.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,227,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,249,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,676,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,024,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water SRF - Authorization to Use Loan Repayments
(04-4-010)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Lewis & Clark Confluence Project (04-2-954)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The project must comply with RCW
43.63A.125(2)(c) and other requirements for community projects
administered by the department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,017,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,983,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects (04-4-011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department,
except that the Highline historical society project is land
acquisition.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
204, chapter 277, Laws of 2004.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,936,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,379,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,315,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Funds (04-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,309,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $249,714,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $362,023,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts (06-4-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.750.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
104, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,263,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $427,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,690,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Services Facilities Program (06-4-006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.125.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
123, chapter 488, Laws of 2005 and section 111, chapter 8, Laws of 2001
2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $952,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,394,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,346,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects (06-4-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) Funding for the Inland Northwest Science and Technology Center
shall be held in reserve until the balance of phase I funding has been
secured or committed from local government and community sources.
(3) The Washington state arts commission shall design a plaque that
shall be affixed to buildings or displayed as part of a project
receiving any appropriation from this section. The plaque shall
provide information to the public that the building or project has been
made possible by the tax dollars of Washington citizens. The
commission may contact the secretary of state to obtain approval for
use of the Washington seal in the design of the plaque. The final
design shall be approved by the chairs and ranking members of the house
of representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and
means committee.
(4) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
106, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,192,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,608,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Youth Recreational Facilities Program (06-4-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.135.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
136, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,323,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,977,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (CERB) (06-4-011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A maximum of twenty-five percent of the
reappropriation in this section may be used for grants.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,209,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $241,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (06-4-003)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,100,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,780,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(06-4-001)

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,308,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,792,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(06-4-851)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $7,800,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for the backlog, as defined by the
department, of projects determined by the department to be eligible
under chapter 43.185 or 43.185A RCW.
(2) $4,500,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for weatherization administered
through the energy matchmakers program.
(3) $850,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely to promote development of safe and
affordable housing units for persons eligible for services from the
division of developmental disabilities within the department of social
and health services.
(4) $500,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for shelters, transitional housing, or
other housing facilities for victims of domestic violence.
(5) $3,000,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for farm worker housing projects and
programs to meet the full spectrum of housing needs of Washington's
farm workers and their families. The department shall work with
stakeholders representing a diversity of farm worker housing interests
to develop a strategic plan in implementing this provision.
(6) $200,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for the implementation and management
of a manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant ombudsman conflict
resolution program by the office of mobile home affairs as generally
described in section 3, chapter 429, Laws of 2005. The office of
mobile home affairs shall also determine the number of complaints made
to the department since May of 2005 that, in the best estimate of the
department, do in fact present violations of chapter 59.20 RCW and
shall produce a summary of the number and types of complaints. The
office of mobile home affairs shall also continue to maintain and
update a database with information about all mobile home parks and
manufactured housing communities. The office of mobile home affairs
shall provide a report regarding the activities and results of the
program to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives
and the senate by December 31, 2007.
(7) $150,000 of the appropriation from the Washington housing trust
account is provided solely for a program to assist individuals and
communities in the home-buying process, including, but not limited to:
Homebuyer education classes, credit and budget counseling, financial
literacy training, and down payment assistance programs. The department
shall contract with a nonprofit organization as defined under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or similar successor provision
that has experience and expertise in addressing language access
barriers in the home-buying process to implement this program.
(8) The reappropriation in this section must be included in the
calculation of annual funds available for determining the
administrative costs of the department, which shall not exceed five
percent of the annual funds available for the housing assistance
program and the affordable housing program as authorized under RCW
43.185.050 and 43.185A.030.

Reappropriation:
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,502,000
Homeless Families Services Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,502,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $499,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,001,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Job/Economic Development Grants (06-4-950)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
107, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.
(2) $1,000,000 of the reappropriation for the Pacific Northwest
national labs campus infrastructure project is provided solely for
giga-pop infrastructure.
(3) $5,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
military communities infrastructure projects. Military communities
infrastructure projects shall include:
(a) Grants to counties and cities for the purchase of development
easements to restrict the use of accident potential zones and clear
zones. The office of financial management shall establish a
competitive process for selecting projects to receive the grants.
Final allocation of these grants shall be at the discretion and with
the approval of the director of the office of financial management.
The grants are subject to the following conditions:
(i) The county or city must be subject to and in compliance with
RCW 36.70A.530;
(ii) The grants may not be used to remove encroachments into these
zones allowed by county or city zoning or permitting actions;
(iii) The county or city must have an encroachment prevention plan
preventing future encroachment into these zones; and
(iv) The grant provided by the state must not exceed one-third of
the project cost with funds from local and federal sources providing
the balance of the funds.
(b) Up to $481,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
improvements to a military department site on Fairchild air force base.

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,482,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,519,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Jobs in Communities (06-4-951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
140, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,965,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,286,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,251,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (06-4-004)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (06-4-010)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,937,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,128,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Water System Acquisition and Rehabilitation Program (06-4-850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation must be jointly
administered by the department of health, the public works board, and
the department of community, trade, and economic development using the
drinking water state revolving fund loan program as an administrative
model. In order to expedite the use of these funds and minimize
administration costs, this reappropriation must be administered by
guidance, rather than rule. Projects must generally be prioritized
using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program criteria.
All financing provided through this program must be in the form of
grants that must partially cover project costs. The maximum grant to
any eligible entity may not exceed twenty-five percent of the funds
allocated to this appropriation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,706,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,001,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Grays Harbor Public Utility District Bioenergy Project (06-4-852)

Reappropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts Grants (07-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.750.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects Location Recommendation

Wing Luke Asian museum Seattle $2,000,000

Friends of Gladish Pullman $48,000

Town hall association Seattle $750,000

Duwamish tribal services Seattle $275,000

Seattle art museum Seattle $1,750,000

Village theatre Issaquah $575,000

Artspace projects, Inc. Seattle $1,000,000

Suquamish foundation Suquamish $550,000

Edmonds center for the arts Edmonds $1,000,000

The Merc playhouse society Twisp $9,500

Orcas open arts Eastsound $70,000

Whatcom film association Bellingham $325,000

Whatcom museum society Bellingham $1,000,000

Seattle theatre group Seattle $750,000

Confluence gallery Twisp $77,000

Columbia theatre association Longview $750,000

San Juan community theatre Friday Harbor $193,000

Harlequin productions Olympia $75,000

Northshore performing arts center Bothell $350,000

Tacoma musical playhouse Tacoma $75,000

Wing it productions Seattle $20,000

826 Seattle Seattle $7,500

Cornish College of the Arts Seattle $350,000

Total $12,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (07-4-015)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A maximum of twenty-five percent of the
appropriation may be used for grants.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,711,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,289,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Services Facilities Grants (07-4-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.125.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects Location Recommendation

West Seattle food bank Seattle $400,000

Compass health Lynnwood $37,000

Neighborhood house Seattle $1,000,000

White Center emergency food association White Center $184,000

Garden-raised bounty Olympia $170,000

Food lifeline Seattle $122,000

Marysville food bank Marysville $187,000

Maple Valley food bank Maple Valley $117,000

The Arc of Whatcom county Bellingham $158,000

CAC of Lewis, Mason, and Thurston county Lacey $260,000

South county senior center Edmonds $200,000

Chief Seattle club Seattle $350,000

Senior center of West Seattle Seattle $350,000

YMCA of Snohomish county Monroe $1,000,000

The Salvation Army - Spokane Spokane $275,000

Asian counseling and referral services Seattle $1,000,000

Camas institute foundation Usk $650,000

Youth eastside services Bellevue $750,000

YMCA of Snohomish county Everett $275,000

Bellingham food bank Bellingham $400,000

N.A.T.I.V.E. project Spokane $375,000

Brigid Collins family support center Bellingham $200,000

Family resource center Redmond $150,000

Morningside Olympia $587,000

First step family support center Port Angeles $200,000

Olympic community action programs Port Townsend $400,000

Total $9,797,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,797,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,797,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (07-4-004)

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,100,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $183,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(07-4-009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $9,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
weatherization administered through the energy matchmakers program.
(2) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to promote
development of safe and affordable housing units for persons eligible
for services from the division of developmental disabilities within the
department of social and health services.
(3) $2,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to nonprofit organizations and public housing authorities for revolving
loan, self-help housing programs for low and moderate income families.
(4) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
shelters, transitional housing, or other housing facilities for victims
of domestic violence.
(5) $11,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary
farmworkers. The operation of the facilities built under this section
shall be in compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1342. The department shall
work with the farmworker housing advisory committee to prioritize
funding of projects to the areas of highest need. Funding may also be
provided, to the extent qualified projects are submitted, for health
and safety projects.
(6) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
development of emergency shelters and transitional housing
opportunities for homeless families with children.
(7) $2,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
development of farm infrastructure improvements.
(8) $1,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
development of housing for low-income or homeless Native Americans.
The department shall work with Native American tribes, not-for–profit
organizations with experience in serving Native American populations,
and Native American housing development organizations to prioritize
projects located in the areas of highest identified need.
(9) $4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for loans
and grants to eligible organizations to purchase manufactured/mobile
home communities with the intent of preserving the communities for
affordable housing.
(10) The appropriation in this section shall not be used for the
administrative costs of the department. The amount of the
appropriation shall be included in the calculation of annual funds
available for determining the administrative costs authorized under RCW
43.185.050.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Job Development Fund Grants (07-4-010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $429,000 of the appropriation in this section is for
administration.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects Location Recommendation

Mint farm industrial park phase 2 infrastructure
improvements
City of Longview
$1,982,000

Fruitdale road/McGarigle road improvements Skagit county $2,277,000

Valentine road corridor improvements City of Pacific $4,946,000

Wenatchee waterfront revitalization project City of Wenatchee $10,000,000

Northeast Lacey public infrastructure and economic
stimulus package City of Lacey $9,912,000

Soap Lake spa and wellness center City of Soap Lake $1,000,000

Port of Ephrata transportation center Port of Ephrata $471,000

Project Pier 1 Port of Anacortes $5,610,000

Totem Lake mall and business center City of Kirkland $3,000,000

Burnham/Borgen interchange improvements City of Gig Harbor $5,000,000

Satsop development park turbine/administration
building improvements Grays Harbor public development
authority
$5,053,000

Technical and scientific service incubator City of Tacoma $250,000

Total $49,501,000

Appropriation:
Job Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,930,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Belfair Sewer Improvements (08-4-852)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (07-4-005)

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,727,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (07-4-008)

Appropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,127,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,508,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (07-4-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.135.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects Location Recommendation

YMCA of the inland northwest Spokane $800,000

Boys and girls clubs of south Puget Sound Lakewood $300,000

YMCA of Snohomish county Mukilteo $385,000

YMCA of Snohomish county Everett $800,000

Boys and girls club of south Puget Sound Gig Harbor $600,000

Toutle river ranch Longview $525,000

Boys and girls club of Bellevue Bellevue $800,000

YMCA of Tacoma-Pierce county Gig Harbor $800,000

Wenatchee valley YMCA Wenatchee $213,000

YMCA of greater Seattle Seattle $250,000

Maple Valley community center Maple Valley $100,000

Boys and girls clubs of King county Seattle $618,000

Filipino community of Seattle Seattle $146,000

Boys and girls clubs of King county Seattle $800,000

Ferndale boys and girls club Ferndale $531,000

Mukilteo boys and girls club Mukilteo $250,000

Total $7,918,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,918,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,918,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
High Risk Forests Program (08-2-853)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $3,000,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for grants to an independent nonprofit land stewardship
organization to purchase or lease development rights or conservation
easements from willing family forest landowners facing pressure to
convert their lands and who desire to keep their land as working
forest. The organization shall award grants only for transfer of
development rights programs approved by the local government
participants.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Infrastructure Assistance (08-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for an infrastructure grant to the city of Tieton for
water system improvements.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,627,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,627,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Innovation Partnership Zones (08-2-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Pursuant to chapter . . . (House Bill No.
1091/Senate Bill No. 5090), Laws of 2007 (innovation partnership
zones), the state will designate unique areas of the state as
innovation partnership zones, where globally competitive companies,
research institutions, and advanced training are creating special
competitive advantages for the state. From among the innovation
partnership zones, using a competitive process based on need, estimated
economic impact, geographic diversity, and local matches, five zones or
projects will be selected to receive funding authorized by chapter . .
. (House Bill No. 1091/Senate Bill No. 5090), Laws of 2007. The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for shared
telecommunications within the zone, shared infrastructure and
facilities, long-term capital purchases, and up to 10 percent for zone
administration through the locally-designated innovation partnership
zone administrator. If chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1091/Senate Bill
No. 5090), Laws of 2007 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the funds in
this section shall lapse.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local and Community Projects (08-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement shall
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) Funding for preconstruction activities for the Camas and
Washougal community and recreation center is contingent on voter
approval of a metropolitan park district.
(8) The port of Grays Harbor project is a loan that is subject to
the provisions of chapter 171, Laws of 2006.
(9) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Name Amount

800 MhZ interoperability public safety communication $1,300,000
Aberdeen union gospel mission $562,000
Asian counseling/referral services $2,000,000
Benton City food bank $200,000
Bethel community center $1,000,000
Bothell crossroads/state route 522 realignment-land
acquisitions and preconstruction activities $7,500,000
Bremerton downtown economic revitalization projects $5,000,000
Burbank water improvement $1,621,000
Cannon house $750,000
Chehalis middle school track improvement $350,000
Chehalis veterans wall of honor security enclosure $25,000
Chelan county public utility district monitor
domestic water system $1,000,000
Children's hospital $3,000,000
Cities of Camas and Washougal community/
recreation center preconstruction activities $500,000
City of Everett - senior center expansion and upgrade $500,000
City of Everett minor league baseball - aquasox $433,000
City of Kent event center $3,000,000
City of Mount Vernon downtown and waterfront flood
control $1,000,000
City of Puyallup riverwalk trail project $600,000
City of Tacoma minor league baseball - rainiers $2,500,000
City of Yakima minor league baseball $433,000
Confluence project $500,000
Coupeville covered play area $113,000
Covered bridge park land acquisition $85,000
Dawson place child advocacy center land acquisition
and renovation $850,000
Duwamish education center land $2,000,000
Eatonville family park $160,000
Evergreen school district health and biosciences academy $1,000,000
Friends of Hidden river preconstruction activities $675,000
Goodwill of Tacoma $1,500,000
Granite Falls museum $30,000
Hanford Reach national monument heritage and visitor
center preconstruction activities $3,000,000
Highline school district noise mitigation $3,500,000
Hill Ward building $550,000
Innovative services northwest $1,900,000
Institute for community leadership $700,000
Jewish federation of greater Seattle $900,000
Kirkland public safety campus land acquisition
and preconstruction activities $950,000
Life support and emergency medical services
infrastructure build-out $3,000,000
Lions club renovation $110,000
Long Lake nutrient reduction $300,000
McCaw hall $2,000,000
McDonald park $150,000
Mercer slough environmental center $500,000
Mill Creek senior center $250,000
Mirabeau Point children's universal park $800,000
Mobius $800,000
Monroe rotary field $700,000
Nisei veterans committee $382,000
NORCOM public safety communication geographic
information system and dispatch $750,000
Northwest African American museum $650,000
Northwest harvest land acquisition and renovation $3,000,000
Oak Harbor dredging preconstruction activities $59,000
Oak Harbor veterans memorial $50,000
Performing arts center eastside $1,000,000
Perry technical institute hanger $250,000
Pike Place market $1,070,000
Port of Grays Harbor alternative fuel project $2,500,000
Port of Walla Walla wine incubator $200,000
Poulsbo marine science center floating classroom $100,000
Rainier lifelong learning center $350,000
Richland Babe Ruth field complex $1,000,000
Seattle art museum $1,250,000
Seattle children's play garden $332,000
Seattle Chinese garden $500,000
Simon youth foundation resource center $150,000
Skagit recreation and event center $1,000,000
Snoqualmie railway history preconstruction activities $650,000
South Tacoma community center $700,000
Spokane county minor league baseball - indians $2,000,000
Springwood youth center $500,000
The northwest maritime center $1,000,000
The Tri Cities minor league baseball $666,000
Thurston county small business incubator $750,000
Vancouver national historic reserve $500,000
Vernetta Smith Chehalis timberland library $500,000
Waitsburg flood control feasibility report $29,000
Walla Walla county health center annex
preconstruction activities $100,000
White Salmon water improvement $1,500,000
Washington State University/Shoreline Community
College zero energy house $200,000
Yakima downtown futures initiative phase 3 $1,500,000
YMCA of Snohomish county Ebey Island project $2,500,000

Total $87,985,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,985,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,985,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Development Fund (08-4-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects listed in this section must comply with RCW
43.63A.125(2)(c).
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Name Amount

CASA Latina $1,000,000
Divine alternatives for dads services (DADS) center $10,000
El Centro de la Raza center $821,000
Hilltop renaissance community - centro Latino $1,950,000
Hilltop renaissance community - MLK development
association $4,800,000
HomeSight center $250,000
Ilwaco community building $2,700,000
Japanese cultural center of Washington $1,000,000
KCR Bremerton community services center $900,000
KDNA community center (Granger community center) $500,000
Korean women's association center $1,500,000
North helpline Lake City court $350,000
Salishan housing community $2,900,000
Sea Mar family housing community $2,000,000
Spokane east central community center $150,000
Spokane emmanuel center $470,000
Spokane northeast community center $1,000,000
Wapato Filipino American center $85,000

Total $22,386,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,386,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,386,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Washington State Horse Park (08-2-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section shall
complete the state's capital obligation for the facility.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Small and Rural Fire Districts Facility Assessment (08-2-854)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development,
in consultation with the Washington fire commissioners association, the
association of Washington fire chiefs, and the fiscal committees of the
legislature, shall conduct a study of small and rural fire districts
that have a limited fiscal capacity to finance fire district
facilities. The study shall include but not be limited to the
following:
(a) An assessment of small and rural fire districts' current and
projected need for capital facilities;
(b) An assessment of the fiscal capacity of the fire districts to
finance capital facilities; and
(c) The identification of potential sources of financial assistance
for small and rural fire district and the ability of the districts to
access such assistance.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall provide a report of the findings to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2007.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Land Acquisition Revolving Loans (08-2-856)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to
implement the acquisition revolving loan program created in chapter .
. . (Second Substitute House Bill No. 1401), Laws of 2007. If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the appropriation shall lapse.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Graving Dock Settlement (08-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
purposes of settling all identified and potential claims from the port
of Port Angeles and the city of Port Angeles related to the
construction of a graving dock facility on the graving dock property.
In conjunction with the settlement agreement in Lower Elwha Klallam
Tribe et al v. State et al, Thurston county superior court, cause no.
05-2-01595-8, the city of Port Angeles, port of Port Angeles, and the
state of Washington entered into an economic development agreement
which settles all claims related to graving dock property and
associated construction and releases the state from all claims related
to the construction of the graving dock facilities. The expenditure of
this appropriation is contingent on the conditions and limitation set
forth in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.
(2) $7,500,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the city of Port Angeles for
funding capital projects intended to enhance economic development.
(3) $7,500,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the port of Port Angeles for
funding capital projects intended to enhance economic development.
(4) $480,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the city of Port Angeles for
archaeological work as specified in the settlement agreement.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,480,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,480,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Snohomish, Island, and Skagit County Regional Higher Education
(08-2-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office of financial management is directed to assess
options and make recommendations on the siting of a higher education
institution in the Snohomish-Island-Skagit county region. The office
of financial management shall develop the operational and management
plans needed to establish the institution, including but not limited
to: A master business plan for design and implementation; governance;
site selection; and programs to be offered to address demographic
pressures and workforce needs. Planning and analysis shall be done in
coordination with the local community and existing higher education
institutions. The office of financial management shall evaluate sites
based on, but not limited to, the following criteria: Meeting the
objectives of the master business plan; meeting the unmet baccalaureate
needs in the region including high demand program needs; compliance
with provisions of the state's growth management act; and accessibility
from existing and planned transportation infrastructure.
(2) The office of financial management shall report its findings to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2007.
(3) The office of financial management may contract with outside
sources to carry out the provisions of this section.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Higher Education Cost Escalation (08-2-854)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the office of financial management to assist public
baccalaureate higher education institutions in managing unanticipated
cost escalation for projects bid during the 2007-2009 biennium. Not
more than $750,000 shall be made available to any single project and
amounts used must be matched equally from nonstate resources. The
office of financial management shall manage the distribution of funds
to ensure that the requesting college has managed its project within
the current appropriation through preparation of bid documents and that
the scope of the project is no greater than originally specified in the
design. The office of financial management shall report to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on the use of these
funds.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Oversight of State Facilities (08-2-855)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is this section is
provided solely for the office of financial management to strengthen
its oversight role in state facility analysis and decision making as
generally described in chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2366),
Laws of 2007.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,015,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,015,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Transportation Building Preservation (02-1-008)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,928,000
Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,252,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,605,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Public/Historic Facilities: Preservation Minor Works
(06-1-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $673,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Heritage Park Development (01-H-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,676,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,678,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services (06-2-012)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $874,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,724,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Highway-License Building Repair and Renewal (06-1-013)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $497,000
Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,598,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $354,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,639,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,088,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Natural Resources Building Repairs and Renewal (06-1-014)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $269,000
Appropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $258,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,223,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $233,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,266,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,249,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Statewide Infrastructure: Preservation Minor Works (06-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,824,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,101,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $918,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,019,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Statewide Office Facilities: Preservation Minor Works (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $812,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $510,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,322,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,558,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Statewide Parking Facilities: Preservation Minor Works (06-1-007)

Reappropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $183,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Campus High Voltage System Improvements (08-1-010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1063 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Deferred Maintenance (08-1-018)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1064 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
East Plaza Repairs: Phase 5 (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,756,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,167,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,923,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Emergency Repairs (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1066 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services (08-2-013)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,340,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,418,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,815,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,233,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1067 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Improvements (08-1-011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $25,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely to establish a legislative gift center created in chapter . . .
(Second Substitute House Bill No. 1896), Laws of 2007. If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the appropriation shall lapse.

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $701,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,251,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,836,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,087,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1068 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-015)

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,715,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,456,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,634,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,386,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,365,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,556,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1069 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,899,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,721,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,006,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,727,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1070 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Program (08-2-012)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall post signs on
eastbound and westbound 5th avenue in Olympia, Washington over Capitol
Lake dam to notify cyclists that the bike lanes discontinue.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,720,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,090,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1071 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
O'Brien Building Improvements (08-1-007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,981,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,501,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,482,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1072 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Tacoma Rhodes Center Improvements (08-1-009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for
improvements to the Tacoma Rhodes center, which must include the vacant
space in the first floor south in the Broadway portion of the Tacoma
Rhodes center. The department shall increase Tacoma Rhodes center
lease rates, including parking, to meet the cash gain/loss break even
point, and all nonstate leases must be increased at the time of lease
renewal. The department shall also use its statutory authority to
maximize state occupancy of the facility by directing agencies to move
into the Tacoma Rhodes center when leases of nonstate owned facilities
expire and when the Tacoma Rhodes center space can reasonably
accommodate those agencies.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1073 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Oversight of State Facilities (08-2-853)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is this section is
provided solely for the department of general administration to assist
the office of financial management with the development of six-year
facility plans as generally described in chapter . . . (Substitute
House Bill No. 2366), Laws of 2007.

Appropriation:
General Administration Services Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1074 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Campus Sundial Repair (08-1-853)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the redesign and replacement of the gnomon on the
capitol campus sundial. The department shall coordinate with the
Washington state arts commission to solicit design proposals from
Washington public community and technical colleges. Proposals must be
submitted to the Washington state arts commission by December 31, 2007.
Final selection shall be made by the Washington state arts commission
and construction must be complete by June 30, 2008.

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1075 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
SERVICES
Capitol Campus Data Center (08-3-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office of financial management shall
not allot funding for design until a completed predesign has been
submitted to the legislative fiscal committees and to the office of
financial management for review and approval.

Appropriation:
Data Processing Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1076 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Omnibus Support to Federal Preservation Projects (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,993,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,493,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1077 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Auditorium and Instructor Support Facility (06-2-003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,240,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1078 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Omnibus Support for Federal Minor Works Projects-Statewide
(06-2-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $846,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,046,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,154,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1079 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Modular Building Reutilization (08-2-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1080 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Energy Conservation Project (08-2-005)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1081 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,522,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,801,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,323,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,867,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1082 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works - Program (08-2-003)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,938,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,665,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,603,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,215,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,818,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1083 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Historical Preservation (06-4-009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1084 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Historical Courthouse Rehabilitation (08-2-851)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
courthouse protection and preservation, including character defining
architectural features, general repairs, system upgrades, payments for
renovations completed since January 1, 2006, and improvements to access
and accommodations for persons with disabilities. By July 1, 2007, the
department shall revise the existing eligibility criteria and grant
application process to include review of projects selected for funding
by the courthouse advisory committee. Those projects chosen for
funding shall undergo a review by the department of general
administration's barrier free program to ensure that they meet
Americans with disabilities act standards and accessibility and all
other Americans with disabilities act requirements are maintained
during the construction. The existing historic courthouse advisory
committee shall continue to review grant applications and make funding
recommendations to the state historic preservation officer. All
rehabilitation work shall comply with the secretary of interior's
standards for rehabilitation. Grants shall not be used for
expenditures for courthouse maintenance. Only counties with historic
courthouses that continue to maintain county functions are eligible for
grants. Counties receiving grants shall provide an equal amount of
matching funds from public or private sources. The department shall
use up to two percent of the appropriation for program administration.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1085 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Historic Barn Preservation (08-4-851)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
implementation of the historic barn preservation program created in
chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2115), Laws of 2007. If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the appropriation shall lapse.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1086 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Convention and Trade Center Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,990,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,990,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1087 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE
CENTER
Omnibus Minor Works (2006-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Convention and Trade Center Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $995,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $995,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Mapping of K-8 Schools (08-4-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,236,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,236,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Minor Works - Preservation (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $598,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Replace Hawthorne Hall Dormitory (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,764,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,689,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center-Housing Units (00-1-041)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,292,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,992,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Developmental Disabilities: Omnibus Programmatic Projects
(06-2-465)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital-Westlake Building: Fire Alarm Upgrades
(06-1-370)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Fircrest School - Health and Safety Improvements (06-1-852)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Green Hill School: New IMU, Health Center, and Administration
(06-2-202)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Juvenile Rehabilitation: Omnibus Programmatic Projects (06-2-265)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Lakeland Village-Nine Cottages: Renovation, Phase 4, 5, and 6
(06-1-402)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,990,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,390,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health Division-CLIP Facilities: Preservation (06-4-353)

The appropriations in the section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall evaluate options for
maximizing federal fund contributions for capital needs of
privately-owned facilities that contract with the department for
children's long-term inpatient program services and report to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by September 1, 2007.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,381,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,401,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,701,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health Division-Eastern Washington: Evaluation and Treatment
(06-4-352)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health: Omnibus Programmatic Projects (06-2-365)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Facility Preservation (06-1-112)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements
(06-1-111)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-113)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Rainier School: Storm and Sanitary Sewer, Phase 3 (06-1-853)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $665,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $765,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Emergency and Unanticipated Repair Projects (06-1-101)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $630,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Hazards Abatement and Demolition (06-1-119)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Facilities Assessment and Cultural Resources Planning
(06-1-120)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Capital Project Management (08-1-110)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,555,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,870,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center: Housing Units Renovation (08-1-041)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,185,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Emergency Repairs (08-1-101)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $933,000
State Social and Health Services Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Hazards Abatement and Demolition (08-1-119)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-112)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (08-1-111)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-113)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Program Projects (08-2-365)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $730,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,730,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Special Commitment Center Medium Management Housing Addition
(08-2-505)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is for the evaluation of design
alternatives to meet programmatic needs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Upgrade Eastern State Hospital Communications Systems (08-1-306)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,280,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Utility Replacements at the Special Commitment Center (08-1-504)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital Laundry Upgrades (08-1-325)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $885,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $885,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building
(08-1-319)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of a new kitchen and commissary building at
western state hospital. The office of financial management shall not
allot design funding until a predesign has been submitted to the
legislative fiscal committees and to the office of financial management
for review and approval. The predesign must assess cook chill
alternatives showing staffing and other operating efficiencies such as
providing food for the special commitment center and other facilities
located in Pierce county.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,820,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,470,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Rainier School Waste Treatment Plant (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: Chiller Plant Upgrade (02-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $474,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,380,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,854,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: Roof Replacement (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $898,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $727,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,625,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $386,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,531,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,917,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Minor Works - Program (08-2-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,542,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,677,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory Addition (08-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,184,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,984,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,168,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning
Systems Upgrades (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,912,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,912,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Shoreline Campus Master Plan (08-2-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $255,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $255,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (06-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,588,000
Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,086,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,360,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $179,334,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Building 10 Assisted Living Upgrades (08-2-005)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,242,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $571,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,813,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-003)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $722,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,283,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,005,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works - Program (08-2-002)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $344,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $231,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
State Veterans Cemetery (08-2-004)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,886,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $939,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Emergency Repairs (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $596,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,680,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,276,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2049 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,377,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,402,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2050 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Retsil Energy Assessment and Audit (08-2-850)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $40,000 of the appropriation is for a department of
general administration assessment of the use of digester gas fuel
generated by a nearby wastewater treatment facility to heat the
veterans home in Retsil.
(2) Up to $60,000 of the appropriation is for a department of
general administration energy audit of the veterans home in Retsil.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2051 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Coyote Ridge Corrections Center: Design and Construct Medium
Security Facility (98-2-011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,459,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,449,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $244,608,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2052 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Regional Infrastructure (04-2-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,208,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,521,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,729,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2053 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: North Close Security Compound
(04-2-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,482,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,276,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,758,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Install Close Custody Slider Doors
(06-2-070)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $660,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,581,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,331,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2055 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Replace Support Building Roof
(06-1-044)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,930,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $822,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,752,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2056 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Cedar Creek Corrections Center: Add 100 Minimum Security Beds
(06-2-851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,022,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,229,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2057 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Larch Corrections Center: 80 Bed Expansion (06-2-852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,915,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,072,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2058 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Complex: Improve C and D Units Security Features
(06-1-046)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,618,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,898,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2059 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island Corrections Center: Replace/Stabilize Housing Unit
Siding (06-1-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $445,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $349,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,024,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,818,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2060 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Kitchen Improvements (06-1-007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $569,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2061 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Mission Creek: Add 120 Beds (06-2-017)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,861,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $564,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2062 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Preservation: Facility Preservation (Minor Works)
(06-1-035)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,268,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,565,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,833,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2063 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code (Minor Works)
(06-1-027)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,039,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,061,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2064 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (Minor Works)
(06-1-025)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,183,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $643,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,826,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2065 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Program: Programmatic Projects (Minor Works) (06-2-033)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,554,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $361,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2066 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: Health Care Facility (06-2-043)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,027,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,727,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2067 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Health Care Facility (06-2-072)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,039,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,592,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,792,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2068 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Stafford Creek Corrections Center: Correct Security Deficiencies
(06-1-013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $593,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,593,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2069 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide: Add Minimum Security Beds (06-2-950)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,361,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,082,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,443,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2070 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women Healthcare Center
(06-2-066)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $758,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,858,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $442,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,058,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2071 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Replace Steamlines
(06-1-018)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $641,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,179,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $375,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,195,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2072 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Correctional Industry Roof
(06-1-023)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,619,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,338,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,957,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $494,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,451,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2073 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: South Close Security Complex
(06-2-021)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,983,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,294,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,017,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,193,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,487,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2074 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
100 Bed Expansion at Mission Creek Corrections Center for Women
(08-2-020)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,627,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,627,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2075 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Airway Heights Heating and Cooling Loop Replacement (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2076 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Close Sewer Lagoon at Monroe Correctional Complex (08-2-022)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $229,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,736,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,965,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2077 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Emergency Repairs (08-1-035)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2078 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Expand Reception Center at Washington Corrections Center (08-2-016)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,353,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,823,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2079 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Add 300 Minimum Security Beds
(08-2-026)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,418,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,344,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,762,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2080 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island: 300 Minimum Security Bed Expansion (08-2-032)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $397,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,871,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,268,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2081 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Laundry Improvements at Washington State Penitentiary (08-1-033)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,051,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,051,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2082 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-024)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2083 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (08-1-031)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2084 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-018)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2085 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Barge Slip Pilings at McNeil Island Corrections Center
(08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2086 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Cell Door and Electronics at Washington State Reformatory
(08-1-010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,545,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2087 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Electrical Distribution Building at Special Offenders Unit
(08-1-009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,222,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,222,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2088 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Fire Alarm System at Washington Corrections Center
(08-1-008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,524,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,524,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2089 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace G Building Roof at Washington Corrections Center (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,431,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,431,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2090 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Kitchen Roofs at Monroe Correctional Complex (08-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,062,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,062,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2091 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Roofs at Washington Corrections Center (08-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,666,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,666,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2092 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Roofs at Washington State Penitentiary (08-1-007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,789,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,789,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2093 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Telecommunications Infrastructure at Clallam Bay (08-1-013)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,691,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,541,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2094 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Sex Offender Treatment Program Building at Airway Heights
(08-2-028)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,947,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,947,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2095 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
Employment Resource Center (05-2-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for services and activities including the purchase and
installation of state of the art equipment for a 40,000 square foot
facility supporting work force development programs using funds
available to the state in section 903(d) of the Social Security Act
(Reed act).

Reappropriation:
Unemployment Compensation Administration
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,354,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,646,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2096 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
Employment Security Headquarters Building Assessment (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
Unemployment Compensation Administration
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2097 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
Walla Walla WorkSource Expansion Project (06-2-001)

Reappropriation:
Unemployment Compensation Administration
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Appropriation:
Unemployment Compensation Administration
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $578,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $828,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (74-2-006)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,756,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,543,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,299,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (86-2-007)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $678,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $351,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,029,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (88-2-008)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,191,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,591,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (90-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,306,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,706,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (97-2-012)

Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,045,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,845,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (01-H-010)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,318,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $310,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,628,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,449,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Measuring Devices (01-H-009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
water measuring devices and gauges. The department shall prioritize
the distribution of water measuring devices and gauges to locations
participating in the department of fish and wildlife's fish screens and
cooperative compliance programs.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,201,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,943,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (02-4-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
conditions and limitations of section 315, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,974,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,599,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (02-4-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,079,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,134,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,213,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (02-4-006)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,889,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (04-4-007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,650,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,702,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,752,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (04-4-008)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,296,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,396,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Site Closure - Nuclear Waste Trench Site Investigation (04-4-010)

Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,120,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,146,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,266,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (04-2-951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely to
recover the department of ecology's cost in evaluating and issuing
decisions on water applications and restoration of the Twin Lakes in
the Methow Valley.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $643,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $749,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (04-4-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,200,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,228,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,428,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Rights Purchase/Lease (04-1-005)

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $804,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $696,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (04-4-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,389,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,438,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,827,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,799,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,626,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (05-2-852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,047,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $153,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
State Drought Preparedness (05-4-009)

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,464,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,865,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,329,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (05-2-851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,187,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,544,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,133,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,132,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,996,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Conveyance Infrastructure Projects (05-2-850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,168,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,415,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,876,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $954,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,830,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (06-4-007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,900,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,024,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,424,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Cleanup Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (06-4-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the clean
up of contaminated sites that lie adjacent to and are within one-half
mile of Puget Sound. Clean ups must include orphaned and abandoned
sites that pose a threat to Puget Sound with the highest priority sites
being cleaned up first.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,233,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,983,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (06-2-950)

Reappropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Appropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Program (06-2-010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,542,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,458,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (06-4-008)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,430,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low Impact Development for Storm Water Management (06-2-006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
grants to local governments in Puget Sound to fund innovative, low-impact development storm water management projects to meet critical
storm water management needs and protect or restore water quality.
Projects may include use of bioretention, rainwater harvest, permeable
pavement, vegetated roofs, and other low-impact development techniques.
Projects funded in Puget Sound must meet the design guidelines
contained in the low-impact development technical guidance manual for
Puget Sound, unless the municipality can demonstrate that site
conditions warrant a deviation from the design guidelines and the
deviations in design provides similar performance. All projects must
include performance monitoring.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Minor Works (06-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Motor Vehicle Mercury Removal Program (06-2-850)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Puget Sound Aquatic Cleanup and Restoration (06-1-005)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,129,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,871,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soil Remediation and Awareness Projects (06-2-001)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,059,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,909,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,968,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Waste Tire Piles (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
Waste Tire Removal Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (06-2-009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,435,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (06-4-002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall give priority loan funding consideration
to on-site septic system rehabilitation and replacement programs in
Mason, Kitsap, and Jefferson counties for up to $1,000,000 from the
water pollution control revolving account--state in the second year of
the funding cycle.
(2) Up to $5,000,000 of the water pollution control revolving
account--state reappropriation is for loans for on-site sewage
replacement. This reappropriation may be used to: (a) Establish new
or expand existing on-site sewage repair and replacement loan programs
by county governments or tribes; or (b) develop a pilot program to
administer an on-site sewage repair and replacement loan program
through a qualified private or nonprofit lending institution. This
appropriation must be used in conjunction with water quality capital
account--state appropriation in section 3022 of this act provided for
this purpose. The department must work with the department of health,
the Puget Sound water quality action team, local governments, and the
lending industry in developing and piloting this program. The
department shall provide a status report on the loan program to the
governor and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by June 30,
2008, including any recommendations for improving the program.

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $124,000,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $189,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,617,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,617,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (06-2-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,849,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $386,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,235,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,563,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,798,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (08-4-010)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $10,000,000 of the state building construction account--state appropriation is for the extended grant payment to Spokane for
the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.
(2) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for water quality grants for hardship
communities with a population of less than 5,000. The department shall
give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a
regulatory order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with
water quality rules; (b) projects for which design work has been
completed; and (c) projects with a local match from reasonable water
quality rates and charges.
(3) $1,500,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Adams and Lincoln counties
ground water mapping.
(4) $2,100,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely for wastewater and clean water improvement projects at
Illahee state park, Fort Flagler state park, and Larrabee state park.
(5)(a) $10,505,000 of the state building construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for the following projects:

Project Amount
City of Carnation waste water treatment system $3,000,000
Mansfield waste water treatment upgrade $960,000
Rock Island waste water treatment system $870,000
Enumclaw waste water treatment system $750,000
Snohomish waste water treatment system $4,925,000

(b) The appropriation for entities that are listed in (a) of this
subsection shall not affect the entities' eligibility for centennial
fund hardship assistance and shall be excluded from any financial
hardship calculation that would have the effect of reducing other
moneys for which the entity is currently contracted and eligible under
WAC 173-95A-030(8), as it existed on the effective date of this
section.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,955,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,550,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,605,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $235,005,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Cleanup Toxic Sites in Puget Sound (08-4-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the clean
up of contaminated sites that lie adjacent to and are within one-half
mile of Puget Sound. Clean ups shall include orphan and abandoned
sites that pose a threat to Puget Sound with the highest priority sites
being cleaned up first. The department shall report on the use of
these funds to the Puget Sound partnership as part of its activities
under the 2007-2009 Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan.

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,820,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coordinated Prevention Grants (08-4-015)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to local governments for local waste and pollution prevention projects.
Grants shall fund new organics composting and conversion, green
building, and moderate risk waste initiatives described in the state
"beyond waste" plan.
(2) Up to $2,000,000 of the appropriation may be used for grants to
local governments to provide alternatives to backyard burning of
organic materials. Priority for these grants shall be given to: (a)
Urban growth areas of less than 5,000 people affected by the January 1,
2007, ban on outdoor burning; (b) projects that develop infrastructure
for an on-going program; and (c) projects that coordinate regionally.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $139,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
On-Site Septic Replacement Program (08-4-012)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $3,000,000 of the water quality
capital account--state appropriation is for a contract with a nonprofit
organization that is familiar with on-site sewage repair and
replacement in Hood Canal to coordinate improvements to sewage systems.
As part of a pilot project, the nonprofit organization may provide
funds to a qualified private or nonprofit lending institution to
provide financial assistance to local governments and private
landowners for the repair, replacement, or upgrade of on-site sewage
systems.

Appropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Puget Sound Aquatic Cleanup and Restoration (08-4-004)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,620,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,620,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Puget Sound Storm Water Projects (08-2-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
grants to local governments within Puget Sound for municipal storm
water projects that would prevent the contamination or recontamination
of hazardous waste cleanup sites, including but not limited to,
retrofit of existing storm water projects in urban areas where storm
water is a significant source of contamination, identification and
removal of nonstorm water discharges into municipal storm sewer
systems, and local innovative storm water projects that implement
low-impact development.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,170,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,680,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Projects (08-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Rebuild East Wall of Ecology Headquarters (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reclaimed Water (08-4-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for grants to local governments in Puget Sound to
complete reclaimed water projects. Priority shall be given to projects
in water short areas where reclaimed water can be used to replace other
water sources and where reclaimed water can be used to restore
important ecosystem functions in Puget Sound.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,320,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reduce Health Risks from Toxic Diesel Pollution (08-4-024)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,840,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for school
bus diesel retrofits for local school districts.
(2) $2,330,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for emission
reduction projects for local governments to retrofit public sector
diesel engines to allow public sector fleets to reduce their emissions.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grants (08-4-008)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $264,475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Repair Exterior Surfaces and Expand Emergency Power Supply
(08-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Grants (08-4-009)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reduce Public Health Risks from Wood Stove Pollution (08-4-019)

Appropriation:
Wood Stove Education Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Skykomish Cleanup (08-4-020)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Waste Tire Pile Cleanup (08-4-022)

Appropriation:
Waste Tire Removal Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (08-4-028)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Loan Program (08-4-011)

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $640,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (08-4-029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
grants for projects that improve water supplies and help achieve
instream flows by implementing watershed plans, as follows:
(1) Surface or ground water storage projects, where such projects
are consistent with the recommendations of the water storage task
force. The department shall consult the departments of agriculture and
fish and wildlife before issuing water storage grants.
(2) Infrastructure or water management projects that resolve
conflicts among water needs for municipal, agricultural, rural, and
fish restoration purposes. The stream flow improvements and other
public benefits secured from these projects must be commensurate with
the investment of state funds.
(3) Agricultural water supply projects that improve water
conservation and water use efficiency.
(4) Purchase and installation of water measuring devices in salmon
critical basins and areas participating in the department of fish and
wildlife fish screening and cooperative compliance program, and basins
where watershed plans call for additional water use measurement.
(5) Acquisition of water to achieve instream flows or to establish
water banks. The department shall give priority to acquisitions in
salmon critical basins. The department shall place acquired water into
the state's trust water rights program (chapters 90.38 and 90.42 RCW).

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Yakima River Basin Water Storage Feasibility Study (08-4-026)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
completion of the United States bureau of reclamation's Yakima Basin
storage feasibility study, including the associated joint national
environmental policy act, the state environmental policy act, and
environmental impact statement. The appropriated funds shall be used
by the bureau of reclamation and the department of ecology to evaluate
potential in-basin storage facilities such as the proposed Black Rock
and Wymer reservoirs and other reasonable alternatives that will
enhance water supply in the Yakima Basin.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Spokane Centennial Trail - Unanticipated Receipt (03-2-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cowan Barn and House (06-2-851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $301,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deception Pass - Renewed Traditions (06-2-013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $870,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility Preservation - Facilities (06-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,419,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fort Worden - Facilities (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $432,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $838,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Historic Stewardship - Stewardship (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,485,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Ice Age Floods - Cherished Resources (06-2-014)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Natural Resources - Stewardship (06-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $689,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Park Development (06-1-950)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $415,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $715,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Revenue Creation - Financial Strategy (06-2-010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Rocky Reach - Chelan County Public Utility District (06-1-023)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided to construct and surface the northern mile of Rocky Reach
trail, and partially fund installation of signs, interpretive panels,
and bridges related to the 5.1 mile project.

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--
Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Southeast Washington Parks (06-2-852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Statewide Boat Pumpout - Federal Clean Vessel Act (06-4-018)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $696,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $736,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Trails (06-2-017)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $441,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $649,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Hood Canal Wastewater (06-1-850)

Reappropriation:
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $702,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,802,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Puget Sound Wastewater (06-1-851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,095,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,195,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Sustainable Development and Restoration (06-1-011)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $412,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $492,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cama Beach - New Destinations (06-2-011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,015,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $305,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Bay View Park Wide Wastewater Treatment System (08-2-041)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,187,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,187,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Beacon Rock-Pierce Trust Grant (08-4-034)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--
Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Belfair Major Park Upgrade (08-1-018)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cape Disappointment Major Park Upgrade (08-1-012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,219,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,719,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Clean Vessel Boating Pumpout Grants (08-4-035)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deferred Maintenance (08-1-025)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall develop a plan of
action, agreed upon between the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by September 1, 2007.
Up to $200,000 of the appropriation may be used for systems necessary
to implement the plan. The plan shall address the conclusions and key
findings in the 2006 study of the department's capital development,
execution, and monitoring process, including but not limited to:
(1) The capital budget submittal and approval process;
(2) Emergent needs and unforeseen cost overruns;
(3) Adherence to project budgets and schedules;
(4) Project completion rate;
(5) Agency expenditure of capital budget appropriations;
(6) Permitting delays;
(7) The number of projects with complete close-out;
(8) Project funding sources by project, phase, and/or activity;
(9) Movement of project funding sources from original
appropriation;
(10) Satisfaction levels of operations staff and end users; and
(11) Instances of noncompliance with environmental regulations.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Eastern Region Visible Park Improvements (08-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,587,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,787,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Emergency Repairs (08-1-024)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Federal Grant Authority (08-4-032)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Historic Preservation (08-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
design, permits, and drawings for the seminary building at St. Edward
State Park.
(2) $500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
improvements to prevent further degradation of the seminary building.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,101,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Ice Age Flood (08-2-037)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Local Grant Authority (08-4-033)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Northwest Region Visible Park Improvements (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,301,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,801,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Parkland Acquisition (08-2-031)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state parks and recreation commission
shall provide lists of potential purchases and sales to the office of
financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature prior to committing the state parks and recreation
commission to any sale or purchase of land or buildings and prior to
any allotments made for those purchases. The list shall include any
potential operating or capital cost impacts known to the state parks
and recreation commission.

Appropriation:
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Pearrygin Lake Major Park Upgrade (08-2-016)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,367,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,633,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Puget Sound Region Visible Park Improvements (08-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,568,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,968,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Road Preservation (08-1-036)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Southwest Region Visible Park Improvements (08-1-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Storm Water Improvements (08-1-027)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $571,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,571,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Trail Development (08-1-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $500,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely to construct the ecological trail from Baker Bay to the Pacific
ocean at Cape Disappointment state park, as identified in the
commission's master capital plan.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Statewide Boat Pumpout (04-4-014)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $497,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $497,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cama Beach Donation (06-2-853)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,716,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,716,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR
OUTDOOR RECREATION
Boating Facilities Projects (98-2-001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,369,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,187,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,556,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (98-2-004)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $549,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $574,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Program (NOVA) (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $249,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,847,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,096,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (98-2-003)

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,767,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,252,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,019,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,582,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (00-2-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $166,000
Salmon Recovery Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,175,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,341,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,284,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,625,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (02-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $766,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,167,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Infrastructure Grant (02-4-010)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $529,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,471,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (02-0-001)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $357,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hatchery Management Program (02-4-009)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,482,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,719,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,201,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation Fund (02-4-005)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Program (NOVA) (02-4-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation for the nonhighway and off road vehicle
program under RCW 46.09.170(2)(d)(i) is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A portion of the reappropriation may be
used for grants to projects to research, develop, publish, and
distribute informational guides and maps of nonhighway and off road
vehicle trails and associated facilities meeting the requirements,
guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with
disabilities act.
(2) The reappropriation for the nonhighway and off road vehicle
program under RCW 46.09.170(2)(d)(ii) is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The portion of the reappropriation that
applies to grants for capital facilities may be used for grants to
projects that meet the requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of
the federal Americans with disabilities act and do not compromise or
impair sensitive natural resources. The portion of the reappropriation
that applies to grants for management, maintenance, and operation of
existing off road vehicle recreation facilities may be used to bring
the facilities into compliance with the requirements, guidelines,
spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with disabilities act.
(3) The reappropriation for the nonhighway and off road vehicle
program under RCW 46.09.170(2)(d)(iii) is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funds may be expended for nonhighway road
recreation facilities which may include recreational trails that are
accessed by nonhighway roads and are intended solely for nonmotorized
recreational uses.

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,459,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,528,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (02-4-007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,470,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,786,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,256,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,737,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,993,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (02-4-003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriations that is
not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund projects in the
following order: (1) The department of natural resources Cypress
Island project; and (2) alternate projects approved by the legislature
from the same account in biennia succeeding that in which the funds
were originally appropriated.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $299,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,164,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,463,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,537,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Aquatic Lands Enhancement (04-4-018)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,395,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,962,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,357,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (04-4-003)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,501,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,006,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,507,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Infrastructure Grant (04-4-009)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Family Forest Fish Blockages Program (04-4-011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,812,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (04-4-006)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $169,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hatchery Management Program (04-4-010)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,002,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,997,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation Fund (04-4-007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,133,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,602,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,735,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreation Trails Program (04-4-008)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $226,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,034,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,260,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (NOVA)
(04-4-004)

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,665,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,262,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,927,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Fund Board Programs (04-4-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,132,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,682,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,814,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,561,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (04-4-002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriations that is
not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund alternate
projects approved by the legislature from the same account in biennia
succeeding that in which the moneys were originally appropriated.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,394,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,267,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,661,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,339,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Program (06-4-850)

Reappropriation:
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $996,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (06-4-018)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,010,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,015,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (06-4-003)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,340,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,931,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,271,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Infrastructure Grant (06-4-009)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (06-4-011)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for the salmon recovery
funding board in consultation with the small forest landowner office of
the department of natural resources and the department of fish and
wildlife to provide grants to correct fish passage blockages on
nonindustrial forest lands. Selection of projects must be coordinated
with the other salmon recovery grant programs provided in section 3131
of this act.
(2) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the committee shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,502,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,537,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,830,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,367,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearm and Archery Range Program (06-4-006)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $109,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Improve Hatchery Management (06-4-010)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation Fund (06-4-007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreation Trails Program (06-4-008)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $970,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Program (NOVA) (06-4-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $100,000 of the reappropriation is
for the following studies:
(1) The committee shall prepare cost estimates for creating a
database of motorized and nonmotorized off-road trails and facilities
in Washington state. The cost estimate shall consider the possibility
of a database that allows the downloading of maps formatted for the
most widely used GPS devices, including the feasibility and cost to
make GPS maps readily available for all users of Washington
recreational lands and facilities. For this purpose, available GPS
maps shall include GPS maps developed by state agencies, by federal
agencies, and proprietary maps offered by private companies.
(2) The committee shall recommend a program for enhanced education
and enforcement regarding excessive noise from off-road vehicles. The
study shall include a review of relevant existing laws and regulations.
The recommendations shall address the appropriate equipment needed for
enforcement, model ordinances, enhanced educational strategies, and a
proposed grant program to assist local governments to more effectively
reduce the impact of excessive ORV noise in rural residential
neighborhoods and nonresidential areas, including consideration of
grant programs for planning departments, code enforcement departments,
health departments, or other entities of local government.

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,157,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,579,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Fund Board Programs (06-4-001)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are provided solely
for grants for salmon recovery efforts. These grants may include a
grant to any regional recovery board and/or may include grants for
additional restoration projects, monitoring activities, or other salmon
recovery actions.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,739,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,412,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,151,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,849,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (06-4-002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided for the approved list of
projects in LEAP capital document No. 2005-14 as developed on April 9,
2005.
(2) Funds reappropriated for distribution according to RCW
79A.15.050 shall fulfill the uses and restrictions of each category
whether the funds are distributed according to the statutory allotment,
the unallocated distribution, or a reassignment of reappropriations.
If the cumulative total for acquisition projects is less than the
statutory requirement, the difference may be allocated to the remaining
development projects.
(3) Funds reappropriated for distribution according to the
provisions of RCW 79A.15.040(1)(c) shall be allocated forty percent to
local government projects and sixty percent to state agency projects.
If the cumulative total of local government projects is less than forty
percent of the total distribution to this category, the difference may
be allocated to state agency projects.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,363,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,062,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,575,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Youth Athletic Fields (06-2-952)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (08-4-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2007-1, developed March
17, 2007.
(2) The committee shall submit a list of recommended projects to be
funded from the aquatic lands enhancement account in the 2009-2011
capital budget to the office of financial management and the
appropriate legislative committees. The list shall result from a
competitive grants program developed by the committee based upon, at a
minimum: (a) Uniform criteria for selecting projects and awarding
grants for up to fifty percent of the total projects cost; (b) local
community support for the projects; and (c) environmental benefits to
be derived from projects.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,100,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (08-4-001)

Appropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,021,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,688,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,709,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Improvement Grants (08-4-002)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3137 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Family Forest and Fish Passage Program (08-2-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
salmon recovery funding board in consultation with the small forest
landowner office of the department of natural resources and the
department of fish and wildlife to provide grants to correct fish
passage blockages on nonindustrial forest lands. Selection of projects
must be coordinated with the other salmon recovery grant programs
provided in section 3139 of this act.
(2) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the committee shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3138 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (08-4-003)

Appropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $472,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,007,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,479,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3139 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (SRFB) (08-4-851)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for
grants for salmon recovery efforts. These grants may include grants to
any regional recovery board and/or may include grants for additional
restoration projects, monitoring activities, or other salmon recovery
actions.
(2) The administrative funding currently provided by the salmon
recovery funding board for the regional salmon recovery organization in
Puget Sound shall be redirected to the Puget Sound partnership created
in chapter . . . ([House][Senate] Bill No. ....), Laws of 2007 (Z-0369,
Puget Sound partnership).
(3) Prior to awarding project grants for projects in Puget Sound,
the salmon recovery funding board shall submit the list of proposed
projects to the Puget Sound partnership for their review. The Puget
Sound partnership shall provide their comments back to the salmon
recovery funding board within forty-five days of receiving the proposed
list of projects.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3140 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hatchery Reform Program (08-4-006)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3141 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation (08-4-007)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3142 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreational Trails Program (08-4-009)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3143 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (08-4-008)

Appropriation:
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,036,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,945,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,981,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3144 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Puget Sound Restoration and Acquisition (08-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Prior to awarding project grants, the salmon recovery funding
board shall submit the list of proposed projects to the Puget Sound
partnership for its review. The Puget Sound partnership shall provide
comments to the salmon recovery funding board within forty-five days of
receiving the proposed list of projects.
(2) All estuary projects shall be submitted for review and
coordination with the executive committee of the Puget Sound nearshore
partnership between the department of fish and wildlife and the United
States army corps of engineers.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $205,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3145 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (08-4-011)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations are provided solely for the approved list of
projects in LEAP capital document No. 2007-3 as developed on March 17,
2007.
(2) If additional funds are available after funding the farmlands
preservation account projects approved in subsection (1) of this
section, the commission may:
(a) Provide one-time grants of up to $25,000 each to counties
requesting assistance in developing farmlands preservation strategies
for the purpose of seeking grants from the farmlands preservation
account in future grant cycles.
(b) Conduct a second grant cycle in the 2007-2009 biennium for
farmlands preservation projects. A ranked list of farmlands
preservation projects may be submitted to the governor by November 1,
2007, for approval in the 2008 supplemental capital budget. The
governor may remove projects from the list recommended by the committee
and shall submit this amended list in the supplemental capital budget
request to the legislature.
(3) $627,299 of the appropriation from the habitat conservation
account is provided solely for the Chehalis river surge plain natural
area preserve. This amount shall not be expended for the project until
the department of natural resources has completed a management plan for
the preserve and that management plan is presented to the house of
representatives capital budget and senate ways and means committees.

Appropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000,000
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3146 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (06-4-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The total cumulative dollar value of state
conservation reserve enhancement program grant obligations incurred by
the conservation commission and conservation districts shall not exceed
$20,000,000, as provided in the conservation reserve enhancement
program agreement between the United States department of agriculture,
commodity credit corporation, and the state of Washington executed on
October 19, 1998, and subsequent amendments.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,936,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3147 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Water Quality - Landowner Cost Share (06-4-006)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,490,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3148 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Puget Sound District Grants (06-4-003)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,605,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,705,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3149 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Water Quality Grants Program (06-4-007)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3150 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Skokomish Anaerobic Digester (06-4-009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3151 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Land Restoration (07-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $587,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $587,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3152 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program Cost Share (08-4-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3153 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program Water Quality (08-4-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $709,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $709,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3154 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Practice Incentive Payment Loan Program (08-4-004)

Appropriation:
Conservation Assistance Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3155 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Deschutes Watershed Center (06-2-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the design of the Deschutes Watershed center.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $582,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $268,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3156 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Department of Natural Resources Land Exchange - Shrub Steppe
(06-2-851)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely to appraise the
value of lands for exchange with the department of natural resources.
Forest lands transferred to the department of natural resources under
this section shall be actively managed by the department under a
cooperative agreement with surrounding public and private landowners to
implement landscape scale restoration and other management objectives.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $235,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3157 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Facility, Infrastructure, Lands, and Access Condition Improvements
(06-1-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $5,000 of the reappropriation in
this section is for bank stabilization of the south Toledo access road.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $883,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,574,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,457,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3158 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Opportunity Improvements (06-2-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $174,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3159 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Hatchery Reform, Retrofits, and Condition Improvements (06-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,321,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,271,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3160 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Population and Habitat Protection (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $580,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3161 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Sinlahekin Creek Dams - Flood Damage Repair (07-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3162 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Region 1 Office - Complete Phase 1 (07-2-009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $588,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $588,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3163 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
2006 Flood Damage (08-1-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3164 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (08-2-017)

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3165 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Chambers Creek Adult Trap - Phase 2 (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,202,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,202,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3166 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Dole Bee Be Property (06-1-950)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $754,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3167 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Emergency Projects (08-1-019)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3168 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Methow Culverts Replacement (08-1-027)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $754,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $994,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,748,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3169 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall develop a plan of
action, agreed upon between the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by September 1, 2007.
Up to $200,000 of the appropriation may be used for systems necessary
to implement the plan. The plan shall address the conclusions and key
findings in the 2006 study of the department's capital development,
execution, and monitoring process, including but not limited to:
(1) The commitment and role of senior management to improve and
change the department's capital budget practices;
(2) The clarification of the commission's role and responsibility
for the capital budget process;
(3) The development of capital program performance measures;
(4) The alignment of the capital budget process with the
department's strategic plan and priorities;
(5) The implementation of a project scoping process;
(6) The prioritization of capital projects, including both
maintenance and other capital activities;
(7) The review of business lines; and
(8) The review of construction project delivery and organization.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,525,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3170 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Health Safety and Code Requirements (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3171 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-014)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3172 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (08-2-048)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $2,300,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for capital projects and engineering to pay the total
cost of labor and materials provided by the department of fish and
wildlife.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,800,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $625,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3173 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Puget Sound Initiative - Nearshore Salmon Restoration (06-2-001)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for
efforts to restore nearshore habitat and estuaries in Puget Sound. The
department shall focus on restoring the natural marine shoreline
process, including protection and restoration of beach sediments and
removal of existing bulkheads.
(2) $4,964,375 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
following projects:

Project Amount
Carpenter Creek estuary phase 1 (South Kingston road) $637,000
Duwamish Garden estuary restoration $1,400,000
Seahurst Park bulkhead phase II $1,442,000
Lower Dosewallips floodplain $609,875
Victor Beach/stream restoration $68,000
Moorland's estuary $552,500
East Oro Bay estuary restoration $255,000

(3) The remaining appropriations are provided for a prioritized
list of recommended projects submitted by the department to the
legislature after the department submits the list of proposed projects
to the Puget Sound partnership, created by chapter ... (House Bill No.
1374/Senate Bill No. 5372), Laws of 2007, for their review. The Puget
Sound partnership shall provide their comments back to the department
within forty-five days of receiving the proposed list of projects. The
department shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate
funds for projects, other than those identified in subsection (2) of
this section, before the legislature has appropriated funds for a
specific list of projects. The legislature may remove projects from
the list.
(4) Funded projects, other than those identified in (2) of this
section, require a nonstate match or in-kind contributions.
(5) Eligible projects must be within Puget Sound and identified by
a salmon recovery lead entity or marine resource committee and
identified in a current salmon recovery, watershed, or nearshore
habitat restoration and protection plan.
(6) Project evaluation criteria shall be developed by the Puget
Sound nearshore partnership steering committee. The criteria shall be
consistent with the technical guidance developed by the Puget Sound
nearshore science team and shall be coordinated with the salmon
recovery funding board to ensure that project funding and matching
requirements are maximized to the greatest extent possible.
(7) The department shall not utilize any amount of this
appropriation to support administration or overhead. Funding to
support the administration of the funds and the implementation of
selected projects shall be obtained from the department's operating
budget.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3174 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Ranch Lands Irrigation Efficiencies (06-2-952)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
irrigation efficiency projects on ranch lands owned by the department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3175 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Skookumchuck Hatchery Renovation - Phase 2 (08-2-015)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $528,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,389,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,917,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3176 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Spokane Region One Office - Phase 2 (08-2-008)

As of the effective date of this section, the department of fish
and wildlife's Spokane region one building shall be known as the "Fred
Shiosaki" building.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3177 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Statewide Fencing Renovation and Replacement (08-1-009)

The appropriation is this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,000,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for the replacement of elk fencing lost in the 2005
school fire in the Wooten wildlife area. The department shall contract
with another state agency to construct the fence.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3178 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Sustainability and Energy Savings (06-1-009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $118,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $382,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3179 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Tokul Creek Hatchery (08-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $435,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,857,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,292,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3180 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Voights Creek Hatchery - Phase 1 (08-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $505,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,402,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,907,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3181 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Issaquah Hatchery Gravity Intake (08-1-850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $562,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $562,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3182 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Community and Technical College Trust Land Acquisitions (08-2-004)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Forest Reserve
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3183 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Creosote Removal in Puget Sound (08-2-017)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3184 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Legacy (04-2-015)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,186,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,520,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,206,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3185 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Storm Damage (07-1-850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $282,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $282,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3186 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Riparian Easement Program (08-2-022)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3187 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Acquisition Grants (05-2-021)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,247,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,271,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,363,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $185,881,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3188 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Bank (08-2-011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department to acquire forest lands.

Appropriation:
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3189 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station Public Access (04-2-019)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $236,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,145,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,453,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3190 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works - Preservation (08-1-007)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $430,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $607,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,154,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,604,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3191 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works - Programmatic (08-2-016)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $534,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $556,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,515,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,690,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3192 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (08-1-014)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $942,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,958,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3193 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement (08-2-010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department to acquire forest lands.

Appropriation:
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3194 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Recreation Capital Renovations (08-2-006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $200,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely for trail system signage.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,065,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,278,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,343,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3195 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Right-of-Way Acquisition (08-2-020)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3196 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Riparian Open Space Program (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3197 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Road Maintenance and Abandonment Projects (06-2-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,987,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3198 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
State Lands Maintenance (08-1-019)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,350,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3199 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Statewide Aquatic Restoration Projects (06-2-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3200 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Trust Land Transfer (08-2-005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The total appropriation is provided to the department solely to
transfer from trust status, or enter into ninety-nine year leases for,
certain trust lands of statewide significance deemed appropriate for
state park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural
resources conservation area, open space, or recreation purposes. The
approved list of projects is identified in the LEAP capital document
2007-4, developed March 20, 2007.
(2) Property transferred under this section shall be appraised and
transferred at fair market value. The value of the timber transferred
shall be deposited by the department to the common school construction
account in the same manner as timber revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the resource management
cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The value of the land transferred
shall be deposited in the natural resources real property replacement
account. These funds shall be expended by the department for the
exclusive purpose of acquiring forest lands of equal value to be
managed as common school trust land.
(3) Property subject to lease agreements under this section shall
be appraised at fair market value. Lease payments shall be lump sum
payments for the entire term of the lease at the beginning of the
lease. The department shall calculate such lump sum payments using
professional appraisal standards. These lease payments may not exceed
the fee simple purchase price based on current fair market value and
shall be deposited by the department to the common school construction
account in the same manner as lease revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the resource management
cost account under RCW 79.64.040.
(4) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement
this section are authorized to be paid out of the appropriations.
Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time,
environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs.
(5) Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust
lands of equal value may occur if the exchange is in the interest of
each trust, as determined by the board of natural resources.
(6) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department, with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall
execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the
transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of
this section. Transfer and lease agreements for properties identified
in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that restrict the
use of the property to the intended purpose. Transfer and lease
agreements may include provisions for receiving agencies to request
alternative uses of the property, provided the alternative uses are
compatible with the original intended public purpose and the department
and legislature approves such uses.
(7) The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or
receiving agencies may remove a property from the transfer list based
on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of
the property is not in the statewide interest of either the common
school trust or the receiving agency.
(8) The department shall execute trust land transfers that, after
the deduction of reasonable costs as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, eighty percent of the total value of transferred property is
timber value and is deposited in the common school construction
account. To achieve the eighty percent requirement, the department may
choose to lease properties originally intended as transfers.
(9) On June 30, 2009, the state treasurer shall transfer all
remaining uncommitted funds from this appropriation to the common
school construction account and the appropriations in this section
shall be reduced by an equivalent amount.

Appropriation:
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,320,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,340,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,660,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $401,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Federal Habitat Conservation Program Land Acquisition Grants
(06-2-950)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $705,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,015,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Loomis Natural Resources Conservation Area Restoration (07-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Deep Water Geoduck/Sea Cucumber Population Surveys (06-2-850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $491,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Riparian Open Space Program (06-2-018)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Port Angeles Armory (08-1-851)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,000
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $151,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $443,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $443,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Colville Armory (08-2-851)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $313,000
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $330,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $299,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $942,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $942,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Fair Improvements (06-4-850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Energy Freedom Program (06-2-851)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: If chapter . . . (House Bill No.
1303/Senate Bill No. 5586 (cleaner energy)), Laws of 2007 is enacted,
then the amounts in this section are appropriated to the department of
community, trade, and economic development.

Reappropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,529,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,529,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Energy Freedom Program (E3SHB No. 2939) (06-2-850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: If chapter . . . (House Bill No.
1303/Senate Bill No. 5586 (cleaner energy)), Laws of 2007 is enacted,
then the amounts in this section are appropriated to the department of
community, trade, and economic development.

Reappropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,971,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,971,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Fire Training Academy Sanitary System (08-2-002)

Appropriation:
Fire Service Training Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Minor Works - Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $480,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,480,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4003 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Replace Existing Dormitory (08-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Columbia River Dredging (03-H-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely to fund the second phase of a multiphase cooperative
project with the state of Oregon to dredge the Columbia river. The
amount in this section lapses unless the state of Oregon appropriates
a dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of the project.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,980,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,720,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,700,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2001-2003 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (02-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2003-2005 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (04-4-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,961,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,682,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,643,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,568,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $194,211,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2005-2007 Apple Achievement Awards (06-4-850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 196, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $302,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $198,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2005-2007 High Performance School Building Grants (06-4-852)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Additional funding will be provided to
school districts constructing public schools to recognized standards
for high performance public buildings for a transition period of three
years. The districts building high performance public schools will be
granted funding per school project for capital-related costs associated
with the design and construction of public K-12 schools that meet or
exceed comprehensive design, construction, and operating standards for
high performance and sustainable school buildings. No more than
$250,000 will be allotted for each elementary school built to high
performance standards, no more than $350,000 will be allotted for each
middle school built to high performance standards, and no more than
$500,000 will be allotted to each high school built to high performance
standards. These levels may be modified, in a limited manner, if
specific project conditions warrant and as determined by the office of
the superintendent of public instruction.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,078,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2005-2007 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (06-4-100)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,539,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $218,896,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $336,435,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $305,331,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $641,766,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Capital Project Administration (08-4-100)

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,528,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,049,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,577,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
School Construction Assistance Grants (08-4-200)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For state assistance grants for purposes of calculating square
foot eligibility, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced
by fifty percent.
(2) The legislature has made a commitment to phase in all-day
kindergarten programs beginning with the 2007-08 school year. However,
the legislature finds that one potential barrier to successful
expansion of all-day kindergarten programs may be a lack of facilities
that meet the requirements of an all-day kindergarten program. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation
with the school facilities citizen advisory panel, shall examine
alternatives for addressing school facilities needs for all-day
kindergarten programs, including adapting existing unused space,
creating innovative public-private partnerships and partnerships with
early learning providers, shifting the location of current programs
within a district or a school, and temporary, limited use of portables.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit a
report to the capital budget committee of the house of representatives
and the ways and means committee of the senate by September 1, 2007,
with recommendations on preferred alternatives and an analysis of the
feasibility and cost of implementing the alternatives.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,230,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $774,016,000
Common School Reimbursable Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $874,426,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,725,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,375,151,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Small Repair Grants (08-4-402)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Vocational Skills Centers (08-4-300)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $9,362,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for minor
capital projects at all of the state's skills centers ranked with a
"severity score" of 40 points or more.
(2) $24,400,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Skagit Valley vocational skills center.
(3) $16,366,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Yakima Valley technical skills center.
(4) $23,161,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Sno-Isle skills center.
(5) $1,118,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Clark county skills center.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,407,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,984,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,391,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
K-12 Cost Escalation (08-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to provide grants to public school
districts adversely impacted by unanticipated cost escalation and
market impacts. Public school districts that meet all the following
criteria are eligible for funding:
(a) The school district received voter-approval for bond issues in
2004;
(b) The school district received state matching funds from the
school construction assistance program in 2006 for school construction
projects;
(c) Due to extraordinary inflation and the escalating cost of
school construction between the 2004 bond budget and the actual bids
for the state match projects, the school district is unable to complete
critical state match eligible projects identified in its 2004 bond
issue or its 2004 district bond publication; and
(d) The school district has less than 20,000 student headcount
based on the October 1, 2006, 1251H enrollment report.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
generate a total dollar amount for the bond issues approved by the
voters in 2004 in the districts that meet the four criteria under
subsection (1) of this section. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall then allocate the appropriation in this
section based on the dollar value of the bonds approved by each
district's voters as a percentage of the total bond issues approved in
2004 in the districts that meet the four criteria under subsection (1)
of this section. The appropriation under this section shall be fully
distributed in the 2007-2009 biennium among the school districts that
qualify based on the four criteria under subsection (1) of this
section, and the appropriation may be spent for state match eligible
projects. The appropriation shall not be subject to the state match
process and shall not affect the ability of any school district to
apply or to be eligible for state match funds.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
K-12 Inventory Pilot Project (08-2-851)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the office
of the superintendent of public instruction to define and develop a
pilot information management system for public school facilities,
building on the experience of the community and technical college
facilities information management system. Participating school
districts must represent a cross-section of large and small districts,
urban and rural districts, and districts with facilities of varying age
and condition. The system must allow for the efficient transfer of
information between the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and participating school districts. The inventory system
must include, but not be limited to, facility and site information
necessary for appropriate facility stewardship. Data elements may
include facility location, condition, type, current use, size, date and
cost of original construction, the cost of any major remodeling or
renovation, and energy information. By December 1, 2007, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a report to the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees on the inventory system's
scope, potential school district participants, and an implementation
plan for the pilot group of school districts.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Vader School Campus (08-2-852)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the costs associated with demolition of the Vader school campus.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Chewelah Peak Environmental Learning Center (08-4-401)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Island Wood Environmental Learning Center (08-4-406)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Campus Preservation (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
New Physical Education Center (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,325,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
Vocational Education, Cafeteria, and Maintenance Support Building
(08-2-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD
Higher Education Preservation Information (08-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely to refresh preservation information that resides in the
state's comparable framework for higher education buildings (report 06-5) including any necessary revisions or adjustments that will enable
more direct translation of information, updates for last renewal or
replacement of major systems, and quality assurance field sampling. In
executing this continued capital study, the higher education
coordinating board shall consult the office of financial management and
the legislative fiscal committees about its workplan to ensure timely
delivery of assembled facilities information and related capital models
in an easy to understand format. As a general condition, upon
appropriations provided to higher education agencies in this act, the
state board for community and technical colleges and each state
baccalaureate institution shall provide requested facilities
information in a timely manner to enable the higher education
coordinating board to complete the tasks and oversight assigned in this
section.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $242,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $242,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Bothell/Cascadia Community College - State Route 522 Off Ramp
(02-2-014)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $216,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,534,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Campus Phase 2B (02-2-027)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,335,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Land Acquisition/Soils Remediation (01-2-029)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,214,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,314,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Emergency Power Expansion - Phase II (04-1-024)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,148,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,648,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Classroom Improvements (05-1-850)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,850,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Infectious Disease Laboratory Facilities (05-2-850)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Playhouse Theater (05-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,578,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,578,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Architecture Hall Renovation (06-1-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,324,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,324,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Clark Hall Renovation (06-1-007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $554,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,554,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,054,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Cleanup More Hall and Other Toxics (06-1-950)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,375,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Guggenheim Hall Renovation (06-1-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,312,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,312,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Health Sciences - H Wing (06-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-004)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Program (06-2-009)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Savery Hall Renovation (06-1-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,910,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,510,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma - Assembly Hall (06-2-007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Land Acquisition (06-2-852)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Balmer Hall Reconstruction (08-1-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of the reconstruction/replacement of Balmer hall.
The office of financial management shall not allot funding for the
design until after sine die adjournment of the 2008 regular legislative
session and only if the predesign has been submitted to the legislative
fiscal committees and to the office of financial management for review
and approval under RCW 43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2008
regular legislative session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Denny Hall Renovation (08-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of the renovation of Denny hall. The office of
financial management shall not allot funding for the design until after
sine die adjournment of the 2008 regular legislative session and only
if the predesign has been submitted to the legislative fiscal
committees and to the office of financial management for review and
approval under RCW 43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2008 regular
legislative session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,915,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Interdisciplinary Academic Building (08-2-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of the interdisciplinary academic building. The
office of financial management shall not allot funding for the design
until after sine die adjournment of the 2008 regular legislative
session and only if the predesign has been submitted to the legislative
fiscal committees and to the office of financial management for review
and approval under RCW 43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2008
regular legislative session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Intermediate Student Service and Classroom Improvements (08-1-005)

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Lewis Hall Renovation (08-1-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of the renovation of Lewis hall. The office of
financial management shall not allot funding for the design until after
sine die adjournment of the 2008 regular legislative session and only
if the predesign has been submitted to the legislative fiscal
committees and to the office of financial management for review and
approval under RCW 43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2008 regular
legislative session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,501,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,501,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Program (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,610,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Infrastructure Savings (08-1-151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6003 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(08-1-150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds must be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the performance goal stated in
this subsection (2), with particular attention given to buildings
currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to maximize
useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with which the
space is used.
(3) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Bothell Phase 3 - Predesign (08-2-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,850,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Phase 3 (08-2-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of UW Tacoma phase 3. The office of financial
management shall not allot funding for the design until after sine die
adjournment of the 2008 regular legislative session and only if the
predesign has been submitted to the legislative fiscal committees and
to the office of financial management for review and approval under RCW
43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2008 regular legislative
session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Computing and Communications Upgrades and Data Center (08-2-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Spokane Riverpoint - Academic Center Building (00-2-906)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver - Student Services Center (00-2-905)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,126,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,626,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Biotechnology/Life Sciences 2 (04-2-085)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,022,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,978,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,050,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Spokane - Nursing Building at Riverpoint (04-2-941)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Upon completion of construction of this
facility at the Riverpoint campus in Spokane, the existing land and
facilities housing the intercollegiate nursing center adjacent to
Spokane Falls Community College shall be transferred to the state board
for community and technical colleges for the use of community college
district 17, community colleges of Spokane.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Tri-Cities - Bioproducts Facility (04-2-940)

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Campus Infrastructure (06-1-073)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Capital Improvements (06-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Center for Precision Agriculture (06-2-850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver - Undergraduate Classroom Building (06-2-951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Intermediate Preservation Projects (08-1-702)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,119,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,240,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,359,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Library Road Infrastructure (08-1-703)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,900,000
Washington State University Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $194,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (08-1-151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6003 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (08-2-002)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(08-1-150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds must be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the performance goal stated in
this subsection (2), with particular attention given to buildings
currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to maximize
useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with which the
space is used.
(3) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
University Wide Infrastructure (08-1-701)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Utilities Extension (08-1-100)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,536,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,536,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver: Applied Technology and Classroom Building
(06-2-950)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,300,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Patterson Hall Remodel (06-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (06-1-751)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $377,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,177,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Hargreaves Hall Renovation (06-1-701)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,821,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $914,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,235,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Martin Williamson Hall Renovation (06-1-706)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5077 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-710)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5078 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health Safety and Code Compliance (06-1-711)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5079 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-712)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5080 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Program (06-2-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5081 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5082 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5083 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5084 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5085 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (08-1-151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6003 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5086 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(08-1-150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds must be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the performance goal stated in
this subsection (2), with particular attention given to buildings
currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to maximize
useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with which the
space is used.
(3) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,217,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5087 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Dean Hall Renovation (06-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $924,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,276,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5088 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,808,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,058,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5089 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,073,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5090 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Program (06-2-005)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $669,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,721,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,390,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5091 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Nicholson Pavilion Indoor Air/Asbestos (06-1-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,725,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5092 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Combined Utilities (08-1-011)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5093 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Hogue Hall Renovation and Addition (08-2-003)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5094 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5095 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (08-1-009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $660,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,675,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,340,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,675,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5096 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,165,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,125,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,290,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,160,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5097 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (08-2-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,800,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5098 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (08-1-151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6003 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5099 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(08-1-150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds must be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the performance goal stated in
this subsection (2), with particular attention given to buildings
currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to maximize
useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with which the
space is used.
(3) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5100 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Seminar Building Phase II - Construction (02-2-004)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5101 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Daniel J. Evans Building - Modernization (04-2-006)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5102 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5103 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-004)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $825,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5104 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Lab I First Floor Class/Laboratory Renovation (06-2-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5105 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5106 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works Program (06-2-005)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5107 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
College Activities Building Renovation (08-2-009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5108 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Longhouse Expansion (08-2-007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5109 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5110 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5111 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5112 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Infrastructure Savings (08-1-151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6003 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5113 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Program (08-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $930,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5114 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(08-1-150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds must be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the performance goal stated in
this subsection (2), with particular attention given to buildings
currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to maximize
useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with which the
space is used.
(3) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5115 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Academic Instructional Center (02-2-026)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,895,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,178,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,073,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,171,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,244,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5116 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Miller Hall Renovation (04-1-953)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,523,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,227,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5117 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-083)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,440,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5118 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (06-1-082)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,240,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,090,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5119 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-084)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,375,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5120 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (06-2-085)

Reappropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,522,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,722,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5121 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Academic Facilities Modernization Projects (08-2-099)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5122 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Carver Academic Renovation (08-1-060)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,587,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,987,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5123 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-091)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,051,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,051,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5124 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (08-1-090)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,933,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5125 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-092)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,016,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,016,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5126 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (08-1-151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6003 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5127 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (08-2-093)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5128 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(08-1-150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds must be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the performance goal stated in
this subsection (2), with particular attention given to buildings
currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to maximize
useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with which the
space is used.
(3) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,614,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5129 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Pacific - Lewis and Clark Station Camp Park Project (02-S-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,885,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,551,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5130 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Lewis and Clark Trail Interpretive Infrastructure Grant (02-4-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,081,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $646,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,727,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5131 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Projects (04-4-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,947,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,053,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5132 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Olympia - State Capital Museum: Building Preservation (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $314,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $331,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5133 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Statewide - Washington Heritage Project Grants (06-4-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
project list in section 733, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,821,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $843,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,664,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5134 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Tacoma - State History Museum: Building Preservation (06-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $381,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $481,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5135 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Tacoma - Research Center: Building Preservation (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5136 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Tacoma Research Center Building Preservation (07-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $537,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $737,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5137 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Tacoma State History Museum Building Preservation (07-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5138 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Grants (07-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Recommended

Cascade land conservancy $202,000
Suquamish museum and arts center $1,000,000
Moses Lake museum and arts center $1,000,000
White River Valley museum $245,000
The Tulalip tribe $1,000,000
City of Mukilteo $490,000
Lewis county historical museum $43,000
Pacific county historical society $186,000
City of Gig Harbor $1,000,000
Bainbridge Island metro parks and recreation $70,000
Polson museum $171,000
Washington trust for historic preservation $83,000
Historic Seattle PDA $500,000
City of Tacoma $77,000
City of Des Moines $1,000,000
Fort Walla Walla museum $859,000
Foss waterway seaport $300,000
LaConner quilt museum $125,000
Cowlitz River Valley historical society $158,000
Western forest industries museum $158,000
San Juan historical society $25,000
Central Washington fair association $48,000
Urban league of metro Seattle $650,000
The center for wooden boats $235,000
Jefferson county historical society $200,000
Mansfield museum $10,000
Martin Luther King Ballet $50,000
The northwest railway museum $75,000
Northpoint cooperative preschool $40,000

Total $10,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5139 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Women's History Preservation Grants (07-4-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the preservation of documents that are important in revealing the role
of women in the history of the region and the role Washington women
played in the nation's history.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5140 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Building Management System (08-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5141 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Campbell House Long-Term Preservation (08-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to
repair the foundation, sandstone, mortar, brick, chimney, and roof of
state-owned National Register property "Campbell house" and its
carriage house.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $402,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5142 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Computer Catalog System (08-2-010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5143 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Museum Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,154,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,304,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5144 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Security System and Technology Infrastructure (08-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $408,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5145 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Storage and Exhibit Equipment for Collections (08-2-012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $156,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5146 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Clark Center at WSU Vancouver (00-2-680)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,624,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,774,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5147 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Puyallup: Phase III Expansion (00-2-676)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,335,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,335,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5148 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Science Building (01-2-688)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,804,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,804,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5149 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Science Building (01-2-687)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,496,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,996,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5150 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates Technical College: Learning Resource Center/Vocational
(02-2-684)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,760,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,060,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5151 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Cascadia Community College/UW Bothell: Phase 2B Off Ramp
(02-2-999)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,430,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5152 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Instructional Lab Building -
Construction (02-2-685)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,488,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,488,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5153 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Information Technology Vocational Center
(02-2-683)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,280,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,730,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5154 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Basic Skills/Computer Lab
(02-2-686)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,178,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,178,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5155 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: Science and Technology (04-2-690)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,332,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,066,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,798,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5156 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Welding/Auto Collision Replacement
(04-1-213)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,638,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,838,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5157 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Cascadia Community College: Center for Arts, Technology, and
Communications (04-2-693)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,636,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,091,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,827,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5158 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Centralia Community College: Science Building (04-2-850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,716,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,697,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,113,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5159 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: East County Satellite (04-1-689)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,184,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $693,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5160 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Renovation - Mountlake Terrace Hall
(04-1-311)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,596,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,826,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5161 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Pilchuck/Glacier (04-1-205)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,815,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,945,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5162 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Replacement - Monte Cristo Hall
(04-1-305)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,307,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,352,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5163 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: University Center - North Puget Sound
(04-2-692)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,844,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,744,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,604,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,590,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,938,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5164 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the reappropriation is provided solely
to accomplish preservation work that improves existing state facilities
in the worst relative condition for housed programs and current
building occupants.
(2) With this reappropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preservation backlog reduction project funds shall be
prioritized at local discretion to achieve the above stated goal, with
particular attention given to buildings currently rated in adequate to
marginal condition.
(3) This section is subject to the same allotment procedures as a
minor works category.
(4) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this
reappropriation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,298,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,298,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5165 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Replacement - Instructional Building
(04-1-204)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $420,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,314,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,734,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5166 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Riverview Education Center (07-1-850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $498,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $498,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5167 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Computer Technology Center
(04-2-682)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $580,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,419,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5168 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Redmond Land Acquisition
(04-2-403)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of the reappropriation is to purchase property for
expansion, storm water retention, and parking requirements.
(2) State funds must be matched with nonstate resources of at least
$500,000.
(3) Allotment of funds shall be in accordance with RCW 43.88.150.

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5169 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Renovation - East/West
Buildings (04-1-312)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,271,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,421,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5170 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Instructional Fine Arts Building
(04-1-214)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,861,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,661,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5171 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (Minor Improvements) (04-2-130)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $730,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,850,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,980,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5172 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Science and Technology Building Replacement
(04-1-202)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,998,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,998,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5173 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Replacement Science and Technology Building
(04-1-208)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,640,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5174 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College - Fort Steilacoom: Science and Technology
(04-2-694)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,407,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,327,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,584,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5175 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Childcare Center (04-2-401)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5176 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Puyallup: Communication Arts/Health Building
(04-2-691)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,303,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,196,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,399,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5177 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Renton Technical College: Portable Replacement (04-1-215)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,396,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,396,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5178 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (04-1-010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $640,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,626,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,266,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5179 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (04-1-090)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,006,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,306,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5180 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Science Building Replacement (04-1-209)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,825,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,068,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,217,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5181 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Science Complex (04-2-695)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,867,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,253,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,120,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5182 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Instructional Technology Center
(04-2-681)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,711,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,861,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5183 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Science Building Replacement (04-1-212)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,521,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,721,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5184 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Replacement - Portable Buildings
(04-1-206)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,447,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,622,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5185 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Renovation - Building 7 (04-1-313)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,988,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,988,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5186 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Health Science Facility (04-1-211)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,762,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,262,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5187 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Glenn/Anthon Hall - Replacement
(04-1-207)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,645,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,645,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5188 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Health Sciences Center (05-2-851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,950,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5189 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Training Facility (05-1-854)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,752,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,752,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5190 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls: Business and Social Science Building (05-1-853)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,312,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,312,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5191 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Wenatchee Valley College: Anderson Hall and Portable Replacement
(05-1-852)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,660,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5192 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Big Bend Community College: Performing Arts and Fine Arts
(06-1-309)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $398,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,698,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5193 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Gaiser Hall Renovation (06-1-302)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,374,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,374,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5194 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: O'Connell Sports Center Improvements (06-2-403)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $480,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5195 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clover Park Technical College: Allied Health Care Facility
(06-2-699)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,285,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,315,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5196 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clover Park Technical College: Personal Care Services Facility
(06-1-310)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $599,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5197 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Brier Hall Renovation (06-1-307)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $433,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,133,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5198 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Paine Field Technical Center (06-2-408)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $980,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5199 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs (06-1-050)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,927,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,327,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5200 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Vocational Education Renovation (06-1-303)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $661,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,371,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5201 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Humanities and Classroom Building
(06-1-205)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,744,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,427,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,308,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5202 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Physical Education Renovation
(06-1-313)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $477,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,818,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,295,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5203 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Water System Replacement (06-1-501)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,951,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,951,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5204 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Skills Support Center Addition
(06-2-405)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $640,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5205 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Highline Community College: Marine Science and Technology
(06-2-406)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5206 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Infrastructure Savings (06-1-751)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,716,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5207 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Allied Health Building
(06-2-697)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,732,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,085,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,014,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5208 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Science Lab Renovation
(06-1-308)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $290,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,469,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,759,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5209 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works Preservation (RMI) (06-1-001)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5210 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works: Program (06-2-130)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,363,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,263,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5211 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College: Employment Resource Center
(06-2-851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,283,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $195,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,803,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5212 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College: Wellness Center Repairs
(06-1-330)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $970,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,030,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5213 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Humanities and Student Services (06-1-204)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,889,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $999,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,388,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5214 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Bremer Student Center (06-2-411)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $570,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5215 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Library Renovation (06-1-305)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5216 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Phase II Cultural and Arts Center (06-2-412)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5217 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Core Phase I (06-1-326)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,602,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,952,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5218 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs (06-1-010)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,940,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,840,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5219 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Maritime Academy Repairs
(06-1-502)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $268,000
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,688,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,956,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5220 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Greenhouse/Educational Center
(06-2-410)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5221 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Information Technology and
Visual Communications (06-1-304)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $696,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,096,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5222 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College: Annex Renovation (06-1-312)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,899,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,739,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5223 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College: Automotive Building (Phase I)
(06-2-951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5224 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs (06-1-090)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,537,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,837,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5225 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Campus Fire Loop Replacement (06-1-504)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,404,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,634,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5226 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Learning Resource Center
(06-2-698)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,268,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,382,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,847,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5227 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Automotive Collision Technology
(06-1-306)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $272,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,972,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5228 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Horticulture/SCGS Classrooms
(06-2-404)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5229 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Campus Classrooms (06-2-696)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,802,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,686,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,570,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5230 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Center for Water and Environmental
Studies (06-2-853)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $940,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,060,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5231 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Clarkston Health Science Facility
(06-2-402)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $510,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5232 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Wenatchee Valley College: Brown Library Renovation (06-1-311)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,644,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,404,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5233 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Center for Workforce Education
(06-2-407)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $690,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $310,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5234 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Raymond Hall Renovation
(06-1-325)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $369,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,169,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5235 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates Technical College: Mohler Communications Technology Center
(08-2-703)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $173,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,567,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5236 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: Health Science Building (08-2-702)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,893,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,037,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5237 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Instructional Resource Center
(08-1-223)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,824,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,065,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,889,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5238 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Centralia College: Health and Wellness Education Center (08-2-414)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5239 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Child and Family Studies Center (08-2-417)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5240 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Health and Advanced Technologies Building
(08-2-705)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,982,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,232,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5241 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Business Education Building (08-1-315)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,020,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5242 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Social Science Center (08-2-704)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,299,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,410,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5243 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Vocational Building (08-1-217)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,802,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,498,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5244 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Primary Electrical Replacement
(08-1-508)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,466,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,466,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5245 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Meadowdale Hall Renovation (08-1-318)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,256,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,256,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5246 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Index Hall Replacement (08-1-221)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,005,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5247 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Child Care Facility (08-2-416)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5248 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Science and Math Building (08-1-226)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,026,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,302,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5249 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Primary Electrical Replacement
(08-1-506)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,870,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,870,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5250 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Trades and Industry Building
(08-1-222)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,833,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,971,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5251 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Health and Science Building (08-1-225)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,915,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,415,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5252 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-050)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,243,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,243,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5253 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Facility Preservation - Roof Repairs (08-1-010)

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,676,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,676,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5254 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-090)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,082,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,082,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5255 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Preservation - Repairs and Minor Improvements
(08-1-001)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5256 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (08-2-130)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5257 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Business and Humanities Center (08-1-218)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,938,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,238,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5258 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Core Phase II (08-1-321)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,242,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,353,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,595,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5259 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Infrastructure Savings (08-1-151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6003 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5260 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(08-1-150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds must be
allocated at the state board's discretion to achieve the performance
goal stated in this subsection (2), with particular attention given to
buildings currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to
maximize useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with
which the space is used.
(3) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,802,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,802,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5261 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Edison North Renovation
(08-1-314)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,284,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5262 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Wood Construction Center
(08-1-216)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,549,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,734,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,283,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5263 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College: Automotive Training Center (08-2-413)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5264 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Academic and Student Services Building
(08-1-224)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,763,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,899,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5265 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Building 22 Renovation
(08-1-316)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,359,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,001,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5266 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Building 7 Renovation (08-1-319)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,009,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,331,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,340,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5267 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Technical Education Building (08-1-220)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,393,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,391,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,784,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5268 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Chemistry and Life Science
Building (08-1-219)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,044,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,564,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5269 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Magnuson Building Remodel
(08-2-415)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $941,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $941,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5270 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Music Building 15 Renovation
(08-1-320)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,142,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,094,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,236,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5271 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Early Childhood Education/Childcare
Center (08-2-418)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5272 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (08-2-701)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $255,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,514,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,769,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5273 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Culinary Arts/Student Development
Center (08-2-419)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5274 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Brown Dental Hygiene Building
(08-1-317)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,675,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5275 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Higher Education Cost Escalation (08-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the state board for community and technical colleges to establish a
process for allocating funds to projects that have experienced
unanticipated cost escalation for projects bid during the 2007-2009
biennium. Not more than $750,000 shall be made available to any single
project and amounts provided for this purpose must be matched equally
from nonstate resources. The board shall manage the distribution of
funds to ensure that the requesting college has managed its project
within the current appropriation through preparation of bid documents
and that the scope of the project is no greater than was originally
specified in the design. The board will report to the office of
financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature on the use of these funds.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

(End of part)

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS AND SUPPLEMENTAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 6001 (1) Allotments for appropriations in this
act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review
requirements adopted by the office of financial management. The office
of financial management shall notify the house of representatives
capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee of
allotment releases based on review by the office of financial
management. No expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered into
for appropriations in this act until the office of financial management
has given final approval to the allotment of the funds to be expended
or encumbered. For allotments under this act, the allotment process
includes, in addition to the statement of proposed expenditures for the
current biennium, a category or categories for any reserve amounts and
amounts expected to be expended in future biennia. Projects that will
be employing alternative public works construction procedures under
chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in
this section and RCW 43.88.110. Contracts shall not be executed that
call for expenditures in excess of the approved allotment, and the
total amount shown in such contracts for the cost of future work that
has not been appropriated shall not exceed the amount identified for
such work in the level of funding approved by the office of financial
management at the completion of predesign.
(2) The legislature intends that each project be defined as
proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless
it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature
intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6002 To ensure that major construction
projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive
intent, appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000 shall not be
expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has
reviewed and approved the agency's predesign. The predesign document
shall include but not be limited to program, site, and cost analysis in
accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial
management. To improve monitoring of major construction projects,
progress reports shall be submitted by the agency administering the
project to the office of financial management and to the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and senate. Reports will be
submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a format to be
developed by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6003 (1) To ensure minor works appropriations
are carried out in accordance with legislative intent, funds
appropriated in this act shall not be allotted until project lists are
on file at the office of financial management, the house of
representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means
committee. All projects must meet the criteria included in subsection
(2)(a) of this section. Revisions to the lists must be filed with the
office of financial management, the house of representatives capital
budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee and include
an explanation of variances from the prior lists before funds may be
expended on the revisions. No expenditure may be incurred or
obligation entered into for minor works appropriations until the office
of financial management has approved the allotment of the funds to be
expended.
(2)(a) Minor works projects are single line appropriations that
include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued
between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher
education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000.
These projects can generally be completed within two years of the
appropriation with the funding provided. Agencies are prohibited from
including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a
larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time,
would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works
projects. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the
Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the above
minor works categories.
(b) Minor works appropriations shall not be used for, among other
things: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or
designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor
works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works
list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment
not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office
of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a
specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; or
to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless
expressly authorized elsewhere in this act. The office of financial
management may make an exception to the limitations described in this
subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the
legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the
legislature regarding the proposed exception.
(3) It is generally not the intent of the legislature to make
future appropriations for capital expenditures or for maintenance and
operating expenses for an acquisition project or a significant
expansion project that is initiated through the minor works process and
therefore does not receive a policy and fiscal analysis by the
legislature. Minor works projects are intended to be one-time
expenditures that do not require future state resources to complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6004 (1) The office of financial management
may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a
capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the
completion of such project to another capital project for which the
appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand
the capacity of any facility beyond that intended by the legislature in
making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between
capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or
institution of higher education and only between capital projects that
are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur
between projects to local government agencies except where the grants
are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such
transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that
govern the grants.
(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is
in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only
if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is
substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have
been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that
the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be
completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in
this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each
project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's
budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
(4) Transfers of funds to an agency's infrastructure savings
appropriation are subject to review and approval by the office of
financial management. Expenditures from an infrastructure savings
appropriation are limited to projects that have a primary purpose to
correct infrastructure deficiencies or conditions that: (a) Adversely
affect the ability to utilize the infrastructure for its current
programmatic use; (b) reduce the life expectancy of the infrastructure;
or (c) increase the operating costs of the infrastructure for its
current programmatic use. Eligible infrastructure projects may include
structures and surface improvements, site amenities, utility systems
outside building footprints and natural environmental changes or
requirements as part of an environmental regulation, a declaration of
emergency for an infrastructure issue in conformance with RCW
43.88.250, or infrastructure planning as part of a facility master
plan.
(5) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except
emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with
the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty
days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial
management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6005 (1) It is expected that projects be ready
to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the
project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this
act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two
biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large
infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often
take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does
not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for
smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.
(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and
appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate
infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation
and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural
environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition
and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional
employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.
(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate
expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and
shall use contracted design and construction services wherever
necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6006 The legislature finds that the state's
public four-year institutions and the higher education coordinating
board have made substantial progress in developing a process to create
a single prioritized list of capital project requests as required under
RCW 28B.76.220. The legislature also recognizes that continuing work
by the institutions and the board is needed to refine the methodology
for determining the ranking of project requests, and that this work
will benefit from additional legislative guidance. Therefore, the
higher education coordinating board and the public four-year
institutions, in developing and submitting the single prioritized
project list of capital project requests under RCW 28B.76.220, shall
use the following guidelines:
(1) Representatives of the board shall participate in the process
of scoring projects using the criteria in the board's biennial budget
guidelines. Representatives of the board shall also review the
preliminary project list to verify the scoring and ranking of projects.
As required under RCW 28B.76.210, institutions must submit the
preliminary project list to the board by August 1st of each even-numbered year to enable this review. Any disagreements over project
scorings or rankings shall be resolved as provided under RCW
28B.76.220(4).
(2) The higher education coordinating board's biennial budget
guidelines and the prioritization process shall place greater emphasis
on:
(a) Early critical review of project proposals at the predesign
phase, rather than deferring critical review and prioritization to the
design or construction phases of a project; and
(b) The capital budget bow wave for a six-year period, beginning
with the 2009-2011 biennium through the 2013-2015 biennium.
(3) When projects are aggregated into single line-item requests,
each project must meet the definition of minor works according to
section 6003(2)(a) of this act. All major projects must be listed and
ranked as individual line-item requests.
(4) The scoring and ranking of projects shall not be based on
assigning an equal number of overall points to each public four-year
institution, but shall reflect an assignment of points to individual
projects based on the priorities and criteria in this section and in
the board's biennial budget guidelines.
(5) Projects shall not be ranked on the basis of a project funding
source.
(6) In consultation with the appropriate fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature, the board shall identify statewide
priorities for higher education capital investments and incorporate
those priorities into its biennial budget guidelines. The statewide
priorities shall address the need for higher education capital projects
to:
(a) Implement a specific legislatively authorized program or
planning priority;
(b) Reduce the backlog of deferred building or system preservation,
renewal, or replacement;
(c) Provide additional capacity or adaptation of space for high
demand instructional or research programs;
(d) Provide additional instructional program capacity for under-served geographic regions or populations; and
(e) Reflect institutional planning priorities and areas of
emphasis.
(7) The higher education coordinating board's biennial budget
guidelines shall include a quantitative method for scoring projects on
the identified priorities. The quantitative method shall include use
of the facility condition index developed by the joint legislative
audit and review committee for assessing building or system condition,
and use of the board's space utilization and allocation standards for
assessing the need for additional capacity.
(8) The council of presidents, in consultation with the board,
shall report by September 1, 2007, to the appropriate legislative
fiscal committees on the use of a proportionality factor in the scoring
and ranking of projects. The report shall include:
(a) A definition of proportionality as it has been used in the
scoring and ranking of projects for funding in the 2007-2009 biennium
and may be used for subsequent biennia;
(b) A method for measuring proportionality in a valid and
consistent manner; and
(c) An explanation of how proportionality relates to the statewide
priorities established in subsection (6) of this section, including an
assessment of the extent to which it promotes the achievement of these
statewide priorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6007 The Washington state auditor shall
perform an audit of the Seattle public library and the secretary of
state with regard to expenditures related to the facility located at
2021 9th Avenue, Seattle, Washington that houses the Washington talking
book and braille library and city of Seattle functions. The audit
shall be completed and results available to the legislature by
September 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6008 Eastern Washington University is
authorized to sell its Spokane center. Proceeds from the sale must be
deposited into the higher education construction account. Proceeds may
be used to acquire or design a facility on or adjacent to the
Riverpoint higher education campus for the university's Spokane-based
program offerings. Eastern Washington University must report to the
office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of
the legislature upon the sale of the center and with regard to
expenditure of the proceeds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6009 The office of financial management, in
consultation with the department of general administration, shall
identify capital projects that may benefit from an energy analysis to
determine whether there are alternate, more economical, and energy
efficient means of completing the work. The office of financial
management shall hold appropriations in allotment reserve on the
following types of capital projects until this analysis can be
completed: Heating, ventilation, and air conditioning modifications,
chiller plants, steam plants, boilers, chilled water or steam lines,
building control systems, lighting improvements, or other major energy
using systems that may warrant additional analysis. Agencies receiving
appropriations for such projects are encouraged to utilize energy
performance contracts or alternative financing for equipment in lieu of
state appropriated funds. The office of financial management may
transfer funds remaining in allotment reserve to infrastructure savings
projects within the agency that has realized savings from energy
efficiency alternatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6010 The effective use of state-supported
space in higher education is an important factor in assessing both
effective management and priorities for capital funding. It is also
recognized that the facilities of the state vary significantly among
the community colleges, the comprehensive regional universities, and
the research universities. It is further recognized that the existing
higher education coordinating board space study does a good job of
highlighting the use of a portion of the space for a specific chosen
set of uses.
In order for the legislature to have a better awareness of all uses
of all state-supported space, the council of presidents shall prepare
an assessment of facilities use that covers the full scope of uses for
all types of state-funded spaces. This assessment should start with
the higher education coordinating board report and build upon this to
include additional uses, space types, and methodologies, including
methodologies and practices used by other higher education
institutions.
To the extent possible, it would be helpful for this assessment to
use the same definitions of space types and uses. Based upon the
differences in mission and function, the assessment may be divided to
look at the comprehensive regional universities along with The
Evergreen State College in one group and the research universities as
a second group.
The council of presidents shall coordinate this effort with the
office of financial management, staff from the appropriate fiscal and
higher education committees of the legislature, and the higher
education coordinating board. The assessment shall be completed and
delivered to the legislature by January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6011 State agencies, including institutions of
higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for
capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for
operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6012 Due to the intended replacement of the
building adjoining Capital Way and 11th avenue, the department of
general administration shall not charge the facility depreciation
component of lease charges for nonprofit tenants in that facility
during the 2007-2009 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6013 Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological
and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005.
Agencies and higher education institutions shall comply with the
requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6014 ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES
THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into
financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or
nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the
principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under
this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract
option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase
agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or
financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures
made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue
date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of
participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of
the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to
the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the
state finance committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $1,360,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to replace the dormitory facility at the
Washington state patrol fire training academy in North Bend,
Washington.
(2) Employment security department: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $5,409,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an employment
resource center at North Seattle Community College.
(3) Department of social and health services: Enter into a
financing contract for up to $4,918,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an
employment resource center at North Seattle Community College.
(4) Department of general administration:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $8,975,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct the fifth phase of the east plaza garage repairs.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $685,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the preservation of the transportation building.
(5) Department of corrections: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $17,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to provide additional work release beds.
(6) Parks and recreation commission: Enter into a financing
contract in an amount not to exceed $2,000,000 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop Cama
Beach state park.
(7) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase Kent
Station phase 2.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Tacoma Community
College for up to $3,600,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an early childhood
education and learning center.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to 40
acres of land.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin
College for up to $300,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop an academic support
and achievement center.
(8) Evergreen State College: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $16,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the college activities building
renovation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6015 FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION--ART WORK
ALLOWANCE POOLING. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated
in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is
provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The Washington
state arts commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects
in order to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and
representatives of school district boards.
(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding
two hundred thousand dollars by colleges or universities is provided
solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027. The Washington state arts
commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order
to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with
the board of regents or trustees.
(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of any public building by a state agency as
defined in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW
43.17.200. The Washington state arts commission may combine the
proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger works of art
or mobile art displays in consultation with the state agency.
(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the
Washington state arts commission during the 2007-2009 biennium for the
purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended
solely for direct acquisition of works of art. The commission may use
up to $100,000 of this amount to contract for service to conserve or
maintain existing pieces in the state art collection pursuant to
chapter 36, Laws of 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6016 The amounts shown under the headings
"Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for
informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval
of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate
prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia
in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an
estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the
2009-2011 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero
does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide
funding for the project or program in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6017 (1) "Reappropriations" in this act are
appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are
subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to
appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended
balances remaining on June 30, 2007, from the 2005-2007 biennial
appropriations for each project.
(2) "Reappropriations" from the water quality capital account in
this act shall be limited to the unexpended balance remaining as of the
end of fiscal year 2007 from the water quality account in the 2005-2007
biennial appropriations for each project in this act.
(3) "Reappropriations" in sections 5001, 5002, 5003, and 5005 of
this act shall be reduced in this act to the unexpended balances
remaining as of the end of fiscal year 2007 for the 2005-2007 biennial
appropriation in sections 602, 604, and 607, chapter 488, Laws of 2005,
and section 194, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6018 The water quality capital account is
created in the state treasury pursuant to chapter . . .
([House][Senate] Bill No. . . . . (Z-0356.3/07)), Laws of 2007 (water
quality capital account). In this act, appropriations from the water
quality capital account are defined as appropriations from that
account. If chapter . . . ([House][Senate] Bill No. . . . . (Z-0356.3/07)), Laws of 2007 (water quality capital account) is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, appropriations in this act either from that
account or into that account shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6019 To carry out the provisions of this act,
the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design,
construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6020 If any federal moneys appropriated by
this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the
department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace
the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources.
No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval
of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate
ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6021 (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all
appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or
in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so
that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended
state share of total project costs.
(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not
required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for
phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds
is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6022 Any capital improvements or capital
projects involving construction or major expansion of a state office
facility, including, but not limited to, district headquarters,
detachment offices, and off-campus faculty offices, must be reviewed by
the department of general administration for possible consolidation,
colocation, and compliance with state office standards before allotment
of funds. The intent of the requirement imposed by this section is to
eliminate duplication and reduce total office space requirements where
feasible, while ensuring proper service to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6023 NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.
Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the
state building construction account, or any other account receiving
bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee
to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and
regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. The
state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of
financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation
authority from the state building construction account, or any other
account receiving bond proceeds, to the state taxable building
construction account is necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6024 (1) A study committee on public
infrastructure programs and funds is established. The study committee
shall consist of eight members, as follows:
(a) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(b) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate, appointed by the president of the senate.
(2) The study committee members shall, by an affirmative vote of at
least five members, select a chair from among its membership.
(3) The study committee may consult with individuals from the
public and private sectors and other interested parties, as may be
appropriate, for technical advice and assistance and may request such
individuals to establish advisory committees or work groups that report
to the study committee.
(4) The study committee shall make recommendations regarding a
comprehensive funding structure and systematic approach to support the
integration, consolidation, and standardization of processes,
procedures, and infrastructure programs. In order to make
recommendations, the study committee shall:
(a) Review state public infrastructure programs and funds and the
purposes each serve using the November 29, 2006, inventory of state
infrastructure programs compiled by the joint legislative audit and
review committee;
(b) Review program or fund implementation;
(c) Consider the types of public infrastructure projects supported
by the program or fund; and
(d) Identify overlaps or gaps in types of public infrastructure
projects supported through state programs or funds.
(5) The study committee shall use staff from the house of
representatives office of program research and senate committee
services, in consultation with the department of community, trade, and
economic development and the office of financial management.
(6) The study committee shall report its findings and
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the house of
representatives and the senate by January 1, 2008.
(7) The study committee expires January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6025 The Washington state historical society
shall review its competitive process to solicit proposals for heritage
capital projects for potential funding in the state capital budget.
The Washington state historical society shall submit a report to the
office of financial management with recommendations on how to reduce
its reappropriations by June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6026 The interagency committee for outdoor
recreation shall review its competitive process to solicit proposals
for the wildlife and recreation grant program for potential funding in
the state capital budget. The interagency committee for outdoor
recreation shall submit a report to the office of financial management
with recommendations on how to reduce its reappropriations by June 30,
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6027 The office of financial management may
authorize a value engineering study of a project's predesign report
prior to beginning the design phase for the project. The allotment of
the design phase may be delayed to accommodate the study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6028 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS. The
transfer in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The amount transferred shall be added to the irreducible
principal of the common school permanent fund. The state investment
board shall invest the amount transferred in various types of allowable
investments in order to achieve a balance of long-term growth and
current income. The treasurer shall calculate the irreducible
principal in accordance with the state constitution and state law. The
irreducible principal shall not include investment gains on the
principal of the amount transferred, and the fund may retain or
distribute income and investment earnings attributable to this amount
in order to achieve the appropriate balance between growth and income.

Natural Resources Real Property Replacement
Account: For transfer to the Common School
Permanent Fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6029 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
Education Construction Account: For transfer to
the Common School Construction, an amount
not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $124,200,000

Education Savings Account: For transfer to the
Common School Construction Account, an
amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,400,000

Sec. 6030 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2005 c 488 s 926 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; and
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the top two hazardous waste
management priorities of RCW 70.105.150.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority: (i) Remedial
actions; (ii) hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105
RCW; (iii) solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW; (iv) funds for a program to assist in the
assessment and cleanup of sites of methamphetamine production, but not
to be used for the initial containment of such sites, consistent with
the responsibilities and intent of RCW 69.50.511; and (v) cleanup and
disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or derelict vessels
that pose a threat to human health or the environment. For purposes of
this subsection (3)(a)(v), "abandoned or derelict vessels" means
vessels that have little or no value and either have no identified
owner or have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean
up and dispose of the vessel. Funds for plans and programs shall be
allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements
established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW. During
the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be used
for the following activities: Conducting a study of whether dioxins
occur in fertilizers, soil amendments, and soils; reviewing
applications for registration of fertilizers; and conducting a study of
plant uptake of metals. During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to the
state toxics control account such amounts as specified in the omnibus
capital budget bill. During the ((2005-2007)) 2007-2009 fiscal
biennium, moneys in the account may also be used for grants to local
governments to retrofit public sector diesel equipment and for storm
water planning and implementation activities.
(b) Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to
implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal
safe drinking water act for public water systems. The department of
health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed under RCW
70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local
toxics control accounts shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. However, during the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, funding may not be granted to entities engaged in
lobbying activities, and applicants may not be awarded grants if their
cumulative grant awards under this section exceed two hundred thousand
dollars. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be
renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium
shall revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(((8) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state toxics control account to the water quality
account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.))

Sec. 6031 RCW 43.43.944 and 2005 c 518 s 929 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The fire service training account is hereby established in the
state treasury. The fund shall consist of:
(a) All fees received by the Washington state patrol for fire
service training;
(b) All grants and bequests accepted by the Washington state patrol
under RCW 43.43.940; and
(c) Twenty percent of all moneys received by the state on fire
insurance premiums.
(2) Moneys in the account may be appropriated only for fire service
training. During the ((2005-2007)) 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may appropriate funds from this account for ((school fire
prevention activities within the Washington state patrol)) additional
sanitary wastewater treatment capacity at the state fire service
training center.

Sec. 6032 RCW 43.135.045 and 2005 c 518 s 931, 2005 c 314 s 401,
and 2005 c 72 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer
an amount from the state general fund to the emergency reserve fund.
The amount transferred shall equal the amount by which total state
revenue for the general fund and related funds exceeds the state
expenditure limit, multiplied by the percentage that general fund
expenditures are of total expenditures from the general fund and
related funds. Transfers shall be made at the end of each fiscal
quarter based on projections of state revenues, expenditures, and the
state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall make transfers between
these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues and the
expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter.
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to the student achievement fund hereby
created in the state treasury and twenty-five percent to the general
fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter.
(4) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, funds may also be
used for higher education facilities preservation and maintenance.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(5) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.

Sec. 6033 RCW 43.155.050 and 2005 c 488 s 925 and 2005 c 425 s 4
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. For the ((2005-2007)) 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account
may be used for grants for projects identified in section 138, chapter
488, Laws of 2005.
(2) The job development fund is hereby established in the state
treasury. Up to fifty million dollars each biennium from the public
works assistance account may be transferred into the job development
fund. Money in the job development fund may be used solely for job
development fund program grants, administrative expenses related to the
administration of the job development fund program created in RCW
43.160.230, and for the report prepared by the joint legislative audit
and review committee pursuant to RCW 44.28.801(2). Moneys in the job
development fund may be spent only after appropriation. The board
shall prepare a prioritized list of proposed projects of up to fifty
million dollars as part of the department's 2007-09 biennial budget
request. The board may provide an additional alternate job development
fund project list of up to ten million dollars. The legislature may
remove projects from the list recommended by the board. The
legislature may not change the prioritization of projects recommended
for funding by the board, but may add projects from the alternate list
in order of priority, as long as the total funding does not exceed
fifty million dollars.

Sec. 6034 RCW 43.155.050 and 2005 c 488 s 925 are each amended to
read as follows:
The public works assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. For the ((2005-2007)) 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account
may be used for grants for projects identified in section 138, chapter
488, Laws of 2005 and section 1037 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6035 For appropriations under this act that
contribute to Puget Sound protection and recovery, the department of
ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of natural
resources, the state conservation commission, the state parks and
recreation commission, the department of health, and the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation shall sign performance agreements with
the Puget Sound partnership as described in chapter . . ., ([House]
[Senate] Bill No. . . .) Laws of 2007 (Z-0369 Puget Sound partnership).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6036 Section 6033 of this act expires June 30,
2011.

Sec. 6037 2005 c 488 s 955 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
((Sections)) (1) Section 920 ((and 921)) of this act expires June
30, 2007.
(2) Section 921 of this act expires June 30, 2009.

Sec. 6038 2006 c 371 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects (06-4-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) Funding for the Inland Northwest Science and Technology Center
shall be held in reserve until the balance of phase I funding has been
secured or committed from local government and community sources.
(3) The Washington state arts commission shall design a plaque that
shall be affixed to buildings or displayed as part of a project
receiving any appropriation from this section. The plaque shall
provide information to the public that the building or project has been
made possible by the tax dollars of Washington citizens. The
commission may contact the secretary of state to obtain approval for
use of the Washington seal in the design of the plaque. The final
design shall be approved by the chairs and ranking members of the house
of representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and
means committee.
(4) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects Recommendation

7th street theatre $600,000

Alder creek pioneer association carousel museum $450,000

Asian counseling and referral service $2,000,000

Auburn veterans' memorial park improvements $50,000

Bailey Gatzert children's play area $75,000

Bridge for kids $850,000

Brookside school ADA playground equipment $25,000

Buena library $50,000

Camp prime time repairs--families with terminally ill
children $100,000

Cannon house $250,000

Central area motivation program (CAMP) $250,000

Cesar Chavez park $150,000

Chambers creek footbridge $177,000

Childhaven $150,000

Clark Lake park and retreat center $500,000

Colman school preconstruction activities $1,200,000

Colored women's association meeting house $60,000

Columbia breaks fire interpretive center $150,000

Community center at Greenbridge $400,000

Covington aquatics center phase 1 $350,000

Crossroads community center and park $250,000

Cutter theater $71,000

Deming library $85,000

Des Moines beach park historic buildings $300,000

Discovery park $1,000,000

East Whatcom regional resource center $1,750,000

Eatonville family park $50,000

El Centro de la Raza $900,000

Filipino community center $200,000

Financial assistance to the town of Hamilton $150,000

Food bank refrigeration projects $365,000

Foster creek $150,000

Fox theater $2,398,000

Garfield county agricultural museum $150,000

GC health clinic $12,000

Grand Army of the Republic cemetery $5,000

Granite Falls museum expansion $50,000

Greenbridge plaza in White Center $200,000

Habitat park south hill $400,000

Hanford reach interpretive center preconstruction
activities
$2,000,000

Hidden river environmental education center $50,000

ICL education center $200,000

Japanese cultural and community center $200,000

Joel Pritchard park $2,500,000

Joe's creek project $856,000

Juanita creek channel and riparian restoration $500,000

Juanita highlands $275,000

Julia Butler Hansen home restoration $10,000

Kettle falls park $100,000

Kirkland nonmotorized facilities $200,000

LeRoi smelter smokestack monument $3,000

Lewis and Clark confluence project $2,000,000

McCaw hall $2,000,000

Meridian habitat park $400,000

Miners' memorial $36,500

Miracle league handicapped baseball $57,000

MOBIUS/Inland Northwest science and technology
center
$1,500,000

Mt. Baker theater $200,000

Mt. Vernon Jasper Gates statue $12,000

Multicultural center of Kitsap county $250,000

Nathaniel Orr home site museum interpretive center $29,000

Neighborhood house rainier vista $200,000

New Lakewood clinic $350,000

Northeast community center expansion $250,000

Northshore performing arts center $1,000,000

Northwest communities education center $1,000,000

Oak Harbor multi-purpose community and sports
facility
$50,000

Omak grandstand $250,000

Orting fire station $250,000

Pacific Northwest salmon center $1,000,000

Pacific science center $900,000

Performing arts center (PACE) $500,000

Pike Place Market health center emergency repairs $1,000,000

Port of Quincy $400,000

Puget Sound freight building warehouse--Thea Foss
waterway
$2,000,000

Puyallup river walking trail $200,000

Rainier historical heating system $75,000

Red mountain $200,000

Relocation of Sieke Japanese gardens $250,000

River walk and Sammamish river restoration $200,000

Roslyn city hall $150,000

Ruth Dykeman children's center $27,000

Sandman historical tug restoration $10,000

Seattle Aquarium $2,000,000

Seattle community center (1115 E. Pike street) $13,000

Seattle mental health emerald house $28,000

Seward park environmental and audubon center $400,000

Snohomish senior center $150,000

Sno-Valley senior activity center kitchen $50,000

Sound way property preservation $500,000

Spokane river whitewater course $400,000

Sumas ballpark $250,000

Synthetic sportsfield partnership at Robinswood park $400,000

Tall ships moorage $300,000

Tukwila kayak and canoe launching facility $20,000

Undeveloped woodlands linked to interurban nature
trail
$150,000

Vancouver museum $125,000

Vancouver national historical reserve west barracks $1,000,000

Veterans memorial museum $100,000

Wapato Lake renovations and water quality $250,000

West Seattle community resource center $500,000

West central community center $500,000

West Hylebos wetlands boardwalk $100,000

Wilson playfield land acquisition $200,000

Wing Luke Asian art museum $2,000,000

Youth housing/drop-in center $400,000

Total $49,949,500

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,949,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,949,500

Sec. 6039 2005 c 488 s 165 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Construct Spokane Readiness Center (04-2-003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,800,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,300,000))
$2,250,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,100,000))
$10,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,468,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,568,000))
$12,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6040 A new section is added to 2006 c 371
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Modular Building Reutilization (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

Sec. 6041 2005 c 488 s 347 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Cama Beach - New Destinations (06-2-011)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,820,000))
$4,320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,520,000))
$6,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6042 A new section is added to 2006 c 371
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Land Restoration (07-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $587,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $587,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6043 A new section is added to 2006 c 371
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Sinlahekin Creek Dams - Floods Damage Repair (2007-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6044 A new section is added to 2006 c 371
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Region 1 Office - Complete Phase 1 (2007-2-009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $588,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $588,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6045 A new section is added to 2006 c 371
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Loomis Natural Resources Conservation Area Restoration (2007-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6046 A new section is added to 2006 c 371
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Storm Damage (07-1-850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $282,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $282,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6047 A new section is added to 2006 c 371
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Riverview Education Center (07-1-850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $498,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $498,000

Sec. 6048 2006 c 371 s 192 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Energy Freedom Program (06-2-851)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The appropriation is provided solely for low-interest loans
to political subdivisions for renewable energy projects including the
development of biofuel oilseed crushers, supporting infrastructure, and
facilities. The political subdivision may negotiate an appropriate
agreement with the bioenergy industry for the use of the oilseed
crushers, supporting infrastructure, and facilities.
(b) For purposes of this section, political subdivision means any
port district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any
other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the
state.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Recommendation

Spokane Conservation district (($2,000,000))
$1,779,000

Port of Warden $2,500,000

Odessa public development authority (($2,500,000))
$3,500,000

((Port of Columbia county $2,500,000))
$0

Port of Sunnyside $750,000

Total (($10,250,000))
$8,529,000

(3) All agreements negotiated between the political subdivision and
the bioenergy industry for use of the oilseed crushers, supporting
infrastructure, or facilities funded in this section must provide for
at least a fifty percent match by the industry partner. The industry
match may include, but is not limited to, investments in rail,
buildings, refining capacity, or seed stock.
(4) All other project funds must be disbursed prior to energy
freedom loans, except where required on a matching basis by other
federal or state programs.
(5) The department shall disburse loans to the political
subdivision on a reimbursement basis only.
(6) The department may defer loan repayment for up to twenty-four
months or until the projects start to receive revenue from operations,
whichever is sooner.
(7) Upon written notice to the political subdivision, the
department may suspend or cancel its loans if any of the following
occur:
(a) The political subdivision fails to make satisfactory and
reasonable progress to complete the project, or the department
concludes the political subdivision will be unable to complete the
project or any portion of it; or
(b) The political subdivision or bioenergy industry partners have
made misrepresentations in any information furnished to the department
or the legislature in connection with the project.
(8) In the event that any portion of the loan has been paid to the
political subdivision under this section at the time of breach, or
failure of the political subdivision to satisfactorily perform, the
department may require that the full amount of the loan, or a portion
thereof, be repaid within a period specified by the department.
(9) Future loan repayments shall be deposited into the energy
freedom account created in section 6, chapter . . . (Engrossed Third
Substitute House Bill No. 2939), Laws of 2006.
(10) It is the intent of the legislature to provide loans for the
development of a Washington state biodiesel industry based on
Washington grown oilseed. The legislature is aware that in the
development of this industry, the start-up process may necessitate the
use of other oilseeds until Washington state growers plant sufficient
crops to support this industry. The legislature also understands the
realities of weather and market conditions in this process. The
conversion to maximum Washington grown oilseed must be accomplished as
quickly as possible. The political subdivision shall: (a) Develop a
plan for outreach to local growers and an estimate of when maximum
Washington state oilseed-based production will be reached; (b) develop
a goal for the political subdivision to return a portion of the biofuel
to local oilseed producers; and (c) report this information to the
department of agriculture by December 1, 2006. The department shall
report on the implementation of this section by January 1, 2007, to the
appropriate committees of the legislature.
(11) If chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1303/Senate Bill No. 5586
(cleaner energy)), Laws of 2007 is enacted, then the amounts in this
section are appropriated to the department of community, trade, and
economic development.

Appropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,250,000))
$8,529,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,250,000))
$8,529,000

Sec. 6049 2006 c 371 s 191 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Energy Freedom Program (E3SHB No. 2939) (06-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely to implement the energy
freedom program created in chapter . . . (Engrossed Third Substitute
House Bill No. 2939), Laws of 2006. If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2006, the appropriation shall lapse.
(2) The department shall not expend more than $202,000 of the
appropriation on administrative costs.
(3) If chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1303/Senate Bill No. 5586
(cleaner energy)), Laws of 2007 is enacted, then the amounts in this
section are appropriated to the department of community, trade, and
economic development.

Appropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,750,000))
$5,971,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,750,000))
$5,971,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6050 Part headings in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6051 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6052 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for section 6032 of this act which takes effect
July 1, 2007, and section 6034 of this act which takes effect June 30,
2011.

(End of Part)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 171
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 190, 258
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 72
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 122, 256, 257
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 55
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 131, 257
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 141
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 56
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 188
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 102
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 41, 255
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 31, 32
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 120, 256
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 149
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
STATE TREASURER
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 244
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 143
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 184
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 141
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 161
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 180
--- END ---