BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
2005-07 BIENNIUMTRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- OPERATING
Sec. 201 2005 c 313 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($417,000))
$597,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL. The appropriations to the
Washington state patrol in chapter 370, Laws of 2006 shall be expended
for the programs and in the amounts specified herein. However, after
May 1, 2007, unless specifically prohibited, the Washington state
patrol may transfer state patrol highway account--state appropriations
for the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium between programs after approval by
the director of financial management. However, the Washington state
patrol shall not transfer state moneys that are provided solely for a
specified purpose. The director of financial management shall notify
the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING. The appropriations to the
department of licensing in chapter 370, Laws of 2006 shall be expended
for the programs and in the amounts specified herein. However, after
May 1, 2007, unless specifically prohibited, the department may
transfer motor vehicle account--state appropriations for the 2005-2007
fiscal biennium, highway safety account--state appropriations for the
2005-2007 fiscal biennium, and department of licensing services
account--state appropriations for the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium between
programs after approval by the director of financial management.
However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose. The director of financial
management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives in writing prior to approving any
allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

Sec. 204 2006 c 370 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($372,254,000))
$388,561,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,660,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($375,914,000))
$392,221,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($75,280,000)) $81,144,000 of the total appropriation is
provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2005-2007
biennium.
(2) The maximum amount of expenditures for compensation paid to
ferry employees during the 2005-2007 biennium shall not exceed
(($226,455,000)) $235,325,000. This amount reflects the sole source of
state funding available to support the implementation of any collective
bargaining agreements or arbitration awards with respect to state ferry
employee compensation, including salaries, wages, and employee
benefits, during the 2005-2007 biennium, which amount includes
$6,223,000 in full satisfaction of the arbitration awards for the
2001-2003 biennium and $1,339,000 for labor productivity gains
agreements and $8,870,000 in full satisfaction of the arbitration
awards and the negotiated collective bargaining agreements for the
2003-2005 and 2005-2007 biennia. The department's use of this
expenditure authority constitutes a good faith attempt to implement
such agreements and awards, including those applicable to prior
biennia. It is the intent of the legislature that the expenditure
authority provided in this subsection fully satisfy any agreements or
awards required to be implemented during the 2005-2007 biennium, and
that the provisions of Substitute House Bill No. 3178 (marine employees
collective bargaining) will govern the implementation of agreements or
awards effective beginning with the 2007-2009 biennium. For the
purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation paid to
ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and employee
benefits as defined in the office of financial management's state
administrative and accounting manual, chapter 75.70, named under
objects of expenditure "A" and "B".
(3) $1,116,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for ferry security operations
necessary to comply with the ferry security plan submitted by the
Washington state ferry system to the United States coast guard. The
department shall track security costs and expenditures. Ferry security
operations costs shall not be included as part of the operational costs
that are used to calculate farebox recovery.
(4) The Washington state ferries must work with the department's
information technology division to implement an electronic fare system,
including the integration of the regional fare coordination system
(smart card). Each December and June, semi-annual updates must be
provided to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning
the status of implementing and completing this project, with updates
concluding the first December after full project implementation.
(5) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide service
to Sidney, British Columbia.
(6) $3,660,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to provide passenger-only ferry
service. The ferry system shall continue passenger-only ferry service
from Vashon Island to Seattle until such time as a county ferry
district's assumption of the route, as authorized by Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6787. Beginning September 1, 2005, ferry system management
shall implement its agreement with the Inlandboatmen's Union of the
Pacific and the International Organization of Masters, Mates and Pilots
providing for part-time passenger-only work schedules.
(7) $350,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 3178 (marine employees collective bargaining). If
Substitute House Bill No. 3178 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $378,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the marine division to meet the
United States Coast Guard requirements for appropriate rest hours
between shifts for vessel crews on the Bainbridge to Seattle and
Edmonds to Kingston ferry routes.

Sec. 205 2006 c 370 s 228 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,876,000))
$35,626,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $29,091,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service contract and
Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and maintaining
the state-supported passenger rail service. Upon completion of the
rail platform project in the city of Stanwood, the department shall
provide daily Amtrak Cascades service to the city.
(b) The department shall negotiate with Amtrak and Burlington
Northern Santa Fe to adjust the Amtrak Cascades schedule to leave
Bellingham at a significantly earlier hour.
(2) (($2,750,000)) $1,500,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is provided solely for a new round trip
rail service between Seattle and Portland beginning July 1, 2006.
(3) No AMTRAK Cascade runs may be eliminated.
(4) $40,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the produce railcar program. The
department is encouraged to implement the produce railcar program by
maximizing private investment.
(5) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a study of the realignment of
highway and rail in the Longview industrial area (SR 432) corridor,
specifically regarding whether the construction of a limited access
bypass highway to reduce congestion resulting from anticipated growth
in future rail and truck traffic, is a feasible alternative. In
conducting the study, the department shall consult port districts,
local government planning staff, and rail road companies, and other
appropriate stakeholders.
(6) $60,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a study of the need for
transloading capabilities in the West Plains area that could be served
by the Geiger Spur, including evaluation of prospective transloader
sites, potential operators and users, and the type, size, and special
needs of shippers/customers. The study must also evaluate the costs
associated with building and operating a transloader site and the
impact to local roadways and surrounding land uses. In conducting the
study, the department shall consult with Spokane County.

Sec. 206 2006 c 370 s 229 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,500,000))
$8,836,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,597,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $411,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,508,000))
$11,844,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $211,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and
$411,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
are provided solely for the state's contribution to county and city
studies of flood hazards in association with interstate highways.
First priority shall be given to threats along the I-5 corridor.
(2) (($525,000)) $861,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely to the department in accordance with
RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department
solely for contract services with the association of Washington cities
and the Washington state association of counties for improving
transportation permitting and mitigation processes.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--CAPITAL
Sec. 301 2006 c 370 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,933,000))
$38,046,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,697,000))
$31,882,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($97,985,000))
$70,283,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $355,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided for county ferries as set forth in RCW
47.56.725(4).

Sec. 302 2006 c 370 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($101,425,000))
$93,425,000
Small City Preservation and Sidewalk
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$1,696,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($94,401,000))
$82,258,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($197,826,000))
$177,379,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The transportation improvement account -- state appropriation
includes up to (($14,143,000)) $7,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in RCW 47.26.500.
(2) (($2,000,000)) $1,696,000 of the small city preservation and
sidewalk account--state appropriation is provided to fund the
provisions of chapter 83, Laws of 2005 (Substitute Senate Bill No.
5775).

Sec. 303 2006 c 370 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,190,511,000))
$1,190,261,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,165,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $395,043,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,522,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,479,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $274,038,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $384,186,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,002,000))
$750,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,391,946,000))
$2,391,444,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by fund, project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document
2006-1, Highway Improvement Program (I) as developed March 8, 2006.
However, limited transfers of allocations between projects may occur
for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in
section 603 of this act.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $6,835,000 of
the transportation partnership account--state appropriation, $5,002,000
of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation, and $2,645,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation are for project 109040T: I-90/Seattle to Mercer Island
– Two way transit/HOV. Expenditure of these funds on construction is
contingent upon the development of an access plan that provides
equitable and dependable access for I-90 Mercer Island exit and entry.
(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation is for a west
Olympia access study, to complete an access study for state route
101/west Olympia.
(d) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $800,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation is for an SR
534 access point decision report.
(f) Within the amounts provided within this subsection, $6,000,000
of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation is for
project 509009B: I-90 Snoqualmie Pass East - Hyak to Keechelus dam.
However, if the preferred alternative selected for this project results
in a lower total project cost, the remaining funds may be used for
concrete rehabilitation on I-90 in the vicinity of this project.
(g) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $12,841,000 of
the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation
and $4,939,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation are for construction of a new interchange on SR 522 to
provide direct access to the University of Washington Bothell/Cascadia
community college joint campus. This appropriation assumes an
additional $8,061,000 will be provided in the 2007-09 biennium from the
transportation partnership account.
(h) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $19,262,149 of
the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation and $1,873,478 of the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation are for
project 154302E: SR 543 (I-5 to the international boundary).
(2) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$50,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843.
(3) The department shall not commence construction on any part of
the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project until a
record of decision has been reached providing reasonable assurance that
project impacts will be avoided, minimized, or mitigated as much as
practicable to protect against further adverse impacts on neighborhood
environmental quality as a result of repairs and improvements made to
the state route 520 bridge and its connecting roadways, and that any
such impacts will be addressed through engineering design choices,
mitigation measures, or a combination of both. The requirements of
this section shall not apply to off-site pontoon construction
supporting the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV
project.
(4) The transportation partnership account--state appropriation
includes up to $150,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.873.
(5) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation
includes up to $257,016,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation includes up to $17,022,000 in unexpended proceeds
from the March 2005 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.843 for the
Tacoma Narrows bridge project.
(6) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation includes up to $880,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized by chapter 147, Laws of 2003.
(7) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2005, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each project in the project lists
submitted pursuant to this act. Other projects may be reported on a
programmatic basis. The department shall work with the office of
financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature to agree on report formatting and elements. Elements shall
include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs.
The department shall also provide the information required under this
subsection on a quarterly basis via the transportation executive
information systems (TEIS).
(8) The department of transportation shall conduct an analysis of
the causes of traffic congestion on I-5 in the vicinity of Fort Lewis
and develop recommendations for alleviating the congestion. The
department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2005, on its analysis and recommendations
regarding traffic congestion on I-5 in the vicinity of Fort Lewis.
(9) The department of transportation is authorized to proceed with
the SR 519 Intermodal Access project if the city of Seattle has not
agreed to a project configuration or design by July 1, 2006.
(10) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$14,214,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.10.843.
(11) The special category C account--state appropriation includes
up to $1,710,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.812.
(12) The department should consider using mitigation banking on
appropriate projects whenever possible, without increasing the cost to
projects. The department should consider using the advanced
environmental mitigation revolving account (AEMRA) for corridor and
watershed based mitigation opportunities, in addition to project
specific mitigation.
(13) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a planning study regarding congestion mitigation
improvements on state route 101 in the vicinity of the city of
Aberdeen.
(14) $6,200,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for eastern Washington international border crossing
and freight mobility projects, including pavement preservation,
pavement structural strengthening, and other safety enhancements.
Projects shall include funding for U.S. route 97 international border
vicinity paving and improvement projects.
(15) $3,509,738 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
and $30,793 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation are
provided solely for project 100598C: I-5 Blaine Exit interchange
improvements.
(((17))) (16) The legislature recognizes that the finance and
project implementation planning processes required for the Alaskan Way
viaduct and Seattle Seawall replacement project and the SR 520 bridge
replacement and HOV project cannot guarantee appropriate decisions
unless key study assumptions are reasonable with respect to each
project.
To assure appropriate finance plan and project implementation plan
assumptions, an expert review panel shall be appointed to provide
independent financial and technical review for development of a finance
plan and project implementation plan for the projects described in this
subsection.
(a) The expert review panel shall consist of five to ten members
who are recognized experts in relevant fields, such as planning,
engineering, finance, law, the environment, emerging transportation
technologies, geography, and economics.
(b) The expert review panel shall be selected cooperatively by the
chairs of the senate and house transportation committees, the secretary
of the department of transportation, and the governor to assure a
balance of disciplines.
(c) The chair of the expert review panel shall be designated by the
governor.
(d) The expert panel shall, with respect to completion of the
project alternatives as described in the draft environmental impact
statement of each project:
(i) Review the finance plan for the project to ensure that it
clearly identifies secured and anticipated funding sources and is
feasible and sufficient;
(ii) Review the project implementation plan covering all state and
local permitting and mitigation approvals that ensure the most
expeditious and cost-effective delivery of the project; and
(iii) Report its findings and recommendations on the items
described in (d)(i) and (ii) of this subsection to the joint
transportation committee, the office of financial management, and the
governor no later than September 1, 2006.
(e) Upon receipt of the expert review panel's findings and
recommendations under (d)(iii) of this subsection, the governor must
make a finding of whether each finance plan is feasible and sufficient
to complete the project as described in the draft environmental impact
statement.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to delay
construction of any of the projects referenced in this subsection.
(((18))) (17)(a) Prior to commencing construction on either
project, the department of transportation must complete all of the
following requirements for both the Alaskan Way viaduct and Seattle
Seawall replacement project, and the state route number 520 bridge
replacement and HOV project: (i) In accordance with the national
environmental policy act, the department must designate the preferred
alternative, prepare a substantial project mitigation plan, and
complete a comprehensive cost estimate review using the department's
cost estimate validation process, for each project; (ii) in accordance
with all applicable federal highway administration planning and project
management requirements, the department must prepare a project finance
plan for each project that clearly identifies secured and anticipated
fund sources, cash flow timing requirements, and project staging and
phasing plans if applicable; and (iii) the department must report these
results for each project to the joint transportation committee.
(b) The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to (i)
utility relocation work, and related activities, on the Alaskan Way
viaduct and Seattle Seawall replacement project and (ii) off-site
pontoon construction supporting the state route number 520 bridge
replacement and HOV project.

Sec. 304 2006 c 370 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,687,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,799,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($435,310,000))
$434,483,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,485,000
Puyallup Tribal Settlement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,540,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($575,821,000))
$574,994,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by fund, project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document
2006-1, Highway Preservation Program (P) as developed March 8, 2006.
However, limited transfers of allocations between projects may occur
for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in
section 603 of this act.
(2) $11,000,000 of the Puyallup tribal settlement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mitigation costs associated with
the Murray Morgan/11th Street Bridge demolition. The department may
negotiate with the city of Tacoma for the purpose of transferring
ownership of the Murray Morgan/11th Street Bridge to the city. The
department may use the Puyallup tribal settlement account
appropriation, as well as any funds appropriated in the current
biennium and planned in future biennia for the demolition and
mitigation for the demolition of the bridge to rehabilitate or replace
the bridge, if agreed to by the city. In no event shall the
department's participation exceed $26,500,000 and no funds may be
expended unless the city of Tacoma agrees to take ownership of the
bridge in its entirety and provide that the payment of these funds
extinguishes any real or implied agreements regarding future
expenditures on the bridge.
(3) $740,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation,
$106,149,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation, and
$10,305,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the Hood Canal bridge project.
(4) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$735,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for emergency purposes.
(5) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(6) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2005, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each project in the project lists
submitted pursuant to this act. Other projects may be reported on a
programmatic basis. The department shall work with the office of
financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature to agree on report formatting and elements. Elements shall
include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs.
The department shall also provide the information required under this
subsection on a quarterly basis via the transportation executive
information systems (TEIS).
(7) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$912,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.10.843.
(8) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$6,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843.
(9) (($4,000,000)) $3,200,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation and $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation, as specified in subsection (8) of this section, are for
expenditures on damaged state roads due to flooding, mudslides, rock
fall, or other unforeseen events. Slide repair on state routes 101, 4,
107, and 105 must be funded from this amount if federal emergency funds
are not available.

Sec. 305 2006 c 370 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,998,000))
$41,203,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,340,000))
$5,954,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,008,000
Freight Mobility Investment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,000,000))
$2,850,000
Passenger Ferry Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,403,000))
$33,285,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,700,000))
$2,440,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account--
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,050,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($125,815,000))
$102,156,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to programs I and P and state funds shall be
transferred from programs I and P to program Z to replace those federal
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department may not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the office of financial management. The
department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2006.
(2) The department shall, on a quarterly basis, provide status
reports to the legislature on the delivery of projects as outlined in
the project lists distributed with this act, and on any additional
projects for which the department has expended funds during the 2005-07
fiscal biennium, except for projects managed by the freight mobility
strategic investment board. The department shall work with the
transportation committees of the legislature to agree on report
formatting and elements. For projects funded by new revenue in the
2003 and 2005 transportation packages, reporting elements shall
include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs.
Other projects may be reported on a programmatic basis. The department
shall also provide the information required under this subsection on a
quarterly basis via the transportation executive information system
(TEIS).
(3) The multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation
includes up to $6,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized
by RCW 47.10.867.
(4) $1,545,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to fund the
multiphase cooperative project with the state of Oregon to dredge the
Columbia River. The amount provided in this subsection shall lapse
unless the state of Oregon appropriates a dollar-for-dollar match to
fund its share of the project.
(5) $206,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
reappropriated and provided solely for additional traffic and
pedestrian safety improvements near schools. The highways and local
programs division within the department of transportation shall
administer this program. The department shall review all projects
receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to
determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any
project that has been awarded traffic and pedestrian safety improvement
grant funds, but does not report activity on the project within one
year of grant award should be reviewed by the department to determine
whether the grant should be terminated. The department must promptly
close out grants when projects have been completed, and identify where
unused grant funds remain because actual project costs were lower than
estimated in the grant award. The department shall expeditiously
extend new grant awards to qualified projects when funds become
available either because grant awards have been rescinded for lack of
sufficient project activity or because completed projects returned
excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(6) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$905,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843.
(7) $607,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to support the safe
routes to school program.
(8) (($16,110,000)) $7,488,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation is provided solely for the local freight capital
projects in progress identified in this subsection. The specific
funding listed is provided solely for the respective projects: SR 397
Ainsworth Ave. Grade Crossing, $4,992,000; Colville Alternate Truck
Route, $1,746,000; ((S. 228th Street Extension and Grade Separation,
$6,500,000; Bigelow Gulch Road-Urban Boundary to Argonne Rd.,
$2,000,000; Granite Falls Alternate Route, $122,000;)) and Pacific Hwy.
E./Port of Tacoma Road to Alexander, $750,000.
(9) (($2,898,000)) $1,011,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the local freight capital projects
in progress identified in this subsection. The specific funding listed
is provided solely for the respective projects: Duwamish Intelligent
Transportation Systems (ITS), (($2,382,000)) $495,000; Port of
Kennewick/Piert Road, $516,000.
(10) $6,000,000 of the multimodal account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the local freight 'D' street grade separation
project.
(11) The department shall issue a call for pedestrian safety
projects, such as safe routes to schools and transit, and bicycle and
pedestrian paths. Applications must be received by the department by
November 1, 2005, and November 1, 2006. The department shall identify
cost-effective projects, and submit a prioritized list to the
legislature for funding by December 15th of each year. Recommendations
made to the legislature for safe routes to schools and bicycle and
pedestrian path projects must, to the extent practicable based on
available funding, allocate sixty percent of available funds to bicycle
and pedestrian path projects and forty percent to safe routes to
schools. Preference shall be given to projects that provide a local
match.
(12) (($18,370,000)) $12,000,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation, (($6,000,000)) $2,440,000 of the freight
mobility multimodal account--state appropriation, $2,008,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation, and
(($6,000,000)) $2,850,000 of the freight mobility investment account--state appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities
as listed by fund, project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document
2006-1, Local Programs (Z) as developed March 8, 2006. However,
limited transfers of allocations between projects may occur for those
amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 603
of this act.
(13) $870,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Yakima Avenue, 9th Street to
Front Street, pedestrian safety improvement project.
(14) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the pedestrian and bicycle safety
program projects and safe routes to schools program projects identified
on the LEAP Transportation Document 2006-B, Pedestrian and Bicycle
Safety Program Projects and Safe Routes to Schools Program Projects as
developed March 8, 2006. Projects must be allocated funding based on
order of priority. The department shall review all projects receiving
grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine
whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project
that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the
project within one year of the grant award, shall be reviewed by the
department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The
department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and identify where unused grant funds remain because actual
project costs were lower than estimated in the grant award. When funds
become available either because grant awards have been rescinded for
lack of sufficient project activity or because completed projects
returned excess grant funds upon project closeout, the department shall
expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified alternative projects
identified on the list.
(15) $9,700,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for the intersection and corridor safety program
projects as identified on the LEAP Transportation Document 2006-A,
Intersection and Corridor Safety Program Projects as developed March 8,
2006.
(16) $19,500,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation is provided solely for rural county two-lane roadway
pilot projects including $7,500,000 already under contract. Any
further allocations shall be prioritized by the department based on
high-accident-corridor criteria. For purposes of this subsection,
"high-accident-corridor" means a highway corridor of one mile or more
where analysis of collision history indicates that the section has
higher than average collision and severity factors.
(17) $2,500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the Yakima downtown futures initiative.
(18) $810,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the projects identified in this
subsection: Des Moines creek trail, $250,000; SR 282 to Port of
Ephrata connector, $385,000; Mount Baker Ridge viewpoint, $175,000.
(((20))) (19) $688,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation is provided solely for completion of the Coal Creek
Parkway project.
(((21))) (20) $9,000,000 of the passenger ferry account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the
passenger-only ferry grant program created in Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6787. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 6787 is not enacted by June
30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(21) $827,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for the projects identified in this subsection: The
Franklin county slide project, $800,000; and the Loomis-Oroville Road
guardrail replacement project, $27,000.
(22) $252,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Winthrop pedestrian and bike
path project.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 401 2006 c 370 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND
DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND
REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($334,313,000))
$329,713,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,091,000))
$5,791,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,241,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,923,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($682,000))
$782,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($370,000))
$390,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,600,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,125,000))
$975,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($418,465,000))
$413,535,000

Sec. 402 2006 c 370 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND
FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,000))
$18,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $375,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,871,000))
$2,876,000

Sec. 403 2006 c 370 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($487,612,000))
$468,391,000

Sec. 404 2006 c 370 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account--State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,037,342,000))
$1,031,321,000

Sec. 405 2006 c 370 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSFERS
(1) RV Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$815,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,000,000))
$70,223,000
(3) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(4) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,000,000))
$50,680,000
(5) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Partnership
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,127,000
(6) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,980,000
(7) Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Small City Pavement and Sidewalk
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
(8) Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Improvement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
(9) Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the County Arterial Preservation
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
(10) License Plate Technology Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
(11) Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Partnership
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,417,000
(12) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Freight Mobility Multimodal
Account--State, up to a maximum of . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,700,000))
$3,537,000
(13) Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
(14) Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Freight Mobility Multimodal
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,610,000

(15) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000
The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of transportation shall only transfer funds in
subsection (2) of this section up to the level provided, on an as-needed basis.
(b) The amount transferred in subsection (12) of this section shall
be the same as the Union Pacific Railroad's original contribution,
adjusted for earned interest and expenditures, and shall be made on
June 30, 2006.
(c) The amount transferred in subsection (14) of this section is
the equivalent of the Burlington Northern Santa Fe funds advanced to
the SR 519 project and shall be invested in a freight mobility project
agreed to by the freight mobility strategic investment board and the
BNSF railway if the final design of the SR 519 project does not include
the original rail benefit.

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 1
COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
--- END ---