BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
2007-09 BIENNIUM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The transportation budget of the state
is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several
amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish
the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices
for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and
for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final
judgments arising out of such activities, for the period ending June
30, 2009.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2008" or "FY 2008" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2008.
(b) "Fiscal year 2009" or "FY 2009" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2009.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose which is not expended subject to the specified conditions and
limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.
(f) "Reappropriation" means appropriation and, unless the context
clearly provides otherwise, is subject to the relevant conditions and
limitations applicable to appropriations.
(g) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES -- OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,645,000

(1) $850,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the continued maintenance and support of the
transportation executive information system (TEIS).
(2) $795,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for development of a new transportation capital
budgeting system and transition of a copy of the TEIS system to LEAP.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Grade Crossing Protective Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $505,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,054,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,545,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the office of regulatory assistance integrated
permitting project.
(2) $75,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to address transportation budget and reporting
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $985,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation in this section
is provided solely for road maintenance purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,358,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $351,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for costs associated with the motor fuel quality
program.
(2) $1,007,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to test the quality of biofuel. The department must
test fuel quality at the manufacturer, distributor, and retailer level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is provided
solely for staffing costs to be dedicated to state transportation
activities. Staff hired to support transportation activities must have
practical experience with complex construction projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND
REVIEW COMMITTEE
As part of its 2007-09 biennium work plan, the joint legislative
audit and review committee shall:
(1) Review the Washington state ferries' assignment of preservation
costs as required by Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2358, for
fiscal year 2008, to determine whether costs are capital costs and
whether they meet the statutory requirements for preservation
activities, and report to the legislature not later than January, 2009;
and
(2) Evaluate the Washington state ferries' implementation of the
life cycle cost model, as required by Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 2358, and report to the legislature not later than June 30, 2009,
on whether the model:
(a) Complies with available industry standards or department-adopted standards when industry standards are not available;
(b) Is maintained and updated when asset inspections are made; and
(c) Is used to appropriately develop maintenance, preservation, and
improvement plans and capital project lists.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY
COMMISSION
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,601,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,884,000
School Zone Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,785,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $905,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,071,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $918,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,894,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,791,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,793,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,584,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,156,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,153,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2358
(regarding state ferries). In addition to committee members, or their
designees, the committee shall request the governor to appoint a
representative, and the committee may appoint other persons, to assist
in the committee's review of the department of transportation's
implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2358. The
committee shall report the progress and results of these tasks to the
legislative transportation committees by December 15, 2007. The joint
transportation committee shall:
(a) As directed by Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2358, review
the operational and pricing strategies, justification for preservation
funding, survey of ferry customers, reestablishment of vehicle level of
service standards, terminal design standards, and long-range capital
plan. The review of the customer survey shall include participation in
the development, and reviewing the results of, the survey;
(b) Review the Washington state ferries' update of the terminal
life cycle cost model directed by Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2358;
(c) Evaluate the maintenance and capital cost allocation
methodology developed by the department to implement Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2358;
(d) Participate in the reconciliation of the ridership demand
forecasts used in the Washington state ferries draft long-range
strategic plan, and review the update of the plan and forecasts;
(e) Review and evaluate the following Washington state ferries'
programs and expenditures:
(i) Administrative operating costs;
(ii) Nonlabor and nonfuel operating costs;
(iii) Eagle Harbor maintenance facility program and maintenance
costs;
(iv) Administrative and systemwide capital costs; and
(v) Vessel preservation costs; and
(f) To the extent that Washington State ferries' capital needs are
determined by the methods identified in Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 2358, identify financing alternatives for the ferries' capital
needs.
(2) The joint transportation committee shall conduct a review of
the Washington state patrol aviation section including aircraft usage,
cost reimbursement methodologies, and aviation facilities. A final
report on findings and recommendations must be submitted to the
transportation committees of the legislature on or before December 1,
2007.
(3) $400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2101 (regional
transportation). If House Bill No. 2101 is not enacted by June 30,
2007, this amount shall lapse.
(4) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1694
(coordinated transportation). If Substitute House Bill No. 1694 is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, this amount shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,327,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,439,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Until construction is complete and all
lanes are open to traffic, the transportation commission shall
implement $1.50 tolls for all users of the Good To Go electronic toll
collection program on the Tacoma Narrows bridge in order to create an
incentive for electronic toll payers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT BOARD
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,015,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,143,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The freight mobility strategic investment board shall, on a
quarterly basis and in a format approved by the transportation
committees of the legislature and the office of financial management,
provide status reports to the office of financial management and the
transportation committees of the legislature on the delivery of
projects funded by this act.
(2) The freight mobility strategic investment board and the
department of transportation shall collaborate to submit a report to
the office of financial management and the transportation committees of
the legislature by September 1, 2008, listing proposed freight highway
and rail projects. The report must describe the analysis used for
selecting such projects, as required by chapter 46.06A RCW for the
board and as required by this act for the department.
(3) $320,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and
$128,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are
provided solely for development of a freight database to help guide
freight investment decisions and track project effectiveness. The
database will be based on truck movement tracked through geographic
information system technology. TransNow will contribute an additional
$192,000 in federal funds which are not appropriated in the
transportation budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD
OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $227,248,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,602,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $410,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,260,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed
employment providing traffic control services to the department of
transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles
for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by
the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol
shall be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state
employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines
developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.
(2) In addition to the user fees, the Washington state patrol shall
transfer into the state patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving
account under RCW 43.79.470 no more than the amount of appropriated
state patrol highway account and general fund funding necessary to
cover the costs for the patrol's use of the aircraft. The state patrol
highway account and general fund -- state funds shall be transferred
proportionately in accordance with a cost allocation that
differentiates between highway traffic enforcement services and general
policing purposes.
(3) The Washington state patrol shall not account for or record
locally provided DUI cost reimbursement payments as expenditure credits
to the state patrol highway account. The Washington state patrol shall
report the amount of expected locally provided DUI cost reimbursements
to the governor and the legislative transportation committees by
September 30th of each year.
(4) $1,662,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1304 (commercial vehicle enforcement). If Substitute
House Bill No. 1304 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this amount shall
lapse.
(5) During fiscal year 2008, the Washington state patrol shall
continue to perform traffic accident investigations on Thurston, Mason,
and Lewis county roads. The Washington state patrol shall work with
the counties to transition the traffic accident investigations on
county roads to the counties by July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,597,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,170,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,008,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,178,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The Washington state patrol shall work with the risk management
division in the office of financial management in compiling the
Washington state patrol's data for establishing the agency's risk
management insurance premiums to the tort claims account. The office
of financial management and the Washington state patrol shall submit a
report to the legislative transportation committees by December 31st of
each year on the number of claims, estimated claims to be paid, method
of calculation, and the adjustment in the premium.
(2) $12,641,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
automobile fuel in the 2007-2009 biennium.
(3) $8,678,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
the purchase of pursuit vehicles.
(4) $5,254,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
vehicle repair and maintenance costs of vehicles used for highway
purposes.
(5) $384,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for the
purchase of mission vehicles used for highway purposes in the
commercial vehicle and traffic investigation sections of the Washington
state patrol.
(6) The Washington state patrol may submit information technology
related requests for funding only if the department has coordinated
with
the department of information services as required by section 602
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- CRIMINAL
HISTORY AND BACKGROUND CHECKS. In accordance with RCW 10.97.100 and
chapter 43.43 RCW, the Washington state patrol is authorized to collect
reasonable fees to perform criminal history and background checks for
state and local agencies and nonprofit and other private entities and
disseminate the records resulting from these activities. For each type
of criminal history and background check and dissemination of these
records, the Washington state patrol shall, as nearly as practicable,
set fees at levels sufficient to cover the direct and indirect costs.
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
Washington state patrol may increase fees in excess of the fiscal
growth factor if the increases are necessary to fully fund the cost of
supervision and regulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $132,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,622,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,107,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Department of Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $124,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,104,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $91,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and
$152,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation are
provided solely for contracting with the office of the attorney general
to investigate criminal activity uncovered in the course of the
agency's licensing and regulatory activities. Funding is provided for
the 2008 fiscal year. The department may request funding for the 2009
fiscal year if the request is submitted with measurable data indicating
the department's progress in meeting its goal of increased prosecution
of illegal activity.
(2) $182,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1267 (modifying commercial driver's license requirements). If
Substitute House Bill No. 1267 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this
amount shall lapse. The department shall informally report to the
legislature by December 1, 2008, with measurable data indicating the
department's progress in meeting its goal of improving public safety by
improving the quality of the commercial driver's license testing
process.
(3) $23,000 of the motorcycle safety education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5273 (motorcycle driver's license endorsement and education). If
Senate Bill No. 5273 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this amount shall
lapse. Funding is provided for the 2008 fiscal year. The department
may request funding for the 2009 fiscal year if the request is
submitted with an analysis of workload impacts following the initial
reviews of motorcycle safety training curriculums.
(4) $434,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for costs associated with the systems development and
issuance of enhanced drivers' licenses and identicards to facilitate
crossing the Canadian border. If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
1289 (relating to the issuance of enhanced drivers' licenses and
identicards) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this amount shall lapse.
The department may expend funds only after acceptance of the enhanced
Washington state driver's license for border crossing purposes by the
Canadian and United States governments. The department may expend
funds only after prior written approval of the director of financial
management.
(5) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1046 (meeting financial responsibility requirements for automobiles).
If Substitute House Bill No. 1046 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this
amount shall lapse.
(6) $13,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1588
(providing mobility education to students in driver training
programs). If Substitute House Bill No. 1588 is not enacted by June
30, 2007, this amount shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- INFORMATION SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Washington State Patrol Highway Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,126,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,234,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,286,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Department of Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,508,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,758,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $153,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1267 (modifying commercial driver's license requirements). If
Substitute House Bill No. 1267 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this
amount shall lapse. The department shall informally report to the
legislature by December 1, 2008, with measurable data indicating the
department's progress in meeting its goal of improving public safety by
improving the quality of the commercial driver's license testing
process.
(2) $17,000 of the motorcycle safety education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5273 (motorcycle driver's license endorsement and education). If
Senate Bill No. 5273 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this amount shall
lapse. Funding is provided for fiscal year 2008. The department may
request funding for fiscal year 2009 if the request is submitted with
an analysis of workload impacts following the initial reviews of
motorcycle safety training curriculums.
(3) $6,014,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for costs associated with the systems development
and issuance of enhanced drivers' licenses and identicards to
facilitate crossing the Canadian border. If Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 1289 (relating to the issuance of enhanced drivers' licenses
and identicards) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this amount shall
lapse. The department may expend funds only after acceptance of the
enhanced Washington state driver's license for border crossing purposes
by the Canadian and United States governments. The department may
expend funds only after prior written approval of the director of
financial management.
(4) $225,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1046 (meeting financial responsibility requirements for automobiles).
If Substitute House Bill No. 1046 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this
amount shall lapse.
(5) $1,126,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1304 (modifying commercial motor vehicle carrier
provisions). If Substitute House Bill No. 1304 is not enacted by June
30, 2007, this amount shall lapse.
(6) $7,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1588 (providing mobility education to students in driver training
programs). If Substitute House Bill No. 1588 is not enacted by June
30, 2007, this amount shall lapse.
(7) The department may submit information technology related
requests for funding only if the department has coordinated with the
department of information services as required by section 602 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- VEHICLE
SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Washington State Patrol Highway Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $694,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,169,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $872,000
Department of Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $902,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,142,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $975,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1046 (meeting financial responsibility requirements for automobiles).
If Substitute House Bill No. 1046 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this
amount shall lapse.
(2) $19,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1304 (modifying commercial motor vehicle carrier
provisions). If Substitute House Bill No. 1304 is not enacted by June
30, 2007, this amount shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER
SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,357,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,357,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $233,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,947,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,606,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1267 (modifying commercial driver's license requirements). If
Substitute House Bill No. 1267 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this
amount shall lapse. The department shall informally report to the
legislature by December 1, 2008, with measurable data indicating the
department's progress in meeting its goal of improving public safety by
improving the quality of the commercial driver's license testing
process.
(2) $319,000 of the motorcycle safety education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementing Senate Bill No. 5273
(motorcycle driver's license endorsement and education). If Senate
Bill No. 5273 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this amount shall lapse.
Funding is provided for fiscal year 2008. The department may request
funding for fiscal year 2009 if the request is submitted with an
analysis of workload impacts following the initial reviews of
motorcycle safety training curriculums.
(3) $2,424,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for costs associated with the systems development
and issuance of enhanced drivers' licenses and identicards to
facilitate crossing the Canadian border. If Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 1289 (relating to the issuance of enhanced drivers' licenses
and identicards) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this amount shall
lapse. The department may expend funds only after acceptance of the
enhanced Washington state driver's license for border crossing purposes
by the Canadian and United States governments. The department may
expend funds only after prior written approval of the director of
financial management.
(4) $180,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1588 (providing mobility education to students in driver training
programs). If Substitute House Bill No. 1588 is not enacted by June
30, 2007, this amount shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE
High-Occupancy Toll Lanes Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,436,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,236,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,572,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,556,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,660,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,096,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,184,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,859,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department must consult with the office of financial
management and the department of information services to ensure that:
(a) The department's current and future system development is
consistent with the overall direction of other key state systems which
includes but is not limited to project management, accounting and
budgeting, cost allocation, and human resource systems.
(b) The systems that the department is using are consistent with
common statewide information systems to encourage coordination and
integration of information used by other state agencies and to avoid
duplication of systems and applications.
(2) The department shall develop the project management and
reporting system which is a collection of integrated tools for capital
construction project managers to use to perform all the necessary tasks
associated with project management. The department shall integrate
commercial off-the-shelf software with existing department systems and
enhanced approaches to data management to provide web-based access for
multi-level reporting and improved business workflows and reporting.
Beginning September 1, 2007, and on a quarterly basis thereafter, the
department shall report to the office of financial management and the
transportation committees of the legislature on the status of the
development and integration of the system. The first report shall
include a detailed work plan for the development and integration of the
system including timelines and budget milestones. At a minimum the
ensuing reports shall indicate the status of the work as it compares to
the work plan, any discrepancies, and proposed adjustments necessary to
bring the project back on schedule or budget if necessary.
(3) $5,006,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department of transportation to join the state
government network, which includes a complete inventory and diagram of
the department's information systems network and infrastructure along
with resolving the identified security concerns (servers, mainframes,
software, circuits, equipment, ports, IP addressing, fiberoptic lines,
etc.). This amount also includes sufficient funds for the department's
mainframe migration to the department of information services.
(4) The department may submit information technology related
requests for funding only if the department has coordinated with the
department of information services as required by section 602 of this
act.
(5) The department shall submit a progress report on the critical
application feasibility study to the house of representatives and
senate transportation committees on or before December 1, 2007, and
December 1, 2008, with a final report on or before June 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,547,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- AVIATION
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,885,000
Aeronautics Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $631,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,666,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire multimodal transportation
account -- state appropriation is provided solely for the aviation
planning council as provided for in RCW 47.68.410.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,374,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,968,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $2,422,000 of the transportation
partnership account appropriation and $2,422,000 of the transportation
2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation are provided solely
for consultant contracts to assist the department in the delivery of
the capital construction program by identifying improvements to program
delivery, program management, project controls, program and project
monitoring, forecasting, and reporting. The consultants shall work
with the department of information services in the development of the
project management and reporting system.
The consultants shall provide an updated copy of the capital
construction strategic plan to the legislative transportation
committees and to the office of financial management on June 30, 2008,
and each year thereafter.
The consultants shall also coordinate their work with other budget
and performance efforts, including Roadmap, the joint transportation
committee budget study, the findings of the critical applications
modernization and integration strategies study, including proposed next
steps, and the priorities of government process.
The department shall report to the transportation committees of the
house of representatives and senate, and the office of financial
management, by December 31, 2007, on the implementation status of
recommended capital budgeting and reporting options. Options must
include: Reporting against legislatively-established project
identification numbers and may include recommendations for reporting
against other appropriate project groupings; measures for reporting
progress, timeliness, and cost which create an incentive for the
department to manage effectively and report its progress in a
transparent manner; and criteria and process for transfers of funds
among projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $951,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $321,568,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,797,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $329,365,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations must be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account -- private/local
appropriation.
(4) Funding is provided for maintenance on the state system to
allow for a continuation of the level of service targets included in
the 2005-07 biennium. In delivering the program, the department should
concentrate on the following areas:
(a) Meeting or exceeding the target for structural bridge repair on
a statewide basis;
(b) Eliminating the number of activities delivered in the "f" level
of service at the region level;
(c) Reducing the number of activities delivered in the "d" level of
service by increasing the resources directed to those activities on a
statewide and region basis;
(d) Evaluating, analyzing, and potentially redistributing resources
within and among regions to provide greater consistency in delivering
the program statewide and in achieving overall level of service
targets; and
(e) Raising the current targets to the average service levels
attained over the previous three calendar years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,980,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,157,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $654,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to time state-owned and operated
traffic signals. This funding may also be used to program incident,
emergency, or special event signal timing plans.
(2) $346,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to implement a pilot tow truck
incentive program. The department may provide incentive payments to
towing companies that meet clearance goals on accidents that involve
heavy trucks.
(3) $6,800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give
priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or
provide congestion relief. The department shall prioritize low-cost
enhancement projects on a statewide rather than regional basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,171,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,321,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,495,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall conduct a study to
determine the resources needed to transition from using the
transportation executive information system for budget preparation to
using the capital budget system being developed by the office of
financial management. The report must include the amount of additional
effort necessary for the department to prepare, submit, and report on
capital budget requests submitted using the office of financial
management's capital budget system. The department shall give
consideration to future approaches to developing and presenting the
department's budget such as those recommended in the joint
transportation committee's budget methodology study. The department
must submit its report to the office of financial management and the
legislative transportation committees by September 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,424,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,035,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,027,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,809,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,295,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,900,000 of the transportation partnership account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the costs of the regional
transportation investment district (RTID) and department of
transportation project oversight. The department shall provide support
from its urban corridors region to assist in preparing project costs,
expenditure plans, and modeling. The department shall not deduct a
management reserve, nor charge management or overhead fees. These
funds, including those expended since 2003, are provided as a loan to
the RTID and shall be repaid to the state motor vehicle account within
one year following the certification of the election results related to
the RTID.
(2) $300,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a transportation demand management
program, developed by the Whatcom council of governments, to further
reduce drive-alone trips and maximize the use of sustainable
transportation choices. The community-based program must focus on all
trips, not only commute trips, by providing education, assistance, and
incentives to four target audiences: (a) Large work sites; (b)
employees of businesses in downtown areas; (c) school children; and (d)
residents of Bellingham.
(3) $150,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the costs to develop an electronic map-based
computer application that will enable law enforcement officers and
others to more easily locate collisions and other incidents in the
field.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,710,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $259,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,369,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $33,229,000 of the motor vehicle fund -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the liabilities attributable to the department of
transportation. The office of financial management must provide a
detailed accounting of the revenues and expenditures of the self-insurance fund to the transportation committees of the legislature on
December 31st and June 30th of each year.
(2) Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(a) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
DIVISION OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,520,000
(b) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000
(c) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED
MAIL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,157,000
(d) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,033,000
(e) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY
PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,229,000
(f) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,838,000
(g) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . $647,000
(h) FOR OFFICE OF MINORITIES AND WOMEN BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,070,000
(i) FOR USE OF FINANCIAL SYSTEMS PROVIDED BY
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . $930,000
(j) FOR POLICY ASSISTANCE FROM THE DEPARTMENT
OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,138,000
(k) FOR LEGAL SERVICE PROVIDED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL'S OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,859,000
(l) FOR LEGAL SERVICE PROVIDED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL'S OFFICE FOR THE SECOND PHASE OF THE BOLDT
LITIGATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,000
(m) FOR FERRY INSURANCE INCREASE . . . . . . . . . . . . $804,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION
Regional Mobility Grant Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,994,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,582,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $291,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,867,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation.
(a) $5,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs
transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers shall be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $19,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons
with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit
agency must have a maintenance of effort for special needs
transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of
effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies
shall be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response
service and route deviated service in calendar year 2005 as reported in
the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2005" published by the
department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than
thirty percent of these distributions.
(2) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $8,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the "Summary of
Public Transportation - 2005" published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $8,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(3) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a)
Public transit agencies to add vanpools; and (b) incentives for
employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for
public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; no operating
costs for public transit agencies are eligible for funding under this
grant program. No additional employees may be hired from the funds
provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting
of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. Additional
criteria for selecting grants must include leveraging funds other than
state funds.
(4) $40,000,000 of the regional mobility grant program account--state appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant
projects identified on the LEAP Transportation Document 2007-D,
Regional Mobility Grant Program Projects as developed March 19, 2007.
The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards under
this program at least semiannually to determine whether the projects
are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded
funds, but does not report activity on the project within one year of
the grant award, shall be reviewed by the department to determine
whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall promptly
close out grants when projects have been completed, and identify where
unused grant funds remain because actual project costs were lower than
estimated in the grant award. When funds become available either
because grant awards have been rescinded for lack of sufficient project
activity or because completed projects returned excess grant funds upon
project closeout, the department shall expeditiously extend new grant
awards to qualified alternative projects identified on the list.
(5) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for new tri-county connection service
for Island, Skagit, and Whatcom transit agencies. In the future, the
Island, Skagit, and Whatcom transit agencies shall apply to the
regional mobility grant program for funding.
(6) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to King county as a state match to
obtain federal funding for a car sharing program for persons meeting
certain income or employment criteria. In the future, King county
shall apply to the regional mobility grant program for funding.
(7) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the commute trip reduction program
to allocate among the following: The growth and transportation
efficiency center program, vanpool expansion, and the trip reduction
performance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 228 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION --
MARINE
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $414,759,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,830,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,589,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $79,191,000 of the total appropriation is for ferry vessel
operating fuel in the 2007-2009 biennium.
(2) $1,116,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for ferry security operations
necessary to comply with the ferry security plan submitted by the
Washington state ferry system to the United States coast guard. The
department shall track security costs and expenditures. Ferry security
operations costs shall not be included as part of the operational costs
that are used to calculate farebox recovery.
(3) The Washington state ferries must work with the department's
information technology division to implement an electronic fare system,
including the integration of the regional fare coordination system
(smart card). Each December and June, semiannual updates must be
provided to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning
the status of implementing and completing this project, with updates
concluding the first December after full project implementation.
(4) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide service
to Sidney, British Columbia.
(5) $1,830,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to provide passenger-only ferry
service. The ferry system shall continue passenger-only ferry service
from Vashon Island to Seattle through June 30, 2008. Ferry system
management shall continue to implement its agreement with the
inlandboatmen's union of the pacific and the international organization
of masters, mates and pilots providing for part-time passenger-only
work schedules.
(6) $932,000 of the Puget Sound ferries operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for compliance with department of
ecology rules regarding the transfer of oil on or near state waters.
Funding for compliance with on-board fueling rules is provided for the
2008 fiscal year. The department may request funding for the 2009
fiscal year if the request is submitted with an alternative compliance
plan filed with the department of ecology, as allowed by rule.
(7) $378,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely to meet the United States coast guard
requirements for appropriate rest hours between shifts for vessel crews
on the Bainbridge to Seattle and Edmonds to Kingston ferry routes.
(8) $1,044,000 of the Puget Sound ferries operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2358 (relating to state ferries), including,
but not limited to:
(a) Analysis of the level of service standards for state ferry
routes, including determining if boat wait is the appropriate measure;
(b) Development of a cost allocation methodology to conform to the
definitions and capital expenditure requirements in Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2358;
(c) A survey to gather data on ferry users and help inform level of
service, operational, pricing, planning, and investment decisions;
(d) Development of operational and pricing strategies to ensure
existing assets are fully utilized and to guide future investment
decisions, including an evaluation of the one-way fare collection
policy;
(e) Update of the life cycle cost model on capital assets;
(f) Completion of the required predesign studies;
(g) Development of terminal design standards; and
(h) Updating the Washington state ferries long range strategic
plan, including reconciliation of the ridership demand forecasts.
If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2358 is not enacted by June
30, 2007, this amount shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 229 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,030,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall publish a final long-range plan for Amtrak
Cascades by September 30, 2007. By December 31, 2008, the department
shall submit to the office of financial management and the
transportation
committees of the legislature a midrange plan for Amtrak
Cascades that identifies specific steps the department would propose to
achieve additional service beyond current levels.
(2)(a) $29,091,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service contract and
Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and maintaining
the state-supported passenger rail service. Upon completion of the
rail platform project in the city of Stanwood, the department shall
provide daily Amtrak Cascades service to the city.
(b) The department shall negotiate with Amtrak and Burlington
Northern Santa Fe to adjust the Amtrak Cascades schedule to leave
Bellingham at a significantly earlier hour.
(3) No Amtrak Cascade runs may be eliminated.
(4) $40,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the produce railcar program. The
department is encouraged to implement the produce railcar program by
maximizing private investment.
(5) Within the appropriation, the department shall add a position
within the freight office to provide expertise regarding the trucking
aspects of the state's freight system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 230 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,614,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,567,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,181,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- CAPITAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--FUND TRANSFERS
The legislature finds that the delivery of the largest
transportation construction program in the state's history is
threatened by significant project cost increases, many of which are
beyond the state's control, such as extraordinary inflation. The cost
estimates for completing the 2003 and 2005 transportation funding
packages have surpassed the estimated funding resources dedicated to
complete these projects during the sixteen year plan. These
transportation funding packages improve and preserve the state's
transportation infrastructure and contain safety, mobility, and freight
projects which are critical to the state's continued economic growth
and competitiveness.
The legislature further finds that cost estimates for projects that
are in the early stages of design need substantial contingencies to
cover a range of potential costs. This cost range may be reduced by
further engineering work that identifies cost-effective alternative
approaches to deliver the results of the project.
The legislature further finds that management flexibility is needed
to take advantage of opportunities to achieve these results sooner and
at a lower cost and that a management reserve is a useful tool for
addressing minor project implementation issues as they arise.
The legislature intends that the department of transportation
deliver the promised results of the projects funded by the nickel and
transportation partnership acts as identified on the 2007 LEAP lists.
The legislature directs the department to manage project cost increases
by seeking cost-effective means of delivering project results,
including using value engineering, constructability reviews, and
reviewing design standards. In its subsequent biennial budget request,
the department shall clearly identify project results which can be
achieved more cost effectively, those which cannot, and additional
revenue needed to deliver the remainder of the construction program.
For the 2007-09 biennium, the department may add up to the greater
of $500,000 or five percent of the project budget from the management
reserve to a project budget once during the 2007-09 biennium. The
department may only make withdrawals from the management reserve above
these thresholds with approval from the office of financial management.
The office of financial management may only approve such withdrawals to
keep a project moving and must assure that approval does not negatively
impact the overall project list for the 2007-09 biennium.
If the management reserve does not have sufficient resources to
accommodate project delivery, the department of transportation may
identify projects experiencing unavoidable implementation delays and
request that the office of financial management transfer funds from
that project to the management reserve. Any savings in nickel or
transportation partnership act funds from a project that is completed
under budget shall be deposited into the management reserve.
For budget accountability and transparency, the department must
report quarterly to the governor and the legislature its progress
compared to the legislative baseline funding and schedules by project
identification numbers used in the LEAP lists adopted in sections 306,
307, and 309 through 311 of this act. The report must also include the
amounts for each project taken from the management reserve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,550,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $863,000 is provided solely for minor works projects.
(2) $687,000 is provided solely for design and construction of
regional wastewater treatment systems for the Washington state patrol
Shelton academy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,368,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,342,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,710,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,020,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
may be used for county ferries. The board shall review the requests
for county ferry funding in consideration with other projects funded
from the board. If the board determines these projects are a priority
over the projects in the rural arterial and county arterial
preservation grant programs, then they may provide funding for these
requests.
(2) $481,000 of the county arterial preservation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for continued development and
implementation of a maintenance management system to manage county
transportation assets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Small City Pavement and Sidewalk Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,600,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,643,000
State Capital Building Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $226,493,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The transportation improvement account -- state appropriation
includes up to $7,143,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized
in RCW 47.26.500.
(2) The urban arterial trust account--state appropriation includes
up to $15,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW
47.26.420.
(3) $1,750,000 in the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the city of University Place for
the construction of a town square/plaza and the Drexler Drive
extension.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- CAPITAL FACILITIES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,902,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $584,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for statewide administration.
(2) $750,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for regional minor projects.
(3) $568,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for the Olympic region headquarters property payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- IMPROVEMENTS
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,186,925,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,354,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $403,644,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,436,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,368,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $142,484,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,090,508,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,981,719,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The motor vehicle account -- state appropriation includes up to
$11,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843.
(2) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by fund, project, and amount in the LEAP transportation document
2007-1, dated March 19, 2007. Transfers to specific line-item project
appropriations from the management reserve may occur subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 301 of this act.
(3) The department shall not commence construction on any part of
the SR 520 bridge replacement and HOV project until a record of
decision has been reached providing reasonable assurance that project
impacts will be avoided, minimized, or mitigated as much as practicable
to protect against further adverse impacts on neighborhood
environmental quality as a result of repairs and improvements made to
the SR 520 bridge and its connecting roadways, and that any such
impacts will be addressed through engineering design choices,
mitigation measures, or a combination of both. The requirements of
this section shall not apply to off-site pontoon construction
supporting the SR 520 bridge replacement and HOV project.
(4) The transportation partnership account -- state appropriation
includes up to $860,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.873.
(5) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account -- state appropriation
includes up to $131,016,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843.
(6) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account) -- state
appropriation includes up to $900,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.861.
(7) The special category C account -- state appropriation includes up
to $30,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in House
Bill No. 2394. If House Bill No. 2394 is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
this amount shall lapse.
(8) The department should consider using mitigation banking on
appropriate projects whenever possible, without increasing the cost to
projects. The department should consider using the advanced
environmental mitigation revolving account (AEMRA) for corridor and
watershed based mitigation opportunities, in addition to project
specific mitigation.
(9) The department shall apply for surface transportation program
(STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in the improvement and
preservation programs, including, but not limited to, the SR 167, SR
395, SR 518, SR 519, SR 520, and Alaskan Way Viaduct projects.
(10) The department shall apply for federal transit administration
funds for eligible costs of the SR 520 bridge replacement and HOV
project.
(11) Within the amounts provided in this section, $2,803,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation and $9,187,000
of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation are for project 109040T as identified in the LEAP
transportation document in subsection (2) of this section: I-90/Two
Way Transit-Transit and HOV Improvements - Stage 1. Expenditure of the
funds on construction is contingent upon revising the access plan for
Mercer Island traffic such that Mercer Island traffic will have access
to the outer roadway high occupancy vehicle (HOV) lanes during the
period of operation of such lanes following the removal of Mercer
Island traffic from the center roadway and prior to conversion of the
outer roadway HOV lanes to high occupancy toll (HOT) lanes. Sound
transit may only have access to the center lanes when alternative R8A
is complete.
(12) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2007, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each project in the project lists
submitted pursuant to this act. Other projects may be reported on a
programmatic basis. The department shall work with the office of
financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature to agree on report formatting and elements. Elements shall
include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs.
The department shall also provide the information required under this
subsection on a quarterly basis via the transportation executive
information systems (TEIS).
(13) The funding described in this section includes $8,095,541 of
the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation
and $237,241 of the motor vehicle account--private/local appropriation,
which are provided solely for the SR 519 project. The total project is
expected to cost no more than $74,400,000 including an additional
$8,400,000 in contributions from project partners.
(14) To promote and support community-specific noise reduction
solutions, the department shall:
(a) Prepare a draft directive that establishes how each community's
priorities and concerns may be identified and addressed in order to
allow consideration of a community's preferred methods of advanced
visual shielding and aesthetic screening, for the purpose of improving
the noise environment of major state roadway projects in locations that
do not meet the criteria for standard noise barriers. The intent is
for these provisions to be supportable by existing project budgets.
The directive shall also include direction on the coordination and
selection of visual and aesthetic options with local communities. The
draft directive shall be provided to the standing transportation
committees of the legislature by January 2008; and
(b) Pilot the draft directive established in (a) of this subsection
in two locations along major state roadways. If practicable, the
department should begin work on the pilot projects while the directive
is being developed. One pilot project shall be located in Clark county
on a significant capacity improvement project. The second pilot
project shall be located in urban King county, which shall be on a
corridor highway project through mixed land use areas that is nearing
or under construction. The department shall provide a written report
to the standing transportation committees of the legislature on the
findings of the Clark county pilot project by January 2009, and the
King county pilot project by January 2010. Based on results of the
pilot projects, the department shall update its design manual,
environmental procedures, or other appropriate documents to incorporate
the directive.
(15) Funding allocated for mitigation costs is provided solely for
the purpose of project impact mitigation, and shall not be used to
develop or otherwise participate in the environmental assessment
process.
(16) Of the amounts in this section provided for the SR
304/Bremerton transportation center access improvement tunnel project,
up to $3,000,000 is provided for project cost increases.
(17) If the "Green Highway" provisions of House Bill No. 1303
(cleaner energy) are enacted, the department shall erect signs on the
interstate highways included in those provisions noting that these
interstates have been designated "Washington Green Highways."
(18) Funding provided by this act for the Alaskan Way Viaduct
project shall not be spent for preliminary engineering, design, right-of-way acquisition, or construction on the project if completion of the
project would more likely than not reduce the capacity of the facility.
Capacity shall be measured by including the consideration of the
efficient movement of people and goods on the facility.
(19) If on the I-405/I-90 to SE 8th Street Widening project the
department finds that there is an alternative investment to preserve
reliable rail accessibility to major manufacturing sites within the
I-405 corridor that are less expensive than replacing the Wilburton
Tunnel, the department may enter into the necessary agreements to
implement that alternative provided that costs remain within the
approved project budget.
(20) The governor shall convene a collaborative process involving
key leaders to determine the final project design for the Alaskan Way
Viaduct.
(a) The process shall be guided by the following common principles:
Public safety must be maintained; the final project shall meet both
capacity and mobility needs; and taxpayer dollars must be spent
responsibly.
(b) The state's project expenditures shall not exceed
$2,800,000,000.
(c) A final design decision will be made by December 31, 2008.
(21) During the 2007-09 biennium, the department shall proceed with
a series of projects on the Alaskan Way Viaduct that are common to any
design alternative. Those projects include relocation of two
electrical transmission lines, Battery Street tunnel upgrades, seismic
upgrades from Lenora to the Battery Street tunnel, viaduct removal from
Holgate to King Street, and development of transit enhancements and
other improvements to mitigate congestion during construction.
(22) Within the amounts provided in this section, $11,039,945 of
the transportation 2003 account (nickel)--state appropriation,
$11,798,042 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation, and $3,986,249 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation are provided for project 152219A as identified in the
LEAP transportation document in subsection (2) of this section: SR
522/University of Washington Bothell - Build Interchange. If
Substitute House Bill No. 1092 (capital budget) is enacted without new
appropriations for this project, increases in cost for this project
shall be eligible for a transfer from the management reserve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PRESERVATION
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $221,075,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,591,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,159,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,285,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,791,000
Puyallup Tribal Settlement--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $749,901,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by fund, project, and amount in the LEAP transportation document
2007-1, dated March 19, 2007. Transfers to specific line-item project
appropriations from the management reserve may occur subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 301 of this act.
(2) The motor vehicle account -- state appropriation includes up to
$3,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843.
(3) The department shall apply for surface transportation program
(STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in the improvement and
preservation programs, including, but not limited to, the SR 167, SR
395, SR 518, SR 519, SR 520, and Alaskan Way Viaduct projects.
(4) $9,665 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation,
$12,652,812 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation, and
$138,174,581 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the Hood Canal bridge project.
(5) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(6) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2007, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each project in the project lists
submitted pursuant to this act. Other projects may be reported on a
programmatic basis. The department shall work with the office of
financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature to agree on report formatting and elements. Elements shall
include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs.
The department shall also provide the information required under this
subsection on a quarterly basis via the transportation executive
information systems (TEIS).
(7) $2,604,501 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
and $3,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation are
for expenditures on damaged state roads due to flooding, mudslides,
rock fall, or other unforeseen events. Slide repair on SR 101, SR 4,
SR 107, and SR 105 must be funded from this amount if federal emergency
funds are not available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION --
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,437,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,726,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,237,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The motor vehicle account--state
appropriation includes $2,903,654 provided solely for state matching
funds for federally selected competitive grant or congressional earmark
projects other than the commercial vehicle information systems and
network. These moneys shall be placed into reserve status until such
time as federal funds are secured that require a state match.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,744,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,742,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,600,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,014,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,100,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation and the entire multimodal transportation account
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by fund, project, and amount in the LEAP transportation document
2007-1, dated March 19, 2007. Transfers to specific line-item project
appropriations from the management reserve may occur subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 301 of this act. The department
may use funds from systemwide projects in the LEAP transportation
document 2007-1, dated March 19, 2007, for productive community
conversations regarding terminal improvement projects.
(2) The Puget Sound capital construction account -- state
appropriation includes up to $82,689,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843.
(3) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes up to $5,600,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized
by RCW 47.10.867.
(4) The department shall sell the M.V. Chinook and M.V. Snohomish
passenger-only fast ferries as soon as practicable and deposit the
proceeds of the sales into the passenger ferry account created in RCW
47.60.645.
(5) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2007, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each project in the project lists
submitted pursuant to this act and on any additional projects for which
the department has expended funds during the 2007-09 fiscal biennium.
Elements shall include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule,
and costs. The department shall also provide the information required
under this subsection via the transportation executive information
systems (TEIS).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Transportation Infrastructure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,515,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,050,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,894,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,459,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The entire essential rail assistance account appropriation
and the entire multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund,
project, and amount in the LEAP transportation document 2007-1, dated
March 19, 2007. Transfers to specific line-item project appropriations
from the management reserve may occur subject to the conditions and
limitations in section 301 of this act.
(b) The funding described in (a) of this subsection includes
$2,500,000 of the transportation infrastructure account-state
appropriation, which is for low-interest loans or grants for rail
capital projects through the freight rail investment bank program. The
department shall submit criteria for the use of such funds to the
office of financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature prior to issuing a call for projects.
(2) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes up to $136,895,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.867.
(3) The department is directed to seek the use of unprogrammed
federal rail crossing funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in the rail capital program,
including, but not limited to the "Tacoma - bypass of Pt. Defiance"
project.
(4) If new federal funding for freight or passenger rail is
received, the department shall consult with the transportation
committees of the legislature and the office of financial management
prior to spending the funds on existing or additional projects.
(5)(a) The department shall develop and implement the
benefit/impact evaluation methodology recommended in the statewide rail
capacity and needs study finalized in December 2006.
(b) The department shall convene a work group to collaborate on the
development of the benefit/impact analysis method to be used in the
evaluation. The work group must include, at a minimum, the freight
mobility strategic investment board, the department of agriculture, and
representatives from the various users and modes of the state's rail
system.
(c) In addition to existing criteria established by the department
for evaluating rail projects, the department shall use the
benefit/impact analysis in subsection (5)(a) of this section when
submitting requests for state funding for rail projects. The
department shall develop a standardized format for submitting requests
for state funding for rail projects that includes an explanation of the
analysis undertaken, and the conclusions derived from the analysis.
(d) The Stampede Pass corridor rail project shall be evaluated
using the benefit/impact analysis method developed under this section,
as soon as the analysis method is completed, and the results reported
to the office of financial management and to the house and senate
transportation committees of the legislature.
(e) The department and the freight mobility strategic investment
board shall collaborate to submit a report to the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature by
September 1, 2008, listing proposed freight highway and rail projects.
The report must describe the analysis used for selecting such projects,
as required by this act for the department and as required by chapter
46.06A RCW for the board.
(6) Upon the expiration of the operating agreements contained in
the memorandum of understanding between the office of financial
management and Watco for the CW, P&L, and PV Hooper rail lines for the
2007 harvest season, the state will transfer the operating rights to an
intergovernmental entity or local rail district which will own the long
term operating rights to the rail lines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- CAPITAL
Transportation Infrastructure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Freight Mobility Investment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,500,000
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,906,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,440,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,900,000
State Building Construction Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,100,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,167,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,706,000
Passenger Ferry Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,428,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire freight mobility investment account appropriation,
$2,906,000 of the transportation partnership account appropriation, the
entire freight mobility multimodal account appropriation, the entire
transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation, and
$15,495,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by fund, project, and amount in the LEAP transportation document
2007-1, dated March 19, 2007. Transfers to specific line-item project
appropriations from the management reserve may occur subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 301 of this act.
(2) The department shall seek the use of unprogrammed federal rail
crossing funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to state funds
for eligible costs of projects in the rail program, including, but not
limited to the "Tacoma - bypass of Pt. Defiance" project.
(3) The department shall apply for surface transportation program
(STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in the improvement and
preservation programs, including, but not limited to, the SR 167, SR
395, SR 518, SR 519, SR 520, and Alaskan Way Viaduct projects.
(4) Federal funds may be transferred from local programs to the
improvement and preservation programs and state funds shall be
transferred from the improvement and preservation programs to local
programs to replace those federal funds in a dollar-for-dollar match.
Fund transfers authorized under this subsection shall not affect
project prioritization status. Appropriations shall initially be
allotted as appropriated in this act. The department may not transfer
funds as authorized under this subsection without approval of the
office of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2007, and December 1, 2008.
(5) $8,500,000 of the passenger ferry account--state appropriation
is provided solely for near and long-term costs of capital improvements
in a business plan approved by the governor for passenger ferry
service.
(6) $400,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Pasco SR 395 pedestrian and
bicycle overpass.
(7) $11,672,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation, $8,711,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation, and $4,000,000 of the transportation partnership
account--state appropriation are provided solely for the pedestrian and
bicycle safety program projects and safe routes to schools program
projects identified on the LEAP Transportation Document 2007-B,
Pedestrian and Bicycle Safety Program Projects and Safe Routes to
Schools Program Projects as developed March 19, 2007. Projects must be
allocated funding based on order of priority. The department shall
review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least
semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory
progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report
activity on the project within one year of the grant award, shall be
reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be
terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when
projects have been completed, and identify where unused grant funds
remain because actual project costs were lower than estimated in the
grant award. When funds become available either because grant awards
have been rescinded for lack of sufficient project activity or because
completed projects returned excess grant funds upon project closeout,
the department shall expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified
alternative projects identified on the list.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $549,418,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,059,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,650,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,645,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,354,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,065,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $211,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,354,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,645,000
Special Category C Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $285,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $649,799,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $440,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,348,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account -- State Reappropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,016,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$131,016,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

(2) Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound capital construction
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,689,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$82,689,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,543,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- ADMINISTRATIVE
TRANSFERS
(1) Recreational Vehicle Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,954,000
(2) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the State Patrol Highway Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
(3) License Plate Technology Account--State
Appropriation: For the Highway Safety Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
(4) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the High-Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations--
State Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(5) Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Transportation
Partnership Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000,000
(6) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
(7) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the State Patrol Highway Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,500,000
(8) Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound
Ferry Operations Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,100,000
(9) Advanced Right-of-Way Revolving Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
(10) Licensing Service Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the State Patrol Highway Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
(11) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Partnership
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS. In addition to
the amounts appropriated in this act for revenue for distribution,
state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system, and bond retirement and interest including ongoing
bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on
registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also
appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for
these purposes under any statutory formula or under any proper bond
covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 The department of transportation is
authorized to undertake federal advance construction projects under the
provisions of 23 U.S.C. Sec. 115 in order to maintain progress in
meeting approved highway construction and preservation objectives. The
legislature recognizes that the use of state funds may be required to
temporarily fund expenditures of the federal appropriations for the
highway construction and preservation programs for federal advance
construction projects prior to conversion to federal funding.

COMPENSATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 COMPENSATION--NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS. The appropriations for state agencies, are subject
to the following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $707 per eligible employee for
fiscal year 2008. For fiscal year 2009 the monthly employer funding
rate shall not exceed $732 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2008, through December 31, 2008, the
subsidy shall be $165.31. Starting January 1, 2009, the subsidy shall
be $184.26 per month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES
OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE BENEFITS. The appropriations for
state agencies, are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, for represented employees outside the super
coalition under chapter 41.80 RCW, shall not exceed $707 per eligible
employee for fiscal year 2008. For fiscal year 2009 the monthly
employer funding rate shall not exceed $732 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2008, through December 31, 2008, the
subsidy shall be $165.31. Starting January 1, 2009, the subsidy shall
be $184.26 per month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION. Collective bargaining agreements negotiated as part
of the super coalition under chapter 41.80 RCW include employer
contributions to health insurance premiums at 88% of the cost. Funding
rates at this level are currently $707 per month for fiscal year 2008
and $732 per month for fiscal year 2009. The agreements also include
a one-time payment of $756 for each employee who is eligible for
insurance for the month of June, 2007, as well as continuation of the
salary increases that were negotiated for the twelve-month period
beginning July 1, 2006, and scheduled to terminate June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 COMPENSATION--PENSION CONTRIBUTIONS. The
appropriations for state agencies, including institutions of higher
education are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
Appropriations are provided to fund employer contributions to state
pension funds at the rates adopted by the pension funding council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 COMPENSATION--REVISE PENSION GAIN
SHARING. The appropriations for (schools) state agencies, including
institutions of higher education are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Appropriations are adjusted to reflect
changes to pension gain sharing as provided in House Bill No. 1711
(gainsharing).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION.
The appropriations for nonrepresented employee compensation adjustments
are provided solely for:
(1) Across the Board Adjustments.
(a) Appropriations are provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective September 1, 2007, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapter 41.80 RCW,
and except the certificated employees of the state schools for the deaf
and blind and employees of community and technical colleges covered by
the provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732. Also included are
employees in the Washington management service, and exempt employees
under the jurisdiction of the director of personnel.
The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 3.2% salary
increase effective September 1, 2007, and for executive, legislative,
and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose
maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected
officials.
(b) Appropriations are provided for a 2.0% salary increase
effective September 1, 2008, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapter 41.80 RCW,
and except for the certificated employees of the state schools of the
deaf and blind and employees of community and technical colleges
covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732. Also included
are employees in the Washington management service, and exempt
employees under the jurisdiction of the director of personnel. The
appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 2.0% salary increase
effective September 1, 2008, for executive, legislative, and judicial
branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries
are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials.
(2) Salary Survey.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey, for
job classes more than 25% below market rates and affected classes.
(3) Classification Consolidation.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's phase 4 job class
consolidation and revisions under the personnel system reform act of
2002.
(4) Agency Request Consolidation.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's agency request job
class consolidation and reclassification plan.
(5) Additional Pay Step.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for a
new pay step L for those who have been in step K for at least one year.
(6) Retain Fiscal Year 2007 Pay Increase.
For all classified state employees, except those represented by a
bargaining unit under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except
for the certificated employees of the state schools of the deaf and
blind and employees of community and technical colleges covered by the
provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732, funding is provided for
continuation of the 1.6% salary increase that was provided during
fiscal year 2007. Also included are employees in the Washington
management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the
director of personnel. The appropriations are also sufficient to
continue a 1.6% salary increase for executive, legislative, and
judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum
salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected
officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS.
Provisions of the collective bargaining agreements contained in
sections 508 through 518 of this act are described in general terms.
Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These
descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreements.
The collective bargaining agreements contained in sections 506 through
516 may also be funded by expenditures from nonappropriated accounts.
If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources
with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not
provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--IBU.
Appropriations in this act contain funding for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the
inlandboatmen's union of the pacific under chapter 47.64 RCW. For
employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6%
salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase
that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30,
2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007,
a 2% salary increase effective July 1, 2008, and increases ranging from
1.5% to 4% to address specific classifications which are below market
rates as established by the marine employees commission 2006 salary
survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--MEBA-LICENSED. Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the marine engineers'
beneficial association under chapter 47.64 RCW. For employees covered
under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into
effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also
included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, a 2% salary
increase effective July 1, 2008, and increases ranging from 1% to 6% to
address specific classifications which are below market rates as
established by the marine employees commission 2006 salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--MEBA-UNLICENSED. Appropriations in this act reflect the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the marine
engineers' beneficial association under chapter 47.64 RCW. For
employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6%
salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase
that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30,
2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007,
and a 2% salary increase effective July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec.511 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--MM&P.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the international organization of
master, mates & pilots, local 6, under chapter 47.64 RCW. For
employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6%
salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase
that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30,
2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007,
a 2% salary increase effective July 1, 2008, and increases ranging from
2.5% to 7.5% to address specific classifications which are below market
rates as established by the marine employees commission 2006 salary
survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--MM&P-WATCH SUPERVISORS. Appropriations in this act reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the
international organization of master, mates & pilots, watch
supervisors, local 6, under chapter 47.64 RCW. For employees covered
under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into
effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also
included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, a 2% salary
increase effective July 1, 2008, and a 3% increase to address this
specific classification which is below market rates as established by
the marine employees commission 2006 salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--METAL
TRADES COUNCIL. Appropriations in this act reflect the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the Puget Sound
metal trades council under chapter 47.64 RCW. For employees covered
under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into
effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also
included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, a 2% salary
increase effective July 1, 2008, and a $0.95/hour salary adjustment to
all classifications which are below market rates as established by the
marine employees commission 2006 salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec.514 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--FASPAA.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the ferry agents, supervisors, &
project administrators association under chapter 47.64 RCW. For
employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6%
salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase
that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30,
2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007,
a 2% salary increase effective July 1, 2008, and a 10% increase to
address specific classifications which are below market rates as
established by the marine employees commission 2006 salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--OPEIU.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the office & professional employees
international union, local 8, under chapter 47.64 RCW. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into
effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also
included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, a 2% salary
increase effective July 1, 2008, and a one salary range (5%) increase
to address specific classifications which are below market rates as
established by the marine employees commission 2006 salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the service employees international
union, local 6, under chapter 47.64 RCW. For employees covered under
this agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase effective
July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into effect July
1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a
3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, a 2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2008, and a 5% increase to address specific
classifications which are below market rates as established by the
marine employees commission 2006 salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WSP
TROOPERS ASSOCIATION. Appropriations in this act reflect funding for
the collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor and
the Washington state patrol trooper's association under the provisions
of chapter 41.56 RCW. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 4.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, and
a 4.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2008. Also effective July 1,
2007, positions located in King (10%), Snohomish (5%), or Pierce (3%)
counties will receive geographic pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WSP
LIEUTENANTS ASSOCIATION. Appropriations in this act reflect funding
for the collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor
and the Washington state patrol lieutenant's association under the
provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW. For employees covered under this
agreement, provisions include a 4.0% salary increase effective July 1,
2007, and a 4.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2008. Also
effective July 1, 2007, positions located in King (10%), Snohomish
(5%), or Pierce (3%) counties will receive geographic pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--IFPTE.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the international federation of
professional and technical engineers under the provisions of chapter
41.80 RCW. For employees covered under this agreement, provisions
include a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues
the increase that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to
terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, and a 2% salary increase effective July 1,
2008. Select classifications will receive wage increases due to the
implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey for
classes more than 25% below market rates. These increases will be
effective July 1, 2007. All employees covered under the agreement that
have been at the top step of their range for a year or longer will
progress to a new step L effective July 1, 2007.

MISCELLANEOUS 2007-09 BIENNIUM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 Executive Order number 05-05,
archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective November
10,
2005. Agencies and higher education institutions that issue grants
or loans for capital projects shall comply with the requirements set
forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies
shall comply with the following requirements regarding information
systems projects when specifically directed to do so by this act.
(1) Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology
shall be made in the context of its information technology portfolio.
"Information technology portfolio" means a strategic management
approach in which the relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments can be seen and understood, such
that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and
business functions are assessed and understood before implementation;
and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.
(2) Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in
making decisions on matters related to the following:
(a) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(b) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology
in meeting legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;
(c) Assessment of overall information processing performance,
resources, and capabilities;
(d) Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for
the operation of any new systems developed using external resources;
and
(e) Progress toward enabling electronic access to public
information.
(3) Each project will be planned and designed to take optimal
advantage of Internet technologies and protocols. Agencies shall
ensure that the project is in compliance with the architecture,
infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.
(4) The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information
technology projects at the direction of the information services board
and in accordance with published department of information services
policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such studies shall include a
statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business
value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation of
benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment
based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d)
the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and (e)
the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.
(5) The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for
each project. The plan or plans shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of each project. The plan(s) shall include, but
is not limited to, the following elements: A description of the
problem or opportunity that the information technology project is
intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for
the phased approach shall be such that the business case justification
for a project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or
adds measurable value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business
functions within each development cycle.
(6) The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for
information technology projects. Consistent with the direction of the
information services board and the published policies and guidelines of
the department of information services, the quality assurance plan
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of the
project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance
plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The
quality assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements
for each phase of a project.
(7) A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and
quality assurance plan shall be provided to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall demonstrate
a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer funds
on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system
on the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined
use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval
of the relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan by the department of information services and the office
of financial management.
(8) Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the
department of information services, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees at intervals specified in the
project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 MEGA-PROJECTS. (1) Mega-projects are
defined as individual or groups of related projects that cost
$1,000,000,000 or more. These projects include, but are not limited
to: Alaskan Way Viaduct, SR 520, SR 167, SR 395, I-405, North Spokane
corridor, I-5 Tacoma HOV, and the Columbia River Crossing.
(2) The office of financial management shall track mega-projects
and report the financial status and schedule of these projects at least
once a year to the transportation committees of the legislature.
(3) The design of mega-projects must be evaluated considering cost,
capacity, safety, mobility needs, and how well the design of the
facility fits within its urban environment.

Sec. 604 RCW 46.68.170 and 1996 c 237 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created in the motor vehicle fund the RV account.
All moneys hereafter deposited in said account shall be used by the
department of transportation for the construction, maintenance, and
operation of recreational vehicle sanitary disposal systems at safety
rest areas in accordance with the department's highway system plan as
prescribed in chapter 47.06 RCW. During the 2005-2007 and 2007-2009
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the RV account to
the motor vehicle fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
of the RV account.

Sec. 605 RCW 47.29.170 and 2006 c 370 s 604 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting any unsolicited project proposals, the commission
must adopt rules to facilitate the acceptance, review, evaluation, and
selection of unsolicited project proposals. These rules must include
the following:
(1) Provisions that specify unsolicited proposals must meet
predetermined criteria;
(2) Provisions governing procedures for the cessation of
negotiations and consideration;
(3) Provisions outlining that unsolicited proposals are subject to
a two-step process that begins with concept proposals and would only
advance to the second step, which are fully detailed proposals, if the
commission so directed;
(4) Provisions that require concept proposals to include at least
the following information: Proposers' qualifications and experience;
description of the proposed project and impact; proposed project
financing; and known public benefits and opposition; and
(5) Provisions that specify the process to be followed if the
commission is interested in the concept proposal, which must include
provisions:
(a) Requiring that information regarding the potential project
would be published for a period of not less than thirty days, during
which time entities could express interest in submitting a proposal;
(b) Specifying that if letters of interest were received during the
thirty days, then an additional sixty days for submission of the fully
detailed proposal would be allowed; and
(c) Procedures for what will happen if there are insufficient
proposals submitted or if there are no letters of interest submitted in
the appropriate time frame.
The commission may adopt other rules as necessary to avoid
conflicts with existing laws, statutes, or contractual obligations of
the state.
The commission may not accept or consider any unsolicited proposals
before ((June 30, 2007)) July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 To the extent that any appropriation
authorizes expenditures of state funds from the motor vehicle account,
special category C account, Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
transportation 2003 account (nickel account), transportation
partnership account, transportation improvement account, Puget Sound
capital construction account, multimodal transportation account, or
other transportation capital project account in the state treasury for
a state transportation program that is specified to be funded with
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in chapter 47.10 RCW, the
legislature declares that any such expenditures made prior to the issue
date of the applicable transportation bonds for that state
transportation program are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of
those transportation bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of
such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 The department of transportation, in
conjunction with the office of financial management, must implement the
governmental accounting standards board's (GASB) statement number 34
including a complete inventory and valuation of the state's highway
system. The financial reporting value of the state's highway system
must be adjusted for any new additions to the system. The biennial
reporting of the condition of the system must be related to the funding
levels of maintaining the system. The department must maintain a
current inventory of the state's highway system and estimate the actual
cost to maintain and preserve the assets. In addition to the GASB
statement 34, the department of transportation with the office of
financial management's assistance must establish an asset replacement
value for the entire state's highway system. During 2007, the speaker
of the house of representatives and the president of the senate must
select one member from each caucus to work with the office of financial
management and the department of transportation. The purpose of this
effort is to enhance decision making that will result in strategic
long-term investment decisions in transportation capital project
management and asset preservation. The office of financial management
will coordinate and manage the inventory and the valuation. The office
of financial management must submit a final report to the legislative
transportation committees on or before December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 It is the intent of the legislature to
establish policy goals for the planning, operation, performance of, and
investment in, the state's transportation system. The policy goals
established under this section are deemed consistent with the benchmark
categories adopted by the state's blue ribbon commission on
transportation on November 30, 2000. Public investments in
transportation should support achievement of these policy goals:
(a) Preservation: To maintain, preserve, and extend the life and
utility of prior investments in transportation systems and services;
(b) Safety: To provide for and improve the safety and security of
transportation customers and the transportation system;
(c) Mobility: To improve the predictable movement of goods and
people throughout Washington state;
(d) Environment: To enhance Washington's quality of life through
transportation investments that promote energy conservation, enhance
healthy communities, and protect the environment; and
(e) Stewardship: To continuously improve the quality,
effectiveness, and efficiency of the transportation system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 RCW 47.01.390 (Alaskan Way viaduct,
Seattle Seawall, and state route No. 520 improvements -- Requirements -- Exceptions) and 2006 c 311 s 27 are each repealed.

Sec. 610 RCW 88.16.090 and 2005 c 26 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person may pilot any vessel subject to this chapter on waters
covered by this chapter only if licensed to pilot such vessels on such
waters under this chapter.
(2)(a) A person is eligible to be licensed as a pilot if the
person:
(i) Is a citizen of the United States;
(ii) Is over the age of twenty-five years and under the age of
seventy years;
(iii) Is a resident of the state of Washington at the time of
licensure as a pilot;
(iv)(A) Holds at the time of application, as a minimum, a United
States government license as master of steam or motor vessels of not
more than one thousand six hundred gross register tons (three thousand
international tonnage convention tons) upon oceans, near coastal
waters, or inland waters; or the then most equivalent federal license
as determined by the board; any such license to have been held by the
applicant for a period of at least two years before application;
(B) Holds at the time of licensure as a pilot, after successful
completion of the board-required training program, a first class United
States endorsement without restrictions on the United States government
license for the pilotage district in which the pilot applicant desires
to be licensed; however, all applicants for a pilot examination
scheduled to be given before July 1, 2008, must have the United States
pilotage endorsement at the time of application; and
(C) The board may establish such other federal license requirements
for applicants and pilots as it deems appropriate; and
(v) Successfully completes a board-specified training program.
(b) In addition to the requirements of (a) of this subsection, a
pilot applicant must meet such other qualifications as may be required
by the board.
(c) A person applying for a license under this section shall not
have been convicted of an offense involving drugs or the personal
consumption of alcohol in the twelve months prior to the date of
application. This restriction does not apply to license renewals under
this section.
(3) The board may establish such other training license and pilot
license requirements as it deems appropriate.
(4) Pilot applicants shall be evaluated and ranked in a manner
specified by the board based on their experience, other qualifications
as may be set by the board, performance on a written examination or
examinations established by the board, and performance in such other
evaluation exercises as may be required by the board, for entry into a
board-specified training program.
When the board determines that the demand for pilots requires entry
of an applicant into the training program it shall issue a training
license to that applicant, but under no circumstances may an applicant
be issued a training license more than four years after taking the
written entry examination. The training license authorizes the trainee
to do such actions as are specified in the training program.
After the completion of the training program the board shall
evaluate the trainee's performance and knowledge. The board, as it
deems appropriate, may then issue a pilot license, delay the issuance
of the pilot license, deny the issuance of the pilot license, or
require further training and evaluation.
(5) The board may appoint a special independent committee or may
contract with a firm knowledgeable and experienced in the development
of professional tests and evaluations for development and grading of
the examinations and other evaluation methods. Active licensed state
pilots may be consulted for the general development of any examinations
and evaluation exercises but shall have no knowledge of the specific
questions. The pilot members of the board may participate in the
grading of examinations. If the board does appoint a special
examination or evaluation development committee it is authorized to pay
the members of the committee the same compensation and travel expenses
as received by members of the board. Any person who willfully gives
advance knowledge of information contained on a pilot examination or
other evaluation exercise is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(6) Pilots are licensed under this section for a term of five years
from and after the date of the issuance of their respective state
licenses. Licenses must thereafter be renewed as a matter of course,
unless the board withholds the license for good cause. Each pilot
shall pay to the state treasurer an annual license fee ((of three
thousand dollars)) in an amount set by the board by rule. The fees
established under this subsection (6) may be increased in excess of the
fiscal growth factor as provided in RCW 43.135.055 for the fiscal year
ending 2009. The fees must be deposited in the state treasury to the
credit of the pilotage account. The board may assess partially active
or inactive pilots a reduced fee.
(7) All pilots and applicants are subject to an annual physical
examination by a physician chosen by the board. The physician shall
examine the applicant's heart, blood pressure, circulatory system,
lungs and respiratory system, eyesight, hearing, and such other items
as may be prescribed by the board. After consultation with a physician
and the United States coast guard, the board shall establish minimum
health standards to ensure that pilots licensed by the state are able
to perform their duties. Within ninety days of the date of each annual
physical examination, and after review of the physician's report, the
board shall make a determination of whether the pilot or applicant is
fully able to carry out the duties of a pilot under this chapter. The
board may in its discretion check with the appropriate authority for
any convictions of offenses involving drugs or the personal consumption
of alcohol in the prior twelve months.
(8) The board may require vessel simulator training for a pilot
applicant and shall require vessel simulator training for a licensed
pilot subject to RCW 88.16.105. The board shall also require vessel
simulator training in the first year of active duty for a new pilot and
at least once every five years for all active pilots.
(9) The board shall prescribe, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, such
reporting requirements and review procedures as may be necessary to
assure the accuracy and validity of license and service claims.
Willful misrepresentation of such required information by a pilot
applicant shall result in disqualification of the pilot applicant.

Sec. 611 RCW 46.16.685 and 2003 c 370 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The license plate technology account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts collected under RCW 46.01.140(4)(e)(ii) must be
deposited into this account. Expenditures from this account must
support current and future license plate technology and systems
integration upgrades for both the department and correctional
industries. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Additionally, the moneys in this account may be used to
reimburse the motor vehicle account for any appropriation made to
implement the digital license plate system. During the 2007-09 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the license plate
technology account to the highway safety fund such amounts as reflect
the excess account balance of the license plate technology account.

Sec. 612 RCW 46.68.060 and 1969 c 99 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as
the highway safety fund to the credit of which shall be deposited all
moneys directed by law to be deposited therein. This fund shall be
used for carrying out the provisions of law relating to driver
licensing, driver improvement, financial responsibility, cost of
furnishing abstracts of driving records and maintaining such case
records, and to carry out the purposes set forth in RCW 43.59.010.
During the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from
the highway safety fund to the state patrol highway account amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the highway safety fund.

Sec.613 RCW 46.68.220 and 1992 c 216 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of licensing services account is created in the
motor vehicle fund. All receipts from service fees received under RCW
46.01.140(4)(b) shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for information and service delivery systems
for the department, and for reimbursement of county licensing
activities. During the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the department of licensing services account to the state
patrol highway account amounts as reflect the excess account balance of
the department of licensing services account.

Sec. 614 RCW 47.12.244 and 1991 c 291 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created the "advance right of way revolving fund" in the
custody of the treasurer, into which the department is authorized to
deposit directly and expend without appropriation:
(1) An initial deposit of ten million dollars from the motor
vehicle fund included in the department of transportation's 1991-93
budget;
(2) All moneys received by the department as rental income from
real properties that are not subject to federal aid reimbursement,
except moneys received from rental of capital facilities properties as
defined in chapter 47.13 RCW; and
(3) Any federal moneys available for acquisition of right of way
for future construction under the provisions of section 108 of Title
23, United States Code.
(4) During the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the advance right of way revolving fund to the motor
vehicle account amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
advance right of way revolving fund.

Sec. 615 RCW 47.66.090 and 2005 c 312 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The high-occupancy toll lanes operations account is created in the
state treasury. The department shall deposit all revenues received by
the department as toll charges collected from high-occupancy toll lane
users. Moneys in this account may be spent only if appropriated by the
legislature. Moneys in this account may be used for, but be not
limited to, debt service, planning, administration, construction,
maintenance, operation, repair, rebuilding, enforcement, and expansion
of high-occupancy toll lanes and to increase transit, vanpool and
carpool, and trip reduction services in the corridor. A reasonable
proportion of the moneys in this account must be dedicated to increase
transit, vanpool, carpool, and trip reduction services in the corridor.
A reasonable proportion of the moneys in this account must be dedicated
to increase transit, vanpool, carpool, and trip reduction services in
the corridor. During the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, any funds
transferred from the motor vehicle account shall be spent in a manner
consistent with Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution.

Sec. 616 RCW 47.06A.030 and 1999 c 216 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The freight mobility strategic investment board is created.
The board shall convene by July 1, 1998.
(2) The board is composed of twelve members. The following members
are appointed by the governor for terms of four years, except that five
members initially are appointed for terms of two years: (a) Two
members, one of whom is from a city located within or along a strategic
freight corridor, appointed from a list of at least four persons
nominated by the association of Washington cities or its successor; (b)
two members, one of whom is from a county having a strategic freight
corridor within its boundaries, appointed from a list of at least four
persons nominated by the Washington state association of counties or
its successor; (c) two members, one of whom is from a port district
located within or along a strategic freight corridor, appointed from a
list of at least four persons nominated by the Washington public ports
association or its successor; (d) one member representing the office of
financial management; (e) one member appointed as a representative of
the trucking industry; (f) one member appointed as a representative of
the railroads; (g) the secretary of the department of transportation;
(h) one member representing the steamship industry; and (i) one member
of the general public. For the 2007-09 biennium, the board shall also
include a representative of organized labor. In appointing the general
public member, the governor shall endeavor to appoint a member with
special expertise in relevant fields such as public finance, freight
transportation, or public works construction. The governor shall
appoint the general public member as chair of the board. In making
appointments to the board, the governor shall ensure that each
geographic region of the state is represented.
(3) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for reasonable and
customary travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) If a vacancy on the board occurs by death, resignation, or
otherwise, the governor shall fill the vacant position for the
unexpired term. Each vacancy in a position appointed from lists
provided by the associations and departments under subsection (2) of
this section must be filled from a list of at least four persons
nominated by the relevant association or associations.
(5) The appointments made in subsection (2) of this section are not
subject to confirmation.

2005-07 BIENNIUMTRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- OPERATING
Sec. 701 2006 c 53 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,017,000))
$1,317,000

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $500,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely for stipends to trainees in the training program as set forth in
rules adopted by the board.))

Sec. 702 2006 c 370 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,679,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $200,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
the joint transportation committee to conduct a finance study of the
Washington state ferry system. The purpose of the study is to
facilitate policy discussions and decisions by members of the
legislature regarding the Washington state ferry system. The
legislature recognizes there is a need within the Washington state
ferry system for predictable cash flows, transparency, assessment of
organizational structure, verification that the Washington state ferry
system is operating at maximum efficiency, and better labor relations.
The committee shall report the study to the house of representatives
and senate transportation committees by January 1, 2007.
(b) The study must include, at a minimum, a review and evaluation
of the ferry system's financial plan, including current assumptions and
past studies, in the following areas:
(i) Operating program, including ridership, revenue, and cost
forecasts and the accuracy of those forecasts; and
(ii) Capital program, including project scoping, prioritization and
cost estimating, project changes including legislative input regarding
significant project changes, and performance measures.
(c) In addition to committee members, or their designees, the
governor shall appoint a representative for this study. The committee
may retain consulting services to assist the committee in conducting
the study, including the evaluation of financial, operating, and
capital plans. The committee may also appoint other persons to assist
with the study.
(2) The joint transportation committee shall conduct a study
regarding the feasibility of a statewide uniform motor vehicle excise
tax (MVET) depreciation schedule. In addition to committee members,
the participants in the study must include at a minimum the following
individuals: (a) A representative of a regional transit authority
(Sound Transit); (b) a representative of a regional transportation
planning organization; (c) the secretary of transportation, or his or
her designee; (d) a representative of the attorney general's office;
(e) a representative of the department of licensing; and (f) a
representative of the financial community. The purpose of the study is
to develop an MVET depreciation schedule that more accurately reflects
vehicle value but does not hinder outstanding contractual obligations.
(3) Funds provided in this section are sufficient for the committee
to administer a study of the most reliable and cost-effective means of
providing passenger-only ferry service.
(a) The study shall be guided by a 18 member task force consisting
of the chairs and ranking members of the house of representatives and
senate transportation committees, a designee of the director of the
office of financial management, a member of the transportation
commission, a designee of the secretary of transportation, a
representative of organized labor, and ten stakeholders to be appointed
by the governor as follows: Six representatives of ferry user
communities, two representatives of public transportation agencies, and
two representatives of commercial ferry operators.
(b) The study shall examine issues including but not limited to the
long-term viability of different service providers, cost to ferry
passengers, the state subsidies required by each provider, and the
availability of federal funding for the different service providers.
(c) By November 30, 2005, the task force shall make its
recommendations to the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees.
(4) (($450,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to administer a consultant study of the long-term
viability of the state's transportation financing methods and sources.
(a) At a minimum, the study must examine the following: (i) The
short and long-term viability of the motor fuel tax (both state and
federal) as a major source of funding for transportation projects and
programs; (ii) the desirability and effectiveness of state-distributed
transportation funds for the benefit of local units of government;
(iii) the potential for alternative and/or emerging sources of
transportation revenues, with particular emphasis on user-based fees
and charges; and (iv) trends and implications of debt financing for
transportation projects. The scope of work for the study may be
expanded to include analysis of other financing issues relevant to the
long-term viability of the state's transportation system.
(b) The findings and recommendations must be submitted to the
fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2006.
(5))) $75,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the joint transportation committee to contract for
a review of existing research on programs and policies which decrease
accidents by teenage drivers, including but not limited to publicly
operated driver education and intermediate drivers licensing programs.
The institute shall also evaluate the costs and benefits of programs
and policies showing the greatest positive impact on teenage driving
safety.
(((6))) (5) The committee shall conduct an evaluation of the
department of transportation surface transportation program enhancement
grant program. The evaluation will include (a) information about the
categories of projects submitted for consideration; (b) a review of the
allocation of funds awarded across the categories of STP enhancement
eligible activities; (c) a review of the criteria used to score
projects; and (d) a finding by the committee whether certain categories
of projects are disproportionately funded or unfunded.

Sec. 703 2006 c 370 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($201,063,000))
$201,102,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,544,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $169,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($211,776,000))
$211,815,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed
employment providing traffic control services to the department of
transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles
for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by
the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol
shall be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state
employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines
developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The patrol
shall report to the house of representatives and senate transportation
committees by December 31, 2005, on the use of agency vehicles by
officers engaging in the off-duty employment specified in this
subsection. The report shall include an analysis that compares cost
reimbursement and cost-impacts, including increased vehicle mileage,
maintenance costs, and indirect impacts, associated with the private
use of patrol vehicles.
(2) In addition to the user fees, the patrol shall transfer into
the state patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving account under RCW
43.79.470 no more than the amount of appropriated state patrol highway
account and general fund funding necessary to cover the costs for the
patrol's use of the aircraft. The state patrol highway account and
general fund--state funds shall be transferred proportionately in
accordance with a cost allocation that differentiates between highway
traffic enforcement services and general policing purposes.
(3) The patrol shall not account for or record locally provided DUI
cost reimbursement payments as expenditure credits to the state patrol
highway account. The patrol shall report the amount of expected
locally provided DUI cost reimbursements to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 31st
of each year.
(4) The state patrol highway account--state appropriation for DUI
reimbursements shall only be spent for pursuit vehicle video cameras,
datamaster DUI testing equipment, tire deflator equipment, and taser
guns. The Washington state patrol prior to the issuance of any taser
guns will train the troopers on using the equipment. The agency will
provide a report to the transportation committees of the senate and
house of representatives by December 31st of each year on the
occurrences where the taser guns were utilized along with any issues
that have been identified.
(5) $29,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill
No. 1469. If House Bill No. 1469 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $5,580,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for a
3.8% salary increase for commissioned officers effective July 1, 2005,
in addition to any other salary increases provided for in this act.
(7) The Washington state patrol is authorized to use certificates
of participation to fund the King Air aircraft replacement over a term
of not more than ten years and an amount not to exceed $1,900,000.
(8)(a) $834,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol
troopers association under chapter 438, Laws of 2005. For commissioned
troopers and sergeants covered under this section, funding is provided
for a 2.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2006. This increase
supersedes the fiscal year 2007 increase granted under section 501,
chapter 313, Laws of 2005. Provisions of the collective bargaining
agreement contained in this subsection are described in general terms.
Only major economic terms are included in this description. This
description does not contain the complete contents of the agreement.
Due to the timing challenges in negotiating the initial collective
bargaining agreement under chapter 438, Laws of 2005, this agreement
was not concluded by the October 1st statutory deadline. However, the
legislature does not intend to fund bargaining agreements concluded
after the October 1st deadline, or other salary increases not included
in the governor's budget proposal, in future biennia.
(b) $62,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for salary increases for commissioned
captains and lieutenants covered under this section, if a new
collective bargaining agreement is reached between the governor and the
Washington state patrol lieutenants association by July 1, 2006. The
amount provided in this subsection is contingent on an agreement being
reached by July 1, 2006, and shall be held in reserve status until the
agreement is reached. If an agreement is not reached by July 1, 2006,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. If an agreement is
reached by July 1, 2006, the increase supersedes the fiscal year 2007
increase granted under section 501, chapter 313, Laws of 2005. Due to
the timing challenges in negotiating a collective bargaining agreement
funded under this subsection, the agreement will not have been
concluded by the October 1st statutory deadline. However, the
legislature does not intend to fund bargaining agreements concluded
after the October 1st deadline, or other salary increases not included
in the governor's budget proposal, in future biennia.
(9) The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the
department of licensing, local law enforcement agencies, and other
appropriate organizations, shall study the options for implementing an
inspection program for tow truck operators that are not licensed as
registered tow truck operators. This study shall also evaluate
prospective sources of funding and the amount of funding necessary for
the program. The Washington state patrol shall report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2006, on
the
options, strategies, and recommendations for implementing an
inspection program for tow truck operators that are not licensed as
registered tow truck operators.
(10) $2,040,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for eighteen additional commissioned
officers in the vessel and terminal security division.
(11) The office of financial management shall conduct a review of
the state patrol highway account and report its findings to the
legislature by January 1, 2007.

Sec. 704 2006 c 370 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($91,359,000))
$91,629,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,008,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($93,367,000))
$93,637,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $247,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1188. If Second Substitute House Bill No.
1188 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) The Washington state patrol is instructed to work with the risk
management division in the office of financial management in compiling
the state patrol data for establishing the agency's risk management
insurance premiums to the tort claims account. The office of financial
management and the Washington state patrol shall submit a report to the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 31st of each year on the number of claims, estimated claims to
be paid, method of calculation, and the adjustment in the premium.
(3) $8,678,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
the purchase of pursuit vehicles.
(4) $5,254,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
vehicle repair and maintenance costs of vehicles used for highway
purposes.
(5) $384,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for the
purchase of mission vehicles used for highway purposes in the
commercial vehicle and traffic investigation sections of the patrol.
(6)(a) $28,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol
troopers association under chapter 438, Laws of 2005. For commissioned
troopers and sergeants covered under this section, funding is provided
for a 2.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2006. This increase
supersedes the fiscal year 2007 increase granted under section 501,
chapter 313, Laws of 2005. Provisions of the collective bargaining
agreement contained in this subsection are described in general terms.
Only major economic terms are included in this description. This
description does not contain the complete contents of the agreement.
Due to the timing challenges in negotiating the initial collective
bargaining agreement under chapter 438, Laws of 2005, this agreement
was not concluded by the October 1st statutory deadline. However, the
legislature does not intend to fund bargaining agreements concluded
after the October 1st deadline, or other salary increases not included
in the governor's budget proposal, in future biennia.
(b) $2,000 of the state patrol highway account--state appropriation
is provided solely for salary increases for commissioned captains and
lieutenants covered under this section, if a new collective bargaining
agreement is reached between the governor and the Washington state
patrol lieutenants association by July 1, 2006. The amount provided in
this subsection is contingent on an agreement being reached by July 1,
2006, and shall be held in reserve status until the agreement is
reached. If an agreement is not reached by July 1, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse. If an agreement is reached by
July 1, 2006, the increase supersedes the fiscal year 2007 increase
granted under section 501, chapter 313, Laws of 2005. Due to the
timing challenges in negotiating a collective bargaining agreement
funded under this subsection, the agreement will not have been
concluded by the October 1st statutory deadline. However, the
legislature does not intend to fund bargaining agreements concluded
after the October 1st deadline, or other salary increases not included
in the governor's budget proposal, in future biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING. The appropriations to the
department of licensing in chapter 370, Laws of 2006 shall be expended
for the programs and in the amounts specified herein. However, after
May 1, 2007, unless specifically prohibited, the department may
transfer motor vehicle account--state appropriations for the 2005-2007
fiscal biennium, highway safety account--state appropriations for the
2005-2007 fiscal biennium, and department of licensing services
account--state appropriations for the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium between
programs after approval by the director of financial management.
However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose. The director of financial
management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives in writing prior to approving any
allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

Sec. 706 2006 c 370 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TOLL OPERATIONS AND
MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,294,000))
$5,200,000

Sec. 707 2006 c 370 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,137,000))
$6,925,000
Aeronautics Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,287,000))
$10,075,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $433,000 of the aeronautics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for airport pavement projects. The department's
aviation division shall complete a priority airport pavement project
list by January 1, 2006, to be considered by the legislature in the
2006 supplemental budget. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(b) If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 is enacted by July 1, 2005,
then the remaining unexpended fund balance in the aircraft search and
rescue, safety, and education account shall be deposited into the state
aeronautics account.
(2) The entire multimodal transportation account--state and federal
appropriations are provided solely for implementing Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121. If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5121 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, or if federal funds are not
received by March 1, 2006, for the purpose of implementing Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 708 2006 c 370 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($299,720,000))
$300,920,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,426,000))
$3,926,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,315,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($305,461,000))
$309,161,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations must be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account -- private/local
appropriation.
(4) Funding is provided for maintenance on the state system to
allow for a continuation of the level of service targets included in
the 2003-05 biennium. In delivering the program, the department should
concentrate on the following areas:
(a) Meeting or exceeding the target for structural bridge repair on
a statewide basis;
(b) Eliminating the number of activities delivered in the "f" level
of service at the region level;
(c) Reducing the number of activities delivered in the "d" level of
service by increasing the resources directed to those activities on a
statewide and region basis; and
(d) Evaluating, analyzing, and potentially redistributing resources
within and among regions to provide greater consistency in delivering
the program statewide and in achieving overall level of service
targets.
(5) The department shall develop and implement a plan to improve
work zone safety on a statewide basis. As part of the strategy
included in the plan, the department shall fund equipment purchases
using a portion of the money from the annual OTEF equipment purchasing
and replacement process. The department shall also identify and
evaluate statewide equipment needs (such as work zone safety equipment)
and prioritize any such needs on a statewide basis. Substitute
purchasing at the statewide level, when appropriate, shall be utilized
to meet those identified needs. The department must report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005, on
the plan, and by December 1, 2006, on the status of implementing the
plan.

Sec. 709 2006 c 370 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read
as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA,
AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,052,000))
$23,053,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,756,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,279,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,829,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,316,000))
$47,317,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In order to qualify for state planning funds available to
regional transportation planning organizations under this section, a
regional transportation planning organization containing any county
with a population in excess of one million shall provide voting
membership on its executive board to any incorporated principal city of
a metropolitan statistical area within the region, as designated by the
United States census bureau, and to any incorporated city within the
region with a population in excess of eighty thousand as of July 1,
2005. Additionally, a regional transportation planning organization
described under this subsection shall conduct a review of its executive
board membership criteria to ensure that the criteria appropriately
reflects a true and comprehensive representation of the organization's
jurisdictions of significance within the region.
(2) $175,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department to support the
processing and analysis of the backlog of city and county collision
reports by January 2006. The amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse if federal funds become available for this purpose.
(3) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1565. If Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1565 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) The department of transportation shall evaluate the number of
spaces available for long-haul truck parking relative to current and
projected future needs. The department of transportation shall also
explore options for augmenting the number of spaces available,
including, but not limited to, expanding state-owned rest areas or
modifying regulations governing the use of these facilities, utilizing
weigh stations and park and ride lots, and encouraging the expansion of
the private sector's role. Finally, the department shall explore the
utility of coordinating with neighboring states on long-haul truck
parking and evaluate methodologies for alleviating any air quality
issues relative to the issue. The department must report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005, on
the options, strategies, and recommendations for long-haul truck
parking.
(5) $50,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for evaluating high-speed passenger
transportation facilities and services, including rail or magnetic
levitation transportation systems, to connect airports as a means to
more efficiently utilize airport capacity, as well as connect major
population and activity centers. This evaluation shall be coordinated
with the airport capacity and facilities market analysis conducted
pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121 and results of
the evaluation shall be submitted by July 1, 2007. If Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, or if
federal funds are not received by March 1, 2006, for the purpose of
implementing Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) (($700,000)) $440,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for completing funding for a route
development plan of U.S. route 2.
(7) The department shall conduct a study of the resources allocated
to each of the seven department regions and the corresponding
workloads. Given the magnitude of the investments in the Puget Sound
region, particular emphasis shall be given to reviewing the resources
allocated and corresponding workloads with respect to the urban
corridors region and the northwest region. Based on the results of
this study, the department shall submit recommendations by December 1,
2006, to the legislature and the office of financial management
regarding reallocating resources and revising regional boundaries
within the department, as appropriate, in order to better coincide
allocated resources with designated regional boundaries.
(8) $750,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementing Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2871. If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2871 is
not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse. The regional transportation commission's duties to
develop, complete, and submit a governance proposal to the 2007
legislature are highly time sensitive. As a result, the legislature
finds that competitive bidding is not cost-effective or appropriate for
personal service contracts entered into by the commission, and that the
director of the office of financial management should, by the
director's authority under RCW 39.29.011(5), exempt any such personal
service contract from the competitive bidding requirements of chapter
39.29 RCW.
(9) $2,300,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the costs of the regional
transportation investment district (RTID) and department of
transportation project oversight. The department shall provide support
from its urban corridors region to assist in preparing project costs,
expenditure plans, and modeling. The department shall not deduct a
management reserve, nor charge management or overhead fees. These
funds are provided as a loan to the RTID and shall be repaid to the
state motor vehicle account within one year following the certification
of the election results related to the RTID.
(10) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2)
and 46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department solely to conduct
an analysis of expanding the transportation concurrency requirements
prescribed under the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, to
include development impacts on level of service standards applicable to
state-owned transportation facilities, including state highways and
state ferry routes. The objective of the analysis is to determine how
to ensure that jurisdictional divisions do not defeat growth management
act concurrency goals. The department shall convene a committee to
oversee the analysis, with the committee comprised of, at a minimum,
four members of the transportation committees of the legislature, four
members of the appropriate land use committees of the legislature, and
one member each from the association of Washington cities and the
Washington state association of counties, or a designee thereof. The
completed study, including recommendations, must be submitted to the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature, and to the office
of financial management, by December 1, 2006.
(11) The department of transportation, the Washington state
economic revenue forecast council, and the office of financial
management shall review and adopt a method of forecasting motor vehicle
and special fuel prices, revenue, and the amount of consumption that
has an increased rate of accuracy as compared to the existing method.
The three agencies shall submit a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2006, outlining the
methods researched and the criteria utilized to select and adopt the
new fuel forecasting method.
(12) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a transportation demand management
program, developed by the Whatcom council of governments, to further
reduce drive-alone trips and maximize the use of sustainable
transportation choices. The community based program must focus on all
trips, not only commute trips, by providing education, assistance, and
incentives to four target audiences: (a) Large work sites; (b)
employees of businesses in downtown areas; (c) school children; and (d)
residents of Bellingham.

Sec. 710 2006 c 370 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM
V
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($87,233,000))
$70,005,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,603,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($89,991,000))
$72,763,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation.
(a) $5,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs
transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers shall be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $19,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons
with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit
agency must have a maintenance of effort for special needs
transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of
effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies
shall be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response
service and route deviated service in calendar year 2003 as reported in
the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2003" published by the
department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than
thirty percent of these distributions. The first $450,000 provided to
King county shall be used as follows:
(i) $320,000 shall be used to provide electric buses, instead of
diesel buses, for service on Capital Hill in Seattle, Washington
through June 30, 2007;
(ii) $130,000 shall be used to provide training for blind
individuals traveling through Rainier Valley and the greater Seattle
area. The training is to include destination training and retraining
due to the expected closure of the downtown bus tunnel and training on
how to use the Sound Transit light rail system.
(2) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2003 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(3) $8,900,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a)
Public transit agencies to add vanpools; and (b) incentives for
employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for
public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; no operating
costs for public transit agencies are eligible for funding under this
grant program. No additional employees may be hired from the funds
provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting
of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. Additional
criteria for selecting grants must include leveraging funds other than
state funds.
(4) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the city of Seattle for the
Seattle streetcar project on South Lake Union.
(5) $1,200,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2124. If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2124 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6)(a) (($20,000,000)) $2,832,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the regional
mobility grant projects identified on the LEAP Transportation Document
2006-D, Regional Mobility Grant Program Projects as developed March 8,
2006. The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards
under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the
projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been
awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within one
year of the grant award, shall be reviewed by the department to
determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall
promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and
identify where unused grant funds remain because actual project costs
were lower than estimated in the grant award. When funds become
available either because grant awards have been rescinded for lack of
sufficient project activity or because completed projects returned
excess grant funds upon project closeout, the department shall
expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified alternative projects
identified on the list.
(b) Pursuant to the grant program established in RCW 47.66.030, the
department shall issue a call for projects and/or service proposals.
Applications must be received by the department by November 1, 2005,
and November 1, 2006. The department must submit a prioritized list
for funding to the transportation committees of the legislature that
reflects the department's recommendation, as well as, a list of all
project or service proposals received.
(7) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for new tri-county connection service
for Island, Skagit, and Whatcom transit agencies.
(8) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to King county as a state match to
obtain federal funding for a car sharing program for persons meeting
certain income or employment criteria.
(9) $750,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the local
government and regional transportation planning requirements in
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6566 (commute trip reduction).
The department may use contract or temporary employees to implement the
bill and shall allocate the remaining funds to regional transportation
planning organizations, counties, and cities on an as needed basis. If
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6566 is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) (($200,000)) $140,000 of the multimodal account appropriation
is provided solely for up to three low-income car ownership programs.
The department shall seek to leverage available federal funds from the
job access and reverse commute program to augment the funding provided
in this subsection. Additionally, the department shall report back to
the appropriate committees of the legislature with a review of the
obstacles presented by state laws on surplus property disposal to
community organizations reconditioning cars and selling those cars at
below market rates to low-income families.

Sec. 711 2006 c 370 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($372,254,000))
$388,061,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,660,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($375,914,000))
$391,721,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($75,280,000)) $80,476,000 of the total appropriation is
provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2005-2007
biennium.
(2) The maximum amount of expenditures for compensation paid to
ferry employees during the 2005-2007 biennium shall not exceed
(($226,455,000)) $235,325,000. This amount reflects the sole source of
state funding available to support the implementation of any collective
bargaining agreements or arbitration awards with respect to state ferry
employee compensation, including salaries, wages, and employee
benefits, during the 2005-2007 biennium, which amount includes
$6,223,000 in full satisfaction of the arbitration awards for the
2001-2003 biennium and $1,339,000 for labor productivity gains
agreements and $8,870,000 in full satisfaction of the arbitration
awards and the negotiated collective bargaining agreements for the
2003-2005 and 2005-2007 biennia. The department's use of this
expenditure authority constitutes a good faith attempt to implement
such agreements and awards, including those applicable to prior
biennia. It is the intent of the legislature that the expenditure
authority provided in this subsection fully satisfy any agreements or
awards required to be implemented during the 2005-2007 biennium, and
that the provisions of Substitute House Bill No. 3178 (marine employees
collective bargaining) will govern the implementation of agreements or
awards effective beginning with the 2007-2009 biennium. For the
purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation paid to
ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and employee
benefits as defined in the office of financial management's state
administrative and accounting manual, chapter 75.70, named under
objects of expenditure "A" and "B".
(3) $1,116,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for ferry security operations
necessary to comply with the ferry security plan submitted by the
Washington state ferry system to the United States coast guard. The
department shall track security costs and expenditures. Ferry security
operations costs shall not be included as part of the operational costs
that are used to calculate farebox recovery.
(4) The Washington state ferries must work with the department's
information technology division to implement an electronic fare system,
including the integration of the regional fare coordination system
(smart card). Each December and June, semi-annual updates must be
provided to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning
the status of implementing and completing this project, with updates
concluding the first December after full project implementation.
(5) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide service
to Sidney, British Columbia.
(6) $3,660,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to provide passenger-only ferry
service. The ferry system shall continue passenger-only ferry service
from Vashon Island to Seattle until such time as a county ferry
district's assumption of the route, as authorized by Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6787. Beginning September 1, 2005, ferry system management
shall implement its agreement with the Inlandboatmen's Union of the
Pacific and the International Organization of Masters, Mates and Pilots
providing for part-time passenger-only work schedules.
(7) $350,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 3178 (marine employees collective bargaining). If
Substitute House Bill No. 3178 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 712 2006 c 370 s 228 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,876,000))
$35,376,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $29,091,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service contract and
Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and maintaining
the state-supported passenger rail service. Upon completion of the
rail platform project in the city of Stanwood, the department shall
provide daily Amtrak Cascades service to the city.
(b) The department shall negotiate with Amtrak and Burlington
Northern Santa Fe to adjust the Amtrak Cascades schedule to leave
Bellingham at a significantly earlier hour.
(2) (($2,750,000)) $1,500,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is provided solely for a new round trip
rail service between Seattle and Portland beginning July 1, 2006.
(3) No AMTRAK Cascade runs may be eliminated.
(4) $40,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the produce railcar program. The
department is encouraged to implement the produce railcar program by
maximizing private investment.
(5) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a study of the realignment of
highway and rail in the Longview industrial area (SR 432) corridor,
specifically regarding whether the construction of a limited access
bypass highway to reduce congestion resulting from anticipated growth
in future rail and truck traffic, is a feasible alternative. In
conducting the study, the department shall consult port districts,
local government planning staff, and rail road companies, and other
appropriate stakeholders.
(6) $60,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a study of the need for
transloading capabilities in the West Plains area that could be served
by the Geiger Spur, including evaluation of prospective transloader
sites, potential operators and users, and the type, size, and special
needs of shippers/customers. The study must also evaluate the costs
associated with building and operating a transloader site and the
impact to local roadways and surrounding land uses. In conducting the
study, the department shall consult with Spokane county.

Sec. 713 2006 c 370 s 229 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,500,000))
$8,836,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,597,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $411,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,508,000))
$11,844,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $211,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and
$411,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
are provided solely for the state's contribution to county and city
studies of flood hazards in association with interstate highways.
First priority shall be given to threats along the I-5 corridor.
(2) (($525,000)) $861,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely to the department in accordance with
RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department
solely for contract services with the association of Washington cities
and the Washington state association of counties for improving
transportation permitting and mitigation processes.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--CAPITAL
Sec. 801 2005 c 313 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,801,000))
$4,138,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,535,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
Shelton training academy domestic water and wastewater treatment
project.
(2) $1,266,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for minor
works projects.

Sec. 802 2006 c 370 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,933,000))
$38,046,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,697,000))
$31,882,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($97,985,000))
$70,283,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $355,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is provided for county ferries as set forth in RCW
47.56.725(4).

Sec. 803 2006 c 370 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($101,425,000))
$93,425,000
Small City Preservation and Sidewalk
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$1,696,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($94,401,000))
$82,258,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($197,826,000))
$177,379,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The transportation improvement account -- state appropriation
includes up to (($14,143,000)) $7,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in RCW 47.26.500.
(2) (($2,000,000)) $1,696,000 of the small city preservation and
sidewalk account--state appropriation is provided to fund the
provisions of chapter 83, Laws of 2005 (Substitute Senate Bill No.
5775).

Sec. 804 2006 c 370 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,190,511,000))
$1,190,261,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,165,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $395,043,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,522,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,479,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $274,038,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $384,186,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,002,000))
$750,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,391,946,000))
$2,391,444,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by fund, project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document
2006-1, Highway Improvement Program (I) as developed March 8, 2006.
However, limited transfers of allocations between projects may occur
for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in
section 603 of this act.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $6,835,000 of
the transportation partnership account--state appropriation, $5,002,000
of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation, and $2,645,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation are for project 109040T: I-90/Seattle to Mercer Island
– Two way transit/HOV. Expenditure of these funds on construction is
contingent upon the development of an access plan that provides
equitable and dependable access for I-90 Mercer Island exit and entry.
(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation is for a west
Olympia access study, to complete an access study for state route
101/west Olympia.
(d) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $800,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation is for an SR
534 access point decision report.
(f) Within the amounts provided within this subsection, $6,000,000
of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation is for
project 509009B: I-90 Snoqualmie Pass East - Hyak to Keechelus dam.
However, if the preferred alternative selected for this project results
in a lower total project cost, the remaining funds may be used for
concrete rehabilitation on I-90 in the vicinity of this project.
(g) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $12,841,000 of
the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation
and $4,939,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation are for construction of a new interchange on SR 522 to
provide direct access to the University of Washington Bothell/Cascadia
community college joint campus. This appropriation assumes an
additional $8,061,000 will be provided in the 2007-09 biennium from the
transportation partnership account.
(h) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $19,262,149 of
the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation and $1,873,478 of the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation are for
project 154302E: SR 543 (I-5 to the international boundary).
(2) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$50,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843.
(3) The department shall not commence construction on any part of
the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project until a
record of decision has been reached providing reasonable assurance that
project impacts will be avoided, minimized, or mitigated as much as
practicable to protect against further adverse impacts on neighborhood
environmental quality as a result of repairs and improvements made to
the state route 520 bridge and its connecting roadways, and that any
such impacts will be addressed through engineering design choices,
mitigation measures, or a combination of both. The requirements of
this section shall not apply to off-site pontoon construction
supporting the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV
project.
(4) The transportation partnership account--state appropriation
includes up to $150,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.873.
(5) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation
includes up to $257,016,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation includes up to $17,022,000 in unexpended proceeds
from the March 2005 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.843 for the
Tacoma Narrows bridge project.
(6) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation includes up to $880,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized by chapter 147, Laws of 2003.
(7) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2005, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each project in the project lists
submitted pursuant to this act. Other projects may be reported on a
programmatic basis. The department shall work with the office of
financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature to agree on report formatting and elements. Elements shall
include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs.
The department shall also provide the information required under this
subsection on a quarterly basis via the transportation executive
information systems (TEIS).
(8) The department of transportation shall conduct an analysis of
the causes of traffic congestion on I-5 in the vicinity of Fort Lewis
and develop recommendations for alleviating the congestion. The
department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2005, on its analysis and recommendations
regarding traffic congestion on I-5 in the vicinity of Fort Lewis.
(9) The department of transportation is authorized to proceed with
the SR 519 Intermodal Access project if the city of Seattle has not
agreed to a project configuration or design by July 1, 2006.
(10) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$14,214,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.10.843.
(11) The special category C account--state appropriation includes
up to $1,710,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.812.
(12) The department should consider using mitigation banking on
appropriate projects whenever possible, without increasing the cost to
projects. The department should consider using the advanced
environmental mitigation revolving account (AEMRA) for corridor and
watershed based mitigation opportunities, in addition to project
specific mitigation.
(13) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a planning study regarding congestion mitigation
improvements on state route 101 in the vicinity of the city of
Aberdeen.
(14) $6,200,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for eastern Washington international border crossing
and freight mobility projects, including pavement preservation,
pavement structural strengthening, and other safety enhancements.
Projects shall include funding for U.S. route 97 international border
vicinity paving and improvement projects.
(15) $3,509,738 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
and $30,793 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation are
provided solely for project 100598C: I-5 Blaine Exit interchange
improvements.
(((17))) (16) The legislature recognizes that the finance and
project implementation planning processes required for the Alaskan Way
viaduct and Seattle Seawall replacement project and the SR 520 bridge
replacement and HOV project cannot guarantee appropriate decisions
unless key study assumptions are reasonable with respect to each
project.
To assure appropriate finance plan and project implementation plan
assumptions, an expert review panel shall be appointed to provide
independent financial and technical review for development of a finance
plan and project implementation plan for the projects described in this
subsection.
(a) The expert review panel shall consist of five to ten members
who are recognized experts in relevant fields, such as planning,
engineering, finance, law, the environment, emerging transportation
technologies, geography, and economics.
(b) The expert review panel shall be selected cooperatively by the
chairs of the senate and house transportation committees, the secretary
of the department of transportation, and the governor to assure a
balance of disciplines.
(c) The chair of the expert review panel shall be designated by the
governor.
(d) The expert panel shall, with respect to completion of the
project alternatives as described in the draft environmental impact
statement of each project:
(i) Review the finance plan for the project to ensure that it
clearly identifies secured and anticipated funding sources and is
feasible and sufficient;
(ii) Review the project implementation plan covering all state and
local permitting and mitigation approvals that ensure the most
expeditious and cost-effective delivery of the project; and
(iii) Report its findings and recommendations on the items
described in (d)(i) and (ii) of this subsection to the joint
transportation committee, the office of financial management, and the
governor no later than September 1, 2006.
(e) Upon receipt of the expert review panel's findings and
recommendations under (d)(iii) of this subsection, the governor must
make a finding of whether each finance plan is feasible and sufficient
to complete the project as described in the draft environmental impact
statement.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to delay
construction of any of the projects referenced in this subsection.
(((18)(a) Prior to commencing construction on either project, the
department of transportation must complete all of the following
requirements for both the Alaskan Way viaduct and Seattle Seawall
replacement project, and the state route number 520 bridge replacement
and HOV project: (i) In accordance with the national environmental
policy act, the department must designate the preferred alternative,
prepare a substantial project mitigation plan, and complete a
comprehensive cost estimate review using the department's cost estimate
validation process, for each project; (ii) in accordance with all
applicable federal highway administration planning and project
management requirements, the department must prepare a project finance
plan for each project that clearly identifies secured and anticipated
fund sources, cash flow timing requirements, and project staging and
phasing plans if applicable; and (iii) the department must report these
results for each project to the joint transportation committee.
(b) The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to (i)
utility relocation work, and related activities, on the Alaskan Way
viaduct and Seattle Seawall replacement project and (ii) off-site
pontoon construction supporting the state route number 520 bridge
replacement and HOV project.))

Sec. 805 2006 c 370 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,687,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,799,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($435,310,000))
$434,483,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,485,000
Puyallup Tribal Settlement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,540,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($575,821,000))
$574,994,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by fund, project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document
2006-1, Highway Preservation Program (P) as developed March 8, 2006.
However, limited transfers of allocations between projects may occur
for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in
section 603 of this act.
(2) $11,000,000 of the Puyallup tribal settlement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mitigation costs associated with
the Murray Morgan/11th Street Bridge demolition. The department may
negotiate with the city of Tacoma for the purpose of transferring
ownership of the Murray Morgan/11th Street Bridge to the city. The
department may use the Puyallup tribal settlement account
appropriation, as well as any funds appropriated in the current
biennium and planned in future biennia for the demolition and
mitigation for the demolition of the bridge to rehabilitate or replace
the bridge, if agreed to by the city. In no event shall the
department's participation exceed $26,500,000 and no funds may be
expended unless the city of Tacoma agrees to take ownership of the
bridge in its entirety and provide that the payment of these funds
extinguishes any real or implied agreements regarding future
expenditures on the bridge.
(3) $740,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation,
$106,149,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation, and
$10,305,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the Hood Canal bridge project.
(4) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$735,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for emergency purposes.
(5) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(6) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2005, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each project in the project lists
submitted pursuant to this act. Other projects may be reported on a
programmatic basis. The department shall work with the office of
financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature to agree on report formatting and elements. Elements shall
include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs.
The department shall also provide the information required under this
subsection on a quarterly basis via the transportation executive
information systems (TEIS).
(7) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$912,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.10.843.
(8) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$6,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843.
(9) (($4,000,000)) $3,200,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation and $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation, as specified in subsection (8) of this section, are for
expenditures on damaged state roads due to flooding, mudslides, rock
fall, or other unforeseen events. Slide repair on state routes 101, 4,
107, and 105 must be funded from this amount if federal emergency funds
are not available.

Sec. 806 2006 c 370 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL
((Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000))
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,998,000))
$16,734,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,340,000))
$1,900,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,008,000))
$694,000
((Freight Mobility Investment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Passenger Ferry Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000))
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,403,000))
$21,110,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($557,000))
$145,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,700,000))
$1,900,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account--
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,050,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($125,815,000))
$45,533,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to programs I and P and state funds shall be
transferred from programs I and P to program Z to replace those federal
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department may not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the office of financial management. The
department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2006.
(2) The department shall, on a quarterly basis, provide status
reports to the legislature on the delivery of projects as outlined in
the project lists distributed with this act, and on any additional
projects for which the department has expended funds during the 2005-07
fiscal biennium, except for projects managed by the freight mobility
strategic investment board. The department shall work with the
transportation committees of the legislature to agree on report
formatting and elements. For projects funded by new revenue in the
2003 and 2005 transportation packages, reporting elements shall
include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs.
Other projects may be reported on a programmatic basis. The department
shall also provide the information required under this subsection on a
quarterly basis via the transportation executive information system
(TEIS).
(3) The multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation
includes up to $6,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized
by RCW 47.10.867.
(4) $1,545,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to fund the
multiphase cooperative project with the state of Oregon to dredge the
Columbia River. The amount provided in this subsection shall lapse
unless the state of Oregon appropriates a dollar-for-dollar match to
fund its share of the project.
(5) (($206,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
reappropriated and provided solely for additional traffic and
pedestrian safety improvements near schools. The highways and local
programs division within the department of transportation shall
administer this program. The department shall review all projects
receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to
determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any
project that has been awarded traffic and pedestrian safety improvement
grant funds, but does not report activity on the project within one
year of grant award should be reviewed by the department to determine
whether the grant should be terminated. The department must promptly
close out grants when projects have been completed, and identify where
unused grant funds remain because actual project costs were lower than
estimated in the grant award. The department shall expeditiously
extend new grant awards to qualified projects when funds become
available either because grant awards have been rescinded for lack of
sufficient project activity or because completed projects returned
excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(6) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$905,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843.
(7) $607,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to support the safe
routes to school program.
(8) $16,110,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for the local freight capital projects in progress
identified in this subsection. The specific funding listed is provided
solely for the respective projects: SR 397 Ainsworth Ave. Grade
Crossing, $4,992,000; Colville Alternate Truck Route, $1,746,000; S.
228th Street Extension and Grade Separation, $6,500,000; Bigelow Gulch
Road-Urban Boundary to Argonne Rd., $2,000,000; Granite Falls Alternate
Route, $122,000; and Pacific Hwy. E./Port of Tacoma Road to Alexander,
$750,000.
(9) $2,898,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the local freight capital projects in progress
identified in this subsection. The specific funding listed is provided
solely for the respective projects: Duwamish Intelligent
Transportation Systems (ITS), $2,382,000; Port of Kennewick/Piert Road,
$516,000.
(10) $6,000,000 of the multimodal account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the local freight 'D' street grade separation
project.
(11) The department shall issue a call for pedestrian safety
projects, such as safe routes to schools and transit, and bicycle and
pedestrian paths. Applications must be received by the department by
November 1, 2005, and November 1, 2006. The department shall identify
cost-effective projects, and submit a prioritized list to the
legislature for funding by December 15th of each year. Recommendations
made to the legislature for safe routes to schools and bicycle and
pedestrian path projects must, to the extent practicable based on
available funding, allocate sixty percent of available funds to bicycle
and pedestrian path projects and forty percent to safe routes to
schools. Preference shall be given to projects that provide a local
match.
(12) $18,370,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation, $6,000,000 of the freight mobility multimodal account--state appropriation, $2,008,000 of the transportation partnership
account--state appropriation, and $6,000,000 of the freight mobility
investment account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
projects and activities as listed by fund, project and amount in LEAP
Transportation Document 2006-1, Local Programs (Z) as developed March
8, 2006. However, limited transfers of allocations between projects
may occur for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and
limitations in section 603 of this act.
(13) $870,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Yakima Avenue, 9th Street to
Front Street, pedestrian safety improvement project.
(14) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the pedestrian and bicycle safety
program projects and safe routes to schools program projects identified
on the LEAP Transportation Document 2006-B, Pedestrian and Bicycle
Safety Program Projects and Safe Routes to Schools Program Projects as
developed March 8, 2006. Projects must be allocated funding based on
order of priority. The department shall review all projects receiving
grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine
whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project
that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the
project within one year of the grant award, shall be reviewed by the
department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The
department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and identify where unused grant funds remain because actual
project costs were lower than estimated in the grant award. When funds
become available either because grant awards have been rescinded for
lack of sufficient project activity or because completed projects
returned excess grant funds upon project closeout, the department shall
expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified alternative projects
identified on the list.
(15) $9,700,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for the intersection and corridor safety program
projects as identified on the LEAP Transportation Document 2006-A,
Intersection and Corridor Safety Program Projects as developed March 8,
2006.
(16) $19,500,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation is provided solely for rural county two-lane roadway
pilot projects including $7,500,000 already under contract. Any
further allocations shall be prioritized by the department based on
high-accident-corridor criteria. For purposes of this subsection,
"high-accident-corridor" means a highway corridor of one mile or more
where analysis of collision history indicates that the section has
higher than average collision and severity factors.
(17) $2,500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the Yakima downtown futures initiative.
(18) $810,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the projects identified in this
subsection: Des Moines creek trail, $250,000; SR 282 to Port of
Ephrata connector, $385,000; Mount Baker Ridge viewpoint, $175,000.
(20) $688,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for completion of the Coal Creek Parkway project.
(21) $9,000,000 of the passenger ferry account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of the passenger-only ferry
grant program created in Substitute Senate Bill No. 6787. If
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6787 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))
$827,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the projects identified in this subsection: The
Franklin county slide project, $800,000; and the Loomis-Oroville Road
guardrail replacement project, $27,000.
(6) $252,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Winthrop pedestrian and bike
path project.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 901 2006 c 370 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND
DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND
REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($334,313,000))
$329,713,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,091,000))
$5,791,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,241,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,923,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($682,000))
$782,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($370,000))
$390,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,600,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,125,000))
$975,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($418,465,000))
$413,535,000

Sec. 902 2006 c 370 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND
FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,000))
$18,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,200,000))
$2,098,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $375,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,871,000))
$2,876,000

Sec. 903 2006 c 370 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($487,612,000))
$468,391,000

Sec. 904 2006 c 370 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSFERS
(1) RV Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$815,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000,000
(3) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(4) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,000,000))
$50,680,000
(5) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Partnership
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,127,000
(6) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,980,000
(7) Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Small City Pavement and Sidewalk
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
(8) Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Improvement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
(9) Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the County Arterial Preservation
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
(10) License Plate Technology Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
(11) Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Partnership
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,417,000
(12) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Freight Mobility Multimodal
Account--State, up to a maximum of . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,700,000))
$3,537,000
(13) Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
(14) Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Freight Mobility Multimodal
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,610,000

(15) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,288,000
The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of transportation shall only transfer funds in
subsection (2) of this section up to the level provided, on an as-needed basis.
(b) The amount transferred in subsection (12) of this section shall
be the same as the Union Pacific Railroad's original contribution,
adjusted for earned interest and expenditures, and shall be made on
June 30, 2006.
(c) The amount transferred in subsection (14) of this section is
the equivalent of the Burlington Northern Santa Fe funds advanced to
the SR 519 project and shall be invested in a freight mobility project
agreed to by the freight mobility strategic investment board and the
BNSF railway if the final design of the SR 519 project does not include
the original rail benefit.
(d) The amount transferred in subsection (13) of this section is
appropriated as a nonreimbursable state financial contribution to the
project and does not require repayment.

Sec. 905 RCW 46.16.685 and 2003 c 370 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The license plate technology account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts collected under RCW 46.01.140(4)(e)(ii) must be
deposited into this account. Expenditures from this account must
support current and future license plate technology and systems
integration upgrades for both the department and correctional
industries. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Additionally, the moneys in this account may be used to
reimburse the motor vehicle account for any appropriation made to
implement the digital license plate system. During the 2005-07 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the license plate
technology account to the highway safety fund such amounts as reflect
the excess account balance of the license plate technology account.

Sec. 906 RCW 46.68.060 and 1969 c 99 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as
the highway safety fund to the credit of which shall be deposited all
moneys directed by law to be deposited therein. This fund shall be
used for carrying out the provisions of law relating to driver
licensing, driver improvement, financial responsibility, cost of
furnishing abstracts of driving records and maintaining such case
records, and to carry out the purposes set forth in RCW 43.59.010.
During the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from
the highway safety fund to the state patrol highway account amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the highway safety fund.

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT
FASPAA . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
IBU . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
IFPTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
MEBA-LICENSED . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
MEBA-UNLICENSED . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
METAL TRADES COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
MM&P . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
MM&P-WATCH SUPERVISORS . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
OPEIU . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
SEIU . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
WSP LIEUTENANTS ASSOCIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
WSP TROOPERS ASSOCIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
COMPENSATION
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
PENSION CONTRIBUTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE--SUPER COALITION INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
REVISE PENSION GAIN SHARING . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 4, 30, 88
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
DRIVER SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
VEHICLE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL FACILITIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
AVIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
AVIATION -- PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 75
IMPROVEMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I . . . . . . . . . . . . 89
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 96
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 87
MARINE . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 84
PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P . . . . . . . . . . . . 94
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 80
RAIL -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
RAIL -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 86
TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 77
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--FUND TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 55
JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5, 66
MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
STATE TREASURER
ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 101, 102
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER . . . . . . . . . . . . 43, 44
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 45, 102
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 5, 30, 88
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 30, 88
CRIMINAL HISTORY AND BACKGROUND CHECKS . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 7, 69
TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 9, 72
WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
--- END ---