BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.520 and 2004 c 141 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The term "medical assistance" may include the following care
and services: (a) Inpatient hospital services; (b) outpatient hospital
services; (c) other laboratory and X-ray services; (d) nursing facility
services; (e) physicians' services, which shall include prescribed
medication and instruction on birth control devices; (f) medical care,
or any other type of remedial care as may be established by the
secretary; (g) home health care services; (h) private duty nursing
services; (i) dental services; (j) physical and occupational therapy
and related services; (k) prescribed drugs, dentures, and prosthetic
devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in diseases
of the eye or by an optometrist, whichever the individual may select;
(l) personal care services, as provided in this section; (m) hospice
services; (n) other diagnostic, screening, preventive, and
rehabilitative services; and (o) like services when furnished to a
child by a school district in a manner consistent with the requirements
of this chapter. For the purposes of this section, the department may
not cut off any prescription medications, oxygen supplies, respiratory
services, or other life-sustaining medical services or supplies.
"Medical assistance," notwithstanding any other provision of law,
shall not include routine foot care, or dental services delivered by
any health care provider, that are not mandated by Title XIX of the
social security act unless there is a specific appropriation for these
services.
(2) The department shall amend the state plan for medical
assistance under Title XIX of the federal social security act to
include personal care services, as defined in 42 C.F.R. 440.170(f), in
the categorically needy program.
(3) The department shall adopt, amend, or rescind such
administrative rules as are necessary to ensure that Title XIX personal
care services are provided to eligible persons in conformance with
federal regulations.
(a) These administrative rules shall include financial eligibility
indexed according to the requirements of the social security act
providing for medicaid eligibility.
(b) The rules shall require clients be assessed as having a medical
condition requiring assistance with personal care tasks. Plans of care
for clients requiring health-related consultation for assessment and
service planning may be reviewed by a nurse.
(c) The department shall determine by rule which clients have a
health-related assessment or service planning need requiring registered
nurse consultation or review. This definition may include clients that
meet indicators or protocols for review, consultation, or visit.
(4) The department shall design and implement a means to assess the
level of functional disability of persons eligible for personal care
services under this section. The personal care services benefit shall
be provided to the extent funding is available according to the
assessed level of functional disability. Any reductions in services
made necessary for funding reasons should be accomplished in a manner
that assures that priority for maintaining services is given to persons
with the greatest need as determined by the assessment of functional
disability.
(5) Effective July 1, 1989, the department shall offer hospice
services in accordance with available funds.
(6) For Title XIX personal care services administered by aging and
disability services administration of the department, the department
shall contract with area agencies on aging:
(a) To provide case management services to individuals receiving
Title XIX personal care services in their own home; and
(b) To reassess and reauthorize Title XIX personal care services or
other home and community services as defined in RCW 74.39A.009 in home
or in other settings for individuals consistent with the intent of this
section:
(i) Who have been initially authorized by the department to receive
Title XIX personal care services or other home and community services
as defined in RCW 74.39A.009; and
(ii) Who, at the time of reassessment and reauthorization, are
receiving such services in their own home.
(7) In the event that an area agency on aging is unwilling to enter
into or satisfactorily fulfill a contract or an individual consumer's
need for case management services will be met through an alternative
delivery system, the department is authorized to:
(a) Obtain the services through competitive bid; and
(b) Provide the services directly until a qualified contractor can
be found.
(8) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, effective July 1, 2007, the department may offer
medicare part D prescription drug copayment coverage to full benefit
dual eligible beneficiaries.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.09.010 and 1990 c 296 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Children's health program" means the health care services
program provided to children under eighteen years of age and in
households with incomes at or below the federal poverty level as
annually defined by the federal department of health and human services
as adjusted for family size, and who are not otherwise eligible for
medical assistance or the limited casualty program for the medically
needy.
(2) "Committee" means the children's health services committee
created in section 3 of this act.
(3) "County" means the board of county commissioners, county
council, county executive, or tribal jurisdiction, or its designee. A
combination of two or more county authorities or tribal jurisdictions
may enter into joint agreements to fulfill the requirements of RCW
74.09.415 through 74.09.435.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Department of health" means the Washington state department of
health created pursuant to RCW 43.70.020.
(6) "Internal management" means the administration of medical
assistance, medical care services, the children's health program, and
the limited casualty program.
(7) "Limited casualty program" means the medical care program
provided to medically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the
federal social security act, and to medically indigent persons who are
without income or resources sufficient to secure necessary medical
services.
(8) "Medical assistance" means the federal aid medical care program
provided to categorically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of
the federal social security act.
(9) "Medical care services" means the limited scope of care
financed by state funds and provided to general assistance recipients,
and recipients of alcohol and drug addiction services provided under
chapter 74.50 RCW.
(10) "Nursing home" means nursing home as defined in RCW 18.51.010.
(11) "Poverty" means the federal poverty level determined annually
by the United States department of health and human services, or
successor agency.
(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(13) "Full benefit dual eligible beneficiary" means an individual
who, for any month: Has coverage for the month under a medicare
prescription drug plan or medicare advantage plan with part D coverage;
and is determined eligible by the state for full medicaid benefits for
the month under any eligibility category in the state's medicaid plan
or a section 1115 demonstration waiver that provides pharmacy benefits.

--- END ---