BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The economic trends of globalization and technological change
are increasing the demand for higher and differently skilled workers
than in the past;
(2) Increasing Washington's economic competitiveness requires
increasing the supply of skilled workers in the state;
(3) Improving the labor market competitiveness of all Washington
residents requires that all residents have access to postsecondary
education; and
(4) Community and technical college workforce training programs and
Washington state apprenticeship and training council-approved
apprenticeship programs provide effective and efficient pathways for
people to enter high wage, high skill careers while also meeting the
needs of the economy.

PART 1
OPPORTUNITY GRANT PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The college board shall develop and implement a workforce
education program known as the opportunity grant program to provide
funding for students enrolled at qualified institutions of higher
education in opportunity grant-eligible programs of study as described
in section 201 of this act. Students enrolled in the opportunity grant
program are eligible for:
(a) Funding for tuition and mandatory fees at the public community
and technical college rate, prorated if the credit load is less than
full time, paid directly to the educational institution; and
(b) An additional one thousand dollars per academic year for books,
tools, and supplies, prorated if the credit load is less than full
time.
(2) Funding under subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section is
limited to a maximum forty-five credits or the equivalent in an
opportunity grant-eligible program of study, including required related
courses. No student may receive opportunity grant funding for more
than forty-five credits or for more than three years from initial
receipt of grant funds in one or a combination of programs.
(3) Grants awarded under this section are subject to the
availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To be eligible for participation in the opportunity grant
program established in section 101 of this act, a student must:
(a) Be a Washington resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012
enrolled in an opportunity grant-eligible program of study; and
(b)(i) Be enrolled on or after January 1, 2008, but before January
1, 2010, have a family income that is at or below two hundred percent
of the federal poverty level using the most current guidelines
available from the United States department of health and human
services, and be determined to have financial need based on the free
application for federal student aid;
(ii) Be enrolled on or after January 1, 2010, but before January 1,
2012, and have a family income that is at or below the state median
family income using the state need grant schedule for the same academic
year; or
(iii) Be enrolled in a qualified institution of higher education on
or after January 1, 2012.
(2) Upon enrolling, the student must provide evidence of commitment
to complete the program. The student must make satisfactory progress
and maintain a cumulative 2.0 grade point average for continued
eligibility. If a student's cumulative grade point average falls below
2.0, the student may petition the institution of higher education of
attendance. The qualified institution of higher education has the
authority to establish a probationary period until such time as the
student's grade point average reaches required standards.
(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose,
qualified institutions of higher education shall receive an enhancement
of one thousand five hundred dollars for each full-time equivalent
student enrolled in the opportunity grant program whose income is below
two hundred percent of the federal poverty level. The funds shall be
used for individualized support services which may include, but are not
limited to, college and career advising, tutoring, emergency child
care, and emergency transportation. The qualified institution of
higher education is expected to help students access all financial
resources and support services available to them through alternative
sources.
(4) The college board shall be accountable for student retention
and completion of opportunity grant-eligible programs of study. It
shall set annual performance measures and targets and monitor the
performance at all qualified institutions of higher education. The
college board must reduce funding at institutions of higher education
that do not meet targets for two consecutive years, based on criteria
developed by the college board.
(5) The college board and higher education coordinating board shall
work together to ensure that students participating in the opportunity
grant program:
(a) Receive all other state and federal financial aid to which they
are entitled while receiving an opportunity grant; and
(b) Receive priority for state and federal financial aid when
pursuing a subsequent related credential, certificate, or degree at a
two or four-year institution of higher education, after completing the
opportunity grant program.
(6) The college board and higher education coordinating board shall
document the amount of opportunity grant assistance and the types and
amounts of other sources of financial aid received by participating
students. Annually, they shall produce a summary of the data.
(7) The college board shall:
(a) Begin developing the program no later than August 1, 2007, with
student enrollment to begin no later than January 14, 2008; and
(b) Submit a progress report to the legislature by December 1,
2008.
(8) The college board may, in implementing the opportunity grant
program, accept, use, and expend or dispose of contributions of money,
services, and property. All such moneys received by the college board
for the program must be deposited in an account at a depository
approved by the state treasurer. Only the college board or a duly
authorized representative thereof may authorize expenditures from this
account. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue
control, the account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required to permit expenditure of moneys in the
account.

PART 2
OPPORTUNITY PARTNERSHIPS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
The college board, in partnership with business, labor, and the
workforce training and education coordinating board, shall:
(1) Identify job specific training programs offered by qualified
postsecondary institutions that lead to a credential, certificate, or
degree in high demand occupations, which are occupations where data
show that employer demand for workers exceeds the supply of qualified
job applicants throughout the state or in a specific region, and where
training capacity is underutilized;
(2) Gain recognition of the credentials, certificates, and degrees
by Washington's employers and labor organizations. The college board
shall designate these recognized credentials, certificates, and degrees
as "opportunity grant-eligible programs of study"; and
(3) Market the credentials, certificates, and degrees to potential
students, businesses, and apprenticeship programs as a way for
individuals to advance in their careers and to better meet the needs of
industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Community and technical colleges shall partner with local
workforce development councils to develop the opportunity partnership
program. The opportunity partnership program may be newly developed or
part of an existing program, and shall provide mentoring to students
participating in the opportunity grant program. The program must
develop criteria and identify opportunity grant students who would
benefit by having a mentor. Each participating student shall be
matched with a business or labor mentor employed in the field in which
the student is interested. The mentor shall help the student explore
careers and employment options through any combination of tours,
informational interviews, job shadowing, and internships.
(2) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the
workforce training and education coordinating board shall create the
opportunity partnership program. The board, in partnership with
business, labor, and the college board, shall determine the criteria
for the distribution of funds.
(3) The board may, in implementing this section, accept, use, and
dispose of contributions of money, services, and property. All moneys
received by the board for the purposes of this section must be
deposited in a depository approved by the state treasurer. Only the
board or a duly authorized representative thereof may authorize
expenditures from this account. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control, the account is subject in all respects
to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit
expenditure of moneys in the account.

PART 3
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 301 RCW 28B.50.030 and 2005 c 258 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the
term:
(1) "System" shall mean the state system of community and technical
colleges, which shall be a system of higher education.
(2) "Board" shall mean the work force training and education
coordinating board.
(3) "College board" shall mean the state board for community and
technical colleges created by this chapter.
(4) "Director" shall mean the administrative director for the state
system of community and technical colleges.
(5) "District" shall mean any one of the community and technical
college districts created by this chapter.
(6) "Board of trustees" shall mean the local community and
technical college board of trustees established for each college
district within the state.
(7) "Occupational education" shall mean that education or training
that will prepare a student for employment that does not require a
baccalaureate degree, and education and training leading to an applied
baccalaureate degree.
(8) "K-12 system" shall mean the public school program including
kindergarten through the twelfth grade.
(9) "Common school board" shall mean a public school district board
of directors.
(10) "Community college" shall include those higher education
institutions that conduct education programs under RCW 28B.50.020.
(11) "Technical college" shall include those higher education
institutions with the sole mission of conducting occupational
education, basic skills, literacy programs, and offering on short
notice, when appropriate, programs that meet specific industry needs.
The programs of technical colleges shall include, but not be limited
to, continuous enrollment, competency-based instruction, industry-experienced faculty, curriculum integrating vocational and basic skills
education, and curriculum approved by representatives of employers and
labor. For purposes of this chapter, technical colleges shall include
Lake Washington Vocational-Technical Institute, Renton Vocational-Technical Institute, Bates Vocational-Technical Institute, Clover Park
Vocational Institute, and Bellingham Vocational-Technical Institute.
(12) "Adult education" shall mean all education or instruction,
including academic, vocational education or training, basic skills and
literacy training, and "occupational education" provided by public
educational institutions, including common school districts for persons
who are eighteen years of age and over or who hold a high school
diploma or certificate. However, "adult education" shall not include
academic education or instruction for persons under twenty-one years of
age who do not hold a high school degree or diploma and who are
attending a public high school for the sole purpose of obtaining a high
school diploma or certificate, nor shall "adult education" include
education or instruction provided by any four year public institution
of higher education.
(13) "Dislocated forest product worker" shall mean a forest
products worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in
the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of
a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or
industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or
her business because of the diminishing demand for the business'
services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from
employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources
impact area.
(14) "Forest products worker" shall mean a worker in the forest
products industries affected by the reduction of forest fiber
enhancement, transportation, or production. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries
assigned the major group standard industrial classification codes "24"
and "26" and the industries involved in the harvesting and management
of logs, transportation of logs and wood products, processing of wood
products, and the manufacturing and distribution of wood processing and
logging equipment. The commissioner may adopt rules further
interpreting these definitions. For the purposes of this subsection,
"standard industrial classification code" means the code identified in
RCW 50.29.025(3).
(15) "Dislocated salmon fishing worker" means a finfish products
worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in
the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of
a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or
industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or
her business because of the diminishing demand for the business's
services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from
employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources
impact area.
(16) "Salmon fishing worker" means a worker in the finfish industry
affected by 1994 or future salmon disasters. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries
involved in the commercial and recreational harvesting of finfish
including buying and processing finfish. The commissioner may adopt
rules further interpreting these definitions.
(17) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:
(a) A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial
census, that meets three of the five criteria set forth in subsection
(18) of this section;
(b) A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty
thousand in the 1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five
criteria as set forth in subsection (18) of this section; or
(c) A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census,
that is located in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five
criteria set forth in subsection (18) of this section.
(18) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:
(a) A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(b) A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(c) Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses
of one hundred positions or more;
(d) Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses
of one hundred positions or more; and
(e) An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state
average. The counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by
the employment security department for the most recent year for which
data is available. For the purposes of administration of programs
under this chapter, the United States post office five-digit zip code
delivery areas will be used to determine residence status for
eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition, a zip code
delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an urbanized
area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by zip
codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also
considered nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make
available a zip code listing of the areas to all agencies and
organizations providing services under this chapter.
(19) "Applied baccalaureate degree" means a baccalaureate degree
awarded by a college under RCW 28B.50.810 for successful completion of
a program of study that is:
(a) Specifically designed for individuals who hold an associate of
applied science degree, or its equivalent, in order to maximize
application of their technical course credits toward the baccalaureate
degree; and
(b) Based on a curriculum that incorporates both theoretical and
applied knowledge and skills in a specific technical field.
(20) "Qualified institutions of higher education" means:
(a) Washington public community and technical colleges;
(b) Private career schools that are members of an accrediting
association recognized by rule of the higher education coordinating
board for the purposes of chapter 28B.92 RCW; and
(c) Washington state apprenticeship and training council-approved
apprenticeship programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---