BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.050 and 1997 c 392 s 514 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of rape in the second degree when, under
circumstances not constituting rape in the first degree, the person
engages in sexual intercourse with another person:
(a) By forcible compulsion;
(b) When the victim is incapable of consent by reason of being
physically helpless or mentally incapacitated;
(c) When the victim is ((developmentally disabled)) a person with
a developmental disability and the perpetrator is a person who is not
married to the victim and who:
(i) Has supervisory authority over the victim; or
(ii) Was providing transportation, within the course of his or her
employment, to the victim at the time of the offense;
(d) When the perpetrator is a health care provider, the victim is
a client or patient, and the sexual intercourse occurs during a
treatment session, consultation, interview, or examination. It is an
affirmative defense that the defendant must prove by a preponderance of
the evidence that the client or patient consented to the sexual
intercourse with the knowledge that the sexual intercourse was not for
the purpose of treatment;
(e) When the victim is a resident of a facility for ((mentally
disordered or chemically dependent)) persons with a mental disorder or
chemical dependency and the perpetrator is a person who is not married
to the victim and has supervisory authority over the victim; or
(f) When the victim is a frail elder or vulnerable adult and the
perpetrator is a person who is not married to the victim and who:
(i) Has a significant relationship with the victim; or
(ii) Was providing transportation, within the course of his or her
employment, to the victim at the time of the offense.
(2) Rape in the second degree is a class A felony.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.44.100 and 2003 c 53 s 67 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of indecent liberties when he or she
knowingly causes another person who is not his or her spouse to have
sexual contact with him or her or another:
(a) By forcible compulsion;
(b) When the other person is incapable of consent by reason of
being mentally defective, mentally incapacitated, or physically
helpless;
(c) When the victim is ((developmentally disabled)) a person with
a developmental disability and the perpetrator is a person who is not
married to the victim and who:
(i) Has supervisory authority over the victim; or
(ii) Was providing transportation, within the course of his or her
employment, to the victim at the time of the offense;
(d) When the perpetrator is a health care provider, the victim is
a client or patient, and the sexual contact occurs during a treatment
session, consultation, interview, or examination. It is an affirmative
defense that the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the
evidence that the client or patient consented to the sexual contact
with the knowledge that the sexual contact was not for the purpose of
treatment;
(e) When the victim is a resident of a facility for ((mentally
disordered or chemically dependent)) persons with a mental disorder or
chemical dependency and the perpetrator is a person who is not married
to the victim and has supervisory authority over the victim; or
(f) When the victim is a frail elder or vulnerable adult and the
perpetrator is a person who is not married to the victim and who:
(i) Has a significant relationship with the victim; or
(ii) Was providing transportation, within the course of his or her
employment, to the victim at the time of the offense.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, indecent
liberties is a class B felony.
(b) Indecent liberties by forcible compulsion is a class A felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.44.010 and 2005 c 262 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Sexual intercourse" (a) has its ordinary meaning and occurs
upon any penetration, however slight, and
(b) Also means any penetration of the vagina or anus however
slight, by an object, when committed on one person by another, whether
such persons are of the same or opposite sex, except when such
penetration is accomplished for medically recognized treatment or
diagnostic purposes, and
(c) Also means any act of sexual contact between persons involving
the sex organs of one person and the mouth or anus of another whether
such persons are of the same or opposite sex.
(2) "Sexual contact" means any touching of the sexual or other
intimate parts of a person done for the purpose of gratifying sexual
desire of either party or a third party.
(3) "Married" means one who is legally married to another, but does
not include a person who is living separate and apart from his or her
spouse and who has filed in an appropriate court for legal separation
or for dissolution of his or her marriage.
(4) "Mental incapacity" is that condition existing at the time of
the offense which prevents a person from understanding the nature or
consequences of the act of sexual intercourse whether that condition is
produced by illness, defect, the influence of a substance or from some
other cause.
(5) "Physically helpless" means a person who is unconscious or for
any other reason is physically unable to communicate unwillingness to
an act.
(6) "Forcible compulsion" means physical force which overcomes
resistance, or a threat, express or implied, that places a person in
fear of death or physical injury to herself or himself or another
person, or in fear that she or he or another person will be kidnapped.
(7) "Consent" means that at the time of the act of sexual
intercourse or sexual contact there are actual words or conduct
indicating freely given agreement to have sexual intercourse or sexual
contact.
(8) "Significant relationship" means a situation in which the
perpetrator is:
(a) A person who undertakes the responsibility, professionally or
voluntarily, to provide education, health, welfare, or organized
recreational activities principally for minors;
(b) A person who in the course of his or her employment supervises
minors; or
(c) A person who provides welfare, health or residential
assistance, personal care, or organized recreational activities to
frail elders or vulnerable adults, including a provider, employee,
temporary employee, volunteer, or independent contractor who supplies
services to long-term care facilities licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 18.20, 18.51, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW, and home
health, hospice, or home care agencies licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, but not including a consensual
sexual partner.
(9) "Abuse of a supervisory position" means:
(a) To use a direct or indirect threat or promise to exercise
authority to the detriment or benefit of a minor; or
(b) To exploit a significant relationship in order to obtain the
consent of a minor.
(10) "((Developmentally disabled)) Person with a developmental
disability," for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1)(c) and 9A.44.100(1)(c),
means a person with a developmental disability as defined in RCW
71A.10.020.
(11) "Person with supervisory authority," for purposes of RCW
9A.44.050(1) (c) or (e) and 9A.44.100(1) (c) or (e), means any
proprietor or employee of any public or private care or treatment
facility who directly supervises developmentally disabled, mentally
disordered, or chemically dependent persons at the facility.
(12) "((Mentally disordered)) Person with a mental disorder" for
the purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1)(e) and 9A.44.100(1)(e) means a person
with a "mental disorder" as defined in RCW 71.05.020.
(13) "((Chemically dependent)) Person with a chemical dependency"
for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1)(e) and 9A.44.100(1)(e) means a person
who is "chemically dependent" as defined in RCW 70.96A.020(4).
(14) "Health care provider" for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050 and
9A.44.100 means a person who is, holds himself or herself out to be, or
provides services as if he or she were: (a) A member of a health care
profession under chapter 18.130 RCW; or (b) registered under chapter
18.19 RCW or licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, regardless of whether
the health care provider is licensed, certified, or registered by the
state.
(15) "Treatment" for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050 and 9A.44.100 means
the active delivery of professional services by a health care provider
which the health care provider holds himself or herself out to be
qualified to provide.
(16) "Frail elder or vulnerable adult" means a person sixty years
of age or older who has the functional, mental, or physical inability
to care for himself or herself. "Frail elder or vulnerable adult" also
includes a person found incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW, a person
over eighteen years of age who has a developmental disability under
chapter 71A.10 RCW, a person admitted to a long-term care facility that
is licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 18.20, 18.51,
72.36, or 70.128 RCW, and a person receiving services from a home
health, hospice, or home care agency licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---