BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95M.115 and 2006 c 231 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2007, a person who is known to be pregnant or
who is under three years of age shall not be vaccinated with a
mercury-containing vaccine or injected with a mercury-containing
product that contains more than 0.5 micrograms of mercury per 0.5
milliliter dose.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, an influenza
vaccine may contain up to 1.0 micrograms of mercury per 0.5 milliliter
dose.
(3) The secretary of the department of health may, upon the
secretary's or local public health officer's declaration of ((a public
health emergency)) an outbreak of vaccine-preventable disease or of a
shortage of vaccine that complies with subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, suspend the requirements of this section for the duration of
the ((emergency)) outbreak or shortage.
(4) All vaccines and products referenced under this section must
meet food and drug administration licensing requirements.

--- END ---