BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Close supervision" means that a supervising dentist whose
patient is being treated has personally diagnosed the condition to be
treated and has personally authorized the procedures to be performed.
The supervising dentist is continuously on-site and physically present
in the treatment facility while the procedures are performed by the
assistive personnel and capable of responding immediately in the event
of an emergency. The term does not require a supervising dentist to be
physically present in the operatory.
(2) "Commission" means the Washington state dental quality
assurance commission created in chapter 18.32 RCW.
(3) "Dental assistant" means a person who is registered by the
commission to provide supportive services to a licensed dentist to the
extent provided in this chapter and under the close supervision of a
dentist.
(4) "Dentist" means an individual who holds a license to practice
dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.
(6) "Expanded function dental auxiliary" means a person who is
licensed by the commission to provide supportive services to a licensed
dentist to the extent provided in this chapter and under the specified
level of supervision of a dentist.
(7) "General supervision" means that a supervising dentist has
examined and diagnosed the patient and provided subsequent instructions
to be performed by the assistive personnel, but does not require that
the dentist be physically present in the treatment facility.
(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(9) "Supervising dentist" means a dentist licensed under chapter
18.32 RCW that is responsible for providing the appropriate level of
supervision for dental assistants and expanded function dental
auxiliaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) No person may practice or represent
himself or herself as a registered dental assistant by use of any title
or description without being registered by the commission as having met
the standards established for registration under this chapter unless he
or she is exempt under section 11 of this act.
(2) No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a
licensed expanded function dental auxiliary by use of any title or
description without being licensed by the commission under this chapter
unless he or she is exempt under section 11 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The commission shall issue a registration to
practice as a dental assistant to any applicant who pays any applicable
fees, as established by the secretary in accordance with RCW 43.70.110
and 43.70.250, and submits, on forms provided by the secretary, the
applicant's name, address, and other information as determined by the
secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The commission shall issue a license to
practice as an expanded function dental auxiliary to any applicant who:
(a) Pays any applicable fees as established by the secretary in
accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250;
(b) Submits, on forms provided by the secretary, the applicant's
name, address, and other applicable information as determined by the
secretary; and
(c) Demonstrates that the following requirements have been met:
(i) Successful completion of a dental assisting education program
approved by the commission. The program may be an approved on-line
education program;
(ii) Successful completion of an expanded function dental auxiliary
education program approved by the commission; and
(iii) Successful passage of both a written examination and a
clinical examination in restorations approved by the commission.
(2)(a) An applicant that holds a limited license to practice dental
hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW is considered to have met the dental
assisting education program requirements of subsection (1)(c)(i) of
this section.
(b) An applicant that holds a full license to practice dental
hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW is considered to have met the
requirements of subsection (1)(c) of this section upon demonstrating
the successful completion of training in taking final impressions as
approved by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The commission shall adopt rules
relating to the scope of dental assisting services related to patient
care and laboratory duties that may be performed by dental assistants.
All dental services performed by dental assistants must be performed
under the close supervision of a supervising dentist as the dentist may
allow.
(2) In addition to any other limitations established by the
commission, dental assistants may not perform the following procedures:
(a) Any scaling procedure;
(b) Any oral prophylaxis, except coronal polishing;
(c) Administration of any general or local anesthetic, including
intravenous sedation;
(d) Any removal of or addition to the hard or soft tissue of the
oral cavity;
(e) Any diagnosis of or prescription for treatment of disease,
pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, or physical condition of the human
teeth, jaw, or adjacent structures; and
(f) The taking of any impressions of the teeth or jaw or the
relationships of the teeth or jaws, for the purpose of fabricating any
intra-oral restoration, appliance, or prosthesis.
(3) A dentist may not assign a dental assistant to perform duties
until the dental assistant has demonstrated skills necessary to perform
competently all assigned duties and responsibilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The commission shall adopt rules
relating to the scope of expanded function dental auxiliary services
related to patient care and laboratory duties that may be performed by
expanded function dental auxiliaries.
(2) The scope of expanded function dental auxiliary services that
the commission identifies in subsection (1) of this section includes:
(a) In addition to the dental assisting services that a dental
assistant may perform under the close supervision of a supervising
dentist, the performance of the following services under the general
supervision of a supervising dentist as the dentist may allow:
(i) Performing coronal polishing;
(ii) Giving fluoride treatments;
(iii) Applying sealants;
(iv) Placing dental x-ray film and exposing and developing the
films;
(v) Giving patient oral health instruction; and
(b) Notwithstanding any prohibitions in section 5 of this act, the
performance of the following services under the close supervision of a
supervising dentist as the dentist may allow:
(i) Placing and carving direct restorations; and
(ii) Taking final impressions.
(3) A dentist may not assign an expanded function dental auxiliary
to perform services until the expanded function dental auxiliary has
demonstrated skills necessary to perform competently all assigned
duties and responsibilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A supervising dentist is responsible for:
(1) Maintaining the appropriate level of supervision for dental
assistants and expanded function dental auxiliaries; and
(2) Ensuring that the dental assistants and expanded function
dental auxiliaries that the dentist supervises are able to competently
perform the tasks that they are assigned.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The commission shall issue an initial
credential or renewal credential to an applicant who has met the
requirements for a credential or deny an initial credential or renewal
credential based upon failure to meet the requirements for a credential
or unprofessional conduct or impairment governed by chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 An applicant holding a license in another
state may be licensed as an expanded function dental auxiliary in this
state without examination if the commission determines that the other
state's licensing standards are substantially equivalent to the
standards in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The commission may approve a written
examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or
association of licensing agencies for use by an applicant in meeting
the licensing requirements under section 4 of this act. The
requirement that the examination be written does not exclude the use of
computerized test administration.
(2) The commission, upon consultation with the dental hygiene
examining committee, may approve a clinical examination prepared or
administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing
agencies for use by an applicant in meeting the licensing requirements
under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Nothing in this chapter may be construed to
prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice of a dental assistant in the discharge of official
duties by dental assistants in the United States federal services on
federal reservations, including but not limited to the armed services,
coast guard, public health service, veterans' bureau, or bureau of
Indian affairs; or
(2) Expanded function dental auxiliary education and training
programs approved by the commission and the practice as an expanded
function dental auxiliary by students in expanded function dental
auxiliary education and training programs approved by the commission,
when acting under the direction and supervision of persons licensed
under chapter 18.29 or 18.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The commission may adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW as required to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Chapter 18.130 RCW governs unregistered or
unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of credentials, and the
discipline of those credentialed under this chapter. The commission is
the disciplining authority under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 18.29 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who holds a license under this chapter and who has met the
requirements under section 4 of this act and has been issued a license
to practice as an expanded function dental auxiliary may perform those
expanded function dental auxiliary services identified in section 6 of
this act under the specified supervision of a supervising dentist.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.32.030 and 2003 c 282 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following practices, acts, and operations are excepted from the
operation of the provisions of this chapter:
(1) The rendering of dental relief in emergency cases in the
practice of his or her profession by a physician or surgeon, licensed
as such and registered under the laws of this state, unless the
physician or surgeon undertakes to or does reproduce lost parts of the
human teeth in the mouth or to restore or to replace in the human mouth
lost or missing teeth;
(2) The practice of dentistry in the discharge of official duties
by dentists in the United States federal services on federal
reservations, including but not limited to the armed services, coast
guard, public health service, veterans' bureau, or bureau of Indian
affairs;
(3) Dental schools or colleges approved under RCW 18.32.040, and
the practice of dentistry by students in accredited dental schools or
colleges approved by the commission, when acting under the direction
and supervision of Washington state-licensed dental school faculty;
(4) The practice of dentistry by licensed dentists of other states
or countries while appearing as clinicians at meetings of the
Washington state dental association, or component parts thereof, or at
meetings sanctioned by them, or other groups approved by the
commission;
(5) The use of roentgen and other rays for making radiographs or
similar records of dental or oral tissues, under the supervision of a
licensed dentist or physician;
(6) The making, repairing, altering, or supplying of artificial
restorations, substitutions, appliances, or materials for the
correction of disease, loss, deformity, malposition, dislocation,
fracture, injury to the jaws, teeth, lips, gums, cheeks, palate, or
associated tissues or parts; providing the same are made, repaired,
altered, or supplied pursuant to the written instructions and order of
a licensed dentist which may be accompanied by casts, models, or
impressions furnished by the dentist, and the prescriptions shall be
retained and filed for a period of not less than three years and shall
be available to and subject to the examination of the secretary or the
secretary's authorized representatives;
(7) The removal of deposits and stains from the surfaces of the
teeth, the application of topical preventative or prophylactic agents,
and the polishing and smoothing of restorations, when performed or
prescribed by a dental hygienist licensed under the laws of this state;
(8) A qualified and licensed physician and surgeon or osteopathic
physician and surgeon extracting teeth or performing oral surgery
pursuant to the scope of practice under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW;
(9) The performing of dental operations or services by ((persons
not licensed under this chapter)) registered dental assistants and
licensed expanded function dental auxiliaries holding a credential
issued under chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 13 and 18 of this
act) when performed under the supervision of a licensed dentist, and
persons not licensed under this chapter: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That such
((nonlicensed)) a credentialed person shall in no event perform the
following dental operations or services unless permitted to be
performed by the person under this chapter or chapters 18.29, 18.57,
18.71, ((and)) 18.79, and 18.-- (sections 1 through 13 and 18 of this
act) RCW as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered
nurse practitioners:
(a) Any removal of or addition to the hard or soft tissue of the
oral cavity;
(b) Any diagnosis of or prescription for treatment of disease,
pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, or physical condition of the human
teeth or jaws, or adjacent structure;
(c) Any administration of general or injected local anaesthetic of
any nature in connection with a dental operation, including intravenous
sedation;
(d) Any oral prophylaxis;
(e) The taking of any impressions of the teeth or jaw or the
relationships of the teeth or jaws, for the purpose of fabricating any
intra-oral restoration, appliance, or prosthesis.

Sec. 16 RCW 18.32.0351 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 204 are each amended
to read as follows:
The Washington state dental quality assurance commission is
established, consisting of ((fourteen)) sixteen members each appointed
by the governor to a four-year term. No member may serve more than two
consecutive full terms. In appointing the initial members of the
commission, it is the intent of the legislature that, to the extent
possible, members of the previous boards and committees regulating
these professions be appointed to the commission. Members of the
commission hold office until their successors are appointed. The
governor may appoint members of the initial commission to staggered
terms of from one to four years. Thereafter, all members shall be
appointed to full four-year terms. Twelve members of the commission
must be dentists, two members must be expanded function dental
auxiliaries licensed under chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 13 and
18 of this act), and two members must be public members.

Sec. 17 RCW 18.130.040 and 2004 c 38 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(viii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(ix) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(x) Persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(xi) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and
family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xii) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xiii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiv) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xvi) Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(xvii) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xviii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xix) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xx) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;
(xxi) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
and
(xxii) Recreational therapists.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW and
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1
through 13 and 18 of this act);
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses
based on the conditions and criteria established in this chapter and
the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter
also governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to
denial of licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the
applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW 18.130.160
by the disciplining authority.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 By November 15, 2012, the department, in
consultation with the commission and the dental hygiene examining
committee, shall conduct a review of the effectiveness of the creation
of the dental assistant and expanded function dental auxiliary
professions as related to:
(1) Increasing professional standards in dental practices;
(2) Increasing efficiency in dental practices and community health
clinics;
(3) Promoting career ladders in the dental professions; and
(4) Recommendations for expanding or contracting the practice of
dental assistants and expanded function dental auxiliaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 1 through 13 and 18 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Section 16 of this act takes effect July 1,
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 (1) The provisions of this act apply to
registered dental assistants effective July 1, 2008.
(2) The provisions of this act apply to expanded function dental
auxiliaries effective December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The secretary of health and the Washington
state dental quality assurance commission may take the necessary steps
to ensure that this act is implemented on its effective date.

--- END ---