BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall establish requirements for each
applicant for an initial license to obtain a state background check
through the state patrol prior to the issuance of any license. The
background check may be fingerprint-based at the discretion of the
department.
(b) The department shall specify those situations where a
background check under (a) of this subsection is inadequate and an
applicant for an initial license must obtain an electronic fingerprint-based national background check through the state patrol and federal
bureau of investigation. Situations where a background check is
inadequate may include instances where an applicant has recently lived
out-of-state or where the applicant has a criminal record in
Washington.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to require license holders to
report to the disciplining authority and to the individual's employer
any arrests, convictions, or other determinations or findings by a law
enforcement agency occurring after the effective date of this section
for a criminal offense that constitutes unprofessional conduct under
this chapter or the chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040(2). The
report must be made within fourteen days of the conviction.
(3) The department shall conduct an annual review of a
representative sample of all license holders who have previously
obtained a background check through the department. The selection of
the license holders to be reviewed shall be representative of all
categories of license holders and geographic locations.
(4)(a) When deciding whether or not to issue an initial license,
the disciplining authority shall consider the results of any background
check conducted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section that reveals
a conviction for any criminal offense that constitutes unprofessional
conduct under this chapter or the chapters specified in RCW
18.130.040(2) or a series of arrests that when considered together
demonstrate a pattern of behavior that, without investigation, may pose
a risk to the safety of the license holder's patients.
(b) If the background check conducted pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section reveals any information related to unprofessional conduct
that has not been previously disclosed to the disciplining authority,
it shall take appropriate disciplinary action against the license
holder.
(5) The department shall:
(a) Require the applicant or license holder to submit full sets of
fingerprints if necessary to complete the background check;
(b) Require the applicant to submit any fees for background check
activities conducted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, except
as precluded by RCW 43.70.110, and other information required by the
state patrol;
(c) Notify the applicant of the results of the background check;
and
(d) Restrict use of the background check results to determining the
individual's suitability for a license and to conducting disciplinary
functions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in RCW 18.130.310 or sections 1 and 4 of this act limits
the authority of the disciplining authority to investigate the
suitability of an individual for holding a license.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.130.310 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 313 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to RCW 40.07.040, the disciplinary authority shall submit
a biennial report to the legislature on its proceedings during the
biennium, detailing the number of complaints made, investigated, and
adjudicated and manner of disposition. In addition, the report shall
provide data on the department's background check activities conducted
under sections 1 and 2 of this act and the effectiveness of those
activities in identifying potential license holders who may not be
qualified to practice safely. The report may include recommendations
for improving the disciplinary process, including proposed legislation.
The department shall develop a uniform report format.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
To implement section 1 of this act, the department may increase
application and renewal fees by amounts that exceed the fiscal growth
factor under RCW 43.135.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 1 of this act takes effect January
1, 2008.

--- END ---