BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary, with the advice and consultation of the other
disciplining authorities, shall adopt a schedule that defines
appropriate ranges of sanctions that are applicable to a finding after
a hearing that a license holder has committed unprofessional conduct as
defined in this chapter or the chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040(2).
The schedule must identify aggravating and mitigating circumstances
that may enhance or reduce the sanction imposed by the disciplining
authority for each act of unprofessional conduct. The schedule must
apply to all disciplining authorities. In addition, the secretary
shall make provisions for instances in which there are multiple
findings of unprofessional conduct. When establishing the schedule,
the secretary shall consider maintaining consistent sanction
determinations that balance the protection of the public's health and
the rights of health care providers of the different health
professions.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.050 and 2006 c 99 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The disciplining authority has the following authority:
(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind such rules as are deemed necessary
to carry out this chapter;
(2) To investigate all complaints or reports of unprofessional
conduct as defined in this chapter and to hold hearings as provided in
this chapter;
(3) To issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any
investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;
(4) To take or cause depositions to be taken and use other
discovery procedures as needed in any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;
(5) To compel attendance of witnesses at hearings;
(6) In the course of investigating a complaint or report of
unprofessional conduct, to conduct practice reviews;
(7) To take emergency action ordering summary suspension of a
license, or restriction or limitation of the license holder's practice
pending proceedings by the disciplining authority. Consistent with RCW
18.130.370, a disciplining authority shall issue a summary suspension
of the license or temporary practice permit of a license holder
prohibited from practicing a health care profession in another state,
federal, or foreign jurisdiction because of an act of unprofessional
conduct that is substantially equivalent to an act of unprofessional
conduct prohibited by this chapter or any of the chapters specified in
RCW 18.130.040. The summary suspension remains in effect until
proceedings by the Washington disciplining authority have been
completed;
(8) To use a presiding officer as authorized in RCW 18.130.095(3)
or the office of administrative hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12
RCW to conduct hearings. The disciplining authority shall make the
final decision regarding disposition of the license unless the
disciplining authority elects to delegate in writing the final decision
to the presiding officer;
(9) To use individual members of the boards to direct
investigations. However, the member of the board shall not
subsequently participate in the hearing of the case;
(10) To enter into contracts for professional services determined
to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;
(11) To contract with licensees or other persons or organizations
to provide services necessary for the monitoring and supervision of
licensees who are placed on probation, whose professional activities
are restricted, or who are for any authorized purpose subject to
monitoring by the disciplining authority;
(12) To adopt standards of professional conduct or practice;
(13) To grant or deny license applications, and in the event of a
finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder, to
impose ((any sanction)) sanctions in accordance with section 1 of this
act against a license applicant or license holder provided by this
chapter;
(14) To designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and
statements of charges;
(15) To establish panels consisting of three or more members of the
board to perform any duty or authority within the board's jurisdiction
under this chapter;
(16) To review and audit the records of licensed health facilities'
or services' quality assurance committee decisions in which a
licensee's practice privilege or employment is terminated or
restricted. Each health facility or service shall produce and make
accessible to the disciplining authority the appropriate records and
otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall
not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil
action pursuant to RCW 70.41.200(3).

Sec. 3 RCW 18.130.160 and 2006 c 99 s 6 and 2006 c 8 s 104 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Upon a finding, after hearing, that a license holder or applicant
has committed unprofessional conduct or is unable to practice with
reasonable skill and safety due to a physical or mental condition, the
disciplining authority ((may consider the imposition of sanctions,
taking into account)) shall issue an order including sanctions adopted
in accordance with the schedule adopted by the secretary in section 1
of this act giving proper consideration to any prior findings of fact
under RCW 18.130.110, any stipulations to informal disposition under
RCW 18.130.172, and any action taken by other in-state or out-of-state
disciplining authorities((, and issue an)). The order ((providing))
must provide for one or any combination of the following, as directed
by the schedule:
(1) Revocation of the license;
(2) Suspension of the license for a fixed or indefinite term;
(3) Restriction or limitation of the practice;
(4) Requiring the satisfactory completion of a specific program of
remedial education or treatment;
(5) The monitoring of the practice by a supervisor approved by the
disciplining authority;
(6) Censure or reprimand;
(7) Compliance with conditions of probation for a designated period
of time;
(8) Payment of a fine for each violation of this chapter, not to
exceed five thousand dollars per violation. Funds received shall be
placed in the health professions account;
(9) Denial of the license request;
(10) Corrective action;
(11) Refund of fees billed to and collected from the consumer;
(12) A surrender of the practitioner's license in lieu of other
sanctions, which must be reported to the federal data bank.
Any of the actions under this section may be totally or partly
stayed by the disciplining authority. Safeguarding the public's health
and safety is the paramount responsibility of every disciplining
authority ((and)). In determining what action is appropriate, the
disciplining authority must consider the schedule adopted by the
secretary in section 1 of this act. Where the schedule allows
flexibility in determining the appropriate sanction, the disciplining
authority must first consider what sanctions are necessary to protect
or compensate the public. Only after such provisions have been made
may the disciplining authority consider and include in the order
requirements designed to rehabilitate the license holder or applicant.
All costs associated with compliance with orders issued under this
section are the obligation of the license holder or applicant.
The ((licensee)) license holder or applicant may enter into a
stipulated disposition of charges that includes one or more of the
sanctions of this section, but only after a statement of charges has
been issued and the ((licensee)) license holder has been afforded the
opportunity for a hearing and has elected on the record to forego such
a hearing. The stipulation shall either contain one or more specific
findings of unprofessional conduct or inability to practice, or a
statement by the ((licensee)) license holder acknowledging that
evidence is sufficient to justify one or more specified findings of
unprofessional conduct or inability to practice. The stipulation
entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be considered formal
disciplinary action for all purposes.

--- END ---