BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.130.160 and 2006 c 99 s 6 and 2006 c 8 s 104 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Upon a finding, after hearing, that a license holder or applicant
has committed unprofessional conduct or is unable to practice with
reasonable skill and safety due to a physical or mental condition, the
disciplining authority may consider the imposition of sanctions, taking
into account any prior findings of fact under RCW 18.130.110, any
stipulations to informal disposition under RCW 18.130.172, and any
action taken by other in-state or out-of-state disciplining
authorities, and issue an order providing for one or any combination of
the following:
(1) Revocation of the license;
(2) Suspension of the license for a fixed or indefinite term;
(3) Restriction or limitation of the practice;
(4) Requiring the satisfactory completion of a specific program of
remedial education or treatment;
(5) The monitoring of the practice by a supervisor approved by the
disciplining authority;
(6) Censure or reprimand;
(7) Compliance with conditions of probation for a designated period
of time;
(8) Payment of a fine for each violation of this chapter, not to
exceed five thousand dollars per violation. Funds received shall be
placed in the health professions account;
(9) Denial of the license request;
(10) Corrective action;
(11) Refund of fees billed to and collected from the consumer;
(12) A surrender of the practitioner's license in lieu of other
sanctions, which must be reported to the federal data bank.
Except as provided in section 3 of this act, any of the actions
under this section may be totally or partly stayed by the disciplining
authority. Safeguarding the public's health and safety is the
paramount responsibility of every disciplining authority and in
determining what action is appropriate, the disciplining authority must
first consider what sanctions are necessary to protect or compensate
the public. Only after such provisions have been made may the
disciplining authority consider and include in the order requirements
designed to rehabilitate the license holder or applicant. All costs
associated with compliance with orders issued under this section are
the obligation of the license holder or applicant.
The ((licensee)) license holder or applicant may enter into a
stipulated disposition of charges that includes one or more of the
sanctions of this section, but only after a statement of charges has
been issued and the ((licensee)) license holder has been afforded the
opportunity for a hearing and has elected on the record to forego such
a hearing. The stipulation shall either contain one or more specific
findings of unprofessional conduct or inability to practice, or a
statement by the ((licensee)) license holder acknowledging that
evidence is sufficient to justify one or more specified findings of
unprofessional conduct or inability to practice. The stipulation
entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be considered formal
disciplinary action for all purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.172 and 2000 c 171 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for those acts of unprofessional conduct specified in
section 3 of this act, prior to serving a statement of charges under
RCW 18.130.090 or 18.130.170, the disciplinary authority may furnish a
statement of allegations to the licensee or applicant along with a
detailed summary of the evidence relied upon to establish the
allegations and a proposed stipulation for informal resolution of the
allegations. These documents shall be exempt from public disclosure
until such time as the allegations are resolved either by stipulation
or otherwise.
(2) The disciplinary authority and the applicant or licensee may
stipulate that the allegations may be disposed of informally in
accordance with this subsection. The stipulation shall contain a
statement of the facts leading to the filing of the complaint; the act
or acts of unprofessional conduct alleged to have been committed or the
alleged basis for determining that the applicant or licensee is unable
to practice with reasonable skill and safety; a statement that the
stipulation is not to be construed as a finding of either
unprofessional conduct or inability to practice; an acknowledgement
that a finding of unprofessional conduct or inability to practice, if
proven, constitutes grounds for discipline under this chapter; and an
agreement on the part of the licensee or applicant that the sanctions
set forth in RCW 18.130.160, except RCW 18.130.160 (1), (2), (6), and
(8), may be imposed as part of the stipulation, except that no fine may
be imposed but the licensee or applicant may agree to reimburse the
disciplinary authority the costs of investigation and processing the
complaint up to an amount not exceeding one thousand dollars per
allegation; and an agreement on the part of the disciplinary authority
to forego further disciplinary proceedings concerning the allegations.
A stipulation entered into pursuant to this subsection shall not be
considered formal disciplinary action.
(3) If the licensee or applicant declines to agree to disposition
of the charges by means of a stipulation pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, the disciplinary authority may proceed to formal
disciplinary action pursuant to RCW 18.130.090 or 18.130.170.
(4) Upon execution of a stipulation under subsection (2) of this
section by both the licensee or applicant and the disciplinary
authority, the complaint is deemed disposed of and shall become subject
to public disclosure on the same basis and to the same extent as other
records of the disciplinary authority. Should the licensee or
applicant fail to pay any agreed reimbursement within thirty days of
the date specified in the stipulation for payment, the disciplinary
authority may seek collection of the amount agreed to be paid in the
same manner as enforcement of a fine under RCW 18.130.165.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The disciplining authority shall revoke the license of a
license holder who is found, in three unrelated orders under RCW
18.130.110 in a ten-year period, to have engaged in three separate
courses of unprofessional conduct based upon any combination of the
following:
(a) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(4) that causes or substantially
contributes to the death of or severe injury to a patient or creates a
significant risk of harm to the public;
(b) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(6) that creates a significant
risk of harm to the public;
(c) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(7) that causes or substantially
contributes to the death of or severe injury to a patient or creates a
significant risk of harm to the public;
(d) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(9);
(e) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(17), except gross misdemeanors;
(f) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(23) that causes or
substantially contributes to the death of or severe injury to a patient
or creates a significant risk of harm to the public;
(g) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(24) based upon an act of abuse
to a client or patient; and
(h) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(24) based upon sexual contact
with a client or patient.
(2) For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, a ten-year
period commences upon the completion of all conditions and obligations
imposed for the acts identified in subsection (1)(a) through (h) of
this section.
(3) An order that includes a finding of mitigating circumstances
for an act of unprofessional conduct may be issued and, except for (a)
of this subsection, applied one time for any license holder or
applicant for a license and, if so, that order does not count as one of
the three orders that triggers a license revocation for purposes of
this section. A finding of mitigating circumstances under (a) of this
subsection may be issued and applied as many times as the license
holder meets the criteria for such a finding and does not count as one
of the three orders that triggers the revocation of a license for the
purposes of this section. Except for (a) of this subsection, after a
finding of mitigating circumstances is issued and applied, no
subsequent orders under this section may consider any mitigating
circumstances. The following mitigating circumstances may be
considered:
(a) For subsection (1)(a) of this section, the act involved a high-risk procedure, there was no lower-risk alternative to that procedure,
the patient was informed of the risks of the procedure and consented to
the procedure anyway, and prior to the institution of disciplinary
actions the license holder took appropriate remedial measures;
(b) There is a strong potential for rehabilitation of the license
holder; or
(c) There is a strong potential for remedial education and training
to prevent future harm to the public.
(4) Nothing in this section limits the ability of the disciplining
authority to impose any sanction, including revocation, for a single
violation of any subsection of RCW 18.130.180.
(5) Notwithstanding RCW 9.96A.020(1), revocation of a license under
this section is not subject to a petition for reinstatement under RCW
18.130.150.

--- END ---