BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
An insurer licensed to write liability insurance, such as
homeowner's insurance, in this state may not deny an application for a
homeowner's insurance policy, or cancel, refuse to renew, or modify an
existing homeowner's insurance policy, on the basis that the applicant
or insured owns or harbors a specific breed of dog on the real
property, unless the dog is a dangerous dog as defined in RCW
16.08.070.

--- END ---