BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that each year health
care-associated infections affect two million Americans. These
infections result in the unnecessary death of ninety thousand patients
and costs the health care system 4.5 billion dollars. Hospitals should
be implementing evidence-based measures to reduce hospital-acquired
infections. The legislature further finds the public should have
access to data on outcome measures regarding hospital-acquired
infections. Data reporting should be consistent with national hospital
reporting standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Health care-associated infection" means a localized or
systemic condition that results from adverse reaction to the presence
of an infectious agent or its toxins and that was not present or
incubating at the time of admission to the hospital.
(b) "Hospital" means a health care facility licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, including an ambulatory surgical facility maintained and
operated by a health care facility licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.
An ambulatory surgical facility not maintained and operated by a health
care facility licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW shall be considered a
hospital for purposes of this definition on the effective date of a
requirement for state registration or licensure of ambulatory surgical
facilities.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection:
(i) A hospital shall collect data related to health care-associated
infections according to the definitions and methods of the centers for
disease control and prevention's national healthcare safety network on
the following:
(A) Beginning July 1, 2008, central line-associated bloodstream
infection in the intensive care unit;
(B) Beginning January 1, 2009: (I) Ventilator-associated
pneumonia; and (II) antimicrobial use and resistance, as determined by
the department under subsection (3) of this section;
(C) Beginning January 1, 2010, surgical site infection for selected
procedures, as determined by the department under subsection (3) of
this section;
(D) Beginning January 1, 2011, other health care-associated
infection events or procedures as determined by the department under
subsection (3) of this section.
(ii)(A) A hospital must routinely submit the data collected under
(a)(i) of this subsection to the national healthcare safety network of
the United States centers for disease control and prevention in
accordance with national healthcare safety network requirements and
procedures. Data collection and submission must be overseen by a
trained infection control professional.
(B) With respect to the data required to be reported under this
subsection, a hospital must release to the department, or grant the
department access to, its hospital-specific information contained in
the national healthcare safety network report on that hospital.
(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, the
department may by rule, upon recommendation of the advisory committee
established under subsection (5) of this section, require hospitals to
collect and submit the data collected on health care-associated
infections to the centers for medicare and medicaid services according
to the definitions, methods, requirements, and procedures of the
hospital compare program, rather than the national healthcare safety
network, if:
(A) The health care-associated events and procedures are
substantially the same events and procedures required to be reported
under (a)(i)(A) through (D) of this subsection;
(B) The hospital-specific information required to be reported to
the hospital compare program under this subsection (2)(b) is available
to the department; and
(C) The department determines that reporting under this subsection
(2)(b) will facilitate reporting and will provide substantially the
same information to the hospitals and the public as reporting under the
national healthcare safety network will provide.
(ii) Unless the department determines that reporting is available
to them under the hospital compare program, ambulatory surgical
facilities not maintained and operated by a health care facility
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must report to the national healthcare
safety network as required under (a) of this subsection.
(c) The hospital reports obtained by the department under this
section, and any of the information contained in them, are not subject
to discovery by subpoena or admissible as evidence in a civil
proceeding, and are not subject to public disclosure as provided in RCW
42.56.360.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Provide oversight of the health care-associated infection
reporting program established in this section;
(b) Adopt by rule additional categories of health care-associated
infection events or procedures for which data must be collected,
subject to the following:
(i) Categories to be added are those reported under the national
healthcare safety network or, if reporting under subsection (2)(b) of
this section, reported under the hospital compare program of the
centers for medicare and medicaid services; and
(ii) The department determines that reporting the additional
categories is necessary to protect public health and safety;
(c) Delete, by rule, the reporting of categories that the
department determines are no longer necessary to protect public health
and safety;
(d) By December 1, 2009, and by each December 1st thereafter,
prepare and publish a report on the department's web site that compares
the health care-associated infection rates at individual hospitals in
the state using the data reported in the previous calendar year
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The department may update
the reports quarterly. In developing a methodology for the report and
determining its contents, the department shall consider the
recommendations of the advisory committee established in subsection (5)
of this section. The report is subject to the following:
(i) The report must disclose data in a format that does not release
health information about any individual patient; and
(ii) The report must not include data if the department determines
that a data set is too small or possesses other characteristics that
make it otherwise unrepresentative of a hospital's particular ability
to achieve a specific outcome; and
(e) Evaluate, on a regular basis, the quality and accuracy of
health care-associated infection reporting required under this section
and the data collection, analysis, and reporting methodologies.
(4) The department may respond to requests for data and other
information from the data required to be reported under subsection (2)
of this section, at the requestor's expense, for special studies and
analysis consistent with requirements for confidentiality of patient
records.
(5)(a) The department shall establish an advisory committee which
may include members representing infection control professionals and
epidemiologists, licensed health care providers, nursing staff,
organizations that represent health care providers and facilities,
health maintenance organizations, health care payers and consumers, and
the department. The advisory committee shall make recommendations to
assist the department in carrying out its responsibilities under this
section, including making recommendations on allowing a hospital to
review and verify data to be released in the report and on excluding
from the report selected data from certified critical access hospitals.
(b) In developing its recommendations, the advisory committee shall
consider methodologies and practices related to health care-associated
infections of the United States centers for disease control and
prevention, the centers for medicare and medicaid services, the joint
commission, the national quality forum, and the institute for
healthcare improvement.
(6) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to carry out its
responsibilities under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.41.200 and 2005 c 291 s 3 and 2005 c 33 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every hospital shall maintain a coordinated quality improvement
program for the improvement of the quality of health care services
rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical
malpractice. The program shall include at least the following:
(a) The establishment of a quality improvement committee with the
responsibility to review the services rendered in the hospital, both
retrospectively and prospectively, in order to improve the quality of
medical care of patients and to prevent medical malpractice. The
committee shall oversee and coordinate the quality improvement and
medical malpractice prevention program and shall ensure that
information gathered pursuant to the program is used to review and to
revise hospital policies and procedures;
(b) A medical staff privileges sanction procedure through which
credentials, physical and mental capacity, and competence in delivering
health care services are periodically reviewed as part of an evaluation
of staff privileges;
(c) The periodic review of the credentials, physical and mental
capacity, and competence in delivering health care services of all
persons who are employed or associated with the hospital;
(d) A procedure for the prompt resolution of grievances by patients
or their representatives related to accidents, injuries, treatment, and
other events that may result in claims of medical malpractice;
(e) The maintenance and continuous collection of information
concerning the hospital's experience with negative health care outcomes
and incidents injurious to patients including health care-associated
infections as defined in section 2(1)(a) of this act, patient
grievances, professional liability premiums, settlements, awards, costs
incurred by the hospital for patient injury prevention, and safety
improvement activities;
(f) The maintenance of relevant and appropriate information
gathered pursuant to (a) through (e) of this subsection concerning
individual physicians within the physician's personnel or credential
file maintained by the hospital;
(g) Education programs dealing with quality improvement, patient
safety, medication errors, injury prevention, infection control, staff
responsibility to report professional misconduct, the legal aspects of
patient care, improved communication with patients, and causes of
malpractice claims for staff personnel engaged in patient care
activities; and
(h) Policies to ensure compliance with the reporting requirements
of this section.
(2) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such
activity. Any person or entity participating in a coordinated quality
improvement program that, in substantial good faith, shares information
or documents with one or more other programs, committees, or boards
under subsection (8) of this section is not subject to an action for
civil damages or other relief as a result of the activity. For the
purposes of this section, sharing information is presumed to be in
substantial good faith. However, the presumption may be rebutted upon
a showing of clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the
information shared was knowingly false or deliberately misleading.
(3) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a
quality improvement committee are not subject to review or disclosure,
except as provided in this section, or discovery or introduction into
evidence in any civil action, and no person who was in attendance at a
meeting of such committee or who participated in the creation,
collection, or maintenance of information or documents specifically for
the committee shall be permitted or required to testify in any civil
action as to the content of such proceedings or the documents and
information prepared specifically for the committee. This subsection
does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the discovery of the
identity of persons involved in the medical care that is the basis of
the civil action whose involvement was independent of any quality
improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the testimony of any
person concerning the facts which form the basis for the institution of
such proceedings of which the person had personal knowledge acquired
independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil action by a health
care provider regarding the restriction or revocation of that
individual's clinical or staff privileges, introduction into evidence
information collected and maintained by quality improvement committees
regarding such health care provider; (d) in any civil action,
disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or
restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any and the
reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil action, discovery and
introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by
regulation of the department of health to be made regarding the care
and treatment received.
(4) Each quality improvement committee shall, on at least a
semiannual basis, report to the governing board of the hospital in
which the committee is located. The report shall review the quality
improvement activities conducted by the committee, and any actions
taken as a result of those activities.
(5) The department of health shall adopt such rules as are deemed
appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this section.
(6) The medical quality assurance commission or the board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery, as appropriate, may review and audit
the records of committee decisions in which a physician's privileges
are terminated or restricted. Each hospital shall produce and make
accessible to the commission or board the appropriate records and
otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall
not be subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be
respected as required by subsection (3) of this section. Failure of a
hospital to comply with this subsection is punishable by a civil
penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.
(7) The department, the joint commission on accreditation of health
care organizations, and any other accrediting organization may review
and audit the records of a quality improvement committee or peer review
committee in connection with their inspection and review of hospitals.
Information so obtained shall not be subject to the discovery process,
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section. Each hospital shall produce and make accessible to the
department the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review
and audit.
(8) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a quality
improvement committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250
with one or more other coordinated quality improvement programs
maintained in accordance with this section or RCW 43.70.510, a quality
assurance committee maintained in accordance with RCW 18.20.390 or
74.42.640, or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250, for the
improvement of the quality of health care services rendered to patients
and the identification and prevention of medical malpractice. The
privacy protections of chapter 70.02 RCW and the federal health
insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 and its
implementing regulations apply to the sharing of individually
identifiable patient information held by a coordinated quality
improvement program. Any rules necessary to implement this section
shall meet the requirements of applicable federal and state privacy
laws. Information and documents disclosed by one coordinated quality
improvement program to another coordinated quality improvement program
or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 and any information and
documents created or maintained as a result of the sharing of
information and documents shall not be subject to the discovery process
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section, RCW 18.20.390 (6) and (8), 74.42.640 (7) and (9), and
4.24.250.
(9) A hospital that operates a nursing home as defined in RCW
18.51.010 may conduct quality improvement activities for both the
hospital and the nursing home through a quality improvement committee
under this section, and such activities shall be subject to the
provisions of subsections (2) through (8) of this section.
(10) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence
per se.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.56.360 and 2006 c 209 s 9 and 2006 c 8 s 112 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The following health care information is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter:
(a) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090;
(b) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420;
(c) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee under RCW
43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250, or by a quality assurance committee pursuant to RCW 74.42.640
or 18.20.390, or by a hospital, as defined in section 2 of this act,
for reporting of health care-associated infections under section 2 of
this act, and notifications or reports of adverse events or incidents
made under RCW 70.56.020 or 70.56.040, regardless of which agency is in
possession of the information and documents;
(d)(i) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310;
(ii) If a request for such information is received, the submitting
entity must be notified of the request. Within ten business days of
receipt of the notice, the submitting entity shall provide a written
statement of the continuing need for confidentiality, which shall be
provided to the requester. Upon receipt of such notice, the department
of health shall continue to treat information designated under this
subsection (1)(d) as exempt from disclosure;
(iii) If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality;
(e) Records of the entity obtained in an action under RCW 18.71.300
through 18.71.340;
(f) Except for published statistical compilations and reports
relating to the infant mortality review studies that do not identify
individual cases and sources of information, any records or documents
obtained, prepared, or maintained by the local health department for
the purposes of an infant mortality review conducted by the department
of health under RCW 70.05.170; and
(g) Complaints filed under chapter 18.130 RCW after July 27, 1997,
to the extent provided in RCW 18.130.095(1).
(2) Chapter 70.02 RCW applies to public inspection and copying of
health care information of patients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The hospital infection control grant account is created in the
custody of the state treasury. All receipts from gifts, grants,
bequests, devises, or other funds from public or private sources to
support its activities must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for awarding hospital
infection control grants to hospitals and public agencies for
establishing and maintaining hospital infection control and
surveillance programs, for providing support for such programs, and for
the administrative costs associated with the grant program. Only the
secretary or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---