BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington is a
leading technology state. The legislature recognizes that during the
past three decades Washington has experienced rapid growth in
technology-based industries, compared to overall economic activity, and
that the concentration of technology-based industries in the state is
significantly higher than the national average. Technology-based
industries in Washington account for one of the largest shares of
employment, labor income, and business activity of any major sector in
the Washington state economy.
However, despite Washington's leading position in the technology
field, the legislature has concerns that other states and other
countries are outpacing Washington state in enrolling and graduating
qualified engineers and others in technology fields. While Washington
is ranked as having one of the most highly educated populations in the
country, it is ranked in the bottom quartile in the country in terms of
production of bachelor's degrees. Additionally, of public bachelor's
degrees awarded in 2005, only five percent were in engineering and
related technologies and only two percent were in computer and
information science.
In order for Washington to continue to be a leading technology
state, and to compete in a global, technology-driven economy,
Washington needs a more robust higher education system that places a
priority on enrolling and conferring undergraduate and graduate degrees
upon students in science and technology, particularly in the fields of
engineering, technology, biotechnology, science, computer science, and
mathematics. The legislature recognizes that it must increase access,
enrollment slots, and degree opportunities in those fields of study as
they are integrally linked to ensuring that Washington state's economy
can compete nationally and globally.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to create a center
of excellence in this state, dedicated to technology, to be known as
the Washington institute of technology. This institute of technology
shall combine three world-class, university branch campuses:
University of Washington - Bothell; Washington State University -TriCities; and Washington State University - Vancouver, and shall offer
areas of study including, but not limited to, engineering, technology,
biotechnology, science, computer science, and mathematics. The
institute shall have a single board of regents and will be centrally
administered. The board of regents will include representation from
various technology-related organizations across the state.
The mission of the Washington institute of technology is to deliver
world-class education in technology, science, and related fields, to
prepare students to become leaders in the technology-dependent economy
of the twenty-first century. Through rigorous academic study at the
undergraduate and graduate level, and the excitement of discovery
through research, the institute will play a critical role in shaping
Washington's future. As a major public technological institute, it
will create, share, and apply knowledge to promote student growth,
advance community development, increase economic competitiveness, and
improve the quality of life.

--- END ---