BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds the practice of using
"living trusts" as a marketing tool by persons who are not authorized
to practice law, who are not acting directly under the supervision of
a person authorized to practice law, or who are not a financial
institution to be a deceptive means of obtaining personal asset
information and of developing and generating leads for sales to senior
citizens. The legislature further finds that this practice endangers
the financial security of consumers and may frustrate their estate
planning objectives. Therefore, the legislature intends to prohibit
the marketing of services related to preparation of estate distribution
documents by persons who are not authorized to practice law or who are
not a financial institution.
This chapter is not intended to limit consumers from receiving
legitimate estate planning services, including "living trusts," from
those authorized to practice law; but is intended to prohibit persons
not licensed to engage in the practice of law from the unscrupulous
practice of marketing legal services as a means of targeting senior
citizens for financial exploitation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Market" or "marketing" includes every offer, contract, or
agreement to prepare or gather information for the preparation of, or
to provide, individualized advice about an estate distribution
document.
(2) "Estate distribution document" means any one or more of the
following documents, instruments, or writings prepared, or intended to
be prepared, for a specific person or as marketing materials for
distribution to any person, other than documents, instruments,
writings, or marketing materials relating to a payable on death account
established under RCW 30.22.040(9):
(a) Last will and testament or any writing, however designated,
that is intended to have the same legal effect as a last will and
testament, and any codicil thereto;
(b) Revocable and irrevocable inter vivos trusts and any instrument
which purports to transfer any of the trustor's current and/or future
interest in real or personal property thereto;
(c) Agreement that fixes the terms and provisions of the sale of a
decedent's interest in any real or personal property at or following
the date of the decedent's death.
(3) "Financial institution" means a bank holding company registered
under federal law, or a bank, trust company, mutual savings bank,
savings bank, savings and loan association or credit union organized
under state or federal law, or any affiliate, subsidiary, officer or
employee of a financial institution.
(4) "Person" means any natural person, corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, firm, or association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, it is unlawful for a person to market estate distribution
documents, directly or indirectly, in or from this state unless the
person is authorized to practice law in this state.
(2) A person employed by someone authorized to practice law in this
state may gather information for, or assist in the preparation of,
estate distribution documents as long as that person does not provide
any legal advice.
(3) This chapter applies to any person who markets estate
distribution documents in or from this state. Marketing occurs in this
state, whether or not either party is then present in this state, if
the offer originates in this state or is directed into this state or is
received or accepted in this state.
(4) This chapter does not apply to any financial institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for purposes of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---