BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The Washington state housing finance
commission shall create a strategic plan to increase the state
homeownership rate to seventy-five percent by the year 2020. The
commission shall ensure that the plan addresses increasing
homeownership on a fair basis for all geographic areas of the state.
The commission shall involve representatives from the affordable
housing advisory board, the department of community, trade, and
economic development, and other housing stakeholders, including
nonprofit and for-profit housing developers and local governments. The
commission shall present the state homeownership plan to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2007.
(2) This section expires December 31, 2007.

--- END ---