BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 36.22.179, 43.20A.790, 43.63A.650,
43.185C.180, 43.330.167, 59.24.010, 59.24.020, 59.24.030, 59.24.040,
59.24.050, 59.24.060, 59.24.900, and 74.50.060 are each recodified as
sections in chapter 43.185C RCW.

--- END ---