BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state
annually awards contracts to private contractors and vendors, and that
such expenditures should be spent in a manner that promotes the
creation of jobs that allow residents to support themselves and their
families with dignity. The legislature further finds that the present
federal and state minimum wages generate income at a level below the
amount required to support a family at a basic level and that jobs that
do not pay living wages result in families who have greater need of
social services provided by the state and paid for by state taxpayers.
The payment of adequate wages to workers employed by private
contractors and vendors that contract with the state will promote
stability and reduced turnover, resulting in a higher quality of
service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Contract" means public works contracts, personal services
contracts, and purchasing contracts for goods and services.
(2) "Contractor" means any person, firm, or corporation that, in
the pursuit of an independent business, undertakes a contract with a
state agency.
(3) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries.
(5) "Employee" has the meaning set forth in RCW 49.46.010. In
addition to the individuals excluded under RCW 49.46.010, "employee"
does not include an individual:
(a) Seventeen years old or younger;
(b) In a position that is designated for a trainee, apprentice, or
is otherwise part of a training program; and
(c) In a work study position, internship, or who is in a position
that requires student status as a prerequisite to being employed in
that position.
(6) "Employer" means a contractor or a subcontractor that employs
an employee.
(7) "State agency" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development or the department of ecology.
(8) "Subcontractor" means any person, firm, or corporation that, in
the pursuit of an independent business, undertakes a contract with
another person, firm, or corporation who holds a contract with the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All contractors and subcontractors
covered under this chapter shall pay employees performing work under
contracts or subcontracts a living wage no less than nine dollars and
twenty-five cents per hour if health benefits are paid for in whole or
in substantial part by the employer, or eleven dollars per hour if
health benefits are not so provided.
(2)(a) Beginning January 1, 2008, and each following January 1st as
set forth under (b) of this subsection, every contractor and
subcontractor shall pay each of his or her employees performing work
under contracts or subcontracts at a rate of not less than the amount
established under (b) of this subsection.
(b) Beginning September 30, 2007, and on each following September
30th, the department shall calculate an adjusted living wage rate as
specified under this subsection (2)(b). Each adjusted living wage rate
shall be calculated to the nearest cent, and shall take effect on the
following January 1st.
(i) If the per capita personal income for the prior calendar year
for Washington is equal to or greater than the per capita personal
income for the prior calendar year for the United States, the adjusted
living wage rate shall be calculated using the sum of:
(A) The percentage increase in the consumer price index for urban
wage earners and clerical workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the
twelve months prior to each September 1st as calculated by the United
States department of labor; and
(B) The average annual percentage increase in per capita personal
income for the prior two calendar years as calculated by the United
States department of commerce bureau of economic analysis.
(ii) If the per capita personal income for the prior calendar year
for Washington is less than the per capita personal income for the
prior calendar year for the United States, the adjusted living wage
rate shall be calculated to the nearest cent using the percentage
increase in the consumer price index for urban wage earners and
clerical workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months
prior to each September 1st as calculated by the United States
department of labor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) In circumstances where a contract also
requires the contractor or subcontractor to pay its employees
prevailing wages, the contractor or subcontractor shall pay its
employees at the contractually prescribed prevailing wage rate or the
minimum living wage payable under this chapter, whichever is higher.
(2) The contractor or subcontractor also shall pay its employees at
the minimum wage rate under chapter 49.46 RCW or the minimum living
wage payable under this chapter, whichever is higher.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 No contractor or subcontractor shall
retaliate or discriminate against an employee in his or her terms and
conditions of employment for:
(1) Reporting a possible violation of this chapter to the director;
(2) Participating in any legal or administrative proceeding in
respect to this chapter;
(3) Seeking civil remedies to enforce his or her rights conferred
by this chapter; or
(4) Otherwise asserting his or her rights under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If a contractor or subcontractor violates
section 3 of this act, the state agency may withhold payment, or
suspend or terminate the contract. If the contractor or subcontractor
willfully violates section 3 of this act, as evidenced by final orders
issued by the department under chapter 49.48 RCW, more than once in a
two-year period, the state agency may disqualify the contractor or
subcontractor from further contracts for a period of up to two years.

Sec. 7 RCW 49.48.082 and 2006 c 89 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
RCW 49.48.083 through 49.48.086:
(1) "Citation" means a written determination by the department that
a wage payment requirement has been violated.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Determination of compliance" means a written determination by
the department that wage payment requirements have not been violated.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries, or the director's authorized representative.
(5) "Employee" has the meaning provided in: (a) RCW 49.46.010 for
purposes of a wage payment requirement set forth in RCW 49.46.020 or
49.46.130; ((and)) (b) RCW 49.12.005 for purposes of a wage payment
requirement set forth in RCW 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or 49.52.060; and
(c) section 2 of this act for purposes of a wage payment requirement
set forth in chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 6 and 8 through 10
of this act).
(6) "Employer" has the meaning provided in: (a) RCW 49.46.010 for
purposes of a wage payment requirement set forth in RCW 49.46.020,
49.46.130, 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or 49.52.060; and (b) section 2 of
this act for purposes of a wage payment requirement set forth in
chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 6 and 8 through 10 of this act).
(7) "Notice of assessment" means a written notice by the department
that, based on a citation, the employer shall pay the amounts assessed
under RCW 49.48.083.
(8) "Wage" has the meaning provided in RCW 49.46.010.
(9) "Wage complaint" means a complaint from an employee to the
department that asserts that an employer has violated one or more wage
payment requirements and that is reduced to writing.
(10) "Wage payment requirement" means a wage payment requirement
set forth in RCW 49.46.020, 49.46.130, 49.48.010, 49.52.050, ((or))
49.52.060, or section 3 of this act, and any related rules adopted by
the department.
(11) "Willful" means a knowing and intentional action that is
neither accidental nor the result of a bona fide dispute, as evaluated
under the standards applicable to wage payment violations under RCW
49.52.050(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Nothing contained in this chapter may be
construed to limit in any way the remedies, legal or equitable, that
are available for violations of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The living wage requirement imposed by
this chapter applies to all contracts and related subcontracts entered
into, renewed, or extended by either the department of community,
trade, and economic development or the department of ecology on or
after January 1, 2008.
(2) This act does not apply to any contracts entered into before
January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
All contracts entered into under this chapter by either the
department of community, trade, and economic development or the
department of ecology on or after January 1, 2008, are subject to the
requirements established under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 6
and 8 through 10 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 47.28 RCW
to read as follows:
All contracts entered into under this chapter by either the
department of community, trade, and economic development or the
department of ecology on or after January 1, 2008, are subject to the
requirements established under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 6
and 8 through 10 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 6 and 8 through 10 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

--- END ---