BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to assist families to
access affordable and comprehensive health care for their children with
disabilities by providing medical assistance to these children through
a buy-in program in accordance with section 1902(a)(10)(A)(iii) of the
social security act and eligibility and cost-sharing requirements
established by the department.
(2) The department shall establish cost-sharing and employer-sponsored coverage requirements for the buy-in program in accordance
with federal law and any conditions or limitations specified in the
omnibus appropriations act. The department shall make every effort to
coordinate benefits with employer-sponsored coverage available to the
families receiving benefits under this chapter.

--- END ---