BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.37.010 and 2006 c 309 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Retirement system" means the Washington public safety
employees' retirement system provided for in this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(3) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of
Washington.
(4) "Employer" means the Washington state department of
corrections, the Washington state parks and recreation commission, the
Washington state gambling commission, the Washington state patrol, the
Washington state department of natural resources, and the Washington
state liquor control board; any county corrections department; or any
city corrections department not covered under chapter 41.28 RCW((; or
other employers employing statewide elective officials)).
(5) "Member" means any employee employed by an employer on a full-time basis:
(a) Who is in a position that requires completion of a certified
criminal justice training course and is authorized by their employer to
arrest, conduct criminal investigations, enforce the criminal laws of
the state of Washington, and carry a firearm as part of the job;
(b) Whose primary responsibility is to ensure the custody and
security of incarcerated or probationary individuals as a corrections
officer, probation officer, or jailer;
(c) Who is a limited authority Washington peace officer, as defined
in RCW 10.93.020, for an employer; or
(d) Whose primary responsibility is to supervise members eligible
under this subsection.
(6)(a) "Compensation earnable" for members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services,
including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries
deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b),
414(h), and 457 of the United States internal revenue code, but shall
exclude nonmoney maintenance compensation and lump sum or other
payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation,
unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay.
(b) "Compensation earnable" for members also includes the following
actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:
(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement, which are awarded or granted
as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the individual would have
earned during a payroll period shall be considered compensation
earnable to the extent provided in this subsection, and the individual
shall receive the equivalent service credit;
(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature, the
member shall have the option of having such member's compensation
earnable be the greater of:
(A) The compensation earnable the member would have received had
such member not served in the legislature; or
(B) Such member's actual compensation earnable received for
nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any
additional contributions to the retirement system required because
compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater
than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be
paid by the member for both member and employer contributions;
(iii) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045,
and 72.09.240;
(iv) Compensation that a member would have received but for a
disability occurring in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW
41.37.070;
(v) Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the
leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through
41.04.670; and
(vi) Compensation that a member receives for being in standby
status. For the purposes of this section, a member is in standby
status when not being paid for time actually worked and the employer
requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work, if
the need arises, although the need may not arise.
(7) "Service" means periods of employment by a member on or after
July 1, 2006, for one or more employers for which compensation earnable
is paid. Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any
calendar month shall constitute one service credit month. Compensation
earnable earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours
in any calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month of
service. Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy hours in
any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month of
service. Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is
not service.
Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in
the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.
(a) Service in any state elective position shall be deemed to be
full-time service.
(b) A member shall receive a total of not more than twelve service
credit months of service for such calendar year. If an individual is
employed in an eligible position by one or more employers the
individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during
any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours
is rendered.
(8) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(9) "Service credit month" means a month or an accumulation of
months of service credit which is equal to one.
(10) "Membership service" means all service rendered as a member.
(11) "Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by another person.
(12) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(13) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the
regular interest thereon.
(14) "Average final compensation" means the member's average
compensation earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of
service credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination,
or death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be
used in the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW
41.37.290.
(15) "Final compensation" means the annual rate of compensation
earnable by a member at the time of termination of employment.
(16) "Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(17) "Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions
made by the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(18) "Retirement allowance" means monthly payments to a retiree or
beneficiary as provided in this chapter.
(19) "Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free
from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work.
The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection
consistent with common law.
(20) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when
computed upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as may be
adopted by the director.
(21) "Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a
retirement allowance as provided by this chapter.
(22) "Eligible position" means any permanent, full-time, fully
compensated position included in subsection (5) of this section.
(23) "Ineligible position" means any position which does not
conform with the requirements set forth in subsection (22) of this
section.
(24) "Leave of absence" means the period of time a member is
authorized by the employer to be absent from service without being
separated from membership.
(25) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer while a member.
(26) "Director" means the director of the department.
(27) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(28) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(29) "Plan" means the Washington public safety employees'
retirement system plan 2.
(30) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual
average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage
earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor statistics, United States department of labor.
(31) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the
determination of a postretirement adjustment.
(32) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.
(33) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index
B.
(34) "Separation from service" occurs when a person has terminated
all employment with an employer.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.40.113 and 2004 c 242 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An employee who was a member of the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 before July 1, 2006, and on July 1,
2006, is employed by an employer as defined in RCW 41.37.010(4) and is
an employee in a job class included in RCW 41.37.010(5), has the
following options during the election period:
(a) Remain a member of the public employees' retirement system; or
(b) Become a member of the public safety employees' retirement
system plan 2. All members will be dual members as provided in chapter
41.54 RCW, and public employees' retirement system service credit may
not be transferred to the public safety employees' retirement system
plan 2.
(2) The "election period" is the period between July 1, 2006, and
September 30, 2006.
(3) During the election period, employees remain members of the
public employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 until they elect
to join the public safety employees' retirement system. Members who
elect to join the public safety employees' retirement system as
described in subsection (1) of this section will have their membership
begin prospectively from the date of their election.
(4) If after September 30, 2006, the member has not made an
election to join the public safety employees' retirement system he or
she will remain in the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or
plan 3.
(5) An employee who was a member of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 on or before July 1, 2006, and on or after
July 1, 2006, is employed by an employer as defined in RCW 41.37.010(4)
as an employee in a job class included in RCW 41.37.010(5), shall
remain a member of the public employees' retirement system plan 1.
(6) All new employees hired on or after July 1, 2006, who become
employed by an employer as defined in RCW 41.37.010(4) as an employee
in a job class included in RCW 41.37.010(5) will become members of the
public safety employees' retirement system.
(7) An employee of the department of natural resources who was a
member of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3
before July 1, 2007, and on July 1, 2007, is performing the duties as
defined in RCW 41.37.010(5), has the following options during the
election period defined in subsection (8) of this section:
(a) Remain in the public employees' retirement system; or
(b) Become a member of the public safety employees' retirement
system plan 2 and be a dual member as provided in chapter 41.54 RCW,
and public employees' retirement system service credit may not be
transferred to the public safety employees' retirement system.
(8) The "election period" is the period between July 1, 2007, and
September 30, 2007.
(9) During the election period, department of natural resources
employees remain members of the public employees' retirement system
plan 2 or plan 3 until they elect to join the public safety employees'
retirement system. Members who elect to join the public safety
employees' retirement system as described in subsection (7) of this
section will have their membership begin prospectively from the date of
their election.
(10) If after September 30, 2007, an employee has not made an
election to join the public safety employees' retirement system, he or
she will remain in the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or
plan 3.

--- END ---