BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.04.610 and 2004 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If any owner of forest land within a forest protection zone
neglects or fails to provide adequate fire protection as required by
RCW 76.04.600, the department shall provide such protection and shall
annually impose the following assessments on each parcel of such land:
(((a))) (i) A flat fee assessment of ((fourteen)) seventeen dollars and
fifty cents; and (((b) twenty-five)) (ii) twenty-seven cents on each
acre exceeding fifty acres.
(b) Assessors may, at their option, collect the assessment on tax
exempt lands. If the assessor elects not to collect the assessment,
the department may bill the landowner directly.
(2) An owner who has paid assessments on two or more parcels, each
containing fewer than fifty acres and each within the same county, may
obtain the following refund:
(a) If all the parcels together contain less than fifty acres, then
the refund is equal to the flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the
total of (i) ((fourteen)) seventeen dollars and (ii) the total of the
amounts retained by the county from such assessments under subsection
(5) of this section.
(b) If all the parcels together contain fifty or more acres, then
the refund is equal to the flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the
total of (i) ((fourteen)) seventeen dollars, (ii) ((twenty-five))
twenty-seven cents for each acre exceeding fifty acres, and (iii) the
total of the amounts retained by the county from such assessments under
subsection (5) of this section.
Applications for refunds shall be submitted to the department on a
form prescribed by the department and in the same year in which the
assessments were paid. The department may not provide refunds to
applicants who do not provide verification that all assessments and
property taxes on the property have been paid. Applications may be
made by mail.
In addition to the procedures under this subsection, property
owners with multiple parcels in a single county who qualify for a
refund under this section may apply to the department on an application
listing all the parcels owned in order to have the assessment computed
on all parcels but billed to a single parcel. Property owners with the
following number of parcels may apply to the department in the year
indicated:

Year Number of Parcels
2002 10 or more parcels
2003 8 or more parcels
2004 and thereafter 6 or more parcels

The department must compute the correct assessment and allocate one
parcel in the county to use to collect the assessment. The county must
then bill the forest fire protection assessment on that one allocated
identified parcel. The landowner is responsible for notifying the
department of any changes in parcel ownership.
(3) Beginning January 1, 1991, under the administration and at the
discretion of the department up to two hundred thousand dollars per
year of this assessment shall be used in support of those rural fire
districts assisting the department in fire protection services on
forest lands.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, the department may divide the
forest lands of the state, or any part thereof, into districts, for
fire protection and assessment purposes, may classify lands according
to the character of timber prevailing, and the fire hazard existing,
and place unprotected lands under the administration of the proper
district. Amounts paid or contracted to be paid by the department for
protection of forest lands from funds at its disposal shall be a lien
upon the property protected, unless reimbursed by the owner within ten
days after October 1st of the year in which they were incurred. The
department shall be prepared to make statement thereof, upon request,
to a forest owner whose own protection has not been previously approved
as to its adequacy, the department shall report the same to the
assessor of the county in which the property is situated. The assessor
shall extend the amounts upon the tax rolls covering the property, and
upon authorization from the department shall levy the forest protection
assessment against the amounts of unimproved land as shown in each
ownership on the county assessor's records. The assessor may then
segregate on the records to provide that the improved land and
improvements thereon carry the millage levy designed to support the
rural fire protection districts as provided for in RCW 52.16.170.
(5) The amounts assessed shall be collected at the time, in the
same manner, by the same procedure, and with the same penalties
attached that general state and county taxes on the same property are
collected, except that errors in assessments may be corrected at any
time by the department certifying them to the treasurer of the county
in which the land involved is situated. Assessments shall be known and
designated as assessments of the year in which the amounts became
reimbursable. Upon the collection of assessments the county treasurer
shall place fifty cents of the total assessments paid on a parcel for
fire protection into the county current expense fund to defray the
costs of listing, billing, and collecting these assessments. The
treasurer shall then transmit the balance to the department.
Collections shall be applied against expenses incurred in carrying out
the provisions of this section, including necessary and reasonable
administrative costs incurred by the department in the enforcement of
these provisions. The department may also expend sums collected from
owners of forest lands or received from any other source for necessary
administrative costs in connection with the enforcement of RCW
76.04.660.
(6) When land against which forest protection assessments are
outstanding is acquired for delinquent taxes and sold at public
auction, the state shall have a prior lien on the proceeds of sale over
and above the amount necessary to satisfy the county's delinquent tax
judgment. The county treasurer, in case the proceeds of sale exceed
the amount of the delinquent tax judgment, shall immediately remit to
the department the amount of the outstanding forest protection
assessments.
(7) All nonfederal public bodies owning or administering forest
land included in a forest protection zone shall pay the forest
protection assessments provided in this section and the special forest
fire suppression account assessments under RCW 76.04.630. The forest
protection assessments and special forest fire suppression account
assessments shall be payable by nonfederal public bodies from available
funds within thirty days following receipt of the written notice from
the department which is given after October 1st of the year in which
the protection was provided. Unpaid assessments are not a lien against
the nonfederal publicly owned land but shall constitute a debt by the
nonfederal public body to the department and are subject to interest
charges at the legal rate.
(8) A public body, having failed to previously pay the forest
protection assessments required of it by this section, which fails to
suppress a fire on or originating from forest lands owned or
administered by it, is liable for the costs of suppression incurred by
the department or its agent and is not entitled to reimbursement of
costs incurred by the public body in the suppression activities.
(9) The department may adopt rules to implement this section,
including, but not limited to, rules on levying and collecting forest
protection assessments.

--- END ---