BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A budget is hereby adopted and, subject
to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the several
amounts specified in parts I through VIII of this act, or so much
thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated,
are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries,
wages, and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and
for other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1,
2007, and ending June 30, 2009, except as otherwise provided, out of
the several funds of the state hereinafter named.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2008" or "FY 2008" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2008.
(b) "Fiscal year 2009" or "FY 2009" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2009.
(c) "FTE" means full time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose which is not expended subject to the specified conditions and
limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,366,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,495,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,421,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,654,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,723,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $467,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,844,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,986,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,991,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,013,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions in this section, the committee
may adjust the due dates for projects included on the committee's
2007-09 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.
(2) Within the amount appropriated in this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall perform a comprehensive
study that examines the office of minority and women's business
enterprises. The study shall include: (a) An examination of the
policies, procedures, and programs that have been established by the
office of minority and women's business enterprises and other state
agencies to implement Initiative Measure No. 200 and Governor's
Directive 98-01; (b) an assessment of the role of the office of
minority and women's business enterprises and its interaction with
state agencies prior to the passage of Initiative Measure No. 200
compared to its role and interaction after the initiative became law;
(c) an analysis of the trends in certification and hiring of minority
and women-owned businesses by state and local agencies from 1997 to the
present; (d) an assessment of the impact that the office of minority
and women's business enterprises programs have had on the certification
of minority and women's business enterprises; (e) an analysis of the
potential efficiencies from allowing nongovernmental organizations to
oversee certification instead of the office of minority and women's
business enterprises; (f) an examination of the practices that other
governmental organizations use for outreach and recruitment of minority
and women-owned business enterprises; and (g) an evaluation of the
participation of agencies in the governor's supplier diversity
directive. The committee shall provide a report to the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature in December 2007.
(3) Within amounts provided in this section, the committee shall
conduct a review of the eligibility requirements and eligibility review
processes that apply to any state program that offers individual health
care coverage for qualified recipients.
(4) Within the amounts provided in this section, the committee
shall review the constitutional, case law, and statutory objectives and
obligations of the department of natural resources' management of
state-owned aquatic lands. The review will include an assessment of
the degree to which the management practices of the department and
other agencies are meeting these objectives and complying with legal
obligations.
(5) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the joint legislative audit and review
committee to conduct a review of the method used to determine lease
rates for state-owned aquatic lands. The review shall include
classification of current lease base and lease rates by category of use
such as marinas; a review of previous studies of formulas for
state-owned aquatic land leases; and identification of pros and cons of
alternative approaches to calculating aquatic lands lease rates. The
committee shall complete the review by June 2008.
(6) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1374 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(7) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the joint legislative audit
and review committee to conduct a study to determine options,
strategies, and elements necessary to assess the costs of providing
higher education including but not limited to, cost of degrees and
programs and approaches of measuring degree quality and higher
education costs used in other states. The committee shall report
findings to the legislature on October 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,771,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,932,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,744,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,373,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,935,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,936,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,963,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,680,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,050,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES. In order to achieve
operating efficiencies within the financial resources available to the
legislative branch, the executive rules committee of the house of
representatives and the facilities and operations committee of the
senate by joint action may transfer funds among the house of
representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review committee,
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
legislative transportation committee, office of the state actuary,
joint legislative systems committee, and statute law committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,590,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,651,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,241,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,196,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,192,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,388,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,980,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,223,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,203,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $101,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $101,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for House
Bill No. 1960 (judges' travel reimbursement). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,088,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,090,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,178,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,175,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,580,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,463,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,206,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,274,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $20,458,000 of the judicial information systems account
appropriation is provided solely for the development and implementation
of the core case management system. The amount provided in this
subsection may not be expended without prior approval by the judicial
information system committee and the information services board. The
department shall regularly submit project plan updates for approval to
the judicial information system committee and the information services
board for the core case management system. In approving the project
updates, the judicial information system committee shall consult with
and accept advice from the department of information services regarding
consistency with the state's architecture and infrastructure,
consistency with a statewide enterprise view of service delivery, and
the ability of the agency or state to support the system in the future.
The judicial information system committee and the information services
board shall review project progress on a regular basis and may require
quality assurance plans. The judicial information systems committee
and the information services board shall provide a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature no later than January 1,
2008, on the status of the implementation of the core case management
system and the consistency of the project with the state's
architecture, infrastructure, and statewide enterprise view of service
delivery.
(2) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the provision of interpreter
services. No portion of the funds may be spent by the administrative
office of the courts for administrative and other agency costs.
(3) $534,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1130 (creating an office of public guardianship). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,582,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,582,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,040,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,979,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,251,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,251,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,685,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amounts provided from the public
safety and education account appropriations include funding for expert
and investigative services in death penalty personal restraint
petitions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,921,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,007,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,327,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,378,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $927,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $927,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,494,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,493,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,474,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $120,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $120,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue support for the
agricultural dispute resolution system funded through the office of
civil legal aid for disputes between farmers and farm workers.
(2) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and an amount not to exceed $40,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 may be
used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise
eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters
authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2)(a) through (k) regardless of household
income or asset level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,045,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,759,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $205,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,014,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $810,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $495,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2100 (health
resources strategy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $776,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,659,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,346,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,260,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,606,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $100,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for a study on an
electronic filing system for lobbyists. The department shall submit
the study to the department of information services when completed. In
approving the study, the department of information services shall
ensure that the project is feasible, consistent with the architecture
and infrastructure of the state, consistent with a statewide enterprise
view of delivering services, and that the agency or state will be able
to support the system in the future. The department of information
services may require successful completion of each project phase prior
to authorizing the agency to proceed with the project phase and may
also require quality assurance plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,479,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,928,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,132,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,424,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $732,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,459,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,003,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,271,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $13,104,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) $2,421,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,893,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the verification of initiative
and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and
candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $118,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29A.52.330.
(4)(a) $2,465,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $2,501,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2007-09 biennium. The funding level
for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in
this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The
office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once
all criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection have been satisfactorily
documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(5) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for humanities Washington's "we
the people" community conversations program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $308,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $601,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of
personnel on providing the government-to-government training sessions
for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The
training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal
issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the
training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the
participants of each session. The department of personnel shall be
responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training,
including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC
AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $243,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $494,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The commission on Asian Pacific American
affairs shall consult with the department of information services to
develop a cost-effective plan for delivery of information technology
services, including data base maintenance, internet access, web hosting
and maintenance, search capabilities, software purchasing and
maintenance, and translation services. In developing the plan, the
commission and the department shall explore the possibility of
consolidating information technology services for the commission with
the commission on Hispanic affairs and the commission on African-American affairs. The commission shall provide a copy of the plan to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,844,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $183,000 of the state treasurer's service
account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1512 (linked deposit program). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $752,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $765,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,324,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,841,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $752,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $765,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for staff and related costs to
verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.
(3) $1,000 of the appropriation from the auditing services
revolving account--state is provided solely for an adjustment to the
agency lease rate for space occupied and parking in the Tacoma Rhodes
Center. The department of general administration shall increase lease
rates to meet the cash gain/loss break even point for the Tacoma Rhodes
Center effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES
FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $156,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $381,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125 FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,106,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,349,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,911,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,093,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,133,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,244,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $209,992,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $230,098,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.
(3) $157,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $157,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $7,969,000 of the legal services revolving account--state appropriation are provided solely for increases in salaries and
benefits of assistant attorneys general effective July 1, 2007. This
funding is provided solely for increases to address critical
recruitment and retention problems, and shall not be used for the
performance management program or to fund general administration. The
attorney general shall report to the office of financial management and
the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by
October 1, 2008, and provide detailed demographic information regarding
assistant attorneys general who received increased salaries and
benefits as a result of the appropriation. The report shall include at
a minimum information regarding the years of service, division
assignment within the attorney general's office, and client agencies
represented by assistant attorneys general receiving increased salaries
and benefits as a result of the amount provided in this subsection.
The report shall also provide initial findings regarding the effect of
the increases on recruitment and retention of assistant attorneys
general.
(4) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the continued development and
implementation of the homicide investigation tracking system. The
office of the attorney general shall submit a project plan to the
department of information services for the homicide investigation
tracking system. Amounts provided in this subsection may not be
expended without prior approval of the project plan by the department
of information services. In approving the project plan, the department
of information services shall ensure that the project is feasible,
consistent with the architecture and infrastructure of the state,
consistent with a statewide enterprise view of delivering services, and
that the agency or state will be able to support the system in the
future. The department of information services may require successful
completion of each project phase prior to authorizing the agency to
proceed with the project phase and may also require quality assurance
plans.
(5) $200,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the development and implementation
of the computer system upgrade. The attorney general's office shall
submit a project plan to the department of information services for the
computer system upgrade. Amounts provided in this subsection may not
be expended without prior approval of the project plan by the
department of information services. In approving the project plan, the
department of information services shall ensure that the project is
feasible, consistent with the architecture and infrastructure of the
state, consistent with a statewide enterprise view of delivering
services, and that the agency or state will be able to support the
system in the future. The department of information services may
require successful completion of each project phase prior to
authorizing the agency to proceed with the project phase and may also
require quality assurance plans.
(6) $217,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $218,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1461 (manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution). If
this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126 FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $730,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $763,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,493,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,832,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,015,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,014,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,180,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,001,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,784,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,354,000
Tourism Development Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $356,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,142,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,570,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,702,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,656,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,824,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,600,000
Homeless Families Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $656,000
Community Preservation and Development Authority
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Clean Streams and Clear Sky Subaccount--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Family Prosperity Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,763,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $455,252,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center for work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities. The
center shall not pay any increased indirect rate nor increases in other
indirect charges above the absolute amount paid during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium.
(2) $1,658,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,658,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for multijurisdictional drug task
forces.
(3) $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to fund domestic violence legal
advocacy.
(4) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall contract with a lender or contract collection agent to
act as a collection agent of the state. The lender or contract
collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and
deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected
shall be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest earned in the
account may be retained by the lender or contract collection agent, and
shall be considered a fee for processing payments on behalf of the
state. Repayments of loans granted under this chapter shall be made to
the lender or contract collection agent as long as the loan is
outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the chapter.
(5) $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided to support a task force on human
trafficking.
(6) To improve accountability, oversight, and performance
measurement, the department shall collect geographic location
information on all future grants, loans, and contracts consistent with
the geographic information system codes in the grant, loan, and
contract information system under development by the department of
information services. The department shall report to the department of
information services by September 30, 2007, the extent to which such
data may be used in conjunction with similar information managed by
other state agencies.
(7) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1178 (associate development organizations). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for domestic violence grants.
(9) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the community services block
grant program.
(10) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Substitute House Bill No. 1091
(innovation partnership zones). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $112,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the retired senior volunteer
program.
(12) $425,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $425,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the Washington state
association of counties for the county training program.
(13) $495,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $495,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the northwest agriculture
business center.
(14) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for House Bill No. 2156 (carbon dioxide
mitigation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $200,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year
2008 is provided solely for a program to build capacity and promote the
development of nonprofit community land trust organizations in the
state. Funds shall be granted through a competitive process to
community land trusts with assets under one million dollars, and these
funds shall be used for operating costs, technical assistance, and
other eligible capacity building expenses to be determined by the
department.
(16) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to centro latino to provide adult
basic education that includes but is not limited to: English as a
second language, Spanish literacy training, work-readiness training,
citizenship classes, programs to promote school readiness, community
education, and entrepreneurial services.
(17)(a) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to an independent
nonprofit land stewardship organization to develop and demonstrate one
or more transfer of development rights programs. This organization
must have proven local and multi-county expertise in implementing
transfers of development rights and other market based conservation
strategies within King, Kitsap, Pierce, and Snohomish counties and
shall provide a 1:1 private match on the public funds received. These
programs shall involve the purchase or lease of development rights or
conservation easements from family forest landowners facing pressure to
convert their lands and who desire to keep their land in active forest
management. The nonprofit organization is required to work in
collaboration with family forest landowners and affected local
governments, and to submit an interim written progress report to the
department by September 15, 2008, and a final report by June 30, 2009.
The department shall transmit the reports to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature. (b) Of the amounts within
this subsection, up to $150,000 shall be made available for a contract
between the nonprofit organization and the department to implement
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1636 (regional transfer of development
rights). If Second Substitute House Bill No. 1636 is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1422 (addressing children and families of incarcerated
parents). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to resolution Washington to build
statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and
dispute resolution programs that guarantee that all citizens have
access to a low-cost resolution process as an alternative to
litigation.
(20) $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the long-term care ombudsman
program within the department of community, trade, and economic
development to recruit and train volunteers to serve in the adult
family home setting.
(21) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1303 (cleaner energy). The department shall
retain $1,500,000 for expenditures related to the operations of the
energy freedom authority, and the support of the vehicle workgroup and
the carbon market stakeholder workgroup. The department shall enter
into interagency agreements with other agencies to implement the bill
in the following amounts: (a) $1,500,000 shall be provided to the
climate impacts group at the University of Washington for climate
assessments; (b) $200,000 shall be provided to the University of
Washington college of forest resources for identification of barriers
to using the state's forest resources for fuel production; and (c)
$800,000 shall be provided to the Washington State University for
analyzing options for market incentives to encourage biofuels
production. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(22) $245,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $245,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for KCTS public television to
support programming in the Spanish language. These funds are intended
to support the addition of a bilingual outreach coordinator to serve
Latino adults, families and children in western and central Washington;
multimedia promotion on Spanish-language media and website integration;
the production of targeted public affairs programs that seek to improve
education and the quality of life for Latinos; and to establish
partnerships with city and county library systems to provide
alternative access to the v-me Spanish language channel via the
internet.
(23) $350,000 of the community preservation and development
authority account--state appropriation is provided solely for Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1992 (community development authorities). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(24) $1,000,000 of the tourism and promotion account--state
appropriation is provided solely for House Bill No. 1276 (creating a
public/private tourism partnership). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1359 (affordable housing for all). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(26) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the African chamber of
commerce of the Pacific Northwest to support the formation of trade
alliances between Washington businesses and African businesses and
governments.
(27) $347,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $348,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to Western Washington University
to support small business development centers and underserved economic
development councils with secondary research services. Of the amounts
in this subsection, $500,000 is intended for research services and
shall be divided evenly between 25-50 small business development
centers and underserved economic development councils and $195,000
shall be used to develop infrastructure, training programs, and
marketing materials.
(28) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the emergency food assistance
program.
(29) $1,763,000 of the family prosperity account--state
appropriation is provided solely for Second Substitute House Bill No.
2256 (family prosperity account). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(30) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for a study on improving the effectiveness
of the growth management act. Topics may include but are not limited
to: How best to meet and finance infrastructure and service needs of
growing communities; how to provide incentives to accommodate projected
growth and protect resource lands and critical areas; and how local
governments are prepared to address land use changes associated with
climate change.
(31) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the history link web site to
support state and local history information provided free to the
public.
(32) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department's individual
development account program.
(33) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the Poulsbo marine science
center.
(34) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for a study of southwest Washington's
utility corridor capacity for the distribution of petroleum through
pipelines.
(35) $2,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants to public television
and radio stations pursuant to RCW 43.63A.400, 43.63A.410, and
43.63A.420.
(36) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the safe and drug free schools
and communities program.
(37) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the University of Washington's
college of forest resources center for international trade in forest
products.
(38) $2,000,000 of the clean streams and clear sky subaccount
appropriation is provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1035 (anaerobic digester power). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(39) $2,000,000 of the clean streams and clear sky subaccount
appropriation is provided solely for Second Substitute House Bill No.
1036 (renewable energy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(40) $471,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $471,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla
Walla community college for its water and environmental center.
(41) $450,000 of the tourism and promotion account--state is
provided solely for marketing of the 2010 olympics.
(42) $50,000 of the tourism and promotion account--state is
provided solely for the Washington state games.
(43) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a contract with a food
distribution program for communities in the southwestern portion of the
state and for workers impacted by timber and salmon fishing closures
and reductions. The department may not charge administrative overhead
or expenses to the funds provided in this subsection.
(44)(a) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for a study to examine the fiscal
health of counties. The study shall address spending and revenues, as
well as the demographic, geographic, social, economic, and other
factors contributing to or causing financial distress. The study shall
also examine the financial efficiencies, cost savings, and improved
levels of service that may be gained by authorizing noncharter counties
greater flexibility in altering their forms of governance, including
consolidating or merging constitutional or statutory functions or
structures.
(b) The department of community, trade, and economic development
may contract or consult with any agency, organization, or other public
or private entity as it deems necessary in order to complete the study
required under this section. The study may contain options and actions
for consideration by the governor and the legislature, but at minimum
shall recommend the changes to constitutional and statutory law
necessary to provide counties with the legal authority required to
implement the changes in governmental structures and functions needed
to promote optimum financial efficiency and improved services. The
study shall be transmitted to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and the governor by December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128 FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST
COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $589,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $598,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,187,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,794,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,879,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,525,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,265,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,734,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for a contract with the Ruckelshaus
center to continue the agricultural pilot programs that identify
projects to enhance farm income and improve natural resource
protection. Specific work will include project outreach and
refinement, stakeholder support, staffing the oversight committee,
seeking federal and private match funding, and further refining the
list of projects to be recommended for funding.
(2) $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for a contract with the Ruckelshaus
center to fund "proof-of-concept" model and projects recommended by the
oversight committee, as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) $580,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $580,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the association of Washington
cities and the Washington state association of counties for improving
project permitting and mitigation processes.
(4) $320,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $320,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the office of regulatory
assistance to develop statewide multiagency permits for transportation
infrastructure and other projects that integrate local, state, and
federal permit requirements and mitigation standards.
(5) $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement legislation that
continues the office of regulatory assistance.
(6) $165,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a study to develop options for
a new K-12 pupil transportation funding formula. The office of
financial management shall contract with consultants with expertise in
both pupil transportation and K-12 finance formulas. The office of
financial management and the contractors shall consult with the
legislative fiscal committees and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction. The office of financial management shall submit a
final report to the governor, the house of representatives
appropriations committee, and senate ways and means committee by
November 15, 2008.
(7) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for development of a new incentive
pay structure for K-12 staff as directed by House Bill No. 1907
(educator preparation, professional development, and compensation).
(8) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the office of
financial management shall enter into an interagency agreement with the
department of social and health services to establish a program of
technical assistance to pharmacies providing services under chapter
74.09 RCW that offers information to pharmacies regarding compliance
with payment requirements and that offers technical assistance to
pharmacies that request such assistance or who, as identified in a
prepayment or other preaudit review, would benefit from such
assistance. Additionally, the office of financial management shall
oversee the technical assistance program and review the department of
social and health services' pharmacy audit practices and determine
whether it is desirable, in instances when fraud is not suspected, to
extend the time from when a pharmacy is notified of an upcoming audit,
to when an audit begins. The office of financial management shall
report its findings and recommendations to the governor and to the
appropriate legislative fiscal and policy committees by December 1,
2007.
(9) Sufficient funding is provided in this section to implement
section 4 of Engrossed House Bill No. 2212 (growth
management/agricultural activities).
(10) $639,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $377,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 2366 (state facility planning). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130 FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,583,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $80,000 of the administrative hearings
revolving account appropriation is provided solely for contracting with
the department of information services for a requirements assessment
and feasibility study to determine if it would be more cost-effective
and efficient to migrate from the ACTS, HATS, and CATS systems to one
common case tracking system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,421,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,726,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,147,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall coordinate with the
governor's office of Indian affairs on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal
government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal
historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal
governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through
a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department
shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the
training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the
training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,050,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section may not
be expended by the Washington state lottery for any purpose associated
with a lottery game offered through any interactive electronic device,
including the internet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133 FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $256,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $267,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $523,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The commission on Hispanic affairs shall
consult with the department of information services to develop a cost-effective plan for delivery of information technology services,
including data base maintenance, internet access, web hosting and
maintenance, search capabilities, software purchasing and maintenance,
and translation services. In developing the plan, the commission and
the department shall explore the possibility of consolidating
information technology services for the commission with the commission
on Asian Pacific American affairs and the commission on African-American affairs. The commission shall provide a copy of the plan to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134 FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $252,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $258,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $510,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The commission on African-American affairs
shall consult with the department of information services to develop a
cost-effective plan for delivery of information technology services,
including data base maintenance, internet access, web hosting and
maintenance, search capabilities, software purchasing and maintenance,
and translation services. In developing the plan, the commission and
the department shall explore the possibility of consolidating
information technology services for the commission with the commission
on Asian Pacific American affairs and the commission on Hispanic
affairs. The commission shall provide a copy of the plan to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000
Dependent Care Administrative Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $430,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,108,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,988,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to design a plan for the operation
of a universal voluntary retirement accounts program, and then seek
approval from the federal internal revenue service to offer the plan to
workers and employers in Washington on a tax-qualified basis.
Features of Washington voluntary retirement accounts plan include
a defined contribution plan with limited preselected menu of investment
options, administration by the department of retirement systems,
investment oversight by the state investment board, tax-deferred
payroll deductions, retirement account portability between jobs, and a
two-tier system with workplace-based individual retirement accounts
open to all workers, and a deferred compensation 401(k)-type program or
SIMPLE IRA-type program open to all employers who choose to participate
for their employees.
The director shall undertake the legal and development work to
determine how to implement a universal voluntary retirement accounts
program, managed through the department of retirement systems directly
or by contract. By December 1, 2008, the director shall report to the
legislature on the program's design, and any required changes to state
law that are necessary to implement the program.
(2) $15,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1261 (duty disability service credit). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $43,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1680
(emergency medical technician service credit). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $72,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1649 (judges' past service credit purchases). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $33,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1262 (plan 1 post retirement employment). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $2,207,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No.
2391 (gain sharing revisions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,758,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,067,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,451,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $109,000
Waste Tire Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Real Estate Excise Tax Grant Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,370,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,744,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137 FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD
State Investment Board Expense Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,460,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138 FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,455,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,303,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,758,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139 FOR THE MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL
County Research Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $859,000
City and Town Research Services -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,522,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,381,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140 FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S
BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,505,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $38,000 of the OMWBE enterprises account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1512 (linked deposit program). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $471,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $470,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,642,000
General Administration Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,770,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,353,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,053,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,617,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,223,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,078,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,752,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,423,000
The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,025,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for an evaluation of the
information technology infrastructure capacity for institutions
operated by the department of social and health services, department of
veterans affairs, and department of corrections. The evaluation will
detail the status of the participating institutions' infrastructure and
recommend an improvement strategy that includes the use of electronic
medical records. The department shall report back to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on its findings by January 1, 2009.
(2) $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $192,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to host and
maintain the department of archaeology and historic preservation's
information technology systems, including its geographic information
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,525,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,141,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,666,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $104,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1206 (automobile insurance). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $464,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1532 (market conduct oversight). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144 FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,572,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $40,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
development and implementation of the database system. The department
shall submit a project plan to the department of information services
for the database system. Amounts provided in this subsection may not
be expended without prior approval of the project plan by the
department of information services. In approving the project plan, the
department of information services shall ensure that the project is
feasible, consistent with the architecture and infrastructure of the
state, consistent with a statewide enterprise view of delivering
services, and that the agency or state will be able to support the
system in the future. The department of information services may
require successful completion of each project phase prior to
authorizing the agency to proceed with the project phase and may also
require quality assurance plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145 FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the death investigation
account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial
assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations.
The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding
these funds for multiple death investigations involving an
unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving
multiple jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146 FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION
Horse Racing Commission Operating Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,361,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
commission may increase license fees in excess of the fiscal growth
factor as provided in RCW 43.135.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147 FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,721,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,730,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,517,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $187,486,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $199,454,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,277,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of increased information
technology service support. The department shall submit a project plan
to the department of information services for the implementation of
increased information technology service support. Amounts provided in
this subsection may not be expended without prior approval of the
project plan by the department of information services. In approving
the project plan, the department of information services shall ensure
that the project is feasible, consistent with the architecture and
infrastructure of the state, consistent with a statewide enterprise
view of delivering services, and that the agency or state will be able
to support the system in the future. The department of information
services may require successful completion of each project phase prior
to authorizing the agency to proceed with the project phase and may
also require quality assurance plans.
(2) $1,468,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the study and implementation of a data warehouse
system. The department shall submit the results of the feasibility
study to the department of information services and must receive
approval before they may implement the data warehouse system. In
approving the feasibility study, the department of information services
shall ensure that the project is feasible, consistent with the
architecture and infrastructure of the state, consistent with a
statewide enterprise view of delivering services, and that the agency
or state will be able to support the system in the future. The
department of information services may require successful completion of
each project phase prior to authorizing the agency to proceed with the
project phase and may also require quality assurance plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148 FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS
Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'
Administrative Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,276,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $9,000 of the expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1475
(additional board members). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Public Service Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,354,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,978,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,535,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,867,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In accordance with RCW 81.66.030, it is the policy of the state
of Washington that the costs of regulating the companies transporting
persons with special needs shall be borne by those companies. For each
company or class of companies covered by RCW 81.66.030 the commission
shall set fees at levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of
supervising and regulating the companies or classes of companies.
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
commission may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if
the increases are necessary to fully fund the cost of supervision and
regulation.
(2) In accordance with RCW 81.70.350, it is the policy of the state
of Washington that the cost of regulating charter party carrier and
excursion service carriers shall be borne by those entities. For each
charter party carrier and excursion service carrier covered by RCW
81.70.350, the commission shall set fees at levels sufficient to fully
cover the cost of supervising and regulating such carriers. Pursuant
to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the commission
may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the
increases are necessary to fully fund the cost of the program's
supervision and regulation.
(3) $21,000 of the public service revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1252 (prerecorded telephone calls). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $22,000 of the public service revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No.
2156 (carbon dioxide mitigation). If House Bill No. 2156 (carbon
dioxide mitigation) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,413,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,020,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,922,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,972,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,924,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,769,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $374,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $556,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,269,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $229,541,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $12,924,000 of the disaster response account -- state
appropriation and $55,769,000 of the disaster response account -- federal
appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor
and with the approval of the office of financial management. The
military department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2007-2009 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(2) $556,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- state
appropriation and $1,269,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--federal appropriation are provided solely for response and recovery
costs associated with the February 28, 2001, earthquake. The military
department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing earthquake
recovery costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual
expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and
(e) estimates of future payments by biennium. This information shall
be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and by amount paid on
behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The military
department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2007-2009 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(3) $61,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) This amount shall not be allotted until a spending plan is
reviewed by the governor's domestic security advisory group and
approved by the office of financial management;
(c) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; incremental changes from the
previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security expenditures by
the state and local governments with this federal funding; and matching
or accompanying state or local expenditures; and
(d) The department shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing homeland security revenues and expenditures for
the previous fiscal year by county and legislative district.
(4) $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2225 (enhanced 911 radio network). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151 FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,926,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,970,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,081,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,977,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $873,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,593,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,330,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 153 FOR THE GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,844,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,860,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,704,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 154 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
State Convention and Trade Center Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,910,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operating
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,748,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,658,000

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES. (1) Appropriations made in this act to the department of
social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by
this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include
transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other
than that purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act.
(4) The department is authorized to develop an integrated health
care program designed to slow the progression of illness and disability
and better manage medicaid expenditures for the aged and disabled
population. Under this Washington medicaid integration partnership
(WMIP) the department may combine and transfer such medicaid funds
appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 209 of this act as may
be necessary to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 13,000 persons during the 2007-2009 biennium. The amount
of funding assigned to the pilot projects from each program may not
exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act for individuals
covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the health condition
of persons enrolled in the pilot, times the number of clients enrolled
in the pilot. In implementing the WMIP pilot projects, the department
may: (a) Withhold from calculations of "available resources" as set
forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the capitated rate for
individuals enrolled in the pilots; and (b) employ capitation financing
and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health care service
contractors licensed by the office of the insurance commissioner and
qualified to participate in both the medicaid and medicare programs.
The department shall conduct an evaluation of the WMIP, measuring
changes in participant health outcomes, changes in patterns of service
utilization, participant satisfaction, participant access to services,
and the state fiscal impact.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $305,712,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $310,816,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,527,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,251,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,254,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,298,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,108,126,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,271,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $2,271,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $1,584,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the category of services titled
"intensive family preservation services."
(2) $701,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $701,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $322,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(4) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a foster parent retention
program. This program is directed at foster parents caring for
children who act out sexually.
(5) The providers for the 31 HOPE beds shall be paid a $1,000 base
payment per bed per month, and reimbursed for the remainder of the bed
cost only when the beds are occupied.
(6) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures. The
department shall adjust adoption support benefits to account for the
availability of the new federal adoption support tax credit for special
needs children. The department shall report annually by October 1st to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the specific efforts
taken to contain costs.
(7) Within amounts appropriated in this section, priority shall be
given to proven intervention models, including evidence-based
prevention and early intervention programs identified by the Washington
institute for public policy and the department. The department shall
include information on the number, type, and outcomes of the evidence-based programs being implemented in its reports on child welfare reform
efforts.
(8) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase services provided
through children's advocacy centers.
(9) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a street youth program in
Spokane.
(10) Within the amounts provided, the department shall develop and
implement a two-tiered reimbursement rate schedule for children under
age two and children age two and older served by the medicaid treatment
child care program. The department shall work in collaboration with
contracted providers of the program to develop the rate schedule,
taking into consideration such factors as higher staff level and
smaller group size requirements for each age group. The department
shall implement the rate schedule no later than January 1, 2008, and
neither reimbursement rate in the two-tiered schedule shall be lower
than the reimbursement rate level from the 2007 fiscal year.
(11) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for a demonstration project to promote
sibling placement and placement stability in foster care and to improve
foster care parent recruitment and retention. $50,000 of the funds
allocated for this project shall be transferred to the Washington state
institute for public policy, which shall report to the appropriate
policy committees of the legislature by September 1, 2008, with an
evaluation of this project, including outcomes related to sibling
placements, placement stability, and foster care parent recruitment and
retention.
(12) $4,962,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $4,586,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $9,548,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
a statewide automated child welfare information system.
(13) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $129,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1333 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $429,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1334 (child welfare proceedings). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $53,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $73,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $39,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1472 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $131,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $126,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $110,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 1624 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $201,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $72,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $117,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1716 (foster care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $858,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $809,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $715,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1854
(background checks). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $137,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $137,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $118,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1287
(foster children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,786,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,077,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,734,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,873,000
Reinvesting in Youth--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,846,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,249,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,252,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,510,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,527,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $353,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $353,000 of the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation for fiscal year
2009 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice
assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code
revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to
provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $3,078,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,078,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in
this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $1,030,000 of the general fund--state appropriation and
$2,686,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,030,000 of the general fund--state appropriation and $2,686,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants pursuant
to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided
in this subsection may be used solely for community juvenile
accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of
programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,506,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,506,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $71,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $5,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Third
Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(6) $21,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $22,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1733 (community justice facilities). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $306,275,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $307,512,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $376,365,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,948,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,002,100,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $253,481,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $254,832,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, and $318,877,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the regional support networks to
provide services covered under the prepaid inpatient health plan and
state mental health contracts. Distribution of funds shall be based on
the regional support network funding model. Of these amounts,
$107,807,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2008 and $107,807,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for persons and services not
covered by the medicaid program and shall be distributed proportional
to each regional support network's percentage of the total state
population, consistent with RCW 71.24.035(13).
(b) $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to contract for development and initial implementation
of high-intensity program for active community treatment (PACT) teams,
and other proven program approaches which the department concurs will
enable the regional support network to achieve significant reductions
during fiscal year 2008 and thereafter in the number of beds the
regional support network would otherwise need to use at the state
hospitals.
(c) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 222 per day
throughout fiscal year 2008. Beginning January 1, 2009, the number of
nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support networks at
eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The number of nonforensic
beds allocated for use by regional support networks at western state
hospital shall be 777 per day in fiscal year 2008. Beginning September
2008, the number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at western state hospital shall be 747 per day until
May 2009, at which time, the bed allocation shall be 717 beds per day.
Beginning January 2008, the department shall separately charge regional
support networks for use of state hospital beds for short-term
commitments or for persons served in the program for adaptive living
skills (PALS).
(d) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(e) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department
shall contract with the Clark county regional support network for
development and operation of a project demonstrating collaborative
methods for providing intensive mental health services in the school
setting for severely emotionally disturbed children who are medicaid
eligible. Project services shall be delivered by teachers and teaching
assistants who qualify as, or who are under the supervision of, mental
health professionals meeting the requirements of chapter 275-57 WAC.
The department shall increase medicaid payments to the regional support
network by the amount necessary to cover the necessary and allowable
costs of the demonstration, not to exceed the upper payment limit
specified for the regional support network in the department's medicaid
waiver agreement with the federal government after meeting all other
medicaid spending requirements assumed in this subsection. The
regional support network shall provide the required nonfederal share of
the increased medicaid payment provided for operation of this project.
(f) At least $902,000 of the federal block grant funding
appropriated in this subsection shall be used for the continued
operation of the mentally ill offender pilot program.
(g) $1,061,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,407,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to expand the mentally ill
offender program.
(h) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for mental health services for
mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for
facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon
mentally ill offenders' release from confinement.
(i) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants for innovative mental
health service delivery projects. Such projects may include, but are
not limited to, clubhouse programs and projects for integrated health
care and behavioral health services for general assistance recipients.
These amounts shall supplement, and not supplant, local or other
funding currently being used for activities funded under the projects
authorized in this subsection.
(j) The department is authorized to continue to expend federal
block grant funds, and special purpose federal grants, through direct
contracts, rather than through contracts with regional support
networks; and to distribute such funds through a formula other than the
one established pursuant to RCW 71.24.035(13).
(k) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(l) $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $4,500,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment. Coordination of these services will be done in partnership
between the mental health program and the aging and disability services
administration. The funds are not subject to the standard allocation
formula applied in accordance with RCW 71.24.035(13)(a).
(m) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided to continue performance-based incentive
contracts to provide appropriate community support services for
individuals with severe mental illness who have been discharged from
the state hospitals. These funds will be used to enhance community
residential and support services provided by regional support networks
through other state and federal funding.
(n) $696,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $696,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the mental health division, in
collaboration with the children's administration and the juvenile
rehabilitation services administration, to continue the children's
evidence-based mental health services pilot program. The department
shall contract with the University of Washington school of medicine's
department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences division of public
behavioral health and justice to provide support and assistance in all
phases of the pilot program.
(o) $5,985,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $5,985,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to regional support to increase
amounts available for nonmedicaid psychiatric inpatient hospital
payments over fiscal year 2005 levels. Nonmedicaid psychiatric
inpatient hospital rates shall be set at 85.04% of each hospital's
medicaid psychiatric inpatient rate.
(p) $2,109,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $2,094,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $4,435,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase medicaid inpatient
psychiatric hospital rates up to the statewide weighted average for
those hospitals that under the Navigant study recommendations will have
rates below the statewide weighted average.
(q) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, and $10,000,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for supplemental compensation
increases for workers employed by community mental health agencies
contracted by regional support networks in order to improve staff
recruitment and retention. The compensation pass-through is provided
solely for compensation increases for providers employed by community
mental health agencies which have a legally binding written commitment
to increase the compensation of their workers, such as a collectively
bargained contract or a comparable legal commitment. The intent of
this written requirement is to ensure that the full amount of the
compensation increase reaches the community mental health care workers
in the form of a wage or benefit increase. In order for a specific
community mental health care agency to be eligible for such an
increase, the agency must submit to the department of social and health
services and its regional support network proof of a legally binding
written commitment to increase the compensation of existing and newly
hired community mental health care providers, excluding administrators
and contract employees, by an amount commensurate with the rate
increase provided. An agency will be deemed to have met this condition
by submitting an executed collective bargaining agreement.
(r) $789,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $789,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for clubhouse services. The
department may contract directly with clubhouse organizations for these
services.
(s) $2,021,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,683,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1456 (mental health professionals). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,779,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,719,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $142,713,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,563,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,058,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,832,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state mental hospitals may use funds appropriated in this
subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state
hospital and adjacent areas.
(c) $18,575,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $9,675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to operate on a temporary basis
five additional adult civil commitment wards at the state psychiatric
hospitals. The legislature intends for these wards to close, on a
phased basis, during the 2007-09 biennium as a result of targeted
investments in community services for persons who would otherwise need
care in the hospitals. To the extent that the department and regional
support networks are able to develop and implement cost-effective
approaches that would avert the need to open one or more of the
additional wards, the department is authorized to use funds
appropriated in this subsection for implementation of those approaches.
The department shall seek review and comment from the legislative
fiscal committees at least thirty days prior to proceeding with
implementation of any such alternative approach.
(d) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for protective equipment for staff
at eastern and western state hospitals. Protective equipment shall
include shields, helmets, gloves, and body protection.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,966,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,502,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,906,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,374,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,951,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $6,499,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $1,859,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of
sections 4, 5, 7, and 10 of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1088
(children's mental health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,814,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,027,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,477,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,318,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $125,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $164,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the institute for public
policy to continue the longitudinal analysis directed in chapter 334,
Laws of 2001 (mental health performance audit), and, to the extent
funds are available within these amounts, to build upon the evaluation
of the impacts of chapter 214, Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,984,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,653,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $617,359,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,322,900,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The entire health services account appropriation, $615,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $892,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and
$2,546,011 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for health care benefits for agency home care workers who are
employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours a week. The
state contribution to the cost of health care benefits per
participating worker per month shall be no greater than $532.00 in
fiscal year 2008 and $585.00 in fiscal year 2009.
(b) Individuals receiving family support or high school transition
payments as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental
payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW
74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.
(c) $2,950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $4,815,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $8,010,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for community residential and support
services. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for (i)
residents of residential habilitation centers who are able to be
adequately cared for in community settings and who choose to live in
those community settings; (ii) clients without residential services who
are at immediate risk of institutionalization or in crisis; (iii)
children who are aging out of other state services; and (iv) current
home and community-based waiver program clients who have been assessed
as having an immediate need for increased services. The department
shall ensure that the average cost per day for all program services
other than start-up costs shall not exceed $300. In order to maximize
the number of clients served and ensure the cost-effectiveness of the
waiver programs, the department will strive to limit new client
placement expenditures to 90 percent of the budgeted daily rate. If
this can be accomplished, additional clients may be served with excess
funds provided the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not
exceed the amounts estimated. The department shall electronically
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days
following each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served with
these additional community services, where they were residing, what
kinds of services they were receiving prior to placement, and the
actual expenditures for all community services to support these
clients.
(d) $1,762,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $3,150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $5,101,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for expanded community services for
persons with developmental disabilities who also have community
protection issues. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for
(i) clients being diverted or discharged from the state psychiatric
hospitals; (ii) clients participating in the dangerous mentally ill
offender program; (iii) clients participating in the community
protection program; and (iv) mental health crisis diversion
outplacements. The department shall ensure that the average cost per
day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed
$325. In order to maximize the number of clients served and ensure the
cost-effectiveness of the waiver programs, the department will strive
to limit new client placement expenditures to 90 percent of the
budgeted daily rate. If this can be accomplished, additional clients
may be served with excess funds if the total projected carry-forward
expenditures do not exceed the amounts estimated. The department shall
implement the four new waiver programs such that decisions about
enrollment levels and the amount, duration, and scope of services
maintain expenditures within appropriations. The department shall
electronically report to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the number of
persons served with these additional community services, where they
were residing, what kinds of services they were receiving prior to
placement, and the actual expenditures for all community services to
support these clients.
(e) $14,435,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $17,011,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $8,579,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for family support programs for
individuals with developmental disabilities.
Of the amounts provided in this subsection (e), $2,133,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $4,509,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for individuals with developmental disabilities
receiving state-only family support services.
Of the amounts provided in this subsection (e), $1,600,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,600,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for the implementation of a flexible family support
pilot program for families who are providing care and support for
family members with developmental disabilities. The program shall
provide funding for support services such as respite care, training and
counseling, assistive technologies, transition services, and assistance
with extraordinary household expenses.
(i) To receive funding, an individual must: (A) Be eligible for
services from the division of developmental disabilities; (B) live with
his or her family; (C) not live independently or with a spouse; (D) not
receive paid services through the division, including medicaid personal
care and medicaid waiver services; and (E) have gross household income
of less than or equal to four hundred percent of the federal poverty
level.
(ii) The department shall determine individual funding awards based
on the following criteria: (A) Documented need for services, with
priority given to individuals in crisis or at immediate risk of needing
institutional services, individuals who transition from high school
without employment or day program opportunities, individuals cared for
by a single parent, and individuals with multiple disabilities; (B)
number and ages of family members and their relation to the individual
with developmental disabilities; (C) gross annual household income; and
(D) availability of state funds.
Funding awards may be made as one-time awards or on a renewable
basis. Renewable awards shall be for a period of twelve months for the
biennium. Awards shall be based upon the criteria provided in this
subsection, but shall be within the following limits: Maximum of
$4,000 per year for an individual whose gross annual household income
is up to 100 percent of the federal poverty level; maximum of $3,000
per year for an individual whose gross annual household income is up to
200 percent of the federal poverty level; maximum of $2,000 per year
for an individual whose gross annual household income is up to 300
percent of the federal poverty level; and maximum of $1,000 per year
for an individual whose gross annual household income is up to 400
percent of the federal poverty level. Of the amounts provided in this
subsection, $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for one-time awards.
(iii) Eligibility for, and the amount of, renewable awards and one-time awards shall be redetermined annually and shall correspond with
the application of the department's mini-assessment tool. At the end
of each award period, the department must redetermine eligibility for
funding, including increases or reductions in the level of funding, as
appropriate.
(iv) By November 1, 2008, and by November 1, 2009, the department
shall provide a status report to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the flexible family support pilot
program, which shall include the following information: The number of
applicants for funding; the total number of awards; the number and
amount of both annual and one-time awards, broken down by household
income levels; and the purpose of the awards.
(v) The department shall manage enrollment and award levels so as
to not exceed the amounts appropriated for this purpose.
(f) $1,560,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $3,497,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $2,384,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for employment and day services.
Priority consideration for this new funding shall be young adults with
developmental disabilities living with their family who need employment
opportunities and assistance after high school graduation. Services
shall be provided for both waiver and nonwaiver clients.
(g) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1548 (developmental disabilities). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,781,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,922,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,885,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,613,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,614,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $335,815,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The developmental disabilities program is
authorized to use funds appropriated in this section to purchase goods
and supplies through direct contracting with vendors when the program
determines it is cost-effective to do so.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,207,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,266,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,173,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) As part of the needs assessment instrument, the department
shall collect data on family income for minor children with
developmental disabilities and all individuals who are receiving
state-only funded services. The department shall ensure that this
information is collected as part of the client assessment process.
(b) The division of developmental disabilities shall collect data
from the counties related to employment services. This data shall
include, but not necessarily be limited to, information pertaining to:
(i) The average length of time clients utilize job coaching services;
(ii) the percentage of clients utilizing job coaching services from
zero to three months, four to six months, seven to nine months, ten to
twelve months, and twelve months or more; and (iii) within the monthly
grouping, the percentage of clients utilizing job coaching services
from zero to five hours per week, five to ten hours per week, ten to
twenty hours per week, and twenty or more hours per week. This data
shall be provided to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2007.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,708,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $691,098,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $738,190,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,524,851,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,001,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,444,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,444,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,448,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $232,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,979,708,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire health services account appropriation, $10,456,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008,
$11,370,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009, and $26,778,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for health care benefits for agency home care workers
who are employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours a
week. The state contribution to the cost of health care benefits per
eligible participating worker per month shall be no greater than
$532.00 in fiscal year 2008 and $585.00 per month in fiscal year 2009.
(2) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $156.73 for
fiscal year 2008 and shall not exceed $165.60 for fiscal year 2009.
For all nursing facilities, the direct care, therapy care, support
services, and operations component rates established in accordance with
chapter 74.46 RCW shall be adjusted for economic trends and conditions
by 3.2 percent effective July 1, 2007.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue certificates of capital authorization that result in up to $16
million of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in
fiscal year 2008; up to $16 million of increased asset value completed
and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2009; and up to $16 million of
increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year
2010.
(4) Adult day health services shall not be considered a duplication
of services for persons receiving care in long-term care settings
licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW.
(5) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not qualify
for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval
and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 600
persons at any time.
(b) The second waiver program shall include coverage of in-home
care. Enrollment in this second waiver shall not exceed 200 persons at
any time.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(d) If it is necessary to establish a waiting list for either
waiver because the budgeted number of enrollment opportunities has been
reached, the department shall track how the long-term care needs of
applicants assigned to the waiting list are met.
(6) $1,804,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,804,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
chore services program.
(7) The department shall establish waiting lists to the extent
necessary to assure that annual expenditures on the community options
program entry systems (COPES) program do not exceed appropriated
levels. In establishing and managing any such waiting list, the
department shall assure priority access to persons with the greatest
unmet needs, as determined by department assessment processes.
(8) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department is
authorized to expand the number of boarding homes that receive
exceptional care rates for persons with Alzheimer's disease and related
dementias who might otherwise require nursing home care. The
department may expand the number of licensed boarding home facilities
that specialize in caring for such conditions by up to 100 beds.
(9) Within amounts appropriated in this section and in section 205
of this act, the department of social and health services shall:
(a) Determine how geographic differences in community residential
provider payments affect provider and workforce turnover;
(b) Examine alternative community residential provider payment
systems that account for differences in direct care labor costs in
various areas of the state, including alternative peer groupings in its
payment systems that take such factors into account; and
(c) Submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the
office of financial management and to the appropriate fiscal committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2007.
(10) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $816,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2111 (adult family homes). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $250,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2098 (blue ribbon commission/health care). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $232,000 of the traumatic brain injury account--state
appropriation and $178,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2055 (traumatic brain injury). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13)(a) $14,250,000 of the fiscal year 2009 general fund--state
appropriation and $15,145,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase nursing facility payment
rates.
(b) A joint legislative task force on long-term care residential
facility payment systems shall review and develop recommendations
related to payment methodologies for the care of medicaid-eligible
residents of nursing homes, boarding homes, and adult family homes in
Washington state.
(i) Membership of the task force shall consist of eight
legislators. The president of the senate shall appoint four members of
the senate, including two members of the majority caucus and two
members of the minority caucus. The speaker of the house of
representatives shall appoint four members of the house of
representatives, including two members of the majority caucus and two
members of the minority caucus. Each body shall select representatives
from committees with jurisdiction over health and long-term care and
fiscal matters.
(ii) The task force shall give strong consideration to the
following principles in the course of its deliberations:
(A) A continuum of residential care settings should be available to
medicaid-eligible vulnerable adults so as to honor consumer choice;
(B) Payment methodologies for care provided in adult family homes,
boarding homes, and nursing homes should be based upon resident acuity,
with payment rates that recognize the impact of differing state and
federal regulatory requirements upon facility costs, but also address
current disparities in payments to facilities serving residents with
similar nursing or personal care needs;
(C) Payment methodologies should be designed to support retention
of qualified direct care staff through training, wages, and benefits
offered to direct care staff, with special consideration given to
nursing homes, boarding homes, and adult family homes that care for a
disproportionate number of medicaid-eligible residents relative to
their peer facilities;
(D) Performance measures related to critical issues such as staff
retention and resident outcomes should be developed, with payment
linked to facility performance on the measures; and
(E) Payment methodologies should be simplified, with greater
predictability and stability in payments.
(iii) The task force shall:
(A) Consider input from long-term care stakeholders with respect to
the principles in (b)(ii) of this subsection;
(B) Review the current payment methodologies for nursing homes,
boarding homes, and adult family homes, giving strong consideration to
the principles in (b)(ii) of this subsection, and make recommendations
for revisions to, restructuring of, or replacement of existing payment
methodologies. The recommendations related to payments made in fiscal
year 2009 shall be consistent with the amounts appropriated in this
subsection.
(iv) The task force shall complete its review and submit its
recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2007.
(v) The task force expires December 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $590,306,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $619,636,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $991,591,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,920,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,592,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,234,045,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $255,240,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $256,196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, and $833,074,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst
program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the
department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families
eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. Within the
amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department shall:
(a) Establish a post-TANF work transition program;
(b) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Outcome data regarding job retention and wage progression
shall be reported quarterly to appropriate fiscal and policy committees
of the legislature for families who leave assistance, measured after 12
months, 24 months, and 36 months. The department shall also report the
percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance for
needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months; and
(c) Submit a report by October 1, 2007, to the fiscal committees of
the legislature containing a spending plan for the WorkFirst program.
The plan shall identify how spending levels in the 2007-2009 biennium
will be adjusted to stay within available federal grant levels and the
appropriated state-fund levels.
(2) Up to $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 of the amounts in subsection (1) of this section
are for the WorkFirst pathway to engagement program. The department
shall collaborate with community partners and represented staff to
identify additional services needed for WorkFirst clients in sanction
status. The department shall contract with qualified community-based
organizations to deliver such services, provided that such services are
complimentary to the work of the department and are not intended to
supplant existing staff or services. The department shall also
contract with community-based organizations for the provision of
services for WorkFirst clients who have been terminated after six
months of sanction. Contracts established pursuant to this subsection
shall have a performance-based component and shall include both
presanction termination and postsanction termination services. Clients
shall be able to choose whether or not to accept the services. The
department shall develop outcome measures for the program related to
outreach and reengagement, reduction of barriers to employment, and
client feedback and satisfaction. Nothing in this subsection is
intended to modify a collective bargaining agreement under chapter
41.80 RCW or to change the state's responsibility under chapter 41.80
RCW. The department shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007, on program
implementation and outcomes. The department also shall report on
implementation of specialized caseloads for clients in sanction status,
including average caseload size, referral process and criteria, and
expected outcomes for specialized caseloads.
(3) $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $187,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $396,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of section 8 of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1088 (children's mental health). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $152,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $482,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1009 (child support schedule). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase naturalization
services. These amounts shall supplement and not supplant state and
federal resources currently provided by the department for this
purpose.
(6) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase limited English
proficiency pathway services. These amounts shall supplement and not
supplant state and federal resources currently provided by the
department for this purpose.
(7) $4,463,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $3,958,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1329 (deficit reduction act). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall increase the state supplemental payment by $1.46 per month
beginning in fiscal year 2008, and by an additional $2.96 per month
beginning in fiscal year 2009, for SSI clients who reside in nursing
facilities, residential habilitation centers, or state hospitals and
who receive a personal needs allowance and decrease other state
supplemental payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,369,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,375,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $137,547,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $632,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,743,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,538,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,538,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,567,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,044,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,043,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $339,542,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,601,653,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,695,161,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,293,624,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,076,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,634,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,737,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $646,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,304,531,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the department is authorized to disregard recoveries by
Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined
in RCW 48.104.030.
(3) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to continue podiatry services for medicaid-eligible adults.
(4) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to provide an adult dental benefit that is equivalent to the
benefit provided in the 2003-05 biennium.
(5) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The
public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the
required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the
payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules.
It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental
to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated
and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the
legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall
not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues
retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments.
(6) $1,111,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,110,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $5,402,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, $1,590,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $1,591,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
grants to rural hospitals. The department shall distribute the funds
under a formula that provides a relatively larger share of the
available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate share
of low-income and medically indigent patients and (b) have relatively
smaller net financial margins, to the extent allowed by the federal
medicaid program.
(7) $10,546,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $10,546,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $19,725,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for grants to nonrural
hospitals. The department shall distribute the funds under a formula
that provides a relatively larger share of the available funding to
hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate share of low-income and
medically indigent patients and (b) have relatively smaller net
financial margins, to the extent allowed by the federal medicaid
program.
(8) The department shall continue the inpatient hospital certified
public expenditures program for the 2007-2009 biennium. The department
shall periodically evaluate the extent to which savings continue to
exceed costs for this program. The program shall apply to all public
hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those
classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric
institutions. During fiscal year 2008 and fiscal year 2009, hospitals
in the program shall be paid and shall retain (a) one hundred percent
of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid
inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance; and (b)
one hundred percent of the federal portion of the maximum
disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal
regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an
allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by
the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each
fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount that
is the total of (c) the total payment for claims for services rendered
during the fiscal year calculated according to the methodology employed
by the legislature in the omnibus appropriations act for implementation
in fiscal year 2008 and (d) disproportionate share hospital payment
amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005
that pertain to fiscal year 2005. If payments during the fiscal year
exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be
made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable
disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can
certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less
than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal
to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the
applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made
in the applicable fiscal year and is subject to an interim cost
settlement within eleven months after the end of the fiscal year. A
final cost settlement shall be performed within two years after the end
of the related fiscal year. To the extent that a final cost settlement
determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it
would have received under the methodology in place in fiscal year 2008
as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay these amounts
to the state when requested. $74,477,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated
in section 204(1) of this act and the balance in this section, and
$70,668,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated in section 204(1) of this act
and the balance in this section, are provided solely for state grants
for the participating hospitals.
(9) $7,314,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $7,800,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $48,995,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
a replacement system for the existing medicaid management information
system. The amounts are conditioned on the department satisfying the
requirements of section 902 of this act.
(10) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the department shall
provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if
eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.
(11) The medical assistance administration is authorized to use
funds appropriated in this section to purchase goods and supplies
through direct contracting with vendors when the administration
determines it is cost-effective to do so.
(12) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(13) The department shall, within available resources, continue
operation of the medical care services care management pilot project
for clients receiving general assistance benefits in King and Pierce
counties. The project may use a full or partial capitation model that
includes a mechanism for shared savings.
(14) $1,688,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,689,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to incorporate a mental health
service component to the pilot project established pursuant to
subsection (13) of this section. Addition of the mental health service
component authorized in this subsection is contingent upon the managed
care contractor or the participating counties providing, alone or in
combination, matching funds in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to
one-ninth of the amounts appropriated in this subsection. The mental
health service component may include care coordination, mental health
services, and integrated medical and mental health service delivery for
general assistance clients with mental health disorders, as well as
primary care provider training and education. The department shall
provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2009, on costs, savings, and any outcomes or quality
measures associated with the pilot projects during calendar year 2007
and 2008. To the extent possible, the report shall address any impact
that the mental health services component has had upon clients' use of
medical services, including but not limited to primary care physician's
visits, emergency room utilization, and prescription drug utilization.
(15) $424,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $1,152,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $1,649,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1201 (foster care youth medical). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $288,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $277,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $566,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2098 (blue ribbon comm/health care). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $19,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, $260,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008, $1,570,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $1,916,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement sections
5 and 8 of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1088 (children's mental
health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $6,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $6,651,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to provide full benefit dual
eligible beneficiaries with medicare part D prescription drug copayment
coverage in accordance with chapter 3, Laws of 2007 (part D copayment
drug program).
(19) $640,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to:
(a) Pay the premiums associated with enrollment in a medicare
advantage plan for those full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries, as
defined in RCW 74.09.010, who were enrolled on or before November 14,
2006, in a medicare advantage plan sponsored by an entity accredited by
the national committee for quality assurance and for whom the
department had been paying part C premium as of November 2006, as well
as any persons who age in or otherwise qualify for continuous
enrollment in such a plan on or after November 2006; and
(b) Undertake, directly or by contract, a study to determine the
cost-effectiveness of paying premiums for enrollment of full benefit
dual eligible beneficiaries in medicare advantage plans in lieu of
paying full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries' medicare cost-sharing.
The study shall compare the cost and health outcomes experience,
including rates of nursing home placement and costs for groups of full
benefit dual eligible beneficiaries who are enrolled in medicare
advantage plans, in medicare special needs plan or in medicare
fee-for-service. The study shall compare the health status and
utilization of health and long-term care services for the three groups,
and the impact of access to a medical home and specialty care, over a
period of two years to determine any differences in health status,
health outcomes, and state expenditures that result. The department
shall submit the results of the study to the governor and the
legislature on or before December 1, 2009. The department is
authorized to accept private cash and in-kind donations and grants to
support the study and evaluation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,631,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,348,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,885,000

Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,793,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,773,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,503,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,731,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,234,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,341,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,028,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,834,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,226,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,226,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $904,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,408,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $141,677,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project through the governor's juvenile justice advisory committee.
(2) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to expand and enhance the juvenile
detention alternatives initiative. This funding is intended to add
three new program sites, support the addition of a data analyst, and to
provide resources for the state to participate in annual national
conferences.
(3) $4,150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $4,150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for home visitation services as
determined by the Washington council for the prevention of child abuse
and neglect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,094,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,131,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,185,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,410,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,044,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,606,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $521,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $285,518,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $307,272,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $654,461,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents and home
care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals which are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
which choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(4) $1,600,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely to support the state subsidies
for the additional benefits added to the basic health plan for the 2007
calendar year. For calendar year 2008 and 2009, the actuarial value of
the benefits offered by basic health plan will be reduced to a level
equivalent to the 2006 calendar year benefits.
(5) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, $3,050,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $3,450,000 of the health
services account appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely
for additional enrollment in the basic health plan.
(6) $21,108,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
is provided solely for funding for health care services provided
through local community clinics.
(7) $1,125,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,250,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for provisions
of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2098 (blue ribbon commission) not
specifically funded elsewhere in this act. If Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2098 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $1,471,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,471,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are appropriated solely for state
subsidies for foster parent enrollees in the basic health plan with
household incomes between 200 percent and 300 percent of the federal
poverty level pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 2098 (blue
ribbon commission). If Second Substitute House Bill No. 2098 is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(9) $731,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $977,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the dental
residency program, including maintenance of the existing residency
positions and the establishment of six additional resident positions in
fiscal year 2008, including four additional residency positions in
eastern Washington and two in the Seattle area, and five additional
positions in fiscal year 2009.
(10) $1,000,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to conduct a
pilot project to develop an emergency medical response health
management record system. The health care authority shall contract to
provide health management record services, such as those developed with
patients in Whatcom county, to provide integrated care management that
are web-services enabled. The record system developed by the pilot
project will begin to provide services to Emergency Medical Personnel
within two years in at least King, Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom
counties and the city of Vancouver. The requirements of the pilot
project contract shall require the initial development of specific
evaluation criteria, and a report on the performance of the system
according to those criteria no later than June 30, 2009.
(11) $4,057,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $3,300,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
administrative costs associated with implementing Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1569 (reforming the health care system in
Washington state). If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1569
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(12) $784,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008, $1,676,000 of the health service account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $540,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, and $22,480,000 of the state health care
authority administrative account appropriation are provided for the
development of a new benefits administration and insurance accounting
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,328,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,350,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,328,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,006,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE
APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,789,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,790,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,599,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,515,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,667,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,790,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) During the 2007-2009 biennium, the criminal justice training
commission is authorized to raise existing fees charged for firearms
certification for security guards in excess of the fiscal growth factor
established pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the
actual costs of conducting the certification programs and the
appropriation levels in this section.
(2) $50,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $50,000 of the public safety and
education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for support of the coalition of small police agencies
major crimes task force. The purpose of this task force is to pool its
resources and to establish an efficient and cooperative approach in
addressing major violent crimes.
(3) $1,310,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $526,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for six additional basic law enforcement academies in
fiscal year 2008 and two additional basic law enforcement academies in
fiscal year 2009. Continued funding for these additional academies is
contingent upon the result of an office of financial management
forecast for future student demand for basic law enforcement academies
at the criminal justice training centers in Burien and Spokane.
(4) $1,146,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,219,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs to implement a crime mapping enhancement to the national
incident-based reporting system (NIBRS), and the continued development,
maintenance, and operation of the jail booking and reporting system
(JBRS), and the statewide automated victim information and notification
system (SAVIN).
(5) $28,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1182 (missing persons). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) $14,000,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $150,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $150,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1333 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,235,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,196,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,091,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,228,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $848,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,353,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,844,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,768,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,714,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,622,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,444,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,186,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,793,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,417,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $569,767,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,413,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for conducting utilization reviews of physical and
occupational therapy cases at the 24th visit and the associated
administrative costs, including those of entering data into the
claimant's file. The department shall develop and report performance
measures and targets for these reviews to the office of financial
management. The reports are due September 30th for the prior fiscal
year and must include the amount spent and the estimated savings per
fiscal year.
(2) $1,089,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$192,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2171 (crane safety). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $2,196,000 of the medical aid--state appropriation is provided
solely for Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2073 (vocational
rehabilitation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $16,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, $758,000 of the electrical license account--state
appropriation, and $246,000 of the plumbing certificate account--state
appropriation are provided solely for Substitute House Bill No. 1597
(durable licenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $605,000 of the accident account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for a study of the incidence of
permanent total disability pensions in the state's workers'
compensation system. To conduct the study, the department shall
contract with an independent researcher that has demonstrated expertise
in workers' compensation systems. When selecting the independent
researcher the department shall consult the labor and business members
of the workers' compensation advisory committee and, if the labor and
business members of the workers' compensation advisory committee agree
on a particular independent researcher, the department shall select
that independent researcher. The study must consider causes of the
recent increase in permanent total disability cases, future anticipated
permanent total disability trends, a comparison of Washington's
permanent total disability claims experience and injured workers with
other states and jurisdictions, the impact of the standard for finding
workers employable on the incidence of permanent total disability
pensions, and the impact of vocational rehabilitation under RCW
51.32.095, and any improvements to vocational rehabilitation, on the
incidence of permanent total disability pensions. The department shall
report to the workers' compensation advisory committee, the house of
representatives commerce and labor committee, and the senate labor,
commerce, research and development committee on the results of the
study on or before July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW
BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,797,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,795,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,592,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $224,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 1220 (sentence review board). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,029,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,043,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Veterans Innovations Program Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,437,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,519,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,639,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,932,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $972,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,988,000
Veteran Estate Management Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,593,000

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,623,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,175,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,331,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,197,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,326,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,708,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,718,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,426,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,994,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,707,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $473,341,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,881,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,190,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,158,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,579,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,939,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,272,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,493,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,866,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,870,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,556,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,988,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,512,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,472,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,577,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,224,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,709,000
Local Public Health Financing Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $224,000
Shellfish Contamination Prevention and Protection
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $993,804,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department is authorized to raise existing fees charged for
its fee-supported programs in excess of the fiscal growth factor
pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section.
(2) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive,
and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not
anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require
expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated
unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services
authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) $1,599,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1993
(counselors). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $877,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1099
(dental professions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $20,000,000 of the local public health financing account
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1825 (local public health funding). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 2304 (cardiac care services). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(7) $633,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $729,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 2098 (blue ribbon comm/health care). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(8) $51,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1855 (sex education). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(9) $30,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2015 (genetic counselors). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1837 (nonambulatory persons). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $201,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2087 (health care facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $293,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for public service announcements
regarding childhood lead poisoning, information pamphlets, rule
development, and for early identification of persons at risk of having
elevated blood-lead levels, which includes systematically screening
children under six years of age and other target populations identified
by the department.
(13) $72,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $2,243,000 of the health professions account
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1103 (health professions). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(14) $101,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $81,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $6,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1414 (ambulatory surgical facilities). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(15) $55,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1397 (massage therapy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $58,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1378
(specialty hospitals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $76,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $124,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $1,000,000 of the shellfish contamination prevention and
protection account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1595
(shellfish protection). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $31,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $224,000 of the oyster reserve land account--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1374 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(19) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $383,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1809 (patient safety act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $433,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $397,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1106 (hospital acquired infections). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(21) $240,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $240,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to support
efforts to prevent the spread of methicillin-resistant staphylococcus
aureus and other multidrug resistant organisms by providing
surveillance, outbreak investigation, and education of health care
workers and the public on preventing the spread of multidrug resistant
organisms.
(22) No additional funding is provided within the appropriations in
this section from the health services account--state to increase the
department of health expenditures for the prevention and treatment of
sexually transmitted diseases over the funding levels provided for the
2005-07 fiscal biennium.
(23) At least $750,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $750,000 of the health services
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely
for pertusis-HepB-IPV combination vaccines as part of the universal
access to childhood immunization program. The department shall fully
fund provider requests for the combination vaccine during the 2007-2009
fiscal biennium.
(24) $4,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for department of health-funded
family planning clinics to increase the capacity of the clinics to
provide family planning and reproductive health services to low-income
men and women who are not otherwise eligible for services through the
department of social and health services medical assistance program and
for clinical or other health services associated with sexually
transmitted disease testing through the infertility prevention project.
Of these amounts, the department is authorized to expend up to
$1,000,000 of its general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009 for services provided in fiscal year 2008, if necessary, to offset
reductions in federal funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,924,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,561,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,393,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,404,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,588,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $9,389,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the completion of phase three of the
department's offender-based tracking system replacement project. This
amount is conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of
section 902 of this act.
(b) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the establishment and support
of a statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its
members representatives of community-based mental health treatment
programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors and
commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities. The
council will begin to investigate and promote cost-effective approaches
to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental
disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of
offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing,
employment, and job training needs.
(c) $314,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $294,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for four additional staff to
collect and analyze data for programs funded through the offender
reentry initiative and collect, analyze, and disseminate information
required by the GMAP process, performance audits, data requests, and
quality assessments and assurances.
(d) $169,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Third
Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $575,461,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $611,791,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,455,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,492,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,492,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,205,491,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the
department of corrections is authorized to enter into financial
contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the purposes
indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
This authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option
to purchase or lease-purchase work release beds in facilities
throughout the state for $8,561,000.
(b) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as recovery
of costs.
(c) The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership
program at the Washington corrections center for women at a level at
least equal to that provided in the 1995-97 biennium.
(d) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(e) During the 2007-09 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(f) The Harborview medical center shall provide inpatient and
outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in department of
corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the average rate that
the department has negotiated with other community hospitals in
Washington state.
(g) $358,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $980,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(h) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1030 (eluding a police vehicle).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(i) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1097 (vulnerable adults). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(j) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1319 (correctional agency employee). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(k) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1592 (sentence review board). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,623,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $132,351,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,526,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,629,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,929,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) $374,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $714,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for employment and job training in
the community for released offenders.
Of the amounts provided in this subsection (b), $135,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $135,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for south Seattle community college to develop and establish a
common curriculum for corrections education faculty, and to establish
and maintain a database that tracks and records measurable outcomes of
corrections education. The database shall track the number of offender
students who enroll in the common curriculum program, the education
attained by each offender, and the employment status of each offender
student.
(c) $56,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1733 (community justice
facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $967,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,313,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,280,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $110,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts
provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,897,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,047,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,944,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $35,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for expenditures
related to the Farrakhan v. Locke litigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE
BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,513,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,557,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,003,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,093,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $4,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for an
adjustment to the agency lease rate for space occupied and parking in
the Tacoma Rhodes Center. The department of general administration
shall increase lease rates to meet the cash gain/loss break even point
for the Tacoma Rhodes Center effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $904,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $910,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,814,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $261,495,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,413,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $241,985,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,219,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,656,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $596,888,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,578,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from funds made available to
the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
These funds are authorized to provide direct services to unemployment
insurance claimants and providing job search review.
(2) $2,300,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to continue implementation of chapter 4, Laws
of 2003 2nd sp. sess. and for implementation costs relating to chapter
133, Laws of 2005 (unemployment insurance).
(3) $12,348,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to continue current unemployment insurance
functions.
(4) $12,054,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to fund the unemployment insurance tax
information system (TAXIS) technology initiative.
(5) $430,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to replace high-risk servers.
(6) $503,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to provide a system to track computer
upgrades and changes.
(7) $183,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to conduct a feasibility study to integrate
job search data systems.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $506,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,010,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,045,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,415,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,375,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,586,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,516,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,723,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,891,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter
Control -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,387,000
State Drought Preparedness -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $491,000
Vessel Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,438,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
Water Rights Tracking System Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $661,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,538,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,510,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,162,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,492,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $381,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,708,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,488,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,590,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,290,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,462,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,211,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,982,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,967,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,649,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $679,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,145,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $448,873,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of
Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(2) $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $209,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $200,000 of the general fund--private local
appropriation are provided solely to implement activities associated
with a regional haze program. Funds shall be collected and expended in
accordance with the terms of the contract entered into with affected
businesses and the department of ecology.
(3) $2,000,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to local governments outside of Puget
Sound for municipal storm water programs, including but not limited to,
implementation of phase II municipal storm water permits, source
control for toxics in association with cleanup of contaminated sediment
sites, and source control programs for shellfish protection districts
where storm water is a significant contributor.
(4) Fees approved by the department of ecology in the 2007-09
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(5) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $927,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for wetland mitigation. Of this amount,
$110,000 is provided solely to support development of a wetland
mitigation program in Clark county and $55,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $55,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to
support development of a wetland in Whatcom county. The program will
engage local, state, and federal agencies, private investors, property
owners, and others in the creation of one or more wetland banks and
other measures to protect habitat functions and values while
accommodating urban growth in the region. Priority shall be given to
state and local government partnerships for wetland characterization.
(6) $260,000 of the state toxics control account -- state
appropriation is provided solely to support pesticide container
recycling activities in Washington.
(7) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a pilot project to provide
grants to two local government jurisdictions located in the Puget Sound
area to improve compliance with existing environmental laws. Grant
funds shall be used for providing information on existing requirements,
providing technical assistance necessary to comply on a voluntary
basis, and taking enforcement action.
(8) $1,257,000 of the reclamation account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2038 (hydropower fees). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
section shall lapse.
(9) $679,000 of the underground storage tank account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1789
(underground storage tanks). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(10) $2,026,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for local governments located near
hazardous waste clean-up sites, including Duwamish Waterway,
Commencement Bay, and Bellingham Bay, to work with small businesses and
citizens to safely manage hazardous and solid wastes to prevent the
contamination.
(11) $876,000 of the state toxics control account and $876,000 of
the local toxics control account are provided solely for public
participation grants related to toxic cleanup sites within and around
Puget Sound.
(12) $1,376,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,377,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement watershed plans. Of
this amount, $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $160,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to study the feasibility of a
public utility district pipeline in the Bertrand watershed and $250,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and
$350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009
are provided solely to study water storage and augmentation in the
Bertrand watershed.
(13) $830,000 of the flood control assistance account--state
appropriation is provided to mitigate the potential for flooding
through habitat restoration and stream enhancements in the Fishtrap
watershed.
(14) $90,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for plan preparation and
development in the Fishtrap watershed.
(15) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2220 (shellfish). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,184,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,520,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,450,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,111,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $224,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,811,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $347,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,636,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,701,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2007-09 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for project scoping and cost estimating
for the agency's 2009-11 capital budget submittal.
(4) $2,255,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for costs associated with relocating the
commission's Tumwater headquarters office.
(5) $272,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $271,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for costs associated with
relocating the commission's eastern Washington regional headquarters
office.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for replacing vehicles and
equipment.
(7) $1,679,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,504,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for planned and emergency
maintenance of park facilities.
(8) $600,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the recreational boating
safety program.
(9) $232,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $233,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the development of a
long-range plan for Fort Worden state park, including architectural and
site design guidelines, business and operations implementation, site
and facilities use plan, and for the department to convene a task force
to recommend alternative governance structures for Fort Worden state
park.
(10) $954,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,007,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operations of Cama Beach
state park.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,524,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,558,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,236,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,556,000
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicles Activities Program
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,004,000
Boating Activities Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,622,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $16,025,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the forest and fish agreement
rules. These funds shall be passed through to the department of
natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife.
(2) $5,000,000 of the boating activities account--state
appropriation is provided to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1651
(boating activities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,102,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,105,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,207,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,033,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,047,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,178,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,435,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,143,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for supplementary basic funding
grants to the state's lowest-income conservation districts. The
supplementary grant process shall be structured to aid recipients in
becoming financially self-sufficient in the future.
(2) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the pioneers in conservation
program for grants awarded through a competitive grant process. The
grants are for agricultural landowners for projects that benefit fish
and wildlife restoration and farm operations. Grants must be matched
by an equal amount or more from nonstate sources with priority for
projects identified in the Puget Sound Chinook salmon recovery plan and
the Puget Sound partnership strategy.
(3) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 1627 (farmland preservation office). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,851,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,006,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,024,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,379,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $405,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,859,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $266,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $322,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,495,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,876,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $751,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $842,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,397,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,324,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,872,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,143,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,877,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,750,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,048,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $412,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,709,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall use the department of printing for
printing needs. Funds provided in this section may not be used to
staff or fund a stand alone printing operation.
(2) $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(3) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(4) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(5) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
Army Corps of Engineers.
(6) The department shall assist the office of regulatory assistance
in implementing activities consistent with the governor's regulatory
improvement program. The department shall support and provide
expertise to facilitate, coordinate, and simplify citizen and business
interactions so as to improve state regulatory processes involving
state, local, and federal stakeholders.
(7) $634,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for operations and fish production costs
at department-operated Mitchell act hatchery facilities.
(8) Within the amount provided for the agency, the department shall
implement a joint management and collaborative enforcement agreement
with the Confederated Tribes of the Colville and the Spokane Tribe.
(9) $276,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $674,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for migration of agency
information technology infrastructure to a platform consistent with
department of information services standards.
(10) $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of a ballast
water management program. The department shall coordinate with the
department of ecology and the office of financial management to
evaluate the feasability of synchronizing ballast water program and
spills program inspections. The department will submit recommendations
to the office of financial management by November 1, 2007.
(11) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for hatchery facility maintenance
improvements.
(12) $440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $409,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for estimates of juvenile
abundance of federally listed salmon and steelhead populations. The
department shall report back to the office of financial management and
the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature with a letter
stating the use and measurable results of activities that are supported
by these funds.
(13) $134,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $134,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the strategic budget and
accountability program. The program and associated employees shall be
structured directly under the fish and wildlife commission.
(14) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Northwest straits
commission to remove lost and abandoned fishing nets and crab and
shrimp pots that may be dangerous to humans and that unintentionally
trap and kill endangered salmon and other aquatic species.
(15) $245,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $245,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department to work in
cooperation with the department of natural resources to assist with the
implementation of the wild horse coordinated resource management plan.
Implementation may include providing grant funding to other state and
nonstate entities as needed.
(16) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1147
(damage to livestock). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1374 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(18) $67,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $68,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a study of introducing oxygen
to the waters of Hood Canal. The study shall propose a location in a
small marine area where a large number of bottom-dwelling fish species
exist and shall analyze the impact of injected dissolved oxygen on
aquatic life. The department shall report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the results of the study and recommend
whether to proceed with a project to inject oxygen into Hood Canal.
(19) $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to develop
siting guidelines for power generation facilities, provide technical
assistance for permitting, support voluntary compliance with the
guidelines, and to conduct bird and wildlife assessments on state lands
most eligible for wind power leases.
(20) Prior to submitting its 2009-11 biennial operating and capital
budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office of
financial management, the department shall contract with the hatchery
scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This review
shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent with HSRG
recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the requests based
upon their contributions to protecting wild salmonid stocks and meeting
the recommendations of the HSRG and; (c) evaluate whether the proposed
requests are being done in the most cost effective manner. The
department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the office of
financial management and the appropriate legislative committees by
October 1, 2008.
(21) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for predator control efforts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,457,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,801,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,991,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,235,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,364,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,114,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,442,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,461,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,441,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,219,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,331,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,331,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,325,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,000
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicles Activities Program
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $982,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,641,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,984,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $303,790,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $122,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $162,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(2) $11,463,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $13,792,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $5,000,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.
None of the general fund and disaster response account amounts
provided in this subsection may be used to fund agency indirect and
administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs
shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and
appropriations.
(3) Fees approved by the department of natural resources and the
board of natural resources in the 2007-09 biennium are authorized to
exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.
(4) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to work with
appropriate stakeholders and state agencies in determining how
privately owned lands, in combination with other land ownership such as
public and tribal lands, contribute to wildlife habitat. The
assessment will also determine how commercial forests, forest lands on
the urban fringe, and small privately-owned forest lands that are
managed according to Washington's forest and fish prescriptions, in
combination with other forest management activities, function as
wildlife habitat now and in the future.
(5) $2,500,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to tribes. If federal funding for this
purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(6) $400,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife. If federal funding for this purpose is reinstated, this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) The department shall prepare a feasibility study that analyzes
applicable business processes and develops the scope, requirements, and
alternatives for replacement of the department's current suite of
payroll-support systems. The department shall use an independent
consultant to assist with the study, and shall submit the completed
analysis to the office of financial management, the department of
personnel, and the department of information services by August 1,
2008.
(8) $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue interagency agreements
with the department of fish and wildlife and the department of ecology
for forest and fish report field implementation tasks.
(9) All department staff serving as recreation-management trail
stewards shall be noncommissioned.
(10) $112,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for spartina eradication efforts. The
department may enter into agreements with federal agencies to eradicate
spartina from private lands that may provide a source of reinfestation
to public lands.
(11) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for health benefits to Washington
conservation corps employees.
(12) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for staff support for the natural
heritage program to integrate, analyze, and provide bird area
information, and for state designations and mapping support, among
other activities.
(13) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to convene and
staff a work group to study issues related to wildfire prevention and
protection. The work group shall issue a report of findings and
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
August 1, 2008.
(14) $48,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2220
(shellfish). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $256,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1374 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,965,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,787,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,853,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,022,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $574,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $575,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,016,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,257,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees and assessments approved by the department in the 2007-09
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(2) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department, in
addition to the authority provided in RCW 17.26.007, may enter into
agreements with federal agencies to eradicate spartina from private
lands that may provide a source of reinfestation to public lands.
(3) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to evaluate the strengths,
weaknesses, opportunities, and threats facing agriculture in Washington
state and to develop a strategy to keep our farms profitable and
productive, and our agriculture industry competitive. The department
shall conduct this work with the assistance of a stakeholder advisory
group representing the agriculture, food processing, and supporting
industries. The department shall submit a project work plan to the
office of financial management and appropriate legislative committees
by November 1, 2007. A final report, including recommendations, shall
be submitted by September 1, 2008.
(4) $275,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $275,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for pesticide technical
assistance.
(5) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for distribution to counties with
weed boards to control invasive weeds. Of this amount, $250,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $250,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely to control Japanese knotweed in counties with weed boards.
(6) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1374 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY
REINSURANCE PROGRAM
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $772,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,155,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,458,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,459,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,072,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,000,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008, $1,000,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $2,500,000 of the general
fund--private/local appropriation are provided solely for the education
of citizens through attracting and utilizing volunteers to engage in
activities that result in environmental benefits.
(2) $2,208,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008, $2,209,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $1,155,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1374 (Puget Sound partnership). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, then $2,208,000 of the water
quality account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $2,209,000
of the water quality account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009,
and $1,155,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
appropriated to the office of the governor for operation of the Puget
Sound action team, and $500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--
state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 of the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,760,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,011,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $720,000
Cemetery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,277,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,317,000
Master License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,395,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,925,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,564,000
Business Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,203,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $319,000
Funeral Directors And Embalmers Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $542,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,646,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is the policy of the state
of Washington that the cost of each professional, occupational, or
business licensing program be fully borne by the members of that
profession, occupation, or business. For each licensing program
covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall set fees at levels
sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering the licensing
program, including any costs associated with policy enhancements funded
in the 2007-09 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the
2007-09 fiscal biennium, the department may increase fees in excess of
the fiscal growth factor if the increases are necessary to fully fund
the costs of the licensing programs.
(2) $230,000 of the master license account--state appropriation is
provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1461
(manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,958,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,013,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,629,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,223,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,841,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,377,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,385,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $572,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,040,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,242,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,557,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $472,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,675,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,496,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,794,000
DNA Data Base Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $119,825,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $233,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $282,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $357,000 of the fingerprint identification
account--state appropriation are provided solely for workload
associated with implementation of the federal Adam Walsh Act -- the
Children's Safety and Violent Crime Reduction Act of 2006.
(2) In accordance with RCW 10.97.100 and chapter 43.43 RCW, the
Washington state patrol is authorized to perform and charge fees for
criminal history and background checks for state and local agencies,
and nonprofit and other private entities and disseminate the records.
It is the policy of the state of Washington that the fees cover, as
nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs of performing
criminal history and background checks activities. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the Washington state
patrol may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the
increases are necessary to fully fund the direct and indirect cost of
the criminal history and background check activities.
(3) $200,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the
state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12
construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the
state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide
these services only to those districts that are located in counties
without qualified review capabilities.
(4) $277,000 from the fingerprint identification account
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1103 (health professions). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(5) The legislature finds that creating and implementing a program
to achieve statewide interoperability is important to protect the
safety of Washington's citizens. $3,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the
implementation of an interoperability pilot project in region 1. The
office of financial management may not allot this amount until a
revised pilot project is developed jointly by the Washington state
patrol and the state interoperability executive committee. The revised
pilot project must achieve the same level of interoperability in region
1 as in the technical implementation plan, and must recommend a
significantly less costly approach to implementing interoperability in
region 1 and throughout the state. The Washington state patrol and the
state interoperability executive committee shall also recommend funding
sources other than in near state general fund.

(End of part)

PART V
K-12 EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
(1) STATE AGENCY OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,040,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,085,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,527,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,594,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,246,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $11,965,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $12,351,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Within the
amounts provided in this subsection, the superintendent shall recognize
the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have
demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning
requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award. The
students selected for the award must demonstrate understanding through
completion of at least one of the classroom-based civics assessment
models developed by the superintendent of public instruction, and
through leadership in the civic life of their communities. The
superintendent shall select two students from eastern Washington and
two students from western Washington to receive the award, and shall
notify the governor and legislature of the names of the recipients.
(b) $550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,236,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of a school
district financial health and monitoring system as directed by House
Bill No. 1871 (educational benchmarks and monitoring). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(c) $1,080,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $815,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities. Within the amounts provided, the board shall (i) develop
a comprehensive set of recommendations for an accountability system;
(ii) adopt high school graduation requirements aligned with
international performance standards in mathematics and science and
assist the office of the superintendent of public instruction in
identifying no more than three curricula that are aligned with these
standards; and (iii) review all requirements related to the high school
diploma as directed by section 405, chapter 263, Laws of 2006.
(d) Funding for the following items is provided solely to the
professional educator standards board:
(i) $742,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $892,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $366,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the
Washington professional educator standards board, including
administering the alternative routes to certification program, pipeline
for paraeducators conditional scholarship loan program, and the
retooling to teach math conditional loan program. Within the amounts
provided in this subsection (1)(d)(i), the professional educator
standards board shall implement the responsibilities and assignments of
the board directed by House Bill No. 1907 (educator preparation,
professional development, and compensation); and
(ii) $1,059,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,059,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the professional educator
standards board for conditional scholarship loans and mentor stipends
provided through the alternative routes to certification program
administered by the professional educator standards board. Of the
amounts provided in this subsection (1)(d)(ii), $500,000 each year is
provided solely for conditional scholarships to candidates seeking an
endorsement in special education, math, science, or bilingual
education;
(iii) $5,440,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation is provided solely to the professional educator standards
board for the expansion of conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends for individuals enrolled in alternative route state
partnership programs and seeking endorsements in math and science as
follows: (A) For route one interns (those currently holding associates
of arts degrees), in fiscal year 2008, sixty interns seeking
endorsements in mathematics and sixty interns seeking endorsements in
science and in fiscal year 2009, an additional sixty in each subject
area; and (B) for all other routes, funding is provided each year for
seventy interns seeking endorsements in mathematics and seventy interns
seeking endorsements in science; and
(iv) $300,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely to the professional educator standards board for
$4,000 conditional loan stipends for paraeducators participating in the
pipeline for paraeducators established in House Bill No. 1906 (math and
science education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(v) $488,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation is
provided solely to the professional educator standards board for
conditional stipends for certificated teachers pursuing a mathematics
endorsement under the retooling to teach mathematics program
established in House Bill No. 1906 (math and science education). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse. The conditional stipends shall be for
endorsement exam fees as well as stipends for teachers who must also
complete coursework.
(vi) $236,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the recruiting diverse
teachers program established in Substitute House Bill No. 1907
(educator preparation, professional development, and compensation).
(e) $555,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for increased attorney general fees
related to education litigation.
(f) $300,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for replacement of the
apportionment data system, which includes the processes that collect
school district budget and expenditure information, staffing
characteristics, and the student enrollments that drive the funding
process.
(g) $78,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $78,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to provide direct services and
support to schools around an integrated, interdisciplinary approach to
instruction in conservation, natural resources, sustainability, and
human adaptation to the environment. Specific integration efforts will
focus on science, math, and the social sciences. Integration between
basic education and career and technical education, particularly
agricultural and natural sciences education, is to be a major element.
(h) $1,336,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,227,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the creation of a statewide
data base of longitudinal student information. This amount is
conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements in section
902 of this act.
(i) $325,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for comprehensive cultural
competence and anti-bias education programs for educators and students.
The office of superintendent of public instruction shall administer
grants to school districts with the assistance and input of groups such
as the anti-defamation league and the Jewish federation of Seattle.
(j) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy
of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial
literacy public-private partnership.
(k) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $98,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support a full-time director of
skills centers within the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(l) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $98,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support a full-time world
languages supervisor within the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(m) $291,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1716
(supporting educational achievement for children in foster care). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(n) $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support a program to recognize
the work of outstanding classified staff in school districts throughout
the state.
(o) $46,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1855
(providing sexual health education in schools). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(p) $11,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $11,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for a study of the expanded special
services pilot required in House Bill No. 2136 (creating the improving
core subject instruction for all students pilot program). If this bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,358,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,822,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,890,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,432,000

The appropriations in this subsection are provided solely for the
statewide programs specified in this subsection and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at
educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of
public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to
provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.
(ii) $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the school safety center in
the office of the superintendent of public instruction subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(A) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(B) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(iii) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a school safety training
program provided by the criminal justice training commission. The
commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel, including school safety
personnel hired after the effective date of this section.
(iv) $40,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the safety center advisory
committee to develop and distribute a pamphlet to promote internet
safety for children, particularly in grades seven through twelve. The
pamphlet shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's
web site. To the extent possible, the pamphlet shall be distributed in
schools throughout the state and in other areas accessible to youth,
including but not limited to libraries and community centers.
(v) $10,344,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for safe and drug free schools and communities grants for drug
and violence prevention activities and strategies, and $800,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $800,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for one-time backfill of the federal reductions to the safe and
drug free schools and communities grant program.
(vi) $405,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $380,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a nonviolence leadership
training program provided by the institute for community leadership.
The program shall provide in-school, weekend, and school break
programming for students of 12 school districts in 36 elementary,
middle, and high schools throughout Washington state.
(vii) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a pilot youth suicide
prevention and information program. The office of superintendent of
public instruction will work with selected school districts and
community agencies in identifying effective strategies for preventing
youth suicide.
(viii) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the development of a model policy and
guidelines for school districts regarding appropriate handling of life
threatening food allergies of school children.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
$1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2008 and $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network
technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and
avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and
video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be
used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the
network.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $639,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,308,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the special services pilot
projects. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate these funds to the district or districts participating in the
pilot program according to the provisions of House Bill No. 2136. If
this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(ii) $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operation of the Cispus
environmental learning center.
(iii) $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support vocational student
leadership organizations.
(iv) $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington civil liberties
education program.
(v) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers
scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community
involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer
mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(vi) $294,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $294,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Lorraine Wojahn dyslexia
pilot reading program in up to five school districts.
(vii) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for developing and disseminating
curriculum and other materials documenting women's roles in World War
II.
(viii) $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for incentive grants for districts
to develop preapprenticeship programs. Grant awards up to $10,000 each
shall be used to support the program's design, school/business/labor
agreement negotiations, and recruiting high school students for
preapprenticeship programs in the building trades and crafts.
(ix) $3,220,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,220,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the dissemination of the
Navigation 101 curriculum to all districts, including disseminating
electronic student planning tools and software for analyzing the impact
of the implementation of Navigation 101 on student performance, and
grants to at least one hundred school districts each year for the
implementation of the Navigation 101 program. The implementation
grants will be limited to a maximum of two years and the school
districts selected shall represent various regions of the state and
reflect differences in school district size and enrollment
characteristics.
(x) $36,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the enhancement of civics
education. Of this amount, $25,000 each year is provided solely for
competitive grants to school districts for curriculum alignment,
development of innovative civics projects, and other activities that
support the civics assessment established in chapter 113, Laws of 2006.
(xi) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a pilot grant program
addressing the impact on school districts of serving concentrations of
high-need students, such as students in staffed residential homes and
other group care facilities, placed by the department of social and
health services in those facilities. The resources shall be
distributed to school districts with the highest concentration of
eligible high needs students on a per student rate, based on criteria
determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
For the purposes of distributing these impact aid grants, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall define "high-need" in
consultation with the department of social and health services. Within
the amounts provided in this subsection, by November 1, 2007, the
superintendent shall issue a report to the governor and appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding the number
and type of students included within the superintendent's definition of
"high need," the percentage that are special education eligible within
that group, as well as recommendations for refining the state's policy
regarding the process by which these students are placed in school
districts, and how existing funding structures recognize the resulting
costs incurred by local school districts.
(xii) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for program initiatives to address
the educational needs of Latino students and families. Using the full
amounts of the appropriations under this subsection, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with the Seattle
community coalition of compana quetzal to provide for three
initiatives: (A) Early childhood education; (B) parent leadership
training; and (C) high school success and college preparation programs.
Campana quetzal shall report to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction by June 30, 2009, regarding impact of the programs
on addressing the academic achievement gap, including high school
drop-out rates and college readiness rates, for Latino students.
(xiii) $8,363,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1573
(dropout prevention). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(xiv) $3,873,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1051
(expanding high school completion programs). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,508,057,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,581,897,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $226,624,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,316,578,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (d) through (f) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (c)
and (d) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (c) through
(f) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) Forty-nine certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.56 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding;
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of
the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established
under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district
documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater than 53.2
certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students. For any school district documenting a lower certificated
instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio
achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding ratio to employ additional classified
instructional assistants assigned to basic education classrooms in
grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a district's staff ratio under
this section, funds used by the district to employ additional
classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified
instructional assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be
determined using the 1989-90 school year as the base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students may use allocations generated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of that required to maintain the
minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ
additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) shall only be expended to reduce class
size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional
funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction with a waiver allowed for skills centers in current
operation that are not meeting this standard until the 2008-09 school
year, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent vocational
students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic
education and vocational enhancement allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(h) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2007-08 and 2008-09
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each three certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
fifty-nine average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
14.63 percent in the 2007-08 school year and 16.40 percent in the 2008-09 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 17.24 percent in the
2007-08 school year and 18.54 percent in the 2008-09 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a) and (c)
through (g) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$9,753 per certificated staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a
maximum of $9,958 per certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $23,881 per certificated
staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a maximum of $24,383 per
certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $18,539 per certificated
staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a maximum of $18,928 per
certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $555.20 for the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) $5,744,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,660,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1432
(granting service credit to educational staff associates for nonschool
employment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $7,235,000
outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2008 and 2009
as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $547,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2008
and a maximum of $558,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2009;
(b) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,385,000 may be expended for the 2008 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,385,000 for the 2009 fiscal year. 20 percent of each fiscal year
amount may carry over from one year to the next;
(c) A maximum of $390,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies; and
(d) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs.
(11) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 5.7 percent from the 2006-07 school year to the
2007-08 school year and 5.1 percent from the 2007-08 school year to the
2008-09 school year.
(12) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (g) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (g) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(13) For the purposes of allocating general apportionment funding
pursuant to this section, students enrolled in skills centers may be
counted up to a combined 2.0 full-time equivalent status in their home
school district and the skills center of attendance. If House Bill No.
1977 (skills centers) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this subsection
(13) shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION. (1) The following
calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund
allocations for certificated instructional, certificated
administrative, and classified staff units under section 502 of this
act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
shall be determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 2
by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP Document
1; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district shall be based on the
district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation
amounts shown on LEAP Document 2.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1" means the staff mix factors for certificated
instructional staff according to education and years of experience, as
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on March 17, 2007, at 10:36 p.m.; and
(b) "LEAP Document 2" means the school year salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and
total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed
by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
March 17, 2007, at 10:36 p.m.
(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors shall be applied to salary
adjustments at a rate of 14.63 percent for school year 2007-08 and
16.40 percent for school year 2008-09 for certificated staff and for
classified staff 17.24 percent for school year 2007-08 and 18.54
percent for the 2008-09 school year.
(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2007-08 School Year

Years of
Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 MA+90
or PHD

0 32,746 33,630 34,547 35,465 38,412 40,310 39,260 42,207 44,107

1 33,187 34,083 35,011 35,970 38,948 40,836 39,696 42,674 44,560

2 33,607 34,512 35,450 36,483 39,452 41,359 40,135 43,104 45,012

3 34,039 34,953 35,901 36,967 39,930 41,884 40,552 43,513 45,468

4 34,464 35,418 36,372 37,474 40,455 42,423 40,988 43,969 45,938

5 34,902 35,861 36,824 37,988 40,958 42,965 41,432 44,403 46,410

6 35,353 36,291 37,287 38,508 41,464 43,482 41,887 44,843 46,860

7 36,145 37,097 38,106 39,394 42,393 44,467 42,739 45,737 47,812

8 37,304 38,308 39,340 40,735 43,775 45,925 44,079 47,120 49,269

9 39,562 40,646 42,091 45,202 47,425 45,434 48,547 50,770

10 41,967 43,516 46,669 48,966 46,861 50,014 52,310

11 44,984 48,204 50,547 48,328 51,550 53,891

12 46,404 49,781 52,194 49,853 53,126 55,540

13 51,397 53,882 51,431 54,741 57,226

14 53,020 55,632 53,056 56,471 58,977

15 54,400 57,080 54,435 57,939 60,511

16 or more 55,487 58,220 55,523 59,097 61,720

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2008-09 School Year

Years of
Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 MA+90
or PHD

0 33,898 34,814 35,762 36,713 39,763 41,728 40,641 43,691 45,658

1 34,354 35,282 36,243 37,236 40,318 42,272 41,093 44,175 46,128

2 34,789 35,726 36,697 37,766 40,840 42,814 41,547 44,621 46,596

3 35,237 36,183 37,164 38,267 41,335 43,357 41,979 45,044 47,067

4 35,676 36,664 37,651 38,793 41,878 43,915 42,430 45,516 47,554

5 36,130 37,123 38,120 39,324 42,399 44,476 42,890 45,965 48,043

6 36,597 37,567 38,598 39,863 42,923 45,011 43,361 46,421 48,508

7 37,416 38,402 39,446 40,780 43,885 46,031 44,243 47,346 49,494

8 38,616 39,655 40,724 42,168 45,315 47,541 45,630 48,778 51,002

9 40,954 42,076 43,572 46,792 49,093 47,032 50,255 52,556

10 43,443 45,047 48,310 50,688 48,509 51,773 54,150

11 46,566 49,900 52,326 50,028 53,363 55,787

12 48,036 51,533 54,030 51,606 54,995 57,493

13 53,205 55,777 53,240 56,667 59,239

14 54,885 57,589 54,922 58,457 61,052

15 56,313 59,088 56,350 59,977 62,639

16 or more 57,439 60,269 57,476 61,176 63,892

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before
the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be
counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection,
the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this act, or any replacement schedules and
documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(7) The certificated instructional staff base salary specified for
each district in LEAP Document 2 and the salary schedules in subsection
(4)(a) of this section include two learning improvement days. A school
district is eligible for the learning improvement day funds only if the
learning improvement days have been added to the 180- day contract
year. If fewer days are added, the additional learning improvement
allocation shall be adjusted accordingly. The additional days shall be
limited to specific activities identified in the state required school
improvement plan related to improving student learning that are
consistent with education reform implementation, and shall not be
considered part of basic education. The principal in each school shall
assure that the days are used to provide the necessary school- wide,
all staff professional development that is tied directly to the school
improvement plan. The school principal and the district superintendent
shall maintain documentation as to their approval of these activities.
The length of a learning improvement day shall not be less than the
length of a full day under the base contract. The superintendent of
public instruction shall ensure that school districts adhere to the
intent and purposes of this subsection.
(8) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2)
and subsection (7) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,031,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,307,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $965,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $507,303,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $401,047,000 is provided solely for the following:
(a) A cost of living adjustment of 3.7 percent effective September
1, 2007, and another 2.8 percent effective September 1, 2008, pursuant
to Initiative Measure No. 732.
(b) Additional salary increases as necessary to fund the base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as listed for each
district in LEAP Document 2. Allocations for these salary increases
shall be provided to all 262 districts that are not grandfathered to
receive salary allocations above the statewide salary allocation
schedule, and to certain grandfathered districts to the extent
necessary to ensure that salary allocations for districts that are
currently grandfathered do not fall below the statewide salary
allocation schedule. These additional salary increases will result in
a decrease in the number of grandfathered districts from the current 34
to 24 in the 2007-08 school year and to 13 in the 2008-09 school year.
(c) Additional salary increases to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff as listed for each district in LEAP
Document 2. These additional salary increases shall ensure a minimum
salary allocation for certificated administrative staff of $54,405.00
in the 2007-08 school year and $57,097.00 in the 2008-09 school year.
(d) Additional salary increases to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for classified
staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2. These additional
salary increases ensure a minimum salary allocation for classified
staff of $29,993.00 in the 2007-08 school year and $31,218.00 in the
2008-09 school year.
(e) The appropriations in this subsection (1) include associated
incremental fringe benefit allocations at rates of 13.99 percent for
the 2007-08 school year and 15.76 percent for the 2008-09 school year
for certificated staff and 13.74 percent for the 2007-08 school year
and 15.04 percent for the 2008-09 school year for classified staff.
(f) The appropriations in this section include the increased
portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant
state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Increases for
general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this
act. Increases for special education result from increases in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act.
(g) The appropriations in this section provide cost of living and
incremental fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments as
follows:

School Year

2007-08 2008-09

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $1.04 $1.95

Highly Capable (per formula student) $11.18 $20.93

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $29.94 $56.05

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $6.38 $11.94

(h) The appropriations in this section include $927,000 for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,944,000 for fiscal year 2009 for salary increase
adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) $66,380,000 is provided for adjustments to insurance benefit
allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is
$682.54 per month for the 2007-08 and 2008-09 school years. The
appropriations in this section provide for a rate increase to $707.00
per month for the 2007-08 school year and $732.00 per month for the
2008-09 school year. The adjustments to health insurance benefit
allocations are at the following rates:

School Year

2007-08 2008-09

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.22 $0.45

Highly Capable (per formula student) $1.49 $3.05

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $3.97 $8.01

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $0.79 $1.58

(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,382,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,073,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $552,455,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such
amounts as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $848,000 of this fiscal year 2008 appropriation
and a maximum of $866,000 of the fiscal year 2009 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $44.88 per weighted mile in the 2007-08 school
year and $45.44 per weighted mile in the 2008-09 school year exclusive
of salary and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.
Allocations for transportation of students transported more than one
radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based
on the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by
the per mile reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide reimbursement funding to a school district only after the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was
purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or
a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote
based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall base
depreciation payments for school district buses on the five-year
average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the
final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall
be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that
school year.
(7) $12,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $12,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided to support the implementation of House
Bill No. 1165 (student transportation funding). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,159,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,159,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,398,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $286,716,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for state matching money for federal
child nutrition programs.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the 2009 fiscal year appropriation are
provided for summer food programs for children in low-income areas.
(3) $59,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $59,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to reimburse school districts for
school breakfasts served to students enrolled in the free or reduced
price meal program pursuant to chapter 287, Laws of 2005 (requiring
school breakfast programs in certain schools).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $541,813,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $558,483,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $434,528,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,534,824,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt the full
cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and
recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k),
chapter 372, Laws of 2006, and ensure that all school districts adopt
the method beginning in the 2007-08 school year.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
funds to school districts based on two categories: (a) The first
category includes (i) children birth through age two who are eligible
for the optional program for special education eligible developmentally
delayed infants and toddlers, and (ii) students eligible for the
mandatory special education program and who are age three or four, or
five and not yet enrolled in kindergarten; and (b) the second category
includes students who are eligible for the mandatory special education
program and who are age five and enrolled in kindergarten and students
age six through 21.
(5)(a) For the 2007-08 and 2008-09 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of students
ages birth through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten, as defined in subsection (4) of this section, multiplied
by the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
four enrollment and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
Each district's general fund -- state funded special education
enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent or 12.7 percent.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, $30,690,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation and $29,574,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided for safety net awards for districts with
demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts
provided in subsection (5) of this section. If safety net awards
exceed the amount appropriated in this subsection (8), the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the
state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal sources. Differences in
program costs attributable to district philosophy, service delivery
choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety
net awards.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) The committee shall then consider extraordinary costs
associated with communities that draw a larger number of families with
children in need of special education services. The committee shall
first distribute funds where state-placed students cause the district
to exceed the 12.7 percent index, and then prioritize funding for other
factors, such as community services, program quality, and/or employment
patterns, that drive higher concentrations of children in need of
special education services.
(d) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor who shall be nonvoting
members of the committee; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund -- state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(12) A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for projects to provide special education
students with appropriate job and independent living skills, including
work experience where possible, to facilitate their successful
transition out of the public school system. The funds provided by this
subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.
(13) A maximum of $100,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation shall be expended to support a special education
ombudsman program within the office of superintendent of public
instruction. The purpose of the program is to provide support to
parents, guardians, educators, and students with disabilities. The
program will provide information to help families and educators
understand state laws, rules, and regulations, and access training and
support, technical information services, and mediation services. The
ombudsman program will provide data, information, and appropriate
recommendations to the office of superintendent of public instruction,
school districts, educational service districts, state need projects,
and the parent and teacher information center.
(14) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(15) A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation may be expended by the superintendent for projects
related to use of inclusion strategies by school districts for
provision of special education services.
(16) The superintendent, consistent with the new federal IDEA
reauthorization, shall continue to educate school districts on how to
implement a birth-to-three program and review the cost effectiveness
and learning benefits of early intervention.
(17) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(18) $262,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for two additional full-time
equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to
provide training and support to districts applying for safety net
awards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,538,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,515,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,053,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) $1,872,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal
year 2008 and $3,618,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for creating the capacity to
provide regional professional development related to mathematics and
science curriculum and instructional strategies and related to
implementation of the comprehensive math, science, and targeted
secondary reading improvement initiative under House Bill No. 1907
(educator preparation, professional development, and compensation).
For each educational service district, $183,892 is provided in fiscal
year 2008 for professional development activities as directed by this
subsection and $372,156 is provided in fiscal year 2009 for
professional development activities as directed by this subsection.
Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for
salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff with
expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional
development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures
related to providing regional professional development support. The
office of superintendent of public instruction shall also allocate to
each educational service district additional amounts provided in
section 504 of this act for compensation increases associated with the
salary amounts and staffing provided in this subsection (2).
(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.310.340, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $202,394,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $212,310,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $414,704,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,343,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,510,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,853,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such amounts as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $196,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $196,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to maintain at least one
certificated instructional staff and related support services at an
institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support
one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish
the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for
juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,417,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,771,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,188,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of $373.36 per funded
student for the 2007-08 school year and $377.49 per funded student for
the 2008-09 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded students
shall be a maximum of 2.3 percent of each district's full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $170,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.
(4) $90,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $90,000 of
the fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided for the Washington
destination imagination network and future problem-solving programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR MISCELLANEOUS PURPOSES UNDER THE ELEMENTARY AND
SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT AND THE NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,341,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,761,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,815,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,692,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,609,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $19,966,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $19,946,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $15,870,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
the Washington assessments of student learning (WASL), including
development and implementation of retake assessments for high school
students who are not successful in one or more content areas of the
WASL and development and implementation of alternative assessments or
appeals procedures to implement the certificate of academic
achievement. The superintendent of public instruction shall report
quarterly on the progress on development and implementation of
alternative assessments or appeals procedures. Within these amounts,
the superintendent of public instruction shall contract for the early
return of 10th grade student WASL results, on or around June 10th of
each year.
(2) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the second grade assessments.
(3) $1,414,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,414,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for (a) the tenth grade
mathematics assessment tool that: (i) Presents the mathematics
essential learnings in segments for assessment; (ii) is comparable in
content and rigor to the tenth grade mathematics WASL when all segments
are considered together; (iii) is reliable and valid; and (iv) can be
used to determine a student's academic performance level; (b) tenth
grade mathematics knowledge and skill learning modules to teach middle
and high school students specific skills that have been identified as
areas of difficulty for tenth grade students; and (c) making the
modules available on-line.
(4) $4,334,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely to develop a system of mathematics and science
standards and instructional materials that are internationally
competitive and consistent with emerging best practices research.
Funding in this subsection shall fund all of the following specific
projects:
(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt revised state standards in mathematics as directed by House Bill
No. 1906 (math and science education). Activities include conducting
research at the request of the state board of education, engaging one
or more national experts in mathematics selected by the board, and
convening education practitioners and community members in an advisory
capacity regarding revised standards in mathematics.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, shall research and
identify not more than three basic mathematics curricula as well as
diagnostic and supplemental instructional materials for elementary,
middle, and high school grade spans that align with the revised
mathematics standards.
(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt revised state standards in science as directed by House Bill No.
1906 (math and science education). Activities include conducting
research at the request of the state board of education, engaging one
or more national experts in science selected by the board, and
convening education practitioners and community members in an advisory
capacity regarding revised standards in science.
(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, shall research and
identify not more than three basic science curricula as well as
diagnostic and supplemental instructional materials for elementary,
middle, and high school grade spans that align with the revised science
standards.
(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
evaluate science textbooks, instructional materials, and diagnostic
tools to determine the extent to which they are aligned with the
revised science standards. Once the evaluations have been conducted,
results will be shared with science teachers, other educators, and
community members.
(f) Funding is provided for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to develop WASL knowledge and skill learning modules
to assist students performing at tenth grade level 1 and level 2 in
science.
(5) $5,376,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for a math and science instructional coaches
demonstration project. Funding shall be used to provide grants to
schools and districts to provide salaries, benefits, and professional
development activities to instructional coaches in middle and high
school math and science in the 2007-08 and 2008-09 school years. Up to
$300,000 of this amount may be used by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to administer and coordinate the program. Each
instructional coach will receive five days of training at a coaching
institute prior to being assigned to serve two schools each. These
coaches will attend meetings during the year to further their training
and assist with coordinating statewide trainings on math and science,
and shall collaborate regularly with staff in the educational service
districts to ensure coordinated implementation of the math and science
initiatives described in House Bill No. 2339 (math and science
improvement initiative).
(6) $8,950,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for allocations to districts for
salaries and benefits for additional job-embedded professional
development focused on improving math and science instruction in fourth
and fifth grade. Funding amounts provided in this subsection are based
on the estimated costs of two professional development days for fourth
and fifth grade teachers, and are intended to support district efforts
to align instruction with new math and science state standards.
(7) $13,077,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for allocations to districts for
additional job-embedded professional development for middle and high
school math and science teachers. Funding amounts provided in this
subsection are based on the estimated costs of three professional
development days for middle and high school math and science teachers,
and are intended to support district efforts to improve mathematics and
science instruction and align curriculum to new math and science state
standards.
(8) $17,473,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for allocations to districts for specialized
professional development in math for one math teacher and one science
teacher in each middle school and high school in the state. Funding
amounts provided in this subsection are based on the costs of five
professional development days for each participating middle and high
school math and science teacher, and are intended to support district
efforts to improve mathematics and science instruction and align
curriculum to the newly adopted math and science state standards.
(9) $282,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for (a) staff at the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts
to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering
programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of
$2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year
professional development training for implementing integrated math,
science, technology, and engineering program in their schools.
(10) $14,006,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for in-service training and
educational programs conducted by the Pacific science center and for
the Washington state leadership assistance for science education reform
(LASER) regional partnership coordinated at the Pacific science center.
(11) $675,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to support state college readiness
assessment fees for eleventh grade students. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall allocate funds for this
purpose to school districts based on the number of eleventh grade
students who complete the college readiness exam. School districts
shall use these funds to reimburse institutions of higher education for
the assessments students take and report to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction on the number of assessments
provided.
(12) $51,236,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for voluntary all-day
kindergarten at the highest poverty schools, as provided in House Bill
No. 1872 (student learning opportunities and achievement). The office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide allocations
to districts for recipient schools in accordance with the funding
formulas provided in section 502 of this act. Each kindergarten
student who enrolls for the voluntary full day program in a recipient
school shall count as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for
the purpose of making allocations under this subsection. Although the
allocations are formula-driven, the office of the superintendent shall
consider the funding provided in this subsection as a fixed amount, and
shall limit the number of recipient schools so as to stay within the
amounts appropriated each fiscal year in this subsection. The funding
provided in this subsection is estimated to provide all-day
kindergarten programs for 10 percent of kindergarten enrollment in the
2007-08 school year and 20 percent of kindergarten enrollment in the
2008-09 school year. Funding priority shall be given to schools with
the highest poverty levels, as measured by free and reduced priced
lunch eligibility rates in each school. Additionally, as a condition
of funding, school districts must agree to provide the full day program
to the children of parents who request it in each eligible school.
(13) $130,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to support a full-day kindergarten
"lighthouse" resource program at the Bremerton school district, as
provided in House Bill No. 1872 (student learning opportunities and
achievement). The purpose of the program is to provide technical
assistance to districts in the initial stages of implementing a high
quality full-day kindergarten program.
(14) $1,300,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the development of a leadership
academy for school principals and administrators as directed by House
Bill No. 1907 (educator preparation, professional development, and
compensation).
(15) $1,345,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to school districts to
implement an English as a second language demonstration project in
schools in which there are many first languages among the students as
provided in House Bill No. 1872 (student learning opportunities and
achievement).
(16) $250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for reimbursement of diagnostic
assessments pursuant to RCW 28A.655.200.
(17) $548,000 of the fiscal year 2008 general fund -- state
appropriation and $548,000 of the fiscal year 2009 general fund -- state
appropriation are provided solely for training of paraprofessional
classroom assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom
assistants as provided in RCW 28A.415.310.
(18) $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for mentor teacher assistance,
including state support activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and
28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in
this subsection may be used each fiscal year to operate a mentor
academy to help districts provide effective training for peer mentors.
Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be allocated to school
districts based on the number of first year beginning teachers.
(19) $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(20) $105,765,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(21)(a) $488,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $488,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a principal support
program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
contract with an independent organization to administer the program.
The program shall include: (i) Development of an individualized
professional growth plan for a new principal or principal candidate;
and (ii) participation of a mentor principal who works over a period of
between one and three years with the new principal or principal
candidate to help him or her build the skills identified as critical to
the success of the professional growth plan. Within the amounts
provided, $25,000 per year shall be used to support additional
participation of secondary principals.
(b) $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Each educational audit
shall include recommendations for best practices and ways to address
identified needs and shall be presented to the community in a public
meeting to seek input on ways to implement the audit and its
recommendations.
(22) $3,950,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $6,575,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a high school and school
district improvement program modeled after the office of the
superintendent of public instruction's existing focused assistance
program in subsection (19)(b) of this section. The state funding for
this improvement program will be combined with an amount committed by
a nonprofit foundation in furtherance of a jointly funded program.
(23) A maximum of $375,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and a maximum of $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided for summer
accountability institutes offered by the superintendent of public
instruction. The institutes shall provide school district staff with
training in the analysis of student assessment data, information
regarding successful district and school teaching models, research on
curriculum and instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve
instruction in reading, mathematics, language arts, social studies,
including civics, and guidance and counseling. The superintendent of
public instruction shall offer at least one institute specifically for
improving instruction in mathematics in fiscal years 2008 and 2009 and
at least one institute specifically for improving instruction in
science in fiscal year 2009. Additionally, $50,000 of the funds
provided in this subsection shall go to the Washington association for
career and technical education to work in collaboration with the career
and technical education department of OSPI to provide professional
development opportunities for career and technical educators.
(24) $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for the evaluation of mathematics
textbooks, other instructional materials, and diagnostic tools to
determine the extent to which they are aligned with the state
standards. Once the evaluations have been conducted, results will be
shared with math teachers, other educators, and community members for
the purposes of validating the conclusions and then selecting up to
three curricula, supporting materials, and diagnostic instruments as
those best able to assist students to learn and teachers to teach the
content of international standards. In addition, the office of the
superintendent shall continue to provide support and information on
essential components of comprehensive, school-based reading programs.
(25) $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the mathematics helping corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall not be
permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) The school improvement specialists shall provide the following:
(i) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(ii) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(iii) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(iv) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(v) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(vi) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(vii) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(26) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the improvement of reading
achievement and implementation of research-based reading models. The
superintendent shall evaluate reading curriculum programs and other
instructional materials to determine the extent to which they are
aligned with state standards. A report of the analyses shall be made
available to school districts. The superintendent shall report to
districts the assessments that are available to screen and diagnose
reading difficulties, and shall provide training on how to implement a
reading assessment system. Resources may also be used to disseminate
grade level expectations and develop professional development modules
and web-based materials.
(27) $30,706,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the reading first program under Title I of the no child
left behind act.
(28)(a) $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to award five grants to parent,
community, and school district partnership programs that will meet the
unique needs of different groups of students in closing the achievement
gap. The legislature intends that the pilot programs will help
students meet state learning standards, achieve the skills and
knowledge necessary for college or the workplace, reduce the
achievement gap, prevent dropouts, and improve graduation rates.
(b) The pilot programs shall be designed in such a way as to be
supplemental to educational services provided in the district and shall
utilize a community partnership based approach to helping students and
their parents.
(c) The grant recipients shall work in collaboration with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop
measurable goals and evaluation methodologies for the pilot programs.
$25,000 of this appropriation may be used by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to hold a statewide meeting to
disseminate successful strategies developed by the grantees.
(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
issue a report to the legislature in the 2009 session on the progress
of each of the pilot programs.
(29) $1,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the development of mathematics
support activities provided by community organizations in after school
programs. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
administer grants to community organizations that partner with school
districts to provide these activities and develop a mechanism to report
program and student success. Of these amounts, at least $120,000 is
for the Ferndale boys & girls club for facilities renovations.
(30) $4,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $4,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $1,507,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation are provided solely for: (a) The meals for kids program
under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155; (b) to eliminate the
breakfast co-pay for students eligible for reduced price lunch; and (c)
for additional assistance for school districts initiating a summer food
service program.
(31) $1,056,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,056,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps.
The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing
comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more
schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs. Grants
provided under this section may be used by school districts for
expenditures from September 2007 through August 31, 2009.
(32) $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
provide a continuum of care for children and families to help children
become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall
contain local plans designed collaboratively with community service
providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which
the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible.
Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.
(33) $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate a process to
facilitate the evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses to
school districts which includes the following: Creation of a general
listing of the types of available online curriculum courses; a survey
conducted by each regional educational technology support center of
school districts in its region regarding the types of online curriculum
courses desired by school districts; a process to evaluate and
recommend to school districts the best online courses in terms of
curriculum, student performance, and cost; and assistance to school
districts in procuring and providing the courses to students.
(34) $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for the development and posting of web-based instructional tools, assessment data, and other information that
assists schools and teachers implementing higher academic standards.
(35) $333,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $333,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operation of the center
for the improvement of student learning pursuant to RCW 28A.300.130.
(36) $10,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1907
(regarding educator preparation, professional development, and
compensation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse. Up to $500,000 of the amount
in this subsection may be used for literacy grants deemed necessary to
enable students to be ready to learn math and science. The grants may
be used solely for high schools with over 40% of students eligible for
free and reduced lunch with a high concentration of students not
passing the WASL in reading and writing.
(37) $9,533,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of sections 4,
6, and 7 of House Bill No. 2327 (standards, instruction, and
assessments for mathematics and science). $4,400,000 of the amount
provided in this subsection shall be used for diagnostic assessments as
directed by section 7 of House Bill No. 2327. If these sections of the
bill are not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(38)(a) $10,082,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $13,638,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification
from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are
teaching in a Washington public school:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,250.00 per
teacher in fiscal year 2008 and $5,400.00 per teacher in fiscal year
2009;
(ii) For national board certified teachers who teach in schools
where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible
for the federal free and reduced price lunch program, an additional
$5,000 annual bonus to be paid in one lump sum; and
(iii) For national board certified teachers who meet the criteria
in (a)(ii) of this subsection and whose national board certificate is
in math or science and who also are teaching math or science, an
additional $5,000 annual bonus to be paid in one lump sum.
(b) The annual bonus shall be paid in a lump sum amount and shall
not be included in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW
41.32.010(10).
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
ensure that national board certified teachers who meet the
qualifications for bonuses under (a)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection
for less than one full school year receive bonuses on a pro-rated
basis.
(d) For purposes of this subsection (38), "schools where at least
70 percent of the student headcount enrollment is eligible for the
federal free and reduced price lunch program" shall be defined as: (i)
For the 2007-08 and the 2008-09 school years, schools in which the
prior year percentage of students eligible for the federal free and
reduced price lunch program was at least 70 percent; and (ii) in the
2008-09 school year, any school that met the criterion in (d)(i) of
this subsection in the 2007-08 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,520,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,139,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,243,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $179,902,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $827.37 per
eligible bilingual student in the 2007-08 school year and $838.44 in
the 2008-09 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to 1.5 percent of the school
year allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section,
and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, solely for the central provision of assessments as
provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are
provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual
program students.
(5) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I Part C and English
language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III
of the elementary and secondary education act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,146,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,202,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,660,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,716,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $534,724,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $200.59 per funded student for the
2007-08 school year and $203.50 per funded student for the 2008-09
school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided under
section 504 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the following as appropriate:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12
for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch in the prior school year; and
(ii) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch exceeded forty percent, subtract forty percent from
the district's percentage and multiply the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school
year.
(d) In addition to amounts allocated in (b) and (c) of this
subsection, an additional amount shall be allocated to a school
district for each school year in which the district's allocation is
less than the amount the district received for the general fund -- state
learning assistance program allocation in the 2004-05 school year. The
amount of the allocation in this section shall be sufficient to
maintain the 2004-05 school year allocation.
(2) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided solely for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left
behind act of 2001.
(3) Small school districts are encouraged to make the most
efficient use of the funding provided by using regional educational
service district cooperatives to hire staff, provide professional
development activities, and implement reading and mathematics programs
consistent with research-based guidelines provided by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund -- state or education legacy trust
funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(5) School districts are encouraged to coordinate the use of these
funds with other federal, state, and local sources to serve students
who are below grade level and to make efficient use of resources in
meeting the needs of students with the greatest academic deficits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- PROMOTING ACADEMIC SUCCESS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,918,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,192,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,110,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The amounts appropriated in this section are provided solely
for remediation for students who have not met standard in one or more
content areas of the Washington assessment of student learning in the
spring of their tenth grade year or on a subsequent retake. The funds
may be used for extended learning activities, including summer school,
before and after school, Saturday classes, skill seminars, assessment
preparation, and in-school or out- of-school tutoring. Extended
learning activities may occur on the school campus, via the internet,
or at other locations and times that meet student needs. Funds
allocated under this section shall not be considered basic education
funding. Amounts allocated under this section shall fund new extended
learning opportunities, and shall not supplant funding for existing
programs and services.
(2) School district allocations for promoting academic success
programs shall be calculated as follows:
(a) Allocations shall be made to districts only for students
actually served in a promoting academic success program.
(b) A portion of the district's annual student units shall be the
number of content area assessments (reading, writing, and mathematics)
on which eleventh and twelfth grade students were more than one
standard error of measurement from meeting standard on the WASL in
their most recent attempt to pass the WASL.
(c) The other portion of the district's annual student units shall
be the number of content area assessments (reading, writing, and
mathematics) on which eleventh and twelfth grade students were less
than one standard error of measurement from meeting standard but did
not meet standard on the WASL in their most recent attempt to pass the
WASL.
(d) Districts with at least one but less than 20 student units
combining the student units generated from (b) and (c) of this
subsection shall be counted as having 20 student units for the purposes
of the allocations in (e) and (f)(i) of this subsection.
(e) Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries and
benefits shall be determined using formula-generated staff units
calculated pursuant to this subsection. Ninety-four hours of
certificated instructional staff units are allocated per 13.0 student
units as calculated under (a) of this subsection and thirty-four hours
of certificated instructional staff units are allocated per 13.0
student units as calculated under (b) of this subsection. Allocations
for salaries and benefits for the staff units calculated under this
subsection shall be calculated in the same manner as provided under
section 503 of this act. Salary and benefit increase funding for staff
units generated under this section is included in section 504 of this
act.
(f) The following additional allocations are provided per student
unit, as calculated in (a) and (b) of this subsection:
(i) $12.80 in school year 2007-08 and $13.07 in school year 2008-09
for maintenance, operations, and transportation;
(ii) $12.29 in school year 2007-08 and $12.55 in school year 2008-09 for pre- and post-remediation assessments;
(iii) $17.41 in school year 2007-08 and $17.77 in school year 2008-09 per reading remediation student unit;
(iv) $8.19 in school year 2007-08 and $8.36 in school year 2008-09
per mathematics remediation student unit; and
(v) $8.19 in school year 2007-08 and $8.36 in school year 2008-09
per writing remediation student unit.
(g) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute
school year allocations according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.
(3) By November 15th of each year, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and to the office of financial management on the use of
these funds in the prior school year, including the types of assistance
selected by students, the number of students receiving each type of
assistance, and the impact on WASL test scores.
(4) School districts may carry over from one year to the next up to
20 percent of funds allocated under this program; however, carryover
funds shall be expended for promoting academic success programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $423,414,000
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $446,357,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $869,771,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $450.00 per FTE student for the 2007-08 school year and $459.45 per FTE student for the 2008-09 school year.
For the purposes of this section, FTE student refers to the annual
average full-time equivalent enrollment of the school district in
grades kindergarten through twelve for the prior school year, as
reported to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by
August 31st of the previous school year.
(2) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection (2).
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute the
school year allocation according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION. (1) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act, except as
expressly provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2008, unless
specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director
of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may
transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2008 among
the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a
specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment;
employee compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special
education programs; institutional education programs; transitional
bilingual programs; and learning assistance programs.
(3) The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving
any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519 K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR
ADJUSTMENTS. State general fund and state student achievement fund
appropriations provided to the superintendent of public instruction for
state entitlement programs in the public schools in this part V of this
act may be expended as needed by the superintendent for adjustments to
apportionment for prior fiscal periods. Recoveries of state general
fund moneys from school districts and educational service districts for
a prior fiscal period shall be made as reductions in apportionment
payments for the current fiscal period and shall be shown as prior year
adjustments on apportionment reports for the current period. Such
recoveries shall not be treated as revenues to the state, but as a
reduction in the amount expended against the appropriation for the
current fiscal period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 520 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION. Appropriations made in this act to the office of
superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 The appropriations in sections 603 through
609 of this act are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.
(2)(a) The salary increases provided or referenced in this
subsection and described in sections 603 and 910 through 943 of this
act shall be the only allowable salary increases provided at
institutions of higher education, excluding increases associated with
normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and
professional staff retention, and excluding increases associated with
employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1).
(b) For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1), salary
increases will be in accordance with the applicable collective
bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to
any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range
maximum for the class to which the employee's position is allocated.
(c) Each institution of higher education receiving appropriations
for salary increases under sections 604 through 609 of this act may
provide additional salary increases from other sources to instructional
and research faculty, exempt professional staff, teaching and research
assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW
28B.16.015. Any additional salary increase granted under the authority
of this subsection (2)(c) shall not be included in an institution's
salary base for future state funding. It is the intent of the
legislature that general fund -- state support for an institution shall
not increase during the current or any future biennium as a result of
any salary increases authorized under this subsection (2)(c).
(d) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other
state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from
institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes.
Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the
department of personnel for inclusion in the department's data
warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the
department of personnel for use by the reporting institutions,
including provisions for common job classifications and common
definitions of full-time equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts,
number of contract months, and funding sources shall be consistently
reported for employees under contract.
(3) The technical colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess
of the fiscal growth factor to conform with the percentage increase in
community college operating fees.
(4) The tuition fees, as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW, charged to
full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education for
the 2007-08 and 2008-09 academic years, other than the summer term,
shall be adjusted by the governing boards of the state universities,
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state board
for community and technical colleges. Tuition fees may be increased in
excess of the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.
For the 2007-08 academic year, the governing boards of the research
universities may implement an increase no greater than five percent
over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate students
for the 2006-07 academic year. The regional universities and The
Evergreen State College may implement an increase no greater than five
percent over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate
students for the 2006-07 academic year. The state board for community
and technical colleges may implement an increase no greater than two
percent over tuition and fees charged to full-time resident students
for the 2006-07 academic year.
For the 2008-09 academic year, the governing boards of the research
universities may implement an increase no greater than five percent
over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate students
for the 2007-08 academic year. The regional universities and The
Evergreen State College may implement an increase no greater than five
percent over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate
students for the 2007-08 academic year. The state board for community
and technical colleges may implement an increase no greater than two
percent over tuition and fees charged to full-time resident students
for the 2007-08 academic year.
In addition to the tuition authorization provided under this
subsection, amounts appropriated in this budget provide an amount
approximately equal to a two percent increase in tuition for each of
the research universities, and an amount approximately equal to a one
percent tuition increase per academic year for the state board for
community and technical colleges.
(5) For the 2007-09 biennium, the governing boards and the state
board may adjust full-time operating fees for factors that may include
time of day and day of week, as well as delivery method and campus, to
encourage full use of the state's educational facilities and resources.
(6) Technical colleges may increase their building fee in excess of
the fiscal growth factor until parity is reached with the community
colleges.
(7) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW
28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or
a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund
appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue
foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.
(8) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act are
authorized to increase summer term tuition in excess of the fiscal
growth factor during the 2007-09 biennium. Tuition levels increased
pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed the per credit hour rate
calculated from the academic year tuition levels adopted under this
act.
(9) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, community and technical colleges
are authorized to increase services and activities fee charges in
excess of the fiscal growth factor during the 2007-09 biennium. The
services and activities fee charges increased pursuant to this
subsection shall not exceed the maximum level authorized by the state
board for community and technical colleges.
(10) The appropriations in this part 6 for nonrepresented
institution of higher education employee compensation adjustments are
provided solely for:
(a) Across the Board Adjustments.
(i) Appropriations are provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective September 1, 2007, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80,
41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except the certificated employees of the
state schools for the deaf and blind and employees of community and
technical colleges covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No.
732. Also included are employees in the Washington management service,
and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the director of
personnel.
(ii) Appropriations are provided for a 2.0% salary increase
effective September 1, 2008, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80,
41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except for the certificated employees of the
state schools of the deaf and blind and employees of community and
technical colleges covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No.
732. Also included are employees in the Washington management service,
and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the director of
personnel.
(b) Salary Survey.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey, for
job classes more than 25% below market rates and affected classes.
(c) Classification Consolidation.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's phase 4 job class
consolidation and revisions under chapter 41.80 RCW.
(d) Agency Request Consolidation.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's agency request job
class consolidation and reclassification plan. This implementation
fully satisfies the conditions specified in the settlement agreement of
WPEA v State/Shroll v State.
(e) Additional Pay Step.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for a
new pay step L for those who have been in step K for at least one year.
(f) Retain Fiscal Year 2007 Pay Increase.
For all classified state employees, except those represented by a
bargaining unit under chapter 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except
for the certificated employees of the state schools of the deaf and
blind and employees of community and technical colleges covered by the
provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732, funding is provided for
continuation of the 1.6% salary increase that was provided during
fiscal year 2007. Also included are employees in the Washington
management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the
director of personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 (1) The appropriations in sections 602
through 609 of this act provide state general fund support for full-time equivalent student enrollments at each institution of higher
education. Listed below are the annual full-time equivalent student
enrollments by institutions assumed in this act.

2007-08
Annual
Average 2008-09
Annual
Average

University of Washington

Main campus 33,722 34,077

Bothell branch 1,760 1,980

Tacoma branch 2,109 2,349

Washington State University

Main campus 19,077 19,172

Tri-Cities branch 780 840

Vancouver branch 1,888 2,113

Central Washington University 9,022 9,072

Eastern Washington University 9,046 9,304

The Evergreen State College 4,165 4,213

Western Washington University 11,897 12,165

State Board for Community and Technical Colleges 135,277 137,707

(2) For the state universities, the number of full-time equivalent
student enrollments enumerated in this section for the branch campuses
are the minimum required enrollment levels for those campuses. At the
start of an academic year, the governing board of a state university
may transfer full-time equivalent student enrollments among campuses.
Intent notice shall be provided to the office of financial management
and reassignment of funded enrollment is contingent upon satisfying
data needs of the forecast division who is responsible to track and
monitor state-supported college enrollment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $642,117,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $627,017,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,068,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,436,002,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,612,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand general enrollments by 1,120
student FTEs in academic year 2008 and an additional 1,000 student FTEs
in academic year 2009.
(2) $15,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand high-demand enrollments by
500 student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and 500 student FTEs in fiscal
year 2009. The programs expanded shall include, but are not limited
to, mathematics and health sciences. The state board shall provide
data to the office of financial management that is required to track
changes in enrollments, graduations, and the employment of college
graduates related to state investments in high-demand enrollment
programs. Data may be provided through the public centralized higher
education enrollment system or through an alternative means agreed to
by the institutions and the office of financial management.
(3) $1,995,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand early childhood education
programs with a focus on early math and science and awareness by 100
student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and an additional 150 student FTEs in
2009. The board shall provide data to the office of financial
management regarding math and science enrollments, graduations, and
employment of college graduates related to state investments in math
and science programs. Data may be provided through the centralized
higher education enrollment system or through an alternative means
agreed to by the institutions and the office of financial management.
(4) $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in
chapter 226, Laws of 1993 (employment and training for unemployed
workers). Funding is provided to support up to 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in each fiscal year.
(5) $5,775,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for basic skills education enrollments
at community and technical colleges. Budgeted enrollment levels shall
increase by 250 student FTEs per year.
(6) $7,500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to increase salaries and related
benefits for part-time faculty. It is intended that part-time faculty
salaries will increase relative to full-time faculty salaries after all
salary increases are collectively bargained.
(7) $11,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $11,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1096 (post-secondary opportunities). The
state board shall seek additional private sector involvement and
support for the opportunity grants program. If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, $7,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $7,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 shall lapse and remaining amounts in
this subsection shall be used for an opportunity grant program to
provide grants covering community and technical college tuition and
fees for up to 45 credits and books or other materials to be awarded to
eligible students. Program participants must earn credentials or
certificates in industry-defined occupations with a need for skilled
employees.
(8) $1,925,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase enrollment levels in
the integrated basic education, skills, and language program (I-BEST)
by 250 student FTEs per year.
(9) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the transitions math project.
This phase of work shall include the establishment of a single math
placement test to be used at colleges and universities statewide.
(10) $1,540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,080,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase enrollment in
apprenticeship training programs by 200 student FTEs in each fiscal
year.
(11) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the community and technical college system by 1,700
students each year. TRIO eligible students include low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities. The state board
for community and technical colleges shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 65% for TRIO students and other low-income and
first-generation students served through this appropriation.
(12)(a) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures and targets in 2006. By July 31, 2007,
the state board for community and technical colleges and the higher
education coordinating board shall revisit these targets based on
per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In addition,
the board shall compile comparable data from peer institutions in the
eight "global challenge states" identified in the Washington learns
study.
(b) The targets agreed to by the state board and the higher
education coordinating board are enumerated as follows:
(i) Increase the percentage and number of academic students who are
eligible to transfer to baccalaureate institutions to 18,700;
(ii) Increase the percentage and number of students prepared for
work to 23,490; and
(iii) Increase the percentage and number of basic skills students
who demonstrate substantive skill gain by 22,850.
The state board for community and technical colleges shall report
their progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of
this section to the higher education coordinating board prior to
November 1, 2009.
(13) $452,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for start-up and planning funds for two
applied baccalaureate degree programs at community and technical
colleges of which one degree program must be at a technical college.
The applied baccalaureate degrees shall be specifically designed for
individuals who hold associate of applied science degrees, or
equivalent, in order to maximize application of their technical course
credits toward the applied baccalaureate degree.
(14) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for faculty salary increments and
associated benefits and may be used in combination with salary and
benefit savings from faculty turnover to provide salary increments and
associated benefits for faculty who qualify through professional
development and training. To the extent general salary increase
funding is used to pay faculty increments, the general salary increase
shall be reduced by the same amount. The state board shall determine
the method of allocating to the community and technical colleges the
appropriations granted for academic employee increments, provided that
the amount of the appropriation attributable to the proportionate share
of the part-time faculty salary base shall only be accessible for
part-time faculty.
(15) $504,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for 80 student FTEs in the existing four
applied baccalaureate degree programs at community and technical
colleges as authorized in RCW 28B.50.
(16) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
develop and implement a comprehensive salary study of the community and
technical college system. The study shall produce data to support a
long-term strategy to pay community and technical college faculty and
professional employees salaries that are commensurate with their
responsibilities, to improve recruitment and increase retention of
staff, and to maintain market competitiveness and local flexibility.
The state board for community and technical college will ensure that
the study address full-time and part-time employee compensation,
including increments. The study shall be completed by June 30, 2008.
The state board for community and technical colleges shall provide
copies of the study to the office of financial management and relevant
fiscal and policy committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,026,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $399,268,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,950,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,621,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,449,000
Geoduck Aquaculture Research Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $836,414,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $14,562,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand general enrollments by 565
student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and an additional 565 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2009. Of these, 105 FTEs in 2008 and 105 FTEs in 2009 must
be graduate student FTEs.
(2) $9,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand math and science
undergraduate enrollments by 250 student FTEs in each fiscal year. The
programs expanded shall include mathematics, engineering, and the
physical sciences. The university shall provide data to the office of
financial management that is required to track changes in enrollments,
graduations, and the employment of college graduates related to state
investments in math and science programs. Data may be provided through
the public centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(3) $2,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support for the
department of global health.
(4) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the University of Washington
office of technology transfer's gap fund. The funds shall be used to
assist bringing research discoveries to market sooner, and to boost the
licensing revenue of the university.
(5) $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
Washington state academy of sciences, authorized by chapter 70.220 RCW.
(6) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
William D. Ruckelshaus center.
(7) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at the
University of Washington by 250 students each year. TRIO students
include low-income, first-generation, and college students with
disabilities. The student support services program shall report
annually to the office of financial management and the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the retention and
completion rates of students served through this appropriation.
Retention rates shall continue to exceed 85% for TRIO students in this
program.
(8) $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to establish the state
climatologist position.
(9) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to
identify and carry out, or otherwise appropriately support, a process
to identify issues that have led to conflict around land use
requirements and property rights, and explore practical and effective
ways to resolve or reduce that conflict. A report with conclusions and
recommendations shall be submitted to the governor and the chairs of
the appropriate committees of the legislature by no later than October
31, 2007.
(10) $3,506,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand health sciences capacity at
the University of Washington. Consistent with the medical and dental
school extension program appropriations at Washington State University
and Eastern Washington University, funding is provided to expand
classes at the University of Washington. Medical and dental students
shall take the first year of courses for this program at the Riverpoint
campus in Spokane and the second year of courses at the University of
Washington in Seattle.
(11) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, check points, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall revisit these targets
based on per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In
addition, the board shall compile comparable data from peer
institutions in the eight "global challenge states" identified in the
Washington Learns study.
The check points agreed to by the board and the University of
Washington are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the combined number of baccalaureate degrees conferred
per year at all campuses to 8,850;
(b) Increase the combined number of high-demand baccalaureate
degrees conferred at all campuses per year to 1,380;
(c) Increase the combined number of advanced degrees conferred per
year at all campuses to 3,610;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 74.7%;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 76.0%;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 93.0%;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 92% at the
Seattle campus and 92.5% at the Bothell and Tacoma campuses, measured
by the percent of admitted students who graduate within 125% of the
credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
subsection.
The University of Washington shall report their progress and
ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the
higher education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(12) $165,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $165,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan, Puget Sound partnership early
implementation items, and the agency action items UW-01 and UW-02. The
department shall consult and sign performance agreements with the
leadership council of the Puget Sound partnership created by Z-0369/07
regarding these items.
(13) $1,672,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,672,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operations and maintenance of
the University of Washington Research and Technology building.
(14) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for the
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the institute for learning and
brain sciences.
(15) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for costs associated with the
initial establishment of a family practice residency program in
southeastern Washington associated with the University of Washington
family medicine residency network. Collaborative academic planning may
begin by June 1, 2007, with the University of Washington to investigate
inclusion as an accreditation council for graduate medical education -accredited residency within the network. The residency program shall
be established and operated through a cooperative relationship between
a not-for-profit hospital and a federally qualified community and
migrant health center located in southeastern Washington. Once
operational, the family practice residency program shall be supported
exclusively by third party payments for health services provided
through the program. The residency program shall be designed to
provide residency experience in rural communities with the goal of
recruiting and retaining primary care physicians in rural communities
in southeastern Washington.
(16) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the Burke Museum to support
science and social science educational programs including public
outreach programs, new educational programs and resources, web-based
interactive learning experiences, teacher training, and traveling
educational opportunities.
(17) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the purpose of implementing Substitute
House Bill No. 1394 (medical training). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1242 (voluntary adult family certification).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(19) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(20)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the University of Washington
school of law loan repayment assistance program endowment fund. The
University of Washington shall conduct fund-raising activities to
increase private sector support of the endowment program and $500,000
of the appropriation in this subsection is contingent on a private
sector match. Funds in the law school repayment assistance program
endowment fund shall be used to provide graduates who pursue careers in
public interest legal positions with payment assistance toward their
student loan debt.
(b) The University of Washington law school shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2010, information about the loan repayment
assistance program. The report shall contain at least the following
information:
(i) A financial summary of the endowment fund;
(ii) The number of individuals receiving assistance from the
program and information related to the positions in which these
individuals are working;
(iii) Any available information regarding the effect of the loan
repayment assistance program on student recruitment and enrollment; and
repayment assistance; and
(iv) Other information the school of law deems relevant to the
evaluation of the program.
(c) In its rules for administering the program, the school of law
must make provision for cases of hardship or exceptional circumstances,
as defined by the school of law. Examples of such circumstances
include, but are not limited to, family leave, medical leave, illness
or disability, and loss of employment.
(d) The loan repayment assistance program must be available to
otherwise eligible graduates of the law school who work in positions
with nonprofit organizations or government agencies. Such positions
must be located within Washington state. Government agencies shall
include the various branches of the military.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $231,985,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,410,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,243,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $515,088,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,244,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand general enrollments by 250
student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and an additional 260 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2009.
(2) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for research and commercialization
in bio-products and bio-fuels. Of this amount, $2,000,000 shall be
targeted at the development of new crops to be used in the bio-products
facility at WSU-Tri-Cities. The remainder shall be used for research
into new bio-products created from agricultural waste to be conducted
in the Tri-Cities in a joint program between Washington State
University and Pacific Northwest national laboratories.
(3) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at Washington
State University by 250 students each year. TRIO students include
low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities.
The student support services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 85% for TRIO students in this program.
(4) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington State
University office of technology transfer's Cougar gap fund. The funds
shall be used to assist bringing research discoveries to market sooner,
and to boost the licensing revenue of the university.
(5) $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
Washington state academy of sciences, under chapter 70.220 RCW.
(6) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
William D. Ruckelshaus center.
(7) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to
identify and carry out, or otherwise appropriately support, a process
to identify issues that have led to conflict around land use
requirements and property rights, and explore practical and effective
ways to resolve or reduce that conflict. A report with conclusions and
recommendations shall be submitted to the governor and the chairs of
the appropriate committees of the legislature by no later than October
31, 2007.
(8) $9,551,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand health sciences offerings in
Spokane. Washington State University shall enroll 30 student FTEs in
nursing programs in fiscal year 2008 and 5 additional FTEs in nursing
programs in fiscal year 2009. In addition, WSU shall enroll 20 student
FTEs in fiscal year 2009 in a University of Washington medical school
extension program at the Riverpoint campus of WSU in Spokane. Students
shall take the first year of courses for this program at the Riverpoint
campus in Spokane, and shall do their clinical rotations and other
upper level training in the inland northwest.
(9) $484,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for start-up funds for the
Vancouver campus-based electrical engineering program.
(10) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall revisit these targets
based on per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In
addition, the board shall compile comparable data from peer
institutions in the eight "global challenge states" identified in the
Washington learns study.
The checkpoints agreed to by the board and the Washington State
University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the combined number of baccalaureate degrees conferred
per year at all campuses to 4,170;
(b) Increase the combined number of high-demand baccalaureate
degrees conferred at all campuses per year to 630;
(c) Increase the combined number of advanced degrees conferred per
year at all campuses to 1,090;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 63.2%;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 65.4%;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 84.8%;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 92%,
measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate within 125%
of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
The Washington State University shall report their progress and
ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the
higher education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(11) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(12) $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan, Puget Sound partnership early
implementation items, and agency action item WSU-01. The department
shall consult and sign performance agreements with the leadership
council of the Puget Sound partnership created by Z-0369/07 regarding
these items.
(13) $1,040,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 and $2,080,000 of the education
legacy trust account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 are
provided solely to expand math and science enrollments by 230 student
FTEs in each fiscal year, of which 15 FTEs in each fiscal year must be
graduate enrollments. The programs expanded shall include mathematics,
engineering, and the physical sciences. Fifty student FTEs in each
year will be shifted from general enrollments to high-demand, high-cost
fields, and thus do not affect the enrollment levels listed in section
602 of this act. The university shall provide data to the office of
financial management regarding math and science enrollments,
graduations, and the employment of college graduates related to state
investments in math and science programs. Data may be provided through
the public centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(14) $4,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $4,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support the unified agriculture
initiative at Washington State University. Funds are provided for:
(a) $3,000,000 for competitive agriculture grant funds. Of this
amount $400,000 is provided for biological intensive and organic
agriculture grants;
(b) $1,600,000 for operating and program support for the
university's research and extension centers; and
(c) $4,900,000 for positions to fill research gaps in the
development of value-added agricultural products and economically and
environmentally sustainable food production.
(15) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2246
(deaf and hearing impaired). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,019,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,800,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,793,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,758,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $118,370,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,475,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand general enrollments by 50
student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and an additional 200 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2009. Of these, 50 FTEs in 2009 must be graduate student
FTEs.
(2) $1,168,500 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand high-demand undergraduate
enrollments by 50 student FTEs in each fiscal year. The programs
expanded shall include, but are not limited to, mathematics,
engineering, and health sciences. The university shall provide data to
the office of financial management that is required to track changes in
enrollments, graduations, and the employment of college graduates
related to state investments in high-demand enrollment programs. Data
may be provided through the public centralized higher education
enrollment system or through an alternative means agreed to by the
institutions and the office of financial management.
(3) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at Eastern
Washington University by 250 students each year. TRIO students include
low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities.
The student support services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 85% for TRIO students in this program.
(4) $1,021,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the RIDE program. The program
shall enroll eight student FTEs in the University of Washington School
of Dentistry in fiscal year 2009. Students shall take the first year
of courses for this program at the Riverpoint campus in Spokane, and
their second and third years at the University of Washington School of
Dentistry.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall revisit these targets
based on per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In
addition, the board shall compile comparable data from peer
institutions in the eight "global challenge states" identified in the
Washington learns study.
The checkpoints agreed to by the board and the Eastern Washington
University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 2035;
(b) Increase the number of high-demand baccalaureate degrees
conferred per year to 405;
(c) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 550;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 50.0%;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 61.0%;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 76.0%;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 81.0%,
measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate within 125%
of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
Eastern Washington University shall report their progress and
ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the
higher education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(6) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,479,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,055,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,770,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,330,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $118,634,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $750,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand general graduate enrollment
by 50 student FTEs in fiscal year 2009.
(2) $1,623,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely to expand general
enrollments by 106 FTE students, including business program
enrollments.
(3) $1,944,900 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely to expand math
and science enrollments by 139 FTE students. The university shall
provide data to the office of financial management regarding math and
science enrollments, graduations, and employment of college graduates
related to state investments in math and science enrollment programs.
Data may be provided through the centralized higher education
enrollment system or through an alternative means agreed to by the
institutions and the office of financial management.
(4) $1,324,300 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand high-demand undergraduate
enrollments by 85 student FTEs in fiscal year 2008. The programs
expanded shall include, but are not limited to, bilingual education and
information technology. The university shall provide data to the
office of financial management that is required to track changes in
enrollments, graduations, and the employment of college graduates
related to state investments in high-demand enrollment programs. Data
may be provided through the public centralized higher education
enrollment system or through an alternative means agreed to by the
institutions and the office of financial management.
(5) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at Central
Washington University by 250 students each year. TRIO students include
low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities.
The student support services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 85% for TRIO students in this program.
(6) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall revisit these targets
based on per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In
addition, the board shall compile comparable data from peer
institutions in the eight "global challenge states" identified in the
Washington learns study.
The checkpoints agreed to by the board and the Central Washington
University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 2,050;
(b) Increase the number of high-demand baccalaureate degrees
conferred per year to 49;
(c) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 196;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 51.1%;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 72.3%;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 78.2%;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 86.6%,
measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate within 125%
of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
Central Washington University shall report their progress and
ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the
higher education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(7) $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1497 (CWU fee waiver). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,740,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,762,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,183,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,685,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $560,880 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand upper division math and
science enrollments by 22 student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and 28
student FTEs in fiscal year 2009.
(2) $300,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for 20 student
FTE graduate enrollments in the masters in education program.
(3) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at The
Evergreen State College by 250 students each year. TRIO students
include low-income, first-generation, and college students with
disabilities. The student support services program shall report
annually to the office of financial management and the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the retention and
completion rates of students served through this appropriation.
Retention rates shall continue to exceed 80% for students served in
this program, with a goal of reaching a retention rate in excess of
85%.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to conduct a field study regarding teacher
preparation, training, and coordinated instructional support strategies
related to effective classroom teacher practices that help students,
with a first language other than English, acquire academic English
skills. Participating schools and school districts shall be among
those currently implementing emerging best practices in these areas.
This study will result in recommendations regarding topics for
inclusion in teacher preparation programs, content of effective
professional development, and practices for supporting instruction in
non-English language learning classes.
(5) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the labor center at The
Evergreen State College.
(6) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the institute for public policy to
conduct a study to determine state policy options regarding the role of
higher education institutions in developing and marketing intellectual
property and potential state revenue opportunities. A report is due to
the legislature July 1, 2008.
(7) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the college and the board shall revisit these targets
based on per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In
addition, the board shall compile comparable data from peer
institutions in the eight "global challenge states" identified in the
Washington learns study.
The checkpoints agreed to by the board and The Evergreen State
College are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 1182;
(b) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 92;
(c) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 57.0%;
(d) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 72.8%;
(e) Improve the freshman retention rate to 73.9%;
(f) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 97.0%,
measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate within 125%
of the credits required for a degree; and
(g) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
The Evergreen State College shall report their progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(8) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(9) $174,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement provisions of Substitute
House Bill No. 1472 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $191,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the institute for public
policy to continue studies funded in previous biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,773,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,980,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,364,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,117,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $408,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand math and science enrollments
by 8 student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and an additional 8 student FTEs
in fiscal year 2009. Programs expanded include cell and molecular
biology. The university shall provide data to the office of financial
management regarding math and science enrollments, graduations, and the
employment of college graduates related to state investments in math
and science enrollment programs. Data may be provided through the
public centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(2) $4,552,200 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand general enrollments by 150
student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and an additional 250 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2009. Programs expanded include human services and
teaching English to speakers of other languages. Of these, 24 FTEs in
each fiscal year must be graduate student FTEs.
(3) $270,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand high demand enrollments by
10 FTE students in fiscal year 2008 and an additional 10 FTE students
in fiscal year 2009. Programs expanded include early childhood
education. The university shall provide data to the office of
financial management regarding high-demand enrollments, graduations,
and employment of college graduates related to state investments in
high demand enrollment programs. Data may be provided through the
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(4) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of low-income and
first-generation students served in the student outreach services
program at Western Washington University by 500 students over the
biennium. The student outreach services program shall report annually
to the office of financial management and the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature on the retention and completion
rates of students served through this appropriation. Retention rates
shall continue to exceed 80% for students served in this program, with
a goal of reaching a retention rate in excess of 85%.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall revisit these targets
based on per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In
addition, the board shall compile comparable data from peer
institutions in the eight "global challenge states" identified in the
Washington learns study.
The checkpoints agreed to by the board and the Western Washington
University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 2,968;
(b) Increase the number of high-demand baccalaureate degrees
conferred per year to 371;
(c) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 375;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 62.8%;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 61.4%;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 85.0%;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 95.6%,
measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate within 125%
of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
Western Washington University shall report their progress and
ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the
higher education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(6) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, the university shall
report progress towards developing and implementing outreach programs
designed to increase awareness of higher education to K-12 populations
to the higher education coordinating board by October 1st of each year.
(7) $371,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $942,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the advanced materials science
and engineering program. The program shall develop the advanced
materials science and engineering center for research, teaching, and
development which will offer a minor degree in materials science and
engineering beginning in the fall 2009.
(8) $444,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $611,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for development of the biomedical
research activities in the neuroscience program. The program shall
link biology and chemistry curriculum to prepare students for
biomedical research positions in academia and industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,460,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,347,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,315,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,122,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,465,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,327,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to collaborate with the state
board for community and technical colleges in developing a statewide,
web-based advising system. The system shall assist prospective and
enrolled students in charting the most efficient means of achieving
their degree goals. The two boards will jointly implement this system
in close collaboration with the institutions of higher education in
Washington.
(2) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $169,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to maintain and update a
scholarship clearinghouse that lists every public and private
scholarship available to Washington students. The higher education
coordinating board shall develop a web-based interface for students and
families as well as a common application for these scholarships.
(3) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the higher education
coordinating board to implement a capital facility and technology
capacity study which will compare the 10-year enrollment projections
with the capital facility requirements and technology application and
hardware capacity needed to deliver higher education programs for the
period 2009-2019. The higher education coordinating board shall:
(a) Develop the study in collaboration with the state board for
community and technical colleges, four-year universities and the
Washington independent colleges;
(b) Determine the 10-year capital facilities and technology
application and hardware investment needed by location to deliver
higher education programs to additional student FTE;
(c) Estimate operational and capital costs of the additional
capacity; and
(d) Report findings to the legislature on October 1, 2008.
(4) The legislature intends to develop a higher education data
system that enables oversight of the public's interest in student
access, retention, learning, and success as well as the efficiency and
effectiveness of higher education. This system shall utilize student-level data while also protecting student privacy through the use of a
unique student identifier linked to the K-12 system. The higher
education coordinating board, in collaboration with the state board for
community and technical colleges, office of the superintendent of
public instruction, council of presidents, office of financial
management, the joint legislative audit and review committee, and any
other necessary entities, shall convene a work group and develop a work
plan for a statewide data system consisting of, but not limited to, the
following attributes:
(a) Privacy-protected student-level data of applicants to
institutions that award higher education credit in Washington;
(b) Application and acceptance information to higher education
institutions, fields of study, and programs;
(c) Student class placement, courses attempted, and credits and
grades awarded;
(d) K-12 and college standardized exam scores;
(e) Higher education degrees and certificates awarded; and
(f) Student-level financial aid data.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,529,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $167,042,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,085,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,274,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,930,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $154,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $154,762,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, and $100,274,000 of the education legacy trust--state appropriation are provided solely for the financial aid programs
managed by the higher education coordinating board. The state need
grant, state work study program, Washington scholars, and the
Washington award for vocational excellence will all increase grant
awards to hold qualified students harmless from the tuition increases
assumed in this budget. Furthermore, funding is provided within this
appropriation to permit less-than-halftime students to be eligible for
the grant if legislation is passed in 2007 authorizing this change.
After April 1st of each fiscal year, uncommitted funds from the annual
appropriation for these programs may be transferred to the state work
study or educational opportunity grant program.
(2) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to expand the gaining early
awareness and readiness for undergraduate programs project to up to 30
additional school districts.
(3) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for one-time funding for scholarship
credits earned by students participating in the gaining early awareness
and readiness for undergraduate programs. This amount closes a
shortfall in the program caused by stronger than forecasted student
demand.
(4) $14,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the purchase of GET shares to be
held in trust by the higher education coordinating board in order to
endow the GET ready for math and science program, should legislation
creating this program be enacted in 2007. The board shall be the owner
of the GET units. The board is authorized to deposit funds for this
purpose in the state education trust fund until April 30, 2008. Up to
3% of these amounts may be used by the college success foundation for
program administration and notification of students who are eligible to
apply for these scholarships.
(5) $1,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to encourage more students to teach
secondary mathematics and science. $500,000 of this amount is provided
to increase the future teacher scholarship and conditional loan program
by 35 students per year. $500,000 of this amount is provided to
support state work study positions for students to intern in secondary
math and science classrooms.
(6) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2082 (field of dreams) to implement
the field of dreams program. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $1,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1131 (passport to college) to support the
passport to college promise program. If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $2,800,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation in this section is provided solely to implement Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1179 (state need grant). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,347,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,323,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,938,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,608,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $53,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $53,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to improve
the oversight of private vocational and career schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,658,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,748,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $217,546,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $343,958,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $37,025,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $46,543,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $10,284,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for early childhood education and
assistance program services. Within these amounts, funding is provided
to increase the number of children receiving education by 2,000 slots
and for a vendor rate increase of 8 percent in fiscal year 2008 and 7.2
percent in fiscal year 2009.
(2) Within the administrative amounts provided for the early
childhood education and assistance program, the department shall
develop recommendations for expanding the program to serve low-income
and at-risk children from birth to age three. The recommendations
shall address outcomes, scope of need, eligibility criteria including
income, and an array of age-appropriate services for children and their
families aimed at improving child development, education, health, and
family outcomes. The department shall report its recommendations to
the appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 1,
2007.
(3) $1,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the child care career and wage
ladder program created by chapter 507, Laws of 2005.
(4) $2,031,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,661,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally
relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers. As these
supports are provided, the agency shall evaluate their effectiveness
and report outcomes to the governor and the legislature by October
2008.
(5) $1,496,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $5,984,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to pilot a quality rating and
improvement system. Of this amount, funding is provided both to
implement a tiered reimbursement system based on a rating scale and to
fund supports for child care providers that will help them move up the
rating scale.
(6) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a child care consultation
pilot program linking child care providers with evidence-based and best
practice resources regarding caring for infants and young children who
present behavioral concerns.
(7) $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of an early
learning information system. The department shall submit the results
of the 2007 feasibility study to the department of information services
and must receive approval before they may implement the early learning
information system. In approving the feasibility study, the department
of information services shall ensure that the project is feasible,
consistent with the architecture and infrastructure of the state,
consistent with a statewide enterprise view of delivering services, and
that the agency or state will be able to support the system in the
future. The department of information services may require successful
completion of each project phase prior to authorizing the agency to
proceed with the next project phase and may also require quality
assurance plans.
(8) Beginning with the 2007-09 biennium, the department shall be
the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and
development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to
fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration,
and other costs associated with child care subsidies. The department
shall transfer a portion of this grant to the department of social and
health services to partially fund the child care subsidies paid by the
department of social and health services on behalf of the department of
early learning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,740,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,869,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,458,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,067,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,499,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,603,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $232,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,334,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $39,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2246 (deaf and
hearing impaired). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,499,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,382,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $153,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,534,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,239,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,231,000
Vancouver National Historic Reserve Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,581,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $111,000 of the Vancouver national
historic reserve account appropriation is provided solely for
implementation of House Bill No. 1049 (Vancouver historic reserve). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,815,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,887,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,702,000

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $724,362,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $764,561,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,970,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,790,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retire
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,624,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,502,646,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
deposit into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES

State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,553,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,204,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,204,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,961,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,068,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,825,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,332,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,225,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,546,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,854,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL
Disaster Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is for the
purpose of making allocations to the Washington state patrol for fire
mobilizations costs or to the department of natural resources for fire
suppression costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--FIRE CONTINGENCY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account for the purposes
specified in section 705 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,729,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EMERGENCY FUND
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for
the governor's emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any
agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING IMPACT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,188,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,509,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,697,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
distribution to counties to pay for the costs of implementing chapter
176, Laws of 2004, which makes amendments to the special sex offender
sentencing alternative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT -- COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall distribute the
appropriations to the following counties and health districts in the
amounts designated:

Health District FY 2008
FY 2009 FY 2007-09
Biennium

Adams County Health District $30,951 $30,951 $61,902

Asotin County Health District $67,714 $67,714 $135,428

Benton-Franklin Health District $1,165,612 $1,165,612 $2,331,224

Chelan-Douglas Health District $184,761 $184,761 $369,522

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department $141,752 $141,752 $283,504

Southwest Washington Health District $1,084,473 $1,084,473 $2,168,946

Columbia County Health District $40,529 $40,529 $81,058

Cowlitz County Health Department $278,560 $278,560 $557,120

Garfield County Health District $15,028 $15,028 $30,056

Grant County Health District $118,595 $118,595 $237,191

Grays Harbor Health Department $183,870 183,870 $367,740

Island County Health Department $91,892 $91,892 $183,784

Jefferson County Health and Human Services $85,782 $85,782 $171,564

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health $9,531,747 $9,531,747 $19,063,494

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District $554,669 $554,669 $1,109,338

Kittitas County Health Department $92,499 $92,499 $184,998

Klickitat County Health Department $62,402 $62,402 $124,804

Lewis County Health Department $105,801 $105,801 $211,602

Lincoln County Health Department $29,705 $29,705 $59,410

Mason County Department of Health Services $95,988 $95,988 $191,976

Okanogan County Health District $63,458 $63,458 $126,916

Pacific County Health Department $77,427 $77,427 $154,854

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department $2,820,590 $2,820,590 $5,641,180

San Juan County Health and Community Services $37,531 $37,531 $75,062

Skagit County Health Department $223,927 $223,927 $447,854

Snohomish Health District $2,258,207 $2,258,207 $4,516,414

Spokane County Health District $2,101,429 $2,101,429 $4,202,858

Northeast Tri-County Health District $110,454 $110,454 $220,908

Thurston County Health Department $600,419 $600,419 $1,200,838

Wahkiakum County Health Department $13,773 $13,772 $27,545

Walla Walla County-City Health Department $172,062 $172,062 $344,124

Whatcom County Health Department $855,863 $855,863 $1,711,726

Whitman County Health Department $78,733 $78,733 $157,466

Yakima Health District $623,797
$623,797 $1,247,594

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS $24,000,000 $24,000,000 $48,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 BELATED CLAIMS. The agencies and
institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act,
upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of
supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior
fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis beginning July 1,
2007, consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the
judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly
basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,200,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,600,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,600,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,800,000

(3) There is appropriated for state contributions to the state
retirement systems:
(a) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1264
(portability of retirement benefits). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(b) -$800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and -$800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1262
(plan 1 postretirement employment). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,097,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,098,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,195,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for expenditure into the education technology revolving
account for the purpose of covering ongoing operational and equipment
replacement costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in
providing telecommunication services to network participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 FOR THE GOVERNOR -- COMPENSATION--PENSION
RATE CHANGES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $755,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,747,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,000
Judicial Information Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,000
Department of Retirement Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,015,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
be expended solely for pension rate changes for legislative and
judicial employees, as adopted by the pension funding council. The
office of financial management shall allocate the moneys appropriated
in this section in the amounts specified and to the state agencies
specified in LEAP document number H17 - 2007, and adjust appropriation
schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--READING ACHIEVEMENT ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $525,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $525,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,050,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the reading achievement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--WATER QUALITY CAPITAL ACCOUNT
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,135,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the water quality capital account. If House Bill No.
1137 (water quality capital account) is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--WATER POLLUTION CONTROL REVOLVING ACCOUNT
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,027,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,027,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,054,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the water pollution control revolving account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--REINVESTING IN YOUTH ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,423,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,423,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,846,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the reinvesting in youth account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2008. The sum of
one hundred million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on
June 30, 2008, from the total amount of unspent fiscal year 2008 state
general fund appropriations, exclusive of amounts placed into
unallotted status pursuant to section 721 of this act, is appropriated
for the purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this
section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2009. The sum of
one hundred million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on
June 30, 2009, from the total amount of unspent fiscal year 2009 state
general fund appropriations, exclusive of amounts placed into
unallotted status pursuant to section 721 of this act, is appropriated
for the purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this
section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--LOCAL PUBLIC HEALTH FINANCING ACCOUNT
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
deposit into the local public health financing account. If Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1825 (public health funding) is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the appropriation in this section shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722 STATE DESKTOP COMPUTER ENERGY REDUCTION
STRATEGY. The department of information services shall work with state
agencies to evaluate the energy usage of desktop computers, and to
reduce energy usage without affecting existing functions to generate
savings of $1,500,000 from the state general fund. Savings are assumed
to be found through policy changes that include examining existing
power saving functions in computer software, exploring vendor
alternatives, such as software, or by turning off computers when not in
use. From appropriations in this act, the office of financial
management shall reduce general fund--state allotments by $750,000 for
fiscal year 2008 and by $750,000 for fiscal year 2009 to reflect the
savings from the state desktop computer energy reduction strategy. The
allotment reductions shall be placed in unallotted status and remain
unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 723 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE GIFT CENTER ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the legislative gift center account. If Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1896 (legislative gift center) is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the appropriations in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 724 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Of the amount in this section the director
of financial management shall distribute $539,000 to Yakima county and
$61,000 to Grant county for extraordinary criminal justice costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 725 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--FAMILY PROSPERITY ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,763,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
deposit into the family prosperity account. If Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2256 (family prosperity account) is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 726 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--INDEPENDENT YOUTH HOUSING ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the independent youth housing account. If Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1922 (youth housing program) is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 727 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--COMMUNITY PRESERVATION ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the community preservation account. If Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1992 (community preservation authorities) is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the appropriation in this section shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 728 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--VANCOUVER NATIONAL HISTORIC RESERVE ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the Vancouver national historic reserve account. If
House Bill No. 1049 (Vancouver national historic reserve) is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the appropriation in this section shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 729 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CLEAN STREAMS AND CLEAN SKY SUBACCOUNT OF THE ENERGY FREEDOM ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the clean streams and clear sky subaccount of the
energy freedom account. If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
1035 (anaerobic digester power) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
appropriations in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 730 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CLEAN STREAMS AND CLEAN SKY SUBACCOUNT OF THE ENERGY FREEDOM ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the clean streams and clear sky subaccount of the
energy freedom account. If Second Substitute House Bill No. 1036
(renewable energy) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the appropriations
in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 731 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--REGIONAL FISHERIES ENHANCEMENT GROUP ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
condition and limitation: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the regional fisheries enhancement group account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 732 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--OUTDOOR EDUCATION AND RECREATION ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the outdoor education and recreation account. If
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1677 (outdoor education and recreation
program) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the appropriation in this
section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 733 FOR THE GOVERNOR -- WORKERS COMPENSATION
CHANGES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($1,000)
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($2,000)
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($1,000)
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($2,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
be expended solely for changes to workers compensation charges by the
department of labor and industries. The office of financial management
shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts
specified, and to the state agencies specified in OFM document #2007 -R01, dated December 19, 2006, and adjust appropriation schedules
accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 734 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--SHELLFISH CONTAMINATION PREVENTION AND PROTECTION ACCOUNT
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the shellfish contamination prevention and protection
account. If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1595 (shellfish
protection) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the appropriation in this
section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 735 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--GEODUCK AQUACULTURE RESEARCH ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the geoduck aquaculture research account. If Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2220 (shellfish) is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,325,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,656,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,999,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety
and education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,833,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly
funded autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,192,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation
for harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation
for distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,346,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,906,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,359,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for
liquor excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,472,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,399,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for local
government financial assistance distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,272,000
Streamline Sales and Use Tax Account Appropriation
for distribution to local taxing jurisdictions
to mitigate the unintended revenue redistribution
effect of the sourcing law changes . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,600,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $441,549,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,174,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2007-09 biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,449,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2007-09 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal
grazing fees distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,950,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood
control funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal
forest reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,524,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS.
State Treasurer's Service Account: For
transfer to the state general fund,
$10,000,000 for fiscal year 2008 and
$10,000,000 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the water
quality account, $12,200,000 for fiscal
year 2008 and $12,201,000 for fiscal
year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,401,000
Education Legacy Trust Account: For transfer
to the student achievement account for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,714,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance repayment
account, an amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance account,
$3,600,000 for fiscal year 2008 and
$3,600,000 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer
to the job development account, $25,000,000
for fiscal year 2008 and $25,000,000 for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer
to the health services account, in an
amount not to exceed the actual amount
of the annual base payment to the tobacco
settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,915,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the
life sciences discovery fund, in an amount
not to exceed the actual amount of the
strategic contribution supplemental payment
to the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the water
quality account . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,885,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,932,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the tobacco
prevention and control account . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,336,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamline
sales and use tax account for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,600,000

If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5089 (streamlined sales tax) is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, this transfer shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS. The
appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure
authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the
treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as
loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To
the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding
appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed
from the treasury during the 2005-07 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies
shall comply with the following requirements regarding information
systems projects when specifically directed to do so by this act.
(1) Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology
shall be made in the context of its information technology portfolio.
"Information technology portfolio" means a strategic management
approach in which the relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments can be seen and understood, such
that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and
business functions are assessed and understood before implementation;
and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.
(2) Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in
making decisions on matters related to the following:
(a) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(b) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology
in meeting legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;
(c) Assessment of overall information processing performance,
resources, and capabilities;
(d) Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for
the operation of any new systems developed using external resources;
and
(e) Progress toward enabling electronic access to public
information.
(3) Each project will be planned and designed to take optimal
advantage of Internet technologies and protocols. Agencies shall
ensure that the project is in compliance with the architecture,
infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.
(4) The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information
technology projects at the direction of the information services board
and in accordance with published department of information services
policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such studies shall include a
statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business
value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation of
benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment
based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d)
the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and (e)
the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.
(5) The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for
each project. The plan or plans shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of each project. The plan(s) shall include, but
is not limited to, the following elements: A description of the
problem or opportunity that the information technology project is
intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for
the phased approach shall be such that the business case justification
for a project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or
adds measurable value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business
functions within each development cycle.
(6) The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for
information technology projects. Consistent with the direction of the
information services board and the published policies and guidelines of
the department of information services, the quality assurance plan
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of the
project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance
plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The
quality assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements
for each phase of a project.
(7) A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and
quality assurance plan shall be provided to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall demonstrate
a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer funds
on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system
on the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined
use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval
of the relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan by the department of information services and the office
of financial management.
(8) Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the
department of information services, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees at intervals specified in the
project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ENTERPRISE
SERVICES. Agencies shall make use of the department of information
services when acquiring information technology services, products, and
assets.
"Information technology services" means the acquisition,
provisioning, or approval of hardware, software, and purchased or
personal services provided by the department of information services.
If an information technology enterprise service is provided by the
department, or an agency has a specific requirement to acquire
hardware, software, or purchased or personal services directly, the
agency shall consult with the department of information services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS. The department
of information services shall act as lead agency in coordinating video
telecommunications services for state agencies. As lead agency, the
department shall develop standards and common specifications for leased
and purchased telecommunications equipment and assist state agencies in
developing a video telecommunications expenditure plan. No agency may
spend any portion of any appropriation in this act for new video
telecommunication equipment, new video telecommunication transmission,
or new video telecommunication programming, or for expanding current
video telecommunication systems without first complying with chapter
43.105 RCW, including but not limited to, RCW 43.105.041(2), and
without first submitting a video telecommunications expenditure plan,
in accordance with the policies of the department of information
services, for review and assessment by the department of information
services under RCW 43.105.052. Prior to any such expenditure by a
public school, a video telecommunications expenditure plan shall be
approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall submit the plans to the
department of information services in a form prescribed by the
department. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications in public schools
by providing educational information to local school districts and
shall assist local school districts and educational service districts
in telecommunications planning and curriculum development. Prior to
any such expenditure by a public institution of postsecondary
education, a telecommunications expenditure plan shall be approved by
the higher education coordinating board. The higher education
coordinating board shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications
for instruction and instructional support in postsecondary education,
including the review and approval of instructional telecommunications
course offerings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS. Whenever
allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation
to an agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general
fund moneys, the director of financial management may direct the
repayment of such allocated amount to the general fund from any balance
in the fund or funds which finance the agency. No appropriation shall
be necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS. In addition
to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution,
state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2, and bond retirement and interest including
ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on
registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also
appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for
these purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94 and
39.96 RCW or any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 BOND EXPENSES. In addition to such other
appropriations as are made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to
the state finance committee from legally available bond proceeds in the
applicable construction or building funds and accounts such amounts as
are necessary to pay the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 VOLUNTARY SEPARATION INCENTIVES. As a
management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of
resources, while improving employee productivity and morale, agencies
may offer voluntary separation and/or downshifting incentives and
options according to procedures and guidelines established by the
department of personnel and the department of retirement systems in
consultation with the office of financial management. The options may
include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for: Voluntary
resignation, voluntary leave-without-pay, voluntary workweek or work
hour reduction, voluntary downward movement, or temporary separation
for development purposes. No employee shall have a contractual right
to a financial incentive offered pursuant to this section. Agencies
shall report on the outcomes of their plans, and offers shall be
reviewed and monitored jointly by the department of personnel and the
department of retirement systems, for reporting to the office of
financial management by June 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT INCENTIVES.
Agencies may implement a voluntary retirement incentive program that is
cost neutral or results in cost savings provided that such a program is
approved by the director of retirement systems and the office of
financial management. Agencies participating in this authorization are
required to submit a report by June 30, 2009, to the legislature and
the office of financial management on the outcome of their approved
retirement incentive program. The report should include information on
the details of the program including resulting service delivery
changes, agency efficiencies, the cost of the retirement incentive per
participant, the total cost to the state, and the projected or actual
net dollar savings over the 2007-09 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 COMPENSATION--REVISE PENSION GAIN SHARING
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . -$1,260,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . -$1,260,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . -$9,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . -$9,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . -$24,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . -$24,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . -$1,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . -$1,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . -$7,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . -$7,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . -$780,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . -$98,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . -$1,092,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . -$4,572,000

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for
adjustments to state agency appropriations to reflect changes to
pension gain sharing as provided in House Bill No. 2391 (revise pension
gain sharing). The office of financial management shall allocate the
moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts specified to the
state agencies specified in LEAP document number H01 - 2007, and adjust
appropriations schedules accordingly.
(2) The appropriations for school districts and institutions of
higher education are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: Appropriations are adjusted to reflect changes to pension
gain sharing as provided in House Bill No. 2391 (revise pension gain
sharing).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911 COMPENSATION--NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--
INSURANCE BENEFITS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,785,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,714,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,332,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,124,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,453,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for
nonrepresented state employee health benefits for state agencies,
including institutions of higher education are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $707 per eligible employee for
fiscal year 2008. For fiscal year 2009 the monthly employer funding
rate shall not exceed $732 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065, but in no case to increase the actuarial value of the plans
offered as compared to the comparable plans offered to enrollees in
calendar year 2007.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2008, through December 31, 2008, the
subsidy shall be $164.08. Starting January 1, 2009, the subsidy shall
be $182.89 per month.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $59.37 per month beginning
September 1, 2007, and $67.10 beginning September 1, 2008;
(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $59.37 each month beginning September 1, 2007, and
$67.10 beginning September 1, 2008, prorated by the proportion of
employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the
part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in
this subsection shall not apply to employees of a technical college,
school district, or educational service district who purchase insurance
benefits through contracts with the health care authority.
(4) The office of financial management shall allocate the moneys
appropriated in this section in the amounts specified to the state
agencies specified in LEAP document number H02 - 2007, and adjust
appropriations schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 912 COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES
OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE BENEFITS. The appropriations for
state agencies, including institutions of higher education are subject
to the following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, for represented employees outside the super
coalition under chapter 41.80 RCW, shall not exceed $707 per eligible
employee for fiscal year 2008. For fiscal year 2009 the monthly
employer funding rate shall not exceed $732 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065, but in no case to increase the actuarial value of the plans
offered as compared to the comparable plans offered to enrollees in
calendar year 2007.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2008, through December 31, 2008, the
subsidy shall be $164.08. Starting January 1, 2009, the subsidy shall
be $182.89 per month.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $59.37 per month beginning
September 1, 2007, and $67.10 beginning September 1, 2008;
(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $59.37 each month beginning September 1, 2007, and
$67.10 beginning September 1, 2008, prorated by the proportion of
employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the
part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in
this subsection shall not apply to employees of a technical college,
school district, or educational service district who purchase insurance
benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913 COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION. Collective bargaining agreements negotiated as part
of the super coalition under chapter 41.80 RCW include employer
contributions to health insurance premiums at 88% of the cost. Funding
rates at this level are currently $707 per month for fiscal year 2008
and $732 per month for fiscal year 2009. The agreements also include
a one-time payment of $756 for each employee who is eligible for
insurance for the month of June 2007 and is covered by a 2007-2009
collective bargaining agreement negotiated pursuant to chapter 41.80
RCW, and the continuation of the salary increases that were negotiated
for the twelve-month period beginning July 1, 2006, and scheduled to
terminate June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914 ACROSS THE BOARD SALARY ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,252,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,061,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $491,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $354,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $665,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $169,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,979,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $664,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,863,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,902,000

The appropriations for nonrepresented employee compensation
adjustments provided in this section are solely for Across the Board
Adjustments.
(a) Appropriations are provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective September 1, 2007, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80,
41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except the certificated employees of the
state schools for the deaf and blind and employees of community and
technical colleges covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No.
732. Also included are employees in the Washington management service,
and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the director of
personnel.
The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 3.2% salary
increase effective September 1, 2007, for executive, legislative, and
judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum
salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected
officials.
(b) Appropriations are provided for a 2.0% salary increase
effective September 1, 2008, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80,
41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except for the certificated employees of the
state schools of the deaf and blind and employees of community and
technical colleges covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No.
732. Also included are employees in the Washington management service,
and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the director of
personnel. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 2.0%
salary increase effective September 1, 2008, for executive,
legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system
rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries
for elected officials. The office of financial management shall
allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts
specified to the state agencies specified in LEAP document number H03
- 2007, and adjust appropriations schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915 SALARY SURVEY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,898,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,797,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $202,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,586,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $264,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,986,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,288,000

For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, the appropriations in this
section are provided solely for implementation of the department of
personnel's 2006 salary survey, for job classes more than 25% below
market rates and affected classes. The office of financial management
shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts
specified to the state agencies specified in LEAP document number H04
- 2007, and adjust appropriations schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 916 AGENCY REQUEST CONSOLIDATION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $264,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $708,000

For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, the appropriations in this
section are provided solely for implementation of the department of
personnel's agency request job class consolidation and reclassification
plan. This implementation fully satisfies the conditions specified in
the settlement agreement of WPEA v State/Shroll v State. The office of
financial management shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this
section in the amounts specified to the state agencies specified in
LEAP document number H05 - 2007, and adjust appropriations schedules
accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 917 CLASSIFICATION CONSOLIDATION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $538,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $544,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,242,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,579,000

For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, the appropriations in this
section are provided solely for implementation of the department of
personnel's phase 4 job class consolidation and revisions under chapter
41.80 RCW. The office of financial management shall allocate the
moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts specified to the
state agencies specified in LEAP document number H06 - 2007, and adjust
appropriations schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 918 ADDITIONAL PAY STEP
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,773,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,808,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $156,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $177,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,529,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $132,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,861,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,795,000

For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, the appropriations in this
section are provided solely for a new pay step L for those who have
been in step K for at least one year. The office of financial
management shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in
the amounts specified to the state agencies specified in LEAP document
number H07 - 2007, and adjust appropriations schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 919 SHIFT DIFFERENTIAL
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000

For all classified state employees, except those represented by a
bargaining unit under chapter 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except
for the certificated employees of the state schools of the deaf and
blind and employees of community and technical colleges covered by the
provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732, the appropriations in this
section are provided solely for shift differential pay. The office of
financial management shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this
section in the amounts specified to the state agencies specified in
LEAP document number H08 - 2007, and adjust appropriations schedules
accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 920 RETAIN FISCAL YEAR 2007 PAY INCREASE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,747,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,845,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $211,000
Public Safety and Education Account (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,352,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $279,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,935,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,029,000

For all classified state employees, except those represented by a
bargaining unit under chapter 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except
for the certificated employees of the state schools of the deaf and
blind and employees of community and technical colleges covered by the
provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732, the appropriations in this
section are provided solely for continuation of the 1.6% salary
increase that was provided during fiscal year 2007. Also included are
employees in the Washington management service, and exempt employees
under the jurisdiction of the director of personnel. The
appropriations are also sufficient to continue a 1.6% salary increase
for executive, legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from
merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission
on salaries for elected officials. The office of financial management
shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts
specified to the state agencies specified in LEAP document number H09
- 2007, and adjust appropriations schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 921 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS. (1)
Provisions of collective bargaining agreements contained in this act
are described in general terms. Only major economic terms are included
in the descriptions. These descriptions do not contain the complete
contents of the agreements. The collective bargaining agreements
contained in sections 913 through 948 of this act may also be funded by
expenditures from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded
with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue,
additional funding from other sources is not provided.
(2) Some contracts contain implementation of the department of
personnel's phase 4 classification consolidation. This implementation
fully satisfies the conditions specified in the settlement agreement of
WPEA v. State/Shroll v. State.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 922 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,778,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,419,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $234,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,206,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,545,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,075,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,466,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $394,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $514,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,123,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,775,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,458,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,162,000

Appropriations in this section reflect the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of
state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. For
employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6%
salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase
that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30,
2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007,
and a 2% salary increase effective July 1, 2008. Select
classifications will receive wage increases due to phase four of the
department of personnel's class consolidation project, the
implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey for
classes more than 25% below market rates and agency request packages
meeting the specified criteria outlined in RCW 41.06.152. These
increases will be effective July 1, 2007. All employees covered under
the agreement that have been at the top step of their salary range for
a year or longer will progress to a new step L effective July 1, 2007.
The office of financial management shall allocate the moneys
appropriated in this section in the amounts specified to the state
agencies specified in LEAP document number H10 - 2007, and adjust
appropriations schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 923 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,151,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,933,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,872,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,337,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,515,000

Appropriations in this section reflect the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the Washington public
employees association under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. For
employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6%
salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase
that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30,
2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007,
and a 2% salary increase effective July 1, 2008. Select
classifications will receive wage increases due to phase four of the
department of personnel's class consolidation project, the
implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey for
classes more than 25% below market rates and agency request packages
meeting the specified criteria outlined in RCW 41.06.152. These
increases will be effective July 1, 2007. All employees covered under
the agreement that have been at the top step of their range for a year
or longer will progress to a new step L effective July 1, 2007. The
office of financial management shall allocate the moneys appropriated
in this section in the amounts specified to the state agencies
specified in LEAP document number H11 - 2007, and adjust appropriations
schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 924 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--TEAMSTERS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,992,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,019,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,011,000

Appropriations in this section reflect the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the brotherhood of teamsters
under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. For employees covered under
this agreement, provisions include a 2.9% salary increase effective
July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into effect July
1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a
3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, and a 2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2008. Select classifications will receive wage
increases due to phase four of the department of personnel's class
consolidation project, the implementation of the department of
personnel's 2006 salary survey for classes more than 25% below market
rates, and agency request packages meeting the specified criteria
outlined in RCW 41.06.152. These increases will be effective July 1,
2007.
Also effective July 1, 2007, corrections and custody officers 1s,
2s, and 3s in Franklin, Snohomish, and Walla Walla counties will
receive 5% geographic pay. All employees covered under the agreement
that have been at the top step of their range for a year or longer will
progress to a new step L effective July 1, 2007. The office of
financial management shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this
section in the amounts specified to the state agencies specified in
LEAP document number H12 - 2007, and adjust appropriations schedules
accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 925 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UFCW
Liquor Revolving Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,004,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,004,000

Appropriations in this section reflect the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the united food and
commercial workers under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. For
employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6%
salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase
that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30,
2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007,
and a 2% salary increase effective July 1, 2008. All employees covered
under the agreement that have been at the top step of their range for
a year or longer will progress to a new step L effective July 1, 2007.
The office of financial management shall allocate the moneys
appropriated in this section in the amounts specified to the state
agencies specified in LEAP document number H13 - 2007, and adjust
appropriations schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 926 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--IFPTE
LOCAL 17
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,000

Appropriations in this section reflect the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the international federation
of professional and technical engineers under the provisions of chapter
41.80 RCW. For employees covered under this agreement, provisions
include a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues
the increase that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to
terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, and a 2% salary increase effective July 1,
2008. Select classifications will receive wage increases due to the
implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey for
classes more than 25% below market rates. These increases will be
effective July 1, 2007. All employees covered under the agreement that
have been at the top step of their range for a year or longer will
progress to a new step L effective July 1, 2007. The office of
financial management shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this
section in the amounts specified to the state agencies specified in
LEAP document number H14 - 2007, and adjust appropriations schedules
accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 927 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU
1199
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,189,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,353,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,124,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,575,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,241,000

Appropriations in this section reflect the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the service employee's
international union, local 1199 NW under the provisions of chapter
41.80 RCW. For employees covered under this agreement, provisions
include a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues
the increase that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to
terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, and a 2% salary increase effective July 1,
2008. Select classifications will receive wage increases due to phase
four of the department of personnel's class consolidation project and
the implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey
for classes more than 25% below market rates. These increases will be
effective July 1, 2007. The office of financial management shall
allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts
specified to the state agencies specified in LEAP document number H15
- 2007, and adjust appropriations schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 928 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--COALITION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,083,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,830,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $426,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $488,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,365,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,192,000

Appropriations in this section reflect the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the coalition under the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. For employees covered under this
agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1,
2007, which continues the increase that went into effect July 1, 2006,
and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary
increase effective July 1, 2007, and a 2% salary increase effective
July 1, 2008. Select classifications will receive wage increases due
to phase four of the department of personnel's class consolidation
project, the implementation of the department of personnel's 2006
salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rates, and agency
request packages meeting the specified criteria outlined in RCW
41.06.152. These increases will be effective July 1, 2007. All
employees covered under the agreement that have been at the top step of
their range for a year or longer will progress to a new step L
effective July 1, 2007. These increases will be effective July 1,
2007. The office of financial management shall allocate the moneys
appropriated in this section in the amounts specified to the state
agencies specified in LEAP document number H16 - 2007, and adjust
appropriations schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 929 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
HIGHER EDUCATION. Appropriations in this act reflect the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the Washington
federation of state employees in higher education under the provisions
of chapter 41.80 RCW. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which
continues the increase that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set
to terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, and a 2% salary increase effective July 1,
2008. Select classifications will receive wage increases due to phase
four of the department of personnel's class consolidation project and
the implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey
for classes more than 25% below market rates. These increases will be
effective July 1, 2007. All employees covered under the agreement that
have been at the top step of their range for a year or longer will
progress to a new step L effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 930 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA
HIGHER EDUCATION. Appropriations in this act reflect the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the Washington
public employees association in higher education under the provisions
of chapter 41.80 RCW. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which
continues the increase that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set
to terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, and a 2% salary increase effective July 1,
2008. Select classifications will receive wage increases due to phase
four of the department of personnel's class consolidation project and
the implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey
for classes more than 25% below market rates. These increases will be
effective July 1, 2007. All employees covered under the agreement that
have been at the top step of their range for a year or longer will
progress to a new step L effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 931 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE. Appropriations in this act reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the Western Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
units A, B, and E. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 3.2% pay increase effective July 1, 2007; a second
increase of 2.0% effective July 1, 2008; implementation of the
department of personnel's salary survey for classes more than 25% below
market rate; a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid; and movement of all
classified staff at or below pay range 30 to step G of their range,
effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 932 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--PSE BARGAINING UNIT PTE. Appropriations in this
act reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
Western Washington University and the public school employees
bargaining unit PTE. For employees covered under this agreement, the
provisions include a 3.2% increase effective July 1, 2007; a second
increase of 2.0% effective July 1, 2008; implementation of the
department of personnel's salary survey for classes more than 25% below
market rate; a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid; and implementation
of phase four of the department of personnel's class consolidation
project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 933 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--PSE BARGAINING UNIT D. Appropriations in this
act reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
Western Washington University and the public school employees
bargaining unit D. For employees covered under this agreement, the
provisions include a 3.2% increase effective July 1, 2007; a second
increase of 2.0% effective July 1, 2008; implementation of the
department of personnel's salary survey for classes more than 25% below
market rate; a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid; and implementation
of phase four of the department of personnel's class consolidation
project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 934 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE. Appropriations in this act reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the Central Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees. For
employees covered under this agreement, the provisions include a pay
increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a second increase of 2.0%
effective July 1, 2006; phase four of the department of personnel's
class consolidation project; implementation of the 2006 department of
personnel's salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rate;
and a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 935 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE BU 1. Appropriations in this act reflect
the collective bargaining agreement reached between the Eastern
Washington University and the Washington federation of state employees
bargaining unit 1. For employees covered under this agreement, the
provisions include a pay increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a
second increase of 2.0%; phase four of the department of personnel's
class consolidation project; a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid; and
the potential for two $200 one-time payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 936 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE BU 2. Appropriations in this act reflect
the collective bargaining agreement reached between the Eastern
Washington University and the Washington federation of state employees
bargaining unit 2. For employees covered under this agreement, the
provisions include a pay increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a
second increase of 2.0%; phase four of the department of personnel's
class consolidation project; a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid; and
the potential for two $200 one-time payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 937 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY–WSU POLICE GUILD. Appropriations in this
act reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
Washington State University and the Washington State University police
guild. For employees covered under this agreement, the provisions
include a pay increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a second
increase of 2.0%; effective July 1, 2008; implementation of the 2006
department of personnel's salary survey for classes more than 25% below
market rate; and a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 938 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY--WFSE. Appropriations in this act reflect
the collective bargaining agreement reached between the Washington
State University and the Washington federation of state employees. For
employees covered under this agreement, the provisions include a pay
increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a second increase of 2.0%
effective July 1, 2008; implementation of the 2006 department of
personnel's salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rate;
and a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 939 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--WFSE CAMPUS--WIDE BARGAINING UNIT.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the University of Washington and the Washington
federation of state employees campus-wide bargaining unit. For
employees covered under this agreement, the provisions include a pay
increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a second increase of 2.0%
effective July 1, 2008; recruitment and retention adjustments for
specific classes; increases for classes more than 80% below market
according to a survey by the University of Washington; and an
additional pay step in fiscal year 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 940 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--WFSE POLICE MANAGEMENT BARGAINING UNIT.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the University of Washington and the Washington
federation of state employees police management bargaining unit. For
employees covered under this agreement, the provisions include a pay
increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a second increase of 2.0%
effective July 1, 2008; longevity pay for those with service of 5 years
(1%), 10 years (2%), 15 years (3%), 20 years (4%), and 25 years (5%);
and a new top step effective fiscal year 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 941 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--UWPOA. Appropriations in this act reflect
the collective bargaining agreement reached between the University of
Washington and the University of Washington police officers
association. For employees covered under this agreement, the
provisions include a pay increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a
second pay increase of 2.0% effective July 1, 2008; an additional top
step on the pay grid effective fiscal year 2009; and increases in
midcareer pay increments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 942 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--SEIU 925. Appropriations in this act reflect
the collective bargaining agreement reached between the University of
Washington and the service employees' international union 925. For
employees covered under this agreement, the provisions include a pay
increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a second pay increase of 3.0%
effective July 1, 2008; and market rate adjustments for specific job
classes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 943 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--YAKIMA
VALLEY COMMUNITY COLLEGE--WPEA/UFCW. Appropriations in this act
reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached between the Yakima
Valley community college and the Washington public employees'
association/united food and commercial workers union local 365. For
employees covered under this agreement, the provisions include a pay
increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; an increase of 2.0% effective
July 1, 2008; implementation of the 2006 department of personnel's
salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rate; phase four
of the department of personnel's class consolidation project; agency
requests for reclassification that meet the criteria outlined in RCW
41.06.152; and a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 944 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WSP
TROOPERS ASSOCIATION
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $468,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $782,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000

Appropriations in this act reflect funding for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the Washington
state patrol trooper's association under the provisions of chapter
41.56 RCW. For employees covered under this agreement, provisions
include a 4.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, and a 4.0%
salary increase effective July 1, 2008. Also effective July 1, 2007,
positions located in King (10%), Snohomish (5%), or Pierce (3%)
counties will receive geographic pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 945 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WSP
LIEUTENANTS ASSOCIATION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,000

Appropriations in this act reflect funding for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the Washington
state patrol lieutenant's association under the provisions of chapter
41.56 RCW. For employees covered under this agreement, provisions
include a 4.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, and a 4.0%
salary increase effective July 1, 2008. Also effective July 1, 2007,
positions located in King (10%), Snohomish (5%), or Pierce (3%)
counties will receive geographic pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 946 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU
LOCAL 775 HOMECARE WORKERS. Appropriations in this act reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the
service employee's international union local 775 under the provisions
of chapter 74.39 RCW. For those covered under this agreement,
provisions include a base wage increase of $.30 per hour effective July
1, 2007, a base wage increase of $.30 per hour effective July 1, 2008,
an additional step to the wage grid for providers with over 14,000
hours, an additional $1.00 per hour for mentor and trainer pay,
implementation of mileage reimbursement by July 1, 2008, and state
payment of the provider's share of workers compensation. In addition,
the state will increase the contribution to health care by 10% on July
1, 2008, to $550 per month, and implement an agreed upon approach to
shared living.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 947 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU
LOCAL 925 CHILDCARE WORKERS. Appropriations in this act reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the
service employee's international union local 925 under the provisions
of chapter 74.15 RCW. For those covered under this agreement,
provisions include a subsidy rate increase of 7% for licensed homes and
4% for exempt providers effective July 1, 2007, a subsidy rate increase
of 3% for both licensed and exempt providers on July 1, 2008,
elimination of a reduced rate for additional children per family on
July 1, 2007, for exempt providers, additional incentive pay for
nonstandard hours and infant care, training for providers on licensing
requirements, and health care for eligible licensed home providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 948 FISCAL GROWTH FACTOR--WASHINGTON STATE
GAMBLING COMMISSION. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
gambling commission may increase license fees in excess of the fiscal
growth factor as provided in RCW 43.135.055.

Sec. 949 RCW 41.05.065 and 2006 c 299 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall study all matters connected with the provision
of health care coverage, life insurance, liability insurance,
accidental death and dismemberment insurance, and disability income
insurance or any of, or a combination of, the enumerated types of
insurance for employees and their dependents on the best basis possible
with relation both to the welfare of the employees and to the state.
However, liability insurance shall not be made available to dependents.
(2) The board shall develop employee benefit plans that include
comprehensive health care benefits for all employees. In developing
these plans, the board shall consider the following elements:
(a) Methods of maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to
quality health care;
(b) Development of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment and ensure access to quality care, including but not
limited to prepaid delivery systems and prospective payment methods;
(c) Wellness incentives that focus on proven strategies, such as
smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol
misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and
motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition
education;
(d) Utilization review procedures including, but not limited to a
cost-efficient method for prior authorization of services, hospital
inpatient length of stay review, requirements for use of outpatient
surgeries and second opinions for surgeries, review of invoices or
claims submitted by service providers, and performance audit of
providers;
(e) Effective coordination of benefits;
(f) Minimum standards for insuring entities; and
(g) Minimum scope and content of public employee benefit plans to
be offered to enrollees participating in the employee health benefit
plans. To maintain the comprehensive nature of employee health care
benefits, employee eligibility criteria related to the number of hours
worked and the benefits provided to employees shall be substantially
equivalent to the state employees' health benefits plan and eligibility
criteria in effect on January 1, 1993. Nothing in this subsection
(2)(g) shall prohibit changes or increases in employee point-of-service
payments or employee premium payments for benefits or the
administration of a high deductible health plan in conjunction with a
health savings account.
(h) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the board may not make
changes to the benefit plans offered to enrollees that increase the net
actuarial cost of the plans as compared to the same, or most similar
plans, offered for calendar year 2007.
(3) The board shall design benefits and determine the terms and
conditions of employee and retired employee participation and coverage,
including establishment of eligibility criteria. The same terms and
conditions of participation and coverage, including eligibility
criteria, shall apply to state employees and to school district
employees and educational service district employees.
(4) The board may authorize premium contributions for an employee
and the employee's dependents in a manner that encourages the use of
cost-efficient managed health care systems. During the 2005-2007
fiscal biennium, the board may only authorize premium contributions for
an employee and the employee's dependents that are the same, regardless
of an employee's status as represented or nonrepresented by a
collective bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of
2002. The board shall require participating school district and
educational service district employees to pay at least the same
employee premiums by plan and family size as state employees pay.
(5) The board shall develop a health savings account option for
employees that conform to section 223, Part VII of subchapter B of
chapter 1 of the internal revenue code of 1986. The board shall comply
with all applicable federal standards related to the establishment of
health savings accounts.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the board
shall develop a high deductible health plan to be offered in
conjunction with a health savings account developed under subsection
(5) of this section.
(7) Employees shall choose participation in one of the health care
benefit plans developed by the board and may be permitted to waive
coverage under terms and conditions established by the board.
(8) The board shall review plans proposed by insuring entities that
desire to offer property insurance and/or accident and casualty
insurance to state employees through payroll deduction. The board may
approve any such plan for payroll deduction by insuring entities
holding a valid certificate of authority in the state of Washington and
which the board determines to be in the best interests of employees and
the state. The board shall promulgate rules setting forth criteria by
which it shall evaluate the plans.
(9) Before January 1, 1998, the public employees' benefits board
shall make available one or more fully insured long-term care insurance
plans that comply with the requirements of chapter 48.84 RCW. Such
programs shall be made available to eligible employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees as well as eligible dependents
which, for the purpose of this section, includes the parents of the
employee or retiree and the parents of the spouse of the employee or
retiree. Employees of local governments and employees of political
subdivisions not otherwise enrolled in the public employees' benefits
board sponsored medical programs may enroll under terms and conditions
established by the administrator, if it does not jeopardize the
financial viability of the public employees' benefits board's long-term
care offering.
(a) Participation of eligible employees or retired employees and
retired school employees in any long-term care insurance plan made
available by the public employees' benefits board is voluntary and
shall not be subject to binding arbitration under chapter 41.56 RCW.
Participation is subject to reasonable underwriting guidelines and
eligibility rules established by the public employees' benefits board
and the health care authority.
(b) The employee, retired employee, and retired school employee are
solely responsible for the payment of the premium rates developed by
the health care authority. The health care authority is authorized to
charge a reasonable administrative fee in addition to the premium
charged by the long-term care insurer, which shall include the health
care authority's cost of administration, marketing, and consumer
education materials prepared by the health care authority and the
office of the insurance commissioner.
(c) To the extent administratively possible, the state shall
establish an automatic payroll or pension deduction system for the
payment of the long-term care insurance premiums.
(d) The public employees' benefits board and the health care
authority shall establish a technical advisory committee to provide
advice in the development of the benefit design and establishment of
underwriting guidelines and eligibility rules. The committee shall
also advise the board and authority on effective and cost-effective
ways to market and distribute the long-term care product. The
technical advisory committee shall be comprised, at a minimum, of
representatives of the office of the insurance commissioner, providers
of long-term care services, licensed insurance agents with expertise in
long-term care insurance, employees, retired employees, retired school
employees, and other interested parties determined to be appropriate by
the board.
(e) The health care authority shall offer employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees the option of purchasing long-term care insurance through licensed agents or brokers appointed by the
long-term care insurer. The authority, in consultation with the public
employees' benefits board, shall establish marketing procedures and may
consider all premium components as a part of the contract negotiations
with the long-term care insurer.
(f) In developing the long-term care insurance benefit designs, the
public employees' benefits board shall include an alternative plan of
care benefit, including adult day services, as approved by the office
of the insurance commissioner.
(g) The health care authority, with the cooperation of the office
of the insurance commissioner, shall develop a consumer education
program for the eligible employees, retired employees, and retired
school employees designed to provide education on the potential need
for long-term care, methods of financing long-term care, and the
availability of long-term care insurance products including the
products offered by the board.
(h) By December 1998, the health care authority, in consultation
with the public employees' benefits board, shall submit a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature, including an analysis of the
marketing and distribution of the long-term care insurance provided
under this section.

Sec. 950 RCW 43.08.250 and 2005 c 518 s 926, 2005 c 457 s 8, and
2005 c 282 s 44 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The money received by the state treasurer from fees, fines,
forfeitures, penalties, reimbursements or assessments by any court
organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, or chapter 2.08 RCW, shall be
deposited in the public safety and education account which is hereby
created in the state treasury. The legislature shall appropriate the
funds in the account to promote traffic safety education, highway
safety, criminal justice training, crime victims' compensation,
judicial education, the judicial information system, civil
representation of indigent persons under RCW 2.53.030, winter
recreation parking, drug court operations, and state game programs.
((During)) Through the fiscal biennium ending June 30, ((2007)) 2009,
the legislature may appropriate moneys from the public safety and
education account for purposes of appellate indigent defense and other
operations of the office of public defense, the criminal litigation
unit of the attorney general's office, the treatment alternatives to
street crimes program, crime victims advocacy programs, justice
information network telecommunication planning, treatment for
supplemental security income clients, sexual assault treatment,
operations of the administrative office of the courts, security in the
common schools, alternative school start-up grants, programs for
disruptive students, criminal justice data collection, Washington state
patrol criminal justice activities, drug court operations, unified
family courts, local court backlog assistance, financial assistance to
local jurisdictions for extraordinary costs incurred in the
adjudication of criminal cases, domestic violence treatment and related
services, the department of corrections' costs in implementing chapter
196, Laws of 1999, reimbursement of local governments for costs
associated with implementing criminal and civil justice legislation,
the replacement of the department of corrections' offender-based
tracking system, secure and semi-secure crisis residential centers,
HOPE beds, the family policy council and community public health and
safety networks, the street youth program, public notification about
registered sex offenders, and narcotics or methamphetamine-related
enforcement, education, training, and drug and alcohol treatment
services.
(2)(a) The equal justice subaccount is created as a subaccount of
the public safety and education account. The money received by the
state treasurer from the increase in fees imposed by sections 9, 10,
12, 13, 14, 17, and 19, chapter 457, Laws of 2005 shall be deposited in
the equal justice subaccount and shall be appropriated only for:
(i) Criminal indigent defense assistance and enhancement at the
trial court level, including a criminal indigent defense pilot program;
(ii) Representation of parents in dependency and termination
proceedings;
(iii) Civil legal representation of indigent persons; and
(iv) Contribution to district court judges' salaries and to
eligible elected municipal court judges' salaries.
(b) For the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, an amount equal to twenty-five
percent of revenues to the equal justice subaccount, less one million
dollars, shall be appropriated from the equal justice subaccount to the
administrator for the courts for purposes of (a)(iv) of this
subsection. For the 2007-09 fiscal biennium and subsequent fiscal
biennia, an amount equal to fifty percent of revenues to the equal
justice subaccount shall be appropriated from the equal justice
subaccount to the administrator for the courts for the purposes of
(a)(iv) of this subsection.

Sec. 951 RCW 43.60A.165 and 2006 c 343 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The defenders' fund is created to provide assistance to members of
the Washington national guard and reservists who served in Operation
Enduring Freedom, Operation Iraqi Freedom, or Operation Noble Eagle,
and who are experiencing financial hardships in employment, education,
housing, and health care due to the significant period of time away
from home serving our country. The program shall be administered by
the department. Eligibility determinations shall be made by the
department. Eligible veterans may receive a one-time grant of no more
than five hundred dollars, except that for the 2007-2009 biennium, the
one-time grant may not exceed one thousand dollars.

Sec. 952 RCW 46.09.170 and 2004 c 105 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on a tax rate of: (a) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (b) twenty cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;
(c) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2009; (d) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (e) twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, 2011,
and thereafter, less proper deductions for refunds and costs of
collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090.
(2) The treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as
follows:
(a) Thirty-six percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and
management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities, and information programs and maintenance of nonhighway
roads;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and the maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management
of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities; and
(d) Fifty-eight and one-half percent shall be credited to the
nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to be
administered by the committee for planning, acquisition, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and for education, information, and law
enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection shall be
expended in accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than thirty percent may be expended for education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than seventy percent may be expended for ORV,
nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities. Except as
provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, of this amount:
(A) Not less than thirty percent, together with the funds the
committee receives under RCW 46.09.110, may be expended for ORV
recreation facilities;
(B) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonmotorized
recreation facilities. Funds expended under this subsection
(2)(d)(ii)(B) shall be known as Ira Spring outdoor recreation
facilities funds; and
(C) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(iii) The committee may waive the minimum percentage cited in
(d)(ii) of this subsection due to insufficient requests for funds or
projects that score low in the committee's project evaluation. Funds
remaining after such a waiver must be allocated in accordance with
committee policy.
(3) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.
(4) During the ((2003-05)) 2007-09 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the
NOVA account to ((the interagency committee for outdoor recreation,))
the department of natural resources((, the department of fish and
wildlife, and the state parks and recreation commission)) for planning
and designing consistent off-road vehicle signage at department-managed
recreation sites, and for planning recreation opportunities on
department-managed lands in the Reiter block and Ahtanum state forest.
This appropriation is not required to follow the specific distribution
specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 953 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2005 c 488 s 926 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; and
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the top two hazardous waste
management priorities of RCW 70.105.150.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority: (i) Remedial
actions; (ii) hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105
RCW; (iii) solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW; (iv) funds for a program to assist in the
assessment and cleanup of sites of methamphetamine production, but not
to be used for the initial containment of such sites, consistent with
the responsibilities and intent of RCW 69.50.511; and (v) cleanup and
disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or derelict vessels
that pose a threat to human health or the environment. For purposes of
this subsection (3)(a)(v), "abandoned or derelict vessels" means
vessels that have little or no value and either have no identified
owner or have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean
up and dispose of the vessel. Funds for plans and programs shall be
allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements
established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW. During
the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be used
for the following activities: Conducting a study of whether dioxins
occur in fertilizers, soil amendments, and soils; reviewing
applications for registration of fertilizers; and conducting a study of
plant uptake of metals. During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to the
state toxics control account such amounts as specified in the omnibus
capital budget bill. During the ((2005-2007)) 2007-2009 fiscal
biennium, moneys in the account may also be used for grants to local
governments to retrofit public sector diesel equipment and for storm
water planning and implementation activities.
(b) Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to
implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal
safe drinking water act for public water systems. The department of
health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed under RCW
70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local
toxics control accounts shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. However, during the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, funding may not be granted to entities engaged in
lobbying activities, and applicants may not be awarded grants if their
cumulative grant awards under this section exceed two hundred thousand
dollars. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be
renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium
shall revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(((8) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state toxics control account to the water quality
account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.))

Sec. 954 RCW 70.146.030 and 2005 c 518 s 940 and 2005 c 514 s
1108 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, 82.24.026(2)(d),
((82.26.025,)) and 82.32.390, principal and interest from the repayment
of any loans granted pursuant to this chapter, and any other moneys
appropriated to the account by the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. For the period July
1, ((2005)) 2007, to June 30, ((2007)) 2009, moneys in the account may
be used to process applications received by the department that seek to
make changes to or transfer existing water rights and for other water
resources and water quality activities, for water conveyance projects,
shoreline technical assistance. Puget Sound education and outreach and
for grants and technical assistance to public bodies for watershed
planning under chapter 90.82 RCW. No more than three percent of the
moneys deposited in the account may be used by the department to pay
for the administration of the grant and loan program authorized by this
chapter.
(3) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31st of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 955 The water quality capital account is
created in the state treasury pursuant to House Bill No. 1137 (water
quality capital account). In this act, appropriations from the water
quality capital account are defined as appropriations from that
account. If House Bill No. 1137 (water quality capital account) is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, appropriations in this act either from that
account or into that account shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 956 The governor's committee on disability
issues and employment is supported through resources provided by state
agencies. Within appropriations contained in this act, the office of
financial management may direct agencies that report directly to the
governor to enter into contracts with the governor's committee on
disability issues and employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 957 (1) The legislature intends to improve the
administration and coordination of state information technology. The
legislature finds that opportunities are being missed to use the
expertise in the department of information services and to leverage the
purchasing power of the department to drive down the cost of securing
information services.
(2) The office of financial management, the department of
information services, and the legislature shall form a 2007 interim
workgroup on improving state strategies, administration, and
coordination of information technology. The workgroup shall consist
of:
(a) The director or designee of the department of information
services, and the director or designee of the office of financial
management;
(b) A member of the information services board;
(c) Two members of the senate, appointed by the president of the
senate, one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;
(d) Two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the
speaker of the house, one member from each of the two largest caucuses
of the house of representatives;
(e) The workgroup shall invite a representative from one large
agency and one small agency to participate; and
(f) The workgroup shall choose its co-chairs from among its
legislative membership.
(3) The workgroup shall review the following issues:
(a) A statewide information services strategy;
(b) The approval and oversight process of information technology
projects;
(c) Leveraging the expertise and purchasing power of the department
of information services; and
(d) Strengthening the role of the information services board in
enhancing the utilization of services offered by the department of
information services.
(4) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by the
senate committee services, the house of representatives office of
program research, the office of financial management, and the
department of information services.
(5) Legislative members of the workgroup shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2007.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 958 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WSP
TROOPERS AND LIEUTENANTS ASSOCIATIONS HEALTH BENEFITS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section provide
funding solely for the health benefits provided in the collective
bargaining agreements negotiated with the Washington state patrol
troopers' association and the Washington state patrol lieutenant's
association under chapter 41.56 RCW. The agreements include employer
contributions to health insurance premiums at 88% of the cost. Funding
rates at this level are currently $707 per month for fiscal year 2008
and $732 per month for fiscal year 2009.

(End of part)

PART X
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 1001 2006 c 372 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,095,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,397,000))
$6,401,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,529,000))
$12,533,000

Sec. 1002 2006 c 372 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,916,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,393,000))
$14,447,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,389,000))
$28,443,000

Sec. 1003 2006 c 372 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,834,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,298,000))
$21,340,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,277,000))
$50,300,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,051,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($117,556,000))
$117,621,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for court-appointed special
advocates in dependency matters. The administrator for the courts,
after consulting with the association of juvenile court administrators
and the association of court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad
litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer court-appointed
special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution of
funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally
accessible to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian
ad litem programs. The administrator for the courts shall not retain
more than six percent of total funding to cover administrative or any
other agency costs.
(2) $3,000,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for school district petitions to
juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and
28A.225.035. The office of the administrator for the courts shall
develop an interagency agreement with the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this
subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be
based on the number of petitions filed.
(3) $13,224,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to county juvenile
court administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children
in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The office of the
administrator for the courts shall not retain any portion of these
funds to cover administrative costs. The office of the administrator
for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula
shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition
processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average
per-petition processing costs.
(4) The distributions made under subsection (3) of this section and
distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made
pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate
reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of
service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.
(5) Each fiscal year during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a fiscal year
ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for
the purpose of distributing funds.
(6) $82,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $82,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1112 (creating an additional superior court position). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts in this subsection
shall lapse.
(7) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1854 (driving privilege) and Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5454 (court operations). If neither bill is enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $569,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the juror pay pilot and research
project.

Sec. 1004 2006 c 372 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,083,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,232,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,705,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,987,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,007,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 may be used to
provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible
persons who are sixty years or older on matters authorized by RCW
2.53.030(2)(a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset
level.

Sec. 1005 2006 c 372 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,593,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,473,000))
$19,028,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,099,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,210,000
Department of Personnel Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $721,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,398,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,010,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($121,777,000))
$122,332,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,472,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) $2,441,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,403,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the verification of initiative
and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and
candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $118,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29.27.072.
(4)(a) $2,028,004 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $2,382,772 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2005-07 biennium. The funding level
for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in
this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The
office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once
all criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection have been satisfactorily
documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(5) $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $173,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for the implementation of House Bill No.
1749 (county election procedures). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims in
Washington State Democratic Party, et al. v. Sam S. Reed, et al.,
United States District Court Western District of Washington at Tacoma
Cause No. C00-5419FDB and related appeal. The expenditure of this
appropriation is contingent on the release of all claims in the case
and related appeal, and total settlement costs shall not exceed the
appropriation in this subsection.
(7) $131,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for expenditures related to the
Farrakhan v. Locke litigation.

Sec. 1006 2006 c 372 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,258,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($351,000))
$748,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,011,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,624,000))
$16,021,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $731,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $727,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for staff and related costs to
verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.
(3) The office shall report to the office of financial management
and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature detailed
information on risk-based auditing, its theory, and its application for
the audits performed on Washington state government. The report shall
include an explanation of how the office identifies, measures, and
prioritizes risk, the manner in which the office uses these factors in
the planning and execution of the audits of Washington state
government, and the methods and procedures used in the conduct of the
risk-based audits themselves. The report is due no later than December
1, 2005.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1064 (government performance).
(5) $16,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided for a review of special education excess cost
accounting and reporting requirements. The state auditor's office
shall coordinate this work with the joint legislative audit and review
committee's review of the special education excess cost accounting
methodology and expenditure reporting requirements. The state
auditor's review shall include an examination of whether school
districts are (a) appropriately implementing the excess cost accounting
methodology; (b) consistently charging special education expenses to
the special education and basic education programs; (c) appropriately
determining the percentage of expenditures that should be charged to
the special education and basic education programs; and (d)
appropriately and consistently reporting special education
expenditures. The results of this review will be included in the joint
legislative audit and review committee's report issued in January 2006.

Sec. 1007 2006 c 372 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,724,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,844,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,428,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,307,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,315,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($191,627,000))
$195,307,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($210,536,000))
$214,216,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.

Sec. 1008 2006 c 372 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,758,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,229,000))
$59,942,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($258,085,000))
$257,888,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,422,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,443,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,430,000
Tourism Development and Promotion Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,133,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,809,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,362,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,234,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,570,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,536,000
Homeless Families Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $616,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($462,905,000))
$462,421,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center for work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities. The
center shall not pay any increased indirect rate nor increases in other
indirect charges above the absolute amount paid during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium.
(2) $5,902,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for the justice assistance grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 2006 as follows:
(a) $2,064,000 to local units of government to continue
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;
(b) $330,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;
(c) $675,000 to the Washington state patrol for coordination,
investigative, and supervisory support to the multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces and for methamphetamine education and response;
(d) $20,000 to the department for tribal law enforcement;
(e) $345,000 to the department to continue domestic violence legal
advocacy;
(f) $60,000 to the department for community-based advocacy services
to victims of violent crime, other than sexual assault and domestic
violence;
(g) $351,000 to the department of social and health services,
division of alcohol and substance abuse, for juvenile drug courts in
eastern and western Washington;
(h) $626,000 to the department of social and health services to
continue youth violence prevention and intervention projects;
(i) $97,000 to the department to continue evaluation of this grant
program;
(j) $290,000 to the office of financial management for criminal
history records improvement;
(k) $580,000 to the department for required grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on justice assistance grant programs; and
(l) $464,000 to the department for distribution to small
municipalities.
These amounts represent the maximum justice assistance grant
expenditure authority for each program. No program may expend justice
assistance grant funds in excess of the amounts provided in this
subsection. If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this
subsection become available, whether from prior or current fiscal year
distributions, the department shall hold these moneys in reserve and
may not expend them without specific appropriation. These moneys shall
be carried forward and applied to the pool of moneys available for
appropriation for programs and projects in the succeeding fiscal year.
As part of its budget request for the succeeding year, the department
shall estimate and request authority to spend any justice assistance
grant funds.
(3) $3,600,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the justice assistance grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 2007 as follows:
(a) $2,013,000 to local units of government to continue
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;
(b) $330,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;
(c) $675,000 to the Washington state patrol for coordination,
investigative, and supervisory support to the multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces;
(d) $110,000 to the department to support the governor's council on
substance abuse;
(e) $97,000 to the department to continue evaluation of the justice
assistance grant program;
(f) $360,000 to the department for required grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on justice assistance grant programs; and
(g) $15,000 to the department for a tribal and local law
enforcement statewide summit.
(4) $1,658,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for multijurisdictional drug task forces.
The funding for this amount, and the amounts provided in subsection
(3)(a) and (b) of this section, will be distributed in a manner so that
all drug task forces funded in fiscal year 2004 will receive funding in
fiscal year 2007 at amounts similar to the amounts received in fiscal
year 2004.
(5) $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to fund domestic violence legal
advocacy, in recognition of reduced federal grant funding.
(6) $28,848,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for providing early childhood education
assistance. Of this amount, $1,497,000 is provided solely to increase
the number of children receiving education, and $1,052,000 is provided
solely for a targeted vendor rate increase.
(7) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall contract with a lender or contract collection agent to
act as a collection agent of the state. The lender or contract
collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and
deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected
shall be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest earned in the
account may be retained by the lender or contract collection agent, and
shall be considered a fee for processing payments on behalf of the
state. Repayments of loans granted under this chapter shall be made to
the lender or contract collection agent as long as the loan is
outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the chapter.
(8) $1,288,000 of the Washington housing trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No.
1074. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts in this
subsection shall lapse.
(9) $725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for food banks to obtain and
distribute additional nutritious food; and purchase equipment to
transport and store perishable products.
(10) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the community services block
grant program to help meet current service demands that exceed
available community action resources.
(11) $215,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for matching funds for a federal economic
development administration grant awarded to the city of Kent to conduct
a feasibility study and economic analysis for the establishment of a
center for advanced manufacturing.
(12) $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the department to compile a report on
housing stock in Washington state to identify areas of potentially high
risk for child lead exposure. This report shall include an analysis of
existing data regarding the ages of housing stock in specific regions
and an analysis of data regarding actual lead poisoning cases, which
shall be provided by the department of health's childhood lead
poisoning surveillance program.
(13) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the Cascade land conservancy to
develop and implement a plan for regional conservation within King,
Kittitas, Pierce, and Snohomish counties.
(14) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the support, including safety and
security costs, of the America's freedom salute to be held in the
Vancouver, Washington area.
(15) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to Snohomish county for a law
enforcement and treatment methamphetamine pilot program. $250,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $250,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are
provided solely to the Pierce county alliance's methamphetamine family
services treatment program and safe streets of Tacoma's methamphetamine
prevention service.
(16) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely for one pilot project to promote the study and implementation of
safe neighborhoods through community planning.
(17) $287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $288,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for Walla Walla community college
to establish the water and environmental studies center to provide
workforce education and training, encourage innovative approaches and
practices that address environmental and cultural issues, and
facilitate the Walla Walla watershed alliance role in promoting
communication leading to cooperative conservation efforts that
effectively address urban and rural water and environmental issues.
(18) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for work with the northwest food
processors association on the food processing cluster development
project.
(19) $140,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture
incubator project, which will support small farms in economic
development.
(20) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the department of community,
trade, and economic development as the final appropriation for the
youth assessment center in Pierce county for activities dedicated to
reducing the rate of incarceration of juvenile offenders.
(21) $235,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $235,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
small business incubator program. $250,000 must be distributed as
grants and must be matched by an equal amount of private funds.
(22) The department shall coordinate any efforts geared towards the
2010 Olympics with the regional effort being conducted by the Pacific
northwest economic region, a statutory committee.
(23) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for HistoryLink to expand its
free, noncommercial online encyclopedia service on state and local
history.
(24) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for Women's Hearth, a nonprofit
program serving the Spokane area's homeless and low-income women.
(25) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to the Pacific Science Center to host the
dead sea scrolls exhibition in September 2006.
(26) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for providing statewide sexual assault
services.
(27) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the Olympic loop of the great
Washington state birding trail.
(28) $529,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the department to provide to the department of
archeology and historic preservation through an interagency agreement.
The full amount of federal funding shall be transferred. The
department of community, trade, and economic development shall not
retain any portion for administrative purposes.
(29) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to assist the suburban cities association,
King county, and the cities of Seattle and Bellevue to comply with the
most acute buildable lands needs countywide. Of this amount, $50,000
is provided solely to the suburban cities association to fully fund a
buildable lands program manager position.
(30) $116,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for an increase to the statewide
coordination of the volunteer programs for court-appointed special
advocates.
(31) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the energy facilities siting and
evaluation council to make rules related to RCW 80.70.070, the carbon
dioxide mitigation statute.
(32) $712,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the department to provide each county
with an additional 0.5 FTE for prosecutors' victim/witness units.
(33) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the department to implement two
demonstration pilot projects related to transfer of development rights
in cooperation with Snohomish and Pierce county legislative
authorities. Projects may receive no more than $100,000.
(34) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the Seattle police department, and is
to be divided evenly between the weed and seed programs in southeast
Seattle and South Delridge/White Center to mitigate a one-year funding
lapse from the federal department of justice. This appropriation is
for the continuation of community police work and community building in
these areas.
(35) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to the Thurston county prosecutor's
office, for the Rochester weed and seed program to mitigate a one-year
funding lapse from the federal department of justice. This
appropriation is for the continuation of community police work and
community building in Rochester.
(36) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to the city of Poulsbo for the reopening
of the Poulsbo marine science center as an educational facility on the
Puget Sound marine environment.
(37) $544,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for an upgrade to discovery park's
daybreak star cultural center electrical system.
(38) $670,000 of the housing trust account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2418 (affordable housing program). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(39) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2498 (cluster-based economic development).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(40) $186,000 of the general fund--local appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2402 (energy facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(41) $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No.
3156 (low income persons). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((43))) (42) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for one-time backfill of the
federal reductions to the safe and drug free schools and communities
grant program.
(((44))) (43) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the developmental disabilities
council to contract for legal services for individuals with
developmental disabilities who are served or are entering the community
protection program in the department of social and health services
division of developmental disabilities. Funding shall be prioritized
for those individuals who do not have paid legal guardians, but is
available to all community protection clients, subject to available
funds.
(((45))) (44) $100,000 of the fiscal year 2006 general fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for tourism branding and marketing
associated with the January 2007 United States figure skating
championships in Spokane. It is the intent of the legislature to
provide an additional $500,000 during the 2007-09 fiscal biennium for
the payment of one-half of the hosting fee if Spokane is designated as
the host city of the 2009 world figure skating championships. The
funds provided under this section are contingent on an equal amount of
matching funds from nonstate sources.
(((46))) (45) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to the Pacific northwest economic
region as matching funds for use in the development and operation of a
regional tourism initiative in coordination with the department and
consistent with the governor's initiatives on marketing, tourism, and
trade. The department and the Pacific northwest economic region will
jointly establish appropriate deliverables. The first $25,000 of this
amount will be released when the Pacific northwest economic region has
secured at least $75,000 in funding from other public and private
sources. The final $25,000 of this amount will be released when the
Pacific northwest economic region has secured an additional $75,000 in
funding from other public and private sources. A minimum of 25 percent
of the matching funds raised by the Pacific northwest economic region
for the initiative shall be from private sources.
(((47))) (46) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the international trade
alliance of Spokane to partnership with other regional governments to
strengthen and diversify the regional economy.
(((48))) (47) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely to contract for a study that will
provide recommendations on a small harbor dredging cooperative among
the port districts of Pacific County and Wahkiakum County. The
recommendations shall include options for an organizational framework,
as well as the long-term financing of the cooperative.
(((49))) (48) $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely to the Pacific-Algona senior
center, a nonprofit food program serving low-income seniors.
(((50))) (49) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely to the northwest Korean sports and
cultural festival.
(((51))) (50) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to allow Washington state
tribes to continue participation in the Forest and Fish Report
currently out for public comment as a habitat conservation plan under
the endangered species act. In the event federal funding is
reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((52))) (51) $5,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided for Tacoma's international music festival.
(((53))) (52) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 ((is)) and $113,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Mimms
Academy in Tacoma to facilitate a pilot project concerning expelled and
suspended students.
(((54))) (53) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to the King county sexual assault
resource center to provide for a Spanish-speaking therapist position,
parent/child victim education, and prevention education.
(((55))) (54) $67,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for a study of methamphetamine
action teams and drug task forces as provided by Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6239, sections 110 and 204 (controlled substances).
The department shall report findings and recommendations to the
legislature by November 1, 2006. If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2006, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(((56))) (55) $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for distribution to Benton and
Franklin counties to continue the Benton-Franklin juvenile drug court
program. The counties shall provide an equivalent amount of matching
funds.
(((57))) (56) $7,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to the owners of the following
minor league baseball facilities for major and minor restoration and
repair of facilities projects: Tacoma Rainiers ($2,500,000); Spokane
Indians ($2,000,000); Tri-Cities Dust Devils ($1,000,000); Yakima Bears
($750,000); and Everett AquaSox ($750,000). The department shall not
retain any portion for administrative purposes.
(((58))) (57) $40,000 of the fiscal year 2006 general fund--state
appropriation and $1,510,000 of the fiscal year 2007 general fund--state appropriation are provided solely for the department to enter
into funding agreements with the mountains to sound greenway trust to
accomplish the following projects: Squak mountain trail upgrades;
Tiger mountain trailhead and trails upgrades; Rattlesnake mountain
trail and trailhead construction; greenway legacy planning; Snoqualmie
point view park construction; and state route 18/interstate 90
interchange protection.
(((59))) (58) $149,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to implement a human trafficking
task force as described in section 1 of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6652
(human trafficking), authorizing a task force through June 30, 2011, to
provide guidance in responding to the crime of human trafficking, and
in providing services to human trafficking victims.
(((60))) (59) $140,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Senate Bill
No. 5330 (economic development grants). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((61))) (60) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 ((and $197,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are)) is provided solely for the
long-term care ombudsman program within the department of community,
trade, and economic development to recruit and train volunteers to
serve in the adult family home setting.
(((62))) (61) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the Enumclaw loggers monument.

Sec. 1009 2006 c 372 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $579,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($523,000))
$546,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,105,000))
$1,128,000

Sec. 1010 2006 c 372 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,775,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,080,000))
$20,140,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,555,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,216,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,197,000))
$63,257,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the public works assistance account appropriation
is provided solely for an inventory and evaluation of the most
effective way to organize the state public infrastructure programs and
funds. The inventory and evaluation shall be delivered to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2005.
(2)(a) $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for an advisory council to study
residential services for persons with developmental disabilities. The
study shall identify a preferred system of services and a plan to
implement the system within four years. Recommendations shall be
provided on the services that best address client needs in different
regions of the state and on the preferred system by January 1, 2006.
The office of financial management may contract for specialized
services to complete the study.
(b) The advisory council shall consist of thirteen members.
Members appointed by the governor, include one representative from each
of the governor's office or the office of financial management, the
department of social and health services, the Washington state
disabilities council, two labor organizations, the community
residential care providers, residents of residential habilitation
centers, individuals served by community residential programs, and
individuals with developmental disabilities who reside or resided in
residential habilitation centers. The advisory council shall also
include two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives representing the majority and
minority caucuses and two members of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate representing the majority and minority
caucuses. Legislative members of the advisory group shall be
reimbursed in accordance with RCW 44.04.120, and nonlegislative members
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 44.04.120. Staff support shall be
provided by the department of social and health services, the
developmental disabilities council, the office of financial management,
the house of representatives office of program research, and senate
committee services.
(3) $1,041,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $706,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5441 (studying early
learning, K-12, and higher education). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided to the office of regulatory assistance and is
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) This amount is provided solely for the enhanced planning and
permit pilot program; and
(b) Regulatory assistance is to select two local government
planning and permitting offices to participate in an enhanced permit
assistance pilot program. Such enhancement may include, but is not
limited to:
(i) Creation of local and state interagency planning and permit
review teams;
(ii) Use of advanced online planning and permit applications;
(iii) Using loaned executives; and
(iv) Additional technical assistance and guidance for permit
applicants.
(5) $303,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $255,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1970 (government management). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(6) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Engrossed House Bill No. 1242 (budgeting outcomes and priorities). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) The department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife,
the department of natural resources, the conservation commission, and
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall make
recommendations to improve or eliminate monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery and watershed health. The agencies shall coordinate
with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and
consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of the report.
The agencies shall prepare a report detailing all new activity and
updating all previously identified activity within the comprehensive
monitoring strategy. The report shall identify the monitoring activity
being performed and include: The purpose of the monitoring activity,
when the activity started, who uses the information, how often it is
accessed, what costs are incurred by fund, what frequency is used to
collect data, what geographic location is used to collect data, where
the information is stored, and what is the current status and cost by
fund source of the data storage systems.
The agencies shall provide a status report summarizing progress to
the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and the office
of financial management by March 1, 2006. A final report to the
governor's monitoring forum, the office of financial management, and
the appropriate legislative fiscal committees shall be submitted no
later than September 1, 2006.
(8) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided to the office of financial management for the
purpose of contracting with the Washington State University and
University of Washington policy consensus center to provide project
coordination for the office of financial management, the department of
agriculture, the conservation commission, and the department of
community, trade, and economic development to work with farmers,
ranchers, and other interested parties to identify potential
agricultural pilot projects that both enhance farm income and improve
protection of natural resources.
(9) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the office of regulatory
assistance to implement activities supporting the governor's regulatory
improvement program including deployment of interagency permit teams,
a business portal, programmatic permits, and an alternative mitigation
program.
(((11))) (10) $46,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $131,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2353 (family child care
providers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((12))) (11) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the Washington state quality
award program to assist state agencies in obtaining the goals of the
Washington state quality award.
(((13))) (12) $66,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $134,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to establish and provide staff
support and technical assistance to the blue ribbon commission on
health care costs and access. The commission shall consist of the
governor or a designee, who shall serve as chair; two members from each
of the four caucuses of the legislature; the insurance commissioner or
a designee; the secretary of health; the administrator of the health
care authority; the assistant secretary for health and recovery
services in the department of social and health services; and the
assistant director for insurance services in the department of labor
and industries. By December 1, 2006, the commission shall recommend to
the governor and legislature a sustainable five-year plan for
substantially improving access to affordable health care for all
Washington residents.

Sec. 1011 2006 c 372 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,595,000))
$29,702,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $103,000 of the administrative hearing
revolving account--state appropriation is provided solely to determine,
in collaboration with other state agencies, the best mechanism of
digital recording for the office of administrative hearings, the manner
of conversion from tape recording to digital recording, and the
purchase of digital recording devices.

Sec. 1012 2006 c 372 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS -- OPERATIONS
Dependent Care Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,176,000))
$46,334,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,589,000))
$46,747,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $13,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1327,
chapter 65, Laws of 2005 (purchasing service credit).
(2) $10,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1269,
chapter 21, Laws of 2005 (law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 service credit purchase).
(3) $55,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1270 (law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2
postretirement employment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $26,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1319,
chapter 62, Laws of 2005 (law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 1 ex-spouse benefits).
(5) $46,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1325,
chapter 64, Laws of 2005 (military service credit purchase).
(6) $79,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1329,
chapter 67, Laws of 2005 (law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 1 reduced survivor benefit).
(7) $56,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1936
(emergency medical technician membership in law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 service). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(8) $16,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5522 (purchasing
service credit lost due to injury). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $80,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate
Bill No. 6453 (minimum monthly retirement). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $230,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 2932 (catastrophic disability benefit). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $78,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute
House Bill No. 2684 (plan 3 five-year vesting). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $117,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 2690 (service credit purchase). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $111,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2680 (TRS out-of-state service credit). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(14) $375,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute
House Bill No. 2691 (retirement for justices). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(15) $158,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No.
2391 (gain sharing revisions).

Sec. 1013 2006 c 372 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,302,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($92,647,000))
$92,471,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,627,000))
$5,377,000
Real Estate Excise Tax Grant Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $447,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($193,118,000))
$192,692,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, and $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1315 (modifying disclosure requirements for the purposes of
the real estate excise tax). If House Bill No. 1315 is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $7,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2006 and $2,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5101 (renewable energy). If Substitute Senate Bill No.
5101 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $114,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed House Bill No. 1241 (modifying vehicle licensing and
registration penalties).
(4) $1,390,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, and $1,240,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for the department to employ strategies to enhance
current revenue enforcement activities.
(5) $5,121 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2006 is provided solely to satisfy two claims to estate property,
pursuant to RCW 11.76.245.
(6) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $89,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2673 (local infrastructure).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $147,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2457 (tax relief/farm machinery). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $29,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No.
2466 (tax relief for aerospace) or for Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6604 (tax relief for aerospace). If neither of these bills are
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(9) $193,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No.
2671 (excise tax relief) or Substitute Senate Bill No. 6385 (excise tax
relief). If neither of these bills are enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $33,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 2640 (biotechnology product). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(11) $176,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2670 (hospital benefit zones). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1014 2006 c 372 s 138 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,362,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,213,000))
$1,218,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,581,000))
$2,586,000

Sec. 1015 2006 c 372 s 147 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,739,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,720,000))
$1,723,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,832,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($159,863,000))
$160,072,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($176,161,000))
$176,373,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) As authorized under RCW 66.16.010, the liquor control board
shall add an equivalent surcharge of $0.42 per liter on all retail
sales of spirits, excluding licensee, military and tribal sales,
effective no later than July 1, 2005. The intent of this surcharge is
to generate additional revenues for the state general fund in the
2005-07 biennium.
(2) $154,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the lease of state vehicles from the department
of general administration's motor pool.
(3) $2,228,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for costs associated with the installation of a wide
area network that connects all of the state liquor stores and the
liquor control board headquarters.
(4) $186,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for an alcohol education staff coordinator and
associated alcohol educational resources targeted toward middle school
and high school students.
(5) $2,261,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for replacement of essential computer equipment,
improvement of security measures, and improvement to the core
information technology infrastructure.
(6) $2,800,000 of the liquor control board construction and
maintenance account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
certificate of participation to fund the expansion of the liquor
distribution center.
(7) $3,233,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for upgrades to material handling system and
warehouse management system software and equipment, and associated
staff to increase the liquor distribution center's shipping capacity.
(8) $2,746,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for additional state liquor store and retail
business analysis staff. The additional liquor store staff will be
deployed to those stores with the greatest potential for increased
customer satisfaction and revenue growth. The liquor control board,
using the new retail business analysis staff and, if needed, an
independent consultant, will analyze the impact of additional staff on
customer satisfaction and revenue growth and make recommendations that
will increase the effectiveness and efficiency of all the liquor
control board's retail-related activities. Using best practices and
benchmarks from comparable retail organizations, the analysis will
evaluate and make recommendations, at a minimum, on the following
issues: Optimal staffing levels and store locations and numbers of
stores (both state liquor stores and contract liquor stores); options
for an improved retail organizational structure; strategies to increase
the retail decision-making capacity; and resources required for
enhanced internal organizational support of the retail activities. In
support of this evaluation, a survey shall be employed to gauge
customer satisfaction with state and contract liquor store services.
A written evaluation with recommendations shall be submitted to the
governor and the legislative fiscal committees by October 1, 2006.
(9) $187,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $122,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 6097 (tobacco products enforcement). If Senate Bill No. 6097
is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) $1,435,000 of the liquor revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1379 (liquor retail plan). If Substitute House Bill No.
1379 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) $1,864,000 of the liquor revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6823 (distribution of beer and wine). If
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6823 is not enacted by June 30, 2006,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $575,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No.
6537 (direct wine sales). If Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6537 is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 1016 2006 c 372 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,137,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,037,000))
$16,071,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($214,322,000))
$193,846,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,812,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,664,000))
$4,611,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,297,000))
$15,239,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,531,000))
$5,350,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,075,000))
$23,066,000
Military Department Rental and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $378,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($316,614,000))
$303,871,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($1,664,000)) $4,611,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation and (($6,297,000)) $15,239,000 of the disaster
response account -- federal appropriation may be spent only on disasters
declared by the governor and with the approval of the office of
financial management. The military department shall submit a report
quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative
fiscal committees detailing information on the disaster response
account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the
account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting
date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2005-07
biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) (($6,531,000)) $5,350,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--state appropriation and (($27,075,000)) $23,066,000 of the Nisqually
earthquake account -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
response and recovery costs associated with the February 28, 2001,
earthquake. The military department shall submit a report quarterly to
the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing earthquake recovery costs, including: (a)
Estimates of total costs; (b) incremental changes from the previous
estimate; (c) actual expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining
costs to be paid; and (e) estimates of future payments by biennium.
This information shall be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and
by amount paid on behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The
military department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office
of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2005-07 biennium based on current revenue and
expenditure patterns.
(3) (($173,613,000)) $152,033,573 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the
following conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) This amount shall not be allotted until a spending plan is
reviewed by the governor's domestic security advisory group and
approved by the office of financial management;
(c) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; incremental changes from the
previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security expenditures by
the state and local governments with this federal funding; and matching
or accompanying state or local expenditures; and
(d) The department shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing homeland security revenues and expenditures for
the previous fiscal year by county and legislative district.
(4) $867,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the Cowlitz county 911 communications
center for the purpose of purchasing or reimbursing the purchase of
interoperable radio communication technology to improve disaster
response in the Mount St. Helens area.
(5) No funds from sources other than fees from voice over internet
protocol (VOIP) providers may be used to implement technologies
specific to the integration of VOIP 911 with E-911. The military
department, in conjunction with the department of revenue, shall
propose methods for assuring the collection of an appropriate enhanced
911 excise tax from VOIP 911 providers and shall report their
recommendations to the legislature by November 1, 2005.
(6) $41,000 of the enhanced 911 account appropriation is provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2543 (911 advisory
committee). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7)(a) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the military department for
administration of competitive grants detailed in (b) of this subsection
and for implementation of one or more of the following activities
regarding emergency management: Development and coordination of
comprehensive emergency management plans; training of elected and
appointed officials on state laws, disaster command and response
structures, and the roles and responsibilities of officials before,
during, and after a disaster; and administrating periodic joint
emergency management training exercises involving the military
department and other state agencies. In addition, the military
department will study the feasibility of having regional disaster
medical assistance teams and urban search and rescue teams available
within the state to be deployed by the governor. The military
department will report the findings and recommendations to the
legislature by December 1, 2006.
(b) $1,600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the military department to allocate
grants to regional agencies, local governments, tribal governments,
regional incident management teams, and private organizations. The
grants shall be for one or more of the following purposes and
distributed on a competitive basis: Development and coordination of
comprehensive emergency management plans; training of elected and
appointed officials on state laws, ordinances, disaster command and
response structures, and the roles and responsibilities of officials
before, during, and after a disaster; administration of periodic joint
emergency management training exercises; and implementation of projects
that will strengthen emergency response, mitigation, preparation, and
coordination.
(8)(a) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the military department to: (i)
Initiate a health registry for veterans and military personnel
returning from Afghanistan, Iraq, or other countries in which depleted
uranium or other hazardous materials may be found; (ii) develop a plan
for outreach to and follow-up of military personnel; (iii) prepare a
report for service members concerning potential exposure to depleted
uranium and other toxic chemical substances and the precautions
recommended under combat and noncombat conditions while in a combat
zone; (iv) submit a report by October 1, 2006, to the joint veterans
and military affairs committee on the scope and adequacy of training
received by members of the Washington national guard on detecting
whether their service as eligible members is likely to entail, or to
have entailed, exposure to depleted uranium, including an assessment of
the feasibility and cost of adding predeployment training concerning
potential exposure to depleted uranium and other toxic chemical
substances; and (v) study the health effects of hazardous materials
exposure including, but not limited to, depleted uranium, as they
relate to military service and submit a report and recommendations to
the joint veterans and military affairs committee.
(b) By January 31, 2007, the joint veterans and military affairs
committee shall submit its recommendations, if any, to the appropriate
committees of the legislature.

Sec. 1017 2006 c 372 s 152 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,571,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,590,000))
$1,605,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,169,000))
$3,184,000

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:))

Sec. 1018 2006 c 372 s 154 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $745,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($728,000))
$845,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,037,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,527,000))
$2,644,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $184,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to contract with
the department of information services for information technology
operation and maintenance costs.

(End of part)

PART XI
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 1101 2006 c 372 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES. (1)
Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health
services shall initially be allotted as required by this act.
Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of
moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in
this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that
purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2006)) 2007,
unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year ((2006)) 2007 among
programs after approval by the director of financial management.
However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in
(b) of this subsection.
(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year
((2006)) 2007 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the
medical assistance, long-term care, foster care, adoption support, and
child support programs, the department may transfer state moneys that
are provided solely for a specified purpose, other than family support
appropriations for the developmental disabilities program in section
205(1)(e) of this act and family reconciliation services appropriations
for the children and family services program in section 202(20) of this
act, after approval by the director of financial management.
(c) The department shall not transfer funds, ((and the director of
financial management shall not approve the transfer,)) unless the
transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum
extent possible, the expenditure of state funds ((and not federal
funds)). The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written
notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of
the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and
appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or
transfers.
(4) The department is authorized to expend up to $4,700,000 of its
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 for any
reductions in federal funding in fiscal year 2006 for targeted case
management services for children who are in the care of the state. The
director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing seven
days prior to approving any allotment modifications under this
subsection.
(5) The department is authorized to develop an integrated health
care program designed to slow the progression of illness and disability
and better manage Medicaid expenditures for the aged and disabled
population. Under this Washington medicaid integration partnership
(WMIP) the department may combine and transfer such Medicaid funds
appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 209 of this act as may
be necessary to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons during the 2005-2007 biennium. The amount
of funding assigned to the pilot projects from each program may not
exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act for individuals
covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the health condition
of persons enrolled in the pilot, times the number of clients enrolled
in the pilot. In implementing the WMIP pilot projects, the department
may: (a) Withhold from calculations of "available resources" as set
forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the capitated rate for
individuals enrolled in the pilots; and (b) employ capitation financing
and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health care service
contractors licensed by the office of the insurance commissioner and
qualified to participate in both the medicaid and medicare programs.
The department shall conduct an evaluation of the WMIP, measuring
changes in participant health outcomes, changes in patterns of service
utilization, participant satisfaction, participant access to services,
and the state fiscal impact.
(6) In accordance with RCW 74.39A.300, the appropriations to the
department of social and health services in this act are sufficient to
implement the compensation and fringe benefits of the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers of home care
services.

Sec. 1102 2006 c 372 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,266,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($287,602,000))
$283,428,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($433,829,000))
$434,010,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,345,000))
$1,000,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,405,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,860,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($699,000))
$711,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($993,406,000))
$989,080,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,271,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $2,271,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $1,584,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the category of services titled
"intensive family preservation services."
(2) $701,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $701,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $322,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-
affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(4) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a foster parent retention
program. This program is directed at foster parents caring for
children who act out sexually.
(5) The providers for the 31 HOPE beds shall be paid a $1,000 base
payment per bed per month, and reimbursed for the remainder of the bed
cost only when the beds are occupied.
(6) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures. The
department shall adjust adoption support benefits to account for the
availability of the new federal adoption support tax credit for special
needs children. The department shall report annually by October 1st to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the specific efforts
taken to contain costs.
(7) $4,661,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $12,666,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $7,443,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for reforms to the child protective
services and child welfare services programs, including improvement in
achieving face-to-face contact for children every 30 days, improved
timeliness of child protective services investigations, and education
specialist services. The department shall report by December 1st of
each year on the implementation status of the enhancements, including
the hiring of new staff, and the outcomes of the reform efforts. The
information provided shall include a progress report on items in the
child and family services review program improvement plan and areas
identified for improvement in the Braam lawsuit settlement.
(8) Within amounts appropriated in this section, priority shall be
given to proven intervention models, including evidence-based
prevention and early intervention programs identified by the Washington
institute for public policy and the department. The department shall
include information on the number, type, and outcomes of the evidence-based programs being implemented in its reports on child welfare reform
efforts.
(9) $177,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $228,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the state association of
children's advocacy centers. Funds may be used for (a) children's
advocacy centers that meet the national children's alliance
accreditation standards for full membership, and are members in good
standing; (b) communities in the process of establishing a center; and
(c) the state association of children's advocacy centers. A 50 percent
match will be required of each center receiving state funding.
(10) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a street youth program in
Spokane.
(11) $4,672,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,672,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for secure crisis residential
centers.
(12) $572,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for section 305 of Senate Bill No.
5763 (mental disorders treatment) for chemical dependency specialist
services.
(13) (($3,500,000)) $3,386,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 and (($1,500,000)) $1,449,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for ((Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 5922 (child neglect). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, these amounts shall lapse)) chapter 512, Laws of 2005.
(14) (($1,345,000)) $1,000,000 of the domestic violence prevention
account appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 374, Laws of 2005.
(15) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the supervised visitation and safe
exchange center in Kent. The department shall not retain any portion
for administrative purposes.
(16) $450,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2002 (foster care support services). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $521,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $223,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for a statewide foster parent recruitment and retention
program pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 3115 (foster care
critical support). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) The department shall evaluate integrating a family assessment
component into its practice model for working with lower risk families
involved with child protective services. The department shall report
its findings to the joint task force on child safety for children in
child protective services or child welfare services by July 1, 2007.
(19) $3,700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $3,700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $6,200,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid treatment child care
(MTCC) program. The department shall contract for MTCC services. In
addition to referrals made by children's administration case workers,
the department shall authorize children referred to the MTCC program by
local public health nurses and case workers from the temporary
assistance for needy families (TANF) program, as long as the children
meet the eligibility requirements as outlined in the Washington state
plan for the MTCC program. Starting in June 2006, the department shall
report quarterly to the appropriate policy committees of the
legislature on the MTCC program and include monthly statewide and
regional information on: (a) The number of referrals; (b) the number
of authorized referrals and child enrollments; and (c) program
expenditure levels.
(20) $540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $2,476,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for the category of services titled "family
reconciliation services."
(21) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for continuum of care in Region 1.

Sec. 1103 2006 c 372 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,031,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,615,000))
$82,301,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,668,000))
$6,459,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,098,000))
$2,068,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,385,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,516,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($449,000))
$451,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($210,762,000))
$214,211,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $706,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation is provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $6,156,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts
provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county
impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $1,020,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,030,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $5,345,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation are provided solely to implement
community juvenile accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws
of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection
may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants,
administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the
grants.
(4) $2,997,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely to implement alcohol and
substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on
a competitive basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision
of services approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for
evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and
shall assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) For the purposes of a pilot project, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall provide a block grant, rather than
categorical funding, for consolidated juvenile services, community
juvenile accountability act grants, the chemically dependent
disposition alternative, and the special sex offender disposition
alternative to the Pierce county juvenile court. To evaluate the
effect of decategorizing funding for youth services, the juvenile court
shall do the following:
(a) Develop intermediate client outcomes according to the risk
assessment tool (RAT) currently used by juvenile courts and in
coordination with the juvenile rehabilitation administration;
(b) Track the number of youth participating in each type of
service, intermediate outcomes, and the incidence of recidivism within
twenty-four months of completion of services;
(c) Track similar data as in (b) of this subsection with an
appropriate comparison group, selected in coordination with the
juvenile rehabilitation administration and the family policy council;
(d) Document the process for managing block grant funds on a
quarterly basis, and provide this report to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the family policy council; and
(e) Provide a process evaluation to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the family policy council by June 20, 2006, and a
concluding report by June 30, 2007. The court shall develop this
evaluation in consultation with the juvenile rehabilitation
administration, the family policy council, and the Washington state
institute for public policy.
(6) $319,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $678,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to establish a reinvesting in
youth pilot program. Participation shall be limited to three counties
or groups of counties, including one charter county with a population
of over eight hundred thousand residents and at least one county or
group of counties with a combined population of three hundred thousand
residents or less.
(a) Only the following intervention service models shall be funded
under the pilot program: (i) Functional family therapy; (ii)
multi-systemic therapy; and (iii) aggression replacement training.
(b) Subject to (c) of this subsection, payments to counties in the
pilot program shall be sixty-nine percent of the average service model
cost per youth times the number of youth engaged by the selected
service model. For the purposes of calculating the average service
model cost per engaged youth for a county, the following costs will be
included: Staff salaries, staff benefits, training, fees, quality
assurance, and local expenditures on administration.
(c) Distribution of moneys to the charter county with a population
of over eight hundred thousand residents shall be based upon the number
of youth that are engaged by the intervention service models, up to six
hundred thousand dollars for the biennium. The department may
distribute the remaining grant moneys to the other counties selected to
participate in the pilot program.
(d) The department shall provide recommendations to the legislature
by June 30, 2006, regarding a cost savings calculation methodology, a
funds distribution formula, and criteria for service model eligibility
for use if the reinvesting in youth program is continued in future
biennia.
(7) $602,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims in
Brown, et. al v. State of Washington, Pierce County Superior Court
Cause No. 04-2-11093-4. The expenditure of this appropriation is
contingent on the release of all claims in this case, and total
settlement costs shall not exceed the amount provided in this
subsection. If settlement is not executed by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1104 2006 c 372 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,292,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($283,039,000))
$278,724,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($344,331,000))
$338,013,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,970,000))
$6,100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($889,632,000))
$883,129,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $103,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for persons and services not
covered by the medicaid program. The department shall distribute this
amount among the regional support networks according to a formula that,
consistent with RCW 71.24.035(13), assures continuation of fiscal year
2003 levels of nonmedicaid service in each regional support network
area for the following service categories in the following priority
order: (i) Crisis and commitment services; (ii) community inpatient
services; and (iii) residential care services, including personal care
and emergency housing assistance. The formula shall also ensure that
each regional support network's combined state and federal allocation
is no less than the amount it was due under the fiscal year 2005
allocation methodology. The remaining amounts shall be distributed
based upon a formula that incorporates each regional support network's
percentage of the state's population.
(b) $100,959,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for persons and services not
covered by the medicaid program. Consistent with RCW 71.24.035(13),
these funds shall be distributed proportional to each regional support
network's percentage of the total state population.
(c) (($10,882,000)) $10,466,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 and (($10,922,000)) $10,504,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to increase
medicaid capitation rates (i) by three and one-half percent, for
regional support networks whose fiscal year 2006 capitation rates are
above the statewide population-weighted average; and (ii) to the
statewide population-weighted average, for regional support networks
whose fiscal year 2006 capitation rates are below that level. Regional
support networks may elect to receive all or a portion of the general
fund--state share of the funding for which they qualify under this
subsection (1)(c) as an increase in nonmedicaid rather than medicaid
funding. Regional support networks choosing to obtain funding in this
way must notify the department of their decision no later than June 1,
2006.
(d) $359,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to ensure that no regional support
network's combined state and federal allocation is less than the amount
it was due under the fiscal year 2006 allocation methodology.
(e) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for grants to hospitals that are unable to
receive disproportionate share hospital funding due to the federal
funding restrictions on "institutions for mental disease." These funds
shall be allocated among eligible hospitals proportional to the amount
the hospital would have received from the disproportionate share
hospital grants funded under section 209 of this 2006 act if the
federal funding restriction were not in effect.
(f) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for a contract with the national alliance
for the mentally ill of greater Seattle to assist people who are
recovering from a major mental illness to participate in development of
a group residence for women.
(g) $2,825,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to refund to regional support networks
fifty percent of the "liquidated damages" amount that was withheld from
payments to the regional support network during fiscal years 2002
through 2005 because the regional support network used more than its
allocated number of state hospital days of care. The payments directed
in this subsection (1)(g) are contingent upon agreement by the regional
support network that the funds shall be used only for mental health
services. The payments directed in this subsection do not apply to
regional support networks to which such refunds have been directed by
court order prior to the effective date of this 2006 act.
(h) The department shall refund to the regional support networks
100 percent of the "liquidated damages" that have been withheld from
payments to the regional support network during fiscal year 2006 for
periods prior to the effective date of this act. The payments directed
in this subsection (1)(h) do not apply to regional support networks to
which such refunds have been directed by court order prior to the
effective date of this act.
(i) $3,238,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the department and regional support
networks to contract for development and initial implementation of
high-intensity program for active community treatment (PACT) teams, and
other proven program approaches which the department concurs will
enable the regional support network to achieve significant reductions
during fiscal year 2008 and thereafter in the number of beds the
regional support network would otherwise need to use at the state
hospitals.
(j) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall average 222 per day
throughout fiscal year 2007. The number of nonforensic beds allocated
for use by regional support networks at western state hospital shall
average 727 during the first quarter of fiscal year 2007, 757 during
the second quarter of fiscal year 2007, and 777 during the third and
fourth quarters of fiscal year 2007. During fiscal year 2007, the
department shall not separately charge regional support networks for
use of state hospital beds for short-term commitments, or for persons
served in the program for adaptive living skills (PALS), but the days
of care provided for such commitments and in the PALS program shall
count against the regional support network's state hospital allocation.
The legislature intends to authorize separate charges for the PALS
program beginning in January 2008.
(k) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(l) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department
shall contract with the Clark county regional support network for
development and operation of a project demonstrating collaborative
methods for providing intensive mental health services in the school
setting for severely emotionally disturbed children who are medicaid
eligible. Project services shall be delivered by teachers and teaching
assistants who qualify as, or who are under the supervision of, mental
health professionals meeting the requirements of chapter 275-57 WAC.
The department shall increase medicaid payments to the regional support
network by the amount necessary to cover the necessary and allowable
costs of the demonstration, not to exceed the upper payment limit
specified for the regional support network in the department's medicaid
waiver agreement with the federal government after meeting all other
medicaid spending requirements assumed in this subsection. The
regional support network shall provide the required nonfederal share of
the increased medicaid payment provided for operation of this project.
(m) $3,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to establish a base community
psychiatric hospitalization payment rate. The base payment rate shall
be $400 per indigent patient day at hospitals that accept commitments
under the involuntary treatment act, and $550 per medicaid patient day
at free-standing psychiatric hospitals that accept commitments under
the involuntary treatment act. The department shall allocate these
funds among the regional support networks to reflect projected
expenditures at the enhanced payment level by hospital and region.
(n) At least $902,000 of the federal block grant funding
appropriated in this subsection shall be used for the continued
operation of the mentally ill offender pilot program.
(o) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for mental health services for
mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for
facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon
mentally ill offenders' release from confinement. These amounts shall
supplement, and not supplant, local or other funding or in-kind
resources currently being used for these purposes. The department is
authorized to transfer such amounts as are necessary, which are not to
exceed $418,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $418,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, to the economic services program for the purposes of
implementing section 12 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
1290 (community mental health) related to reinstating and facilitating
access to mental health services upon mentally ill offenders' release
from confinement.
(p) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for grants for innovative mental
health service delivery projects. Such projects may include, but are
not limited to, clubhouse programs and projects for integrated health
care and behavioral health services for general assistance recipients.
These amounts shall supplement, and not supplant, local or other
funding currently being used for activities funded under the projects
authorized in this subsection.
(q) The department is authorized to continue to expend federal
block grant funds, and special purpose federal grants, through direct
contracts, rather than through contracts with regional support
networks; and to distribute such funds through a formula other than the
one established pursuant to RCW 71.24.035(13).
(r) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(s) $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $4,500,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment. Coordination of these services will be done in partnership
between the mental health program and the aging and disability services
administration. The funds are not subject to the standard allocation
formula applied in accordance with RCW 71.24.035(13)(a).
(t) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided to continue performance-based incentive
contracts to provide appropriate community support services for
individuals with severe mental illness who have been discharged from
the state hospitals. These funds will be used to enhance community
residential and support services provided by regional support networks
through other state and federal funding.
(u) $539,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to assist with the one-time start-up costs
of two evaluation and treatment facilities. Funding for ongoing
program operations shall be from existing funds that would otherwise be
expended upon short-term treatment in state or community hospitals.
(v) $550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for enhancing rates to a facility
that (i) is a licensed nursing home; (ii) is considered to be an
"Institution for Mental Diseases" under centers for medicare and
medicaid services criteria; (iii) specializes in long-term
rehabilitation services for people with chronic mental illness who are
chronically medically-compromised; and (iv) provides services to a
minimum of 48 consumers funded by a regional support network. These
amounts shall be provided in coordination with and under the auspices
of a regional support network and shall enhance, and not supplant,
other funding or in-kind resources currently being used for these
purposes. These funds shall be used to cover costs incurred throughout
fiscal year 2006 and fiscal year 2007 and ensure adequate compensation
for extra medical care services, personal care services, and other
incidental costs that are not fully covered in the current rate paid to
the facility.
(w) $450,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the mental health division, in
collaboration with the children's administration and the juvenile
rehabilitation services administration, to establish a pilot program to
provide evidence-based mental health services to children. The mental
health service or services to be provided under the pilot program must
be selected from a list of evidence-based service options developed by
the department, in consultation with a broadly representative group of
individuals with expertise in children's mental health.
(i) The program site shall be selected through a request for
proposal (RFP) process, open to counties or groups of counties, and
shall be operational by December 2006.
(ii) Pilot site proposals shall be required to include: A
designated lead agency and a commitment to work with community
partners, including consumer/family representatives and representatives
of the local mental health, juvenile justice, and child welfare systems
and, at the applicant's discretion, may also include representatives of
other child-serving systems such as health care and education;
identification of areas of potential need based upon input from
community partners; identification of the service or services that the
pilot site would implement based upon community needs and resources;
and demonstration of a commitment to participate in efforts that will
ensure adherence to the chosen evidence-based practices and evaluate
outcomes of implementation of the evidence-based practices.
(iii) The department shall contract with the University of
Washington school of medicine's department of psychiatry and behavioral
sciences division of public behavioral health and justice to provide
support and assistance in all phases of the pilot program, including
initiating, implementing, training providers, providing quality
assurance, and monitoring implementation and outcomes.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,706,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($137,445,000))
$132,747,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($143,693,000))
$144,509,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,994,000))
$35,290,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $965,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($428,803,000))
$429,217,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state mental hospitals may use funds appropriated in this
subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $3,725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to operate at least one more
forensic ward at western state hospital than was operational in
December 2004, and to employ professional staff in addition to those
assigned in December 2004 to conduct outpatient evaluations of
competency to stand trial.
(c) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood on September 1 of each year for police services provided by
the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.
(d) $6,770,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $19,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to open on a temporary basis five
additional adult civil commitment wards at the state psychiatric
hospitals. The legislature intends for these wards to close, on a
phased basis, during the 2007-09 biennium as a result of targeted
investments in community services for persons who would otherwise need
care in the hospitals. To the extent that the department and regional
support networks are able to develop and implement cost-effective
approaches during fiscal year 2007 that would avert the need to open
one or more of the additional wards, the department is authorized to
use funds appropriated in this subsection for implementation of those
approaches. The department shall seek review and comment from the
legislative fiscal committees at least thirty days prior to proceeding
with implementation of any such alternative approach.

(3) CIVIL COMMITMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,499,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,276,000))
$42,481,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,904,000))
$83,109,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $643,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,726,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,395,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,765,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $40,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement the request for proposal process required
by House Bill No. 1290 (community mental health). If House Bill No.
1290 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, these amounts shall lapse.
(b) $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to develop and to train community
mental health staff in the use of the integrated chemical
dependency/mental health screening and assessment system and tool
required by section 601 of Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders
treatment). If section 601 of Senate Bill No. 5763 is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, these amounts shall lapse.
(c) Funds provided in this subsection may be used to issue a
request for proposals in accordance with RCW 71.24.320(2) only if
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6793 is enacted by June 30, 2006.

(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,577,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,183,000))
$4,473,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,881,000))
$6,179,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,000))
$21,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,660,000))
$17,250,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $164,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the institute for public policy to continue the
longitudinal analysis directed in chapter 334, Laws of 2001 (mental
health performance audit), and, to the extent funds are available
within these amounts, to build upon the evaluation of the impacts of
chapter 214, Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders).
(b) $2,032,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the purposes of complying with and
satisfaction of a final court order and judgment in Pierce County, et
al v. State of Washington and State of Washington Department of Social
and Health Services, et al, Thurston County Superior Court Cause No.
03-2-00918-8.
(c) $520,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims in
County of Spokane, a Washington municipal entity v. State of Washington
Department of Social and Health Services and Dennis Braddock, the
Secretary of the Department of Social and Health Services, in his
official capacity, Thurston County Superior Court Cause No. 03-2-01268-5. The expenditure of this amount is contingent on the release of all
claims in the case, and total settlement costs shall not exceed the
amount provided in this subsection. If the settlement is not executed
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(d) Funds provided in this subsection may be used to issue a
request for proposals in accordance with RCW 71.24.320(2) only if
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6793 is enacted by June 30, 2006.

Sec. 1105 2006 c 372 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $296,430,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($312,856,000))
$317,942,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($503,419,000))
$512,959,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $904,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,113,747,000))
$1,128,373,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The entire health services account appropriation, $151,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006, $427,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and
$1,482,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for health care benefits for agency home care workers who are
employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours a week. The
state contribution to the cost of health care benefits per
participating worker per month shall be no greater than $449.00 in
fiscal year 2006 and $532.00 in fiscal year 2007.
(b) Individuals receiving family support or high school transition
payments as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental
payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW
74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.
(c) $516,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, (($1,917,000)) $2,920,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and (($2,433,000)) $3,306,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
community residential and support services. Funding in this subsection
shall be prioritized for (i) residents of residential habilitation
centers who are able to be adequately cared for in community settings
and who choose to live in those community settings; (ii) clients
without residential services who are at immediate risk of
institutionalization or in crisis; (iii) children who are aging out of
other state services; and (iv) current home and community-based waiver
program clients who have been assessed as having an immediate need for
increased services. The department shall ensure that the average cost
per day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not
exceed $300. In order to maximize the number of clients served and
ensure the cost-effectiveness of the waiver programs, the department
will strive to limit new client placement expenditures to 90 percent of
the budgeted daily rate. If this can be accomplished, additional
clients may be served with excess funds provided the total projected
carry-forward expenditures do not exceed the amounts estimated. The
department shall electronically report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the
number of persons served with these additional community services,
where they were residing, what kinds of services they were receiving
prior to placement, and the actual expenditures for all community
services to support these clients.
(d) $579,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, (($1,735,000)) $2,023,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and (($2,315,000)) $2,557,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
expanded community services for persons with developmental disabilities
who also have community protection issues. Funding in this subsection
shall be prioritized for (i) clients being diverted or discharged from
the state psychiatric hospitals; (ii) clients participating in the
dangerous mentally ill offender program; (iii) clients participating in
the community protection program; and (iv) mental health crisis
diversion outplacements. The department shall ensure that the average
cost per day for all program services other than start-up costs shall
not exceed (($300)) $325. In order to maximize the number of clients
served and ensure the cost-effectiveness of the waiver programs, the
department will strive to limit new client placement expenditures to 90
percent of the budgeted daily rate. If this can be accomplished,
additional clients may be served with excess funds if the total
projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed the amounts
estimated. The department shall implement the four new waiver programs
such that decisions about enrollment levels and the amount, duration,
and scope of services maintain expenditures within appropriations. The
department shall electronically report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the
number of persons served with these additional community services,
where they were residing, what kinds of services they were receiving
prior to placement, and the actual expenditures for all community
services to support these clients.
(e) $12,902,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, (($13,802,000)) $12,502,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and $8,579,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for family support
programs for individuals with developmental disabilities.
((Of)) The amounts provided in this subsection (((e), $900,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and
$1,600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2007 are provided solely)) are sufficient for the implementation of a
flexible family support pilot program for families who are providing
care and support for family members with developmental disabilities.
The program shall provide funding for support services such as respite
care, training and counseling, assistive technologies, transition
services, and assistance with extraordinary household expenses.
(i) To receive funding, an individual must: (A) Be eligible for
services from the division of developmental disabilities; (B) live with
his or her family; (C) not live independently or with a spouse; (D) not
receive paid services through the division, including medicaid personal
care and medicaid waiver services; and (E) have gross household income
of less than or equal to four hundred percent of the federal poverty
level.
(ii) The department shall determine individual funding awards based
on the following criteria: (A) Documented need for services, with
priority given to individuals in crisis or at immediate risk of needing
institutional services, individuals who transition from high school
without employment or day program opportunities, individuals cared for
by a single parent, and individuals with multiple disabilities; (B)
number and ages of family members and their relation to the individual
with developmental disabilities; (C) gross annual household income; and
(D) availability of state funds.
Funding awards may be made as one-time awards or on a renewable
basis. Renewable awards shall be for a period of twelve months for the
biennium. Awards shall be based upon the criteria provided in this
subsection, but shall be within the following limits: Maximum of
$4,000 per year for an individual whose gross annual household income
is up to 100 percent of the federal poverty level; maximum of $3,000
per year for an individual whose gross annual household income is up to
200 percent of the federal poverty level; maximum of $2,000 per year
for an individual whose gross annual household income is up to 300
percent of the federal poverty level; and maximum of $1,000 per year
for an individual whose gross annual household income is up to 400
percent of the federal poverty level. Of the amounts provided in this
subsection, $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for one-time awards.
(iii) Eligibility for, and the amount of, renewable awards and one-time awards shall be redetermined annually and shall correspond with
the application of the department's mini-assessment tool. At the end
of each award period, the department must redetermine eligibility for
funding, including increases or reductions in the level of funding, as
appropriate.
(iv) By November 1, 2006, the department shall provide
recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature on strategies for integrating state-funded family support
programs, including, if appropriate, the flexible family support pilot
program, into a single program. The department shall also provide
((a)) an additional status report by November 1, 2007, on the flexible
family support pilot program, which shall include the following
information: The number of applicants for funding; the total number of
awards; the number and amount of both annual and one-time awards,
broken down by household income levels; and the purpose of the awards.
(v) The department shall manage enrollment and award levels so as
to not exceed the amounts appropriated for this purpose.
(f) $840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $3,060,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $1,500,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for employment and day services.
Priority consideration for this new funding shall be young adults with
developmental disabilities living with their family who need employment
opportunities and assistance after high school graduation. Services
shall be provided for both waiver and nonwaiver clients.
(g) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $2,000,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided for implementation of the administrative
rate standardization. These amounts are in addition to any vendor rate
increase adopted by the legislature.
(h) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for services to community clients
provided by licensed professionals at the state residential
habilitation centers. The division shall submit claims for
reimbursement for services provided to clients living in the community
with medical assistance or third-party health coverage, as appropriate,
and shall implement a system for billing clients without coverage. The
department shall provide a report by December 1, 2006, to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the number of clients
served, services provided, and expenditures and revenues associated
with those services.
(i) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $65,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for supplemental compensation increases for direct care
workers employed by home care agencies in recognition of higher labor
market cost pressures experienced by agencies subject to collective
bargaining obligations. In order for a specific home care agency to be
eligible for such increases, home care agencies shall submit the
following to the department:
(i) Proof of a legally binding, written commitment to increase the
compensation of agency home care workers; and
(ii) Proof of the existence of a method of enforcement of the
commitment, such as arbitration, that is available to the employees or
their representative, and proof that such a method is expeditious, uses
a neutral decision maker, and is economical for the employees.
(j) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $12,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase boarding home provider payment rates by 1.0
percent, effective July 1, 2006.
(k) $134,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $134,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase adult family home provider payment rates by
1.0 percent, effective July 1, 2006.
(l) $955,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $958,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for a rate increase for supported living providers of
15 cents per hour for King county, and 12 cents per hour for all other
counties.
(m) $778,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $580,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for additional case managers and support staff. The
department shall dedicate half of the amount provided in this
subsection to accelerate the implementation of the mini-assessment tool
on clients not currently receiving paid services, who are receiving
medicaid.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,623,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,826,000))
$78,142,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($153,807,000))
$158,868,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,237,000))
$13,674,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $457,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($320,950,000))
$327,764,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The developmental disabilities program is
authorized to use funds appropriated in this section to purchase goods
and supplies through direct contracting with vendors when the program
determines it is cost-effective to do so.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,312,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,924,000))
$1,915,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,014,000))
$3,490,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,000))
$19,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,267,000))
$7,736,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $578,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $578,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of developing
and implementing a consistent needs assessment instrument for use on
all clients with developmental disabilities. In developing the
instrument, the department shall develop a process for collecting data
on family income for minor children with developmental disabilities and
all individuals who are receiving state-only funded services. The
department shall ensure that this information is captured as part of
the client assessment process.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
((General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000))
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,238,000))
$17,227,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,268,000))
$17,240,000

Sec. 1106 2006 c 372 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $610,082,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($663,865,000))
$661,347,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,312,062,000))
$1,310,970,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,949,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,888,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($317,000))
$319,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,610,163,000))
$2,606,555,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire health services account appropriation, $6,911,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006,
(($11,571,000)) $9,581,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and (($23,251,000)) $20,410,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits for
agency home care workers who are employed through state contracts for
at least twenty hours a week. The state contribution to the cost of
health care benefits per eligible participating worker per month shall
be no greater than $449.00 in fiscal year 2006 and $532.00 per month in
fiscal year 2007. The department, in consultation with the home care
quality authority and the health care authority, shall examine how the
state determines the appropriate level of health care costs when
establishing state contribution rates for all agency and individual
home care workers caring for state subsidized clients. The department
shall recommend options as to how equivalent benefits can be purchased
on behalf of home care workers in a more cost effective manner to the
office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of
the legislature by October 1, 2006.
(2) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $147.57 for
fiscal year 2006 and shall not exceed (($156.41)) $155.99 for fiscal
year 2007.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue certificates of capital authorization that result in up to $16
million of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in
fiscal year 2006; up to $16 million of increased asset value completed
and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2007; and up to $16 million of
increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year
2008.
(4) Adult day health services shall not be considered a duplication
of services for persons receiving care in long-term care settings
licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW.
(5) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not qualify
for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval
and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 600
persons at any time.
(b) The second waiver program shall include coverage of in-home
care. Enrollment in this second waiver shall not exceed 200 persons at
any time.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(d) If it is necessary to establish a waiting list for either
waiver because the budgeted number of enrollment opportunities has been
reached, the department shall track how the long-term care needs of
applicants assigned to the waiting list are met.
(6) $1,604,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $3,450,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $5,064,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase compensation for direct
care workers employed by home care agencies by 27 cents per hour on
July 1, 2005, and by an additional 23 cents per hour on July 1, 2006.
The amounts in this subsection also include the funds needed for the
employer share of unemployment and social security taxes on the amount
of the increase.
(7) $1,786,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,804,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
chore services program.
(8) The department shall establish waiting lists to the extent
necessary to assure that annual expenditures on the community options
program entry systems (COPES) program do not exceed appropriated
levels. In establishing and managing any such waiting list, the
department shall assure priority access to persons with the greatest
unmet needs, as determined by department assessment processes.
(9) $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $8,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $101,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to expand the number of boarding homes that receive
exceptional care rates for persons with Alzheimer's disease and related
dementias who might otherwise require nursing home care. The
department may expand the number of licensed boarding home facilities
that specialize in caring for such conditions by up to 85 beds in
fiscal year 2006 and up to 150 beds in fiscal year 2007.
(10) $305,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $377,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the senior farmer's market
nutrition program.
(11) $109,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $198,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1220 (long-term care financing). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for area agencies on aging, or
entities with which area agencies on aging contract, to provide a
kinship navigator for grandparents and other kinship caregivers of
children in both western and eastern Washington.
(a) Kinship navigator services shall include but not be limited to
assisting kinship caregivers with understanding and navigating the
system of services for children in out-of-home care while reducing
barriers faced by kinship caregivers when accessing services.
(b) In providing kinship navigator services, area agencies on aging
shall give priority to helping kinship caregivers maintain their
caregiving role by helping them access existing services and supports,
thus keeping children from entering foster care.
(13) $435,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $435,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for supplemental compensation increases for direct care
workers employed by home care agencies in recognition of higher labor
market cost pressures experienced by agencies subject to collective
bargaining obligations. In order for a specific home care agency to be
eligible for such increases, home care agencies shall submit the
following to the department:
(a) Proof of a legally binding, written commitment to increase the
compensation of agency home care workers; and
(b) Proof of the existence of a method of enforcement of the
commitment, such as arbitration, that is available to the employees or
their representative, and proof that such a method is expeditious, uses
a neutral decision maker, and is economical for the employees.
(14) $7,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $7,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for purposes of settling all claims in the class action
suit commonly known as Regency Pacific et al. v. Department of Social
and Health Services. The expenditure of this amount is contingent on
the release of all claims in the case, and total settlement costs shall
not exceed the amount provided in this subsection.
(15) $121,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $120,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2475
(individual providers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $57,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6630 (threatening individuals). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2006, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $4,493,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $4,478,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2333 (agency
home care workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $183,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $184,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for payments to a boarding home licensed under chapter
18.20 RCW on January 25, 2002, which contracts with the department to
provide assisted living services and which serves 20 or more clients
participating in the program for all-inclusive care.
(19) $10,090,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 and $10,090,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of House Bill
No. 2716 (nursing facility payment). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for area agencies on aging, or
entities with which area agencies on aging contract, to provide support
services through the kinship caregiver support program for grandparents
and other informal kinship caregivers of children throughout the state.
(21) $732,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $715,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase boarding home provider payment rates by 1.0
percent, effective July 1, 2006.
(22) $443,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $437,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase adult family home provider payment rates by
1.0 percent, effective July 1, 2006.

Sec. 1107 2006 c 372 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($514,027,000))
$513,976,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($531,957,000))
$537,966,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,245,673,000))
$1,225,905,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,535,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,138,000))
$1,169,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,320,330,000))
$2,306,551,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $303,247,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006, $307,273,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007, and $905,232,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst
program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the
department shall:
(a) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Outcome data regarding job retention and wage progression
shall be reported quarterly to appropriate fiscal and policy committees
of the legislature for families who leave assistance, measured after 12
months, 24 months, and 36 months. The department shall also report the
percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance for
needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months; and
(b) Submit a report by October 1, 2005, to the fiscal committees of
the legislature containing a spending plan for the WorkFirst program.
The plan shall identify how spending levels in the 2005-2007 biennium
will be adjusted to stay within available federal grant levels and the
appropriated state-fund levels.
(2) $72,526,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($77,880,000)) $82,259,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for cash
assistance and other services to recipients in the general
assistance((--unemployable)) program. Within these amounts:
(a) The department may expend funds for services that assist
recipients to obtain employment and reduce their dependence on public
assistance, provided that expenditures for these services and cash
assistance do not exceed the funds provided. Mental health, substance
abuse, and vocational rehabilitation services may be provided to
recipients whose incapacity is not severe enough to qualify for
services through a regional support network, the alcoholism and drug
addiction treatment and support act, or the division of vocational
rehabilitation to the extent that those services are necessary to
eliminate or minimize barriers to employment;
(b) The department shall review the general assistance caseload to
identify recipients that would benefit from assistance in becoming
naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal
supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high
priority for naturalization funding through the department;
(c) The department shall identify general assistance recipients who
are or may be eligible to receive health care coverage or services
through the federal veteran's administration and assist recipients in
obtaining access to those benefits; and
(d) The department shall report by November of each year to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the progress and outcomes
of these efforts.
(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall increase the state supplemental payment by $10 per month
beginning in fiscal year 2006, and by an additional $2.06 per month
beginning in fiscal year 2007, for SSI clients who reside in nursing
facilities, residential habilitation centers, or state hospitals and
who receive a personal needs allowance and decrease other state
supplemental payments.
(4) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $10,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a subsidy rate increase for
child care providers. Of this amount, $500,000 per year shall be
targeted for child care providers in urban areas of region 1 and
$500,000 per year shall be targeted for one or more tiered-reimbursement pilot projects.
(5) $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $61,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1329
(deficit reduction act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1108 2006 c 372 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND
SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,136,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,345,000))
$59,865,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($136,750,000))
$156,935,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $634,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,500,000))
$16,745,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,842,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,081,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($328,677,000))
$341,627,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $1,350,000 of the problem gambling account appropriation
are provided solely for the program established in Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1031 (problem gambling). If legislation creating the
account is not enacted by June 30, 2005, this amount shall lapse.
(2) $1,339,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,713,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the parent child assistance
program, including an expansion of services to southwestern Washington
and Skagit county. The department shall contract with the University
of Washington and community-based providers in Spokane, Yakima, Skagit
county, and southwestern Washington for the provision of this program.
For all contractors, indirect charges for administering the program
shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount. The amounts
provided in this subsection are sufficient to fund section 303 of
Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders treatment).
(3) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for vendor rate adjustments for
residential treatment providers for chemical dependency services.
(4) $465,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $934,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, $1,319,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, and
$700,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation are provided solely for vendor rate adjustments for
residential treatment providers. To the extent that a portion of this
funding is sufficient to maintain sufficient residential treatment
capacity, remaining amounts may then be used to provide vendor rate
adjustments to other types of providers as prioritized by the
department in order to maintain or increase treatment capacity.
(5) $1,916,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,278,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for integrated pilot programs as
required by section 203 of Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders
treatment). If section 203 of Senate Bill No. 5763 is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for intensive case management
pilot programs as required by section 220 of Senate Bill No. 5763
(mental disorders treatment). If section 220 of Senate Bill No. 5763
is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $159,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $140,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $161,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for development of the integrated chemical
dependency/mental health screening and assessment tool required by
section 601 of Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders treatment), and
associated training and quality assurance. If section 601 of Senate
Bill No. 5763 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $5,475,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, (($13,124,000)) $6,727,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and (($10,669,000)) $6,997,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to increase
capacity of chemical dependency treatment services for adult medicaid
eligible and general assistance-unemployable clients. The department
shall monitor the number and type of clients entering treatment, for
purposes of determining potential cost offsets.
(9) $1,967,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, (($2,523,000)) $1,361,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and (($1,496,000)) $1,109,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to increase
capacity of chemical dependency treatment services for minors who are
under 200 percent of the federal poverty level. The department shall
monitor the number and type of clients entering treatment, for purposes
of determining potential cost offsets.

Sec. 1109 2006 c 372 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,462,447,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,550,541,000))
$1,535,463,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,001,987,000))
$3,902,112,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($677,288,000))
$663,077,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($123,000))
$124,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,709,386,000))
$7,580,223,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) The department shall continue to extend medicaid eligibility to
children through age 18 residing in households with incomes below 200
percent of the federal poverty level.
(3) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the department is authorized to disregard recoveries by
Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined
in RCW 48.104.030.
(4) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to continue podiatry services for medicaid-eligible adults.
(5) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to provide an adult dental benefit that is equivalent to the
benefit provided in the 2003-05 biennium.
(6) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The
public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the
required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the
payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules.
It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental
to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated
and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the
legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall
not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues
retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments.
(7) $2,221,000 of the health services account appropriation,
$5,402,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation, $1,590,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006, and
$1,591,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2007 are provided solely for grants to rural hospitals. The department
shall distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively
larger share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(8) $21,092,000 of the health services account appropriation and
$19,725,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided
solely for grants to nonrural hospitals. The department shall
distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively larger
share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(9) In response to the federal directive to eliminate
intergovernmental transfer transactions effective June 30, 2005, the
department is directed to implement the inpatient hospital certified
public expenditures program for the 2005-07 biennium. The program
shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated
by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or
state psychiatric institutions. Hospitals in the program shall be paid
and shall retain (a) one hundred percent of the federal portion of each
medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by the medical
assistance administration; and (b) one hundred percent of the federal
portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment
allowable under federal regulations. Medicaid fee-for-service claim
amounts shall be established by applying the department's ratio of
costs to charges payment methodology. The department shall provide
participating hospitals with the information and instructions needed by
the hospital to certify the public expenditures required to qualify for
the federal portions of both the medicaid inpatient fee-for-service
payments and the disproportionate share hospital payments. In the
event that any part of the program including, but not limited to,
allowable certified public expenditures, is disallowed by the federal
government, the department shall not seek recoupment of payments from
the hospitals, provided the hospitals have complied with the directions
of the department for participation in the program. The legislature
intends that hospitals in the program receive no less in combined state
and federal payments than they would have received under the
methodology that was in place during fiscal year 2005. The department
shall therefore make additional grant payments, not to exceed the
amounts specified in this subsection, to hospitals whose total payments
under the program would otherwise be less than the total state and
federal payments they would have received under the methodology in
effect during fiscal year 2005. Payments under these new state grant
and upper payment limit programs shall not exceed $54,054,000 from
general fund--state appropriations in fiscal year 2006, of which
$5,600,000 is appropriated in section 204(1) of this 2006 act and the
balance in this section; (($47,474,000)) $76,527,000 from general
fund--state appropriations in fiscal year 2007, of which $5,600,000 is
appropriated in section 204(1) of this 2006 act and the balance in this
section; and $11,328,000 from the general fund--federal appropriations
in this section.
(10) $4,077,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, (($4,847,000)) $3,294,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and (($70,100,000)) $57,565,000 of
the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
development and implementation of a replacement system for the existing
medicaid management information system.
(11) $188,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $225,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to contract for an independent
analysis of the medical assistance administration's current system for
establishing hospital inpatient payment rates, and for recommendations
on a new or updated system. The department shall submit an interim
report of study findings by December 1, 2005, and a final report by
November 15, 2006. The interim report shall include a comparison of
the strengths and weaknesses of the current rate-setting system
relative to those used by other state, federal, and private payers.
The final report shall include recommendations on the design and
implementation of a new or updated system that will promote equity
among hospitals, access to quality care and improved health outcomes
for patients, and cost-control and efficiency for taxpayers. The study
should make use of complete and current cost data from a wide variety
of hospitals, recognize unique aspects of hospital service delivery
structures and medicaid payment systems in Washington, recognize
impacts on productivity and quality of care that may result from
hospital compensation, recruitment, and retention policies, and provide
opportunities for comment and participation by key interest groups in
the identification and assessment of alternatives.
(12) Payment rates for hospital inpatient and outpatient services
shall be increased by an average of 1.3 percent effective July 1, 2005,
and by an average of an additional 1.3 percent effective July 1, 2006.
The inpatient increases shall be provided only on the portion of a
hospital's rate that excludes medical education and outlier costs, and
shall be allocated so that hospitals with lower costs of care
(excluding medical education and outlier costs) receive larger
percentage increases than those with higher costs of care. The
inpatient increases shall be allocated in three percentage increments,
with the lowest-cost hospitals receiving the largest percentage rate
increase, highest-cost hospitals receiving the smallest percentage
increase, and medium-cost hospitals receiving the average of the
highest and the lowest percentage rate increase. Increases shall not
be provided to those hospitals that are certified as critical access.
Sufficient funds are appropriated in this section for Healthy Options
contractors to increase hospital payment rates commensurate with the
increases in fee-for-service payment rates.
(13) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the department shall
provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if
eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.
(14) The medical assistance administration is authorized to use
funds appropriated in this section to purchase goods and supplies
through direct contracting with vendors when the administration
determines it is cost-effective to do so.
(15) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(16) By October 1, 2005, the department shall recommend to the
governor and legislature at least two pilot project designs which seem
likely to reduce avoidable emergency room utilization at no net cost to
the state within the projects' first eighteen months of operation.
(17) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department
shall participate in the health technology assessment program required
in section 213(6) of this act.
(18) The department is also required to participate in the joint
health purchasing project described in section 213(7) of this act.
(19) The department shall, within available resources, continue
operation of the medical care services care management pilot project
for clients receiving general assistance benefits in King and Pierce
counties. The project may use a full or partial capitation model that
includes a mechanism for shared savings. The department shall provide
a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1,
2006, on costs, savings, and any outcomes or quality measures
associated with the pilot programs during the first year of operation.
(20) By October 1, 2005, the department shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the potential fiscal and
programmatic costs and benefits associated with an expansion of managed
care pilot programs to SSI and other eligible medicaid elderly and
disabled persons.
(21) By November 15, 2006, the department of social and health
services, in consultation with the department of revenue and the health
care authority, shall report to the health care and fiscal committees
of the legislature on options for providing financial incentives for
private practice physicians to serve uninsured, medicare, and medicaid
patients. The report shall include an assessment of the relative costs
and effectiveness of strategies including, but not limited to, tax
credits and payment rate increases. The report shall further suggest
alternative mechanisms and thresholds for varying tax credits and
payment enhancements according to the extent to which a provider serves
uninsured, medicare, and medicaid patients.
(22) The department is directed to pursue all available
administrative remedies to dispute and reverse recent large retroactive
charges by the federal medicare program for payment of medicare part B
premiums on behalf of medicaid recipients, to the extent that such
premiums are for periods when medicare coverage was in fact never
provided the beneficiaries, and their care was instead fully covered by
the state medicaid program. The department shall report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2006, on the actions it
has taken to dispute and reverse these charges.
(23) $66,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $66,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2002
(foster care support services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(24) $255,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $2,107,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase the availability of family planning
services at the department of social and health services' community
service offices. Resources will be prioritized for those offices where
pregnancy rates are higher than the statewide average.
(25) $17,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $53,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $70,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for conducting a study of the employment status of
enrollees in the basic health plan and the medical assistance program,
pursuant to Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 3079 (health care
services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1110 2006 c 372 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,694,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,014,000))
$10,946,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($89,472,000))
$89,471,000

Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,792,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,000))
$33,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($113,003,000))
$112,936,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The division of vocational rehabilitation
shall maintain support for existing clubhouse programs at the 2003-2005
level.

Sec. 1111 2006 c 372 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,675,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,860,000))
$41,279,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,376,000))
$61,788,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($810,000))
$836,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,452,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,793,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($300,000))
$246,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($139,266,000))
$143,069,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project through the governor's juvenile justice advisory committee.
(2) $2,452,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation, $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $1,791,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
family policy council.
(3) $2,245,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,589,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $3,834,000 of the general--fund federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement the 2005-07 home care
worker collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 1112 2006 c 372 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,755,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,277,000))
$50,970,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,248,000))
$49,938,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($145,280,000))
$149,663,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $114,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 and $51,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for chapter 512, Laws of
2005.

Sec. 1113 2006 c 372 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,710,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,279,000))
$34,034,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($468,286,000))
$464,247,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($505,620,000))
$502,336,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents and home
care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals which are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
which choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(4) $21,108,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
is provided solely for funding for health care services provided
through local community clinics.
(5) $391,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5471,
chapter 129, Laws of 2005 (drug purchasing consortium).
(6) The health care authority shall conduct a health technology
assessment pilot project to evaluate scientific evidence regarding
current and evolving health care procedures, services and technology.
The pilot shall be a joint effort of the departments of social and
health services, labor and industries, corrections, and veteran's
affairs and the health care authority. Upon completion of assessment
of a procedure, service or technology, the agencies shall make every
effort, consistent with federal and state law, to jointly decide: (a)
On coverage of the procedure, service or technology by each agency, and
(b) if covered, the guidelines or criteria that will be applied to
medical necessity decisions.
(7) The departments of social and health services, labor and
industries and the health care authority, in collaboration with
affected health care providers, facilities, and contracted health
plans, shall design and implement a joint health purchasing project
that links payment to health care provider or facility performance,
particularly where such performance is expected to improve patient
outcomes or where there are wide variations in clinical practice used
to treat a condition or illness. The purchasing effort shall utilize
evidence-based performance measures that are designed to improve
quality of care and yield measurable and significant savings. The
project shall include payment mechanisms that create incentives to
improve quality of care. On or before December 1, 2006, the agencies
shall report to relevant policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature on the status of the purchasing project, including actual
and anticipated savings.
(8) $395,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1689
(dental residency program). If Substitute House Bill No. 1689 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(9) $250,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1688 (certificate of need program). If Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1688 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $316,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
and $15,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for a study of electronic medical records systems pursuant to
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5064 (electronic medical records). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) $458,000 of the health services account appropriation,
$401,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, $205,000 of the
state health care authority administrative account--state
appropriation, and $174,000 of the medical aid account--state
appropriation are provided solely for establishment of a centralized
evidence-based health technology assessment system as defined in
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2575 (health technology
assessment), for supporting the activities of the health technology
clinical committee, or other activities required to implement Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2575. Participating agencies will be
the medical assistance administration in the department of social and
health services, the department of labor and industries, the health
care authority's uniform medical plan, the department of corrections,
and the department of veterans affairs. If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) As provided in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
6459 (community-based health care solutions), the authority shall make
grants of up to $250,000 from the community health collaborative
account to assist community-based organizations increase access to
appropriate, affordable health care for Washington residents,
particularly low-income working individuals and their families. State
grant funds may be used to collect federal matching funds available
through medicaid or through the state children's health insurance
(SCHIP) program, to the extent allowed by federal rules, and to the
extent funds are available in the state's SCHIP allotment in excess of
those required for services funded in section 209 of this 2006 act.
(13) $625,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2572 (small business health insurance assistance
program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $450,000 of the state health care authority administrative
account--state appropriation is provided solely for an on-line employee
health assessment tool.
(15) $499,000 of the health services account appropriation and
$65,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely
for conducting a study of the employment status of enrollees in the
basic health plan and the medical assistance program, pursuant to
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 3079. If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2006, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1114 2006 c 372 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,779,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,032,000))
$3,067,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,321,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,145,000))
$7,180,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The commission shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing any changes in existing federal revenues for the
remainder of the current fiscal year and changes in projections of
federal revenue for the upcoming fiscal year.
(2) $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for a human rights commission investigator
to travel to Vancouver once a week to provide complaint intake,
outreach, and conduct investigations.

Sec. 1115 2006 c 372 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,231,000))
$22,246,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,839,000))
$22,854,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) During the 2005-2007 biennium, the criminal justice training
commission is authorized to raise existing fees charged for firearms
certification for security guards in excess of the fiscal growth factor
established pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the
actual costs of conducting the certification programs and the
appropriation levels in this section.
(2) $100,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for support of the coalition of small
police agencies major crimes task force. The purpose of this task
force is to pool its resources and to establish an efficient and
cooperative approach in addressing major violent crimes.
(3) Amounts provided within this section are sufficient to
implement the provisions of section 2 of House Bill No. 1136
(electronic monitoring system).
(4) $163,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of section 4 of
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2805 (missing persons). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(5) The commission shall conduct a survey of local law enforcement
and state agencies to collect data projecting future cadet enrollments
for the 2007-2009 biennium. The commission shall report the findings
to the legislature by October 1, 2006.
(6)(a) $411,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6502 (victim information system). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for a contract with the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs to implement a statewide automated victim
information and notification system. This system shall be added to the
city and county jail booking and reporting system. The statewide
automated victim information and notification system shall:
(i) Automatically notify a registered victim via the victim's
choice of telephone, letter, or e-mail when any of the following events
affect an offender housed in any Washington state city or county jail
or department of corrections facility: (A) Is transferred or assigned
to another facility; (B) is transferred to the custody of another
agency outside the state; (C) is given a different security
classification; (D) is released on temporary leave or otherwise; (E) is
discharged; (F) has escaped; or (G) has been served with a protective
order that was requested by the victim;
(ii) Automatically notify a registered victim via the victim's
choice of telephone, letter, or e-mail when an offender has: (A) An
upcoming court event where the victim is entitled to be present, if the
court information is made available to the statewide automated victim
information and notification system administrator at the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs; (B) an upcoming parole,
pardon, or community supervision hearing; or (C) a change in the
offender's parole, probation, or community supervision status including
a change in the offender's supervision status or a change in the
offender's address;
(iii) Automatically notify a registered victim via the victim's
choice of telephone, letter, or e-mail when a sex offender has: (A)
Updated his or her profile information with the state sex offender
registry; or (B) become noncompliant with the state sex offender
registry;
(iv) Permit a registered victim to receive the most recent status
report for an offender in any Washington state city and county jail,
department of corrections, or sex offender registry by calling the
statewide automated victim information and notification system on a
toll-free telephone number or by accessing the statewide automated
victim information and notification system via a public web site. All
registered victims calling the statewide automated victim information
and notification system will be given the option to have live operator
assistance to help use the program on a twenty-four hour, three hundred
sixty-five day per year basis;
(v) Permit a crime victim to register, or registered victim to
update, the victim's registration information for the statewide
automated victim information and notification system by calling a toll-free telephone number or by accessing a public web site; and
(vi) Ensure that the offender information contained within the
statewide automated victim information and notification system is
updated frequently to timely notify a crime victim that an offender has
been released or discharged or has escaped.
(b) The purpose of the victim information and notification system
is to protect the public health, safety, and welfare generally.
Creation and implementation of the victim information and notification
system does not create a private right of action.
(c) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs will
not require automated victim information and notification systems in
existence and operational as of the effective date of this act to
participate in the statewide system.
(d) Any vendor that the association contracts with to provide the
statewide automated victim notification service must deliver the
service with a minimum of 99.95-percent availability and with less than
an average of one-percent notification errors as a result of the
vendor's technology.
(e) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2006, on the availability of federal grant
funds to operate the victim information system.
(7) $132,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6320 (sex offender information). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) $1,575,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of sections
103, 104, and 105 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6239
(controlled substances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1116 2006 c 372 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,561,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,681,000))
$7,671,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,519,000
Public Safety and Education Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,995,000))
$36,303,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,827,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,673,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($211,084,000))
$210,804,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,621,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($208,033,000))
$208,036,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,185,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,730,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,357,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($537,135,000))
$537,156,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $700,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$699,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the construction of a computer system to collect data from
self-insured employers and are contingent on the passage of Substitute
House Bill No. 1310 (workers compensation reporting) on mandatory
electronic data reporting by self-insured employers. If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(2) $29,283,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation, and $10,000,000 of the public safety and education
account--federal appropriation are provided solely for the crime
victims' compensation program, subject to the following conditions:
(a) Reimbursement shall be provided throughout the 2005-2007
biennium for full reimbursement of sexual assault forensic exams at
workers' compensation rates;
(b) Reimbursement shall be provided throughout fiscal year 2007 for
full reimbursement of mental health care at workers' compensation
rates; and
(c) In accordance with RCW 7.68.015, it is the policy of the state
that the department of labor and industries operate the crime victims'
compensation program within the amounts provided for this program in
this subsection.
(3) $200,000 of the accident account--state appropriation is
provided solely to reimburse the department of agriculture for the
agricultural worker pesticide handling and application training
program.
(4) $71,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation and
$71,000 of the accident account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the review of payment of medical bills and authorization for
medical procedures by self-insurers.
(5) The department is required to participate in the health
technology assessment program required in section 213(6) of this act.
(6) The department is also required to participate in the joint
health purchasing project described in section 213(7) of this act.
(7) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $8,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1393 (older mobile homes). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(8) $182,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$623,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to (a) expand services in the centers of occupational health and
education (COHE) in Spokane and Renton; (b) add two additional COHE
locations in the state; and (c) include Yakima county in the Spokane
COHE.
(9) $158,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$158,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1856 (annual audits of
the state industrial insurance fund). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) The department shall delay the costs associated with
implementation of phase II of its indirect cost allocation plan for the
public works administration account until July 1, 2007.
(11) $236,000 of the public safety and education account--state is
provided solely for fiscal year 2007 to implement House Bill No. 2612
(failure to secure a load). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $83,000 of the electrical license account--state is provided
solely for fiscal year 2007 to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1841
(electrical trainees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006 the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((14))) (13) The department shall prepare a report identifying
programs funded either directly or indirectly from state workers'
compensation funds. The report shall describe the amounts and
percentages of funds used to administer identified programs, as well as
the criteria used to make funding decisions. In consultation with the
workers' compensation advisory committee, the department shall also
develop recommendations for equitable, adequate, and stable funding
sources for identified programs. The department shall submit the
report and the recommendations to the house of representatives
committees on appropriations and commerce and labor, or their successor
committees, and the senate committees on ways and means and labor,
commerce, research and development, or their successor committees, by
December 1, 2006.
(((15))) (14) $61,000 of the electrical license account--state
appropriation and $55,000 of the plumbing certificate account--state
appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6225 (domestic water pumping systems). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((16))) (15) $26,000 of the accident account--state appropriation
and $5,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6185 (family and medical
leave act). If the bill not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1117 2006 c 372 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,917,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,982,000))
$2,058,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,919,000))
$3,995,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall participate in the health technology
assessment program required in section 213(6) of this act.
(b) The department shall participate in the joint health purchasing
project described in section 213(7) of this act.
(c) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided for the department to conduct a feasibility study
of a veterans' cemetery in eastern Washington. The study shall include
location, acquisition costs, projection of continued operations costs,
and revenue sources for acquisition and operations. A final report of
the findings shall be submitted no later than December 15, 2005.
(d) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5539 (veterans conservation corps). If Senate Bill No. 5539 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, these amounts shall lapse.

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,811,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,317,000))
$3,359,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($343,000))
$350,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,367,000))
$1,893,000
Veterans Estate Management Account--Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $651,000
Veterans' Innovations Program Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,500,000))
$11,075,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the development of a public service
announcement outreach campaign directed at returning veterans from
Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation Enduring Freedom.
(b) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the post traumatic stress
counseling program expansion to address the needs of veterans returning
from Iraq and Afghanistan.
(c) $2,000,000 of the veterans' innovations program account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to implement
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2754 (veterans' innovations program).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(d) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to facilitate an immediate program of
outreach to Washington soldiers and their families, recognizing a need
to support severely wounded and ill soldiers returning from duty in
Iraq and Afghanistan. It is expected that the veterans' innovations
program will also administer funds and in-kind services contributed by
Washington citizens, businesses, and community organizations.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,283,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,946,000))
$6,626,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,114,000))
$36,507,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,830,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $187,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($76,360,000))
$77,433,000

Sec. 1118 2006 c 372 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,835,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,954,000))
$71,290,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($477,467,000))
$466,007,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($104,867,000))
$106,083,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,521,000))
$1,522,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,975,000))
$54,695,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,579,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,917,000))
$2,918,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,179,000))
$16,182,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,099,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,693,000))
$3,694,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,852,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,798,000))
$1,951,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,806,000))
$1,606,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,306,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,942,000))
$42,107,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,684,000))
$52,685,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($913,867,000))
$904,804,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department or any successor agency is authorized to raise
existing fees charged for the clandestine drug lab program, the
drinking water program, radioactive materials license fees, X-ray
facility registration fees, shellfish commercial paralytic shellfish
poisoning fees, the water recreation program, the wastewater management
program, newborn specialty clinic fees, acute care hospitals,
psychiatric hospitals, child birth centers, correctional medical
facilities, alcoholism hospitals, and the midwifery program, in excess
of the fiscal growth factor pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary,
to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation
levels in this section. However, the department may not raise existing
fees charged for the midwifery program by more than twenty percent over
the biennium and from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, the annual
fees for new or renewed licenses shall be no greater than $450.
(2) $1,363,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2006
appropriation, $1,363,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2007
appropriation, and $676,000 of the general fund--local appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound
conservation and recovery plan and agency action items, DOH-01, DOH-02,
DOH-03, and DOH-04.
(3) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive,
and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not
anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require
expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated
unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services
authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(4) $383,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $317,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $600,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation are provided solely to assist counties in marine areas
complete on-site sewage system management plans and electronic data
bases to inventory on-site sewage systems.
(5) $60,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5470 (prescription importation). If Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5470 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $268,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 2266 (precursor drugs). If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2266 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $42,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1168 (prescription reimportation). If Second Substitute House Bill No.
1168 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(8) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $620,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the department to implement a
multi-year pilot project covering Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Grant,
Okanogan, Skagit, and Franklin counties for persons with household
income at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty level who are
ineligible for family planning services through the medicaid program.
Individuals who will be served under the pilot program include women
who have never been pregnant, are not currently pregnant, or are beyond
the family planning extension period allowed for first steps program
eligibility. It is anticipated that the pilot program will serve over
500 women. The department will provide a preliminary report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2006, and a
final report by January 1, 2007.
(9) $462,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely to support specialty clinics that provide treatment
services to children that are identified with one of the five heritable
or metabolic disorders added to the newborn screening panel by the
state board of health in 2003.
(10) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the farmers' market nutrition
program of the special supplemental nutrition program for women,
infants and children. It is anticipated that these funds will enable
the department to expand 2004 participation levels by 8,000 persons
annually.
(11) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the infertility prevention
project to implement effective prevention strategies designed to reduce
the prevalence of chlamydia and gonorrhea and their potentially
debilitating complications.
(12) With funds appropriated in this section, the medical advisory
committee to the early detection breast and cervical cancer screening
program shall study and recommend strategies for adopting emerging
technologies and best practices from the national, state, and local
levels in the field of early prevention and detection for breast and
cervical cancer, and assist the early detection breast and cervical
cancer screening program in implementing policy that follows the best
practices of high quality health care for clinical, diagnostic,
preventative, pathologic, radiological, and oncology services. The
committee will report its recommendations to the legislature by
December 15, 2006.
(13) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to develop and implement best practices in
preventative health care for children. The department and the kids get
care program of public health - Seattle and King county will work in
collaboration with local health care agencies to disseminate strategic
interventions that are focused on evidence-based best practices for
improving health outcomes in children and saving health-care costs.
(14) $48,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1075
(nursing quality commission). If Substitute House Bill No. 1075 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(15) $74,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1137
(physical therapy). If Substitute House Bill No. 1137 is not enacted
by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $109,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1546 (naturopathic
physicians). If House Bill No. 1546 is not enacted by June 30, 2005,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $80,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1689
(dental health services). If Substitute House Bill No. 1689 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(18) $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1605 (soil contamination). If
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1605 is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1951 (vision exams for children). If Substitute House Bill
No. 1951 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(20) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate
Bill No. 5049 (mold in residential units). If Engrossed Senate Bill
No. 5049 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(21) $26,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5311 (autism task force). If Senate Bill No. 5311 is not enacted
by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(22) $168,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for a two-year pilot project under which parents have
the option to choose vaccines which do not contain mercury.
(23) $750,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
is provided solely to add one or more combination vaccines to the
universal access to childhood immunizations program. The vaccine or
vaccines to be added shall be selected by the department after a
clinical and cost-effectiveness review by the state vaccine advisory
committee. The review shall consider at least the following criteria:
(a) The likelihood that use of the combination vaccine will increase
childhood immunization rates; (b) the vaccine's relative effectiveness,
and the prevalence and seriousness of the conditions it prevents; (c)
the relative cost of the vaccine, after accounting for the extent to
which it would replace some single injection antigens; and (d) the
extent to which the vaccine is mercury-free. The projected 2007-09
state cost of the combination vaccine or vaccines added pursuant to
this review shall not exceed $3,000,000.
(24) $151,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for a grant to the Kitsap county health
district. The funding shall be used to increase the number of women
who receive professional support after delivery through a home visit or
telephone call by the county health district. In order to receive the
funds, Kitsap county health district must provide an equal amount of
matching funds.
(((26))) (25) $324,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2342 (health care declarations). If Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2342 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((27))) (26) $432,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 and $21,000 of the health professions account
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2292 (health care liability reform) including
sections 105 through 112 of the bill. If Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2292 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((28))) (27) $96,000 of the health professions account
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2974 (health professions discipline). If Substitute House
Bill No. 2974 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(((29))) (28) The department of health shall evaluate alternative
models for funding the regulation of the health professions, including
charging an equivalent fee for all licensed, certified, and registered
health professions. The department will provide a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the potential fiscal and
programmatic benefits and challenges of such alternative models by
December 1, 2006.
(((30))) (29) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 2985 (foster care health unit). If Substitute House Bill No. 2985
is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((31))) (30) $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 and $183,000 of the health professions account
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 6194 (multicultural education/health). If Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 6194 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((32))) (31) $118,000 of the health professions account
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1850. If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
1850 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((33))) (32) $173,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the state board of health to
provide staff support to the governor's interagency committee on health
disparities, as provided in Senate Bill No. 6197. If Senate Bill No.
6197 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((34))) (33) $119,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the state board of health to
conduct health impact assessments, as provided in Senate Bill No. 6197.
If Senate Bill No. 6197 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((35))) (34) $327,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the department to conduct a
survey of health professional demographics and practice patterns, as
provided in Senate Bill No. 6193. If Senate Bill No. 6193 is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((36))) (35) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to develop and maintain a database
showing the statewide incidence and provenance of hepatitis C
infections, and to conduct a public information campaign on
transmission, prevention, detection, and treatment of the disease.
(((37))) (36) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the department to implement a
prostate cancer public awareness and education campaign. The campaign
shall place special emphasis on early education for men over forty,
African- American men, and men who are at high risk for prostate cancer
according to the guidelines of the American cancer society.
(((38))) (37) $130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6239 (controlled substances)
including sections 201 through 203 of the bill. If Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6239 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount provide in this subsection shall lapse.
(((39))) (38) Appropriations in this section assume savings
attributable to House Bill No. 2632 (HIV insurance coverage program).
(((40))) (39) $27,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2884 (reclaimed water). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, these funds shall be used solely for the department to
coordinate with the department of ecology or development and adoption
of rules relating to reclaimed water.

Sec. 1119 2006 c 372 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS. The appropriations to the
department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the
programs and in the amounts specified herein. However, after May 1,
((2006)) 2007, after approval by the director of financial management
and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may
transfer general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year ((2006))
2007 between programs. The department shall not transfer funds, and
the director of financial management shall not approve the transfer,
unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to
the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds and not
federal funds. The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any deviations
from appropriation levels. The written notification shall include a
narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with
expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both
before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,867,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($59,681,000))
$51,041,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,022,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,774,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $245,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($110,615,000))
$101,975,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $5,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($17,250,000)) $7,861,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for phase three
of the department's offender-based tracking system replacement project.
This amount is conditioned on the department satisfying the
requirements of section 902 of this act.
(b) $26,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1402 (offender travel or transfer). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(c) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for the fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the establishment and support of a
statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its
members representatives of community-based mental health treatment
programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors and
commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities. The
council will begin to investigate and promote cost-effective approaches
to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental
disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of
offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing,
employment, and job training needs.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $524,561,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($555,895,000))
$559,488,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,447,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,984,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,269,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,089,156,000))
$1,092,749,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the
department of corrections is authorized to enter into financial
contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the purposes
indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
This authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option
to purchase or lease-purchase work release beds in facilities
throughout the state for $8,561,000.
(b) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as recovery
of costs.
(c) The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership
program at the Washington corrections center for women at a level at
least equal to that provided in the 1995-97 biennium.
(d) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(e) During the 2005-07 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(f) The department shall ((participation)) participate in the
health technology assessment program required in section 213(6) of this
act. The department shall also participate in the joint health
purchasing project described in section 213(7) of this act.
(g) The Harborview medical center shall provide inpatient and
outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in department of
corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the average rate that
the department has negotiated with other community hospitals in
Washington state.
(h) $1,060,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of section 3 of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6319 (failure to register). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(i) $384,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6460 (crimes with sexual motivation). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(j) $91,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of section 2 of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6172 (possession of child pornography). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(k) $763,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of sections 102, 301,
and 302 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6239 (controlled
substances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,217,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($92,477,000))
$99,901,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,796,000))
$16,833,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $449,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($198,939,000))
$206,400,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) $268,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $484,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1402 (offender travel or transfer). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(c) $122,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $82,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1136 (electronic monitoring system). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(d) $59,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of section 4 of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6319 (failure to register). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(e) $666,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of section 303 of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6239 (controlled
substances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $838,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($882,000))
$887,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,723,000))
$1,728,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $110,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for
transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts
provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,289,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,662,000))
$39,095,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($75,951,000))
$76,384,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $130,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for
expenditures related to the Farrakhan v. Locke litigation.

Sec. 1120 2006 c 372 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($260,228,000))
$260,256,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,966,000))
$31,974,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($200,541,000))
$200,625,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,866,000))
$16,869,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,491,000))
$24,497,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($534,212,000))
$534,341,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,087,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
This amount is provided to replace obsolete information technology
infrastructure.
(2) $12,735,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized for state choice administrative functions.
The department shall submit recommendations by September 1, 2007, to
the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees for options reducing the costs of the state choice
administrative functions for the 2007-2009 biennium. If these options
require any statutory changes, the department shall submit agency
request legislation to the appropriate legislative policy committees
and fiscal committees by December 15, 2007.
(3) $2,300,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to continue implementation of chapter 4, Laws
of 2003 2nd sp. sess. and for implementation costs relating to
Engrossed House Bill No. 2255 (unemployment insurance).
(4) $4,578,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from funds made available to
the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
These funds are authorized to provide direct services to unemployment
insurance claimants and providing job search review.

(End of part)

PART XII
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 1201 2006 c 372 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,744,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,131,000))
$45,336,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,678,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,290,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,778,000
Flood Control Assistance Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,422,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,312,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,081,000
State Drought Preparedness Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving
Account (Water Supply Facilities)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $386,000
Vessel Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,876,000
Site Closure Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $656,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,085,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $357,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,153,000
State Toxics Control Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,319,000))
$84,426,000
State Toxics Control Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,424,000
Water Quality Permit Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,468,000
Underground Storage Tank Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,889,000
Environmental Excellence Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
Biosolids Permit Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $853,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,171,000
Air Pollution Control Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,206,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,078,000
Air Operating Permit Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,922,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,144,000
Oil Spill Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,079,000
Metals Mining Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $485,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,357,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $186,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($400,176,000))
$401,488,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,526,196 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $2,526,195 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, $366,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation,
$2,581,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation, $540,806
of the water quality account--state appropriation, $3,748,220 of the
water quality permit account--state appropriation, and $705,000 of the
oil spill prevention account are provided solely for the implementation
of the Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action
items DOE-01, DOE-02, DOE-04, DOE-06, DOE-07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.
(2) As described in section 129(7) of this act, the department
shall make recommendations and report on monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery.
(3) $4,054,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely for methamphetamine lab clean-up activities and for the
clean up of toxic waste, focusing on clean up within and around Puget
Sound.
(4) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound conservation and
recovery plan action item UW-02 through a contract with the University
of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(5) (($2,500,000)) $1,567,552 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and (($2,000,000)) $2,932,448 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided
solely for shoreline grants to local governments to implement
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6012 (shoreline management), chapter 262,
Laws of 2003.
(6) $156,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand the department's pilot
program for processing 401 water quality certification projects to a
statewide process and timeline to meet improved permit processing
accountability and timelines, which will result in 90 percent of
routine certifications occurring within 90 days of application, and
acknowledgement of receipt of the application being sent within 10
days.
(7) Fees approved by the department of ecology in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(8) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to support water measurement and
water storage components of the Columbia River Initiative Program.
(9) $509,000 of the freshwater aquatic algae control account--state
is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5699 (aquatic invasive species). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $250,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1605 (soil contamination). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount in this subsection shall
lapse.
(11) $200,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract with the state
conservation commission to provide statewide coordination and support
for coordinated resource management.
(12) The department shall assist the office of regulatory
assistance in implementing activities consistent with the governor's
regulatory improvement program. The department shall support and
provide expertise to facilitate, coordinate, and simplify citizen and
business interactions so as to improve state regulatory processes
involving state, local, and federal stakeholders.
(13) $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2884 (reclaimed water). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection is provided solely to
adopt rules in coordination with the department of health for all
aspects of reclaimed water including: Industrial and commercial uses,
land applications, direct recharge, wetland discharge, surface
percolation, constructed wetlands, stream flow augmentation, and
graywater use. The department must adopt the rules in a phased
approach: The first phase shall be proposed for adoption by June 1,
2007, and shall include the uses of constructed treatment wetlands; and
the second phase shall be adopted by December 31, 2010.
(14) $820,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6244 (oil spill prevention). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(15) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2860 (Columbia river basin). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((17))) (16) $340,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to support development of a wetland
mitigation program in Clark county. The program will engage local,
state, and federal agencies, private investors, property owners, and
others in the creation of one or more wetland banks and other measures
to protect habitat functions and values while accommodating urban
growth in the region.
(((18))) (17) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to develop a pilot water management
process that will include three federally recognized treaty Indian
tribes.
(((19))) (18) $130,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to support pesticide container
recycling activities in Washington.
(((20))) (19) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to Walla Walla county and Columbia
county conservation district for habitat conservation planning and
related endangered species act assurances for small irrigators and
landowners.
(((21))) (20) To maximize the use of amounts appropriated during
this biennium for the clean up of toxic waste, focusing on clean up
within and around Puget Sound, the department shall prioritize for this
purpose the use of existing staff, additional FTEs added this biennium,
temporary project staff, and contracted services.
(((22))) (21) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to the department to collaborate
with the Wenatchee watershed planning unit and Chelan county for
development of a regulatory strategy, as required by the federal clean
water act, to control total maximum daily loads of phosphorous to the
Wenatchee river. A technically sound plan for managing phosphorous and
restoring water quality in the Wenatchee river shall be provided to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by July 1, 2008.
(((23))) (22) $55,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to address air quality issues
for the Columbia river gorge in cooperation with the state of Oregon.
(((24))) (23) $67,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6861
(domestic water users). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((25))) (24) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the restoration of Long lake
located in Kitsap county in accordance with the plan approved by the
Kitsap county weed control board, the county commissioners, the
citizens for improving Long lake, and the department of ecology.
(((26))) (25) $150,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the contracting and production of
the second phase report for establishing sustainable statewide regional
CBRNE/Hazmat response capability. The report will, at a minimum
include, a cost-benefit analysis, analysis of sustainable funding
options, regional alignment and mutual aid agreements, and
administration requirements.
(((27))) (26) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for a pilot project that
demonstrates the value of long-term management plans for small forest
landowners.

Sec. 1202 2006 c 372 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,687,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,334,000))
$38,986,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,738,000))
$2,918,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,109,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,805,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,702,000))
$35,425,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($122,549,000))
$120,104,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2005-07 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $191,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound
conservation and recovery plan and agency action item PRC-02.
(4) $185,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely to develop a plan for public education
and tourist orientation and interpretation at selected state park sites
along the route of the ice age floods from Spokane to the Pacific
ocean.
(5) Until July 1, 2007, the commission may not charge fees for
general park access or parking. Funding of $500,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $2,636,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided
solely to compensate the state parks and recreation commission for lost
revenue from general park access or parking fees.
(6) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for repair and maintenance costs at state
parks.
(7) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for employee retirement buyout costs.
(8) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for computer network hardware and
software, and for backup drives and tapes.

Sec. 1203 2006 c 372 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,235,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,256,000))
$2,745,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,178,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,922,000))
$9,411,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $197,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $197,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action item CC-01.
(2) As described in section 129(7) of this act, the department
shall make recommendations and report on monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery.
(3) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 1462 (relating to funding for conservation districts). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1204 2006 c 372 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,692,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,856,000))
$48,282,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,100,000))
$50,400,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,089,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $392,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,820,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,753,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,904,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,946,000))
$62,406,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,029,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,386,000))
$11,586,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,883,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,863,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $588,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,755,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,043,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $411,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $528,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($315,520,000))
$319,906,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) As described in section 129(7) of this act, the department
shall make recommendations and report on monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery.
(2) $1,556,714 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,556,713 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action items DFW-01 through DFW-06, DFW-08 through DFW-12, and DFW-16.
(3) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(4) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(5) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(6) $180,000 of the wildlife account -- state appropriation is
provided solely to test deer and elk for chronic wasting disease and to
document the extent of swan lead poisoning. Of this amount, $65,000 is
provided solely to document the extent of swan lead poisoning and to
begin environmental cleanup.
(7) The department shall provide quarterly status reports to the
office of financial management regarding the replacement of the
Washington interactive licensing system and the implementation of the
hydraulic permit management system.
(8) The department shall prepare a report detailing the hydraulic
permit approval program applications and project types. The department
shall coordinate with the office of financial management in determining
the contents of the report. At minimum, the report shall include
permits by applicant (name, state, local, federal, tribal entity,
etc.), project type (pamphlet, minor, medium, major, extension,
revision, etc.) and project location (county and water resource
inventory area). The department shall submit the report to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees no later than
September 1, 2006.
(9) $700,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely for environmental data quality and access projects in support of
state salmon recovery efforts. The department shall coordinate
planning and implementation of all activities with the department of
information services and the governor's salmon recovery office. The
department shall make certain that any activity using these funds is
consistent with recommendations to be submitted (per section 405,
chapter 488, Laws of 2005) in the joint report to the legislature and
office of financial management on December 1, 2006.
(10) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
Army Corps of Engineers.
(11) $72,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1211 (multiple season big
game permit). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this section shall lapse.
(12) $528,000 of the aquatic invasive species prevention account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No.
5699 (preventing and controlling aquatic invasive species and algae).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $703,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to purchase six purse seine and three gill
net licenses to meet the provisions of the United States/Canada salmon
treaty.
(14) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for chum salmon production at
Minter creek hatchery.
(15) $45,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $45,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the management of Canada goose
seasons to increase the number of hunting days in southwest Washington.
(16) $46,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to increase the number of courses providing the hunter
education training program created in RCW 77.32.155. The department
shall reduce the current backlog of applicants waiting to take the
training program and provide for a stable supply of training program
courses in order to avoid future backlogs.
(17) $481,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to continued operation of the Naselle Hatchery during
the 2005-07 biennium. This will increase production by 3 million
Chinook, 1 million Coho, and 30,000 trout.
(18) $223,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5227 (wildlife harvest
reports). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for federal match funding for the control
of predators that damage livestock, crops, and property.
(20) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the department to produce educational
materials discouraging activities that harm or disturb the spawning
beds of salmon and steelhead. Discouraged activities include, but are
not limited to, wading on spawning beds, driving motor vehicles on
spawning beds, use of high-powered jet or propeller-driven boats across
spawning beds, dragging anchors through spawning beds, digging or
removing gravel from spawning beds, or any other physical disturbance
capable of disturbing spawning fish or damaging or destroying nests of
incubating eggs.
(a) The educational materials produced by the department in
accordance with this subsection must include, at a minimum, brochures
that are to be disseminated to persons applying for fishing and boating
licenses statewide. The department must also distribute the brochures
widely to retail outlets that cater to outdoor recreation.
(b) The department shall work cooperatively with the tribal fishery
comanagers in the development of the educational materials under this
section.
(c) The department shall report to the legislature concerning the
effectiveness of this subsection after at least two spawning cycles of
salmon and steelhead have occurred.
(21) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, by December
1, 2006, the department shall:
(a) Submit a report detailing the reductions required by omnibus
appropriations acts since 1997 for activities supported by the state
wildlife fund; and
(b) Submit quarterly revenue and expenditure reports for the state
wildlife account based on current revenue forecasts to the office of
financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature((;
and)).
(22) The department shall assist the office of regulatory
assistance in implementing activities consistent with the governor's
regulatory improvement program. The department shall support and
provide expertise to facilitate, coordinate, and simplify citizen and
business interactions so as to improve state regulatory processes
involving state, local, and federal stakeholders.
(23) $408,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 ((is)) and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for fire suppression and
remediation activities on department lands and facilities that were
impacted during the 2005 and 2006 fire season. Funding shall be used
for fire suppression, winter feeding, seeding, planting vegetation,
fertilizing, weed control, and the establishment of water bars and
other erosion control measures.
(24) $266,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $214,000 of the state wildlife account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of the
Nemah, Mossyrock, Omak, Colville, Arlington, and Columbia Basin
hatcheries during the 2005-07 biennium. Funding shall be used to
offset the increased cost of utilities, fuel, fish feed, and mitigation
obligations previously funded from local sources. The department shall
consult with the appropriate natural resource and fiscal committees of
the legislature prior to submitting a 2007-09 budget proposal that
changes current hatchery operations, production, and/or maintenance to
the office of financial management. Unless specifically authorized by
the legislature, the department shall not close any hatchery facility
currently in operation.
(25) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5385 (invasive species council). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(26) $76,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to pay for the added level of fishery
sampling and monitoring in the upper Columbia river area as required
under the endangered species act and federal court orders.
(27) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for an interagency working group scoping
of a study of the sinking of ships as dive attractions. The department
of fish and wildlife shall, as approved by the office of financial
management, enter into an interagency agreement with the department of
natural resources, the state parks and recreation commission, the
department of ecology, and the department of community, trade, and
economic development to delineate elements of this study. The
department of fish and wildlife shall report to the office of financial
management and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later
than November 15, 2006.
(28) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to increase fish production levels on a
statewide basis at state-operated fish hatcheries. By July 31, 2006,
the department shall submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature an implementation plan that outlines in
specific detail how the amount provided in this subsection will be
spent in order to increase fish production. The plan will include
production implementation timelines, increased production goals, by
species, at identified hatcheries that will receive financial
assistance, and the amount to be retained by the department for
administration and overhead costs, including the purchase of any new
equipment. By July 31, 2007, the department shall submit to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature a report
documenting the increased production levels, using fiscal year 2006 as
the base year for comparison purposes. If the department is unable to
produce the implementation plan by July 31, 2006, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.
(29) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the department to prevent impacts to
native species by controlling the nonnative nutria population in Skagit
county.
(30) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the northwest straits commission to
remove lost and abandoned fishing nets and crab and shrimp pots that
may be dangerous to humans and that unintentionally trap and kill
endangered salmon and other aquatic species.
(31) $4,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1210 (temporary fishing
license). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(32) Within existing appropriations and utilizing all available
federal moneys allocated for the crab buy-back program, the department
shall develop and implement a crab buy-back program that allows
commercial crab fishers the opportunity to sell their licenses back to
the state and exit from the crabbing fishery. The department shall
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature its detailed implementation plan no later
than December 1, 2006.
(33) $660,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely to initiate a review of the hydraulic project approval
permit rules and to undergo a public process for adoption of new or
revised rules that my be needed. Upon completion, the department shall
complete a habitat conservation plan for the hydraulic project approval
program, and shall seek legislative review prior to adoption of new or
revised rules.
(34) $125,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided to implement Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5232 (turkey tags). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(35) $634,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for operations and fish production costs
at department-operated Mitchell act hatchery facilities.

Sec. 1205 2006 c 372 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,473,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,999,000))
$89,221,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,215,000))
$25,525,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,276,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,697,000))
$54,842,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,001,000))
$4,026,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,447,000))
$2,450,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,451,000))
$8,966,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,332,000))
$86,537,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,828,000))
$2,830,000
Disaster Response Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,636,000))
$2,645,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,321,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,155,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $556,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,138,000
Agricultural College Trust Management
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,966,000))
$1,972,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($284,661,000))
$331,103,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) As described in section 129(7) of this act, the department
shall make recommendations and report on monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery.
(2) $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $1,652,050 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action items DNR-01 and
DNR-02.
(3) $138,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1896 (geoduck harvest). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount in the subsection shall lapse.
(4) $972,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($994,000)) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for deposit into
the agricultural college trust management account and are provided
solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State
University's agricultural college trust lands.
(5) $10,689,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, (($13,635,000)) $48,571,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and $5,000,000 of the disaster
response account -- state appropriation are provided solely for emergency
fire suppression. Of these amounts, up to $250,000 may be expended for
staff and other necessary resources to design and implement a fire
data-collection system that includes financial- and performance-management information for fires over 10 acres in size.
None of the general fund and disaster response account amounts
provided in this subsection may be used to fund agency indirect and
administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs
shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and
appropriations.
(6) $582,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for spartina control.
(7) Fees approved by the board of natural resources in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(8) $9,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $2,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of settling
those claims identified in U.S., et al. v. State of Washington, et al.
Subproceeding No. 89-3 (Shellfish), United States District Court for
the Western District of Washington at Seattle, Case No. C70-9213. The
expenditure of this appropriation is contingent on a settlement
agreement that includes the state of Washington as a party to the
agreement which is fully executed by June 29, 2007, and a consent
decree entered by June 29, 2007, by the United States District Court
for the Western District of Washington settling and releasing the
identified treaty claims to harvest shellfish previously negotiated in
the settlement agreement. By June 29, 2007, the release of claims
associated with the settlement agreement and consent decree must be
fully effective and there must be no unfulfilled contingencies that
could cause the settlement agreement or consent decree to be vacated at
some future date if not fulfilled. In the event that these
contingencies are not met, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(9) $2,155,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to meet its obligations with the
U.S. environmental protection agency for the clean-up of Commencement
Bay and other sites.
(10) The department shall not develop the Gull Harbor facility
without first submitting a master plan to the appropriate committees of
the legislature. The plan shall ensure continued public access to the
waterfront. The plan shall also examine alternative locations to the
Gull Harbor site that would colocate marine equipment for all state
agencies needing water access in Thurston county. The report shall be
submitted by December 1, 2006.
(11) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $500,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation are provided solely for a report on the future of
Washington forests. The purpose of the report is to examine economic,
recreational, and environmental trends influencing the forest products
industry and secondary manufacturing sectors in Washington state. The
department shall contract with the University of Washington college of
forestry resources. The college shall consult with the University of
Washington economics department for the section on investment returns
from granted lands. The report shall contain the following parts:
(a) An update of the 1992 timber supply study for Washington state
that was conducted by the University of Washington. The update may be
accomplished by reviewing the most recent similar data available in
existing reports, examining a sample of the original 1992 study sample
of lands, and through other existing data sources that may reveal
relevant trends and changes since 1992.
(b) An independent assessment of the economic contribution of the
forest products industry, and secondary manufacturing sectors, to the
state. This assessment will also examine some of the macroeconomic
trends likely to affect the industry in the future.
(c) A comparison of the competitive position of Washington's forest
products industry globally, and with other leading forest products
states, or regions, of the United States. This evaluation should
compare the relative tax burden for growing and harvesting timber
between the states or regions and the relative cost of adhering to
regulations, and identify the competitive advantages of each state or
region.
(d) An assessment of the trends and dynamics that commercial and
residential development play in the conversion of the state's forests
to nonforestry uses. The assessment will involve gathering relevant
data, reviewing that data, and analyzing the relationship between
development and the conversion of forest land uses.
(e) Recommendations on: (i) Policy changes that would enhance the
competitive position of Washington's forest products industry in
Washington state; (ii) policy changes that would, to the extent
possible, ensure that a productive forest land base continues to be
managed for forest products, recreation, and environmental and other
public benefits into the future; and (iii) policy changes that would
enhance the recreational opportunities on working forest lands in the
state.
(f) Based on the information derived from (a) through (d) of this
subsection, an assessment of the expected rate of return from state
granted lands. This section of the reports shall also review reports
prepared by the department over the past ten years that describe the
investment returns from granted lands. The review of these previous
reports shall compare and critique the methodology and indicators used
to report investment returns. The review shall recommend appropriate
measures of investment returns from granted lands.
(g) Analyze and recommend policies and programs to assist Cascade
foothills area landowners and communities in developing and
implementing innovative approaches to retaining traditional forestry
while at the same time accommodating new uses that strengthen the
economic and natural benefits from forest lands. For the purposes of
this section, the Cascade foothills area generally encompasses the
nonurbanized lands within the Cascade mountain range and drainages
lying between three hundred and three thousand feet above mean sea
level, and located within Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish, King, Pierce,
Thurston, and Lewis counties.
(12) $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to compensate the forest board
trust for a portion of the lease to the Crescent television improvement
district consistent with RCW 79.13.520.
(13) The department shall develop a multiyear work plan and
schedule for mapping all applicable areas of the state for landslide
hazards and earthquake hazards. The work plan and schedule shall be
based on a carryforward funding level, and shall be submitted to the
office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by June 30, 2006.
(14) $654,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for geologic hazard research, activities,
and mapping, including earthquake, landslide, and tsunami hazards.
(15) $397,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the department to work with
appropriate stakeholders and state agencies in determining how
privately owned lands, in combination with other land ownership such as
public and tribal lands, contribute to wildlife habitat. The
assessment will also determine how commercial forest, forest lands on
the urban fringe, and small privately-owned forest lands that are
managed according to Washington's forest and fish prescriptions, in
combination with other forest management activities, function as
wildlife habitat now and in the future.
(((17))) (16) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to establish a work group to study
existing legislation affecting the oil and natural gas industry, and to
make recommendations to that legal framework to improve the regulatory,
technical, environmental, and financial framework of the oil and gas
industry. The department shall report its recommendations to the
legislature by December 30, 2006.
(((18))) (17) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Senate Bill
No. 5179 (forest health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((19))) (18) $719,000 of the surface mining reclamation account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6175 (surface mining). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(19) $504,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for expenses related to removing the
hull of the S.S. Catala, shipwrecked on state-owned aquatic lands at
Damon Point State Park.

Sec. 1206 2006 c 372 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,979,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,271,000))
$12,771,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,634,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,990,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $972,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,555,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,091,000))
$41,591,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action item WSDA-01.
(2) Fees and assessments approved by the department in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(3) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department, in
addition to the authority provided in RCW 17.26.007, may enter into
agreements with federal agencies to eradicate spartina from private
lands that may provide a source of reinfestation to public lands.
(4) $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for an economic impact study of
fairs in the state of Washington.
(5) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $13,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for indemnity payments for poultry
that are ordered by the department to be slaughtered or destroyed.
(6) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for market promotion and trade
barrier grants.
(7) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the small farm and direct
marketing program.
(8) $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $160,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to complete a database application
that would consolidate program information and enable the department to
more effectively respond to a food safety or animal disease emergency.
(9) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement the Washington wine
brand campaign.
(10) The department shall consult with affected agricultural
industries before fees for fruit and vegetable inspections may be
raised. The consultation shall include a review of current inspection
services, the cost of providing those services, and the discontinuation
of unnecessary services.
(11) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
3033 (animal identification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6508 (renewable fuel). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to support noxious weed boards.
(14) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the purchase of agricultural products
equipment. The department shall negotiate an appropriate agreement
with the agriculture industry for the use of the equipment.
(15) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for spartina eradication efforts.
(16) $26,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5385 (invasive species council). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No.
6377 (milk and milk products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement the wine commission marketing
campaign.

(End of part)

PART XIII
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 1301 2006 c 372 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,601,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,753,000))
$36,220,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,364,000))
$4,872,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $596,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,628,000))
$4,591,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,388,000))
$3,438,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,895,000))
$2,923,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,157,000))
$1,171,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,560,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $313,000
Fingerprint Identification
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,270,000))
$6,271,000
Disaster Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,947,000))
$106,978,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of state
fire marshal to exclusively review K-12 construction documents for fire
and life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the
intent of this appropriation to provide these services only to those
districts that are located in counties without qualified review
capabilities.
(2) $145,000 of the aquatic invasive species enforcement account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5699 (aquatic invasive species).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $240,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed House Bill No. 1241 (vehicle licensing and registration). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $395,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of section 5 of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2805 (missing persons). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(5) If funding is provided through a federal grant or through a
memorandum of understanding with a local government, the Washington
state patrol's automatic fingerprint identification system shall be
capable of instantly accepting electronic latent search records from
any Washington state local law enforcement agency, to be implemented on
a timeline agreed to by the patrol and the agency granting the fund
source. The Washington state patrol shall notify the appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the legislature in writing upon the
receipt of such federal moneys or upon the effective date of a
memorandum of understanding with a local government.
(6) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6519 (sex offender registration). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(7) In accordance with RCW 10.97.100 and chapter 43.43 RCW, the
Washington state patrol is authorized to perform and charge fees for
criminal history and background checks for state and local agencies,
and nonprofit and other private entities and disseminate the records.
It is the policy of the state of Washington that the fees cover, as
nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs of the criminal
history and background check activities. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055,
during the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the Washington state patrol may
increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the increases
are necessary to fully fund the direct and indirect cost of criminal
history and background check activities.

(End of part)

PART XIV
EDUCATION
Sec. 1401 2006 c 372 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) STATE AGENCY OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,452,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,151,000))
$17,376,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,090,000))
$23,090,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,693,000))
$54,083,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $10,835,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($10,980,000)) $10,990,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the
superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of
four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the
civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans
civic education award. The students selected for the award must
demonstrate understanding through completion of at least one of the
classroom-based civics assessment models developed by the
superintendent of public instruction, and through leadership in the
civic life of their communities. The superintendent shall select two
students from eastern Washington and two students from western
Washington to receive the award, and shall notify the governor and
legislature of the names of the recipients.
(b) $428,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($547,000)) $597,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the state board of education, including basic
education assistance activities.
(c) $509,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($504,000)) $554,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator
standards board. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the
Washington professional educator standards board shall pursue the
implementation of recent study recommendations including: (i) Revision
of teacher mathematics endorsement competencies and alignment of
teacher tests to the updated competencies, and (ii) development of
mathematics specialist endorsement.
(d) $607,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($592,000)) $992,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for increased
attorney general fees related to School Districts' Alliance for
Adequate Funding of Special Education et al. v. State of Washington et
al., Thurston County Superior Court Cause No. 04-2-02000-7 and other
education funding lawsuits.
(e) (($1,900,000)) $1,615,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation is for replacement of the apportionment system, which
includes the processes that collect school district budget and
expenditure information, staffing characteristics, and the student
enrollments that drive the funding process.
(f)(i) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction and the department of health to collaborate and
develop a work group to assess school nursing services in class I
school districts. The work group shall consult with representatives
from the following groups: School nurses, schools, students, parents,
teachers, health officials, and administrators. The work group shall:
(A) Study the need for additional school nursing services by
gathering data about current school nurse-to-student ratios in each
class I school district and assessing the demand for school nursing
services by acuity levels and the necessary skills to meet those
demands. The work group also shall recommend to the legislature best
practices in school nursing services, including a dedicated,
sustainable funding model that would best meet the current and future
needs of Washington's schools and contribute to greater academic
success of all students. The work group shall make recommendations for
school nursing services, and may examine school nursing services by
grade level. The work group shall assess whether funding for school
nurses should continue as part of basic education; and
(B) In collaboration with managed care plans that contract with the
department of social and health services medical assistance
administration to provide health services to children participating in
the medicaid and state children's health insurance program, identify
opportunities to improve coordination of and access to health services
for low-income children through the use of school nurse services. The
work group shall evaluate the feasibility of pooling school district
and managed care plan funding to finance school nurse positions in
school districts with high numbers of low-income children.
(ii) The office of superintendent of public instruction shall
report the work group's findings and plans for implementation to the
legislature by February 1, 2006.
(g) $78,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $228,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to provide direct services and
support to schools around an integrated, interdisciplinary approach to
instruction in conservation, natural resources, sustainability, and
human adaptation to the environment. Of this amount, $150,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided for
deposit in the Washington natural science, wildlife, and environmental
education partnership account for grants pursuant to RCW 28A.300.440.
Specific integration efforts will focus on science, math, and the
social sciences. Integration between basic education and career and
technical education, particularly agricultural and natural sciences
education, is to be a major element.
(h) $2,896,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the creation of a statewide data base
of longitudinal student information. This amount is conditioned on the
department satisfying the requirements in section 902, chapter 518,
Laws of 2005.
(i) $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for comprehensive cultural competence and
anti-bias education programs for educators and students. The office of
superintendent of public instruction shall administer grants to school
districts with the assistance and input of groups such as the
anti-defamation league and the Jewish federation of Seattle.
(j) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6219
(financial literacy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount in this section is provided solely for additional efforts at
promoting financial literacy of students. The effort will be
coordinated through the financial literacy public-private partnership.
(k) $64,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to conduct further evaluation of issues raised in
the recently completed joint legislative audit and review committee
report on the accounting of special education excess costs. Within the
amounts provided in this subsection, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction will convene a work group to evaluate modifying
or replacing the current 1077 methodology. This work group will
deliver a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
including the joint legislative audit and review committee, and the
office of financial management, by January 1, 2007. The work group
will take into consideration recommendations of the Washington learns
steering committee.
(l) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed House
Bill No. 2910 (environmental education). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,341,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,884,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,112,000))
$67,358,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($89,337,000))
$98,583,000

The appropriations in this subsection are provided solely for the
statewide programs specified in this subsection and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) A maximum of $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $2,541,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as
determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be
dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to
students, health education, and training for school staff.
(ii) A maximum of $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for the school
safety center in the office of the superintendent of public instruction
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(A) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(B) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(iii) A maximum of $100,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $100,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
a school safety training program provided by the criminal justice
training commission. The commission, in collaboration with the school
safety center advisory committee, shall provide the school safety
training for all school administrators and school safety personnel,
including school safety personnel hired after the effective date of
this section.
(iv) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely for the safety center advisory committee to develop and
distribute a pamphlet to promote internet safety for children,
particularly in grades seven through twelve. The pamphlet shall be
posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web site. To the
extent possible, the pamphlet shall be distributed in schools
throughout the state and in other areas accessible to youth, including
but not limited to libraries and community centers.
(v) $10,344,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for safe and drug free schools and communities grants for drug
and violence prevention activities and strategies and $800,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided
solely for one-time backfill of the federal reductions to the safe and
drug free schools and communities grant program.
(vi) A maximum of $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for a nonviolence
and leadership training program provided by the institute for community
leadership. The program shall provide a request for proposal process,
with up to 80 percent funding, for nonviolence leadership workshops
serving at least 12 school districts with direct programming in 36
elementary, middle, and high schools throughout Washington state.
(vii) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for a pilot youth suicide prevention and
information program. The office of superintendent of public
instruction will work with selected school districts and community
agencies in identifying effective strategies at preventing youth
suicide.
(viii) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6580 (school notification about sex and kidnapping
offenders), including section 2 of that act.
(ix) $45,000 of the general fund state--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for the development of safe school
plan standards. By December 1, 2006, the Washington state school
safety center advisory committee, in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction shall prepare a report with: (1)
The recommended standards; (2) a potential implementation plan for
those standards statewide; and (3) detailed information on the costs
and other impacts on school districts from implementing the standards.
The development of standards shall address requirements for school
mapping and shall include a review of current research regarding safe
school planning.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
A maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for K-20
telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to
prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization
of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the
network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced
technical support for the network.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $787,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $799,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided solely for the special
services pilot projects. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall allocate these funds to the district or districts
participating in the pilot program according to the provisions of RCW
28A.630.015.
(ii) A maximum of $548,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,059,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for alternative
certification routes. Funds may be used by the professional educator
standards board to continue existing alternative-route grant programs
and to create new alternative-route programs in regions of the state
with service shortages. Of this amount, $511,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided for additional
conditional scholarships to candidates seeking an endorsement in
special education, math, science, and bilingual education.
(iii) A maximum of $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for operation of
the Cispus environmental learning center.
(iv) A maximum of (($1,224,000)) $2,448,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation ((for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,224,000
of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are)) is
provided for in-service training and educational programs conducted by
the Pacific Science Center.
(v) A maximum of (($1,079,000)) $2,158,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation ((for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,079,000
of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are)) is
provided for the Washington state leadership assistance for science
education reform (LASER) regional partnership coordinated at the
Pacific Science Center.
(vi) A maximum of $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided to support
vocational student leadership organizations.
(vii) A maximum of $146,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $146,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
the Washington civil liberties education program.
(viii) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
Washington state achievers scholarship program. The funds shall be
used to support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and
match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers
scholars.
(ix) (($1,911,000)) $2,119,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for the advanced placement fee program to
increase opportunities for low-income students and under-represented
populations to participate in advanced placement courses and to
increase the capacity of schools to provide advanced placement courses
to students.
(x) $5,532,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for comprehensive school reform demonstration projects to
provide grants to low-income schools for improving student achievement
through adoption and implementation of research-based curricula and
instructional programs.
(xi) (($24,490,000)) $33,526,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for 21st century learning center grants,
providing after-school and inter-session activities for students.
(xii) $383,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $294,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Lorraine Wojahn dyslexia
pilot reading program in up to five school districts.
(xiii) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for developing and disseminating
curriculum and other materials documenting women's role in World War
II.
(xiv) $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for incentive grants for districts to
develop preapprenticeship programs. Grant awards up to $10,000 each
shall be used to support the program's design, school/business/labor
agreement negotiations, and recruiting high school students for
preapprenticeship programs in the building trades and crafts.
(xv) $3,980,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the dissemination of the Navigation
101 curriculum to all districts, including the development and
dissemination of electronic student planning tools and the development
of a software package to use to analyze the impact of the
implementation of Navigation 101 on student performance, and grants to
at least one hundred school districts for the implementation of the
Navigation 101 program. The implementation grants will be limited to
a maximum of two years and the school districts selected shall
represent various regions of the state and reflect differences in
school district size and enrollment characteristics.
(xvi) $2,148,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for one-time grants to school
districts to offset extraordinary rate increases for natural gas and
heating oil.
(xvii) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed House
Bill No. 2579 (educational assessments). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(xviii) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a pilot
grant program related to serving students in staffed residential homes
and other students as specified below. The pilot grant program will be
established in at least five school districts. The districts eligible
for the pilot grant program shall be limited to school districts with
a concentration of students residing in staffed residential homes or
other residential facilities where one or more staffed residential
homes have closed within the current or preceding fiscal year, greater
than or equal to 1.3 full time equivalent students per 1,000 K-12
public students. The amount of funding for each pilot grant district
shall be in proportion to the degree of concentration of staffed
residential home students residing and served in each respective
district or serving high school district, and other criteria as
determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
Funding in the pilot grant program shall not be considered part of the
basic education program.
(A) The pilot grant program is intended to: (I) Identify the
fiscal and educational challenges posed to districts that serve staffed
residential homes students; (II) provide resources to assist school
districts in developing best practices for addressing these challenges;
(III) address costs resulting from high concentrations of staffed
residential home students in some school districts; (IV) develop models
of collaboration between school districts and staffed residential
homes; and (V) gain additional information on the variety of
circumstances and needs present in the staffed residential home
population, including both special education and nonspecial education
eligible students.
(B) As a condition of the pilot grant program, the selected school
districts must meet the following criteria: (I) Jointly develop, with
staffed residential homes in their community, a model policy and plan
for collaboration and information sharing, which includes an agreed
upon routine of regular communication regarding each child's progress,
including for special education students the development and regular
updating of individualized education programs; (II) provide an annual
progress report regarding the implementation of the model policy and
plan and measured progress toward meeting the educational needs of
students in staffed residential homes; and (III) provide information
and data to the office of the superintendent of public instruction as
required for the study detailed in (D) of this subsection (c)(xviii).
(C) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, with the assistance of the department of social and
health services, to prepare a report to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature and the office of financial
management on: (I) The number of students residing at each staffed
residential home by school district; (II) the specific types of needs
of students residing at each staffed residential home; and (III) an
overview of the differences in the programs being offered at staffed
residential homes and the ranges of costs associated with these
programs; and (IV) a summary of the current types of collaboration
between school districts and staffed residential homes. This report
shall be submitted by November 30, 2006.
(D) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to report to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on
the results of the pilot grant program established in this subsection
(c)(xviii), including a description of the impact on the educational
services delivered to the students residing at each staffed residential
home. Based on the results of the pilot grant program, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction may make recommendations
regarding best practices for meeting the needs of students residing in
staffed residential homes, and fostering collaboration with staffed
residential homes. This report shall be submitted by June 30, 2007.
(E) For those students ((residing in staffed residential homes))
for whom a school district receives a pilot grant application and who
are special education eligible, school districts are eligible to pursue
safety net funding beyond the pilot grant program amounts so that the
combined basic education allocation, special education excess cost
allocation, pilot grant amount, and safety net grants recognize the
costs associated with serving staffed residential home students
potentially concentrated in a few school districts.
(F) For purposes of this subsection (c)(xviii), "staffed
residential home" means a home licensed by the department of social and
health services to provide twenty-four hour care for six or fewer
children or expectant mothers, which employs staff to care for them.

Sec. 1402 2006 c 372 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,193,442,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,281,807,000))
$4,252,844,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,548,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,503,797,000))
$8,474,834,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2005-06 and
2006-07 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (d) through (f) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (c) through
(f) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) 49 certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding;
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of
the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established
under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district
documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater than 53.2
certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students. For any school district documenting a lower certificated
instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio
achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding ratio to employ additional classified
instructional assistants assigned to basic education classrooms in
grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a district's staff ratio under
this section, funds used by the district to employ additional
classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified
instructional assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be
determined using the 1989-90 school year as the base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students may use allocations generated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of that required to maintain the
minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ
additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) shall only be expended to reduce class
size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional
funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction with a waiver allowed for skills centers in current
operation that are not meeting this standard until the 2007-08 school
year, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent vocational
students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic
education and vocational enhancement allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(h) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2005-06 and 2006-07
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each three certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
sixty average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
11.21 percent in the 2005-06 school year and 13.02 percent in the 2006-07 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 14.07 percent in the
2005-06 school year and 15.99 percent in the 2006-07 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (h) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$9,112 per certificated staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a
maximum of $9,476 per certificated staff unit in the 2006-07 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $22,377 per certificated
staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a maximum of $23,272 per
certificated staff unit in the 2006-07 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $17,362 per certificated
staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a maximum of $18,056 per
certificated staff unit in the 2006-07 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $531.09 for the 2005-06 and
2006-07 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of (($12,992,000))
$12,769,000 outside the basic education formula during fiscal years
2006 and 2007 as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $513,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2006
and a maximum of $534,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2007;
(b) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,035,000 may be expended for the 2006 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,385,000 for the 2007 fiscal year. 20 percent of each fiscal year
amount may carry over from one year to the next;
(c) A maximum of $369,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies;
(d) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs; and
(e) $394,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for incentive grants to encourage
school districts to increase enrollment in vocational skills centers.
Up to $500 for each full-time equivalent student may be proportionally
distributed to a school district or school districts increasing skills
centers enrollment above the levels in the 2004-05 school year. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop
criteria for awarding incentive grants pursuant to this subsection.
The total amount allocated pursuant to this subsection shall be limited
to $1,244,000 for the 2005-07 biennium. Funds provided in this
subsection shall first be expended to provide incentive grants to
school districts increasing skills center enrollment during the school
year. If funds are available after making these allocations, funds may
be distributed for: (i) Increasing enrollment including allowing up to
an additional .2 full time equivalent student enrollment at skills
centers; (ii) increasing enrollment and capacity of summer vocational
programs at the skills centers.
(f) (($4,943,000)) $4,719,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for one-time
allocations for equipment replacement in vocational programs and skills
centers. The funding shall be allocated based on $75 per full time
equivalent vocational student and $125 per full time equivalent skills
center student.
(10) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 5.2 percent from the 2004-05 school year to the
2005-06 school year and 5.2 percent from the 2005-06 school year to the
2006-07 school year.
(11) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

Sec. 1403 2006 c 372 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,336,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($241,576,000))
$239,233,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $470,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,543,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,043,000))
$1,034,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($318,968,000))
$316,616,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($190,375,000)) $187,442,000 is provided for a cost of living
adjustment of 1.2 percent effective September 1, 2005, and another 3.3
percent effective September 1, 2006, for state formula staff units.
The appropriations include associated incremental fringe benefit
allocations at rates of 10.57 percent for the 2005-06 school year and
12.38 percent for the 2006-07 school year for certificated staff and
10.57 percent for the 2005-06 school year and 12.49 percent for the
2006-07 school year for classified staff.
(a) The appropriations in this section include the increased
portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant
state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Increases for
general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this
act. Increases for special education result from increases in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act.
(b) The appropriations in this section provide cost of living and
incremental fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments as
follows:

School Year

2005-06 2006-07

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.27 $1.06

Highly Capable (per formula student) $2.96 $11.40

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $7.94 $30.52

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $1.69 $6.50

(c) The appropriations in this section include $251,000 for fiscal
year 2006 and (($1,022,000)) $1,015,000 for fiscal year 2007 for salary
increase adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) (($129,905,000)) $129,173,000 is provided for adjustments to
insurance benefit allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance
benefit allocations is $582.47 per month for the 2005-06 and 2006-07
school years. The appropriations in this section provide for a rate
increase to $629.07 per month for the 2005-06 school year and $682.54
per month for the 2006-07 school year. The adjustments to health
insurance benefit allocations are at the following rates:

School Year

2005-06 2006-07

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.42 $0.91

Highly Capable (per formula student) $2.88 $6.16

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $7.54 $16.20

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $1.49 $3.21

(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

Sec. 1404 2006 c 372 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $247,541,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($252,607,000))
$253,583,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $755,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,903,000))
$501,879,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $796,000 of this fiscal year 2006 appropriation
and a maximum of $828,000 of the fiscal year 2007 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $42.52 per weighted mile in the 2005-06 school
year and (($42.30)) $44.01 per weighted mile in the 2006-07 school year
exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of
this act. Included in the 2005-06 school year rate is ((a one-time))
an increase of $1.12 and included in the 2006-07 school year rate is an
increase of $1.71 to offset extraordinary increases in the price of
diesel fuel. Allocations for transportation of students transported
more than one radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as
determined by superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the
per mile reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the
formulas adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
Allocations for transportation of students living within one radius
mile shall be based on the number of enrolled students in grades
kindergarten through five living within one radius mile of their
assigned school multiplied by the per mile reimbursement rate for the
school year multiplied by 1.29.
(5) For busses purchased between July 1, 2005, and June 30, 2007,
the office of superintendent of public instruction shall provide
reimbursement funding to a school district only after the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was
purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or
a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote
based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195. The competitive specifications shall meet
federal motor vehicle safety standards, minimum state specifications as
established by rule by the superintendent, and supported options as
determined by the superintendent in consultation with the regional
transportation coordinators of the educational service districts.
(6) Beginning with the 2005-06 school year, the superintendent of
public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district
buses on the five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate
category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the
depreciation payment shall be based on the current state price. The
superintendent may include a weighting or other adjustment factor in
the averaging formula to ease the transition from the current-price
depreciation system to the average depreciation system. Prior to
making any depreciation payment in the 2005-06 school year, the
superintendent shall notify the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the legislature of the specific depreciation
formula to be used. The replacement cost shall be based on the lowest
bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year. A maximum of
$50,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation may be expended for
software programming costs associated with the implementation of this
subsection.

Sec. 1405 2006 c 372 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,147,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,159,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($270,423,000))
$313,038,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($276,729,000))
$319,344,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for state matching money for federal
child nutrition programs.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the 2007 fiscal year appropriation are
provided for summer food programs for children in low-income areas.
(3) $47,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $59,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to reimburse school districts for
school breakfasts served to students enrolled in the free or reduced
price meal program pursuant to House Bill No. 1771 (requiring school
breakfast programs in certain schools). If House Bill No. 1771 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 1406 2006 c 372 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $464,812,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($478,191,000))
$470,395,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($435,664,000))
$436,409,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,234,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,381,901,000))
$1,374,850,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall use the
excess cost methodology developed and implemented for the 2001-02
school year using the S-275 personnel reporting system and all related
accounting requirements to ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The S-275 and accounting changes in effect since the 2001-02
school year shall supercede any prior excess cost methodologies and
shall be required of all school districts.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
and federal funds to school districts based on two categories: The
optional birth through age two program for special education eligible
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers, and the mandatory special
education program for special education eligible students ages three to
twenty-one. A "special education eligible student" means a student
receiving specially designed instruction in accordance with a properly
formulated individualized education program.
(5)(a) For the 2005-06 and 2006-07 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers ages birth through two,
multiplied by the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
two enrollment, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
Each district's general fund -- state funded special education
enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent or 12.7 percent.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, $18,940,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation and $28,698,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided for safety net awards for districts with
demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts
provided in subsection (5) of this section. If safety net awards
exceed the amount appropriated in this subsection (8), the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the
state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal sources. Differences in
program costs attributable to district philosophy, service delivery
choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety
net awards.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(d) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor who shall be nonvoting
members of the committee; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund -- state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(12) A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for projects to provide special education
students with appropriate job and independent living skills, including
work experience where possible, to facilitate their successful
transition out of the public school system. The funds provided by this
subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.
(13) A maximum of $100,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation shall be expended to create a special education ombudsman
program within the office of superintendent of public instruction. The
purpose of the program is to provide support to parents, guardians,
educators, and students with disabilities. The program will provide
information to help families and educators understand state laws,
rules, and regulations, and access training and support, technical
information services, and mediation services. The ombudsman program
will provide data, information, and appropriate recommendations to the
office of superintendent of public instruction, school districts,
educational service districts, state need projects, and the parent and
teacher information center.
(14) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(15) A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation may be expended by the superintendent for projects
related to use of inclusion strategies by school districts for
provision of special education services.
(16) $1,400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation shall be
expended for one-time grants to school districts for the start-up costs
of implementing web-based programs that assist schools in meeting state
and federal requirements regarding individualized education plans.
(17) The superintendent, consistent with the new federal IDEA
reauthorization, shall continue to educate school districts on how to
implement a birth-to-three program and review the cost effectiveness
and learning benefits of early intervention.
(18) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.

Sec. 1407 2006 c 372 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT
ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $173,153,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($190,957,000))
$188,092,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($364,110,000))
$361,245,000

Sec. 1408 2006 c 372 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,078,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,237,000))
$17,551,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,432,000))
$35,746,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $236,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($236,000)) $196,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to maintain at
least one certificated instructional staff and related support services
at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to
support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to
furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions
are included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for
juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 1409 2006 c 372 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY
CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,900,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,974,000))
$6,918,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,918,000))
$13,862,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of $347.93 per funded
student for the 2005-06 school year and $351.98 per funded student for
the 2006-07 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded students
shall be a maximum of two percent of each district's full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $170,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.
(4) $90,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $90,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided for the Washington
destination imagination network and future problem-solving programs.

Sec. 1410 2006 c 372 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,382,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,297,000))
$51,536,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,799,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($244,478,000))
$244,717,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) ASSESSMENT
(a) $21,946,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $21,491,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $18,560,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
the Washington assessments of student learning (WASL), including
development and implementation of retake assessments for high school
students who are not successful in one or more content areas of the
WASL and development of alternative assessments or appeals procedures
to implement the certificate of academic achievement. The
superintendent of public instruction shall report quarterly on the
progress on development of alternative assessments or appeals
procedures. Within these amounts, the superintendent of public
instruction shall contract for the early return of 10th grade student
WASL results, on or around June 10th of each year. $100,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided
solely to: (i) Investigate the use of existing mathematics assessments
in languages other than English as possible means of measuring tenth
grade essential academic learnings and standards, including examining
the content and rigor of the assessments as well as their reliability
and validity; (ii) estimate the cost of translating the tenth grade
mathematics WASL into other languages and scoring these assessments
should they be implemented; and (iii) develop recommendations for (i)
and (ii) of this subsection (a). Funds provided in this section are
sufficient to implement section 5 of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6475 (alternative assessment options).
(b) $1,327,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 3127 (education), including section 2 of that act. If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(c) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for implementation of section 4 of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6255 (student-centered planning)
regarding reimbursement of diagnostic assessments.
(2) MATH REMEDIATION
The purpose of this subsection (2) is to strengthen high school
student performance in meeting the state standards in mathematics.
(a) Included in the general fund--state amounts provided in
subsection (1) of this section is $2,350,000 which is provided solely
for the development of a new tenth grade mathematics assessment tool
that: (i) Presents the mathematics essential learnings in segments for
assessment; (ii) is comparable in content and rigor to the tenth grade
mathematics WASL when all segments are considered together; (iii) is
reliable and valid; and (iv) can be used to determine a student's
academic performance level.
(b) $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the development of WASL knowledge and
skill learning modules to assist students performing at tenth grade
Level 1 in mathematics.
(c) $330,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for development of mathematics knowledge
and skill learning modules to teach middle and high school students
specific skills that have been identified as areas of difficulty for
tenth grade students. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop materials for classroom use and for tutorial
learning activities.
(d) $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for development of web-based applications
of the curriculum and materials produced under (b) and (c) of this
subsection as well as mathematics knowledge and skill modules and
materials previously developed by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction. The products are to be designed as on-line courses
for students needing Level 1 instruction; learning modules accessible
to classroom teachers for incorporation into classroom instruction;
tutorials that can be used as WASL assessment skill refreshers and as
tutor-guided and parent-guided learning modules; and on-line practice
WASLs with supporting item scoring information and student response
examples.
(3) PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT
(a) $548,000 of the fiscal year 2006 general fund -- state
appropriation and $548,000 of the fiscal year 2007 general fund -- state
appropriation are provided solely for training of paraprofessional
classroom assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom
assistants as provided in RCW 28A.415.310.
(b) $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for mentor teacher assistance,
including state support activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and
28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in
this subsection may be used each fiscal year to operate a mentor
academy to help districts provide effective training for peer mentors.
Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be allocated to school
districts based on the number of first year beginning teachers.
(c) $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(d) $3,180,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and (($4,358,000)) $4,597,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for salary
bonuses, and mandatory fringe benefits, for teachers who attain
certification by the national board for professional teaching
standards, subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(i) Teachers who hold a valid certificate from the national board
during the 2005-06 or 2006-07 school years shall receive an annual
bonus not to exceed $3,500 in each of these school years in which they
hold a national board certificate.
(ii) The annual bonus shall be paid in a lump sum amount and shall
not be included in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW
41.32.010(10).
(e) $98,761,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(4) SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT
(a) $338,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $488,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a principal support program.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction may contract
with an independent organization to administer the program. The
program shall include: (i) Development of an individualized
professional growth plan for a new principal or principal candidate;
and (ii) participation of a mentor principal who works over a period of
between one and three years with the new principal or principal
candidate to help him or her build the skills identified as critical to
the success of the professional growth plan. Within the amounts
provided, $25,000 per year shall be used to support additional
participation of secondary principals.
(b) $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Each educational audit
shall include recommendations for best practices and ways to address
identified needs and shall be presented to the community in a public
meeting to seek input on ways to implement the audit and its
recommendations.
(c) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a high school and school
district improvement program modeled after the office of the
superintendent of public instruction's existing focused assistance
program in (b) of this subsection. The state funding for this
improvement program will match an equal amount committed by a nonprofit
foundation in furtherance of a jointly funded program.
(d) A maximum of $250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for summer
accountability institutes offered by the superintendent of public
instruction. The institutes shall provide school district staff with
training in the analysis of student assessment data, information
regarding successful district and school teaching models, research on
curriculum and instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve
instruction in reading, mathematics, language arts, social studies,
including civics, and guidance and counseling. The superintendent of
public instruction shall emphasize issues of high school reform and
mathematics instruction when offering summer institute programs
supported by funds provided in this subsection.
(e) $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $515,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for the evaluation of reading and
mathematics textbooks, other instructional materials, and diagnostic
tools to determine the extent to which they are aligned with the state
standards. A scorecard of the analysis shall be made available to
school districts. The superintendent shall also develop and
disseminate information on essential components of comprehensive,
school-based math and reading programs and shall develop and
disseminate grade level expectations for reading and math which shall
include professional development modules and web-based materials.
(f) $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the mathematics helping corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(i) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall not be
permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(ii) The school improvement specialists shall provide the
following:
(A) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(B) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(C) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(D) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(E) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(F) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(G) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(g) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the improvement of reading
achievement and implementation of research-based reading models. The
superintendent shall evaluate reading curriculum programs and other
instructional materials to determine the extent to which they are
aligned with state standards. A report of the analyses shall be made
available to school districts. The superintendent shall report to
districts the assessments that are available to screen and diagnose
reading difficulties, and shall provide training on how to implement a
reading assessment system. Resources may also be used to disseminate
grade level expectations and develop professional development modules
and web-based materials.
(h) $30,401,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the reading first program under Title I of the no child
left behind act.
(i) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided for the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to award five grants to parent, community, and school
district partnership programs that will meet the unique needs of
different groups of students in closing the achievement gap. The
legislature intends that the pilot programs will help students meet
state learning standards, achieve the skills and knowledge necessary
for college or the workplace, reduce the achievement gap, prevent
dropouts, and improve graduation rates. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop and publish the
criteria for awarding grants by July 2006.
(i) The pilot programs shall be designed in such a way as to be
supplemental to educational services provided in the district and shall
utilize a community partnership based approach to helping students and
their parents.
(ii) The grant recipients shall work in collaboration with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop
measurable goals and evaluation methodologies for the pilot programs.
$25,000 of this appropriation may be used by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to hold a statewide meeting to
disseminate successful strategies developed by the grantees.
(iii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
issue a report to the legislature in the 2007 session on the progress
of each of the pilot programs.
(5) STUDENT SUPPORTS
(a) $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for: (i) The meals for kids
program under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155; (ii) to eliminate
the co-pay for students eligible for reduced price lunch eating
breakfast; and (iii) for additional assistance for school districts
initiating a summer food service program.
(b) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for an early reading grant program for
community-based initiatives that develop prereading and early reading
skills through parental and community involvement, public awareness,
coordination of resources, and partnerships with local school
districts. Grant awards shall include funding for one-time start up
costs for local affiliates and a one-time partial payment of school
district dues to local affiliates of up to 30 percent of the per
student dues amount. Grant applications shall include:
(i) Strategies for parental involvement emphasizing ages birth to
five and outreach to diverse communities;
(ii) Evidence of collaboration with, and support from, local school
districts, and how the activities funded in the grant are complementary
to the reading improvement efforts of local school districts;
(iii) A plan for community participation and coordination of
resources including in-kind and financial support by public and private
sector partners;
(iv) Measurable goals and evaluation methodology to determine
impact;
(v) Integration of reading strategies from the Washington state
early learning and development benchmarks;
(vi) A plan for marketing and public relations;
(vii) Strategies for sustaining the program when grant funding is
no longer available; and
(viii) Evidence of district commitment to reading improvement,
aligned curriculum, progress monitoring, and time-on-task.
(c) $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps.
The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing
comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more
schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs. Grants
provided under this section may be used by school districts for
expenditures from September 2005 through August 31, 2007.
(d) $3,594,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,594,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
provide a continuum of care for children and families to help children
become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall
contain local plans designed collaboratively with community service
providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which
the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible.
Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.
(6) TECHNOLOGY
(a) $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate a process to
facilitate the evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses to
school districts which includes the following: Creation of a general
listing of the types of available online curriculum courses; a survey
conducted by each regional educational technology support center of
school districts in its region regarding the types of online curriculum
courses desired by school districts; a process to evaluate and
recommend to school districts the best online courses in terms of
curriculum, student performance, and cost; and assistance to school
districts in procuring and providing the courses to students.
(b) $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for the development and posting of web-based instructional tools, assessment data, and other information that
assists schools and teachers implementing higher academic standards.

Sec. 1411 2006 c 372 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,205,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,608,000))
$58,181,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,741,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($172,058,000))
$168,631,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $759.58 per
eligible bilingual student in the 2005-06 school year and $770.40 in
the 2006-07 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to 1.5 percent of the school
year allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section,
and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, solely for the central provision of assessments as
provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are
provided solely to develop a system for the tracking of current and
former transitional bilingual program students.
(5) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I Part C and English
language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III
of the elementary and secondary education act.

Sec. 1412 2006 c 372 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,018,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,626,000))
$64,353,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,605,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $553,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $348,351,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($503,153,000))
$502,880,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $184.69 per funded student for the
2005-06 school year and $187.97 per funded student for the 2006-07
school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided under
section 504 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the following as appropriate:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12
for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch in the prior school year; and
(ii) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch exceeded forty percent, subtract forty percent from
the district's percentage and multiply the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school
year.
(d) In addition to amounts allocated in (b) and (c) of this
subsection, an additional amount shall be allocated to a school
district for each school year in which the district's allocation is
less than the amount the district received for the general fund--state
learning assistance program allocation in the 2004-05 school year. The
amount of the allocation in this section shall be sufficient to
maintain the 2004-05 school year allocation.
(2) Increases in a school district's allocation above the 2004-05
school year level shall be directed to grades nine through ten for the
2006-07 school year.
(3) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(4) Small school districts are encouraged to make the most
efficient use of the funding provided by using regional educational
service district cooperatives to hire staff, provide professional
development activities, and implement reading and mathematics programs
consistent with research-based guidelines provided by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(5) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund -- state or education legacy trust
funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(6) School districts are encouraged to coordinate the use of these
funds with other federal, state, and local sources to serve students
who are below grade level and to make efficient use of resources in
meeting the needs of students with the greatest academic deficits.

Sec. 1413 2006 c 372 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--PROMOTING ACADEMIC
SUCCESS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,842,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,879,000))
$19,067,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $189,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,910,000))
$23,098,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The amounts appropriated in this section are provided solely
for remediation for students who have not met standard in one or more
content areas of the WASL in the spring of their tenth grade year and
on each retake thereafter. The funds may be used for extended learning
activities, including summer school, before and after school, Saturday
classes, skill seminars, assessment preparation, and in-school or out-of-school tutoring. Extended learning activities may occur on the
school campus, via the internet, or at other locations and times that
meet student needs. Funds allocated under this section shall not be
considered basic education funding. Amounts allocated under this
section shall fund new extended learning opportunities, and shall not
supplant funding for existing programs and services.
(2) School district allocations for promoting academic success
programs shall be calculated as follows:
(a) A portion of the district's student units shall be the number
of content area assessments (reading, writing, and mathematics) on
which students were more than one standard error of measurement from
meeting standard on the Washington assessment of student learning for
the current class of eleventh grade students.
(b) The other portion of the district's student units shall be the
number of content area assessments (reading, writing, and mathematics)
on which students were less than one standard error of measurement from
meeting standard but did not meet standard on the Washington assessment
of student learning for the current class of eleventh grade students.
Districts with at least one but less than 20 student units combining
the student units generated from this subsection and (a) of this
subsection shall be counted as having 20 student units for the purposes
of the allocations in (d) and (e)(i) of this subsection.
(c) The legislature recognizes that professional development and
planning for teachers is an important component of high quality
extended learning activities. Accordingly, a one-time funding amount
equal to 12 hours of certificated instructional staff units per 13.0
student units, as calculated in (a) and (b) of this subsection, is
provided in this section to ensure that extended learning activities
are of high quality and aligned to the state's essential academic
learning requirements.
(d) Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries and
benefits shall be determined using formula-generated staff units
calculated pursuant to this subsection. Ninety-four hours of
certificated instructional staff units are allocated per 13.0 student
units as calculated under (a) of this subsection and thirty-four hours
of certificated instructional staff units are allocated per 13.0
student units as calculated under (b) of this subsection. Allocations
for salaries and benefits for the staff units calculated under this
subsection shall be calculated in the same manner as provided under
section 503 of this act. Salary and benefit increase funding for staff
units generated under this section is included in section 504 of this
act.
(e) The following additional allocations are provided per student
unit, as calculated in (a) and (b) of this subsection:
(i) $12.50 for maintenance, operations, and transportation;
(ii) $12.00 for pre- and post-remediation assessments;
(iii) $17.00 per reading remediation student unit;
(iv) $8.00 per mathematics remediation student unit; and
(v) $8.00 per writing remediation student unit.
(f) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute
school year allocations according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.
(3) School districts shall report annually to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction on the use of these funds,
including the types of assistance selected by students, the number of
students receiving each type of assistance, and the impact on WASL test
scores.
(4) $708,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,408,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for additional one-time
allocations to offer remedial programs for students in the class of
2007 or other students who have not achieved success on the tenth grade
WASL. The formula for distributing the allocations to school districts
shall include amounts for students in the class of 2007 who register to
retake the WASL and want remedial assistance, and other factors as
determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
Before making the allocations from the funding provided in this
subsection, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall consult with the office of financial management to ensure that
the proposed allocations will achieve efficient and effective program
delivery and that they are one-time in nature.
(5) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided for competitive innovation grants awarded to
schools and school districts for implementing high school remediation
programs that are unique in program delivery, program accessibility,
program content, or a combination of these factors and that serve
students who have not achieved success on the tenth grade WASL.
(6) School districts may carry over from one year to the next up to
20 percent of funds allocated under this program; however, carryover
funds shall be expended for promoting academic success programs, and
may be used to provide extended learning programs for students beyond
their eleventh grade year who want continued remedial assistance to
pass the WASL.

Sec. 1414 2006 c 372 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT
PROGRAM
Student Achievement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($630,537,000))
$630,313,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $300.00 per FTE student for the 2005-06 school year and $375.00 per FTE student for the 2006-07 school year.
For the purposes of this section, FTE student refers to the annual
average full-time equivalent enrollment of the school district in
grades kindergarten through twelve for the prior school year, as
reported to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by
August 31st of the previous school year.
(2) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection (2).
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute the
school year allocation according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

Sec. 1415 2006 c 372 s 518 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,504,000))
$32,799,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,784,000))
$33,079,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $29,941,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for providing early childhood education
assistance. Of this amount, $1,497,000 is provided solely to increase
the number of children receiving education and $2,146,000 is provided
solely for a targeted vendor rate increase.
(2) $525,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for an early reading grant program for
community-based initiatives that develop prereading and early reading
skills through parental and community involvement, public awareness,
coordination of resources, and partnerships with local school
districts. If Substitute House Bill No. 2836 (reading achievement
account) is enacted by June 30, 2006, this amount shall be deposited in
the reading achievement account. Grant awards shall include funding
for one-time start up costs for local affiliates and a one-time partial
payment of school district dues to local affiliates of up to 30 percent
of the per student dues amount. Grant applications shall include:
(a) Strategies for parental involvement emphasizing ages birth to
five and outreach to diverse communities;
(b) Evidence of collaboration with, and support from, local school
districts, and how the activities funded in the grant are complementary
to the reading improvement efforts of local school districts;
(c) A plan for community participation and coordination of
resources including in-kind and financial support by public and private
sector partners;
(d) Measurable goals and evaluation methodology to determine
impact;
(e) Integration of reading strategies from the Washington state
early learning and development benchmarks;
(f) A plan for marketing and public relations;
(g) Strategies for sustaining the program when grant funding is no
longer available; and
(h) Evidence of district commitment to reading improvement, aligned
curriculum, progress monitoring, and time-on-task.
(3) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the child care career and wage ladder
program created by chapter 507, Laws of 2005.

(End of part)

PART XV
HIGHER EDUCATION
Sec. 1501 2006 c 372 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $337,629,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($352,714,000))
$352,614,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,209,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,143,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,748,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($714,347,000))
$714,247,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $165,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $165,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item UW-01.
(2) $300,000 of the general fund -- private/local appropriation is
provided solely for shellfish biotoxin monitoring as specified in
chapter 263, Laws of 2003 (SSB 6073, shellfish license fee).
(3)(a) $3,057,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $7,691,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy
for 360 new enrollments at the Seattle campus, 325 new enrollments at
the Tacoma campus, and 275 new enrollments at the Bothell campus. By
December 15th of each year of the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the
university shall report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees the number of new student FTEs by campus
enrolled with the funding provided in this subsection.
(b) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for 150 additional high-demand student
enrollments. The university shall make it a priority to expand access
to baccalaureate programs in engineering, math, and science. By
December 15, 2006, the university shall report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees the number
of new student FTEs enrolled with the funding provided in this
subsection.
(4) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 949 through 980 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding during the 2005-2007 biennium. This increase
in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition revenues
that will be generated and retained by the university as a result of
the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of this act.
Given these increases in core funding, the University of Washington
shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving
the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that are ranked in the top twenty
nationally;
(e) Sustain the quality of its research programs as measured by the
national ranking for federal research grants received; and
(f) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before November 1, 2006, the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating board
shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to the
governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to December 1, 2006.
(5) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to assist the transition of University of
Washington-Tacoma and University of Washington-Bothell from branch
campuses serving upper-division students, to four-year campuses serving
freshmen, sophomores, and upper-division students. Funds may be used
to develop curricula, recruit new faculty, and expand student services.
Consistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board, UW-Tacoma and UW-Bothell may begin enrolling lower-division students beginning in fiscal year 2007.
(6) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for research on labor and economic
issues in Washington state through the Harry Bridges center.
(7) $146,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $296,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for the
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the Burke Museum to enhance the
museum's public outreach capabilities.
(8) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for the
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the institute for learning and
brain sciences (ILABS) to develop a partnership, linking ILABS to
policymakers, private sectors and user-groups.
(9) The University of Washington medical center shall provide
inpatient and outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in
department of corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the
average rate that the department of corrections has negotiated with
other community hospitals in Washington state.
(10) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Olympic natural resources
center.
(11) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $450,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to maintain the autism center at
the University of Washington-Tacoma campus. The facility will continue
to function as a satellite facility to the autism center at the
University of Washington medical center in Seattle and provide clinical
service and professional training.
(12) $2,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to increase the university's capacity to
conduct research in the life science fields.
(13) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for improvements to the Pacific Northwest
seismic network.
(14) $1,008,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for extraordinary natural gas cost
expenses.
(15) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the university to implement a
department of global health. The school of medicine and the school of
public health and community medicine will jointly form and operate the
department. The focus will be establishing sustainable improvements in
global health through public health policy, practice, and medical care.
(16) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to pay for operations and maintenance
costs of the bioengineering and genome sciences buildings that will
come on line during the 2005-07 biennium.
(17) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to expand the Washington search for young
scholars program at the Robinson center at the University of
Washington.
(((19))) (18) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for math engineering science
achievement (MESA) Washington to establish centers throughout the
state.
(19) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to
identify and carry out, or otherwise appropriately support, a process
to identify issues that have led to conflict around land use
requirements and property rights, and explore practical and effective
ways to resolve or reduce that conflict.

Sec. 1502 2006 c 372 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $206,511,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($213,500,000))
$213,520,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,162,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($431,466,000))
$431,486,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $210,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $210,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item WSU-01.
(2)(a) $2,741,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $6,900,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy
for 430 new enrollments at the Pullman campus, 450 new enrollments at
the Vancouver campus, and 25 new enrollments at the Tri-Cities campus.
By December 15th of each year of the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the
university shall report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees the number of new student FTEs by campus
enrolled with the funding provided in this subsection.
(b) $1,174,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for 80 additional high demand student
enrollments. The university shall make it a priority to expand
baccalaureate and graduate level access to nursing programs and to
expand baccalaureate programs in engineering and construction
management. By December 15, 2006, the university shall report to the
office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees
the number of new student FTEs enrolled with the funding provided in
this subsection.
(3) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 949 through 980 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding during the 2005-2007 biennium. This increase
in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition revenues
that will be generated and retained by the university as a result of
the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of this act.
Given these increases in core funding, Washington State University
shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving
the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that are ranked in the top twenty
nationally;
(e) Sustain the quality of its research programs as measured by the
national ranking for federal research grants received; and
(f) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before November 1, 2006 the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating board
shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to the
governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to December 1, 2006.
(4) $507,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,014,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand the entering class
of veterinary medicine students by 16 resident student FTEs each
academic year during the 2005-2007 biennium.
(5) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to assist the transition of Washington
State University-Vancouver from a branch campus serving only upper-division students, to a four-year campus serving freshmen, sophomores,
and upper-division students. Funds may be used to develop curricula,
recruit new faculty, and expand student services. Consistent with the
recommendations of the higher education coordinating board, WSU-Vancouver may begin enrolling lower-division students beginning in
fiscal year 2007.
(6) The university shall give consideration to reprioritizing
agricultural research funding to allow for expansion of the center for
precision agricultural systems and development of the biologically
intensive and organic agriculture program.
(7) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to study the cost of complying
with vehicle licensing and registration laws. Funding is subject to
the passage of House Bill No. 1241 (modifying vehicle licensing and
registration penalties). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5101
(providing incentives to support renewable energy). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(9) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to conduct research on
alternatives for controlling ghost shrimp in Willapa bay.
(10) $716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for extraordinary natural gas cost
expenses.
(11) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to assist the Washington State University
(WSU) Tri-Cities in planning the transition from a branch campus
serving upper-division students, to a four-year campus serving
freshmen, sophomores, and upper-division students. Funds may be used
to develop curricula, recruit new faculty, and expand student services.
WSU Tri-Cities may begin enrolling lower-division students beginning in
Fall 2007.
(12) $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the university to operate the
AgWeatherNet system.
(13) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the center for sustaining agriculture
and natural resources to create a biologically intensive and organic
agriculture program.
(((15))) (14) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for allocation to a private
nonprofit medical and scientific research institute to be located in
Spokane for the purposes of developing and implementing new medical
treatment therapies involving systems biology, genomics, and
nanotechnology. The allocation shall be matched by the nonprofit
institute by an equal amount of funds from nonstate sources. The
university shall not retain any of these funds for administrative
purposes.
(((16))) (15) $98,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to establish a biofuels consumer
education and outreach program at the Washington State University
extension energy program.
(16) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to
identify and carry out, or otherwise appropriately support, a process
to identify issues that have led to conflict around land use
requirements and property rights, and explore practical and effective
ways to resolve or reduce that conflict.

Sec. 1503 2006 c 372 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,671,000))
$45,586,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,006,000))
$46,980,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,461,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,241,000))
$99,130,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,147,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $4,314,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy
for 650 new enrollments. By December 15th of each year of the 2005-07
fiscal biennium, the university shall report to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees the number of new
student FTEs by campus enrolled with the funding provided in this
subsection.
(2) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 949 through 980 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding during the 2005-2007 biennium. This increase
in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition revenues
that will be generated and retained by the university as a result of
the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of this act.
Given these increases in core funding, Central Washington University
shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving
the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that receive national accreditation;
and
(e) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before November 1, 2006, the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating board
shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to the
governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to December 1, 2006.
(3) For the 2006-07 and 2007-08 academic years, the legislature
hereby increases the limit on total gross authorized operating fees
revenue waived, exempted, or reduced by Central Washington University
pursuant to RCW 28B.15.910 to eleven percent.
(4) $206,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for extraordinary natural gas cost
expenses.

Sec. 1504 2006 c 372 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $156,449,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($162,843,000))
$162,968,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,075,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,910,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($395,278,000))
$395,403,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $299,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $308,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for the western interstate commission for higher
education.
(2) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for higher education student child care matching
grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(3) $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for the benefit of students who participate in
college assistance migrant programs (CAMP) operating in Washington
state. To ensure timely state aid, the board may establish a date
after which no additional grants would be available for the 2005-06 and
2006-07 academic years. The board shall disperse grants in equal
amounts to eligible post-secondary institutions so that state money in
all cases supplements federal CAMP awards.
(4) $124,901,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006, $134,506,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007, $28,400,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2006, and $31,654,000 of the education
legacy trust appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are for the state need
grant program. After April 1st of each fiscal year, uncommitted funds
from the annual appropriation for the state need grant program may be
transferred to the state work study or educational opportunity grant
programs and up to one percent may be transferred to the state
education trust account as authorized in RCW 28B.92.140.
Of the amounts provided in this subsection, up to $500,000 is to
implement House Bill No. 1345 (part-time student financial aid). The
board may not expend more than the amount provided in this subsection
to implement the bill.
(5) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for the implementation of Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1050 (foster care endowed scholarship program). The purpose
of the program is to help students who are or were in foster care
attend an institution of higher education in the state of Washington.
(6) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for the
fiscal year 2007 are to support the future teachers' conditional
scholarship and loan repayment program. Of this amount, $500,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided
solely to expand the program by up to 70 additional slots for
prospective teachers in special education, bilingual education,
secondary mathematics, and secondary science.
(7) $17,048,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $17,048,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, $863,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation
for fiscal year 2006, and $1,993,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are for the state work study
program. After April 1st of each fiscal year, uncommitted funds from
the annual appropriation for the state work study program may be
transferred to the state need grant or educational opportunity grant
programs. In addition to the administrative allowance in section
609(2) of this act, four percent of the general fund -- state amount and
the education legacy trust amounts in this subsection may be
transferred to and expended for state work study program
administration.
(8) $2,867,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,867,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for educational opportunity grants pursuant to
chapter 233, Laws of 2003 (ESB 5676). The board may deposit sufficient
funds from its appropriation into the state education trust fund as
established in RCW 28B.92.140 to provide a one-year renewal of the
grant for each new recipient of the educational opportunity grant
award. After April 1st of each fiscal year, uncommitted funds from the
annual appropriation for the educational opportunity grant program may
be transferred to the state work study or state need grant programs.
(9) $2,384,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,361,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are to implement the Washington scholars program. Any
Washington scholars program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each
year may be transferred by the board to the Washington award for
vocational excellence. Amounts provided in this subsection are
sufficient for the higher education coordinating board to select three
Washington scholars in fiscal year 2006 and two Washington scholars in
fiscal year 2007 from each legislative district under the provisions of
RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150.
(10) $794,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $847,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are to implement Washington award for vocational
excellence program. Any Washington award for vocational program moneys
not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the board
to the Washington scholars program.
(11) $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for community scholarship matching grants of
$2,000 each and up to a total of $46,000 per year in grants for
nonprofit community organizations with preference given to
organizations affiliated with scholarship America to administer the
scholarship matching grants. To be eligible for the matching grant, a
nonprofit community organization organized under section 501(c)(3) of
the internal revenue code must demonstrate that it has raised $2,000 in
new moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
section. An organization may receive more than one $2,000 matching
grant and preference shall be given to organizations affiliated with
scholarship America.
(12) Subject to state need grant service requirements pursuant to
chapter 28B.119 RCW, $4,325,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 is for the Washington promise
scholarship program. The Washington promise scholarship program is
terminated following fiscal year 2006. No Washington promise
scholarship awards may be offered to students beyond the graduating
high school class of 2004. Unexpended funds remaining after June 30,
2006, may be transferred to the state education trust account
authorized in RCW 28B.92.140.
(13) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for one-time costs associated with
stabilizing the GEAR-UP scholarship program.
(14) $3,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for the health professions loan repayment and
scholarship program.
(15) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are for the Washington center scholarship program.
(16) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the board to contract with the
Washington leadership 1000 scholarship fund. The funds shall be used
to support, develop, and implement the leadership 1000 scholarship
program which matches private benefactors with selected economically
disadvantaged students who would otherwise be unable to attend college
after depleting all other sources of scholarship and financial aid.
(17) By December 1st of each fiscal year, the board shall submit a
report to the legislature detailing the outcomes from the previous year
and a progress report on the current year for each of the student aid
programs listed in this section: (a) The number of students served;
(b) the award amount provided to students by sector; (c) the total
amount spent; and (d) an explanation for any variation between the
amount listed in the subsections and the amount expended.

(End of part)

PART XVI
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 1601 2006 c 372 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT
LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $640,544,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($683,019,000))
$679,329,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,924,000))
$6,500,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $539,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,395,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,583,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,334,004,000))
$1,330,935,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
deposit into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account. The
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 shall be deposited in the debt-limit
general fund bond retirement account by June 30, 2006.

Sec. 1602 2006 c 372 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,588,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,743,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($130,909,000))
$131,001,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($182,240,000))
$182,332,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 1603 2006 c 372 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,357,000))
$957,000
State Building Construction Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,080,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,000))
$86,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,324,000))
$3,936,000

Sec. 1604 2006 c 372 s 705 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,000,000))
$9,000,000

The sum of (($8,000,000)) $9,000,000 is appropriated from the
disaster response account for the purpose of making allocations to the
Washington state patrol for fire mobilizations costs or to the
department of natural resources for fire suppression costs.

Sec. 1605 2006 c 372 s 706 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--FIRE CONTINGENCY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

The appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: The appropriations ((is)) are
provided solely for deposit into the disaster response account for the
purposes specified in section 705 of this act.

Sec. 1606 2006 c 372 s 707 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS. The following sums, or so much thereof as may
be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise
indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations
for sundry claims. These appropriations are to be disbursed on
vouchers approved by the director of financial management, except as
otherwise provided, as follows:
(1) Reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of
self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110:
(a) Kirk F. Schultz, claim number SCJ 2006-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,312
(b) Scott A. King, claim number SCJ 2006-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,922
(c) Mark D. Huckaba, claim number SCJ 2006-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
(d) James D. Brittain, claim number SCJ 2006-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
(e) Jain E. Johnson, claim number SCJ 2007-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,250
(f) Sandra J. Ciske, claim number SCJ 2007-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,168
(g) Matthew R. Young, claim number SCJ 2007-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,185
(h) Kevin J. Flockhart, claim number SCJ 2007-04 . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,209
(i) James J. O'Hagan, claim number SCJ 2007-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,207
(2) Payment from the state wildlife account for damage to crops by
wildlife pursuant to RCW 77.36.050:
(a) For deposit into the self-insurance liability account for
reimbursement of payment made to Circle S Landscape, claim number SCG
2004-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,926
(b) ((Venture Farms, claim number SCG 2005-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,448
(c))) Patrick O'Hagen, claim number SCG 2006-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,673
(((d))) (c) Patrick O'Hagen, claim number SCG 2006-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,389
(((e))) (d) Swampapple Enterprises, Inc., claim number
SCG 2006-04 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,574
(((f))) (e) Wilbur H. Mundy, claim number SCG 2006-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,307
(((g))) (f) Sam Kayser, claim number SCG 2006-08 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,108
(((h))) (g) Richard Cordell, claim number SCG 2006-09 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,076
(h) Ralland L. Wallace, claim number SCG 2006-06 . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,393
(i) Sulfer Creek Ranches, claim number SCG 2007-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,602
(3) Payment for reinterment of human remains from historic graves
pursuant to RCW 68.60.050:
Darrin Erdahl, claim number SCO 2006-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000

Sec. 1607 2005 c 518 s 707 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING
IMPACT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($792,000))
$604,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($837,000))
$649,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
distribution to counties to pay for the costs of implementing chapter
176, Laws of 2004, which makes amendments to the special sex offender
sentencing alternative.

Sec. 1608 2006 c 372 s 708 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The appropriations in this section are subject to
the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the
law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be
made on a monthly basis beginning July 1, 2005, consistent with chapter
41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial
retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with
chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,450,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,750,000))
$38,650,000

(a) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriations for fiscal
year 2006 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriations for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 1936 (emergency medical technicians). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided shall lapse.
(b) $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the state contributions
required under Substitute Senate Bill No. 5615 (law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 disability
benefit). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts
provided shall lapse.
(c) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2932
(catastrophic disability). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,601,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,539,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges
retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($87,940,000))
$87,840,000

Sec. 1609 2006 c 372 s 712 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--ENERGY FREEDOM ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,000,000))
$20,500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
((deposit)) expenditure into the energy freedom account. If Engrossed
Third Substitute House Bill No. 2939 (energy freedom) is not enacted by
June 30, 2006, the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

Sec. 1610 2006 c 372 s 715 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PERSONNEL LITIGATION
SETTLEMENT--RETROSPECTIVE PAYMENTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,813,000))
$11,039,976
Special Personnel Litigation Revolving
Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,689,000))
$9,954,024
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,502,000))
$20,994,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of
funding the retrospective payments for the settlement of litigation
involving compensation differentials among personnel classes, W.P.E.A.
v. State of Washington.
(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and
accounts, the ((state treasurer)) office of financial management shall
transfer or direct the transfer of sufficient moneys from each
dedicated fund or account, including local funds of state agencies and
institutions of higher education, to the special personnel litigation
revolving account in accordance with ((LEAP)) OFM document number
((2006-S11)) 2007-S01 dated ((March 3,)) December 19, 2006. Agencies
and institutions of higher education with local funds will deposit
sufficient money to the special personnel litigation revolving account
from their local funds as directed by the office of financial
management. The office of financial management will direct the
transfer of funds in the amount of the settlement to the administrator
of the settlement on the date required by the court order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1611 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PERSONNEL LITIGATION
SETTLEMENT--PROSPECTIVE PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,000
Special Personnel Litigation Revolving Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,459,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of
funding the prospective provisions in the settlement agreement,
settling all claims in the litigation involving compensation
differentials among personnel classes, W.P.E.A. v. State of Washington.
(2) Appropriations or spending authority is provided to agencies in
accordance with OFM document number 2007-S02 dated December 19, 2006.
This funding is to be used in each agency's payroll process to pay the
increased salaries for specified job classes as required in the
settlement agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1612 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EQUAL JUSTICE SUBACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the equal justice subaccount.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1613 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,700,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1614 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--TOBACCO PREVENTION AND CONTROL
ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the tobacco prevention and control account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1615 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EMERGENCY RESERVE FUND
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $119,338,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the emergency reserve fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1616 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EDUCATION LEGACY TRUST ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the education legacy trust account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1617 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--READING ACHIEVEMENT ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the reading achievement account. The amounts provided
shall be used: (1) To implement an early reading grant program for
evidence-based or promising community-based initiatives that develop
early literacy skills through parental and community involvement,
public awareness, coordination of resources, and partnerships with
local school districts; and (2) to provide statewide support to
community-based reading initiatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1618 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EDUCATION CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the education construction account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1619 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--MOBILE HOME PARK RELOCATION
ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the mobile home park relocation account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1620 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--STATE WILDLIFE ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the state wildlife account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1621 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--BOATING ACTIVITIES ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the boating activities account under Substitute House
Bill No. 1651 (boating activities). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1622 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--HEALTH SERVICES ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the health services account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1623 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--VIOLENCE REDUCTION AND DRUG
ENFORCEMENT ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the violence reduction and drug enforcement account.

Sec. 1624 2005 c 518 s 729 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PENSION CONTRIBUTION
ADJUSTMENTS FOR THE PUBLIC SAFETY EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM
((General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000))
Special Account Retirement Contribution Increase
Revolving Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ((($3,900,000)))
-$73,000
((TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000))

The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are)) is subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are)) is provided
solely to make adjustments to agency appropriations to reflect the
costs associated with the entry of employees into the public safety
employees' retirement system as created by chapter 242, Laws of 2004.
(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and
accounts, the state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys
from each dedicated fund or account to the special account retirement
contribution increase revolving account in accordance with schedules
provided by the office of financial management.

(End of part)

PART XVII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 1701 2006 c 372 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,561,000))
$6,644,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,292,000))
$44,282,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,568,000))
$3,757,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and
education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,252,000))
$3,979,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,000))
$41,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly
funded autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,969,000))
$2,044,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation
for harbor improvement revenue
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($147,000))
$133,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($83,325,000))
$77,023,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,650,000))
$53,953,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,315,000))
$21,381,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for
liquor excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,512,000))
$41,525,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for
liquor profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,818,000))
$68,911,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for
local government financial assistance
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,100,000))
$26,020,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($368,547,000))
$349,693,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 1702 2006 c 372 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,050,000))
$2,173,601

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2005-07 biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 1703 2006 c 372 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,367,000))
$1,499,068

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2005-07 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 1704 2006 c 372 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing
fees distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,644,000))
$2,292,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood
control funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,000))
$67,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal
forest reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,500,000))
$84,071,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,212,000))
$86,430,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 1705 2006 c 372 s 805 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS. For transfers in this section
to the state general fund, pursuant to RCW 43.135.035(5), the state
expenditure limit shall be increased by the amount of the transfer.
The increase shall occur in the fiscal year in which the transfer
occurs.

State Convention and Trade Center Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$5,150,000 for fiscal year 2006 and $5,150,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000
General Fund: For transfer to the tourism
development and promotion account, $150,000
for fiscal year 2006 and $150,000 for fiscal
year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Financial Services Regulation Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $778,000 for
fiscal year 2006 and $779,000 for fiscal
year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,557,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For
transfer to the drinking water
assistance account, $8,400,000 for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,400,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer
to the health services account, in an
amount not to exceed the actual balance
of the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($185,823,000))
$166,070,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $45,000,000 for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
tobacco prevention and control account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,086,000))
$21,257,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
water quality account . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,885,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
violence reduction and drug enforcement
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,932,000
Public Employees' and Retirees' Insurance Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$40,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 and
$45,000,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,000,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$2,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Secretary of State's Revolving Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $250,000
for fiscal year 2006 and $250,000 for
fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $9,500,000
for fiscal year 2006 and $7,000,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,500,000
General Fund: For transfer to the water quality
account, $318,000 for fiscal year 2006 and
$319,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $637,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the
water quality account . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,500,000
Water Quality Account: For transfer to the
water pollution control revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,534,000))
$11,034,000
Pollution Liability Insurance Trust Account: For
transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance repayment
account, an amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,800,000
Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control
Account: For transfer to the state general
fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 and
$1,000,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to
the public facility construction loan revolving
account, $4,500,000 for fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to
the disaster response account, $3,000,000 for
fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Natural Resources Equipment Revolving Fund: For
transfer to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account,
$1,500,000 for fiscal year 2006 and $1,500,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Education Legacy Trust Account: For transfer
to the student achievement account,
$35,555,000 for fiscal
year 2006 and $103,046,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,601,000

(End of part)

PART XVIII
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1801 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1802 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

ACROSS THE BOARD SALARY ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 230
ADDITIONAL PAY STEP . . . . . . . . . . . . 233
ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 6, 261
AGENCY REQUEST CONSOLIDATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 232
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 14, 268
BELATED CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 208
BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 76
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 31, 288
BOND EXPENSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 225
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 448
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 188
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
CLASSIFICATION CONSOLIDATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 233
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 242
COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 240
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE BU 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . 243
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE BU 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . 243
IFPTE LOCAL 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . 238
SEIU 1199 . . . . . . . . . . . . 239
SEIU LOCAL 925 CHILDCARE WORKERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 246
TEAMSTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 237
UFCW . . . . . . . . . . . . 238
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--SEIU 925 . . . . . . . . . . . . 245
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--UWPOA . . . . . . . . . . . . 244
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--WFSE CAMPUS-WIDE BARGAINING UNIT . . . . . . . . . . . . 244
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--WFSE POLICE MANAGEMENT BARGAINING UNIT . . . . . . . . . . . . 244
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY--WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 243
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY--WSU POLICE GUILD . . . . . . . . . . . . 243
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--PSE BARGAINING UNIT D . . . . . . . . . . . . 242
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--PSE BARGAINING UNIT PTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 242
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 241
WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 235
WFSE HIGHER EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 241
WPEA . . . . . . . . . . . . 236
WPEA HIGHER EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 241
WSP LIEUTENANTS ASSOCIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 246
WSP TROOPERS AND LIEUTENANTS ASSNS HEALTH BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 260
WSP TROOPERS ASSOCIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 245
YAKIMA VALLEY COMMUNITY COLLEGE--WPEA/UFCW . . . . . . . . . . . . 245
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU LOCAL 775 HOMECARE WORKERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 246
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 235
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 94
COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
COMPENSATION
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 226
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE--SUPER COALITION INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 228
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 230
REVISE PENSION GAIN SHARING . . . . . . . . . . . . 226
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 100, 375
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 6, 261
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 77, 344
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 108, 388
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 39, 295
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 16, 268
COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 207
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 87, 361
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING . . . . . . . . . . . . 200, 438
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 94, 368
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 101, 375
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 81, 353
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 78, 347
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 112
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 105, 382
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 458
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 208
OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 284
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 31, 286
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 92
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 40, 296
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 72, 339
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 59, 322
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 66, 329
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 41, 298
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 54, 316
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 63, 327
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 45, 303
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 66, 332
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 47, 306
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 73, 340
SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 72
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 72, 338
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 81, 350
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 203
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 186
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 25, 280
EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 224
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 92, 366
ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 100
EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 221
FISCAL GROWTH FACTOR--WASHINGTON STATE GAMBLING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 247
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
GEODUCK AQUACULTURE RESEARCH ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 216
SHELLFISH CONTAMINATION PREVENTION AND PROTECTION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 215
FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
GOVERNOR
COMPENSATION--PENSION RATE CHANGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 209
WORKERS COMPENSATION CHANGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 215
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 39, 295
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 197, 450
HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 81
HORSE RACING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 76, 344
INCENTIVE SAVINGS
FY 2008 . . . . . . . . . . . . 211
FY 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . 211
INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 80
INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 221
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ENTERPRISE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 223
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 99
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
LEGISLATIVE GIFT CENTER ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 34, 289
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 37, 291
MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 27, 284
OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID . . . . . . . . . . . . 8, 263
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 25, 280
BOATING ACTIVITIES ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 463
CLEAN STREAMS AND CLEAN SKY SUBACCOUNT OF THE ENERGY FREEDOM ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 214
COMMUNITY PRESERVATION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 213
DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 206, 461
EDUCATION CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 463
EDUCATION LEGACY TRUST ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 462
EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 209
EMERGENCY FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 206
EMERGENCY RESERVE FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 462
ENERGY FREEDOM ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 460
EQUAL JUSTICE SUBACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 461
EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
FAMILY PROSPERITY ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 213
FIRE CONTINGENCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 206, 457
FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 456
FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 205
HEALTH SERVICES ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 464
INDEPENDENT YOUTH HOUSING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 213
LOCAL PUBLIC HEALTH FINANCING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
MOBILE HOME PARK RELOCATION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 463
OUTDOOR EDUCATION AND RECREATION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 215
PENSION CONTRIBUTION ADJUSTMENTS FOR THE PSE RETIREMENT SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 464
PERSONNEL LITIGATION SETTLEMENT--PROSPECTIVE PAYMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 461
PERSONNEL LITIGATION SETTLEMENT--RETROSPECTIVE PAYMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 460
READING ACHIEVEMENT ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 210, 462
REGIONAL FISHERIES ENHANCEMENT GROUP ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 214
REINVESTING IN YOUTH ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 211
SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING IMPACT . . . . . . . . . . . . 206, 458
STATE WILDLIFE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 463
TOBACCO PREVENTION AND CONTROL ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 462
VANCOUVER NATIONAL HISTORIC RESERVE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 213
VIOLENCE REDUCTION AND DRUG ENFORCEMENT ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 464
WATER POLLUTION CONTROL REVOLVING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 210
WATER QUALITY CAPITAL ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 210
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 110
RETAIN FISCAL YEAR 2007 PAY INCREASE . . . . . . . . . . . . 234
SALARY SURVEY . . . . . . . . . . . . 231
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 10, 264
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 92
SHIFT DIFFERENTIAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 234
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 13, 266
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
STATE DESKTOP COMPUTER ENERGY REDUCTION STRATEGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 73, 340
STATE INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 98, 373
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 113, 391
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 202
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 202
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 204, 205
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 455, 456
COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 218, 467
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 468
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 219
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 218, 468
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 466
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 217
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 469
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 219
STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 224
SUNDRY CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 457
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 116, 166, 167, 394
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 132
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 148, 423
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 125, 404
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 146, 421
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 161, 433
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 146, 421
MISC PURPOSES UNDER SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT AND NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 148
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 147, 423
PROMOTING ACADEMIC SUCCESS . . . . . . . . . . . . 162, 434
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 138, 414
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 136, 412
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 140, 416
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 140, 417
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 164, 437
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 160, 432
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 5, 261
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 191
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 441
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 223
VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 225
VOLUNTARY SEPARATION INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 225
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 110
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 202
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 202
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 445
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 182
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 193
WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 199
--- END ---