BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In establishing an office of public
guardianship, the legislature intends to promote the availability of
guardianship services for individuals who need them and for whom
adequate services may otherwise be unavailable. The legislature
reaffirms its commitment to treat liberty and autonomy as paramount
values for all Washington residents and to authorize public
guardianship only to the minimum extent necessary to provide for health
or safety, or to manage financial affairs, when the legal conditions
for appointment of a guardian are met. It does not intend to alter
those legal conditions or to expand judicial authority to determine
that any individual is incapacitated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Office" means the office of public guardianship.
(2) "Public guardian" means an individual or entity providing
public guardianship services.
(3) "Public guardianship services" means the services provided by
a guardian or limited guardian appointed under chapters 11.88 and 11.92
RCW, who is compensated under a contract with the office of public
guardianship.
(4) "Long-term care services" means services provided through the
department of social and health services either in a hospital or
skilled nursing facility, or in another setting under a home and
community-based waiver authorized under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) There is created an office of public
guardianship as an independent agency of the judicial branch.
(2) The supreme court shall appoint a public guardianship
administrator to establish and administer a public guardianship program
in the office of public guardianship. The public guardianship
administrator serves at the pleasure of the supreme court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The public guardianship administrator is
authorized to establish and administer a public guardianship program as
follows:
(1)(a) The office shall contract with public or private entities or
individuals to provide public guardianship services to persons age
eighteen or older whose income does not exceed two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level determined annually by the United States
department of health and human services or who are receiving long-term
care services through the Washington state department of social and
health services. Neither the public guardianship administrator nor the
office may act as public guardian or limited guardian or act in any
other representative capacity for any individual.
(b) The office is exempt from RCW 39.29.008 because the primary
function of the office is to contract for public guardianship services
that are provided in a manner consistent with the requirements of this
chapter. The office shall otherwise comply with chapter 39.29 RCW and
is subject to audit by the state auditor.
(c) Public guardianship service contracts are dependent upon
legislative appropriation. This chapter does not create an
entitlement.
(d) The initial implementation of public guardianship services
shall be on a pilot basis in a minimum of two geographical areas that
include one urban area and one rural area. There may be one or several
contracts in each area.
(2) The office shall, within one year of the commencement of its
operation, adopt eligibility criteria to enable it to serve individuals
with the greatest need when the number of cases in which courts propose
to appoint a public guardian exceeds the number of cases in which
public guardianship services can be provided. In adopting such
criteria, the office may consider factors including, but not limited
to, the following: Whether an incapacitated individual is at
significant risk of harm from abuse, exploitation, abandonment,
neglect, or self-neglect; and whether an incapacitated person is in
imminent danger of loss or significant reduction in public services
that are necessary for the individual to live successfully in the most
integrated and least restrictive environment that is appropriate in
light of the individual's needs and values.
(3) The office shall adopt minimum standards of practice for public
guardians providing public guardianship services. Any public guardian
providing such services must be certified by the certified professional
guardian board established by the supreme court.
(4) The office shall require a public guardian to visit each
incapacitated person for which public guardianship services are
provided no less than monthly to be eligible for compensation.
(5) The office shall not petition for appointment of a public
guardian for any individual. It may develop, and shall consult with
the advisory committee regarding the need to develop, a proposal for
the legislature to make affordable legal assistance available to
petition for guardianships.
(6) The office shall not authorize payment for services for any
entity that is serving more than twenty incapacitated persons per
certified professional guardian.
(7) The office shall track cost savings to the state and report the
amount every two years to the legislature and the governor. The office
shall monitor and oversee the use of state funding to ensure compliance
with this chapter.
(8) The office shall collect uniform and consistent basic data
elements regarding service delivery. This data shall be made available
to the legislature and supreme court in a format that is not
identifiable by individual incapacitated person to protect
confidentiality.
(9) The office shall report to the legislature on how services
other than guardianship services, and in particular services that might
reduce the need for guardianship services, might be provided under
contract with the office by December 1, 2009. The services to be
considered should include, but not be limited to, services provided
under powers of attorney given by the individuals in need of the
services.
(10) The office shall submit a biennial budget request.
(11) The office shall require public guardianship providers to seek
reimbursement of fees from program clients who are receiving long-term
care services through the department of social and health services to
the extent, and only to the extent, that such reimbursement may be
paid, consistent with an order of the superior court, from income that
would otherwise be required by the department to be paid toward the
cost of the client's care. Fees reimbursed shall be remitted by the
provider to the office unless a different disposition is directed by
the public guardianship administrator.
(12) The office shall require public guardianship providers to
certify annually that for each individual served they have reviewed the
need for continued public guardianship services and the appropriateness
of limiting, or further limiting, the authority of the public guardian
under the applicable guardianship order, and that where termination or
modification of a guardianship order appears warranted, the superior
court has been asked to take the corresponding action.
(13) The office shall adopt a process for receipt and consideration
of and response to complaints against the office and contracted
providers of public guardianship services. The process shall include
investigation in cases in which investigation appears warranted in the
judgment of the administrator. The office shall provide the advisory
committee with a summary and analysis of the results of these
complaints. When requested by the complaining party, his or her
identity shall not be disclosed to the advisory committee created under
section 5 of this act.
(14) The office shall contract with the Washington state institute
for public policy for a study. An initial report is due two years
following the effective date of this section and a second report by
December 1, 2011. The study shall analyze costs and off-setting
savings to the state from the delivery of public guardianship services.
(15) The office shall develop standardized forms and reporting
instruments that may include, but are not limited to, intake, initial
assessment, guardianship care plan, decisional accounting, staff time
logs, changes in condition or abilities of an incapacitated person, and
values history. The office shall collect and analyze the data gathered
from these reports and submit it to the advisory committee
periodically.
(16) The office shall identify training needs for guardians it
contracts with, and shall make recommendations, after consultation with
the advisory committee, to the supreme court, the certified
professional guardian board, and the legislature for improvements in
guardianship training. The office may offer training to individuals
providing services pursuant to this chapter.
(17) The office shall establish a system for monitoring the
performance of public guardians, and office staff shall make in-home
visits to a randomly selected sample of public guardianship clients.
The office may conduct further monitoring, including in-home visits, as
the administrator deems appropriate. For monitoring purposes, office
staff shall have access to any information relating to a public
guardianship client that is available to the guardian. The office
shall confer with the advisory committee in developing its monitoring
process.
(18) The office shall issue an annual report of its activities,
after review of and comment by the advisory committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) There is created a public guardianship
advisory committee consisting of the following members:
(a) Two persons appointed by the supreme court;
(b) Two persons appointed by the board for judicial administration;
(c) Two senators, one from each of the two largest caucuses,
appointed by the president of the senate; and two members of the house
of representatives, one from each of the two largest caucuses,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(d) One person appointed by the governor;
(e) One person appointed by the secretary of the department of
social and health services;
(f) Two persons appointed by the director of the Washington
protection and advocacy system;
(g) One person appointed by the chairperson of the governor's
committee on disability issues and employment;
(h) Two persons appointed by the chairperson of the developmental
disabilities council;
(i) One person appointed by the long-term care ombudsman;
(j) One person appointed by the Washington state bar association;
and
(k) One person appointed by the dean of the University of
Washington school of social work.
(2) During the term of his or her appointment, an appointee may not
be employed by a provider of public guardianship services.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, members
shall each serve a three-year term, subject to renewal for no more than
one additional three-year term.
(4) The first appointments to the advisory committee shall be for
terms of varying durations as follows: By the supreme court for two
and four years; by the board for judicial administration for three and
four years; by the president of the senate for two and three years; by
the speaker of the house of representatives for two and three years; by
the governor for four years; by the secretary of the department of
social and health services for two years; by the director of the
Washington protection and advocacy system for one and three years; by
the chairperson of the governor's committee on disability issues and
employment for four years; by the chairperson of the developmental
disabilities council for two and four years; by the long-term care
ombudsman for three years; by the Washington state bar association for
three years; and by the dean of the University of Washington school of
social work for four years.
(5) Members of the advisory committee receive no compensation for
their services as members of the advisory committee, but may be
reimbursed for travel and other expenses in accordance with rules
adopted by the office of financial management.
(6) The advisory committee: Shall review the activities of the
office; shall review the performance of the public guardianship
administrator; and may make recommendations to the supreme court, the
certified professional guardian board, and the legislature on issues
relating to the provision of public guardianship services.
(7) The meetings of the advisory committee shall be open to the
public, with agendas published in advance and minutes kept and made
available to the public. The public notice of all meetings shall
indicate that accommodations for disability will be available upon
request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The courts shall waive court costs and
filing fees in any proceeding in which an incapacitated person is
receiving public guardianship services funded under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The public guardianship administrator may
develop rules to implement this chapter. The administrator shall
request and consider recommendations from the advisory committee in the
development of rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 2 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---