BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.577 and 1981 c 185 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of transportation may adopt ((regulations)) rules
governing the use and control of park and ride lots and other parking
facilities operated by the department of transportation, including time
limits for the parking of vehicles. Rules adopted under this section
must allow single-occupant alternative fuel vehicles to park in spaces
designated for high-occupancy vehicles. As used in this section,
"alternative fuel vehicle" means passenger cars, light duty trucks, and
medium duty passenger vehicles that use as motor vehicle fuel natural
gas, propane, hydrogen, or electricity, or that are powered by both
electricity and gasoline, and have a United States environmental
protection agency highway gasoline mileage rating of at least forty
miles per gallon.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.94.531 and 2006 c 329 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) State agency worksites are subject to the same requirements
under this section and RCW 70.94.534 as private employers.
(2) Not more than ninety days after the adoption of a
jurisdiction's commute trip reduction plan, each major employer in that
jurisdiction shall perform a baseline measurement consistent with the
rules established by the department of transportation under RCW
70.94.537. Not more than ninety days after receiving the results of
the baseline measurement, each major employer shall develop a commute
trip reduction program and shall submit a description of that program
to the jurisdiction for review. The program shall be implemented not
more than ninety days after approval by the jurisdiction.
(3) A commute trip reduction program of a major employer shall
consist of, at a minimum (a) designation of a transportation
coordinator and the display of the name, location, and telephone number
of the coordinator in a prominent manner at each affected worksite; (b)
regular distribution of information to employees regarding alternatives
to single-occupant vehicle commuting; (c) a regular review of employee
commuting and reporting of progress toward meeting the single-occupant
vehicle reduction goals to the county, city, or town consistent with
the method established in the commute trip reduction plan and the rules
established by the department of transportation under RCW 70.94.537;
and (d) implementation of a set of measures designed to achieve the
applicable commute trip reduction goals adopted by the jurisdiction.
Such measures may include but are not limited to:
(i) Provision of preferential parking or reduced parking charges,
or both, for high-occupancy vehicles and, at the discretion of the
employer, for alternative fuel vehicles as defined in RCW 46.61.577;
(ii) Instituting or increasing parking charges for single-occupant
vehicles;
(iii) Provision of commuter ride matching services to facilitate
employee ridesharing for commute trips;
(iv) Provision of subsidies for transit fares;
(v) Provision of vans for van pools;
(vi) Provision of subsidies for car pooling or van pooling;
(vii) Permitting the use of the employer's vehicles for car pooling
or van pooling;
(viii) Permitting flexible work schedules to facilitate employees'
use of transit, car pools, or van pools;
(ix) Cooperation with transportation providers to provide
additional regular or express service to the worksite;
(x) Construction of special loading and unloading facilities for
transit, car pool, and van pool users;
(xi) Provision of bicycle parking facilities, lockers, changing
areas, and showers for employees who bicycle or walk to work;
(xii) Provision of a program of parking incentives such as a rebate
for employees who do not use the parking facility;
(xiii) Establishment of a program to permit employees to work part
or full time at home or at an alternative worksite closer to their
homes;
(xiv) Establishment of a program of alternative work schedules such
as compressed work week schedules which reduce commuting; and
(xv) Implementation of other measures designed to facilitate the
use of high-occupancy vehicles such as on-site day care facilities and
emergency taxi services.
(4) Employers or owners of worksites may form or utilize existing
transportation management associations or other transportation-related
associations authorized by RCW 35.87A.010 to assist members in
developing and implementing commute trip reduction programs.
(5) Employers shall make a good faith effort towards achievement of
the goals identified in RCW 70.94.527(4)(d).

--- END ---