BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs shall conduct a study using radio frequency
identification or other similar technology to electronically monitor
sex offenders.
(2) The study shall include:
(a) An evaluation of the current state of radio frequency
identification technology, including the capabilities and limitations
of subcutaneous radio frequency identification tags;
(b) An identification of the ways in which current subcutaneous
radio frequency identification technology can be used to electronically
monitor sex offenders, including an evaluation of costs and benefits of
using the technology compared to the costs and benefits of methods
currently being used to monitor sex offenders;
(c) An evaluation of developing subcutaneous radio frequency
identification technologies, such as linking subcutaneous radio
frequency identification tags with global positioning systems, and an
estimate of the time frame in which the developing technologies will be
available; and
(d) An identification of the ways in which developing radio
frequency identification technologies could be used in the future to
electronically monitor sex offenders, including an evaluation of costs
and benefits of using the technology compared to the costs and benefits
of methods currently being used to monitor sex offenders.
(3) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
report its findings to the legislature by December 31, 2007.

--- END ---