BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any city coterminous with, and comprised only of, an island
that relies solely on groundwater aquifers for its potable water source
and does not have reasonable access to a potable water source outside
its jurisdiction may designate one or more aquifer conservation zones.
Aquifer conservation zones may only be designated for the purpose
of conserving and protecting potable water sources.
(2) Aquifer conservation zones may not be considered critical areas
under this chapter except to the extent that specific areas located
within aquifer conservation zones qualify for critical area designation
and have been designated as such under RCW 36.70A.060(2).
(3) Any city may consider whether an area is within an aquifer
conservation zone when determining the residential density of that
particular area. The residential densities within conservation zones,
in combination with other densities of the city, must be sufficient to
accommodate projected population growth under RCW 36.70A.110.
(4) Nothing in this section may be construed to modify the
population accommodation obligations required of jurisdictions under
this chapter.

--- END ---