BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
imposed on the business of making retail or wholesale sales the amount
of any proceeds from a retail or wholesale sale that have been lost due
to theft. The deduction is allowed only if the theft was by a person
other than the seller, an immediate family or household member of the
seller, an employee of the seller, or a person having a business or
contractual relationship with the seller at the time of the theft. The
maximum deduction allowable is five thousand dollars per theft.
(2) A deduction is allowed under this section only to the extent
the loss is not covered by insurance or otherwise recovered. Proceeds
subsequently recovered in whole or in part must be reported as gross
proceeds of sales for the return filed for the period in which the
recovery is made, but only if the seller incurred a tax liability under
this chapter on the return for the period in which the theft occurred
or would have incurred a tax liability under this chapter for the
period in which the theft occurred absent the deduction under this
section.
(3) A seller must report the theft to the appropriate law
enforcement agency and obtain a copy of such report, which shall be
retained as supporting documentation for the deduction. The department
may require additional information or documentation from the seller as
it determines necessary in order to verify the seller's right to a
deduction under this section.
(4) The deduction claimed under this section shall not exceed the
amount of proceeds of retail or wholesale sales that are lost due to
theft. If a seller cannot determine whether a loss due to theft
represents proceeds of retail or wholesale sales, or proceeds from
business activities taxable under this chapter other than as a retail
or wholesale sale, the seller may use the method of apportioning the
loss in (a) of this subsection or other method of determining the
deduction under this section as approved by the department before
taking the deduction.
(a) If the amount of loss due to theft is known, or an estimate has
been approved in advance by the department under (b) of this
subsection, but the proper amount of the deduction under this section
cannot be determined, the seller may apportion the loss to retail or
wholesale sales as provided in this subsection (4)(a). The department
may adjust the amount of loss apportioned under this subsection (4)(a)
based on amended returns filed by the seller or based on the results of
an audit of the seller by the department.
(i) The seller may determine the amount of the loss to apportion to
retail sales by multiplying the loss by a fraction. The numerator of
the fraction is the taxable amount reported under all retailing
business and occupation tax classifications on the seller's excise tax
returns for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year
in which the theft occurred. The denominator of the fraction is the
total taxable amount reported under all business and occupation tax
classifications on the seller's excise tax returns for the calendar
year immediately preceding the calendar year in which the theft
occurred, less any amount for which a credit is allowed under RCW
82.04.440. For purposes of the numerator and denominator, if the
seller was not engaged in business in the calendar year immediately
preceding the theft, or if the seller is required to file returns more
frequently than annually, the seller may use the taxable amounts on its
returns covering the most recent twelve-month period ending with the
reporting period immediately preceding the reporting period in which
the theft occurred. If twelve months of return data is not available,
the seller shall use as many months of return data as is available.
(ii) The seller may determine the amount of the loss to apportion
to wholesale sales by multiplying the loss by a fraction. The
numerator of the fraction is the taxable amount reported under all
wholesaling business and occupation tax classifications on the seller's
excise tax returns for the calendar year immediately preceding the
calendar year in which the theft occurred. The denominator of the
fraction is the total taxable amount reported under all business and
occupation tax classifications on the seller's excise tax returns for
the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year in which the
theft occurred, less any amount for which a credit is allowed under RCW
82.04.440. For purposes of the numerator and denominator, if the
seller was not engaged in business in the calendar year immediately
preceding the theft, or if the seller is required to file returns more
frequently than annually, the seller may use the taxable amounts on its
returns covering the most recent twelve-month period ending with the
reporting period immediately preceding the reporting period in which
the theft occurred. If twelve months of return data is not available,
the seller shall use as many months of return data as is available.
(b) If the exact amount of proceeds lost due to theft cannot be
precisely determined, the seller may estimate the amount of the loss.
The estimated amount used for the purpose of this deduction must equal
the amount indicated in the report made to law enforcement, and must be
approved in advance by the department. The department may require
additional information or documentation as it determines is necessary.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Proceeds" means the gross proceeds of sales.
(b) "Taxable amount" means the gross amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's excise
tax returns, less any allowable deductions other than the deduction
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A seller is entitled to a deduction from the measure of tax for
the amount of any proceeds from a retail sale subject to tax under RCW
82.08.020 that have been lost due to theft. The deduction is allowed
only if the theft was by a person other than the seller, an immediate
family or household member of the seller, an employee of the seller, or
a person having a business or contractual relationship with the seller
at the time of the theft. The maximum deduction allowable is five
thousand dollars per theft.
(2) A deduction is allowed under this section only to the extent
that the loss is not covered by insurance or otherwise recovered.
Proceeds subsequently recovered in whole or in part and the tax thereon
must be paid and reported on the return filed in the period in which
the recovery is made.
(3) A seller must report the theft to the appropriate law
enforcement agency and obtain a copy of such report, which shall be
retained as supporting documentation for the deduction. The department
may require additional information or documentation from the seller as
it determines is necessary in order to verify the seller's right to a
deduction under this section.
(4)(a) The deduction claimed under this section shall not exceed
the amount of proceeds of retail sales subject to the tax under RCW
82.08.020 that are lost due to theft. If a seller cannot determine
whether a loss due to theft represents proceeds of a retail sale
subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020, or proceeds from business
activities not taxable as a retail sale, the seller may use the method
of apportioning the loss in (b) of this subsection or other method of
determining the deduction under this section as approved by the
department before taking the deduction. The department may adjust the
amount of loss apportioned under (b) of this subsection based on
amended returns filed by the seller or based on the results of an audit
of the seller by the department.
(b)(i) If the amount of loss due to theft is known, or an estimate
has been approved in advance by the department under (b)(ii) of this
subsection, but the proper amount of the deduction under this section
cannot be determined, the seller may apportion the loss to retail sales
subject to tax under RCW 82.08.020 as provided in section 1(4)(a)(i) of
this act.
(ii) If the proceeds lost due to theft represent retail sales and
the local sales taxes imposed on such sales are sourced to more than
one local taxing authority, the seller shall estimate the amount of the
loss. The estimated amount used for the purpose of this deduction must
equal the amount indicated in the report made to law enforcement, and
must be approved in advance by the department. The department may
require additional information or documentation as it determines is
necessary.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "proceeds" has the same
meaning as "selling price" in RCW 82.08.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A retailer required by RCW 82.12.040 to collect the tax imposed
by this chapter is entitled to a credit for use tax proceeds from a
transaction for which the tax imposed by this chapter was collected and
that have been lost due to theft. The credit is allowed only if the
theft was by a person other than the retailer, an immediate family or
household member of the retailer, an employee of the retailer, or a
person having a business or contractual relationship with the retailer
at the time of the theft. The maximum credit allowable is four hundred
fifty dollars per theft.
(2) A credit may be claimed under this section only to the extent
that the loss is not covered by insurance or otherwise recovered.
Proceeds subsequently recovered in whole or in part must be paid and
reported on the return filed in the period in which the recovery is
made.
(3) A retailer must report the theft to the appropriate law
enforcement agency and obtain a copy of such report, which shall be
retained as supporting documentation for the credit. The department
may require additional information or documentation from the retailer
as it determines is necessary in order to verify the retailer's right
to a credit under this section.
(4) The credit claimed under this section shall not exceed the
amount of proceeds that are lost due to theft. If a retailer cannot
determine whether a loss due to theft represents proceeds of
transactions for which the tax imposed by this chapter was collected as
required by RCW 82.12.040, or proceeds from other business activities,
the seller may use the method of apportioning the loss in (a) of this
subsection or other method of determining the credit under this section
as approved by the department before claiming the credit. The
department may adjust the amount of loss apportioned under (a) of this
subsection based on amended returns filed by the seller or based on the
results of an audit of the seller by the department.
(a)(i) If the amount of loss due to theft is known, or an estimate
has been approved in advance by the department under (b) of this
subsection, but the proper amount of the credit under this section
cannot be determined, the retailer may apportion the loss to the use
tax collected as provided in this subsection (4)(a).
(ii) The retailer may determine the amount of the loss to apportion
to the use tax collected by multiplying the loss by a fraction. The
numerator of the fraction is the total amount of state and local use
tax collected by the retailer in the calendar year immediately
preceding the calendar year in which the theft occurred. The
denominator of the fraction is the total tax liability of the retailer
reported on the retailer's excise tax returns for the calendar year
immediately preceding the calendar year in which the theft occurred.
For purposes of the numerator and denominator, if the retailer was not
engaged in business in the calendar year immediately preceding the
theft, or if the retailer is required to file returns more frequently
than annually, the retailer may use data reported on its returns
covering the most recent twelve-month period ending with the reporting
period immediately preceding the reporting period in which the theft
occurred. If twelve months of return data is not available, the
retailer shall use as many months of return data as is available.
(b) If the exact amount of proceeds lost due to theft cannot be
precisely determined, the retailer may estimate the amount of the loss.
The estimated amount used for the purpose of this credit must equal the
amount indicated in the report made to law enforcement, and must be
approved in advance by the department. The department may require
additional information or documentation as it determines is necessary.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "proceeds" means taxes
imposed under this chapter and collected as required by RCW 82.12.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---