BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.146 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The water quality capital account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the water quality capital account may be spent
only after appropriation.
(2) Expenditures from the water quality capital account may only be
used: (a) To make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants
to public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal,
local, or other moneys are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for
the capital component of water pollution control facilities and
activities; (b) for purposes of assisting a public body to obtain an
ownership interest in water pollution control facilities; or (c) to
defray any part of the capital component of the payments made by a
public body to a service provider under a service agreement entered
into under RCW 70.150.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---