BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.16.040 and 1989 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The following actions shall be commenced within six years:
(1) An action upon a contract in writing, or liability express or
implied arising out of a written agreement.
(2) An action upon an account receivable ((incurred in the ordinary
course of business)). For purposes of this section, an account
receivable is any obligation for payment incurred in the ordinary
course of the claimant's business or profession, whether arising from
one or more transactions and whether or not earned by performance.
(3) An action for the rents and profits or for the use and
occupation of real estate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to all causes of action on
accounts receivable, whether commenced before or after the effective
date of this section.

--- END ---