BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.36.080 and 1996 c 54 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may pay no more than ((thirty)) one hundred
fifty thousand dollars per fiscal year from the general fund and one
hundred fifty thousand dollars from the state wildlife account created
in RCW 77.12.170 for claims under RCW 77.36.040 and for assessment
costs and compromise of claims ((unless)). The department may exceed
the limit on general fund expenditures, consistent with this section,
if the legislature declares an emergency. ((Such)) Money allocated
under this section shall be used to pay animal damage claims only if
the claim meets the conditions of RCW 77.36.040 ((and the damage
occurred in a place where the opportunity to hunt was restricted or
prohibited by a county, municipality, or other public entity during the
season prior to the occurrence of the damage)).
(2) The legislature may declare an emergency, defined for the
purposes of this section as any happening arising from weather, other
natural conditions, or fire that causes unusually great damage to
commercially raised agricultural or horticultural crops by deer or elk.
In an emergency, the department may pay as much as may be subsequently
appropriated, in addition to the funds authorized under subsection (1)
of this section, for claims under RCW 77.36.040 and for assessment and
compromise of claims. Such money shall be used to pay animal damage
claims only if the claim meets the conditions of RCW 77.36.040 and the
department has expended all funds authorized under ((RCW 77.36.070 or))
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 77.36.070 (Limit on total claims from
*wildlife fund per fiscal year) and 1996 c 54 s 8 are each repealed.

--- END ---