BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.63.160 and 2004 c 256 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A "designated manufactured home" is a manufactured home
constructed after June 15, 1976, in accordance with state and federal
requirements for manufactured homes, which:
(a) Is comprised of at least two fully enclosed parallel sections
each of not less than twelve feet wide by thirty-six feet long;
(b) Was originally constructed with and now has a composition or
wood shake or shingle, coated metal, or similar roof of nominal 3:12
pitch; and
(c) Has exterior siding similar in appearance to siding materials
commonly used on conventional site-built uniform building code single-family residences.
(2) "New manufactured home" means any manufactured home required to
be titled under Title 46 RCW, which has not been previously titled to
a retail purchaser, and is not a "used mobile home" as defined in RCW
82.45.032(2).
(3) Nothing in this section precludes cities from allowing any
manufactured home from being sited on individual lots through local
standards which differ from the designated manufactured home or new
manufactured home as described in this section, except that the term
"designated manufactured home" and "new manufactured home" shall not be
used except as defined in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) This section does not apply to a manufactured home park or
manufactured housing community as defined in RCW 59.20.030.

--- END ---