BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The director of the department of
agriculture shall convene a livestock identification advisory
committee.
(2)(a) In organizing and making appointments to the livestock
identification advisory committee, the director shall consult with the
broad range of stakeholders who may be impacted by implementation of a
mandatory or voluntary national or state animal identification system,
or components thereof.
(b) The director shall appoint to the advisory committee one or
more members from each of the following livestock-related stakeholder
groups: (i) The commercial livestock industry, including cattle
feeders and producers of beef and dairy cattle, horses, sheep, poultry,
and swine; (ii) noncommercial livestock owners, including those who
raise animals as a hobby or as a source of supplemental income, barter,
food for the family, or recreation; (iii) educational and recreational
organizations such as horse-riding associations, community fairs, and
youth groups; (iv) concerned citizens who have a stake in the issue;
and (v) additional members as the director deems necessary. The
director shall invite one member from an Indian tribe to join the
advisory committee.
(c) The advisory committee shall be convened by the director of the
department of agriculture by July 1, 2007, chaired by the director or
the director's designee, and staffed by the department.
(3) In conjunction with the department, the advisory committee
shall:
(a) Review the recommendations made by the cattle identification
advisory committee for implementation of a voluntary national animal
identification system in Washington state; and
(b) Assess the impacts of such a system, whether federal or state
only, on the commercial livestock industry, noncommercial livestock
owners, livestock-related educational and recreational organizations,
concerned citizens, and Indian tribes, in terms of costs, domestic
commerce, international marketing and sales, animal health, privacy
rights, and other potential impacts identified by the committee.
(4) The livestock identification advisory committee shall make
recommendations to the department on whether and how to implement a
voluntary animal identification system in Washington state.
(5) The department of agriculture, in conjunction with the
livestock identification advisory committee, shall submit a written
report of its findings and recommendations to appropriate committees of
the legislature by January 1, 2008.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2008.

--- END ---