BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it is
unlawful for an employer to require an employee or prospective employee
to disclose verbally or in writing whether he or she consumed lawful
tobacco products at any time before or during employment with the
employer or to require an employee or prospective employee to agree
verbally or in writing not to consume lawful tobacco products off the
premises of the employer during nonworking hours.
(2) An employer may require an applicant or prospective employee to
disclose consumption of or agree not to consume lawful tobacco
products, or both:
(a) Under the terms of an employer's legitimate conflict of
interest policy reasonably designed to protect the employer's trade
secrets, proprietary information, or other proprietary interests;
(b) To meet a bona fide occupational qualification or requirement,
including qualifications or requirements implemented by the employer to
screen for respiratory diseases in occupations where the individual
will be exposed to smoke and noxious fumes;
(c) Under the terms of the employer's drug and alcohol free
workplace program, including those adopted in response to federal
requirements;
(d) Under the terms of an employer's insurance policy or wellness
program, as otherwise permitted by law; or
(e) If the employer is a religious or health organization whose
tenets prohibit the use of an otherwise lawful tobacco product or a
company or nonprofit organization whose primary business purpose is the
prevention of cancer or heart and lung disease.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be applied to any matter that is
also subject to collective bargaining between the employer and the
affected employee.
(4) Nothing in this section precludes an employer from adopting
policies prohibiting the consumption of lawful tobacco products on the
employer's premises or during working hours, or both.
(5) For purposes of this section, "employer" means any person,
firm, corporation, or the state of Washington, its political
subdivisions, or municipal corporations.
(6) Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(7) In a civil action alleging a violation of this section, the
court may:
(a) Award a penalty in the amount of five hundred dollars to a
prevailing employee or prospective employee in addition to any award of
actual damages;
(b) Award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the prevailing
employee or prospective employee; and
(c) Pursuant to RCW 4.84.185, award any prevailing party against
whom an action has been brought for a violation of this section
reasonable expenses and attorneys' fees upon final judgment and written
findings by the trial judge that the action was frivolous and advanced
without reasonable cause.

--- END ---