BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.110.005 and 2006 c 171 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington's dependence on energy supplied from outside the
state and volatile global energy markets makes its economy and citizens
vulnerable to unpredictable and high energy prices;
(2) Washington's dependence on petroleum-based fuels increases
energy costs for citizens and businesses;
(3) Diesel soot from diesel engines ranks as the highest toxic air
pollutant in Washington, leading to hundreds of premature deaths and
increasing rates of asthma and other lung diseases;
(4) The use of biodiesel results in significantly less air
pollution than traditional diesel fuels;
(5) Improper disposal and treatment of organic waste from farms and
livestock operations can have a significant negative impact on water
quality;
(6) Landfill methane gas and wastewater treatment gas, if vented
into the atmosphere, poses a great risk to Washington's climate.
(7) Washington has abundant supplies of landfill methane gas,
wastewater treatment gas, and organic wastes from farms ((that)), which
can be used for energy production and abundant farmland where crops
could be grown to supplement or supplant petroleum-based fuels;
(((7))) (8) The use of energy and fuel derived from these sources
can help citizens and businesses conserve energy and reduce the use of
petroleum-based fuels, would improve air and water quality in
Washington, reduce environmental risks from farm landfills, wastewater
treatment plants, and wastes, create new markets for farm products, and
provide new industries and jobs for Washington citizens;
(((8))) (9) The bioenergy industry is a new and developing industry
that is, in part, limited by the availability of capital for the
construction of facilities for converting farm and forest products and
waste gases into energy and fuels;
(((9))) (10) Instead of leaving our economy at the mercy of global
events, and the policies of foreign nations, Washington state should
adopt a policy of energy independence; and
(((10))) (11) The energy freedom program is meant to lead
Washington state towards energy independence.
Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in the public interest
to encourage the rapid adoption and use of bioenergy, to develop a
viable bioenergy industry within Washington state, to promote public
research and development in bioenergy sources and markets, ((and)) to
support a viable agriculture industry to grow bioenergy crops. To
accomplish this, the energy freedom program is established to promote
public research and development in bioenergy, ((and)) to stimulate the
construction of facilities in Washington to generate energy from farm
sources or convert organic matter, landfill methane gas, or wastewater
treatment gas into fuels.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.110.010 and 2006 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means any political subdivision of the state,
including port districts, counties, cities, towns, special purpose
districts, and other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal
corporations. "Applicant" may also include federally recognized tribes
and state institutions of higher education with appropriate research
capabilities.
(2) "Assistance" includes loans, leases, product purchases, or
other forms of financial or technical assistance.
(3) "Department" means the department of ((agriculture)) community,
trade, and economic development.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of
((agriculture)) community, trade, and economic development.
(5) "Peer review committee" means a board, appointed by the
director, that includes bioenergy specialists, energy conservation
specialists, scientists, and individuals with specific recognized
expertise.
(6) "Project" means the construction of facilities, including the
purchase of equipment, to convert landfill methane gas, wastewater
treatment gas, or farm products or wastes into electricity or gaseous
or liquid fuels or other coproducts associated with such conversion.
These specifically include fixed or mobile facilities to generate
electricity or methane from the anaerobic digestion of organic matter,
and fixed or mobile facilities for extracting oils from canola, rape,
mustard, and other oilseeds. "Project" may also include the
construction of facilities associated with such conversion for the
distribution and storage of such feedstocks and fuels.
(7) "Refueling project" means the construction of new alternative
fuel refueling facilities, as well as upgrades and expansion of
existing refueling facilities, that will enable these facilities to
offer alternative fuels to the motoring public.
(8) "Research and development project" means research and
development, by an institution of higher education as defined in
subsection (1) of this section, relating to:
(a) Bioenergy sources including but not limited to biomass and
associated gases, landfill methane gas, and wastewater treatment gas;
or
(b) The development of markets for bioenergy coproducts.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.110.020 and 2006 c 171 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The energy freedom program is established within the
department. The director may establish policies and procedures
necessary for processing, reviewing, and approving applications made
under this chapter.
(2) When reviewing applications submitted under this program, the
director shall consult with those agencies having expertise and
knowledge to assess the technical and business feasibility of the
project and probability of success. These agencies may include, but
are not limited to, Washington State University, the University of
Washington, the department of ecology, ((the department of community,
trade, and economic development,)) and the Washington state
conservation commission.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
director((, in cooperation with the department of community, trade, and
economic development,)) may approve an application only if the director
finds:
(a) The project will convert landfill methane gas, wastewater
treatment gas, or farm products or wastes directly into electricity or
into gaseous or liquid fuels or other coproducts associated with such
conversion;
(b) The project demonstrates technical feasibility and directly
assists in moving a commercially viable project into the marketplace
for use by Washington state citizens;
(c) The facility will produce long-term economic benefits to the
state, a region of the state, or a particular community in the state;
(d) The project does not require continuing state support;
(e) The assistance will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state;
(f) The state is provided an option under the assistance agreement
to purchase a portion of the fuel or feedstock to be produced by the
project, exercisable by the department of general administration;
(g) The project will increase energy independence or diversity for
the state;
(h) The project will use landfill methane gas, wastewater treatment
gas, or feedstocks produced in the state, if feasible, except this
criterion does not apply to the construction of facilities used to
distribute and store fuels that are produced from landfill methane gas,
wastewater treatment gas, or farm products or wastes;
(i) Any product produced by the project will be suitable for its
intended use, will meet accepted national or state standards, and will
be stored and distributed in a safe and environmentally sound manner;
(j) The application provides for adequate reporting or disclosure
of financial and employment data to the director, and permits the
director to require an annual or other periodic audit of the project
books; and
(k) For research and development projects, the application has been
independently reviewed by a peer review committee as defined in RCW
15.110.010 (as recodified by this act) and the findings delivered to
the director.
(4) The director may approve an application for assistance up to
five million dollars. In no circumstances shall this assistance
constitute more than fifty percent of the total project cost.
(5) The director shall enter into agreements with approved
applicants to fix the terms and rates of the assistance to minimize the
costs to the applicants, and to encourage establishment of a viable
bioenergy industry. The agreement shall include provisions to protect
the state's investment, including a requirement that a successful
applicant enter into contracts with any partners that may be involved
in the use of any assistance provided under this program, including
services, facilities, infrastructure, or equipment. Contracts with any
partners shall become part of the application record.
(6) The director may defer any payments for up to twenty-four
months or until the project starts to receive revenue from operations,
whichever is sooner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following sections are recodified as a
new chapter in Title 43 RCW:
RCW 15.110.005
RCW 15.110.010
RCW 15.110.020
RCW 15.110.030
RCW 15.110.040
RCW 15.110.050
RCW 15.110.060
RCW 15.110.900
RCW 15.110.901

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire June
30, 2016.

--- END ---