BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, every
student transportation program, whether operated by a school district
or a commercial chartered bus service, is exempt from the provisions of
this chapter requiring the payment of special fuel taxes on the
biodiesel fuel portion of a biodiesel blend, on natural gas, and on
liquefied petroleum gas.
(b) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biodiesel fuel" means a mono alkyl ester of long chain fatty
acids derived from vegetable oils or animal fats for use in
compression-ignition engines and that meets the requirements of the
American society of testing and materials specification D 6751 in
effect as of January 1, 2003.
(ii) "Biodiesel blend" means fuel that contains at least twenty
percent biodiesel fuel by volume.
(2)(a) With the exception of the payment of special fuel taxes on
the biodiesel fuel portion of a biodiesel blend, on natural gas, or on
liquefied petroleum gas, as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
the use of fuel for a student transportation program, whether operated
by a school district or a commercial chartered bus service, is exempted
from the tax imposed by this chapter, to the extent provided in (a)(i)
through (x) of this subsection, as follows:
(i) In fiscal year 2006, the use is exempt from ten percent of the
tax rate provided in RCW 82.38.030(4);
(ii) In fiscal year 2007, the use is exempt from twenty percent of
the tax rate provided in RCW 82.38.030(4);
(iii) In fiscal year 2008, the use is exempt from thirty percent of
the tax rate provided in RCW 82.38.030(4);
(iv) In fiscal year 2009, the use is exempt from forty percent of
the tax rate provided in RCW 82.38.030(4);
(v) In fiscal year 2010, the use is exempt from fifty percent of
the tax rate provided in RCW 82.38.030(4);
(vi) In fiscal year 2011, the use is exempt from sixty percent of
the tax rate provided in RCW 82.38.030(4);
(vii) In fiscal year 2012, the use is exempt from seventy percent
of the tax rate provided in RCW 82.38.030(4);
(viii) In fiscal year 2013, the use is exempt from eighty percent
of the tax rate provided in RCW 82.38.030(4);
(ix) In fiscal year 2014, the use is exempt from ninety percent of
the tax rate provided in RCW 82.38.030(4); and
(x) In fiscal year 2015, the use is exempt from one hundred percent
of the tax rate provided in RCW 82.38.030(4).
(b) Beginning July 1, 2007, all uses provided for in subsection (1)
of this section are exempt from one hundred percent of the tax rate
provided in RCW 82.38.030(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of new
alternative fuel vehicles to be used primarily in a student
transportation program, whether operated by a school district or a
commercial chartered bus service.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
tangible personal property, or for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
property, including repair and replacement parts, if:
(a) The property is used to convert vehicles for the purpose of
operating on alternative fuels;
(b) The conversion is performed on a vehicle or engine for which a
United States environmental protection agency certificate of conformity
or a certification from the California air resources board has been
issued for the model year and exhaust and evaporative emissions test
groups of the vehicle or engine; and
(c) The vehicles are used primarily in a student transportation
program, whether operated by a school district or a commercial
chartered bus service.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Alternative fuel" means natural gas (compressed or liquid) or
liquefied petroleum gas (commonly called propane).
(b) "New alternative fuel vehicle" means a new motor vehicle, as
defined in RCW 46.96.020, originally designed and equipped by the
manufacturer to operate exclusively on an alternative fuel.
(c) "Primarily" means at least fifty percent of total use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of new alternative fuel vehicles to be used primarily in a student
transportation program, whether operated by a school district or a
commercial chartered bus service.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of tangible personal property, or of labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
property, if:
(a) The property is used to convert vehicles for the purpose of
operating on alternative fuels;
(b) The conversion is performed on a vehicle or engine for which a
United States environmental protection agency certificate of conformity
or a certification from the California air resources board has been
issued for the model year and exhaust and evaporative emissions test
groups of the vehicle or engine; and
(c) The vehicles are used primarily in a student transportation
program, whether operated by a school district or a commercial
chartered bus service.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 2
of this act apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
emissions control equipment, or for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
equipment, including repair and replacement parts, if the equipment is
used to retrofit diesel vehicles that are used primarily in a student
transportation program, whether operated by a school district or a
commercial chartered bus service.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Emissions control equipment" means a device with an oxidation
catalyst, particulate filter, crankcase ventilation filter, or other
means of reducing emissions from diesel vehicles, and that has been
verified under the federal environmental protection agency's voluntary
diesel retrofit program.
(b) "Primarily" has the same meaning as provided in section 2 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of emissions control equipment, or of labor and services rendered
in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
the equipment, if the equipment is used to retrofit vehicles that are
used primarily in a student transportation program, whether operated by
a school district or a commercial chartered bus service.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 4
of this act apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Sections 2 through 5 of this act expire
the earlier of July 1, 2015, or July 1st of the year following the year
in which the department of licensing estimates that the aggregate
volume of alternative fuels sold at retail for vehicular purposes
represents twenty percent of the aggregate volume of all fuels sold at
retail for vehicular purposes.
(2) In order to calculate the percentage of alternative fuel sales
in subsection (1) of this section, the department of licensing may use
as a proxy the estimated portion of the tax base of the special fuels
tax under chapter 82.38 RCW relating to fuels other than diesel fuel.
If exact volumes are unknown, the department may use reasonable methods
to derive estimates of volumes. To make the calculation, the
department shall convert fuel volumes to gasoline-equivalent gallons,
using the method utilized by the United States department of energy in
reporting such comparisons as of January 1, 2007.
(3) The department of licensing is authorized to adopt rules
necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---