BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.350.005 and 2005 c 424 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature declares that promoting the health of state
residents is a fundamental purpose of state government. The
legislature declares it to be a clear public purpose and governmental
function to promote life sciences research to foster a preventive and
predictive vision of the next generation of health-related innovations,
to enhance the competitive position of Washington state in this vital
sector of the economy, and to improve the quality and delivery of
health care for the people of Washington. The legislature finds that
public support for and promotion of life sciences research will benefit
the state and its residents through improved health status and health
outcomes, economic development, and contributions to scientific
knowledge, and such research will lead to breakthroughs and
improvements that might not otherwise be discovered due to lack of
existing market incentives, especially in the area of regenerative
medicine. The legislature finds that in order to develop a vibrant
life sciences research environment in Washington and to achieve the
greatest benefits from investments in life sciences research, there
must be a balanced investment in a broad range of research fields,
including human adult stem cells, human embryonic germ cells, and human
embryonic stem cells. The legislature finds that public support for
and promotion of life sciences research has the potential to provide
cures or new treatments for many debilitating diseases that cost the
state millions of dollars each year. It is appropriate and consistent
with the intent of the master settlement agreement between the state
and tobacco product manufacturers to invest a portion of the revenues
derived therefrom by the state in life sciences research, to leverage
the revenues with other funds, and to encourage cooperation and
innovation among public and private institutions involved in life
sciences research. The purpose of this chapter is to establish a life
sciences discovery fund authority, to grant that authority the power to
contract with the state to receive revenues under the master settlement
agreement, and to contract with other entities to receive other funds,
and to disburse those funds consistent with the purpose of this
chapter. The life sciences discovery fund is intended to promote the
best available research in life sciences disciplines through diverse
Washington institutions and to build upon existing strengths in the
area of biosciences and biomanufacturing in order to spread the
economic benefits across the state. The life sciences discovery fund
is also intended to foster improved health care outcomes and improved
agricultural production research across this state and the world. The
research investments of the life sciences discovery fund are intended
to further the goals of the "Bio 21" report and to support future
statewide, comprehensive strategies to lead the nation in life
sciences-related research and employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.350 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The human stem cell research advisory committee is created as
a standing committee of the authority. The human stem cell research
advisory committee consists of nine members appointed by the governor.
The governor shall consider those candidates as may be recommended for
appointment by the University of Washington and the biomedical
community. The human stem cell research advisory committee consists of
the following members:
(a) Five scientists with experience in biomedical research in the
field of cell differentiation, nuclear reprogramming, tissue formation
and regeneration, stem cell biology, developmental biology,
regenerative medicine, or related fields;
(b) Two medical ethicists;
(c) One person with a background in legal issues related to human
embryonic stem cell research, in vitro fertilization, or family law, as
it applies to the donation of blastocysts and oocytes; and
(d) One member of the public.
(2) The human stem cell research advisory committee shall develop
scientific, ethical, and legal guidelines for research involving the
derivation or use of human adult stem cells, human embryonic germ
cells, and human embryonic stem cells in Washington. The guidelines
must be submitted to the authority by July 1, 2008. The guidelines
must include recommendations for the authority to use when selecting
projects involving the derivation of human embryonic stem cells, by any
method, including somatic cell nuclear transfer. The recommendations
must inform the authority of specific scientific, ethical, and legal
considerations to examine in its selection of research projects
involving human stem cells. The authority shall use the scientific
recommendations in the guidelines to assist the authority in
determining which human stem cell research projects meet the goals of
the funding criteria established in RCW 43.350.030. After adoption of
the initial guidelines, the human stem cell research advisory committee
may revise the guidelines, issue advisory opinions, or provide other
technical assistance, at the request of the authority, to account for
new developments in research and medicine. The authority may request
that the human stem cell research advisory committee review specific
research proposals that include the use of human stem cells. Such a
review by the human stem cell research advisory committee must be
submitted to the authority, which shall make all final determinations
on project approval and funding.

--- END ---