BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the current
student transportation funding formula is outdated and does not
adequately address the costs incurred by school districts in
transporting students. The legislature further finds that any new
formula should be based on reliable data from a uniform system of
accounting used by all districts, provide incentives for efficient use
of state resources, and maintain local school district control over
operational decisions within the transportation program. Therefore, it
is the legislature's intent to respond to the findings of the 2006
pupil transportation funding study by the joint legislative audit and
review committee by improving the system of accounting for
transportation costs, providing additional payments to districts to
mitigate funding discrepancies identified by the study, and directing
that a new funding formula be developed in a thoughtful and
deliberative manner and implemented no later than the 2009-10 school
year.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.160.160 and 1996 c 279 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.190, except where
the context shall clearly indicate otherwise, the following definitions
apply:
(1) "Eligible student" means any student served by the
transportation program of a school district or compensated for
individual transportation arrangements authorized by RCW 28A.160.030
whose route stop is more than one radius mile from the student's
school, except if the student to be transported is disabled under RCW
28A.155.020 and is either not ambulatory or not capable of protecting
his or her own welfare while traveling to or from the school or agency
where special education services are provided, in which case no mileage
distance restriction applies.
(2) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of public
instruction.
(3) "To and from school" means the transportation of students for
the following purposes:
(a) Transportation to and from route stops and schools;
(b) Transportation to and from schools pursuant to an interdistrict
agreement pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160;
(c) Transportation of students between schools and learning centers
for instruction ((specifically required by statute)) provided under RCW
28A.150.200 (basic education act), chapter 28A.155 RCW (special
education), RCW 28A.165.015 through 28A.165.075 (learning assistance
program), or RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080 (transitional
bilingual instruction program); and
(d) Transportation of students with disabilities to and from
schools and agencies for special education services.
Academic extended day transportation for programs provided under
RCW 28A.150.200 (basic education act), chapter 28A.155 RCW (special
education), RCW 28A.165.015 through 28A.165.075 (learning assistance
program), or RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080 (transitional
bilingual instruction program) shall ((not)) be considered part of
transportation of students "to and from school" for the purposes of
((chapter 61, Laws of 1983 1st ex. sess)) this section. Transportation
for field trips shall not be considered part of transportation of
students "to and from school" under this section.
(4) "Transportation services" for students living within one radius
mile from school means school transportation services including the use
of buses, funding of crossing guards, and matching funds for local and
state transportation projects intended to mitigate hazardous walking
conditions. Priority for transportation services shall be given to
students in grades kindergarten through five.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.160.170 and 1990 c 33 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each district shall submit to the superintendent of public
instruction during October of each year a report containing the
following:
(((1)))(a)(i) The number of eligible students transported to and
from school as provided for in RCW 28A.160.150 for the current school
year and the number of miles estimated to be driven for pupil
transportation services, along with a map describing student route stop
locations and school locations, and (((b))) (ii) the number of miles
driven for pupil transportation services as authorized in RCW
28A.160.150 the previous school year; and
(((2))) (b) Other operational data and descriptions as required by
the superintendent to determine allocation requirements for each
district.
(2) When reporting expenditures for student transportation, each
district shall separate the costs of providing transportation for
eligible students to and from school as defined in RCW 28A.160.160(3)
from other transportation costs.
(3) Each district shall submit the information required in this
section on a timely basis as a condition of the continuing receipt of
school transportation moneys.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Until a new distribution formula is
implemented as directed under section 5 of this act, the legislature
intends to appropriate funds for student transportation in addition to
the funds generated by the distribution formula in RCW 28A.160.150
through 28A.160.180 and the omnibus appropriations act. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate the additional
funds on a pro rata basis to school districts based on the variance
between a district's allocation under the distribution formula in the
2004-05 school year and the estimate of that district's costs of
transporting students to and from school created by the joint
legislative audit and review committee in 2006, if such a variance was
negative. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
adjust a school district's allocation under this section based on
revised data about the district's costs of transporting students. The
purpose of this additional allocation is to mitigate the estimated
funding variance in state allocations for student transportation
identified by the joint legislative audit and review committee while
improvements are made in school districts' cost accounting and a new
distribution formula is developed and implemented as provided in this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The superintendent of public instruction
shall develop and propose a new distribution formula for allocating
state funds to school districts for transportation of students to and
from school, to be implemented beginning with the 2009-10 school year.
The distribution formula shall include but not be limited to the
characteristics in this subsection.
(a) The formula shall be developed using the major cost factors in
student transportation, including but not limited to driver and aide
compensation, road miles, fuel, maintenance, student loads, and
supervision. The major cost factors in the formula shall be based on
reliable data and transparent to policymakers and the public. The
formula shall be constructed in a manner that allows policymakers to
adjust one or more of the major cost factors independently from the
others. The formula may use data from school district transportation
routing programs but shall not necessitate use of such a program to
function reliably.
(b) The formula shall allocate funds to school districts based on
the predicted costs of transporting students to and from school, using
the cost factors in the formula. The formula shall not be based on
direct reimbursement of school districts for transportation
expenditures, nor shall the formula direct how a school district
operates its student transportation program.
(c) The formula shall encourage efficient use of state resources by
addressing:
(i) Reasonable controls on compensation costs to be covered by the
formula;
(ii) Efficient use of vehicle capacity; and
(iii) Efficient routing of buses.
(d) The formula shall allocate funds for all students in grades
kindergarten through five who are transported to and from school and
all students in grades six through twelve who are transported to and
from route stop locations located more than one mile from school.
(e) The formula shall include transportation for academic extended
day programs that are provided under the basic education act, special
education, the learning assistance program, and the transitional
bilingual instruction program.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with a
school transportation finance and funding expert to assist in
developing the new distribution formula.
(3) A student transportation funding work group is established to
provide advice and oversight to the superintendent of public
instruction in the development of the distribution formula under this
section.
(a) At a minimum, the work group shall be comprised of:
(i) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house;
(ii) Two members from each of the largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(iii) A representative from the office of financial management; and
(iv) Two representatives each from school districts with small,
medium, and large student populations, appointed by the superintendent
of public instruction with advice from the school administrators',
school directors', and pupil transportation associations.
(b) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) Beginning in September of 2007, the superintendent shall
provide quarterly updates and progress reports to the fiscal committees
of the legislature on the development and testing of the distribution
formula.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall present an
interim report on the proposed distribution formula to the governor and
the education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1,
2007, and a final report that includes the proposed formula, estimates
of its fiscal impact on the state and school districts, and draft
legislation necessary to implement the proposal, by December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 2 of this act takes effect September
1, 2009.

--- END ---