BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a small
business when the requirements of this section are met. For the
purposes of this section, a small business is a person whose:
(a) Value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of
the business is less than two hundred thousand dollars during a base
period as specified under this section. For purposes of determining
eligibility under the two hundred thousand dollar limitation in this
subsection (1), persons taxable under this chapter on multiple
activities associated with the same product, as identified in RCW
82.04.440, need only include the value of products or gross proceeds of
sales for a single activity associated with the same product; and
(b) Taxes due and paid under this chapter for the base period
exceed the net income reported on the person's federal income tax
return for the same base period. For purposes of determining net
income reported on the person's federal income tax return, a sole
proprietor may subtract the amount of self-employment tax shown on
schedule 1040 SE from the net income reported on schedule C of the
federal income tax return.
(2) The small business selects the base period. The base period is
a twelve-month period that is covered by a single federal income tax
return. The small business must have operated during the entire
twelve-month period.
(3) The small business may take the exemption on twelve monthly tax
returns if the business files tax returns monthly, four quarterly tax
returns if the business files tax returns quarterly, or one annual tax
return if the business files tax returns annually. Once a person has
claimed the exemption on a tax return, the person may not later change
the claim to a different tax return.
(4) For small businesses filing returns on a monthly or quarterly
basis, the base period must end no earlier than six months before the
period covered by the first return on which a person qualifies under
this section. A monthly or quarterly filer may not claim the exemption
for any tax period starting more than twenty-four months after the
first month covered by the first return on which the exemption is
claimed. Annual filers may claim the exemption on one of the two
annual tax returns due following the last month in the base period.
(5) The amount of the exemption claimed must be reported on the
small business' tax return as prescribed by the department. A claim by
a person not entitled to this exemption is fraud or misrepresentation
of a material fact and subject to interest and penalties prescribed by
law.
(6) The exemption provided in this section is not available for any
period during or after which the small business:
(a) Purchases or otherwise acquires, directly or indirectly, in
bulk and not in the ordinary course of business, tangible or intangible
assets of another taxpayer; or
(b) Is a surviving corporation of a statutory merger.

--- END ---