BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Saint Edward
state park is an important, unique, and endangered feature of the state
parks system. Saint Edward state park features over three hundred
acres of land and three thousand feet of freshwater shoreline along
Lake Washington. Most notably, Saint Edward state park is home to the
Saint Edward seminary building, which was constructed in 1931 and
served as a seminary until 1977. The historic seminary building was
operated by the Roman Catholic archdiocese of Seattle until its
transfer to the Washington state parks and recreation commission in the
1970s. The seminary building at Saint Edward state park has been
listed on the Washington heritage register by the department of
archeology and historic preservation.
(2) The legislature further finds that the seminary building at
Saint Edward state park is a unique feature of the park that should be
treasured and maintained by the parks and recreation commission long
into the future. However, the current status of the seminary building
is unsatisfactory. The seminary's current state of disrepair blocks
free public access to the historic building and brings into doubt the
future of the building's stability.
(3) The legislature further finds that the state parks and
recreation commission should give the Saint Edward seminary building a
top priority in terms of attention and funding. The state parks and
recreation commission has been entrusted with a building of great
historical significance and owes to Washington's future citizens the
duty of maintaining and restoring the structure for their enjoyment and
enrichment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The state parks and recreation
commission shall conduct or commission a full engineering and
architectural evaluation of the seminary building at Saint Edward state
park. The evaluation must, at a minimum:
(a) Identify the repairs necessary immediately to stop or slow the
further deterioration of the seminary building;
(b) Identify the extent of the repairs necessary to maintain the
basic level of public safety expected in a building open to the public;
and
(c) Identify which additional repairs or restoration would be
necessary for the seminary building to be used for various purposes
beyond mere recreational occupancy.
(2) The evaluation conducted under this section must also identify
the estimated costs associated with all repairs or restoration.
(3) The evaluation required by this section must be completed and
reported to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1,
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 31, 2008.

--- END ---