BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.86.080 and 1970 ex.s. c 26 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The attorney general may bring an action in the name of the state,
or as parens patriae on behalf of persons residing in the state,
against any person to restrain and prevent the doing of any act herein
prohibited or declared to be unlawful; and the prevailing party may, in
the discretion of the court, recover the costs of said action including
a reasonable attorney's fee.
The court may make such additional orders or judgments as may be
necessary to restore to any person in interest any moneys or property,
real or personal, which may have been acquired by means of any act
herein prohibited or declared to be unlawful. Upon a violation of RCW
19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or 19.86.060, the court may also make
such additional orders or judgments as may be necessary to restore to
any person in interest any moneys or property, real or personal, which
may have been acquired, regardless of whether such person purchased or
transacted for goods or services directly with the defendant or
indirectly through resellers.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.86.090 and 1987 c 202 s 187 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who is injured in his or her business or property by a
violation of RCW 19.86.020, 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or
19.86.060, or any person so injured because he or she refuses to accede
to a proposal for an arrangement which, if consummated, would be in
violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or 19.86.060, may
bring a civil action in the superior court to enjoin further
violations, to recover the actual damages sustained by him or her, or
both, together with the costs of the suit, including a reasonable
attorney's fee, and the court may in its discretion, increase the award
of damages to an amount not to exceed three times the actual damages
sustained: PROVIDED, That such increased damage award for violation of
RCW 19.86.020 may not exceed ten thousand dollars: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That such person may bring a civil action in the district court to
recover his or her actual damages, except for damages which exceed the
amount specified in RCW 3.66.020, and the costs of the suit, including
reasonable attorney's fees. The district court may, in its discretion,
increase the award of damages to an amount not more than three times
the actual damages sustained, but such increased damage award shall not
exceed the amount specified in RCW 3.66.020. For the purpose of this
section, "person" shall include the counties, municipalities, and all
political subdivisions of this state.
Whenever the state of Washington is injured, directly or
indirectly, by reason of a violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040,
19.86.050, or 19.86.060, it may sue therefor in the superior court to
recover the actual damages sustained by it, whether direct or indirect,
and to recover the costs of the suit including a reasonable attorney's
fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---