BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that economic
development success requires coordinated state and local efforts. The
legislature further finds that economic development happens at the
local level. County designated associate development organizations
serve as a networking tool and resource hub for business retention,
expansion, and relocation in Washington. Economic development success
requires an adequately funded and coordinated state effort and an
adequately funded and coordinated local effort. The legislature
intends to bolster the partnership between state and local economic
development efforts, provide increased funding for local economic
development services, and increase local economic development service
effectiveness, efficiency, and outcomes.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.080 and 1997 c 60 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The department shall contract with associate development
organizations ((or other local organizations)) to increase the support
for and coordination of community and economic development services in
communities or regional areas. The organizations contracted with in
each community or regional area shall be broadly representative of
community and economic interests. The organization shall be capable of
identifying key economic and community development problems, developing
appropriate solutions, and mobilizing broad support for recommended
initiatives. The contracting organization shall work with and include
local governments, local chambers of commerce, ((private industry
councils,)) workforce development councils, port districts, labor
groups, institutions of higher education, community action programs,
and other appropriate private, public, or nonprofit community and
economic development groups. The ((department shall be responsible for
determining the)) scope of services delivered under these contracts((.
(2) Associate development organizations or other local development
organizations contracted with shall promote and coordinate, through
local service agreements with local governments, small business
development centers, port districts, community and technical colleges,
private industry councils, and other development organizations, for the
efficient delivery of community and economic development services in
their areas.
(3) The department shall consult with associate development
organizations, port districts, local governments, and other local
development organizations in the establishment of service delivery
regions throughout the state. The legislature encourages local
associate development organizations to form partnerships with other
associate development organizations in their region to combine
resources for better access to available services, to encourage
regional delivery of state services, and to build the local capacity of
communities in the region more effectively.
(4) The department shall contract on a regional basis for surveys
of key sectors of the regional economy and the coordination of
technical assistance to businesses and employees within the key
sectors. The department's selection of contracting organizations or
consortiums shall be based on the sufficiency of the organization's or
consortium's proposal to examine key sectors of the local economy
within its region adequately and its ability to coordinate the delivery
of services required by businesses within the targeted sectors.
Organizations contracting with the department shall work closely with
the department to examine the local economy and to develop strategies
to focus on developing key sectors that show potential for long-term
sustainable growth. The contracting organization shall survey
businesses and employees in targeted sectors on a periodic basis to
gather information on the sector's business needs, expansion plans,
relocation decisions, training needs, potential layoffs, financing
needs, availability of financing, and other appropriate information
about economic trends and specific employer and employee needs in the
region.
(5))) shall include two broad areas of work:
(1) Direct assistance, including business planning, to companies
who need support to stay in business, expand, or relocate to Washington
from out of state or other countries. Assistance includes:
(a) Acting as a conduit to partner organizations in workforce
development, ports, community college and higher education, small
business assistance programs particularly small business development
centers, and other federal, state, and local programs;
(b) Providing information on state and local permitting, tax
issues, and other essential information for operating and expanding a
business in Washington;
(c) Marketing Washington as an excellent location to expand or
relocate a business and positioning Washington as a globally
competitive place to grow business; and
(d) Developing and executing regional plans to attract companies
from out of state and to increase direct foreign investment; and
(2) Support for regional economic research and regional planning
efforts to implement target industry strategies and other economic
development strategies that support increased living standards
throughout Washington. Activities include:
(a) Participation in regional planning efforts involving combined
strategies around workforce development and economic development
policies and programs. The contracting organization shall participate
with the workforce training and education coordinating board as created
in chapter 28C.18 RCW, and any regional entities designated by that
board, in providing for the coordination of job skills training within
its region;
(b) Collecting and reporting local and regional economic
information to inform local, regional, and statewide strategic
decisions regarding business development policy and economic
development aspects of growth management act planning. In cooperation
with other local, regional, and state planning efforts, contracting
organizations may provide insight into the needs of target industry
clusters, business expansion plans, early detection of potential
relocations or layoffs, training needs, and other appropriate economic
information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Contracting associate development
organizations shall provide the department with measures of their
performance. Annual reports shall include information on the impact of
the contracting organization on employment, wages, tax revenue, and
capital investment. Specific measures shall be developed in the
contracting process between the department and the contracting
organization every two years. Performance measures should be
consistent across regions to allow for statewide evaluation.
(2)(a) The department and contracting organizations shall agree
upon specific target levels for the performance measures in subsection
(1) of this section. Comparison of agreed thresholds and actual
performance shall occur annually.
(b) Contracting organizations that fail to achieve the agreed
performance targets in more than one-half of the agreed measures shall
develop remediation plans to address performance gaps. The remediation
plans shall include revised performance thresholds specifically chosen
to provide evidence of progress in making the identified service
changes.
(c) Contracts and state funding shall be terminated for one year
for organizations that fail to achieve the agreed upon progress toward
improved performance defined under (b) of this subsection. During the
year in which termination for nonperformance is in effect,
organizations shall review alternative delivery strategies to include
reorganization of the contracting organization, merging of previous
efforts with existing regional partners, and other specific steps
toward improved performance. At the end of the period of termination,
the department may contract with the associate development organization
or its successor as it deems appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Contracts with associate development
organizations shall be awarded according to the following annual
schedule:
(1) For associate development associations in urban counties, which
are counties other than rural counties as defined in RCW 43.160.020, a
locally matched one dollar per capita allocation totaling no more than
four hundred thousand dollars per organization each state fiscal year;
(2) For associate development associations in rural counties, as
defined in RCW 43.160.020, a per county base allocation of thirty
thousand dollars and a locally matched seventy cents per capita
allocation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 3 and 4 of this act are each added
to chapter 43.330 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---