BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.050 and 2005 c 515 s 2 and 2005 c 514 s 101 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible
personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:
(a) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(b) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(c) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(d) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; (([or])) or
(e) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065. The term ((shall)) must include every sale of tangible
personal property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed
in the performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or
"retail sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as
provided in (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following
such use. The term also means every sale of tangible personal property
to persons engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280
(2) and (7), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908; or
(f) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" ((shall)) must
include the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property
consumed and/or for labor and services rendered in respect to the
following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities,
and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and shall also include the sale of services or charges
made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to
constructing, repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or
under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by
title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such
construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such
construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original
owner;
(d) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to the cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but ((shall)) must not include the charge made
for janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and
all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel,
trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real
property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real
property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real property
for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same.
For the purposes of this subsection, it shall be presumed that the sale
of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous
period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real
property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property,
labor and services to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e),
and (f) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property,
labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by
such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at
retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services
may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection ((shall)) must be construed to modify subsection (1) of this
section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section
((shall)) must be construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" ((shall)) must
include the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or
professional services including amounts designated as interest, rents,
fees, admission, and other service emoluments however designated,
received by persons engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term shall also include:
(i) The renting or leasing of tangible personal property to
consumers; and
(ii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this
is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to
perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (4)(a)(ii), an
operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible
personal property.
(b) The term ((shall)) must not include the renting or leasing of
tangible personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose
of sublease or subrent.
(5) The term ((shall)) must also include the providing of telephone
service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6) The term ((shall)) must also include the sale of prewritten
computer software other than a sale to a person who presents a resale
certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery
to the end user, but ((shall)) must not include custom software or the
customization of prewritten computer software.
(7) The term ((shall)) must also include the sale of or charge made
for an extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this
subsection, "extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified
duration to perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal
property at no additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible
personal property, labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for
the replacement or repair of tangible personal property, based on the
occurrence of specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not
include an agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended
warranty in this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the
agreement and the value of the agreement is included in the sales price
of the tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For
purposes of this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in
RCW 82.08.010.
(8) The term ((shall)) must not include the sale of or charge made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing,
or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of
way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(9) The term ((shall)) must also not include sales of chemical
sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of
fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it
include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state department of
fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that
the farmer owns or leases.
(10) The term ((shall)) must not include the sale of or charge made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing,
repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or
other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development.
(11) The term ((shall)) must not include the sale of or charge made
for labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to
agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed
guideway equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient
of the labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit
agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.
(12) Until July 1, 2012, the term must not include the sale of or
charge made for labor and services rendered for environmental remedial
action, as defined in section 3 of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.190 and 2005 c 514 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Consumer" means the following:
(1) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any
article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the
person's business and including, among others, without limiting the
scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve,
construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than for the purpose (a) of resale as tangible personal property
in the regular course of business or (b) of incorporating such property
as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving,
constructing, or decorating such real or personal property of or for
consumers or (c) of consuming such property in producing for sale a new
article of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in
processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a
chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new
article being produced for sale or (d) of consuming the property
purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in
producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property
is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an
ingredient of ferrosilicon or (e) of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7),
if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or
component of property covered by the extended warranty without
intervening use by such person;
(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or
uses any telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than for
resale in the regular course of business; (c) any person who purchases,
acquires, or uses any service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), other
than for resale in the regular course of business or for the purpose of
satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as
defined in RCW 82.04.050(7); (d) any person who purchases, acquires, or
uses any amusement and recreation service defined in RCW
82.04.050(3)(a), other than for resale in the regular course of
business; (e) any person who is an end user of software; and (f) any
person who purchases or acquires an extended warranty as defined in RCW
82.04.050(7) other than for resale in the regular course of business;
(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the
building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by
the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as
defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of
such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right of
way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the property in
or upon the right of way of such street, place, road, highway,
easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of such
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;
(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of
possession to or an easement in real property which is being
constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a
person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations
or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services
rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82
RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property.
Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition
shall be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";
(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired,
improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged
in business;
(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created
pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land
and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality
thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to
chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person shall be a consumer within the
meaning of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property
incorporated into, installed in, or attached to such building or other
structure by such person, except that consumer does not include any
person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating,
or improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon,
or above real property of or for the United States, or any
instrumentality thereof, if the investment project would qualify for
sales and use tax deferral under chapter 82.63 RCW if undertaken by a
private entity;
(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the
rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under
RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for
tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful
life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section shall be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer";
(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and development;
((and))
(9) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession of tangible personal property that, under the terms of an
extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), has been repaired or
is replacement property, but only with respect to the sale of or charge
made for the repairing of the tangible personal property or the
replacement property; and
(10) Until July 1, 2012, any person engaged in the business of
conducting environmental remedial action, as defined in section 3 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
environmental remedial action, the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the value of the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate 0.471 percent.
(2)(a) For purposes of this section, "environmental remedial
action" means:
(i) Those services related to the identification, investigation, or
cleanup arising out of the release or threatened release of hazardous
substances in Washington state that are conducted under contract with
the department of ecology or under an enforcement order, agreed order,
or consent decree executed by the department of ecology, or those
services, when evaluated as a whole, that are the substantial
equivalent of a department of ecology-conducted or supervised remedial
action under the model toxics control act, chapter 70.105D RCW; or
(ii) Those services related to the identification, investigation,
or cleanup of a facility located in Washington state that are conducted
under contract with the United States environmental protection agency
or under an order or consent decree executed by the United States
environmental protection agency, or that are consistent with the
national contingency plan adopted under the comprehensive environmental
response compensation and liability act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it
exists on July 1, 1998, and those services are conducted at facilities
that are included on the national priorities list adopted under 42
U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it exists on July 1, 1998, or at facilities subject
to a removal action authorized under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9604 as it exists
on July 1, 1998.
(b) "Environmental remedial action" does not include services that
would normally be rendered as part of site development, redevelopment,
or maintenance including:
(i) Demolition of structures, including services related to removal
of asbestos or lead paint from structures, unless removal of the
structure is necessary to gain access to underlying soil or ground
water contamination;
(ii) Placement of pavement and sidewalks;
(iii) Landscaping of the site; and
(iv) Installation of new underground storage tank systems.
(3) A site is eligible for environmental remedial action upon
submittal, via certified mail to the department of ecology and the
department of revenue, of the following:
(a) A certification from the owner, the department of ecology, or
the United States environmental protection agency, containing the
following information:
(i) The location of the site, shown on a map and identified by
parcel number or numbers and street address;
(ii) The name and address and daytime phone number of a contact
person;
(iii) A statement that the proposed environmental remedial actions
will be conducted by the department of ecology or its authorized
contractor under chapter 70.105D RCW or will be substantially
equivalent to a department of ecology-conducted or supervised remedial
action under the model toxics control act, chapter 70.105D RCW, or will
be conducted by the United States environmental protection agency or
its authorized contractor or will be consistent with the national
contingency plan under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it exists on July 1,
1998; and
(iv) A description of the proposed environmental remedial actions
to be taken; and
(b)(i) A certification from a certified underground storage tank
service supervisor as authorized in chapter 90.76 RCW, from a
professional engineer licensed in the state of Washington, or from an
environmental professional who subscribes to a code of professional
responsibility administered by a recognized organization representing
such professions containing the following information:
(A) Confirmation that an environmental remedial action as defined
in this section is to be conducted at the site;
(B) The location of the site, shown on a map and identified by
parcel number or numbers and street address, and the approximate
location of the proposed environmental remedial action; and
(C) The name, address, telephone number, and uniform business
identifier of the person providing the certification; or
(ii) If applicable to the site, a copy of an enforcement order,
agreed order, or consent decree executed by the department of ecology
or the United States environmental protection agency.
(4) The department of revenue shall respond in writing to the owner
within thirty days confirming receipt of the certification, or
certifications, of eligibility. Under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m),
certification is subject to disclosure and copies may be obtained from
the department upon request. The request shall be in writing and shall
identify the site by county and parcel number or numbers.
(5) The owner shall provide a copy of the confirmation from the
department of revenue to each person who renders environmental remedial
action at the site. Each person who renders such action shall
separately state the charges for labor and services associated with the
environmental remedial action.
(6) Upon completion of the environmental remedial action, the owner
shall submit to the department of ecology a report documenting the
environmental remedial actions conducted at the site and documenting
compliance with the requirements of chapter 70.105D RCW. This report
shall include information, on a form provided by the department,
regarding the effect of the tax classification of the environmental
remedial action on the scope and timing of the environmental remedial
action conducted.
(7) In addition to any other penalties, a person who files a
certificate with the department of ecology or the department of revenue
that contains falsehoods or misrepresentations are subject to penalties
authorized under chapter 18.43 or 90.76 RCW or RCW 9A.76.175. Also, a
person who improperly reports the person's tax class shall be assessed
a penalty of fifty percent of the tax due, in addition to other taxes
or penalties, together with interest. The department of revenue shall
waive the penalty imposed under this section if it finds that the
falsehoods or misrepresentations or improper reporting of the tax
classification was due to circumstances beyond the control of the
person.
(8) The department of ecology shall report to the legislature by
December 10, 2011, on the environmental remedial actions conducted
under this act. The report must include the following information:
(a) The number of sites for which the certifications required under
subsection (3) of this section were submitted during the years 2008,
2009, and 2010;
(b) The number of sites for which the owner's report required under
subsection (6) of this section were submitted during the years 2008,
2009, and 2010;
(c) The number of these sites which were cleaned up under a
voluntary remedial action and the number of these sites which were
cleaned up under state or federal order;
(d) An analysis of the effect of this act in encouraging site
owners to conduct environmental remedial action more quickly or more
effectively; and
(e) Recommendations to improve the timely and voluntary cleanup of
contaminated sites in Washington.
(9) This section expires July 1, 2012.

--- END ---