BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.103.090 and 1999 c 142 s 1 and 1999 c 40 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The council may:
(a) Meet at such times and places as may be designated by a
majority vote of the council members or, if a majority cannot agree, by
the chair;
(b) Adopt rules governing the council and the conduct of its
meetings;
(c) Require reports from the chief of the Washington state patrol
on matters pertaining to the bureau of forensic laboratory services;
(d) Authorize the expenditure of up to two hundred fifty thousand
dollars per biennium from the council's death investigations account
appropriation for the purpose of assisting local jurisdictions in the
investigation of multiple deaths involving unanticipated,
extraordinary, and catastrophic events, or involving multiple
jurisdictions. The council shall adopt rules consistent with this
subsection for the purposes of authorizing expenditure of the funds;
(e) Authorize the expenditure of up to twenty-five thousand dollars
per biennium from the council's death investigations account
appropriation for the purpose of assisting local jurisdictions to
secure forensic anthropology services or other testing, to determine
the identity of human remains upon a showing of financial need. The
council shall adopt rules consistent with this subsection for the
purposes of authorizing expenditure of the funds;
(f) Do anything, necessary or convenient, which enables the council
to perform its duties and to exercise its powers; and
(((f))) (g) Be actively involved in the preparation of the bureau
of forensic laboratory services budget and approve the bureau of
forensic laboratory services budget prior to formal submission to the
office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.030.
(2) The council shall:
(a) Prescribe qualifications for the position of director of the
bureau of forensic laboratory services, after consulting with the chief
of the Washington state patrol. The council shall submit to the chief
of the Washington state patrol a list containing the names of up to
three persons who the council believes meet its qualifications to serve
as director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services. Minimum
qualifications for the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory
services must include successful completion of a background
investigation and polygraph examination. If requested by the chief of
the Washington state patrol, the forensic investigations council shall
submit one additional list of up to three persons who the forensic
investigations council believes meet its qualifications. The
appointment must be from one of the lists of persons submitted by the
forensic investigations council, and the director of the bureau of
forensic laboratory services shall report to the office of the chief of
the Washington state patrol;
(b) After consulting with the chief of the Washington state patrol
and the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services, the
council shall appoint a toxicologist as state toxicologist, who shall
report to the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services.
The appointee shall meet the minimum standards for employment with the
Washington state patrol including successful completion of a background
investigation and polygraph examination;
(c) Establish, after consulting with the chief of the Washington
state patrol, the policies, objectives, and priorities of the bureau of
forensic laboratory services, to be implemented and administered within
constraints established by budgeted resources by the director of the
bureau of forensic laboratory services;
(d) Set the salary for the director of the bureau of forensic
laboratory services; and
(e) Set the salary for the state toxicologist.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.58.107 and 2003 c 272 s 1 and 2003 c 241 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The department of health shall charge a fee of ((seventeen)) twenty
dollars for certified copies of records and for copies or information
provided for research, statistical, or administrative purposes, and
eight dollars for a search of the files or records when no copy is
made. The department shall prescribe by regulation fees to be paid for
preparing sealed files and for opening sealed files.
No fee may be demanded or required for furnishing certified copies
of a birth, death, fetal death, marriage, divorce, annulment, or legal
separation record for use in connection with a claim for compensation
or pension pending before the veterans administration. No fee may be
demanded or required for furnishing certified copies of a death
certificate of a sex offender for use by a law enforcement agency in
maintaining a registered sex offender data base.
The department shall keep a true and correct account of all fees
received and transmit the fees to the state treasurer on a weekly
basis.
Local registrars shall charge the same fees as the state as
hereinabove provided and as prescribed by department regulation except
in cases where payment is made by credit card, charge card, debit card,
smart card, stored value card, federal wire, automatic clearinghouse
system, or other electronic communication. Payment by these electronic
methods may be subject to an additional fee consistent with the
requirements established by RCW 36.29.190. All such fees collected,
except for seven dollars of each fee collected for the issuance of
birth certificates and first copies of death certificates and fourteen
dollars of each fee collected for additional copies of the same death
certificate ordered at the same time as the first copy, shall be paid
to the jurisdictional health department.
All local registrars in cities and counties shall keep a true and
correct account of all fees received under this section for the
issuance of certified copies and shall transmit seven dollars of the
fees collected for birth certificates and first copies of death
certificates and fourteen dollars of the fee collected for additional
copies of death certificates to the state treasurer on or before the
first day of January, April, July, and October. All but five dollars
of the fees turned over to the state treasurer by local registrars
shall be paid to the department of health for the purpose of developing
and maintaining the state vital records systems, including a web-based
electronic death registration system.
((Five)) Eight dollars of each fee imposed for the issuance of
certified copies, except for copies suitable for display issued under
RCW 70.58.085, at both the state and local levels shall be held by the
state treasurer in the death investigations' account established by RCW
43.79.445.

--- END ---