BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of this act to build upon
the research and findings of the Washington state missing persons task
force, assembled by the state attorney general in 2003, the United
States department of justice, and the initiative taken in chapter 102,
Laws of 2006, by the legislature to aid in recovery of missing persons
and the identification of human remains.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.103.110 and 2006 c 102 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state forensic investigations council, in
cooperation with the Washington association of coroners and medical
examiners and other interested agencies, shall develop training modules
that are essential to the effective implementation and use of missing
persons protocols using funds provided in RCW 43.79.445. ((The
training modules must provide training through classes and media that
will train and educate small departments or those at remote locations
with the least disruption.)) The training commission shall make the
training modules available to small departments or those at remote
locations with the least disruption. The modules ((will)) shall
include, but ((will)) not be limited to: The reporting process, the
use of forms and protocols, the effective use of resources, the
collection and importance of evidence and preservation of biological
evidence, and risk assessment of the individuals reported missing.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.28A.110 and 2006 c 102 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
create and maintain a statewide web site, which shall be available to
the public. The web site shall post relevant information concerning
persons reported missing in the state of Washington. For missing
persons, the web site shall contain, but is not limited to: The
person's name, physical description, photograph, and other information
that is deemed necessary according to the adopted protocols. This web
site shall allow citizens to more broadly disseminate information
regarding missing persons for at least thirty days. ((Due to the large
number of reports received on persons who are overdue and subsequently
appear, the information will be removed from the web site after thirty
days, unless persons filing the report have notified local law
enforcement that the person is still missing.))

Sec. 4 RCW 36.28A.120 and 2006 c 102 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state patrol shall establish an interface with local
law enforcement and the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs missing persons web site, the toll-free twenty-four hour
hotline, and national and other statewide missing persons systems or
clearinghouses.
Local law enforcement agencies shall file an official missing
persons report and enter biographical information into the state
missing persons computerized network ((within twelve hours)) without
delay after notification of a missing person's report is received under
this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 68.50.320 and 2006 c 102 s 6 and 2006 c 235 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
When a person reported missing has not been found within thirty
days of the report, or at any time the investigating agency suspects
criminal activity to be the basis of the victim being missing, the
sheriff, chief of police, county coroner or county medical examiner, or
other law enforcement authority initiating and conducting the
investigation for the missing person shall: (1) File a missing
person's report with the Washington state patrol missing and
unidentified persons unit; (2) initiate the collection of DNA samples
from the known missing person and their family members for nuclear and
mitochondrial DNA testing along with the necessary consent forms; and
(3) ask the missing person's family or next of kin to give written
consent to contact the dentist or dentists of the missing person and
request the person's dental records.
The missing person's dentist or dentists shall provide diagnostic
quality copies of the missing person's dental records or original
dental records to the sheriff, chief of police, county coroner or
county medical examiner, or other law enforcement authority, when
presented with the written consent from the missing person's family or
next of kin or with a statement from the sheriff, chief of police,
county coroner or county medical examiner, or other law enforcement
authority that the missing person's family or next of kin could not be
located in the exercise of due diligence or that the missing person's
family or next of kin refuse to consent to the release of the missing
person's dental records and there is reason to believe that the missing
person's family or next of kin may have been involved in the missing
person's disappearance.
As soon as possible after collecting the DNA samples ((and
obtaining the dental records)), the sheriff, chief of police, or other
law enforcement authority shall submit the DNA samples ((for nuclear
DNA testing to the Washington state patrol crime laboratory in their
jurisdiction. The DNA samples for mitochondrial DNA testing shall be
submitted to the federal bureau of investigation)) to the appropriate
laboratory. Dental records shall be submitted as soon as possible to
the Washington state patrol missing and unidentified persons unit.
The descriptive information from missing person's reports and
dental data submitted to the Washington state patrol missing
((persons)) and unidentified persons unit shall be recorded and
maintained by the Washington state patrol missing and unidentified
persons unit in the applicable dedicated missing person's databases.
((In cases where criminal activity is suspected, the state patrol
shall conduct nuclear DNA typing for entry into the state missing
person's DNA database as soon as possible.))
When a person reported missing has been found, the sheriff, chief
of police, coroner or medical examiner, or other law enforcement
authority shall report such information to the Washington state patrol.
The dental identification system shall maintain a file of
information regarding persons reported to it as missing. The file
shall contain the information referred to in this section and such
other information as the Washington state patrol finds relevant to
assist in the location of a missing person.
The files of the dental identification system shall, upon request,
be made available to law enforcement agencies attempting to locate
missing persons.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.43.751 and 2006 c 102 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Biological samples taken for a missing person's investigation under
RCW 68.50.320 shall be forwarded ((as appropriate to the federal bureau
of investigation upon receipt of the DNA samples and to the Washington
state patrol crime lab)) to the appropriate laboratory as soon as
possible. The crime laboratory of the Washington state patrol will
provide guidance to agencies regarding where samples should be sent((,
conduct nuclear DNA testing of the biological sample where appropriate
and, in the event additional testing is required, the mitochondrial DNA
testing will be conducted through the federal bureau of investigation.
Priority for testing shall be given to active criminal cases)). If
substantial delays in testing occur or federal testing is no longer
available, the legislature should be requested to provide funding to
implement mitochondrial technology in the state of Washington.

--- END ---