BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.855 and 2005 c 282 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor shall appoint a director of the sentencing
guidelines commission with the consent of the senate, who shall serve
at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall receive a salary
in an amount fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.
(2) The commission shall appoint a research staff of sufficient
size and with sufficient resources to accomplish its duties. The
commission may request from the office of financial management, the
indeterminate sentence review board, the administrative office of the
courts, the department of corrections, and the department of social and
health services such data, information, and data processing assistance
as it may need to accomplish its duties, and such services shall be
provided without cost to the commission. The commission shall adopt
its own bylaws.
((The salary for a full-time executive officer, if any, shall be
fixed by the governor pursuant to RCW 43.03.040.))

Sec. 2 RCW 43.17.020 and 2006 c 265 s 112 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of community,
trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans affairs,
(11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, (14) the secretary of health, (15)
the director of financial institutions, (16) the director of the
department of archaeology and historic preservation, ((and)) (17) the
director of early learning, and (18) the director of the sentencing
guidelines commission.
Such officers, except the director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold
office at the pleasure of the governor. The director of fish and
wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as
prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

--- END ---