BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new chapter is added to Title 43 RCW. The
following sections are recodified under the following subchapters:
(1) "Housing assistance program" as follows:
RCW 43.185.010;
RCW 43.185.015;
RCW 43.185.020;
RCW 43.185.030;
RCW 43.185.050;
RCW 43.185.060;
RCW 43.185.070;
RCW 43.185.074;
RCW 43.185.076;
RCW 43.185.080;
RCW 43.185.090;
RCW 43.185.100;
RCW 43.185.110;
RCW 43.185.120;
RCW 43.185.130;
RCW 43.185.900;
RCW 43.185.910; and
RCW 43.185.911.
(2) "Affordable housing program" as follows:
RCW 43.185A.010;
RCW 43.185A.020;
RCW 43.185A.030;
RCW 43.185A.040;
RCW 43.185A.050;
RCW 43.185A.060;
RCW 43.185A.070;
RCW 43.185A.080;
RCW 43.185A.090;
RCW 43.185A.100;
RCW 43.185A.900;
RCW 43.185A.901; and
RCW 43.185A.902.
(3) "Housing policy act" as follows:
RCW 43.185B.005;
RCW 43.185B.007;
RCW 43.185B.009;
RCW 43.185B.010;
RCW 43.185B.020;
RCW 43.185B.030;
RCW 43.185B.040;
RCW 43.185B.900;
RCW 43.63A.650;
RCW 43.330.170; and
RCW 35.21.685.
(4) "Housing cooperation" as follows:
RCW 35.83.005;
RCW 35.83.010;
RCW 35.83.020;
RCW 35.83.030;
RCW 35.83.040;
RCW 35.83.050;
RCW 35.83.060; and
RCW 35.83.070.
(5) "Federally assisted housing" as follows:
RCW 59.28.010;
RCW 59.28.020;
RCW 59.28.030;
RCW 59.28.040;
RCW 59.28.050;
RCW 59.28.060;
RCW 59.28.070;
RCW 59.28.080;
RCW 59.28.090;
RCW 59.28.100;
RCW 59.28.120;
RCW 59.28.130;
RCW 59.28.900;
RCW 59.28.901; and
RCW 59.28.902.
(6) "Farm worker housing" as follows:
RCW 43.63A.500;
RCW 43.63A.505;
RCW 43.330.165;
RCW 70.114.010;
RCW 70.114.020;
RCW 70.114A.010;
RCW 70.114A.020;
RCW 70.114A.030;
RCW 70.114A.040;
RCW 70.114A.045;
RCW 70.114A.050;
RCW 70.114A.060;
RCW 70.114A.065;
RCW 70.114A.070;
RCW 70.114A.081;
RCW 70.114A.085;
RCW 70.114A.100;
RCW 70.114A.110;
RCW 70.114A.900; and
RCW 70.114A.901.
(7) "Emergency mortgage and rental assistance" as follows:
RCW 43.63A.610;
RCW 43.63A.620;
RCW 43.63A.630;
RCW 43.63A.640; and
RCW 43.63A.645.
(8) "Low-income residential weatherization and energy assistance"
as follows:
RCW 70.164.010;
RCW 70.164.020;
RCW 70.164.030;
RCW 70.164.040;
RCW 70.164.050;
RCW 70.164.060;
RCW 70.164.070;
RCW 70.164.900; and
RCW 43.330.110.
(9) "Surplus property for affordable housing" as follows:
RCW 43.63A.510;
RCW 35.21.687;
RCW 36.34.137;
RCW 43.20A.037;
RCW 47.12.063;
RCW 47.12.064;
RCW 72.09.055; and
RCW 43.19.19201.

--- END ---