BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that good physical
health is vital to the overall well-being of Washington's youth.
Regular physical activity is essential to good physical health, and
schools are a logical place for youth to engage in physical activity.
It is therefore the intent of the legislature to ensure that during
each school day students are provided with adequate opportunities to
engage in physical activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
All public schools must provide to students, in each of grades
kindergarten through twelve, opportunities for at least forty minutes
of physical activity each school day, except that where there are fewer
than three instructional hours in a school day, schools must provide
opportunities for at least thirty minutes of physical activity each
school day. Such opportunities may include recess, a physical
education class, or other school activities, but must in all instances
allow students to be physically active. The hour must be available
during instructional hours and may be provided in one block of time or
in varying increments throughout the school day. Opportunities to
participate in school athletic programs, where the activity occurs
before or after instructional hours, do not satisfy this requirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect September 1, 2007.

--- END ---