BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.070 and 2006 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission may:
(1) Make rules and regulations for the proper administration of its
duties;
(2) Accept any grants of funds made with or without a matching
requirement by the United States, or any agency thereof, for purposes
in keeping with the purposes of this chapter; accept gifts, bequests,
devises and endowments for purposes in keeping with such purposes;
enter into cooperative agreements with and provide for private
nonprofit groups to use state park property and facilities to raise
money to contribute gifts, grants, and support to the commission for
the purposes of this chapter. The commission may assist the nonprofit
group in a cooperative effort by providing necessary agency personnel
and services, if available. However, none of the moneys raised may
inure to the benefit of the nonprofit group, except in furtherance of
its purposes to benefit the commission as provided in this chapter.
The agency and the private nonprofit group shall agree on the nature of
any project to be supported by such gift or grant prior to the use of
any agency property or facilities for raising money. Any such gifts
may be in the form of recreational facilities developed or built in
part or in whole for public use on agency property, provided that the
facility is consistent with the purposes of the agency;
(3) Require certification by the commission of all parks and
recreation workers employed in state aided or state controlled
programs;
(4) Act jointly, when advisable, with the United States, any other
state agencies, institutions, departments, boards, or commissions in
order to carry out the objectives and responsibilities of this chapter;
(5) Grant franchises and easements for any legitimate purpose on
parks or parkways, for such terms and subject to such conditions and
considerations as the commission shall specify;
(6) Charge such fees for services, utilities, and use of facilities
as the commission shall deem proper. The commission may not charge
fees for general park access or parking;
(7) Enter into agreements whereby individuals or companies may rent
undeveloped parks or parkway land for grazing, agricultural, or mineral
development purposes upon such terms and conditions as the commission
shall deem proper, for a term not to exceed forty years;
(8) Determine the qualifications ((of and employ a director of
parks and recreation who shall receive a salary as fixed by the
governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040 and
determine the qualifications)) and salary of and employ such other
persons as may be needed to carry out the provisions hereof; and
(9) Without being limited to the powers hereinbefore enumerated,
the commission shall have such other powers as in the judgment of a
majority of its members are deemed necessary to effectuate the purposes
of this chapter: PROVIDED, That the commission shall not have power to
supervise directly any local park or recreation district, and no funds
shall be made available for such purpose.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.17.020 and 2006 c 265 s 112 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of community,
trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans affairs,
(11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, (14) the secretary of health, (15)
the director of financial institutions, (16) the director of the
department of archaeology and historic preservation, ((and)) (17) the
director of early learning, and (18) the director of the state parks
and recreation commission.
Such officers, except the director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold
office at the pleasure of the governor. The director of fish and
wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as
prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.05.040 and 1999 c 249 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director is appointed by the governor as provided in RCW
43.17.020. The director shall receive a salary as fixed by the
governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040.
(2) In addition to other duties the commission may from time to
time impose, it is the duty of the director to:
(((1))) (a) Ensure the control of weeds in parks to the extent
required by RCW 17.04.160 and 17.10.205; and
(((2))) (b) Participate in the operations of the environmental
enhancement and job creation task force under chapter 43.21J RCW.
(3) The director has the power reasonably necessary to carry out
((these)) the duties assigned in this section.

--- END ---