BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.17.390 and 2005 c 384 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Starting no later than 2008, and at least once every three
years thereafter, each agency shall apply to the Washington state
quality award, or similar organization, for an independent assessment
of its quality management, accountability, and performance system.
(2) The assessment shall evaluate the effectiveness of all elements
of its management, accountability, and performance system, including:
Leadership, strategic planning, customer focus, analysis and
information, employee performance management, and process improvement.
The purpose of the assessment is to recognize best practice and
identify improvement opportunities.
(3) Starting no later than 2011, the following agencies are no
longer subject to subsection (1) of this section and must apply to the
Washington state quality award full examination at least once every
three years: The University of Washington, Washington State
University, department of social and health services, department of
corrections, department of transportation, department of labor and
industries, Washington state patrol, employment security department,
department of health, and department of licensing.
(4) The Washington state quality award full examination process and
evaluation shall review the effectiveness of all elements of its
management, accountability, and performance system, including:
Leadership, strategic planning, customer focus, analysis and
information, employee performance management, and process improvement.
The purpose of the assessment is to recognize best practices and
identify improvement opportunities.
(5) At the time of application for a Washington state quality award
full examination or assessment each agency shall provide the governor
with a copy of the agency's application. The governor shall post all
applications on a web page.

--- END ---