BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.510 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 15 s 3 and 2001 1st
sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Medical assistance may be provided in accordance with eligibility
requirements established by the department, as defined in the social
security Title XIX state plan for mandatory categorically needy persons
and:
(1) Individuals who would be eligible for cash assistance except
for their institutional status;
(2) Individuals who are under twenty-one years of age, who would be
eligible for medicaid, but do not qualify as dependent children and who
are in (a) foster care, (b) subsidized adoption, (c) a nursing facility
or an intermediate care facility for ((the)) persons who are mentally
retarded, or (d) inpatient psychiatric facilities;
(3) ((the)) Individuals who:
(a) Are under twenty-one years of age; and
(b) On the individual's eighteenth birthday, were in foster care in
the state of Washington on or after the effective date of this act, and
for whom the department or a federally recognized Indian tribe has or
has had placement and care responsibility. For the purposes of this
subsection, "foster care" means twenty-four-hour substitute care for
children placed away from their parents or guardians and for whom the
state agency has placement and care responsibility. This includes, but
is not limited to, placements in foster family homes, foster homes of
relatives, group homes, emergency shelters, residential facilities,
child care institutions, and preadoptive homes. A child is in foster
care in accordance with this definition regardless of whether the
foster care facility is licensed and payments are made by the state or
local agency for the care of the child, whether adoption subsidy
payments are being made prior to the finalization of an adoption, or
whether there is federal matching of any payments that are made;
(4) Persons who are aged, blind, ((and)) or disabled who: (a)
Receive only a state supplement, or (b) would not be eligible for cash
assistance if they were not institutionalized;
(((4))) (5) Categorically eligible individuals who meet the income
and resource requirements of the cash assistance programs;
(((5))) (6) Individuals who are enrolled in managed health care
systems, who have otherwise lost eligibility for medical assistance,
but who have not completed a current six-month enrollment in a managed
health care system, and who are eligible for federal financial
participation under Title XIX of the social security act;
(((6))) (7) Children and pregnant women allowed by federal statute
for whom funding is appropriated;
(((7))) (8) Working individuals with disabilities authorized under
section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii) of the social security act for whom funding
is appropriated;
(((8))) (9) Other individuals eligible for medical services under
RCW 74.09.035 and 74.09.700 for whom federal financial participation is
available under Title XIX of the social security act;
(((9))) (10) Persons allowed by section 1931 of the social security
act for whom funding is appropriated; and
(((10))) (11) Women who: (a) Are under sixty-five years of age;
(b) have been screened for breast and cervical cancer under the
national breast and cervical cancer early detection program
administered by the department of health or tribal entity and have been
identified as needing treatment for breast or cervical cancer; and (c)
are not otherwise covered by health insurance. Medical assistance
provided under this subsection is limited to the period during which
the woman requires treatment for breast or cervical cancer, and is
subject to any conditions or limitations specified in the omnibus
appropriations act.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.09.530 and 2000 c 218 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The amount and nature of medical assistance and the
determination of eligibility of recipients for medical assistance shall
be the responsibility of the department of social and health services.
The department shall establish reasonable standards of assistance and
resource and income exemptions which shall be consistent with the
provisions of the Social Security Act and with the regulations of the
secretary of health, education and welfare for determining eligibility
of individuals for medical assistance and the extent of such assistance
to the extent that funds are available from the state and federal
government. The department shall not consider resources in determining
continuing eligibility for recipients eligible under section 1931 of
the social security act.
(2) Individuals eligible for medical assistance under RCW
74.09.510(3) shall be transitioned into coverage under that subsection
immediately upon their termination from coverage under RCW
74.09.510(2)(a). The department shall use income eligibility standards
and eligibility determinations applicable to children placed in foster
care. The department, in consultation with the health care authority,
shall provide information regarding basic health plan enrollment and
shall offer assistance with the application and enrollment process to
individuals covered under RCW 74.09.510(3) who are approaching their
twenty-first birthday.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---