BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.379 and 2005 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the property tax exemption authorized by
Article VII, section 10 of the state Constitution should be made
available on the basis of a retired person's ability to pay property
taxes and that the best measure of a retired person's ability to pay
taxes is that person's disposable income as defined in RCW 84.36.383.
The legislature further finds that veterans with one hundred percent
service-connected disabilities have given so much to our country that
they deserve property tax relief. The legislature further finds that
persons who do not qualify for the exemption under RCW 84.36.381, but
who earn less than fifty thousand dollars a year and own the same
principal place of residence at least ten years, also deserve property
tax relief.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 84.36.381 and 84.36.389, to read as follows:
(1)(a) For a person meeting the requirements of this section, the
valuation of the person's residence is the assessed value of the
residence on January 1st of the assessment year the person first
qualifies under this section. If the person subsequently fails to
qualify under this section only for one year because of high income,
this same valuation shall be used upon requalification. If the person
fails to qualify for more than one year in succession because of high
income or fails to qualify for any other reason, the valuation upon
requalification shall be the assessed value on January 1st of the
assessment year in which the person requalifies.
(b) In no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater
than the true and fair value of the residence on January 1st of the
assessment year.
(c) This subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to
the property in the year in which the improvements are made.
Subsequent improvements to the property shall be added to the value
otherwise determined under this subsection at their true and fair value
in the year in which they are made.
(2) To qualify for the exemption under this section, the person
claiming the exemption must:
(a) Meet the requirements of RCW 84.36.381 (1) through (3);
(b) Have owned the residence to which the exemption will apply for
the ten preceding calendar years beginning with the calendar year a
claim for exemption is filed; and
(c) Have a combined disposable income of less than fifty thousand
dollars.
(3) Combined disposable income shall be calculated in the same
manner as provided in RCW 84.36.381(4).

Sec. 3 RCW 84.36.385 and 2001 c 185 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A claim for exemption under RCW 84.36.381 ((as now or hereafter
amended,)) or section 2 of this act shall be made and filed at any time
during the year for exemption from taxes payable the following year and
thereafter and solely upon forms as prescribed and furnished by the
department of revenue. However, an exemption from tax under RCW
84.36.381 or section 2 of this act shall continue for no more than four
years unless a renewal application is filed as provided in subsection
(3) of this section. The county assessor may also require, by written
notice, a renewal application following an amendment of the income
requirements set forth in RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of this act.
Renewal applications shall be on forms prescribed and furnished by the
department of revenue.
(2) A person granted an exemption under RCW 84.36.381 or section 2
of this act shall inform the county assessor of any change in status
affecting the person's entitlement to the exemption on forms prescribed
and furnished by the department of revenue.
(3) Each person exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 ((in 1993 and
thereafter,)) or section 2 of this act shall file with the county
assessor a renewal application not later than December 31 of the year
the assessor notifies such person of the requirement to file the
renewal application.
(4) ((Beginning in 1992 and in each of the three succeeding
years,)) The county assessor shall notify approximately one-fourth of
those persons exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of
this act in the current year who have not filed a renewal application
within the previous four years((,)) of the requirement to file a
renewal application. This requirement does not apply until 2011 for
those persons exempt from taxes under section 2 of this act.
(5) If the assessor finds that the applicant does not meet the
qualifications as set forth in RCW 84.36.381((, as now or hereafter
amended)) or section 2 of this act, the claim ((or)) for exemption
shall be denied but such denial shall be subject to appeal under the
provisions of RCW 84.48.010(5) and in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 84.40.038. If the applicant had received exemption in prior years
based on erroneous information, the taxes shall be collected subject to
penalties as provided in RCW 84.40.130 for a period of not to exceed
three years.
(6) The department and each local assessor is hereby directed to
publicize the qualifications and manner of making claims under RCW
84.36.381 through 84.36.389, through communications media, including
such paid advertisements or notices as it deems appropriate. Notice of
the qualifications, method of making applications, the penalties for
not reporting a change in status, and availability of further
information shall be included on or with property tax statements and
revaluation notices for all residential property including mobile
homes, except rental properties.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.36.387 and 2003 c 53 s 408 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All claims for exemption under RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of
this act shall be made and signed by the person entitled to the
exemption, by his or her attorney in fact or in the event the residence
of such person is under mortgage or purchase contract requiring
accumulation of reserves out of which the holder of the mortgage or
contract is required to pay real estate taxes, by such holder or by the
owner, either before two witnesses or the county assessor or his or her
deputy in the county where the real property is located((: PROVIDED,
That)). However, if a claim for exemption is made by a person living
in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, such
claim shall be made and signed by the person entitled to the exemption
and by the authorized agent of such cooperative.
(2) If the taxpayer is unable to submit his or her own claim, the
claim shall be submitted by a duly authorized agent or by a guardian or
other person charged with the care of the person or property of such
taxpayer.
(3) All claims for exemption and renewal applications shall be
accompanied by such documented verification of income, and duration of
ownership for claims for exemption under section 2 of this act, as
shall be prescribed by rule adopted by the department of revenue.
(4) Any person signing a false claim with the intent to defraud or
evade the payment of any tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72
RCW.
(5) The tax liability of a cooperative housing association,
corporation, or partnership shall be reduced by the amount of tax
exemption to which a claimant residing therein is entitled and such
cooperative shall reduce any amount owed by the claimant to the
cooperative by such exact amount of tax exemption or, if no amount be
owed, the cooperative shall make payment to the claimant of such exact
amount of exemption.
(6) A remainderman or other person who would have otherwise paid
the tax on real property that is the subject of an exemption granted
under RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of this act for an estate for life
shall reduce the amount which would have been payable by the life
tenant to the remainderman or other person to the extent of the
exemption. If no amount is owed or separately stated as an obligation
between these persons, the remainderman or other person shall make
payment to the life tenant in the exact amount of the exemption.

--- END ---