BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due as provided in this
section for voluntary efforts to mitigate carbon dioxide emissions.
(2) The credit allowed under this section is one dollar for every
ton of carbon emissions certified as mitigated under section 2 of this
act. The total credits granted under this section may not exceed one
million credits per year.
(3) No application is necessary for the tax credit allowed under
this section. The person must keep records for the department to
verify eligibility under this section, including all necessary
certification documentation required under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall generate and maintain, consistent with
section 4 of this act, a list of third party organizations that are
qualified to certify the successful completion of carbon dioxide
mitigation efforts undertaken by businesses or nonprofit organizations
in order to qualify for the tax credit allowed under section 1 of this
act.
(2)(a) Businesses or nonprofit organizations choosing to claim the
tax credit allowed under section 1 of this act must enter into a
business relationship with one of the third party organizations listed
by the department under subsection (1) of this section. The terms of
the relationship may not conflict with this section and must be
determined by the initiating business or nonprofit organization and the
third party organization.
(b) The third party organization shall be responsible for:
(i) Establishing the business or nonprofit organization's baseline
carbon dioxide emissions level;
(ii) Working with the initiating business or nonprofit organization
to establish a carbon dioxide mitigation plan that includes funding for
offset projects meeting the standards for offset projects required by
this section;
(iii) Conducting an emissions audit of the initiating business or
nonprofit organization to assess the business or nonprofit
organization's emitted baseline carbon dioxide equivalents, as that
term is defined in RCW 80.70.010.
(c) The third party organizations shall certify a business or
nonprofit organization if that business or nonprofit organization
satisfies the requirements of this section by either directly funding
and implementing specific mitigation offset projects, or by indirectly
funding mitigation offset projects by providing a monetary contribution
to the carbon dioxide mitigation account created in section 3 of this
act. The contribution amount required by the business or nonprofit
organization shall be established by the third party organization
consistent with this subsection.
(3) The department shall develop minimal standards for carbon
dioxide mitigation offset projects to be undertaken by a business or
nonprofit organization under this section. At a minimum, the standards
must require that all offset projects:
(a) Occur or take place within the state of Washington;
(b) Are in addition to projects that are likely to occur in the
absence of the tax credit allowed under section 1 of this act;
(c) Not include projects, except for project expansions, existing
or undertaken before the tax year in which the tax credit was claimed;
(d) Are not required by any other law or regulation;
(e) Do not claim emissions reductions under any other greenhouse
gas reduction programs; and
(f) Produce quantifiable and measurable results.
(4) The department may audit and inspect all aspects of the
business relationship entered into under this section by the business
or nonprofit organization and the third party organization. The
department may nullify or modify any certification provided by a third
party organization if the department finds that the certification does
not accurately reflect the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The carbon dioxide mitigation account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from businesses or nonprofit organizations
choosing, under section 2 of this act, to indirectly fund carbon
dioxide mitigation offset projects must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may only be used consistent with this
section.
(2) The department shall contract with a third party organization
or organizations to locate, design, and implement carbon dioxide
mitigation projects. Funding for the mitigation projects shall come
from the account created in this section. All projects funded under
this section must comply with the minimum standards for carbon dioxide
mitigation projects adopted by the department under section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To administer section 2 of this act, the department shall
maintain a list of independent qualified organizations with proven
experience in certifying emissions mitigation activities in an
efficient, reliable, and cost-effective manner.
(2) To qualify for inclusion on the list, the department must find
that each organization listed is qualified to certify the successful
completion of carbon dioxide mitigation efforts undertaken by
businesses or nonprofit organizations attempting to qualify for the tax
credit allowed under section 1 of this act. The department may find an
organization qualified if it satisfies the following criteria:
(a) Maintains an open, public process that involves appropriate
stakeholders in criteria or standard development;
(b) Uses transparent standards, criteria, and processes;
(c) Uses a system of data verification and data quality;
(d) Uses a peer review process for developing standards, criteria,
and processes;
(e) Maintains a goal of updating standards or criteria as
technology and scientific knowledge advances;
(f) Retains the authority to inspect the facilities and business
operations of those entities seeking its certification; and
(g) Maintains a cost structure with its clients that ensures their
service is a legitimate option for both small business clients and
large business clients.

--- END ---