BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, a port district formed
under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district formed under Title 57
RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to one
or more retail electric customers in the state.
(2) "Electric utility" means a consumer-owned or investor-owned
utility.
(3) "Greenhouse gases" means carbon dioxide and nitrous oxides as
they relate to electricity generation.
(4) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by investors
that meets the definition of corporation in RCW 80.04.010 and is
engaged in distributing electricity to more than one retail electric
customer in the state.
(5) "Permanently offset" means an emitter of greenhouse gases
making an arrangement with another party whereby the other party
permanently reduces greenhouse gas emissions on behalf of the original
emitter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Beginning August 1, 2007, every
electricity generating plant in the state of Washington using coal
shall begin reducing or permanently offsetting its greenhouse gas
emissions by twenty-five percent per year.
(2) By January 1, 2008, every electricity generating plant in the
state of Washington using coal shall permanently offset its greenhouse
gas emissions by one hundred percent, or completely phase out the use
of coal for electricity.
(3) No electric utility in the state of Washington shall enter into
new long-term contracts to purchase electricity using coal from within
or from outside of the state of Washington.
(4) Contracts in effect on the effective date of this act shall be
honored but not renewed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---