BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.030 and 2005 c 197 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Air contaminant" means dust, fumes, mist, smoke, other
particulate matter, vapor, gas, odorous substance, or any combination
thereof.
(2) "Air pollution" is presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or
more air contaminants in sufficient quantities and of such
characteristics and duration as is, or is likely to be, injurious to
human health, plant or animal life, or property, or which unreasonably
interfere with enjoyment of life and property. For the purpose of this
chapter, air pollution shall not include air contaminants emitted in
compliance with chapter 17.21 RCW.
(3) "Air quality standard" means an established concentration,
exposure time, and frequency of occurrence of an air contaminant or
multiple contaminants in the ambient air which shall not be exceeded.
(4) "Ambient air" means the surrounding outside air.
(5) "Authority" means any air pollution control agency whose
jurisdictional boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of one or
more counties.
(6) "Best available control technology" (BACT) means an emission
limitation based on the maximum degree of reduction for each air
pollutant subject to regulation under this chapter emitted from or that
results from any new or modified stationary source, that the permitting
authority, on a case-by-case basis, taking into account energy,
environmental, and economic impacts and other costs, determines is
achievable for such a source or modification through application of
production processes and available methods, systems, and techniques,
including fuel cleaning, clean fuels, or treatment or innovative fuel
combustion techniques for control of each such a pollutant. In no
event shall application of "best available control technology" result
in emissions of any pollutants that will exceed the emissions allowed
by any applicable standard under 40 C.F.R. Part 60 and Part 61, as they
exist on July 25, 1993, or their later enactments as adopted by
reference by the director by rule. Emissions from any source utilizing
clean fuels, or any other means, to comply with this subsection shall
not be allowed to increase above levels that would have been required
under the definition of BACT as it existed prior to enactment of the
federal clean air act amendments of 1990.
(7) "Best available retrofit technology" (BART) means an emission
limitation based on the degree of reduction achievable through the
application of the best system of continuous emission reduction for
each pollutant that is emitted by an existing stationary facility. The
emission limitation must be established, on a case-by-case basis,
taking into consideration the technology available, the costs of
compliance, the energy and nonair quality environmental impacts of
compliance, any pollution control equipment in use or in existence at
the source, the remaining useful life of the source, and the degree of
improvement in visibility that might reasonably be anticipated to
result from the use of the technology.
(8) "Board" means the board of directors of an authority.
(9) "Carbon dioxide equivalent" has the same meaning assigned to
that term in RCW 80.70.010.
(10) "Control officer" means the air pollution control officer of
any authority.
(((10))) (11) "Department" or "ecology" means the department of
ecology.
(((11))) (12) "Emission" means a release of air contaminants into
the ambient air.
(((12))) (13) "Emission standard" and "emission limitation" mean a
requirement established under the federal clean air act or this chapter
that limits the quantity, rate, or concentration of emissions of air
contaminants on a continuous basis, including any requirement relating
to the operation or maintenance of a source to assure continuous
emission reduction, and any design, equipment, work practice, or
operational standard adopted under the federal clean air act or this
chapter.
(((13))) (14) "Fine particulate" means particulates with a diameter
of two and one-half microns and smaller.
(((14))) (15) "Greenhouse gas" or "greenhouse gases" includes the
following gases: Carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide,
hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, and sulfur hexaflouride.
(16) "Greenhouse gas emissions level" means the total annual
emissions of greenhouse gases in the state expressed in tons of carbon
dioxide equivalents. The term includes all emissions of greenhouse
gases from the generation of electricity delivered to and consumed in
Washington regardless of the state in which the electricity was
originally generated.
(17) "Greenhouse gas emission reduction measures" means programs,
measures, standards, and allowable alternative compliance mechanisms
applicable to sources or categories of sources that are designed to
reduce greenhouse gas emissions.
(18) "Lowest achievable emission rate" (LAER) means for any source
that rate of emissions that reflects:
(a) The most stringent emission limitation that is contained in the
implementation plan of any state for such class or category of source,
unless the owner or operator of the proposed source demonstrates that
such limitations are not achievable; or
(b) The most stringent emission limitation that is achieved in
practice by such class or category of source, whichever is more
stringent.
In no event shall the application of this term permit a proposed
new or modified source to emit any pollutant in excess of the amount
allowable under applicable new source performance standards.
(((15))) (19) "Modification" means any physical change in, or
change in the method of operation of, a stationary source that
increases the amount of any air contaminant emitted by such source or
that results in the emission of any air contaminant not previously
emitted. The term modification shall be construed consistent with the
definition of modification in Section 7411, Title 42, United States
Code, and with rules implementing that section.
(((16))) (20) "Multicounty authority" means an authority which
consists of two or more counties.
(((17))) (21) "New source" means (a) the construction or
modification of a stationary source that increases the amount of any
air contaminant emitted by such source or that results in the emission
of any air contaminant not previously emitted, and (b) any other
project that constitutes a new source under the federal clean air act.
(((18))) (22) "Official act of the legislature" means a bill or
section of a bill passed by a majority of the house of representatives
and senate and not vetoed by the governor.
(23) "Permit program source" means a source required to apply for
or to maintain an operating permit under RCW 70.94.161.
(((19))) (24) "Person" means an individual, firm, public or private
corporation, association, partnership, political subdivision of the
state, municipality, or governmental agency.
(((20))) (25) "Reasonably available control technology" (RACT)
means the lowest emission limit that a particular source or source
category is capable of meeting by the application of control technology
that is reasonably available considering technological and economic
feasibility. RACT is determined on a case-by-case basis for an
individual source or source category taking into account the impact of
the source upon air quality, the availability of additional controls,
the emission reduction to be achieved by additional controls, the
impact of additional controls on air quality, and the capital and
operating costs of the additional controls. RACT requirements for a
source or source category shall be adopted only after notice and
opportunity for comment are afforded.
(((21))) (26) "Silvicultural burning" means burning of wood fiber
on forest land consistent with the provisions of RCW 70.94.660.
(((22))) (27) "Source" means all of the emissions units including
quantifiable fugitive emissions, that are located on one or more
contiguous or adjacent properties, and are under the control of the
same person, or persons under common control, whose activities are
ancillary to the production of a single product or functionally related
group of products.
(((23))) (28) "Stationary source" means any building, structure,
facility, or installation that emits or may emit any air contaminant.
(((24))) (29) "Trigger level" means the ambient level of fine
particulates, measured in micrograms per cubic meter, that must be
detected prior to initiating a first or second stage of impaired air
quality under RCW 70.94.473.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall, by January 1, 2009, adopt a rule that
identifies an estimate as to what the statewide greenhouse gas
emissions level was in the year 1990.
(2) In identifying an estimated emissions level, the department
shall evaluate the best available scientific, technological, and
economic information relating to historic greenhouse gas emissions.
(3) Once adopted, the identified 1990 statewide greenhouse gas
emissions level may not be amended unless the department is directed to
do so by an official act of the legislature. If the department finds
after adopting the 1990 statewide level that advancements in
scientific, technological, or economic information warrants an
amendment to the adopted level, the director of the department shall
formally bring this information forward to the governor and the chairs
of the appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2020, the annual statewide greenhouse gas
emissions level shall be no more than the 1990 estimated level
identified by the department under section 2 of this act.
(2) The department shall adopt rules that are designed to allow the
state to satisfy the annual statewide greenhouse gas emissions level in
a way that uses the maximum technologically feasible and cost-effective
greenhouse gas emission reduction measures.
(3) Any rules adopted under this section may only apply to sources
of greenhouse gas emissions, or categories of sources, whose emissions
are at such a level of significance, as determined by the department,
that their inclusion will enable the department to effectively reduce
greenhouse gas emissions and monitor compliance with the statewide
greenhouse gas emissions limit.
(4) In administering this section, the department shall adopt
temporary rules under section 4 of this act and permanent rules under
section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Consistent with this section and section 3 of this act, the
department shall adopt a series of temporary rules, by June 30, 2008,
designed to allow the state to satisfy the annual statewide greenhouse
gas emissions level identified in section 3 of this act.
(2)(a) Before adopting temporary rules under this section, the
department shall identify and make available to the public a list of
proposed early action greenhouse gas emission reduction measures that
can be implemented before the permanent rules established in section 5
of this act.
(b) The list of proposed early actions must be made available for
public inspection and comment for no less than six months before the
department formally adopts the temporary rules required by this
section.
(c) Temporary rules adopted under this section must be
substantially consistent with the list of proposed early actions
developed by the department.
(3) Temporary rules adopted by the department under this section
shall only remain in effect until the permanent rules developed under
section 5 of this act take effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Consistent with this section and section 3 of this act, the
department shall adopt a series of permanent rules, by June 30, 2011,
designed to allow the state to satisfy the annual statewide greenhouse
gas emissions level identified in section 3 of this act.
(2) Before adopting permanent rules under this section, the
department shall develop a scoping plan as provided in section 6 of
this act.
(3) In adopting permanent rules under this section, the department
shall, to the extent feasible:
(a) Ensure that the rules are substantially consistent with the
terms of the scoping plan adopted under section 6 of this act;
(b) Design the rules, including the distribution of emission
allowances, in a manner that is equitable, seeks to minimize costs and
maximize benefits, and encourages early action to reduce greenhouse gas
emissions;
(c) Ensure that activities undertaken under the rules do not
disproportionally impact low-income communities;
(d) Ensure that entities that have voluntarily reduced their
emissions before the adoption of the permanent rules receive
appropriate credit for their early action;
(e) Ensure that activities undertaken under the permanent rules
complement, and do not interfere with, federal and state efforts to
achieve and maintain ambient air quality standards;
(f) Consider overall societal benefits, including reductions in air
pollutants other than greenhouse gases, diversification of energy
sources, and other benefits to the economy, environment, and public
health;
(g) Minimize the administrative burden of implementing and
complying with the permanent rules; and
(h) Incorporate any appropriate temporary rules adopted under
section 4 of this act.
(4) If the department includes in the permanent rules a market-based compliance mechanism, it must be designed consistent with section
7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop a scoping plan for achieving the
maximum technologically feasible and cost-effective reductions in
greenhouse gas emissions from sources or categories of sources by the
year 2020.
(2) In developing the scoping plan, the department shall consult
with all public agencies with jurisdiction over the sources of
greenhouse gas emissions.
(3) The scoping plan shall identify and make recommendations on
direct emissions reduction measures, alternative compliance mechanisms,
market-based compliance mechanisms, and potential monetary and
nonmonetary incentives for sources and categories of sources.
(4) The department shall ensure that the scoping plan:
(a) Evaluates the total potential costs and total potential
economic and noneconomic benefits of the plan on the state's economy,
environment, and public health;
(b) Takes into account the relative contribution of each source or
source category to statewide greenhouse gas emissions;
(c) Takes into account the potential for adverse effects on small
businesses; and
(d) Recommends a de minimis threshold of greenhouse gas emissions
below which emission reductions requirements will not apply.
(5) Before final approval of the scoping plan, the department shall
conduct a series of public workshops to give all interested parties an
opportunity to comment on the scoping plan.
(6) The department shall update the scoping plan at least once
every five years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may include in the permanent rules adopted under
section 5 of this act a mechanism to allow carbon sources, or
categories of carbon sources, to use market-based compliance mechanisms
in order to achieve the annual statewide greenhouse gas emissions level
established in section 3 of this act.
(2) Any market-based compliance mechanism allowed by the department
must be either:
(a) A system of market-based declining annual aggregate emissions
limitations for sources or categories of sources that emit greenhouse
gases; or
(b) Greenhouse gas emissions exchanges, banking, credits, and other
transactions governed by rule of the department that result in the same
greenhouse gas emission reduction over the same time period as direct
compliance with greenhouse gas emission reduction measures adopted by
the department in permanent rules under section 5 of this act.
(3) Before including market-based compliance mechanisms in the
permanent rules adopted under section 5 of this act, the department
shall:
(a) Consider the potential for direct, indirect, and cumulative
emission impacts from the market-based compliance mechanisms, including
localized impacts in communities that are already adversely impacted by
air pollution; and
(b) Design any market-based compliance mechanisms in a way that
prevent increases in the emission of toxic air contaminants or other
air pollutants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2009, the department shall adopt rules that
require the reporting and verification of statewide greenhouse gas
emissions.
(2) The rules adopted under this section must:
(a) Require the monitoring and annual reporting of greenhouse gas
emissions from greenhouse gas emission sources, beginning with the
sources or categories of sources that contribute the most to statewide
greenhouse gas emissions;
(b) Account for greenhouse gas emissions from all electricity
consumed in the state, as reported by the retail sellers of
electricity;
(c) Ensure consistent accounting of emissions, and provide
reporting tools and formats to ensure collection of necessary data; and
(d) Ensure that greenhouse gas emission sources maintain
comprehensive records of all reported greenhouse gas emissions.
(3) The department shall periodically review and update the
emission reporting rules required by this section.
(4) The department shall review existing and proposed
international, federal, and state greenhouse gas emission reporting
programs when developing or updating the rules required under this
section, and make reasonable efforts to promote consistency among the
programs.

--- END ---