BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An eligible person shall receive an annual sales tax exemption
from the state sales tax in the form of a remittance in accordance with
the terms of this section.
(2) A claim for exemption under this section shall be made and
filed at any time during the year upon forms prescribed and furnished
by the department. The exemption under this section may not be granted
more than once every calendar year. An applicant must file an
application every year to receive the exemption. If the department
finds that the applicant meets the requirements of this section the
department shall issue a check or warrant payable to the eligible
person. The department must determine eligibility under this section
within four weeks from the time an applicant files a claim for
exemption under this section. The remittance shall equal four hundred
fifty dollars. If the department finds that the applicant does not
meet the requirements of this section, the exemption shall be denied,
but is subject to appeal as follows:
(a) The person must first petition for a conference with the
department as provided in RCW 82.32.160.
(b) If the person receives a denial of a petition or unfavorable
notice of determination under (a) of this subsection, the person may
appeal to the board of tax appeals as provided under RCW 82.03.190.
(3) The exemption authorized under this section is not available to
an eligible person if another person residing at the same residence of
the eligible person has received an exemption under this section for
the same calendar year.
(4) The department shall adjust the amount of the exemption under
this section by inflation beginning on January 1, 2009, and every
January 1st thereafter. "Inflation" means the percentage change in the
consumer price index for the United States, western region, for each
fiscal year as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics.
(5) The department may adopt any rules necessary to properly
administer this section.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "eligible person" means a
person who: (a) Is a resident of this state; (b) has a combined
disposable income, as defined in RCW 84.36.383 that is less than
thirty-five thousand dollars; and (c) is at least sixty-five years old
in the year in which a claim for exemption is first filed under this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.03.190 and 1998 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person having received notice of a denial of a petition or a
notice of determination made under RCW 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.34.110,
((or)) 82.49.060, or section 1 of this act may appeal by filing in
accordance with RCW 1.12.070 a notice of appeal with the board of tax
appeals within thirty days after the mailing of the notice of such
denial or determination. In the notice of appeal the taxpayer shall
set forth the amount of the tax which the taxpayer contends should be
reduced or refunded and the reasons for such reduction or refund, in
accordance with rules of practice and procedure prescribed by the
board. However, if the notice of appeal relates to an application made
to the department under chapter 82.34 RCW, the taxpayer shall set forth
the amount to which the taxpayer claims the credit or exemption should
apply, and the grounds for such contention, in accordance with rules of
practice and procedure prescribed by the board. The board shall
transmit a copy of the notice of appeal to the department and all other
named parties within thirty days of its receipt by the board. If the
taxpayer intends that the hearing before the board be held pursuant to
the administrative procedure act (chapter 34.05 RCW), the notice of
appeal shall also so state. In the event that the notice of appeal
does not so state, the department may, within thirty days from the date
of its receipt of the notice of appeal, file with the board notice of
its intention that the hearing be held pursuant to the administrative
procedure act.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.32.160 and 1989 c 378 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person having been issued a notice of additional taxes,
delinquent taxes, interest, or penalties assessed by the department,
may within thirty days after the issuance of the original notice of the
amount thereof or within the period covered by any extension of the due
date thereof granted by the department petition the department in
writing for a correction of the amount of the assessment, and a
conference for examination and review of the assessment. The petition
shall set forth the reasons why the correction should be granted and
the amount of the tax, interest, or penalties, which the petitioner
believes to be due. The department shall promptly consider the
petition and may grant or deny it. If denied, the petitioner shall be
notified by mail thereof forthwith. If a conference is granted, the
department shall fix the time and place therefor and notify the
petitioner thereof by mail. After the conference the department may
make such determination as may appear to it to be just and lawful and
shall mail a copy of its determination to the petitioner. If no such
petition is filed within the thirty-day period the assessment covered
by the notice shall become final.
(2) The procedures provided for ((herein)) in subsection (1) of
this section shall apply also to:
(a) A notice denying, in whole or in part, an application for a
pollution control tax exemption and credit certificate, with such
modifications to such procedures established by departmental rules and
regulations as may be necessary to accommodate a claim for exemption or
credit;
(b) A determination that an applicant is not eligible for the
remittance under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---