BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
operating a moving motor vehicle while reading, manually writing, or
sending a text message on an electronic wireless communications device
is guilty of a traffic infraction.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a person
operating:
(a) An authorized emergency vehicle;
(b) A moving motor vehicle who is also operating an amateur radio
and who holds a current, valid amateur radio station license issued by
the federal communications commission; or
(c) A moving motor vehicle while using an electronic wireless
communications device to:
(i) Report illegal activity;
(ii) Summon medical or other emergency help; or
(iii) Prevent injury to a person or property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---