BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may not sell, offer for sale, purchase, use, or offer
for use an alcohol vaporizing device.
(2) In addition to any other penalties that may apply by rule, a
violation of this section is punishable under RCW 66.44.180.
(3) This section does not apply to vaporizing devices used for
medical or scientific research purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.04.010 and 2006 c 225 s 1 and 2006 c 101 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated
oxide of ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the
fermentation or distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or
other substances including all dilutions and mixtures of this
substance. The term "alcohol" does not include alcohol in the
possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described
in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel
for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements
of husbandry.
(2) "Alcohol vaporizing device" means any mechanical or electrical
apparatus that mixes liquor or other alcohol product with oxygen or
other gas to produce a vapor or mist for the purpose of inhaling.
(3) "Authorized representative" means a person who:
(a) Is required to have a federal basic permit issued pursuant to
the federal alcohol administration act, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 204;
(b) Has its business located in the United States outside of the
state of Washington;
(c) Acquires ownership of beer or wine for transportation into and
resale in the state of Washington; and which beer or wine is produced
anywhere outside Washington by a brewery or winery which does not hold
a certificate of approval issued by the board; and
(d) Is appointed by the brewery or winery referenced in (c) of this
subsection as its exclusive authorized representative for marketing and
selling its products within the United States in accordance with a
written agreement between the authorized representative and such
brewery or winery pursuant to this title. The board may waive the
requirement for the written agreement of exclusivity in situations
consistent with the normal marketing practices of certain products,
such as classified growths.
(((3))) (4) "Beer" means any malt beverage, flavored malt beverage,
or malt liquor as these terms are defined in this chapter.
(((4))) (5) "Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a
domestic brewery, microbrewery, beer certificate of approval holder, or
beer importers, or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source
outside of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same
pursuant to this title, or who represents such brewer or brewery as
agent.
(((5))) (6) "Beer importer" means a person or business within
Washington who purchases beer from a beer certificate of approval
holder or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of
the United States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this
title.
(((6))) (7) "Brewer" or "brewery" means any person engaged in the
business of manufacturing beer and malt liquor. Brewer includes a
brand owner of malt beverages who holds a brewer's notice with the
federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location outside
the state and whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed
in-state brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a
domestic brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to
licensed beer distributors, and exporting beer from the state.
(((7))) (8) "Board" means the liquor control board, constituted
under this title.
(((8))) (9) "Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated
or unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent,
educational, athletic or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.
(((9))) (10) "Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use,
whether by drinking or otherwise.
(((10))) (11) "Contract liquor store" means a business that sells
liquor on behalf of the board through a contract with a contract liquor
store manager.
(((11))) (12) "Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and
regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within
the state pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.
(((12))) (13) "Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of
distilling spirits.
(((13))) (14) "Domestic brewery" means a place where beer and malt
liquor are manufactured or produced by a brewer within the state.
(((14))) (15) "Domestic winery" means a place where wines are
manufactured or produced within the state of Washington.
(((15))) (16) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid
certificate and is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly
engaged in carrying on the business of pharmaceutical chemistry
pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW.
(((16))) (17) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business
is, the sale of drugs, medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and
maintains a regular prescription department and employs a registered
pharmacist during all hours the drug store is open.
(((17))) (18) "Employee" means any person employed by the board.
(((18))) (19) "Flavored malt beverage" means:
(a) A malt beverage containing six percent or less alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than forty-nine
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content; or
(b) A malt beverage containing more than six percent alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than one and one-half
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content.
(((19))) (20) "Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'
(((20))) (21) "Hotel" means every building or other structure kept,
used, maintained, advertised or held out to the public to be a place
where food is served and sleeping accommodations are offered for pay to
transient guests, in which twenty or more rooms are used for the
sleeping accommodation of such transient guests and having one or more
dining rooms where meals are served to such transient guests, such
sleeping accommodations and dining rooms being conducted in the same
building and buildings, in connection therewith, and such structure or
structures being provided, in the judgment of the board, with adequate
and sanitary kitchen and dining room equipment and capacity, for
preparing, cooking and serving suitable food for its guests: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That in cities and towns of less than five thousand
population, the board shall have authority to waive the provisions
requiring twenty or more rooms.
(((21))) (22) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits
from a distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such
spirituous liquor into the state for sale to the board or for export.
(((22))) (23) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.
(((23))) (24) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein
defined (alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented,
spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed
liquor, a part of which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt
liquor, or otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or
semisolid or other substance, patented or not, containing alcohol,
spirits, wine or beer, and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all
preparations or mixtures capable of human consumption, and any liquid,
semisolid, solid, or other substance, which contains more than one
percent of alcohol by weight shall be conclusively deemed to be
intoxicating. Liquor does not include confections or food products
that contain one percent or less of alcohol by weight.
(((24))) (25) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the
preparation of liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.
(((25))) (26) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage
such as beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the
alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or
pure extract of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or
cereal in pure water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol
by weight, and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by
volume. For the purposes of this title, any such beverage containing
more than eight percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as
"strong beer."
(((26))) (27) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for
holding liquor.
(((27))) (28) "Passenger vessel" means any boat, ship, vessel,
barge, or other floating craft of any kind carrying passengers for
compensation.
(((28))) (29) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor
under this title.
(((29))) (30) "Person" means an individual, copartnership,
association, or corporation.
(((30))) (31) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and
regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within
the state pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.
(((31))) (32) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a
physician and given by him to a patient for the obtaining of liquor
pursuant to this title for medicinal purposes.
(((32))) (33) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of
incorporated cities and towns; state or county or township highways or
roads; buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance
halls and grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where
beer may be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public
buildings, public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of
hotels, restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations
which are open to and are generally used by the public and to which the
public is permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains,
stages, and other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and
the depots and waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are
open to unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned
bathing beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of
like or similar nature to which the general public has unrestricted
right of access, and which are generally used by the public.
(((33))) (34) "Regulations" means regulations made by the board
under the powers conferred by this title.
(((34))) (35) "Restaurant" means any establishment provided with
special space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment,
food, without lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not
including drug stores and soda fountains.
(((35))) (36) "Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and
traffic; and also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by
any means whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as
beer or by any name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed
liquor or of wine, by any person to any person; and also include a sale
or selling within the state to a foreign consignee or his agent in the
state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no charge,
of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the board
to a person not licensed by the board, for personal use only. "Sale"
and "sell" also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW
9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That the nonprofit organization conducting the
raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the board.
(((36))) (37) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped
with apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed
or otherwise.
(((37))) (38) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol
obtained by distillation, except flavored malt beverages, but including
wines exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume.
(((38))) (39) "Store" means a state liquor store established under
this title.
(((39))) (40) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space
and accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the
premises, of beer, as herein defined.
(((40))) (41) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for
the manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.
(((41))) (42)(a) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by
fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other
agricultural product containing sugar, to which any saccharine
substances may have been added before, during or after fermentation,
and containing not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume,
including sweet wines fortified with wine spirits, such as port,
sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four percent of
alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol
by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more
than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by
the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage
containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume
when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as
"fortified wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (i)
Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years
or more; and (ii) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol
by volume solely as a result of the natural fermentation process and
that have not been produced with the addition of wine spirits, brandy,
or alcohol.
(b) This subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any
wine be labeled with the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."
(((42))) (43) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from
a domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, or wine
importer, or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same not in
violation of this title, or who represents such vintner or winery as
agent.
(((43))) (44) "Wine importer" means a person or business within
Washington who purchases wine from a wine certificate of approval
holder or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of
the United States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this
title.

--- END ---