BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.100 and 1997 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Upon all roadways of sufficient width)) A vehicle shall be
driven upon the right half of the roadway in the furthest most right-hand lane of travel, except as follows:
(a) When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the
same direction under the rules governing such movement;
(b) When an obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the
left of the center of the highway; provided, any person so doing shall
yield the right of way to all vehicles traveling in the proper
direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within such
distance as to constitute an immediate hazard; or
(c) ((Upon a roadway divided into three marked lanes and providing
for two-way movement traffic under the rules applicable thereon; or
(d))) Upon a street or highway restricted to one-way traffic.
(2) Upon all roadways having two or more lanes for traffic moving
in the same direction, ((all)) a vehicle((s)) shall be driven in the
right-hand lane ((then available for traffic,)) except (a) when
overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same
direction((, (b) when traveling at a speed greater than the traffic
flow, (c) when moving left to allow traffic to merge, or (d))) or (b)
when preparing for a left turn at an intersection, exit, or into a
private road or driveway when ((such)) the left turn is legally
permitted. On any such roadway, a vehicle or combination over ten
thousand pounds shall be driven only in the right-hand lane except
under the conditions enumerated in (a) ((through (d))) and (b) of this
subsection.
(3) No vehicle towing a trailer or no vehicle or combination over
ten thousand pounds may be driven in the left-hand lane of a limited
access roadway having three or more lanes for traffic moving in one
direction except when preparing for a left turn at an intersection,
exit, or into a private road or driveway when a left turn is legally
permitted. This subsection does not apply to a vehicle using a high-occupancy vehicle lane. A high-occupancy vehicle lane is not
considered the left-hand lane of a roadway. The department of
transportation, in consultation with the Washington state patrol, shall
adopt rules specifying (a) those circumstances where it is permissible
for other vehicles to use the left lane in case of emergency or to
facilitate the orderly flow of traffic, and (b) those segments of
limited access roadway to be exempt from this subsection due to the
operational characteristics of the roadway.
(4) It is a traffic infraction to drive continuously in the left
lane ((of a multilane roadway when it impedes the flow of other
traffic)).
(5) Upon any roadway having four or more lanes for moving traffic
and providing for two-way movement of traffic, a vehicle shall not be
driven to the left of the center line of the roadway except when
authorized by official traffic control devices designating certain
lanes to the left side of the center of the roadway for use by traffic
not otherwise permitted to use such lanes, or except as permitted under
subsection (1)(b) of this section. However, this subsection shall not
be construed as prohibiting the crossing of the center line in making
a left turn into or from an alley, private road or driveway.

--- END ---