BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.24.025 and 2006 c 333 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a
short-term severe crisis episode of:
(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case
of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the
case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
or
(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW
71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.
(2) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose
of providing community mental health programs, federal funds, except
those provided according to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and
state funds appropriated under this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW by the
legislature during any biennium for the purpose of providing
residential services, resource management services, community support
services, and other mental health services. This does not include
funds appropriated for the purpose of operating and administering the
state psychiatric hospitals.
(3) "Child" means a person under the age of eighteen years.
(4) "Chronically mentally ill adult" or "adult who is chronically
mentally ill" means an adult who has a mental disorder and meets at
least one of the following criteria:
(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a
mental disorder within the preceding two years; or
(b) Has experienced a continuous psychiatric hospitalization or
residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the
preceding year; or
(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity
by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous
period of not less than twelve months. "Substantial gainful activity"
shall be defined by the department by rule consistent with Public Law
92-603, as amended.
(5) "Clubhouse" means a community-based program that provides
rehabilitation services and is certified by the international center
for clubhouse development.
(6) "Community mental health program" means all mental health
services, activities, or programs using available resources.
(((6))) (7) "Community mental health service delivery system" means
public or private agencies that provide services specifically to
persons with mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and
receive funding from public sources.
(((7))) (8) "Community support services" means services authorized,
planned, and coordinated through resource management services
including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis
intervention available twenty-four hours, seven days a week,
prescreening determinations for persons who are mentally ill
((persons)) being considered for placement in nursing homes as required
by federal law, screening for patients being considered for admission
to residential services, diagnosis and treatment for children who are
acutely mentally ill ((and)) or severely emotionally disturbed
((children)) discovered under screening through the federal Title XIX
early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program,
investigation, legal, and other nonresidential services under chapter
71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric treatment including
medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy, assuring transfer of
relevant patient information between service providers, recovery
services, and other services determined by regional support networks.
(((8))) (9) "Consensus-based" means a program or practice that has
general support among treatment providers and experts, based on
experience or professional literature, and may have anecdotal or case
study support, or that is agreed but not possible to perform studies
with random assignment and controlled groups.
(((9))) (10) "County authority" means the board of county
commissioners, county council, or county executive having authority to
establish a community mental health program, or two or more of the
county authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into
an agreement to provide a community mental health program.
(((10))) (11) "Department" means the department of social and
health services.
(((11))) (12) "Designated mental health professional" means a
mental health professional designated by the county or other authority
authorized in rule to perform the duties specified in this chapter.
(((12))) (13) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice"
means a practice that presents, based on preliminary information,
potential for becoming a research-based or consensus-based practice.
(((13))) (14) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has
had multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous
populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for
the population.
(((14))) (15) "Licensed service provider" means an entity licensed
according to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW or an entity deemed to
meet state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a
recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a
current agreement with the department, that meets state minimum
standards or persons licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.71, 18.83, or
18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered
nurse practitioners.
(((15))) (16) "Long-term inpatient care" means inpatient services
for persons committed for, or voluntarily receiving intensive treatment
for, periods of ninety days or greater under chapter 71.05 RCW. "Long-term inpatient care" as used in this chapter does not include: (a)
Services for individuals committed under chapter 71.05 RCW who are
receiving services pursuant to a conditional release or a court-ordered
less restrictive alternative to detention; or (b) services for
individuals voluntarily receiving less restrictive alternative
treatment on the grounds of the state hospital.
(((16))) (17) "Mental health services" means all services provided
by regional support networks and other services provided by the state
for ((the)) persons who are mentally ill.
(((17))) (18) "Mentally ill persons," "persons who are mentally
ill," and "the mentally ill" mean persons and conditions defined in
subsections (1), (4), (((26))) (27), and (((27))) (28) of this section.
(((18))) (19) "Recovery" means the process in which people are able
to live, work, learn, and participate fully in their communities.
(((19))) (20) "Regional support network" means a county authority
or group of county authorities or other nonprofit entity recognized by
the secretary in contract in a defined region.
(((20))) (21) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness.
(((21))) (22) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has
some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet
the standard of evidence-based practices.
(((22))) (23) "Residential services" means a complete range of
residences and supports authorized by resource management services and
which may involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services
which support community living, for persons who are acutely mentally
ill ((persons)), adults who are chronically mentally ill ((adults)),
children who are severely emotionally disturbed ((children)), or adults
who are seriously disturbed ((adults)) and determined by the regional
support network to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically
mentally ill. The services shall include at least evaluation and
treatment services as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, acute crisis
respite care, long-term adaptive and rehabilitative care, and
supervised and supported living services, and shall also include any
residential services developed to service persons who are mentally ill
((persons)) in nursing homes, boarding homes, and adult family homes,
and may include outpatient services provided as an element in a package
of services in a supported housing model. Residential services for
children in out-of-home placements related to their mental disorder
shall not include the costs of food and shelter, except for children's
long-term residential facilities existing prior to January 1, 1991.
(((23))) (24) "Resilience" means the personal and community
qualities that enable individuals to rebound from adversity, trauma,
tragedy, threats, or other stresses, and to live productive lives.
(((24))) (25) "Resource management services" mean the planning,
coordination, and authorization of residential services and community
support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan
for: (a) Adults and children who are acutely mentally ill ((adults and
children)); (b) adults who are chronically mentally ill ((adults)); (c)
children who are severely emotionally disturbed ((children)); or (d)
adults who are seriously disturbed ((adults)) and determined solely by
a regional support network to be at risk of becoming acutely or
chronically mentally ill. Such planning, coordination, and
authorization shall include mental health screening for children
eligible under the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening,
diagnosis, and treatment program. Resource management services include
seven day a week, twenty-four hour a day availability of information
regarding ((mentally ill adults' and children's)) enrollment of adults
and children who are mentally ill in services and their individual
service plan to designated mental health professionals, evaluation and
treatment facilities, and others as determined by the regional support
network.
(((25))) (26) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services.
(((26))) (27) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:
(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to
himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result
of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;
(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less
restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two
years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental
health hospital;
(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several
areas of daily living;
(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or
(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as
defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which
is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school
or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality
development and learning.
(((27))) (28) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" or "child who
is severely emotionally disturbed" means a child who has been
determined by the regional support network to be experiencing a mental
disorder as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, including those mental
disorders that result in a behavioral or conduct disorder, that is
clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or
with peers and who meets at least one of the following criteria:
(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the
home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;
(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW
within the last two years;
(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special
education, or developmental disabilities;
(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:
(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a caretaker who is
mentally ill or inadequate ((caretaker));
(ii) Changes in custodial adult;
(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement
outside of the home, for example, psychiatric hospital, short-term
inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a
correctional facility;
(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;
(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or
(vi) Homelessness.
(((28))) (29) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements
established by rules adopted by the secretary and necessary to
implement this chapter for: (a) Delivery of mental health services;
(b) licensed service providers for the provision of mental health
services; (c) residential services; and (d) community support services
and resource management services.
(((29))) (30) "Treatment records" include registration and all
other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the
department, by regional support networks and their staffs, and by
treatment facilities. Treatment records do not include notes or
records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment
services for the department, regional support networks, or a treatment
facility if the notes or records are not available to others.
(((30))) (31) "Tribal authority," for the purposes of this section
and RCW 71.24.300 only, means: The federally recognized Indian tribes
and the major Indian organizations recognized by the secretary insofar
as these organizations do not have a financial relationship with any
regional support network that would present a conflict of interest.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.24.037 and 2001 c 323 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall by rule establish state minimum standards
for licensed service providers and services.
(2) Minimum standards for licensed service providers shall, at a
minimum, establish: Qualifications for staff providing services
directly to ((mentally ill)) persons who are mentally ill, the intended
result of each service, and the rights and responsibilities of persons
receiving mental health services pursuant to this chapter. The
secretary shall provide for deeming of licensed service providers as
meeting state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a
recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a
current agreement with the department.
(3) Minimum standards for community support services and resource
management services shall include at least qualifications for resource
management services, client tracking systems, and the transfer of
patient information between service providers.
(4) Minimum standards for clubhouses shall include certification by
the international center for clubhouse development. A clubhouse that
has completed all requirements for certification but is awaiting formal
review shall be deemed to have met the minimum standards.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.19.010 and 2000 c 94 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Health care setting" means:
(a) Hospitals as defined in RCW 70.41.020;
(b) Home health, hospice, and home care agencies under chapter
70.127 RCW, subject to RCW 49.19.070;
(c) Evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in RCW
71.05.020(((12))); and
(d) Community mental health programs as defined in RCW
71.24.025(((5))).
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Employee" means an employee as defined in RCW 49.17.020.
(4) "Violence" or "violent act" means any physical assault or
verbal threat of physical assault against an employee of a health care
setting.

--- END ---