BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An office of investigative assistance is created in the
Washington state patrol, which shall be under the direction of the
chief of the Washington state patrol.
(2) The office of investigative assistance shall investigate cyber
crimes, identity theft, drug trafficking law violations, organized
crime activity, gang-related criminal activity, and missing and
exploited children. The office of investigative assistance shall
direct the use of computer forensics, laboratory forensics, drug
control, and special weapons and tactics by the Washington state
patrol.
(3) The office of investigative assistance shall be organized at
the discretion of the chief of the Washington state patrol. In
addition to any newly created units by the chief of the Washington
state patrol, the office of investigative assistance shall be comprised
of the organized crime intelligence unit, RCW 43.43.850, the drug
control assistance unit, RCW 43.43.600, the special narcotics
enforcement unit, RCW 43.43.655, the bureau of forensic laboratory
services, RCW 43.43.670, and the missing children clearinghouse, RCW
43.43.870.
(4) The office of investigative assistance will assist local
jurisdictions in the investigation of crimes described in subsection
(2) of this section that cross existing jurisdictional lines or that
require specialized technical skills.

--- END ---