BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.95.003 and 1997 c 350 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall consist of a chairman and ((two)) four other
members, each of whom shall be appointed by the governor with the
consent of the senate. Each member shall hold office for a term of
five years, and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.
The terms shall expire on April 15th of the expiration year. Vacancies
in the membership of the board shall be filled by appointment by the
governor with the consent of the senate. In the event of the inability
of any member to act, the governor shall appoint some competent person
to act in his stead during the continuance of such inability. The
members shall not be removable during their respective terms except for
cause determined by the superior court of Thurston county. The
governor in appointing the members shall designate one of them to serve
as chairman at the governor's pleasure. The appointed chairman shall
serve as a fully participating board member and as the director of the
agency.
The members of the board and its officers and employees shall not
engage in any other business or profession or hold any other public
office without the prior approval of the executive ethics board
indicating compliance with RCW 42.52.020, 42.52.030, 42.52.040 and
42.52.120; nor shall they, at the time of appointment or employment or
during their incumbency, serve as the representative of any political
party on an executive committee or other governing body thereof, or as
an executive officer or employee of any political committee or
association. The members of the board shall each severally receive
salaries fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW
43.03.040, and in addition shall receive travel expenses incurred in
the discharge of their official duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
The board may employ, and fix, with the approval of the governor,
the compensation of and prescribe the duties of ((a secretary)) an
executive director and such officers, employees, and assistants as may
be necessary, and provide necessary quarters, supplies, and equipment.

--- END ---