BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.92.060 and 2005 c 93 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In awarding need grants, the board shall proceed substantially as
follows: PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall be construed to
prevent the board, in the exercise of its sound discretion, from
following another procedure when the best interest of the program so
dictates:
(1) The board shall annually select the financial aid award
recipients from among Washington residents applying for student
financial aid who have been ranked according to:
(a) Financial need as determined by the amount of the family
contribution; and
(b) Other considerations, such as whether the student is a former
foster youth.
(2) The financial need of the highest ranked students shall be met
by grants depending upon the evaluation of financial need until the
total allocation has been disbursed. Funds from grants which are
declined, forfeited or otherwise unused shall be reawarded until
disbursed, except that eligible former foster youth shall be assured
receipt of a grant.
(3) A student shall be eligible to receive a state need grant for
up to five years, or the credit or clock hour equivalent of five years,
or up to one hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of
time of the student's program. A student may not start a new associate
degree program as a state need grant recipient until at least five
years have elapsed since earning an associate degree as a need grant
recipient, except that a student may earn two associate degrees
concurrently. Qualifications for renewal will include maintaining
satisfactory academic progress toward completion of an eligible program
as determined by the board. Should the recipient terminate his or her
enrollment for any reason during the academic year, the unused portion
of the grant shall be returned to the state educational grant fund by
the institution according to the institution's own policy for issuing
refunds, except as provided in RCW 28B.92.070.
(4) ((In computing financial need, the board shall determine a
maximum student expense budget allowance, not to exceed an amount equal
to the total maximum student expense budget at the public institutions
plus the current average state appropriation per student for operating
expense in the public institutions.
(5))) The state need grant award for an individual student shall be
the base grant, appropriate for the educational sector attended, and a
dependent care allowance, if applicable, adjusted for the student's
family income and rate of enrollment.
(5) The maximum base grant for students shall:
(a) Be established based on the representative average resident
tuition, service, and activity fees charged within each public sector
of higher education. The average is to be determined annually by the
higher education coordinating board. The amount of the base grant may
be less than the actual average if the higher education coordinating
board finds it necessary to be able to serve the expected number of
eligible students;
(b) Not exceed the actual tuition and fees charged to the eligible
student; and
(c) Be the same for students attending private four-year
institutions of higher education and students attending the public
four-year research universities. The base grant for students attending
private vocational institutions shall be the same as students attending
the public community and technical colleges.
(6)(a) For full-time students, the amount of the state need grant
shall be as follows:
(i) Students with family incomes less than or equal to fifty
percent of the state's median family income shall receive the maximum
award;
(ii) Students whose incomes are greater than fifty percent, but
less than or equal to sixty-five percent, of the state's median family
income shall receive seventy-five percent of the maximum award;
(iii) Students whose incomes are greater than sixty-five percent,
but less than or equal to seventy-five percent, of the state's median
family income shall receive fifty percent of the maximum award;
(iv) Students whose incomes are greater than seventy-five percent,
but less than or equal to eighty-five percent, of the state's median
family income shall receive twenty-five percent of the maximum award;
and
(v) Each eligible grant recipient must receive the maximum grant
award for which he or she is eligible, unless the award would exceed
the student's overall need or the institution's approved gift equity
packaging policy.
(b) Students attending less than full time shall have their grants
prorated based on attendance.
(7) As used in this section, "former foster youth" means a person
who is at least eighteen years of age, but not more than twenty-four
years of age, who was a dependent of the department of social and
health services at the time he or she attained the age of eighteen.

--- END ---