BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.590 and 2006 c 81 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The boards of regents of the state universities and the boards
of trustees of the regional universities ((and)), The Evergreen State
College, and the community college districts, in collaboration with
affiliated bookstores and student and faculty representatives, shall
adopt rules requiring that:
(a) Affiliated bookstores:
(i) Provide students the option of purchasing materials that are
unbundled when possible, disclose to faculty and staff the costs to
students of purchasing materials, and disclose publicly how new
editions vary from previous editions;
(ii) Actively promote and publicize book buy-back programs; and
(iii) Disclose retail costs for course materials on a per course
basis to faculty and staff and make this information publicly
available; and
(b) Faculty and staff members consider the least costly practices
in assigning course materials, such as adopting the least expensive
edition available when educational content is comparable as determined
by the faculty and working closely with publishers and local bookstores
to create bundles and packages if they deliver cost savings to
students.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Materials" means any supplies or texts required or recommended
by faculty or staff for a given course.
(b) "Bundled" means a group of objects joined together by packaging
or required to be purchased as an indivisible unit.

--- END ---