BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.106 and 2004 c 271 s 127 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the consolidated ballot format is used, the major political
party identification check-off box must appear on the primary ballot
before all offices and ballot measures. Clear and concise instructions
to the voter must be prominently displayed immediately before the list
of major political parties, and must include:
(a) A question asking the voter to indicate the major political
party with which the voter chooses to affiliate;
(b) A statement that, for a major political party candidate, only
votes cast by voters who choose to affiliate with that same major
political party will be tabulated and reported;
(c) A statement that votes cast for a major political party
candidate by a voter who chooses to affiliate with a different major
political party will not be tabulated or reported;
(d) A statement that votes cast for a major political party
candidate by a voter who fails to select a major political party
affiliation will ((not)) be tabulated ((or)) and reported only if
candidates for the same major political party were voted throughout the
ballot;
(e) A statement that votes cast for a major political party
candidate by a voter who selects more than one major political party
with which to affiliate will not be tabulated or reported; and
(f) A statement that the party identification option will not
affect votes cast for candidates for nonpartisan offices, or for or
against ballot measures.
(2) If the physically separate ballot format is used, clear and
concise instructions to the voter must be prominently displayed, and
must include:
(a) A statement explaining that only one party ballot and one
nonpartisan ballot may be voted;
(b) A statement explaining that if more than one party ballot is
voted, none of the party ballots will be tabulated or reported;
(c) A statement explaining that a voter's affiliation with a major
political party will be inferred from the act of voting the party
ballot for that major political party; and
(d) A statement explaining that every eligible registered voter may
vote a nonpartisan ballot, regardless of any party affiliation on the
part of the voter.

--- END ---