BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Teaching first peoples' languages, cultures, and history is a
critical factor in successful educational experiences and promoting
cultural sensitivity for all students. Experience shows such teaching
dramatically raises student achievement. The effect is particularly
strong for Native American students;
(2) Native American students have the highest high school dropout
rate among all groups of students. Less than one-fourth of Native
American students in the class of 2008 are on track to graduate based
on the results of the Washington assessment of student learning.
Positive and supportive educational experiences are critical for Native
American students' success;
(3) The sole expertise of sovereign tribal governments whose
traditional lands and territories lie within the borders of the state
of Washington in the transmission of their indigenous languages,
heritage, cultural knowledge, histories, customs, and traditions should
be honored;
(4) Government-to-government collaboration between the state and
the sovereign tribal governments whose traditional lands and
territories lie within the borders of the state of Washington serves to
implement the spirit of the 1989 centennial accord and other similar
government-to-government agreements, including the 2004 accord between
the federally recognized Indian tribes with treaty reserved rights in
Washington state and the state of Washington;
(5) Establishing a first peoples' language, culture, and history
teacher certification program both achieves educational objectives and
models effective government-to-government relationships;
(6) Establishing a first peoples' language, culture, and history
certification program implements the following policy objectives of
P.L. 101-477, the federal Native American languages act of 1990, in a
tangible way:
(a) To preserve, protect, and promote the rights and freedom of
Native Americans to use, practice, and develop Native American
languages;
(b) To allow exceptions to teacher certification requirements for
federal programs and programs funded in whole or in part by the federal
government, for instruction in Native American languages when such
teacher certification requirements hinder the employment of qualified
teachers who teach in Native American languages, and to encourage state
and territorial governments to make similar exceptions;
(c) To encourage and support the use of Native American languages
as a medium of instruction in order to encourage and support Native
American language survival, educational opportunity, increased student
success and performance, increased student awareness and knowledge of
their culture and history, and increased student and community pride;
(d) To encourage state and local education programs to work with
Native American parents, educators, Indian tribes, and other Native
American governing bodies in the implementation of programs to put this
policy into effect; and
(e) To encourage all institutions of elementary, secondary, and
higher education, where appropriate, to include Native American
languages in the curriculum in the same manner as foreign languages and
to grant proficiency in Native American languages the same full
academic credit as proficiency in foreign languages;
(7) Establishing a first peoples' language, culture, and history
certification program is consistent with the intent of presidential
executive order number 13336 from 2004, entitled "American Indian and
Alaska native education," to assist students in meeting the challenging
student academic standards of P.L. 107-110, the no child left behind
act of 2001, in a manner that is consistent with tribal traditions,
languages, and cultures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state first peoples' language, culture, and
history teacher certification program is established. The professional
educator standards board shall adopt rules to implement the program in
collaboration with the sovereign tribal governments whose traditional
lands and territories lie within the borders of the state of
Washington, including the tribal leader congress on education and the
first peoples' language and culture committee. The collaboration
required under this section shall be defined by a protocol for
cogovernance in first peoples' language, culture, and history education
developed by the professional educator standards board, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, and the sovereign tribal
governments whose traditional lands and territories lie within the
borders of the state of Washington.
(2) Any sovereign tribal government whose traditional lands and
territories lie within the borders of the state of Washington may
participate individually on a government-to-government basis in the
program.
(3) Under the first peoples' language, culture, and history teacher
certification program:
(a) Only a participating sovereign tribal government may certify
individuals who meet the tribe's criteria for certification as a
teacher in the Washington state first peoples' language, culture, and
history program. Before certification of the individual, the
participating sovereign tribal government may conduct a background
check through the tribal police departments within Washington state to
determine, to the extent possible, whether the individual has been
convicted of any crimes that may otherwise disqualify the person from
being awarded a teacher certificate and provide this information to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall not authorize or accept a
certificate or endorsement in Washington state first peoples' language,
culture, and history without certification from a participating
sovereign tribal government and without conducting a record check of an
individual applying for certification as required under RCW
28A.410.010;
(b) For each teacher to be certified in the program, the
participating sovereign tribal government shall submit information and
documentation necessary for the issuance of a state certificate, as
defined by rule, to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction;
(c) A Washington state first peoples' language, culture, and
history teacher certificate serves as a subject area endorsement in
first peoples' language, culture, and history. The holder of a
Washington state first peoples' language, culture, and history teacher
certificate who does not also hold an initial, residency, continuing,
or professional teaching certificate authorized by the professional
educator standards board may be assigned to teach only the languages,
cultures, and histories designated on the certificate and no other
subject;
(d) In order to teach first peoples' language, culture, and
history, teachers must hold certificates from both the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the sovereign tribal
government; and
(e) The holder of a Washington state first peoples' language,
culture, and history teacher certificate meets Washington state's
definition of a highly qualified teacher under P.L. 107-110, the no
child left behind act of 2001, for the purposes of teaching first
peoples' language, culture, and history, subject to approval by the
United States department of education.
(4) First peoples' language/culture teacher certificates issued
under rules approved by the state board of education or the
professional educator standards board under a pilot program before the
effective date of this section remain valid as certificates under this
section, subject to the provisions of this chapter.
(5) Schools and school districts on or near tribal reservations are
encouraged to contract with sovereign tribal governments whose
traditional lands and territories lie within the borders of the state
of Washington and first peoples' language, culture, and history
certification programs for in-service teacher training and continuing
education in the culture and history appropriate for their geographic
area, as well as suggested pedagogy and instructional strategies.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.415.020 and 2006 c 263 s 808 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Certificated personnel shall receive for each ten clock hours
of approved in-service training attended the equivalent of a one credit
college quarter course on the salary schedule developed by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.
(2) Certificated personnel shall receive for each ten clock hours
of approved continuing education earned, as continuing education is
defined by rule adopted by the professional educator standards board,
the equivalent of a one credit college quarter course on the salary
schedule developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.
(3) Certificated personnel shall receive for each forty clock hours
of participation in an approved internship with a business, an
industry, or government, as an internship is defined by rule of the
professional educator standards board in accordance with RCW
28A.415.025, the equivalent of a one credit college quarter course on
the salary schedule developed by the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee.
(4) An approved in-service training program shall be a program
approved by a school district board of directors, which meet standards
adopted by the professional educator standards board, and the
development of said program has been participated in by an in-service
training task force whose membership is the same as provided under RCW
28A.415.040, or a program offered by an education agency approved to
provide in-service for the purposes of continuing education as provided
for under rules adopted by the professional educator standards board,
or both.
(5) Clock hours eligible for application to the salary schedule
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee as described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
shall be those hours acquired after August 31, 1987. Clock hours
eligible for application to the salary schedule as described in
subsection (3) of this section shall be those hours acquired after
December 31, 1995.
(6) In-service training or continuing education in first peoples'
language, culture, or history provided by a sovereign tribal government
participating in the Washington state first peoples' language, culture,
and history program authorized under section 2 of this act shall be
considered approved in-service training or approved continuing
education under this section and RCW 28A.415.023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act may be known and cited as the
"First peoples' language/culture/history teacher certification act:
Honoring our ancestors."

--- END ---