BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.92.020 and 2003 c 394 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city or town may construct, condemn and purchase, purchase,
acquire, add to, alter, maintain, and operate systems, plants, sites,
or other facilities of sewerage as defined in RCW 35.67.010, or solid
waste handling as defined by RCW 70.95.030. A city or town shall have
full authority to manage, regulate, operate, control, and, except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, to fix the price of service
and facilities of those systems, plants, sites, or other facilities
within and without the limits of the city or town.
(2)(a) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the rates charged
shall be uniform for the same class of customers or service and
facilities. In classifying customers served or service and facilities
furnished by a system or systems of sewerage, the legislative authority
of the city or town may in its discretion consider any or all of the
following factors:
(((a))) (i) The difference in cost of service and facilities to
customers;
(((b))) (ii) The location of customers within and without the city
or town;
(((c))) (iii) The difference in cost of maintenance, operation,
repair, and replacement of the parts of the system;
(((d))) (iv) The different character of the service and facilities
furnished to customers;
(((e))) (v) The quantity and quality of the sewage delivered and
the time of its delivery;
(((f))) (vi) Capital contributions made to the systems, plants,
sites, or other facilities, including but not limited to, assessments;
(((g))) (vii) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in
RCW 24.03.490, of the land user; and
(((h))) (viii) Any other factors that present a reasonable
difference as a ground for distinction.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, a mobile home park is the
same class of customer as residential multifamily housing.
(3) The rate a city or town may charge under this section for storm
or surface water sewer systems or the portion of the rate allocable to
the storm or surface water sewer system of combined sanitary sewage and
storm or surface water sewer systems shall be reduced by a minimum of
ten percent for any new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes
a permissive rainwater harvesting system. Rainwater harvesting systems
shall be properly sized to utilize the available roof surface of the
building. The jurisdiction shall consider rate reductions in excess of
ten percent dependent upon the amount of rainwater harvested.
(4) Rates or charges for on-site inspection and maintenance
services may not be imposed under this chapter on the development,
construction, or reconstruction of property.
(5) A city or town may provide assistance to aid low-income persons
in connection with services provided under this chapter.
(6) Under this chapter, after July 1, 1998, any requirements for
pumping the septic tank of an on-site sewage system should be based,
among other things, on actual measurement of accumulation of sludge and
scum by a trained inspector, trained owner's agent, or trained owner.
Training must occur in a program approved by the state board of health
or by a local health officer.
(7) Before adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility
services, or incorporating residences into an on-site inspection and
maintenance or sewer utility under this chapter, notification must be
provided, prior to the applicable public hearing, to all residences
within the proposed service area that have on-site systems permitted by
the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the
residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the
service.
(8) A city or town shall not provide on-site sewage system
inspection, pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services
under this section using city or town employees unless the on-site
system is connected by a publicly owned collection system to the city
or town's sewerage system, and the on-site system represents the first
step in the sewage disposal process. Nothing in this section shall
affect the authority of state or local health officers to carry out
their responsibilities under any other applicable law.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.94.140 and 2005 c 324 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every county, in the operation of a system of sewerage and/or
water, shall have full jurisdiction and authority to manage, regulate,
and control it. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
every county shall have full jurisdiction and authority to fix, alter,
regulate, and control the rates and charges for the service and
facilities to those to whom such service and facilities are available,
and to levy charges for connection to the system.
(2)(a) The rates for availability of service and facilities, and
connection charges so charged must be uniform for the same class of
customers or service and facility. In classifying customers served,
service furnished or made available by such system of sewerage and/or
water, or the connection charges, the county legislative authority may
consider any or all of the following factors:
(((a))) (i) The difference in cost of service to the various
customers within or without the area;
(((b))) (ii) The difference in cost of maintenance, operation,
repair and replacement of the various parts of the systems;
(((c))) (iii) The different character of the service and facilities
furnished various customers;
(((d))) (iv) The quantity and quality of the sewage and/or water
delivered and the time of its delivery;
(((e))) (v) Capital contributions made to the system or systems,
including, but not limited to, assessments;
(((f))) (vi) The cost of acquiring the system or portions of the
system in making system improvements necessary for the public health
and safety;
(((g))) (vii) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in
RCW 24.03.490, of the land user; and
(((h))) (viii) Any other matters which present a reasonable
difference as a ground for distinction.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, a mobile home park is the
same class of customer as residential multifamily housing.
(3) The rate a county may charge under this section for storm or
surface water sewer systems or the portion of the rate allocable to the
storm or surface water sewer system of combined sanitary sewage and
storm or surface water sewer systems shall be reduced by a minimum of
ten percent for any new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes
a permissive rainwater harvesting system. Rainwater harvesting systems
shall be properly sized to utilize the available roof surface of the
building. The jurisdiction shall consider rate reductions in excess of
ten percent dependent upon the amount of rainwater harvested.
(4) A county may provide assistance to aid low-income persons in
connection with services provided under this chapter.
(5) The service charges and rates shall produce revenues sufficient
to take care of the costs of maintenance and operation, revenue bond
and warrant interest and principal amortization requirements, and all
other charges necessary for the efficient and proper operation of the
system.
(6) A connection charge under this section for service to a
manufactured housing community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, applies to
an individual lot within that community only if the system of water or
sewerage provides and maintains the connection.

--- END ---