BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in 2005 the name
of the state wildlife fund was changed to the state wildlife account.
The intent of this act is to correct references in the Revised Code of
Washington to the antiquated name "state wildlife fund."

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.184 and 2000 c 252 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall deposit all moneys received from the
following activities into the state wildlife ((fund)) account created
in RCW 77.12.170:
(a) The sale of interpretive, recreational, historical,
educational, and informational literature and materials;
(b) The sale of advertisements in regulation pamphlets and other
appropriate mediums; and
(c) Enrollment fees in department-sponsored educational training
events.
(2) Moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be
spent primarily for producing regulation booklets for users and for the
development, production, reprinting, and distribution of informational
and educational materials. The department may also spend these moneys
for necessary expenses associated with training activities, and other
activities as determined by the director.
(3) Regulation pamphlets may be subsidized through appropriate
advertising, but must be made available free of charge to the users.
(4) The director may enter into joint ventures with other agencies
and organizations to generate revenue for providing public information
and education on wildlife and hunting and fishing rules.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.12.190 and 1991 sp.s. c 31 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
Moneys in the state wildlife ((fund)) account created in RCW
77.12.170 may be used only for the purposes of this title, including
the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued for capital
projects.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.12.210 and 2000 c 107 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall maintain and manage real or personal property
owned, leased, or held by the department and shall control the
construction of buildings, structures, and improvements in or on the
property. The director may adopt rules for the operation and
maintenance of the property.
The commission may authorize the director to sell, lease, convey,
or grant concessions upon real or personal property under the control
of the department. This includes the authority to sell timber, gravel,
sand, and other materials or products from real property held by the
department, and to sell or lease the department's real or personal
property or grant concessions or rights of way for roads or utilities
in the property. Oil and gas resources owned by the state which lie
below lands owned, leased, or held by the department shall be offered
for lease by the commissioner of public lands pursuant to chapter 79.14
RCW with the proceeds being deposited in the state wildlife ((fund:
PROVIDED, That)) account created in RCW 77.12.170. However, the
commissioner of public lands shall condition such leases at the request
of the department to protect wildlife and its habitat.
If the commission determines that real or personal property held by
the department cannot be used advantageously by the department, the
director may dispose of that property if it is in the public interest.
If the state acquired real property with use limited to specific
purposes, the director may negotiate terms for the return of the
property to the donor or grantor. Other real property shall be sold to
the highest bidder at public auction. After appraisal, notice of the
auction shall be published at least once a week for two successive
weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the county where the
property is located at least twenty days prior to sale.
Proceeds from the sales shall be deposited in the state wildlife
((fund)) account.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.12.230 and 1987 c 506 s 32 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director may pay lawful local improvement district assessments
for projects that may benefit wildlife or wildlife-oriented recreation
made against lands held by the state for department purposes. The
payments may be made from money appropriated from the state wildlife
((fund)) account created in RCW 77.12.170 to the department.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.12.240 and 1989 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director may authorize the removal or killing of wildlife that
is destroying or injuring property, or when it is necessary for
wildlife management or research.
The director or other employees of the department shall dispose of
wildlife taken or possessed by them under this title in the manner
determined by the director to be in the best interest of the state.
Proceeds from sales shall be deposited in the state treasury to be
credited to the state wildlife ((fund)) account created in RCW
77.12.170.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.12.323 and 1987 c 506 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established in the state wildlife ((fund)) account
created in RCW 77.12.170 a special wildlife account. Moneys received
under RCW 77.12.320 as now or hereafter amended as compensation for
wildlife losses shall be deposited in the state treasury to be credited
to the special wildlife account.
(2) The director may advise the state treasurer and the state
investment board of a surplus in the special wildlife account above the
current needs. The state investment board may invest and reinvest the
surplus, as the commission deems appropriate, in an investment
authorized by RCW 43.84.150 or in securities issued by the United
States government as defined by RCW 43.84.080 (1) and (4). Income
received from the investments shall be deposited to the credit of the
special wildlife account.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.12.380 and 1987 c 506 s 44 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon receipt of a request under RCW 77.12.360, the commissioner of
public lands shall determine if the withdrawal would benefit the people
of the state. If the withdrawal would be beneficial, the commissioner
shall have the lands appraised for their lease value. Before
withdrawal, the department shall transmit to the commissioner a voucher
authorizing payment from the state wildlife ((fund)) account created in
RCW 77.12.170 in favor of the fund for which the lands are held. The
payment shall equal the amount of the lease value for the duration of
the withdrawal.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.12.390 and 1987 c 506 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon receipt of a voucher under RCW 77.12.380, the commissioner of
public lands shall withdraw the lands from lease. The commissioner
shall forward the voucher to the state treasurer, who shall draw a
warrant against the state wildlife ((fund)) account created in RCW
77.12.170 in favor of the fund for which the withdrawn lands are held.

Sec. 10 RCW 77.12.670 and 2002 c 283 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The migratory bird stamp to be produced by the department shall
use the design as provided by the migratory waterfowl art committee.
(2) All revenue derived from the sale of migratory bird license
validations or stamps by the department to any person hunting waterfowl
or to any stamp collector shall be deposited in the state wildlife
((fund)) account created in RCW 77.12.170 and shall be used only for
that portion of the cost of printing and production of the stamps for
migratory waterfowl hunters as determined by subsection (4) of this
section, and for those migratory waterfowl projects specified by the
director of the department for the acquisition and development of
migratory waterfowl habitat in the state and for the enhancement,
protection, and propagation of migratory waterfowl in the state.
Migratory bird license validation and stamp funds may not be used on
lands controlled by private hunting clubs or on private lands that
charge a fee for public access. Migratory bird license validation and
stamp funds may be used for migratory waterfowl projects on private
land where public hunting is provided by written permission or on areas
established by the department as waterfowl hunting closures.
(3) All revenue derived from the sale of the license validation and
stamp by the department to persons hunting solely nonwaterfowl
migratory birds shall be deposited in the state wildlife ((fund))
account created in RCW 77.12.170 and shall be used only for that
portion of the cost of printing and production of the stamps for
nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters as determined by subsection (4) of
this section, and for those nonwaterfowl migratory bird projects
specified by the director for the acquisition and development of
nonwaterfowl migratory bird habitat in the state and for the
enhancement, protection, and propagation of nonwaterfowl migratory
birds in the state.
(4) With regard to the revenue from license validation and stamp
sales that is not the result of sales to stamp collectors, the
department shall determine the proportion of migratory waterfowl
hunters and solely nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters by using the
yearly migratory bird hunter harvest information program survey results
or, in the event that these results are not available, other similar
survey results. A two-year average of the most recent survey results
shall be used to determine the proportion of the revenue attributed to
migratory waterfowl hunters and the proportion attributed to solely
nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters for each fiscal year. For fiscal
year 1998-99 and for fiscal year 1999-2000, ninety-six percent of the
stamp revenue shall be attributed to migratory waterfowl hunters and
four percent of the stamp revenue shall be attributed to solely
nonwaterfowl migratory game hunters.
(5) Acquisition shall include but not be limited to the acceptance
of gifts of real estate or any interest therein or the rental, lease,
or purchase of real estate or any interest therein. If the department
acquires any fee interest, leasehold, or rental interest in real
property under this section, it shall allow the general public
reasonable access to that property and shall, if appropriate, ensure
that the deed or other instrument creating the interest allows such
access to the general public. If the department obtains a covenant in
real property in its favor or an easement or any other interest in real
property under this section, it shall exercise its best efforts to
ensure that the deed or other instrument creating the interest grants
to the general public in the form of a covenant running with the land
reasonable access to the property. The private landowner from whom the
department obtains such a covenant or easement shall retain the right
of granting access to the lands by written permission, but may not
charge a fee for access.
(6) The department may produce migratory bird stamps in any given
year in excess of those necessary for sale in that year. The excess
stamps may be sold to the migratory waterfowl art committee for sale to
the public.

Sec. 11 RCW 77.12.690 and 1998 c 245 s 158 and 1998 c 191 s 33
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The migratory waterfowl art committee is responsible for the
selection of the annual migratory bird stamp design and shall provide
the design to the department. If the committee does not perform this
duty within the time frame necessary to achieve proper and timely
distribution of the stamps to license dealers, the director shall
initiate the art work selection for that year. The committee shall
create collector art prints and related artwork, utilizing the same
design as provided to the department. The administration, sale,
distribution, and other matters relating to the prints and sales of
stamps with prints and related artwork shall be the responsibility of
the migratory waterfowl art committee.
The total amount brought in from the sale of prints and related
artwork shall be deposited in the state wildlife ((fund)) account
created in RCW 77.12.170. The costs of producing and marketing of
prints and related artwork, including administrative expenses mutually
agreed upon by the committee and the director, shall be paid out of the
total amount brought in from sales of those same items. Net funds
derived from the sale of prints and related artwork shall be used by
the director to contract with one or more appropriate individuals or
nonprofit organizations for the development of waterfowl propagation
projects within Washington which specifically provide waterfowl for the
Pacific flyway. The department shall not contract with any individual
or organization that obtains compensation for allowing waterfowl
hunting except if the individual or organization does not permit
hunting for compensation on the subject property.
The migratory waterfowl art committee shall have an annual audit of
its finances conducted by the state auditor and shall furnish a copy of
the audit to the commission.

Sec. 12 RCW 77.15.100 and 2000 c 107 s 235 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise provided in this title, fish, shellfish, or
wildlife unlawfully taken or possessed, or involved in a violation
shall be forfeited to the state upon conviction. Unless already held
by, sold, destroyed, or disposed of by the department, the court shall
order such fish or wildlife to be delivered to the department. Where
delay will cause loss to the value of the property and a ready
wholesale buying market exists, the department may sell property to a
wholesale buyer at a fair market value.
(2) When seized property is forfeited to the department, the
department may retain it for official use unless the property is
required to be destroyed, or upon application by any law enforcement
agency of the state, release the property to the agency for the use of
enforcing this title, or sell such property and deposit the proceeds
into the state wildlife ((fund established under)) account created in
RCW 77.12.170. Any sale of other property shall be at public auction
or after public advertisement reasonably designed to obtain the highest
price. The time, place, and manner of holding the sale shall be
determined by the director. The director may contract for the sale to
be through the department of general administration as state surplus
property, or, except where not justifiable by the value of the
property, the director shall publish notice of the sale once a week for
at least two consecutive weeks before the sale in at least one
newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the sale is to
be held.

Sec. 13 RCW 77.32.430 and 2005 c 192 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Catch record card information is necessary for proper
management of the state's food fish and game fish species and shellfish
resources. Catch record card administration shall be under rules
adopted by the commission. There is no charge for an initial catch
record card. Each subsequent or duplicate catch record card costs ten
dollars.
(2) A license to take and possess Dungeness crab is only valid in
Puget Sound waters east of the Bonilla-Tatoosh line if the fisher has
in possession a valid catch record card officially endorsed for
Dungeness crab. The endorsement shall cost no more than three dollars,
including any or all fees authorized under RCW 77.32.050, when
purchased for a personal use saltwater, combination, or shellfish and
seaweed license. The endorsement shall cost no more than one dollar,
including any or all fees authorized under RCW 77.32.050, when
purchased for a temporary combination fishing license authorized under
RCW 77.32.470(3)(a).
(3) Catch record cards issued with affixed temporary short-term
charter stamp licenses are not subject to the ten-dollar charge nor to
the Dungeness crab endorsement fee provided for in this section.
Charter boat or guide operators issuing temporary short-term charter
stamp licenses shall affix the stamp to each catch record card issued
before fishing commences. Catch record cards issued with a temporary
short-term charter stamp are valid for one day.
(4) The department shall include provisions for recording marked
and unmarked salmon in catch record cards issued after March 31, 2004.
(5) The funds received from the sale of catch record cards and the
Dungeness crab endorsement must be deposited into the state wildlife
((fund)) account created in RCW 77.12.170. The funds received from the
Dungeness crab endorsement may be used only for the sampling,
monitoring, and management of catch associated with the Dungeness crab
recreational fisheries. Moneys allocated under this section shall
supplement and not supplant other federal, state, and local funds used
for Dungeness crab recreational fisheries management.

Sec. 14 RCW 77.32.530 and 1996 c 101 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission in consultation with the director may authorize
hunting of big game animals and wild turkeys through auction. The
department may conduct the auction for the hunt or contract with a
nonprofit wildlife conservation organization to conduct the auction for
the hunt.
(2) The commission in consultation with the director may authorize
hunting of up to a total of fifteen big game animals and wild turkeys
per year through raffle. The department may conduct raffles or
contract with a nonprofit wildlife conservation organization to conduct
raffles for hunting these animals. In consultation with the gambling
commission, the director may adopt rules for the implementation of
raffles involving hunting.
(3) The director shall establish the procedures for the hunts,
which shall require any participants to obtain any required license,
permit, or tag. Representatives of the department may participate in
the hunt upon the request of the commission to ensure that the animals
to be killed are properly identified.
(4) After deducting the expenses of conducting an auction or
raffle, any revenues retained by a nonprofit organization, as specified
under contract with the department, shall be devoted solely for
wildlife conservation, consistent with its qualification as a bona fide
nonprofit organization for wildlife conservation.
(5) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
shall be deposited in the state wildlife ((fund)) account created in
RCW 77.12.170. The revenues shall be used to improve the habitat,
health, and welfare of the species auctioned or raffled and shall
supplement, rather than replace, other funds budgeted for management of
that species. The commission may solicit input from groups or
individuals with special interest in and expertise on a species in
determining how to use these revenues.
(6) A nonprofit wildlife conservation organization may petition the
commission to authorize an auction or raffle for a special hunt for big
game animals and wild turkeys.

Sec. 15 RCW 77.32.560 and 2003 c 317 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may sell watchable wildlife decals. Proceeds
from the sale of the decal must be deposited into the state wildlife
((fund)) account created in RCW 77.12.170 and must be dedicated to the
support of the department's watchable wildlife activities. The
department may also use proceeds from the sale of the decal for
marketing the decal and for marketing watchable wildlife activities in
the state.
(2) The term "watchable wildlife activities" includes but is not
limited to: Initiating partnerships with communities to jointly
develop watchable wildlife projects, building infrastructure to serve
wildlife viewers, assisting and training communities in conducting
wildlife watching events, developing destination wildlife viewing
corridors and trails, tours, maps, brochures, and travel aides, and
offering grants to assist rural communities in identifying key wildlife
attractions and ways to protect and promote them.
(3) The commission must adopt by rule the cost of the watchable
wildlife decal. A person may, at their discretion, contribute more
than the cost as set by the commission by rule for the watchable
wildlife decal in order to support watchable wildlife activities. A
person who purchases a watchable wildlife decal must be issued one
vehicle use permit free of charge.

Sec. 16 RCW 77.36.070 and 1996 c 54 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may pay no more than one hundred twenty thousand
dollars per fiscal year from the state wildlife ((fund)) account
created in RCW 77.12.170 for claims under RCW 77.36.040 and for
assessment costs and compromise of claims. Such money shall be used to
pay animal damage claims only if the claim meets the conditions of RCW
77.36.040 and the damage occurred in a place where the opportunity to
hunt was not restricted or prohibited by a county, municipality, or
other public entity during the season prior to the occurrence of the
damage.

Sec. 17 RCW 77.44.050 and 1999 c 235 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The warm water game fish account is hereby created in the state
wildlife ((fund)) account created in RCW 77.12.170. Moneys in the
account are subject to legislative appropriation and shall be used for
the purpose of funding the warm water game fish enhancement program,
including the development of warm water pond and lake habitat, culture
of warm water game fish, improvement of warm water fish habitat,
management of warm water fish populations, and other practical
activities that will improve the fishing for warm water fish. Funds
for warm water game fish as provided in RCW 77.32.440 shall not serve
as replacement funding for department-operated warm water fish projects
existing on December 31, 1994, except that an amount not to exceed
ninety-one thousand dollars may be used for warm water fish culture at
the Rod Meseberg warm water fish production facility during the
biennium ending June 30, 2001.

Sec. 18 RCW 79A.55.090 and 1988 c 36 s 59 are each amended to
read as follows:
No funds shall be expended from the wildlife ((fund)) account
created in RCW 77.12.170 to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 19 RCW 82.27.070 and 2005 c 110 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
All taxes collected by the department of revenue under this chapter
shall be deposited in the state general fund except for the excise tax
on anadromous game fish, which shall be deposited in the state wildlife
((fund)) account created in RCW 77.12.170, and, during the period
January 1, 2000, to December 31, 2010, twenty-five forty-sixths of the
revenues derived from the excise tax on sea urchins collected under RCW
82.27.020 shall be deposited into the sea urchin dive fishery account
created in RCW 77.70.150, and twenty-five forty-sixths of the revenues
derived from the excise tax on sea cucumbers collected under RCW
82.27.020 shall be deposited into the sea cucumber dive fishery account
created in RCW 77.70.190.

Sec. 20 RCW 90.56.100 and 2000 c 69 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington wildlife rescue coalition is established for the
purpose of coordinating the rescue and rehabilitation of wildlife
injured or endangered by oil spills or the release of other hazardous
substances into the environment.
(2) The Washington wildlife rescue coalition shall be composed of:
(a) A representative of the department of fish and wildlife
designated by the director of fish and wildlife. The department of
fish and wildlife shall be designated as lead agency in the operations
of the coalition. The coalition shall be chaired by the representative
from the department of fish and wildlife;
(b) A representative of the department of ecology designated by the
director;
(c) A representative of the Washington military department
emergency management division, designated by the director of the
Washington military department;
(d) A licensed veterinarian, with experience and training in
wildlife rehabilitation, appointed by the veterinary board of
governors;
(e) A lay person, with training and experience in the rescue and
rehabilitation of wildlife appointed by the department; and
(f) A person designated by the legislative authority of the county
where oil spills or spills of other hazardous substances may occur.
This member of the coalition shall serve on the coalition until
wildlife rescue and rehabilitation is completed in that county. The
completion of any rescue or rehabilitation project shall be determined
by the director of fish and wildlife.
(3) The duties of the Washington wildlife rescue coalition are to:
(a) Develop an emergency mobilization plan to rescue and
rehabilitate waterfowl and other wildlife that are injured or
endangered by an oil spill or the release of other hazardous substances
into the environment;
(b) Develop and maintain a resource directory of persons,
governmental agencies, and private organizations that may provide
assistance in an emergency rescue effort;
(c) Provide advance training and instruction to volunteers in
rescuing and rehabilitating waterfowl and wildlife injured or
endangered by oil spills or the release of other hazardous substances
into the environment. The training may be provided through grants to
community colleges or to groups that conduct programs for training
volunteers. The coalition representatives from the agencies described
in subsection (2) of this section shall coordinate their training
efforts and work to provide training opportunities for young citizens;
(d) Obtain and maintain equipment and supplies used in emergency
rescue efforts.
(4)(a) Expenses for the coalition may be provided by the coastal
protection fund administered according to RCW 90.48.400.
(b) The coalition is encouraged to seek grants, gifts, or donations
from private sources in order to carry out the provisions of this
section and RCW 90.56.110. Any private funds donated to the commission
shall be deposited into the wildlife rescue account hereby created
within the state wildlife ((fund)) account created in RCW 77.12.170 as
authorized under Title 77 RCW.

Sec. 21 RCW 9.41.070 and 2002 c 302 s 703 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a
county shall within thirty days after the filing of an application of
any person, issue a license to such person to carry a pistol concealed
on his or her person within this state for five years from date of
issue, for the purposes of protection or while engaged in business,
sport, or while traveling. However, if the applicant does not have a
valid permanent Washington driver's license or Washington state
identification card or has not been a resident of the state for the
previous consecutive ninety days, the issuing authority shall have up
to sixty days after the filing of the application to issue a license.
The issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications
for concealed pistol licenses during regular business hours.
The applicant's constitutional right to bear arms shall not be
denied, unless:
(a) He or she is ineligible to possess a firearm under the
provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045;
(b) The applicant's concealed pistol license is in a revoked
status;
(c) He or she is under twenty-one years of age;
(d) He or she is subject to a court order or injunction regarding
firearms pursuant to RCW 9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045,
26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060,
26.50.070, or 26.26.590;
(e) He or she is free on bond or personal recognizance pending
trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense;
(f) He or she has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from
any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor; or
(g) He or she has been ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW
9.41.098(1)(e) within one year before filing an application to carry a
pistol concealed on his or her person.
No person convicted of a felony may have his or her right to
possess firearms restored or his or her privilege to carry a concealed
pistol restored, unless the person has been granted relief from
disabilities by the secretary of the treasury under 18 U.S.C. Sec.
925(c), or RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.
(2) The issuing authority shall check with the national crime
information center, the Washington state patrol electronic data base,
the department of social and health services electronic data base, and
with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether
the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess
a firearm and therefore ineligible for a concealed pistol license.
This subsection applies whether the applicant is applying for a new
concealed pistol license or to renew a concealed pistol license.
(3) Any person whose firearms rights have been restricted and who
has been granted relief from disabilities by the secretary of the
treasury under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c) or who is exempt under 18 U.S.C.
Sec. 921(a)(20)(A) shall have his or her right to acquire, receive,
transfer, ship, transport, carry, and possess firearms in accordance
with Washington state law restored except as otherwise prohibited by
this chapter.
(4) The license application shall bear the full name, residential
address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, date and
place of birth, race, gender, description, not more than two complete
sets of fingerprints, and signature of the licensee, and the licensee's
driver's license number or state identification card number if used for
identification in applying for the license. A signed application for
a concealed pistol license shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality
and written request that the department of social and health services,
mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release
information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for a concealed
pistol license to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.
The application for an original license shall include two complete
sets of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol.
The license and application shall contain a warning substantially
as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal
law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you
are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you
may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a
defense to a federal prosecution.

The license shall contain a description of the major differences
between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local
laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be
consistent with state law. The application shall contain questions
about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a
pistol, the applicant's place of birth, and whether the applicant is a
United States citizen. The applicant shall not be required to produce
a birth certificate or other evidence of citizenship. A person who is
not a citizen of the United States shall meet the additional
requirements of RCW 9.41.170 and produce proof of compliance with RCW
9.41.170 upon application. The license shall be in triplicate and in
a form to be prescribed by the department of licensing.
The original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the
duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the director of licensing
and the triplicate shall be preserved for six years, by the authority
issuing the license.
The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement
and corrections agencies, in an on-line format, all information
received under this subsection.
(5) The nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the original
five-year license shall be thirty-six dollars plus additional charges
imposed by the Federal Bureau of Investigation that are passed on to
the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of government
may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the issuance of
the license.
The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;
(b) Four dollars shall be paid to the agency taking the
fingerprints of the person licensed;
(c) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter; and
(d) Three dollars to the firearms range account in the general
fund.
(6) The nonrefundable fee for the renewal of such license shall be
thirty-two dollars. No other branch or unit of government may impose
any additional charges on the applicant for the renewal of the license.
The renewal fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;
(b) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter; and
(c) Three dollars to the firearms range account in the general
fund.
(7) The nonrefundable fee for replacement of lost or damaged
licenses is ten dollars to be paid to the issuing authority.
(8) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option
of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the
option of the issuing authority.
(9) A licensee may renew a license if the licensee applies for
renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the
license. A license so renewed shall take effect on the expiration date
of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of
the license must pay a late renewal penalty of ten dollars in addition
to the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section. The
fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Three dollars shall be deposited in the state wildlife ((fund))
account created in RCW 77.12.170 and used exclusively first for the
printing and distribution of a pamphlet on the legal limits of the use
of firearms, firearms safety, and the preemptive nature of state law,
and subsequently the support of volunteer instructors in the basic
firearms safety training program conducted by the department of fish
and wildlife. The pamphlet shall be given to each applicant for a
license; and
(b) Seven dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter.
(10) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1) through
(9) of this section, the chief of police of the municipality or the
sheriff of the county of the applicant's residence may issue a
temporary emergency license for good cause pending review under
subsection (1) of this section. However, a temporary emergency license
issued under this subsection shall not exempt the holder of the license
from any records check requirement. Temporary emergency licenses shall
be easily distinguishable from regular licenses.
(11) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the
requirements of this section or chapter, nor may a political
subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not
required by this section.
(12) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding
citizenship or identity on an application for a concealed pistol
license is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition
to any other penalty provided for by law, the concealed pistol license
of a person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and
the person shall be permanently ineligible for a concealed pistol
license.
(13) A person may apply for a concealed pistol license:
(a) To the municipality or to the county in which the applicant
resides if the applicant resides in a municipality;
(b) To the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant
resides in an unincorporated area; or
(c) Anywhere in the state if the applicant is a nonresident.

Sec. 22 RCW 46.16.313 and 2005 c 426 s 3, 2005 c 225 s 3, 2005 c
224 s 3, 2005 c 220 s 3, 2005 c 216 s 3, 2005 c 177 s 3, 2005 c 85 s 3,
2005 c 71 s 3, 2005 c 53 s 3, 2005 c 48 s 3, 2005 c 44 s 3, and 2005 c
42 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee of no more than forty
dollars for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section
5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration
of this program. This fee is in addition to all other fees required to
register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been
requested. All such additional special license plate fees collected by
the department shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to
the motor vehicle fund.
(2) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of
each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate
license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under
this subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by
it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the
state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The state
treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate license
plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a special
baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be distributed
to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest
payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium,
as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a
professional fire fighters and paramedics license plate shall pay an
initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount
not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW
46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the professional fire fighters
and paramedics license plates. Upon the determination by the
department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the Washington State Council of Fire Fighters
benevolent fund established under RCW 46.16.30902.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a professional fire
fighters and paramedics license plate shall, upon application, pay a
fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the professional fire fighters and paramedics
special license plate. Upon the determination by the department that
the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds
to the Washington State Council of Fire Fighters benevolent fund
established under RCW 46.16.30902.
(8) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
November 1, 2004, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a
"Helping Kids Speak" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "Helping Kids Speak" special license plate.
Upon the determination by the department that the state has been
reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Helping
Kids Speak" account established under RCW 46.16.30904.
(9) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on November
1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Helping Kids Speak"
license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each
fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit
the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the department
determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of
implementing the "Helping Kids Speak" special license plate. Upon the
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Helping Kids Speak" account
established under RCW 46.16.30904.
(10) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a "law
enforcement memorial" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the law enforcement memorial special license
plate. Upon the determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the law
enforcement memorial account established under RCW 46.16.30906.
(11) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "law enforcement
memorial" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the law enforcement memorial special license
plate. Upon the determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the law
enforcement memorial account established under RCW 46.16.30906.
(12)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a Washington's Wildlife collection license plate shall pay an
initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount
not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW
46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the Washington's Wildlife
license plate collection. Upon determination by the department that
the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds
to the state wildlife account. Proceeds credited to the state wildlife
account from the sale of the Washington's Wildlife license plate
collection may be used only for the department of fish and wildlife's
game species management activities.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a Washington's
Wildlife collection license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of
thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the Washington's Wildlife license plate
collection. Upon determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the state
wildlife account. Proceeds credited to the state wildlife account from
the sale of the Washington's Wildlife license plate collection may be
used only for the department of fish and wildlife's game species
management activities.
(13)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a Washington state parks and recreation commission special license
plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected
under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody
of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.
Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to
the motor vehicle account until the department determines that the
state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the Washington
state parks and recreation commission special license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the state parks education and
enhancement account established in RCW 79A.05.059.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a Washington
state parks and recreation commission special license plate shall, upon
application, pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW
46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the Washington state parks and
recreation commission special license plate. Upon determination by the
department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the state parks education and enhancement
account established in RCW 79A.05.059.
(14)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a "Washington Lighthouses" license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "Washington Lighthouses" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the lighthouse environmental
programs account established under RCW 46.16.30912.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Washington
Lighthouses" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the "Washington Lighthouses" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the lighthouse environmental
programs account established under RCW 46.16.30912.
(15)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a "Keep Kids Safe" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty-five dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with
a proper identifying report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "Keep Kids Safe" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the children's trust fund
established under RCW 43.121.100.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Keep Kids
Safe" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the "Keep Kids Safe" license plate. Upon determination
by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the children's trust fund established
under RCW 43.121.100.
(16)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a "we love our pets" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administrative
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "we love our pets" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the we love our pets account
established under RCW 46.16.30915.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "we love our
pets" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "we love our pets" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the we love our pets account
established under RCW 46.16.30915.
(17)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a "Gonzaga University alumni association" license plate shall pay an
initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount
not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administrative and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW
46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the "Gonzaga University alumni
association" license plate. Upon determination by the department that
the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds
to the Gonzaga University alumni association account established under
RCW 46.16.30917.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Gonzaga
University alumni association" license plate shall, upon application,
pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not
to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with
a proper identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the
state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account
until the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for
the cost of implementing the "Gonzaga University alumni association"
license plate. Upon determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the Gonzaga
University alumni association account established under RCW
46.16.30917.
(18) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to
be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of
a "Washington's National Park Fund" license plate shall pay an initial
fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "Washington's National Park Fund" license
plate. Upon determination by the department that the state has been
reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the
"Washington's National Park Fund" account established under RCW
46.16.30919.
(19) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or
after January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a
"Washington's National Park Fund" license plate shall, upon
application, pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW
46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the "Washington's National Park
Fund" license plate. Upon determination by the department that the
state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to
the "Washington's National Park Fund" account established under RCW
46.16.30919.
(20)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of an armed forces license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall retain an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the department
determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of
implementing the armed forces special license plate collection. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the veterans stewardship account
established under RCW 43.60A.140.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of an armed forces
license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each
fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying report.
Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to
the motor vehicle account until the department determines that the
state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the armed forces
special license plate collection. Upon the determination by the
department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the veterans stewardship account established in
RCW 43.60A.140.
(21)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a "Ski & Ride Washington" license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "Ski & Ride Washington" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Ski & Ride Washington"
account established under RCW 46.16.30923.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Ski & Ride
Washington" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the "Ski & Ride Washington" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Ski & Ride Washington"
account established under RCW 46.16.30923.
(22)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a Wild On Washington license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the Wild On Washington license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the state wildlife account
created in RCW 77.12.170. Proceeds credited to the state wildlife
account from the sale of the Wild On Washington license plates must be
dedicated to the department of fish and wildlife's watchable wildlife
activities defined in RCW 77.32.560(2).
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a Wild On
Washington license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the Wild On Washington license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the state wildlife account.
Proceeds credited to the state wildlife account from the sale of the
Wild On Washington license plates must be dedicated to the department
of fish and wildlife's watchable wildlife activities defined in RCW
77.32.560(2).
(23)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of an Endangered Wildlife license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the Endangered Wildlife license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the state wildlife account.
Proceeds credited to the state wildlife account from the sale of the
Endangered Wildlife license plates must be used only for the department
of fish and wildlife's endangered wildlife program activities.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of an Endangered
Wildlife license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the Endangered Wildlife license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the state wildlife account.
Proceeds credited to the state wildlife account from the sale of the
Endangered Wildlife license plates must be used only for the department
of fish and wildlife's endangered wildlife program activities.
(24)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a "Share the Road" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the "Share the Road" license plate. Upon determination
by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the "Share the Road" account established
under RCW 46.16.30929.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Share the
Road" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the "Share the Road" license plate. Upon determination
by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the "Share the Road" account established
under RCW 46.16.30929.

Sec. 23 RCW 46.16.605 and 1988 c 36 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
All revenue derived from the fees provided for in RCW 46.16.585
shall be forwarded to the state treasurer and be deposited to the
credit of the state wildlife ((fund)) account created in RCW 77.12.170
to be used for the preservation, protection, perpetuation, and
enhancement of nongame species of wildlife including but not limited to
song birds, raptors, protected wildlife, rare and endangered wildlife,
aquatic life, and specialized-habitat types, both terrestrial and
aquatic, as well as all unclassified marine fish, shellfish, and marine
invertebrates.
Administrative costs incurred by the department of licensing as a
direct result of RCW 46.16.560 through 46.16.605 and 77.12.170 shall be
appropriated by the legislature from the state wildlife ((fund))
account from those funds deposited therein resulting from the sale of
personalized license plates. If the actual costs incurred by the
department of licensing are less than that which has been appropriated
by the legislature the remainder shall revert to the state wildlife
((fund)) account.

Sec. 24 RCW 46.16.606 and 1991 sp.s. c 7 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the fees imposed in RCW 46.16.585 for application
and renewal of personalized license plates an additional fee of ten
dollars shall be charged. The revenue from the additional fee shall be
deposited in the state wildlife ((fund)) account created in RCW
77.12.170 and used for the management of resources associated with the
nonconsumptive use of wildlife.

--- END ---