BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.46.010 and 1994 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county or city shall identify
in the adopted budget the capital projects funded in whole or in part
from the proceeds of the tax authorized in subsection (2) of this
section, and shall indicate that such tax is intended to be in addition
to other funds that may be reasonably available for such capital
projects.
(2) The legislative authority of any county or any city may impose
an excise tax on each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas
of the county for the county tax and in the corporate limits of the
city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-quarter of one
percent of the selling price.
(a) The revenues from this tax shall be used by any city or county
with a population of five thousand or less and any city or county that
does not plan under RCW 36.70A.040 for any capital purpose identified
in a capital improvements plan and local capital improvements,
including those listed in RCW 35.43.040. For purposes of this
subsection (2), "capital projects" include equipment items that may
contain and employ a software element necessary for initial
installation and operation that may be included in the capital
expenditure on a one-time basis during initial acquisition by a county
or city in the regular course of business in connection with associated
capital improvements. These expenditures must be capitalized with a
lifetime of at least five years and must be tied directly to the dollar
amount used solely for the economic development value of an existing or
planned capital improvement. None of the tax proceeds may be used for
daily operations or upgrading of the original capital investment.
(b) After April 30, 1992, revenues generated from the tax imposed
under this subsection in counties over five thousand population and
cities over five thousand population that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be used solely for financing capital
projects specified in a capital facilities plan element of a
comprehensive plan and housing relocation assistance under RCW
59.18.440 and 59.18.450. However, revenues (((a))) (i) pledged by such
counties and cities to debt retirement prior to April 30, 1992, may
continue to be used for that purpose until the original debt for which
the revenues were pledged is retired, or (((b))) (ii) committed prior
to April 30, 1992, by such counties or cities to a project may continue
to be used for that purpose until the project is completed.
(3) In lieu of imposing the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2), the
legislative authority of any county or any city may impose an
additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the
unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the
corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding
one-half of one percent of the selling price.
(4) Taxes imposed under this section shall be collected from
persons who are taxable by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the unincorporated areas of the
county or within the corporate limits of the city, as the case may be.
(5) Taxes imposed under this section shall comply with all
applicable rules, regulations, laws, and court decisions regarding real
estate excise taxes as imposed by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW.
(6)(a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(i) "City" means any city or town; and
(ii) "Capital project" means those public works projects of a local
government for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction,
repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets; roads;
highways; sidewalks; street and road lighting systems; traffic signals;
bridges; domestic water systems; storm and sanitary sewer systems;
parks; recreational facilities; law enforcement facilities; fire
protection facilities; trails; libraries; administrative and/or
judicial facilities; river and/or waterway flood control projects by
those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended funds
derived from the tax authorized by this section for such purposes; and,
until December 31, 1995, housing projects for those jurisdictions that,
prior to June 11, 1992, have expended or committed to expend funds
derived from the tax authorized by this section or the tax authorized
by RCW 82.46.035 for such purposes.
(b)(i) Proceeds from the tax authorized by this section may be used
for the initial acquisition and installation of computer hardware and
computer business systems and applications that are: Capitalized with
a useful life of five or more years; and directly related to an
existing or planned capital project.
(ii) Proceeds from the tax authorized by this section may not be
used for: Ongoing maintenance, operation, or upgrades of computer
hardware or software; computer peripherals; or computer accessories.
(7) All expenditures made by counties and cities for capital
purposes, local capital improvements, and capital projects authorized
under this section on or before the effective date of this act are
declared to be valid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires June 30, 2010.

--- END ---