BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.02.065 and 2005 c 274 s 309 and 2005 c 126 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Documents, materials, or other information as described in
either subsection (5) or (6), or both, of this section are confidential
by law and privileged, are not subject to public disclosure under
chapter 42.56 RCW, and are not subject to subpoena directed to the
commissioner or any person who received documents, materials, or other
information while acting under the authority of the commissioner. The
commissioner is authorized to use such documents, materials, or other
information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action
brought as a part of the commissioner's official duties. The
confidentiality and privilege created by this section and RCW
42.56.400(9) applies only to the commissioner, any person acting under
the authority of the commissioner, the national association of
insurance commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, regulatory
and law enforcement officials of other states and nations, the federal
government, and international authorities.
(2) Neither the commissioner nor any person who received documents,
materials, or other information while acting under the authority of the
commissioner is permitted or required to testify in any private civil
action concerning any confidential and privileged documents, materials,
or information subject to subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The commissioner:
(a) May share documents, materials, or other information, including
the confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information
subject to subsection (1) of this section, with (i) the national
association of insurance commissioners and its affiliates and
subsidiaries, and (ii) regulatory and law enforcement officials of
other states and nations, the federal government, and international
authorities, if the recipient agrees to maintain the confidentiality
and privileged status of the document, material, or other information;
(b) May receive documents, materials, or information, including
otherwise either confidential or privileged, or both, documents,
materials, or information, from (i) the national association of
insurance commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and (ii)
regulatory and law enforcement officials of other states and nations,
the federal government, and international authorities and shall
maintain as confidential and privileged any document, material, or
information received that is either confidential or privileged, or
both, under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the
document, material, or information; and
(c) May enter into agreements governing the sharing and use of
information consistent with this subsection.
(4) No waiver of an existing privilege or claim of confidentiality
in the documents, materials, or information may occur as a result of
disclosure to the commissioner under this section or as a result of
sharing as authorized in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Documents, materials, or information, which is either
confidential or privileged, or both, which has been provided to the
commissioner by (a) the national association of insurance commissioners
and its affiliates and subsidiaries, (b) regulatory or law enforcement
officials of other states and nations, the federal government, or
international authorities, or (c) agencies of this state, is
confidential and privileged only if the documents, materials, or
information is protected from disclosure by the applicable laws of the
jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or
information.
(6) Working papers, documents, materials, or information produced
by, obtained by, or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person
in the course of a financial or market conduct examination, or in the
course of financial analysis or market conduct desk audit, are not
required to be disclosed by the commissioner unless cited by the
commissioner in connection with an agency action as defined in RCW
34.05.010(3). The commissioner shall notify a party that produced the
documents, materials, or information five business days before
disclosure in connection with an agency action. The notified party may
seek injunctive relief in any Washington state superior court to
prevent disclosure of any documents, materials, or information it
believes is confidential or privileged. In civil actions between
private parties or in criminal actions, disclosure to the commissioner
under this section does not create any privilege or claim of
confidentiality or waive any existing privilege or claim of
confidentiality.
(7)(a) After receipt of a public disclosure request, the
commissioner shall disclose the documents, materials, or information
under subsection (6) of this section that relate to a financial or
market conduct examination undertaken as a result of a proposed change
of control of a nonprofit or mutual health insurer governed in whole or
in part by chapter 48.31B or 48.31C RCW.
(b) The commissioner is not required to disclose the documents,
materials, or information in (a) of this subsection if:
(i) The documents, materials, or information are otherwise
privileged or exempted from public disclosure; or
(ii) The commissioner finds that the public interest in disclosure
of the documents, materials, or information is outweighed by the public
interest in nondisclosure in that particular instance.
(8) Any person may petition a Washington state superior court to
allow inspection of information exempt from public disclosure under
subsection (6) of this section when the information is connected to
allegations of negligence or malfeasance by the commissioner related to
a financial or market conduct examination. The court shall conduct an
in-camera review after notifying the commissioner and every party that
produced the information. The court may order the commissioner to
allow the petitioner to have access to the information provided the
petitioner maintains the confidentiality of the information. The
petitioner must not disclose the information to any other person,
except upon further order of the court. After conducting a regular
hearing, the court may order that the information can be disclosed
publicly if the court finds that there is a public interest in the
disclosure of the information and the exemption of the information from
public disclosure is clearly unnecessary to protect any individual's
right of privacy or any vital governmental function.

--- END ---