BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 57.16.010 and 1997 c 447 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before ordering any improvements or submitting to vote any
proposition for incurring any indebtedness, the district commissioners
shall adopt a general comprehensive plan for the type or types of
facilities the district proposes to provide. A district may prepare a
separate general comprehensive plan for each of these services and
other services that districts are permitted to provide, or the district
may combine any or all of its comprehensive plans into a single general
comprehensive plan.
(((1))) (2) For a general comprehensive plan of a water supply
system, the commissioners shall investigate the several portions and
sections of the district for the purpose of determining the present and
reasonably foreseeable future needs thereof; shall examine and
investigate, determine, and select a water supply or water supplies for
such district suitable and adequate for present and reasonably
foreseeable future needs thereof; and shall consider and determine a
general system or plan for acquiring such water supply or water
supplies, and the lands, waters, and water rights and easements
necessary therefor, and for retaining and storing any such waters, and
erecting dams, reservoirs, aqueducts, and pipe lines to convey the same
throughout such district. There may be included as part of the system
the installation of fire hydrants at suitable places throughout the
district. Consistent with this subsection and RCW 43.20.260, the
commissioners shall determine a general comprehensive plan for
distributing such water throughout such portion of the district as may
then reasonably be served by means of subsidiary aqueducts and pipe
lines, and a long-term plan for financing the planned projects and the
method of distributing the cost and expense thereof, including the
creation of local improvement districts or utility local improvement
districts, and shall determine whether the whole or part of the cost
and expenses shall be paid from revenue or general obligation bonds.
(((2))) (3) For a general comprehensive plan for a sewer system,
the commissioners shall investigate all portions and sections of the
district and select a general comprehensive plan for a sewer system for
the district suitable and adequate for present and reasonably
foreseeable future needs thereof. The general comprehensive plan shall
provide for treatment plants and other methods and services, if any,
for the prevention, control, and reduction of water pollution and for
the treatment and disposal of sewage and industrial and other liquid
wastes now produced or which may reasonably be expected to be produced
within the district and shall, for such portions of the district as may
then reasonably be served, provide for the acquisition or construction
and installation of laterals, trunk sewers, intercepting sewers,
syphons, pumping stations or other sewage collection facilities, septic
tanks, septic tank systems or drainfields, and systems for the
transmission and treatment of wastewater. The general comprehensive
plan shall provide a long-term plan for financing the planned projects
and the method of distributing the cost and expense of the sewer system
and services, including the creation of local improvement districts or
utility local improvement districts; and provide whether the whole or
some part of the cost and expenses shall be paid from revenue or
general obligation bonds.
(((3))) (4) For a general comprehensive plan for a drainage system,
the commissioners shall investigate all portions and sections of the
district and adopt a general comprehensive plan for a drainage system
for the district suitable and adequate for present and future needs
thereof. The general comprehensive plan shall provide for a system to
collect, treat, and dispose of storm water or surface waters, including
use of natural systems and the construction or provision of culverts,
storm water pipes, ponds, and other systems. The general comprehensive
plan shall provide for a long-term plan for financing the planned
projects and provide for a method of distributing the cost and expense
of the drainage system, including local improvement districts or
utility local improvement districts, and provide whether the whole or
some part of the cost and expenses shall be paid from revenue or
general obligation bonds.
(((4))) (5) For a general comprehensive plan for street lighting,
the commissioners shall investigate all portions and sections of the
district and adopt a general comprehensive plan for street lighting for
the district suitable and adequate for present and future needs
thereof. The general comprehensive plan shall provide for a system or
systems of street lighting, provide for a long-term plan for financing
the planned projects, and provide for a method of distributing the cost
and expense of the street lighting system, including local improvement
districts or utility local improvement districts, and provide whether
the whole or some part of the cost and expenses shall be paid from
revenue or general obligation bonds.
(((5))) (6) The commissioners may employ such engineering and legal
service as in their discretion is necessary in carrying out their
duties.
(((6))) (7) The commissioners shall adopt any general comprehensive
plan ((or plans shall be adopted)) by resolution ((and)).
(8) A county, city, and town in which the district is located shall
review a general comprehensive plan of a water supply system, or the
water supply system portion of a combined general comprehensive plan,
for consistency with its comprehensive plan and development regulations
in accordance with the procedures and criteria of RCW 43.20.260 and any
applicable rules adopted by the department of health. A general
comprehensive plan for all other systems, or the nonwater supply system
portion of a combined general comprehensive plan, shall be reviewed and
approved in accordance with subsection (9) of this section.
(9) The general comprehensive plan shall be submitted to an
engineer designated by the legislative authority of the county in which
fifty-one percent or more of the area of the district is located, and
to the director of health of the county in which the district or any
portion thereof is located, and must be approved in writing by the
engineer and director of health, except that a comprehensive plan
relating to street lighting shall not be submitted to or approved by
the director of health. The general comprehensive plan shall be
approved, conditionally approved, or rejected by the director of health
and by the designated engineer within sixty days of their respective
receipt of the plan. However, this sixty-day time limitation may be
extended by the director of health or engineer for up to an additional
sixty days if sufficient time is not available to review adequately the
general comprehensive plans.
Before becoming effective, the general comprehensive plan shall
also be submitted to, and approved by resolution of, the legislative
authority of every county within whose boundaries all or a portion of
the district lies. The general comprehensive plan shall be approved,
conditionally approved, or rejected by each of the county legislative
authorities pursuant to the criteria in RCW 57.02.040 for approving the
formation, reorganization, annexation, consolidation, or merger of
districts. The resolution, ordinance, or motion of the legislative
body that rejects the comprehensive plan or a part thereof shall
specifically state in what particular the comprehensive plan or part
thereof rejected fails to meet these criteria. The general
comprehensive plan shall not provide for the extension or location of
facilities that are inconsistent with the requirements of RCW
36.70A.110. Nothing in this chapter shall preclude a county from
rejecting a proposed plan because it is in conflict with the criteria
in RCW 57.02.040. Each general comprehensive plan shall be deemed
approved if the county legislative authority fails to reject or
conditionally approve the plan within ninety days of the plan's
submission to the county legislative authority or within thirty days of
a hearing on the plan when the hearing is held within ninety days of
submission to the county legislative authority. However, a county
legislative authority may extend this ninety-day time limitation by up
to an additional ninety days where a finding is made that ninety days
is insufficient to review adequately the general comprehensive plan.
In addition, the commissioners and the county legislative authority may
mutually agree to an extension of the deadlines in this section.
If the district includes portions or all of one or more cities or
towns, the general comprehensive plan shall be submitted also to, and
approved by resolution of, the legislative authorities of the cities
and towns before becoming effective. The general comprehensive plan
shall be deemed approved by the city or town legislative authority if
the city or town legislative authority fails to reject or conditionally
approve the plan within ninety days of the plan's submission to the
city or town or within thirty days of a hearing on the plan when the
hearing is held within ninety days of submission to the county
legislative authority. However, a city or town legislative authority
may extend this time limitation by up to an additional ninety days
where a finding is made that insufficient time exists to adequately
review the general comprehensive plan within these time limitations.
In addition, the commissioners and the city or town legislative
authority may mutually agree to an extension of the deadlines in this
section.
Before becoming effective, the general comprehensive plan shall be
approved by any state agency whose approval may be required by
applicable law. Before becoming effective, any amendment to,
alteration of, or addition to, a general comprehensive plan shall also
be subject to such approval as if it were a new general comprehensive
plan. However, only if the amendment, alteration, or addition affects
a particular city or town, shall the amendment, alteration, or addition
be subject to approval by such particular city or town governing body.

--- END ---