BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Adult family homes may participate in a voluntary adult family
home certification program through the University of Washington
geriatric education center. In addition to the minimum qualifications
required under RCW 70.128.120, individuals participating in the
voluntary adult family home certification program shall complete fifty-two hours of class requirements as established by the University of
Washington geriatric education center. Subjects covered by the class
requirements shall include: Specific age-related physical or mental
health conditions that can be prevented, postponed, or alleviated by a
health promotion intervention, how to establish health promotion
programs in residential settings and communities, preventing falls,
addressing health issues of aging families, and issues and health
concerns of ethnic older adults and those with developmental
disabilities.
(2) Individuals completing the requirements of RCW 70.128.120 and
the voluntary adult family home certification program shall be issued
a certified adult family home license by the department of social and
health services.
(3) The department shall adopt rules implementing the provisions of
this section.

--- END ---