BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the number of
unrequested solicitations to residents for credit cards is a cause for
concern and consider them to be a violation of the consumer protection
laws of Washington state.
The legislature finds that rising interest rates on credit cards
regularly far exceed the state usury limit. The legislature finds many
of the credit card industry's practices and interest rates to be
unethical. The legislature intends to tax the amounts raised by
interest rates that exceed the usury rate at a higher tax rate. The
additional tax revenues shall be deposited into the vocational
education enhancement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person who is a financial institution engaging
within this state in the business of credit card lending; as to these
persons the amount of tax on such a business is equal to the gross
income of the business multiplied by:
(a) The rate of 3 percent, with respect to gross income derived
from the application of interest in an amount greater than the maximum
rate or amount allowed under RCW 19.52.020, but only to the extent that
the income derived exceeds the amount that would otherwise have been
derived, had the maximum rate or amount allowed under RCW 19.52.020
been applied; and
(b) The rate of 1.5 percent, with respect to all other gross
income.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Credit card" means a card, plate, booklet, credit card number,
credit card account number, or other identifying symbol, instrument, or
device that can be used to pay for, or to obtain, credit, goods, or
services.
(b) "Credit card lending" means to charge, take, receive, or
reserve interest, discount or other points, finance charges, or other
similar charges on any credit card.
(c) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as defined under
RCW 30.22.041.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28C.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The vocational education enhancement account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from section 2(1)(a) of
this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for enhancement of expenditures on vocational
education. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Credit card" means a card, plate, booklet, credit card number,
credit card account number, or other identifying symbol, instrument, or
device that can be used to pay for, or to obtain, credit, goods, or
services.
(b) "Financial institution" means a bank, trust company, mutual
savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union authorized
to do business and accept deposits in this state under state law.
(2) A financial institution may not mail an unsolicited credit card
application to a prospective borrower. This section does not prohibit
a financial institution from mailing a credit card application to a
prospective borrower who has asked in writing for the credit card
application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by section 4 of this act are matters vitally affecting the
public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection
act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of section 4 of this act is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business
and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair
method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 4 and 5 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---