BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature for
enforcement standards to apply to all residential services and support
providers.

Sec. 2 RCW 71A.12.270 and 2006 c 303 s 8 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to take one or more of the
enforcement actions listed in subsection (2) of this section when the
department finds that a provider of residential services and support
with whom the department entered into an agreement under this chapter
has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under it;
(b) Failed or refused to cooperate with the certification process;
(c) Prevented or interfered with a certification, inspection, or
investigation by the department;
(d) Failed to comply with any applicable requirements regarding
vulnerable adults under chapter 74.34 RCW; or
(e) Knowingly, or with reason to know, made a false statement of
material fact related to certification or contracting with the
department, or in any matter under investigation by the department.
(2) The department may:
(a) Decertify or refuse to renew the certification of a provider;
(b) Impose conditions on a provider's certification status;
(c) Suspend department referrals to the provider; or
(d) Require a provider to implement a plan of correction developed
by the department and to cooperate with subsequent monitoring of the
provider's progress. In the event a provider fails to implement the
plan of correction or fails to cooperate with subsequent monitoring,
the department may impose civil penalties of not more than one hundred
((fifty)) dollars per day per violation. Each day during which the
same or similar action or inaction occurs constitutes a separate
violation.
(3) When determining the appropriate enforcement action or actions
under subsection (2) of this section, the department must select
actions commensurate with the seriousness of the harm or threat of harm
to the persons being served by the provider. Further, the department
may take enforcement actions that are more severe for violations that
are uncorrected, repeated, pervasive, or which present a serious threat
of harm to the health, safety, or welfare of persons served by the
provider. The department shall by rule develop criteria for the
selection and implementation of enforcement actions authorized in
subsection (2) of this section. Rules adopted under this section shall
include a process for an informal review upon request by a provider.
(4) The provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW apply to enforcement
actions under this section. Except for the imposition of civil
penalties, the effective date of enforcement actions shall not be
delayed or suspended pending any hearing or informal review.
(5) The enforcement actions and penalties authorized in this
section are not exclusive or exhaustive and nothing in this section
prohibits the department from taking any other action authorized in
statute or rule or under the terms of a contract with the provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 71A.12.270 is recodified as a section in
chapter 71A.12 RCW.

--- END ---