BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.170 and 2005 c 418 s 3, 2005 c 225 s 4, 2005 c
224 s 4, and 2005 c 42 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
account which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes;
(c) The assessment of administrative penalties, and the sale of
licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by chapter 77.32 RCW ((and
RCW 77.65.490, except annual resident adult saltwater and all annual
razor clam and shellfish licenses, which shall be deposited into the
state general fund));
(d) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(e) Fees for personalized vehicle, Wild on Washington, and
Endangered Wildlife license plates and Washington's Wildlife license
plate collection as provided in chapter 46.16 RCW;
(f) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(g) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320;
(h) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(i) The sale of personal property seized by the department for
fish, shellfish, or wildlife violations;
(j) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission; ((and))
(k) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under RCW 77.32.560; and
(l) The sale of commercial licenses and permits required under this
title.
(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife account.
(3) As part of the allotment process for the state wildlife
account, any statement of proposed expenditures prepared by the
commission or department under RCW 43.88.110 shall require an ending
fund balance in the state wildlife account of not less than five
percent of the projected biennial revenues to the account, and any
additional employment positions created by the department or commission
and funded at least in part from the state wildlife account or
transfers from the state wildlife account must be specifically approved
by the office of financial management as a part of any allotments for
that purpose.
(4) Beginning November 1, 2007, and again on every odd year
thereafter, the commission shall submit or update to the office of
financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature
a six-year financial plan for the state wildlife account.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.177 and 2001 c 253 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this title, state and county officers
receiving ((the following)) moneys for damages to food fish or
shellfish shall deposit them in the state general fund((:
(a) The sale of commercial licenses required under this title,
except for licenses issued under RCW 77.65.490; and
(b) Moneys received for damages to food fish or shellfish)).
(2) The director shall make weekly remittances to the state
treasurer of moneys collected by the department.
(3) All fines and forfeitures collected or assessed by a district
court for a violation of this title or rule of the department shall be
remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW.
(4) Proceeds from the sale of food fish or shellfish taken in test
fishing conducted by the department, to the extent that these proceeds
exceed the estimates in the budget approved by the legislature, may be
allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.270 to reimburse
the department for unanticipated costs for test fishing operations in
excess of the allowance in the budget approved by the legislature.
(5) Proceeds from the sale of salmon carcasses and salmon eggs from
state general funded hatcheries by the department of general
administration shall be deposited in the regional fisheries enhancement
group account established in RCW 77.95.090.
(6) Moneys received by the commission under RCW 77.12.039, to the
extent these moneys exceed estimates in the budget approved by the
legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW
43.79.270. Allocations under this subsection shall be made only for
the specific purpose for which the moneys were received, unless the
moneys were received in settlement of a claim for damages to food fish
or shellfish, in which case the moneys may be expended for the
conservation of these resources.
(7) Proceeds from the sale of herring spawn on kelp fishery
licenses by the department, to the extent those proceeds exceed
estimates in the budget approved by the legislature, may be allocated
as unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.270. Allocations under this
subsection shall be made only for herring management, enhancement, and
enforcement.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.95.090 and 2000 c 107 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The dedicated regional fisheries enhancement group account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the commission or
the commission's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
((A portion of each recreational fishing license fee shall be used
as provided in RCW 77.32.440.))
(2) The department shall deposit the following into the regional
fisheries enhancement group account:
(a) All revenue from a surcharge of one hundred dollars, which
shall be collected on each commercial salmon fishery license, ((each))
salmon delivery license, and ((each)) salmon charter license sold in
the state((.));
(b) All revenue from the department's sale of salmon carcasses and
eggs that return to group facilities; and
(c)(i) Two dollars for each recreational fishing license sold to an
individual intending to fish for salmon, steelhead, marine fish, or
sturgeon.
(ii) To determine the number of individuals intending to fish for
salmon, steelhead, marine fish, or sturgeon, the department shall
conduct an annual survey of a portion of the individuals who purchased
a recreational fishing license in that year. The survey must be
designed to determine the percentage of licensees surveyed who intended
to, or actually did, fish for salmon, steelhead, marine fish, or
sturgeon. The department shall multiply the percentage number of
individuals intending to fish for salmon, steelhead, marine fish, or
sturgeon against the total number of recreational fishing licenses sold
to determine the total number of recreational fishing licenses that
were sold to individuals intending to fish for salmon, steelhead,
marine fish, or sturgeon.
(3) All receipts ((shall be)) placed in the regional fisheries
enhancement group account ((and shall)) under this section must be used
exclusively for regional fisheries enhancement group projects for the
purposes of RCW 77.95.110, except for revenue collected under
subsection (2)(b) of this section, which must be made available for use
by the regional fisheries enhancement group that produced the surplus
salmon eggs or carcasses.
(4) Funds from the regional fisheries enhancement group account
shall not serve as replacement funding for department operated salmon
projects that exist on January 1, 1991.
((All revenue from the department's sale of salmon carcasses and
eggs that return to group facilities shall be deposited in the regional
fisheries enhancement group account for use by the regional fisheries
enhancement group that produced the surplus.))
(5) The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 77.32.510 (Recreational license fees--Disposition of appropriation) and 1998 c 191 s 43 are each repealed.

--- END ---