BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The fish and wildlife commission shall
conduct a pilot project designed to provide biological information
directly to the commission from a source independent from the
department of fish and wildlife.
(2) In implementing the pilot project required by this section, the
fish and wildlife commission shall contract with private, independent
wildlife biologists to prepare an assessment of current elk and deer
resource management and recommend future management plans for elk and
deer. The commission shall execute separate contracts for an
independent review of deer and elk management on the area encompassing
the habitat of two individual elk herds a year for five years,
beginning with the Mt. St. Helen's elk herd and the Colockum elk herd,
and continuing with two different herds each year.
(3) The department of fish and wildlife shall, in a timely matter,
grant access to any area or provide any information requested by the
wildlife biologists that contract with the fish and wildlife commission
under this section. However, the director of the department of fish
and wildlife and other department employees shall have no additional
contact with the biologists.
(4) The results of the initial assessments and plans developed
under this section by the contract wildlife biologists shall be
reported directly to the fish and wildlife commission by October 31,
2008, with each additional year's information reporting at the end of
that year.
(5) Upon the completion of the pilot project, the chair of the fish
and wildlife commission shall present a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the differences between the management
recommendations made by the independent biologists as compared to
recommendations made by employees of the department of fish and
wildlife.

--- END ---