BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.36.400 and 1986 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((As used in this section:)) The definitions in this subsection
apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) ((An)) "Automatic dialing and announcing device" ((is)) means
a device which automatically dials telephone numbers and plays a
recorded message once a connection is made.
(b) ((Commercial solicitation means the unsolicited initiation of
a telephone conversation for the purpose of encouraging a person to
purchase property, goods, or services.)) "Caller" means an individual,
corporation, limited liability company, partnership, unincorporated
association, or the entity that attempts to contact, or contacts, a
subscriber in the state on the subscriber's telecommunications device,
regardless of whether the call is made through a wireline, wireless,
voice-over internet protocol, or other telecommunications service. A
caller may also include the business entity or affiliated organization
that contracted for the call, regardless of whether the call is placed
from inside or outside the state.
(c) "Subscriber" means a person who has subscribed to receive
telecommunications service in Washington from a provider of
telecommunications services including, but not limited to, wireline,
wireless, and voice-over internet protocol services, or a person
residing with the subscribing person.
(2) ((No person may use)) A caller may not use or connect to a
telecommunications line an automatic dialing and announcing device
((for purposes of commercial solicitation. This section applies to all
commercial solicitation intended to be received by telephone customers
within the state.
(3) A violation of this section is a violation of chapter 19.86
RCW. It shall be presumed that)) to place calls to subscribers who
reside in Washington and whose telephone numbers are assigned to the
state of Washington under the North American numbering plan unless:
(a) The subscriber has knowingly or voluntarily requested, consented
to, permitted, or authorized receipt of the message; or (b) the message
is immediately preceded by a live operator who discloses who is paying
for the message at the beginning of the call and obtains the
subscriber's consent before the message is delivered.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to the following:
(a) Messages from school districts to students, parents, or
employees;
(b) Messages to subscribers with whom the caller has a current
business or personal relationship;
(c) Messages concerning an emergency affecting public safety;
(d) Messages advising employees of work schedules; or
(e) Messages from federal, state, or local government entities or
municipal corporations.
(4) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.
Damages to the recipient ((of commercial solicitations made)) for
receiving a recorded message using an automatic dialing and announcing
device are five hundred dollars per violation.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent
the Washington utilities and transportation commission from adopting
additional rules regulating automatic dialing and announcing devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---