BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) It is unlawful to display human remains to the public for
commercial purposes without valid written authorization from the
deceased. The valid written authorization may be given in the last
will of the deceased or in a document created under RCW 68.50.160 or
68.50.540, or by a person who has the right to control the disposition
of the remains under RCW 68.50.160. The secretary of the department of
health or the secretary's designee must, prior to the display,
determine the adequacy of the documentation offered to establish
authorization for display.
(b) Human remains are presumed to be held in compliance with this
section when the remains are in the possession of an institution
accredited as a museum or in the possession of an accredited
institution of higher education.
(2) This section does not apply to the display of human remains:
(a) More than one hundred years old;
(b) Consisting solely of human teeth or hair;
(c) As part of the ordinary display or viewing of the deceased at
a funeral establishment licensed under chapter 18.39 RCW, or as part of
a similar funeral or memorial service; or
(d) As objects of religious veneration.
(3) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable under
chapter 9A.20 RCW. The attorney general or the appropriate prosecuting
attorney may bring an action to enjoin a violation of this section in
the superior court of Thurston county or the county in which the
violation occurs or is about to occur.
(4) As used in this section, "commercial purposes" includes any
display for which the public is charged a fee or other consideration.

--- END ---