BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.28.080 and 1997 c 452 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Acquisition" includes, but is not limited to, siting,
acquisition, design, construction, refurbishing, expansion, repair, and
improvement, including paying or securing the payment of all or any
portion of general obligation bonds, leases, revenue bonds, or other
obligations issued or incurred for such purpose or purposes under this
chapter.
(2) "Municipality" means any county, city or town of the state of
Washington.
(3) "Operation" includes, but is not limited to, operation,
management, and marketing.
(4) "Person" means the federal government or any agency thereof,
the state or any agency, subdivision, taxing district or municipal
corporation thereof other than county, city or town, any private
corporation, partnership, association, or individual.
(5) "Tourism" means economic activity resulting from tourists,
which may include sales of overnight lodging, meals, tours, gifts, or
souvenirs.
(6) "Tourism promotion" means activities and expenditures designed
to increase tourism, including but not limited to advertising,
publicizing, or otherwise distributing information for the purpose of
attracting and welcoming tourists; developing strategies to expand
tourism; operating tourism promotion agencies; and funding marketing of
special events and festivals designed to attract tourists.
(7) "Tourism-related facility" means real or tangible personal
property with a usable life of three or more years, or constructed with
volunteer labor((,)) that is: (a) Owned by a public entity or a
nonprofit organization described under 501(c)(6) of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended; and (b) used to support
tourism, including visitor information centers, performing arts, or to
accommodate tourist activities.
(8) "Tourist" means a person who travels from a place of residence
to a different town, city, county, state, or country, for purposes of
business, pleasure, recreation, education, arts, heritage, or culture.
(9) "Visitor information center" means real property which is owned
or leased by a municipality or a nonprofit organization under section
501(c)(6) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, and
is used for the purpose of providing information to tourists.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.28.1815 and 1997 c 452 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
All revenue from taxes imposed under this chapter shall be credited
to a special fund in the treasury of the municipality imposing such tax
and used solely for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost
of tourism promotion, acquisition of tourism-related facilities, or
operation of tourism-related facilities. Municipalities may, under
chapter 39.34 RCW, agree to the utilization of revenue from taxes
imposed under this chapter for the purposes of funding a
multijurisdictional tourism-related facility. In addition,
municipalities may contract with a nonprofit organization described
under 501(c)(6) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as
amended, for tourism promotion activities.

--- END ---