BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Minimum licensing requirements under this chapter shall include
a prohibition on the use of window blinds or other window coverings
with pull cords or inner cords capable of forming a loop and posing a
risk of strangulation to young children. Window blinds and other
coverings that have been manufactured or properly retrofitted in a
manner that eliminates the formation of loops posing a risk of
strangulation are not prohibited under this section.
(2) When developing and periodically reviewing minimum licensing
requirements related to safety of the premises, the director shall
consult and give serious consideration to the consumer product safety
commission's most wanted list.
(3) The department may provide information as available regarding
reduced cost or no-cost options for retrofitting or replacing unsafe
window blinds and window coverings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Within funding appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department of early learning shall adopt rules
and a streamlined process for providing small grants to facilities
licensed under chapter 43.215 RCW for costs associated with replacing
window coverings that can not be retrofitted to comply with licensing
requirements. Any grants provided shall be based on need, expense for
replacement with a safe alternative, and overall impact on the child
care program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
Jaclyn Frank act.

--- END ---