BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.065 and 1999 c 249 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The commission shall grant to any person who meets the
eligibility requirements specified in this section a senior citizen's
pass which shall (((a))) entitle such person, and members of his or her
camping unit, to a fifty percent reduction in the campsite rental fee
prescribed by the commission, and (((b))) entitle such person to free
admission to any state park.
(((2))) (b) The commission shall grant a senior citizen's pass to
any person who applies for the same and who meets the following
requirements:
(((a))) (i) The person is at least sixty-two years of age; and
(((b))) (ii) The person is a domiciliary of the state of Washington
and meets reasonable residency requirements prescribed by the
commission; and
(((c))) (iii) The person and his or her spouse have a combined
income which would qualify the person for a property tax exemption
pursuant to RCW 84.36.381((, as now law or hereafter amended)). The
financial eligibility requirements of this ((subparagraph (c)))
subsection (1)(b)(iii) shall apply regardless of whether the applicant
for a senior citizen's pass owns taxable property or has obtained or
applied for such property tax exemption.
(((3))) (c) Each senior citizen's pass granted pursuant to this
section is valid so long as the senior citizen meets the requirements
of (b)(ii) of this subsection (((2)(b) of this section)).
Notwithstanding, any senior citizen meeting the eligibility
requirements of this section may make a voluntary donation for the
upkeep and maintenance of state parks.
(((4))) (d) A holder of a senior citizen's pass shall surrender the
pass upon request of a commission employee when the employee has reason
to believe the holder fails to meet the criteria in (b) of this
subsection (((2)(a), (b), or (c) of this section)). The holder shall
have the pass returned upon providing proof to the satisfaction of the
director of the parks and recreation commission that the holder does
meet the eligibility criteria for obtaining the senior citizen's pass.
(((5))) (2)(a) Any resident of Washington who is disabled as
defined by the social security administration and who receives social
security benefits for that disability, or any other benefits for that
disability from any other governmental or nongovernmental source, or
who is entitled to benefits for permanent disability under RCW
71A.10.020(3) due to unemployability full time at the minimum wage, or
who is legally blind or profoundly deaf, or who has been issued a card,
decal, or special license plate for a permanent disability under RCW
46.16.381 shall be entitled to receive, regardless of age and upon
making application therefor, a disability pass at no cost to the
holder. The pass shall (((a))) entitle such person, and members of his
or her camping unit, to a fifty percent reduction in the campsite
rental fee prescribed by the commission, and (((b))) entitle such
person to free admission to any state park.
(((6))) (b) A card, decal, or special license plate issued for a
permanent disability under RCW 46.16.381 may serve as a pass for the
holder to entitle that person and members of the person's camping unit
to a fifty percent reduction in the campsite rental fee prescribed by
the commission, and to allow the holder free admission to state parks.
(((7))) (3) Any resident of Washington who is a veteran and has a
service-connected disability of at least thirty percent shall be
entitled to receive a lifetime veteran's disability pass at no cost to
the holder. The pass shall: (a) Entitle such person, and members of
his or her camping unit, to free use of any campsite within any state
park; (b) entitle such person to free admission to any state park; and
(c) entitle such person to an exemption from any reservation fees.
(((8))) (4) All passes issued pursuant to this section shall be
valid at all parks any time during the year((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, the pass shall not be valid for admission to concessionaire
operated facilities.
(((9))) (5) The commission may deny or revoke any Washington state
park pass issued under this section for cause, including but not
limited to the following:
(a) Residency outside the state of Washington;
(b) Violation of laws or state park rules resulting in eviction
from a state park;
(c) Intimidating, obstructing, or assaulting a park employee or
park volunteer who is engaged in the performance of official duties;
(d) Fraudulent use of a pass;
(e) Providing false information or documentation in the application
for a state parks pass;
(f) Refusing to display or show the pass to park employees when
requested; or
(g) Failing to provide current eligibility information upon request
by the agency or when eligibility ceases or changes.
(6) This section shall not affect or otherwise impair the power of
the commission to continue or discontinue any other programs it has
adopted for senior citizens.
(((10))) (7) The commission may engage in a mutually agreed upon
reciprocal or discounted program for all or specific pass programs with
other outdoor recreation agencies.
(8) The commission shall adopt such rules as it finds appropriate
for the administration of this section. Among other things, such rules
shall prescribe a definition of "camping unit" which will authorize a
reasonable number of persons traveling with the person having a pass to
stay at the campsite rented by such person, a minimum Washington
residency requirement for applicants for a senior citizen's pass and an
application form to be completed by applicants for a senior citizen's
pass.

--- END ---