BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 6.15.020 and 1999 c 81 s 1 and 1999 c 42 s 603 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington to ensure the well-being of its citizens by protecting retirement income to which they are
or may become entitled. For that purpose generally and pursuant to the
authority granted to the state of Washington under 11 U.S.C. Sec.
522(b)(2), the exemptions in this section relating to retirement
benefits are provided.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by federal law, any money received by
any citizen of the state of Washington as a pension from the government
of the United States, whether the same be in the actual possession of
such person or be deposited or loaned, shall be exempt from execution,
attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal process
whatever, and when a debtor dies, or absconds, and leaves his or her
family any money exempted by this subsection, the same shall be exempt
to the family as provided in this subsection. This subsection shall
not apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter
26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW, if otherwise permitted by federal law.
(3) The right of a person to a pension, annuity, or retirement
allowance or disability allowance, or death benefits, or any optional
benefit, or any other right accrued or accruing to any citizen of the
state of Washington under any employee benefit plan, and any fund
created by such a plan or arrangement, shall be exempt from execution,
attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal process
whatever. This subsection shall not apply to child support collection
actions issued under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW if otherwise
permitted by federal law. This subsection shall permit benefits under
any such plan or arrangement to be payable to a spouse, former spouse,
child, or other dependent of a participant in such plan to the extent
expressly provided for in a qualified domestic relations order that
meets the requirements for such orders under the plan, or, in the case
of benefits payable under a plan described in sections 403(b) or 408 of
the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or section 409 of such
code as in effect before January 1, 1984, to the extent provided in any
order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction that provides for
maintenance or support. This subsection shall not prohibit actions
against an employee benefit plan, or fund for valid obligations
incurred by the plan or fund for the benefit of the plan or fund.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the term "employee benefit
plan" means any plan or arrangement that is described in RCW 49.64.020,
including any Keogh plan, whether funded by a trust or by an annuity
contract, and in sections 401(a) or 403(a) of the internal revenue code
of 1986, as amended; or that is a tax-sheltered annuity described in
section 403(b) of such code or an individual retirement account
described in section 408 of such code; or a Roth individual retirement
account described in section 408A of such code; or a medical savings
account described in section 220 of such code; or an education
individual retirement account described in section 530 of such code; or
a retirement bond described in section 409 of such code as in effect
before January 1, 1984. The term "employee benefit plan" also means
any rights accruing on account of money paid currently or in advance
for purchase of tuition units under the advanced college tuition
payment program in chapter 28B.95 RCW. The term "employee benefit
plan" shall not include any employee benefit plan that is established
or maintained for its employees by the government of the United States,
by the state of Washington under chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32,
41.34, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW or RCW 41.50.770, or by any
agency or instrumentality of the government of the United States.
(5) An employee benefit plan shall be deemed to be a spendthrift
trust, regardless of the source of funds, the relationship between the
trustee or custodian of the plan and the beneficiary, or the ability of
the debtor to withdraw or borrow or otherwise become entitled to
benefits from the plan before retirement. This subsection shall not
apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter 26.18,
26.23, or 74.20A RCW, if otherwise permitted by federal law. This
subsection shall permit benefits under any such plan or arrangement to
be payable to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a
participant in such plan to the extent expressly provided for in a
qualified domestic relations order that meets the requirements for such
orders under the plan, or, in the case of benefits payable under a plan
described in sections 403(b) or 408 of the internal revenue code of
1986, as amended, or section 409 of such code as in effect before
January 1, 1984, to the extent provided in any order issued by a court
of competent jurisdiction that provides for maintenance or support.
(6) Unless contrary to applicable federal law, nothing contained in
subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this section shall be construed as a
termination or limitation of a spouse's community property interest in
an individual retirement account held in the name of or on account of
the other spouse, the account holder spouse. At the death of the
nonaccount holder spouse, the nonaccount holder spouse may transfer or
distribute the community property interest of the nonaccount holder
spouse in the account holder spouse's individual retirement account to
the nonaccount holder spouse's estate, testamentary trust, inter vivos
trust, or other successor or successors pursuant to the last will of
the nonaccount holder spouse or the law of intestate succession, and
that distributee may, but shall not be required to, obtain an order of
a court of competent jurisdiction, including a nonjudicial dispute
resolution agreement ((entered into pursuant to RCW 11.96.170)) or
other order entered under chapter 11.96A RCW, to confirm the
distribution. For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, the
distributee of the nonaccount holder spouse's community property
interest in an individual retirement account shall be considered a
person entitled to the full protection of subsection (3) of this
section. The nonaccount holder spouse's consent to a beneficiary
designation by the account holder spouse with respect to an individual
retirement account shall not, absent clear and convincing evidence to
the contrary, be deemed a release, gift, relinquishment, termination,
limitation, or transfer of the nonaccount holder spouse's community
property interest in an individual retirement account. For purposes of
this subsection, the term "nonaccount holder spouse" means the spouse
of the person in whose name the individual retirement account is
maintained. The term "individual retirement account" includes an
individual retirement account and an individual retirement annuity both
as described in section 408 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as
amended, a Roth individual retirement account as described in section
408A of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, and an
individual retirement bond as described in section 409 of the internal
revenue code as in effect before January 1, 1984. As used in this
subsection, an order of a court of competent jurisdiction includes an
agreement, as that term is used under RCW 11.96A.220.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.04.410 and 1984 c 184 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a consolidated employer is a participating member in the public
employees' retirement system under chapter 41.40 RCW prior to the
consolidation or in the public safety employees' retirement system
under chapter 41.37 RCW prior to the consolidation:
(1) All existing employees of the consolidated employer who are
active members of the public employees' or public safety employees'
retirement system immediately prior to the consolidation shall continue
to be members of that retirement system while employed by the
consolidated employer.
(2) All existing employees of the consolidated employer who are
active members of a first class city retirement system under chapter
41.28 RCW immediately prior to the consolidation shall cease to be
members of that system at the time of the consolidation and, if
eligible, shall immediately become members of the public employees' or
public safety employees' retirement system. However, any such active
member may, by a writing filed with the consolidated employer within
thirty days after the consolidation or within thirty days after March
15, 1984, whichever is later, irrevocably elect instead to continue to
be a member of the first class city retirement system, thereby forever
waiving any rights under the public employees' or public safety
employees' retirement system based upon employment with the
consolidated employer.
(3) Only prospective periods of qualifying service under the public
employees' or public safety employees' retirement system may be
established under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.04.440 and 2000 c 247 s 1101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The sole purpose of RCW 41.04.445 and 41.04.450 is to allow the
members of the retirement systems created in chapters 2.10, 2.12,
41.26, 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, 41.34, and 43.43 RCW to enjoy the
tax deferral benefits allowed under 26 U.S.C. 414(h). Chapter 227,
Laws of 1984 does not alter in any manner the provisions of RCW
41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 which require that the member
contribution rates shall be set so as to provide fifty percent of the
cost of the respective retirement plans.
(2) Should the legislature revoke any benefit allowed under 26
U.S.C. 414(h), no affected employee shall be entitled thereafter to
receive such benefit as a matter of contractual right.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.04.445 and 2000 c 247 s 1102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This section applies to all members who are:
(a) Judges under the retirement system established under chapter
2.10, 2.12, or 2.14 RCW;
(b) Employees of the state under the retirement system established
by chapter 41.32, 41.37, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW;
(c) Employees of school districts under the retirement system
established by chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW, except for substitute
teachers as defined by RCW 41.32.010;
(d) Employees of educational service districts under the retirement
system established by chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW; or
(e) Employees of community college districts under the retirement
system established by chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW.
(2) Only for compensation earned after the effective date of the
implementation of this section and as provided by section 414(h) of the
federal internal revenue code, the employer of all the members
specified in subsection (1) of this section shall pick up only those
member contributions as required under:
(a) RCW 2.10.090(1);
(b) RCW 2.12.060;
(c) RCW 2.14.090;
(d) RCW 41.32.263;
(e) RCW 41.32.350;
(f) RCW 41.40.330 (1) and (3);
(g) RCW 41.45.061 and 41.45.067;
(h) RCW 41.34.070;
(i) RCW 43.43.300; and
(j) RCW 41.34.040.
(3) Only for the purposes of federal income taxation, the gross
income of the member shall be reduced by the amount of the contribution
to the respective retirement system picked up by the employer.
(4) All member contributions to the respective retirement system
picked up by the employer as provided by this section, plus the accrued
interest earned thereon, shall be paid to the member upon the
withdrawal of funds or lump-sum payment of accumulated contributions as
provided under the provisions of the retirement systems.
(5) At least forty-five days prior to implementing this section,
the employer shall provide:
(a) A complete explanation of the effects of this section to all
members; and
(b) Notification of such implementation to the director of the
department of retirement systems.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.04.450 and 2003 c 294 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Employers of those members under chapters 41.26, 41.34, 41.35,
41.37, and 41.40 RCW who are not specified in RCW 41.04.445 may choose
to implement the employer pick up of all member contributions without
exception under RCW 41.26.080(1)(a), 41.26.450, 41.40.330(1),
41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 and chapter 41.34 RCW. If the
employer does so choose, the employer and members shall be subject to
the conditions and limitations of RCW 41.04.445 (3), (4), and (5) and
RCW 41.04.455.
(2) An employer exercising the option under this section may later
choose to withdraw from and/or reestablish the employer pick up of
member contributions only once in a calendar year following forty-five
days prior notice to the director of the department of retirement
systems.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.05.320 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Elected officials and all permanent employees of the state are
eligible to participate in the benefits contribution plan and
contribute amount(s) by agreement with the authority. The authority
may adopt rules to permit participation in the plan by temporary
employees of the state.
(2) Persons eligible under subsection (1) of this section may enter
into benefits contribution agreements with the state.
(3)(a) In the initial year of the medical flexible spending
arrangement or cafeteria plan, if authorized, an eligible person may
become a participant after the adoption of the plan and before its
effective date by agreeing to have a portion of his or her gross salary
contributed and deposited into a health care and other benefits account
to be used for reimbursement of expenses covered by the plan.
(b) After the initial year of the medical flexible spending
arrangement or cafeteria plan, if authorized, an eligible person may
become a participant for a full plan year, with annual benefit
selection for each new plan year made before the beginning of the plan
year, as determined by the authority, or upon becoming eligible.
(c) Once an eligible person elects to participate and the amount of
gross salary that he or she shall contribute and the benefit for which
the funds are to be used during the plan year is determined, the
agreement shall be irrevocable and may not be amended during the plan
year except as provided in (d) of this subsection. Prior to making an
election to participate in the ((benefit[s])) benefits contribution
plan, the eligible person shall be informed in writing of all the
benefits and contributions that will occur as a result of such
election.
(d) The authority shall provide in the benefits contribution plan
that a participant may enroll, terminate, or change his or her election
after the plan year has begun if there is a significant change in a
participant's status, as provided by 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 and the
regulations adopted under that section and defined by the authority.
(4) The authority shall establish as part of the benefits
contribution plan the procedures for and effect of withdrawal from the
plan by reason of retirement, death, leave of absence, or termination
of employment. To the extent possible under federal law, the authority
shall protect participants from forfeiture of rights under the plan.
(5) Any contribution under the benefits contribution plan shall
continue to be included as reportable compensation for the purpose of
computing the state retirement and pension benefits earned by the
employee pursuant to chapters 41.26, 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, and
43.43 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.24.400 and 1999 c 148 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any
municipality may make provision by appropriate legislation and payment
of fees required by RCW 41.24.030(1) solely for the purpose of enabling
any reserve officer to enroll under the retirement pension provisions
of this chapter or fees required under RCW 41.24.030(1) to pay for the
costs of extending the relief provisions of this chapter to its reserve
officers.
(2) A reserve officer is not eligible to receive a benefit under
the retirement provisions of this chapter for service under chapter
41.26, 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, or 41.40 RCW.
(3) Every municipality shall make provisions for the collection and
payment of the fees required under this chapter, and shall continue to
make provisions for all reserve officers who come under this chapter as
long as they continue to be employed as reserve officers.
(4) Except as provided under RCW 41.24.450, a reserve officer is
not eligible to receive a benefit under the relief provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.26.195 and 2003 c 294 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any member of the teachers' retirement system plans 1, 2, or 3, the
public employees' retirement system plans 1, 2, or 3, the public safety
employees' retirement system plan 2, the school employees' retirement
system plans 2 or 3, or the Washington state patrol retirement system
plans 1 or 2 who has previously established service credit in the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 may
make an irrevocable election to have such service transferred to their
current retirement system and plan subject to the following conditions:
(1) If the individual is employed by an employer in an eligible
position, as of July 1, 1997, the election to transfer service must be
filed in writing with the department no later than July 1, 1998. If
the individual is not employed by an employer in an eligible position,
as of July 1, 1997, the election to transfer service must be filed in
writing with the department no later than one year from the date they
are employed by an employer in an eligible position.
(2) An individual transferring service under this section forfeits
the rights to all benefits as a member of the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 and will be permanently
excluded from membership.
(3) Any individual choosing to transfer service under this section
will have transferred to their current retirement system and plan: (a)
All the individual's accumulated contributions; (b) an amount
sufficient to ensure that the employer contribution rate in the
individual's current system and plan will not increase due to the
transfer; and (c) all applicable months of service, as defined in RCW
41.26.030(14)(a).
(4) If an individual has withdrawn contributions from the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1, the
individual may restore the contributions, together with interest as
determined by the director, and recover the service represented by the
contributions for the sole purpose of transferring service under this
section. The contributions must be restored before the transfer can
occur and the restoration must be completed within the time limitations
specified in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) Any service transferred under this section does not apply to
the eligibility requirements for military service credit as defined in
RCW 41.40.170(3) or 43.43.260(3).
(6) If an individual does not meet the time limitations of
subsection (1) of this section, the individual may elect to restore any
withdrawn contributions and transfer service under this section by
paying the amount required under subsection (3)(b) of this section less
any employee contributions transferred.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.31A.020 and 2003 c 294 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On January 1, 2004, and on January 1st of even-numbered years
thereafter, the member account of a person meeting the requirements of
this section shall be credited by the extraordinary investment gain
amount.
(2) The following persons shall be eligible for the benefit
provided in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Any member of the teachers' retirement system plan 3, the
Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3, or the public
employees' retirement system plan 3 who earned service credit during
the twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st immediately
preceding the distribution and had a balance of at least one thousand
dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution; or
(b) Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.875,
41.35.680, or 41.40.820; or
(c) Any person who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and
who:
(i) Completed ten service credit years; or
(ii) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
months after attaining age ((fifty-four)) forty-four; or
(d) Any teacher who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and
who has completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan
2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817; or
(e) Any classified employee who is a retiree pursuant to RCW
41.34.020(8) and who has completed five service credit years by
September 1, 2000, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510;
or
(f) Any public employee who is a retiree pursuant to RCW
41.34.020(8) and who has completed five service credit years by March
1, 2002, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.40.795; or
(g) Any person who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars
in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution and who:
(i) Completed ten service credit years; or
(ii) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
months after attaining age ((fifty-four)) forty-four; or
(h) Any teacher who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars
in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution and who has completed five service credit
years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under
RCW 41.32.817; or
(i) Any classified employee who had a balance of at least one
thousand dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year
immediately preceding the distribution and who has completed five
service credit years by September 1, 2000, and who transferred to plan
3 under RCW 41.35.510; or
(j) Any public employee who had a balance of at least one thousand
dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution and who has completed five service credit
years by March 1, 2002, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW
41.40.795.
(3) The extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated as
follows:
(a) One-half of the sum of the value of the net assets held in
trust for pension benefits in the teachers' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 fund, the Washington school employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 fund, and the public employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 fund at the close of the previous state fiscal
year not including the amount attributable to member accounts;
(b) Multiplied by the amount which the compound average of
investment returns on those assets over the previous four state fiscal
years exceeds ten percent;
(c) Multiplied by the proportion of:
(i) The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous
year of all persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1)
of this section; to
(ii) The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous
year of:
(A) All persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1)
of this section;
(B) Any person who earned service credit in the teachers'
retirement system plan 2, the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2, or the public employees' retirement system plan 2 during
the twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st immediately
preceding the distribution;
(C) Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.765,
41.35.420, or 41.40.630; and
(D) Any person with five or more years of service in the teachers'
retirement system plan 2, the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2, or the public employees' retirement system plan 2;
(d) Divided proportionally among persons eligible for the benefit
provided in subsection (1) of this section on the basis of their
service credit total on August 31st of the previous year.
(4) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to receive this distribution not granted prior to that time.

Sec. 10 RCW 41.37.010 and 2006 c 309 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Retirement system" means the Washington public safety
employees' retirement system provided for in this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(3) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of
Washington.
(4) "Employer" means the Washington state department of
corrections, the Washington state parks and recreation commission, the
Washington state gambling commission, the Washington state patrol, and
the Washington state liquor control board; any county corrections
department; any city corrections department not covered under chapter
41.28 RCW; or other employers employing statewide elective officials.
(5) "Member" means any employee employed by an employer on a full-time basis:
(a) Who is in a position that requires completion of a certified
criminal justice training course and is authorized by their employer to
arrest, conduct criminal investigations, enforce the criminal laws of
the state of Washington, and carry a firearm as part of the job;
(b) Whose primary responsibility is to ensure the custody and
security of incarcerated or probationary individuals as a corrections
officer, probation officer, or jailer;
(c) Who is a limited authority Washington peace officer, as defined
in RCW 10.93.020, for an employer; or
(d) Whose primary responsibility is to supervise members eligible
under this subsection.
(6)(a) "Compensation earnable" for members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services,
including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries
deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b),
414(h), and 457 of the United States internal revenue code, but shall
exclude nonmoney maintenance compensation and lump sum or other
payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation,
unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay.
(b) "Compensation earnable" for members also includes the following
actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:
(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement, which are awarded or granted
as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the individual would have
earned during a payroll period shall be considered compensation
earnable to the extent provided in this subsection, and the individual
shall receive the equivalent service credit;
(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature, the
member shall have the option of having such member's compensation
earnable be the greater of:
(A) The compensation earnable the member would have received had
such member not served in the legislature; or
(B) Such member's actual compensation earnable received for
nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any
additional contributions to the retirement system required because
compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater
than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be
paid by the member for both member and employer contributions;
(iii) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045,
and 72.09.240;
(iv) Compensation that a member would have received but for a
disability occurring in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW
((41.37.070)) 41.37.060;
(v) Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the
leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through
41.04.670; and
(vi) Compensation that a member receives for being in standby
status. For the purposes of this section, a member is in standby
status when not being paid for time actually worked and the employer
requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work, if
the need arises, although the need may not arise.
(7) "Service" means periods of employment by a member on or after
July 1, 2006, for one or more employers for which compensation earnable
is paid. Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any
calendar month shall constitute one service credit month. Compensation
earnable earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours
in any calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month of
service. Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy hours in
any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month of
service. Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is
not service.
Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in
the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.
(a) Service in any state elective position shall be deemed to be
full-time service.
(b) A member shall receive a total of not more than twelve service
credit months of service for such calendar year. If an individual is
employed in an eligible position by one or more employers the
individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during
any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours
is rendered.
(8) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(9) "Service credit month" means a month or an accumulation of
months of service credit which is equal to one.
(10) "Membership service" means all service rendered as a member.
(11) "Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by another person.
(12) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(13) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the
regular interest thereon.
(14) "Average final compensation" means the member's average
compensation earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of
service credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination,
or death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be
used in the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW
41.37.290.
(15) "Final compensation" means the annual rate of compensation
earnable by a member at the time of termination of employment.
(16) "Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(17) "Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions
made by the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(18) "Retirement allowance" means monthly payments to a retiree or
beneficiary as provided in this chapter.
(19) "Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free
from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work.
The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection
consistent with common law.
(20) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when
computed upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as may be
adopted by the director.
(21) "Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a
retirement allowance as provided by this chapter.
(22) "Eligible position" means any permanent, full-time((, fully
compensated)) position included in subsection (5) of this section.
(23) "Ineligible position" means any position which does not
conform with the requirements set forth in subsection (22) of this
section.
(24) "Leave of absence" means the period of time a member is
authorized by the employer to be absent from service without being
separated from membership.
(25) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer while a member.
(26) "Director" means the director of the department.
(27) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(28) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(29) "Plan" means the Washington public safety employees'
retirement system plan 2.
(30) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual
average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage
earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor statistics, United States department of labor.
(31) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the
determination of a postretirement adjustment.
(32) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.
(33) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index
B.
(34) "Separation from service" occurs when a person has terminated
all employment with an employer.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.45.203 and 2006 c 189 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The required employer contribution rate in support of teachers'
retirement system members employed as supreme court justices, court of
appeals judges, and superior court judges who elect to participate
under RCW 41.32.584(1), or who are newly elected or appointed after
January 1, 2007, shall equal the teachers' retirement system employer
contribution rate established under this chapter.
(2) The required contribution rate for members of the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 employed as supreme court justices, court of
appeals judges, and superior court judges who elect to participate
under RCW 41.32.584(1), or who are newly elected or appointed after
January 1, 2007, shall be the deductions established under RCW
41.50.235 plus ((six and twenty-six)) three and seventy-six one-hundredths percent of pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Section 9 of this act is null and void, if
legislation is enacted during 2007 repealing RCW 41.31A.020.

--- END ---