BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.017 and 2003 c 402 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid as
a sundry claim to the estate of an employee of any state agency, the
common school system of the state, or institution of higher education
who dies as a result of (1) injuries sustained in the course of
employment; or (2) an occupational disease or infection that arises
naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter,
and is not otherwise provided a death benefit through coverage under
their enrolled retirement system under chapter 402, Laws of 2003. The
determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent
with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries. The
department of labor and industries shall notify the director of the
department of general administration by order under RCW 51.52.050.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.26.048 and 2006 c 351 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid
to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust or
organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation
duly executed and filed with the department. If there be no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's
death, such member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's
surviving spouse as if in fact such spouse had been nominated by
written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse, then to
such member's legal representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only when death
occurs: (a) As a result of injuries sustained in the course of
employment; or (b) ((to a member of plan 2)) as a result of an
occupational disease or infection that arises naturally and proximately
out of employment covered under this chapter. The determination of
eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW
by the department of labor and industries. The department of labor and
industries shall notify the department of retirement systems by order
under RCW 51.52.050.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.32.053 and 2003 c 402 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid
to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust or
organization as the member has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If no such designated person
or persons are still living at the time of the member's death, the
member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse
as if in fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation, or
if there is no surviving spouse, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death
occurs as a result of (a) injuries sustained in the course of
employment; or (b) an occupational disease or infection that arises
naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.35.115 and 2003 c 402 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid
to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust or
organization as the member has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If no such designated person
or persons are still living at the time of the member's death, the
member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse
as if in fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation, or
if there is no surviving spouse, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death
occurs as a result of (a) injuries sustained in the course of
employment; or (b) an occupational disease or infection that arises
naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.37.110 and 2004 c 242 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid
to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust, or
organization the member has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If the designated person or
persons are not still living at the time of the member's death, the
member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse
as if in fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation, or
if there is no surviving spouse, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death
occurs as a result of (a) injuries sustained in the course of
employment; or (b) an occupational disease or infection that arises
naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.40.0931 and 1998 c 157 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit for members
who had the opportunity to transfer to the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system pursuant to chapter 502, Laws of
1993, but elected to remain in the public employees' retirement system,
shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the member has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If there is no designated
person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, the
member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse
as if in fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation, or
if there is no surviving spouse, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the benefit under
this section shall be paid only where death occurs as a result of (a)
injuries sustained in the course of employment as a general authority
police officer; or (b) an occupational disease or infection that arises
naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.
(3) The benefit under this section shall not be paid in the event
the member was in the act of committing a felony when the fatal
injuries were suffered.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.40.0932 and 2003 c 402 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid
to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust or
organization as the member has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If no such designated person
or persons are still living at the time of the member's death, the
member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse
as if in fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation, or
if there is no surviving spouse, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death
occurs as a result of (a) injuries sustained in the course of
employment; or (b) an occupational disease or infection that arises
naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.43.285 and 1996 c 226 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid
to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust or
organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation
duly executed and filed with the department. If there be no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's
death, such member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's
surviving spouse as if in fact such spouse had been nominated by
written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse, then to
such member's legal representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death
occurs as a result of (a) injuries sustained in the course of
employment; or (b) an occupational disease or infection that arises
naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

--- END ---