BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.08.065 and 1999 c 245 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be in the county of Grant, three judges of the superior
court; in the county of Okanogan, two judges of the superior court; in
the county of Mason, two judges of the superior court; in the county of
Thurston, eight judges of the superior court; in the counties of
Pacific and Wahkiakum jointly, one judge of the superior court; in the
counties of Ferry, Pend Oreille, and Stevens jointly, two judges of the
superior court; ((and)) in the ((counties)) county of San Juan one
judge of the superior court; and in the county of Island ((jointly)),
two judges of the superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The two judicial positions serving San Juan
and Island counties jointly are allocated to Island county effective
the date upon which the judge for San Juan county superior court
assumes office. The additional judicial position created by section 1
of this act is allocated to San Juan county and becomes effective only
if:
(1) San Juan county, through its duly constituted legislative
authority, documents its approval of the additional position and its
agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement
from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as
provided by state law or the state Constitution; and
(2) Island county, through its duly constituted legislative
authority, documents its approval and its agreement that it will pay
out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses
of the two judicial positions currently serving San Juan and Island
counties jointly as provided by state law or the state Constitution.

--- END ---