BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that financial fraud
and crimes against financial institutions and merchants are increasing
exponentially in Washington state. Until recently, these crimes cost
businesses and consumers thousands of dollars in losses. They now cost
millions of dollars. The legislature further finds that noncredit
losses to financial institutions, and credit card, debit card, and
check fraud against merchants impose danger to consumers and their
financial privacy, and burden law enforcement and public prosecutors
with crimes that are difficult to detect and prosecute. The growth in
financial fraud also provides opportunities for organized crime and
terrorist organizations, and undermines the stability and reliability
of financial and other businesses upon which commerce and the economy
rely.
The legislature intends to enable financial institutions and
merchants, to the extent permitted by federal law, to exchange
information to prevent, detect, deter, and assist in the prosecution of
financial fraud, bank robbery, money laundering, identity theft, and
other financial crimes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Designated employees" means security personnel of a financial
institution or merchant designated by it to participate in a fraud
alert network.
(2) "Electronic posting" means the use of a web site or other form
of electronic communication used to display information gathered in
connection with a fraud alert network.
(3) "Financial crimes" means any act, including any anticipatory or
completed offense, committed for financial gain, that is chargeable or
indictable, regardless of whether the act is actually charged or
indicted, as a violation of a state or federal criminal law prohibiting
false representation, frauds and swindles in violation of chapter 9.45
RCW, forgery, obtaining a signature by deception or duress, criminal
impersonation, false certification, unlawful issuance of checks,
drafts, funds transfers and payment instructions, identity theft,
improperly obtaining financial information, robbery, bank robbery,
theft, scams, tax evasion, embezzlement, money laundering, use of
proceeds of criminal profiteering, false representation concerning
credit, false statement by deposit account applicant, false
representation concerning title, forgery of a digital signature or
other violation of RCW 9.38.060, burglary when it involves entering the
premises of a financial institution or retail establishment, unlawful
possession of payment instruments, unlawful production of payment
instruments, unlawful possession of a personal identification device,
unlawful possession of fictitious identification, unlawful possession
of instruments of financial fraud, possession of another's
identification, display or possession of a fraudulently issued driver's
license or identicard, display or representation as one's own the
driver's license or identicard of another person, unlawful factoring of
a credit card or payment card transaction, or other state or federal
law prohibiting a financial-related crime.
(4) "Financial institution" means: (a) Any person doing business
under the laws of any state or the United States relating to commercial
banks, bank holding companies, financial holding companies, savings
banks, savings and loan associations, trust companies, or credit
unions; (b) any office of an international banking corporation, branch
of a foreign bank, or corporation organized pursuant to the Bank
Service Corporation Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1861-1867) or a corporation
organized under the Edge Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 611-633); (c)
subsidiaries, affiliates, service corporations of the persons in (a)
and (b) of this subsection; (d) third-party service providers that
provide servicing, processing, account maintenance, or security for the
persons in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection; or (e) any group,
organization, or association consisting primarily of the persons in (a)
through (c) of this subsection including, without limitation, the
Washington bankers association, the American bankers association, and
other associations of banks, savings institutions, and/or credit
unions, whether inside or outside the state of Washington. However, a
group or association in this subsection (4)(e) that obtains access to
a fraud alert network may provide access to that network or to
information received from that network only to persons described in (a)
through (d) of this subsection.
(5) "Fraud alert network" means a program established by and among
financial institutions and/or merchants to prevent, detect, deter, and
assist in the prosecution of financial crimes, including a program in
which information is shared by means of electronic posting.
(6) "Merchant" means a person engaged in the business of selling,
leasing, or distributing goods or services and has an existing
contractual relationship or contract with a financial institution.
(7) "Participant" means a financial institution or merchant that
participates in a fraud alert network.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) This chapter provides immunity from
liability for financial institutions and merchants who participate in
a fraud alert network and who comply with the provisions of this
chapter and the standards of use set forth in this subsection as
follows:
(a) Access to the fraud alert network is private and limited to
financial institutions, merchants, and law enforcement agencies;
(b) The sole purpose of the fraud alert network is to share
information among financial institutions, merchants, and law
enforcement agencies to prevent, detect, deter, and assist in the
prosecution of financial crimes;
(c) Information furnished to the fraud alert network consists of:
(i) Descriptions of recent actual or suspected financial crimes
perpetrated against or coming to the attention of the participant
furnishing the information; (ii) descriptions, photographs, images,
reproductions, fingerprints, identifying features, traits, habits,
background, or other data related to identifying the person, persons,
or groups suspected of committing, aiding, or abetting financial
crimes; (iii) identifying information regarding methods of operation,
devices, tricks, or schemes used by persons suspected of financial
crimes; (iv) descriptions, photographs, images, or reproductions of
writings, communications, checks, and personal identification used in
connection with suspected financial crimes; (v) descriptions,
photographs, images, or reproductions of vehicles, license plates,
weapons, devices, or other things used in connection with suspected
financial crimes; (vi) cautionary statements regarding suspects, for
example a statement that a suspect is armed and dangerous; and (vii)
other information that allows participants to identify financial
crimes, to identify persons suspected in connection with financial
crimes, to assist in the apprehension of persons suspected of financial
crimes, or to contact others for further information;
(d) Information furnished to the fraud alert network may not
consist of delinquent payment information, nor may it consist of other
similar evidence of a person's credit history, except in the
exceptional instance where such evidence is an integral part of
information provided under (c) of this subsection and is reasonably
believed to be related to a financial crime;
(e) Information posted must be accessible only to designated
employees, and the distribution of information is limited to those
employees, attorneys, and agents of participants who have job-related
duties relevant to the use of such information in connection with
preventing, detecting, deterring, or assisting in the prosecution of
financial crimes;
(f) The fraud alert network has procedures reasonably calculated to
ensure the security of the information obtained;
(g) Users of the fraud alert network are informed that the
information obtained from the fraud alert network may not be used to
evaluate and make decisions about applications for loans, lines of
credit, and credit cards;
(h) Information furnished pursuant to the fraud alert network is
limited to statements of fact that the person furnishing the
information reasonably believes to be true. However, in exigent
circumstances, information may be furnished without such reasonable
belief if the circumstances creating an emergency are described, and
cautionary advice is provided regarding the limited knowledge of the
person furnishing the information; and
(i) The fraud alert network has an operator that: (i) Employs
procedures to promptly correct and erase information that the operator
learns is erroneous or was submitted or posted to the fraud alert
network not in compliance with this section; (ii) takes reasonable
steps to limit access to the fraud alert network to financial
institutions, merchants, and law enforcement agencies; and (iii) denies
access to the fraud alert network to persons who are not financial
institutions, merchants, or law enforcement agencies or who do not
abide by the provisions of this chapter.
(2) Washington law governs the operation of a fraud alert network.
A participant or law enforcement agency that participates in a fraud
alert network in accordance with subsection (1) of this section,
whether through furnishing, posting, communicating, or using
information in connection thereto, has immunity from civil liability
under the laws of the state of Washington and its political
subdivisions and, to the extent the conflicts of law rules of any other
jurisdiction refer to the law of the state of Washington, under the
laws and rules of such other jurisdiction and its political
subdivisions. However, this immunity does not apply to statutory
violations.
(3) Any financial institution or merchant that makes a voluntary
disclosure of any possible violation of law or regulation to a federal,
state, or local government or agency in connection with information
obtained from a fraud alert network is immune from civil liability for
such disclosure or for any failure to provide notice of such disclosure
to the person who is the subject of or identified in the disclosure,
under the laws and rules of the state of Washington and its political
subdivisions and, to the extent the conflicts of law rules of any other
jurisdiction refer to the law of the state of Washington, under the
laws and rules of such other jurisdiction and its political
subdivisions, and under any contract or other legally enforceable
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The immunity under section 3 of this act
does not apply to any participant that:
(1) Provides false information to the fraud alert network that the
participant does not reasonably believe to be true. However, in
exigent circumstances, information may be furnished without that
reasonable belief if the circumstances creating an emergency are
described, and cautionary advice is provided regarding the limited
knowledge of the person furnishing the information;
(2) Fails to maintain review procedures to remove or correct false,
outdated, incomplete, or erroneous information furnished by it to the
fraud alert network;
(3) Fails to maintain procedures to ensure that information
obtained from the fraud alert network is provided only to employees,
attorneys, or agents who have job-related duties relevant to the use of
such information;
(4) Uses information obtained from the fraud alert network to
evaluate and make decisions about applications for loans, lines of
credit, and credit cards;
(5) Uses information for a purpose other than preventing,
detecting, deterring, and assisting in the prosecution of financial
crimes;
(6) Uses, reproduces, distributes, publishes, forwards, shares,
sells, or communicates any information obtained from the fraud alert
network for a commercial purpose, such as for advertising or marketing;
or
(7) Provides, sells, or resells access to the fraud alert network
to a person who is not a participant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) It is the intent of this chapter to
encourage the sharing of information consistent with federal law.
(2) A fraud alert network is intended to protect against or prevent
actual or potential fraud and unauthorized transactions, claims, or
other liability, and is intended to be exempt from the privacy
disclosure requirements of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999.
(3) It is intended that so long as the participants comply with
this chapter, the provisions of the Washington fair credit reporting
act, chapter 19.182 RCW, do not apply to the fraud alert network.
However, if it is determined that the federal fair credit reporting act
applies to a fraud alert network, the Washington fair credit reporting
act also applies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This chapter shall be construed to encourage
the sharing of information by financial institutions, merchants, and
law enforcement for the prevention and prosecution of financial fraud.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This chapter may be known and cited as the
financial fraud alert act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---