BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many businesses,
associations, and organizations providing goods and services to the
public, conducting other activity in Washington, or otherwise affecting
residents of Washington now operate nationally or globally and often
maintain their business records in a location outside the state of
Washington. The legislature further finds that bringing persons or
organizations committing crimes in Washington to justice is a matter of
great public interest because crimes have a significant effect on
businesses, associations, and other organizations that conduct business
in Washington, as well as on Washington citizens. Crimes result in
significant harm and losses to persons, businesses, associations, and
other organizations victimized, as well as persons not directly
victimized when businesses or others more directly affected by the
crimes must raise prices to cover crime losses. The ability of law
enforcement and the criminal justice system to effectively perform
their duties to the public often depends upon law enforcement agencies,
prosecutors, and criminal defense attorneys being able to obtain and
use records relevant to crimes that affect Washington's citizens,
businesses, associations, organizations, and others who provide goods
or services, or conduct other activity in Washington. In the course of
fulfilling their duties to the public, law enforcement agencies,
prosecutors, and criminal defense attorneys must frequently obtain
records from these entities, and be able to use the records in court.
The ability to obtain and use these records has an impact on Washington
citizens because it affects the ability to enforce Washington's
criminal laws and affects the deterrence value arising from criminal
prosecution. Effectively combating crime requires laws facilitating
and requiring that all those who possess records relevant to a criminal
investigation comply with the legal process issued in connection with
criminal investigations or litigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adverse result" includes one of the following possible
consequences:
(a) Danger to the life or physical safety of an individual;
(b) A flight from prosecution;
(c) The destruction of, potential loss of, or tampering with
evidence;
(d) The intimidation of potential witnesses;
(e) Jeopardy to an investigation or undue delay of a trial.
(2) "Applicant" means a law enforcement officer, prosecuting
attorney, deputy or special deputy prosecuting attorney, or defense
attorney who is seeking criminal process under section 3 of this act.
(3) "Criminal process" means a search warrant or legal process
issued pursuant to RCW 10.79.015 and CrR 2.3; any process issued
pursuant to chapter 9.73, 9A.82, 10.27, or 10.29 RCW; and any other
legal process signed by a judge of the superior court and issued in a
criminal matter which allows the search for or commands production of
records that are in the actual or constructive possession of the
recipient, regardless of whether the recipient or the records are
physically located within the state.
(4) "Defense attorney" means an attorney of record for a person
charged with a crime when the attorney is seeking the issuance of
criminal process for the defense of the criminal case.
(5) "Properly served" means delivery by hand or in a manner
reasonably allowing for proof of delivery if delivered by United States
mail, overnight delivery service, or facsimile to the recipient
addressee of criminal process.
(6) "Recipient" means a person, as defined in RCW 9A.04.110, or a
business, as defined in RCW 5.45.010, upon whom criminal process issued
under this chapter is properly served.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following shall apply to any criminal
process allowing for search of or commanding production of records that
are in the actual or constructive possession of a recipient who
receives service outside Washington, regardless of whether the
recipient or the records are physically located within the state.
(1) When properly served with criminal process issued under this
section, the recipient shall provide the applicant all records sought
pursuant to the criminal process. The records shall be produced within
twenty business days of receipt of the criminal process, unless the
process requires earlier production. An applicant may consent to a
recipient's request for additional time to comply with the criminal
process.
(2) Criminal process issued under this section must contain the
following language in bold type on the first page of the document:
"This [warrant, subpoena, order] is issued pursuant to RCW [insert
citation to this statute]. A response is due within twenty business
days of receipt, unless a shorter time is stated herein, or the
applicant consents to a recipient's request for additional time to
comply."
(3) If the judge finds that failure to produce records within
twenty business days would cause an adverse result, the criminal
process may require production of records within less than twenty
business days. A court may reasonably extend the time required for
production of the records upon finding that the recipient has shown
good cause for that extension and that an extension of time would not
cause an adverse result.
(4) When properly served with criminal process issued under this
section, a recipient who seeks to quash the criminal process must seek
relief from the court where the criminal process was issued, within the
time originally required for production of records. The court shall
hear and decide the motion no later than five court days after the
motion is filed. An applicant's consent, under subsection (1) of this
section, to a recipient's request for additional time to comply with
the criminal process does not extend the date by which a recipient must
seek the relief designated in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Upon written request from the applicant,
or if ordered by the court, the recipient of criminal process shall
verify the authenticity of records that it produces by providing an
affidavit, declaration, or certification that complies with subsection
(2) of this section and providing contact information for the person
completing the affidavit, declaration, or certification. Records
produced in compliance with this section are admissible as evidence.
(2) A record provided by a recipient of criminal process under this
section shall not be excluded as hearsay evidence or for lack of
foundation or authentication if accompanied by an affidavit,
declaration, or certification by its record custodian or other
qualified person that attests to the following:
(a) The record was made at or near the time of the act, condition,
or event set forth in the record by, or from information transmitted
by, a person with knowledge of those matters;
(b) The record was made in the regular course of business;
(c) States the identity of the record and sets forth the mode of
its preparation; and
(d) If such record is not the original, it is a duplicate that
accurately reproduces the original.
(3) No evidence in the records in the form of opinion or diagnosis
is admissible under this section unless the opinion or diagnosis would
otherwise be admissible.
(4) A party intending to offer a record into evidence under this
section must provide written notice of that intention to all adverse
parties, and must make the record and affidavit, declaration, or
certification available for inspection sufficiently in advance of their
offer into evidence to provide an adverse party with a fair opportunity
to challenge them. A motion opposing admission in evidence of the
record shall be made and determined by the court before trial and with
sufficient time to allow the party offering the record time, if the
motion is granted, to produce the custodian of records or other
qualified person at trial, without creating hardship on the party or on
the custodian or other qualified person. A motion opposing
introduction of the records must be based on one or more of the
following reasons: (a) Failure to comply with this section; (b)
failure of the records, as proposed to be offered, to be substantially
understood without further explanation and no other witness is
available to explain them; or (c) admission of the records would
violate ER 403.
(5) Failure by a party to timely file a motion under subsection (4)
of this section shall constitute a waiver of objection to admission of
the evidence, but the court for good cause shown may grant relief from
the waiver. When the court grants relief from the waiver, and
thereafter determines the custodian of records shall appear, a
continuance of the trial may be granted to provide the proponent of the
records sufficient time to arrange for the necessary witness to appear.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes either party from calling the
custodian of record of the record or other witness to testify regarding
the record.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A Washington recipient, when served with
process that was issued by or in another state that, if it were issued
in Washington, would be criminal process, shall comply with that
process as if that warrant or other qualifying legal process had been
issued by a Washington court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A recipient of criminal process or process
under sections 2 and 5 of this act, and any other person that responds
to such process is immune from civil liability for complying with the
process, and for any failure to provide notice of any disclosure to the
person who is the subject of or identified in the disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A judge of the superior court may issue any
criminal process to any recipient at any address, within or without the
state, for any matter over which the court has criminal jurisdiction
pursuant to RCW 9A.04.030. This provision does not limit a court's
authority to issue warrants or legal process under other provisions of
state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 10 RCW.

--- END ---