BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.080 and 2001 c 165 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Under the qualifications, terms, conditions, and benefits set
by the board:
(a) Retired or disabled state employees, retired or disabled school
employees, or employees of county, municipal, or other political
subdivisions covered by this chapter who are retired may continue their
participation in insurance plans and contracts after retirement or
disablement;
(b) Separated employees may continue their participation in
insurance plans and contracts if participation is selected immediately
upon separation from employment;
(c) Retired or disabled school employees who do not immediately
enroll in a medical plan developed by the board at the time of
separation from employment may later enroll by providing proof of
continuous coverage through other comprehensive employer group medical
coverage;
(d) Surviving spouses and dependent children of emergency service
personnel killed in the line of duty may participate in insurance plans
and contracts.
(2) Rates charged surviving spouses of emergency service personnel
killed in the line of duty, retired or disabled employees, separated
employees, spouses, or dependent children who are not eligible for
parts A and B of medicare shall be based on the experience of the
community rated risk pool established under RCW 41.05.022.
(3) Rates charged to surviving spouses of emergency service
personnel killed in the line of duty, retired or disabled employees,
separated employees, spouses, or children who are eligible for parts A
and B of medicare shall be calculated from a separate experience risk
pool comprised only of individuals eligible for parts A and B of
medicare; however, the premiums charged to medicare-eligible retirees
and disabled employees shall be reduced by the amount of the subsidy
provided under RCW 41.05.085.
(4) Surviving spouses and dependent children of emergency service
personnel killed in the line of duty and retired or disabled and
separated employees shall be responsible for payment of premium rates
developed by the authority which shall include the cost to the
authority of providing insurance coverage including any amounts
necessary for reserves and administration in accordance with this
chapter. These self pay rates will be established based on a separate
rate for the employee, the spouse, and the children.
(5) The term "retired state employees" for the purpose of this
section shall include but not be limited to members of the legislature
whether voluntarily or involuntarily leaving state office.

--- END ---