BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 88.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person, or vessel, in the water is not allowed within twenty-five yards of a Washington state ferry terminal structure over water,
excluding the Eagle Harbor maintenance facility, unless otherwise
authorized by federal, state, or local authorities.
(2) Every person who violates this section is guilty of a class 1
civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW, and may be fined up to one
hundred dollars.

--- END ---