BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In 1977, the legislature adopted the
Washington basic education act of 1977 to set forth an education
program that complies with the requirements of Article IX, sections 1
and 2, of the state Constitution. Subsequently, the courts have held
that included in the state's obligation for basic education under
Article IX, sections 1 and 2 of the state Constitution, is the
provision of several programs in addition to the program contained in
the Washington basic education act of 1977. In 1983, Thurston county
superior court Judge Robert J. Doran held in Seattle School District
No. 1 v. State, Thurston Co. Superior Court No. 81-2-1713-1 (1983),
that the program of basic education required by Article IX of the state
Constitution includes certain programs in addition to the program set
forth in the basic education act. Judge Doran identified these
additional programs in his 1983 decision. Following Judge Doran's
decision, the legislature has proceeded as though those programs held
by Judge Doran to be part of the state's obligations under Article IX
of the state Constitution are part of basic education. The purpose of
this act is to set forth in a separate chapter for clarity and ease of
reference all statutes the courts have held to be part of the program
of basic education. This act does not expand, diminish, or alter the
state's basic education obligations under Article IX of the state
Constitution.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.200 and 1990 c 33 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
((This 1977 amendatory act)) Chapter 359, Laws of 1977 ex. sess.
shall be known and may be cited as "The Washington basic education act
of 1977." The program evolving from the basic education act shall
include (1) the goal of the school system as defined in RCW 28A.150.210
(as recodified by this act), (2) those program requirements enumerated
in RCW 28A.150.220 (as recodified by this act), and (3) the
determination and distribution of state resources as defined in RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 (as recodified by this act).
The requirements of the basic education act are deemed by the
legislature to comply with the requirements of Article IX, section 1 of
the state Constitution, which states that "It is the paramount duty of
the state to make ample provision for the education of all children
residing within its borders, without distinction or preference on
account of race, color, caste, or sex," and are adopted pursuant to
Article IX, section 2 of the state Constitution, which states that "The
legislature shall provide for a general and uniform system of public
schools." This act is not intended to expand, diminish, or alter the
state's basic education obligations under Article IX of the state
Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter and RCW 28A.400.200 unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Instructional hours" means those hours students are provided
the opportunity to engage in educational activity planned by and under
the direction of school district staff, as directed by the
administration and board of directors of the district, inclusive of
intermissions for class changes, recess, and teacher/parent-guardian
conferences that are planned and scheduled by the district for the
purpose of discussing students' educational needs or progress, and
exclusive of time actually spent for meals.
(2) "Basic education certificated instructional staff" means all
full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff in the following
programs as defined for statewide school district accounting purposes:
Basic education, secondary vocational education, general instructional
support, and general supportive service.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.220 and 1993 c 371 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Satisfaction of the basic education program requirements
identified in RCW 28A.150.210 (as recodified by this act) shall be
considered to be implemented by the following program:
(a) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in kindergarten at least a total instructional offering of four hundred
fifty hours. The program shall include instruction in the essential
academic learning requirements ((under RCW 28A.630.885)) and such other
subjects and such activities as the school district shall determine to
be appropriate for the education of the school district's students
enrolled in such program;
(b) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in grades one through twelve, at least a district-wide annual average
total instructional hour offering of one thousand hours. The state
board of education may define alternatives to classroom instructional
time for students in grades nine through twelve enrolled in alternative
learning experiences. The state board of education shall establish
rules to determine annual average instructional hours for districts
including fewer than twelve grades. The program shall include the
essential academic learning requirements ((under RCW 28A.630.885)) and
such other subjects and such activities as the school district shall
determine to be appropriate for the education of the school district's
students enrolled in such group;
(c) Each school district shall maintain a ratio of at least forty-six basic education certificated staff to one thousand annual average
full-time equivalent students;
(d) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages.
(e) Each school district shall make available to all eligible and
enrolled students with disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020 the
opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense as provided
in chapter 28A.155 RCW;
(f) Each school district shall make available to all eligible and
enrolled students in grades kindergarten through twelve transportation
to and from school as provided in chapter 28A.160 RCW;
(g) Each school district participating in the learning assistance
program, as set forth in chapter 28A.165 RCW, shall provide a program
to participating students that complies with the requirements of
chapter 28A.165 RCW;
(h) Each school district shall make available to each eligible and
enrolled student transitional bilingual instruction as required by
chapter 28A.180 RCW;
(i) Each education provider under chapter 28A.193 RCW shall provide
a program of education to eligible and participating juvenile inmates
as provided by chapter 28A.193 RCW.
(2) Nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to require individual students to attend school for any
particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.
(3) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty
school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten: PROVIDED, That ((effective May 1, 1979,))
a school district may schedule the last five school days of the one
hundred and eighty day school year for noninstructional purposes in the
case of students who are graduating from high school, including, but
not limited to, the observance of graduation and early release from
school upon the request of a student, and all such students may be
claimed as a full time equivalent student to the extent they could
otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and
28A.150.260 (as recodified by this act).
(4) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 (as recodified by this act),
and such related supplemental program approval requirements as the
state board may establish.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.150.250 and 1990 c 33 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
From those funds made available by the legislature for the current
use of the common schools, the superintendent of public instruction
shall distribute annually as provided in RCW 28A.510.250 to each school
district of the state operating a program approved by the state board
of education an amount which, when combined with an appropriate portion
of such locally available revenues, other than receipts from federal
forest revenues distributed to school districts pursuant to RCW
28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020, as the superintendent of public
instruction may deem appropriate for consideration in computing state
equalization support, excluding excess property tax levies, will
constitute a basic education allocation in dollars for each annual
average full time equivalent student enrolled, based upon one full
school year of one hundred eighty days, except that for kindergartens
one full school year shall be one hundred eighty half days of
instruction, or the equivalent as provided in RCW 28A.150.220 (as
recodified by this act).
Basic education shall be considered to be fully funded by those
amounts of dollars appropriated by the legislature pursuant to RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 (as recodified by this act) to fund those
program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 (as recodified by
this act) in accordance with the formula and ratios provided in RCW
28A.150.260 (as recodified by this act) and those amounts of dollars
appropriated by the legislature to fund the salary requirements of RCW
((28A.150.100)) 28A.150.220 (as recodified by this act) and
28A.150.410.
Operation of a program approved by the state board of education,
for the purposes of this section, shall include a finding that the
ratio of students per classroom teacher in grades kindergarten through
three is not greater than the ratio of students per classroom teacher
in grades four and above for such district: PROVIDED, That for the
purposes of this section, "classroom teacher" shall be defined as an
instructional employee possessing at least a provisional certificate,
but not necessarily employed as a certificated employee, whose primary
duty is the daily educational instruction of students: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the state board of education shall adopt rules and
regulations to insure compliance with the student/teacher ratio
provisions of this section, and such rules and regulations shall allow
for exemptions for those special programs and/or school districts which
may be deemed unable to practicably meet the student/teacher ratio
requirements of this section by virtue of a small number of students.
If a school district's basic education program fails to meet the
basic education requirements enumerated in RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.220 (as recodified by this act), the state
board of education shall require the superintendent of public
instruction to withhold state funds in whole or in part for the basic
education allocation until program compliance is assured: PROVIDED,
That the state board of education may waive this requirement in the
event of substantial lack of classroom space.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2006 c 263 s 322 are each amended to
read as follows:
The basic education allocation for each annual average full time
equivalent student shall be determined in accordance with the following
procedures:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula based on a ratio of students
to staff for the distribution of a basic education allocation for each
annual average full time equivalent student enrolled in a common
school. The distribution formula shall have the primary objective of
equalizing educational opportunities and shall provide appropriate
recognition of the following costs among the various districts within
the state:
(a) Certificated instructional staff and their related costs;
(b) Certificated administrative staff and their related costs;
(c) Classified staff and their related costs;
(d) Nonsalary costs;
(e) Extraordinary costs, including school facilities, of remote and
necessary schools as judged by the superintendent of public
instruction, with recommendations from the school facilities citizen
advisory panel under RCW 28A.525.025, and small high schools, including
costs of additional certificated and classified staff; and
(f) The attendance of students pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and
28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district.
(2)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall
be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature. The formula shall be for allocation
purposes only. While the legislature intends that the allocations for
additional instructional staff be used to increase the ratio of such
staff to students, nothing in this section shall require districts to
reduce the number of administrative staff below existing levels.
(b) The formula adopted by the legislature shall reflect the
following ratios at a minimum: (i) Forty-nine certificated
instructional staff to one thousand annual average full time equivalent
students enrolled in grades kindergarten through three; (ii) forty-six
certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average full
time equivalent students in grades four through twelve; (iii) four
certificated administrative staff to one thousand annual average full
time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through twelve; and
(iv) sixteen and sixty-seven one-hundredths classified personnel to one
thousand annual average full time equivalent students enrolled in
grades kindergarten through twelve.
(c) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect: PROVIDED, That the distribution formula developed
pursuant to this section shall be for state apportionment and
equalization purposes only and shall not be construed as mandating
specific operational functions of local school districts other than
those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 ((and
28A.150.100)) (as recodified by this act). The enrollment of any
district shall be the annual average number of full time equivalent
students and part time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350 (as
recodified by this act), enrolled on the first school day of each month
and shall exclude full time equivalent students with disabilities
recognized for the purposes of allocation of state funds for programs
under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100. The definition of full time
equivalent student shall be determined by rules of the superintendent
of public instruction: PROVIDED, That the definition shall be included
as part of the superintendent's biennial budget request: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That any revision of the present definition shall not take
effect until approved by the house appropriations committee and the
senate ways and means committee: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the office of
financial management shall make a monthly review of the
superintendent's reported full time equivalent students in the common
schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.
(3)(a) Certificated instructional staff shall include those persons
employed by a school district who are nonsupervisory employees within
the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(8): PROVIDED, That in exceptional cases,
people of unusual competence but without certification may teach
students so long as a certificated person exercises general
supervision: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the hiring of such classified
people shall not occur during a labor dispute and such classified
people shall not be hired to replace certificated employees during a
labor dispute.
(b) Certificated administrative staff shall include all those
persons who are chief executive officers, chief administrative
officers, confidential employees, supervisors, principals, or assistant
principals within the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(4).

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.150.290 and 1992 c 141 s 504 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall have the power
and duty to make such rules ((and regulations)) as are necessary for
the proper administration of this chapter, chapter 28A.150 RCW, and RCW
28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210, 28A.300.035,
28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010 not inconsistent with the provisions
thereof, and in addition to require such reports as may be necessary to
carry out his or her duties under this chapter, chapter 28A.150 RCW,
and RCW 28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210, 28A.300.035,
28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall have the
authority to make rules ((and regulations which)) that establish the
terms and conditions for allowing school districts to receive state
basic education moneys as provided in RCW 28A.150.250 (as recodified by
this act) when said districts are unable to fulfill for one or more
schools as officially scheduled the requirement of a full school year
of one hundred eighty days or the annual average total instructional
hour offering imposed by RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.260 (as recodified
by this act) due to one or more of the following conditions:
(a) An unforeseen natural event, including, but not necessarily
limited to, a fire, flood, explosion, storm, earthquake, epidemic, or
volcanic eruption that has the direct or indirect effect of rendering
one or more school district facilities unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible,
or ((inoperable)) inoperative; and
(b) An unforeseen mechanical failure or an unforeseen action or
inaction by one or more persons, including negligence and threats, that
(i) is beyond the control of both a school district board of directors
and its employees and (ii) has the direct or indirect effect of
rendering one or more school district facilities unsafe, unhealthy,
inaccessible, or ((inoperable)) inoperative. Such actions, inactions
or mechanical failures may include, but are not necessarily limited to,
arson, vandalism, riots, insurrections, bomb threats, bombings, delays
in the scheduled completion of construction projects, and the
discontinuance or disruption of utilities such as heating, lighting and
water: PROVIDED, That an unforeseen action or inaction shall not
include any labor dispute between a school district board of directors
and any employee of the school district.
A condition is foreseeable for the purposes of this subsection to
the extent a reasonably prudent person would have anticipated prior to
August first of the preceding school year that the condition probably
would occur during the ensuing school year because of the occurrence of
an event or a circumstance which existed during such preceding school
year or a prior school year. A board of directors of a school district
is deemed for the purposes of this subsection to have knowledge of
events and circumstances which are a matter of common knowledge within
the school district and of those events and circumstances which can be
discovered upon prudent inquiry or inspection.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall make every
effort to reduce the amount of paperwork required in administration of
this chapter, chapter 28A.150 RCW, and RCW 28A.160.150 through
((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210, 28A.300.035, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010;
to simplify the application, monitoring and evaluation processes used;
to eliminate all duplicative requests for information from local school
districts; and to make every effort to integrate and standardize
information requests for other state education acts and federal aid to
education acts administered by the superintendent of public instruction
so as to reduce paperwork requirements and duplicative information
requests.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.150.360 and 1995 c 335 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the event of an unforeseen emergency, in the nature of either an
unavoidable cost to a district or unexpected variation in anticipated
revenues to a district, the state superintendent is authorized, for not
to exceed two years, to make such an adjustment in the allocation of
funds as is consistent with the intent of this chapter, chapter 28A.150
RCW, RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.210, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010
in providing an equal educational opportunity for the children of such
district or districts.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.150.410 and 2002 c 353 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature shall establish for each school year in the
appropriations act a statewide salary allocation schedule, for
allocation purposes only, to be used to distribute funds for basic
education certificated instructional staff salaries under RCW
28A.150.260 (as recodified by this act).
(2) Salary allocations for state-funded basic education
certificated instructional staff shall be calculated by the
superintendent of public instruction by determining the district's
average salary for certificated instructional staff, using the
statewide salary allocation schedule and related documents, conditions,
and limitations established by the omnibus appropriations act.
(3) ((Beginning January 1, 1992,)) No more than ninety college
quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate
degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the
state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in the
omnibus appropriations act, or any replacement schedules and documents,
unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following sections are each recodified
in the new chapter in Title 28A RCW created in section 13 of this act.
RCW 28A.150.200
RCW 28A.150.210
RCW 28A.150.220
RCW 28A.150.250
RCW 28A.150.260
RCW 28A.150.270
RCW 28A.150.290
RCW 28A.150.410
RCW 28A.150.275
RCW 28A.150.280
RCW 28A.150.350
RCW 28A.150.360
RCW 28A.150.370
RCW 28A.150.420

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 28A.150.280 is recodified as a new
section in chapter 28A.160 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 RCW 28A.150.100 (Basic education
certificated instructional staff -- Definition -- Ratio to students) and
1990 c 33 s 103 & 1987 1st ex.s. c 2 s 203 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 and 3 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

--- END ---