BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.16.260 and 2004 c 274 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The horse racing commission may authorize advance deposit
wagering to be conducted by:
(a) A licensed class 1 racing association operating a live horse
racing facility; or
(b) The operator of an advance deposit wagering system accepting
wagers pursuant to an agreement with a licensed class 1 racing
association. The agreement between the operator and the class 1 racing
association must be approved by the commission.
(2) An entity authorized to conduct advance deposit wagering under
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) May accept advance deposit wagering for races conducted in this
state under a class 1 license or races not conducted within this state
on a schedule approved by the class 1 licensee. A system of advance
deposit wagering located outside or within this state may not accept
wagers from residents or other individuals located within this state,
and residents or other individuals located within this state are
prohibited from placing wagers through advance deposit wagering
systems, except with an entity authorized to conduct advance deposit
wagering under subsection (1) of this section;
(b) May not accept an account wager in an amount in excess of the
funds on deposit in the advance deposit wagering account of the
individual placing the wager;
(c) May not allow individuals under the age of twenty-one to open,
own, or have access to an advance deposit wagering account;
(d) Must include a statement in all forms of advertising for
advance deposit wagering that individuals under the age of twenty-one
are not allowed to open, own, or have access to an advance deposit
wagering account; and
(e) Must verify the identification, residence, and age of the
advance deposit wagering account holder using methods and technologies
approved by the commission.
(3) As used in this section, "advance deposit wagering" means a
form of parimutuel wagering in which an individual deposits money in an
account with an entity authorized by the commission to conduct advance
deposit wagering and then the account funds are used to pay for
parimutuel wagers made in person, by telephone, or through
communication by other electronic means.
(4) In order to participate in advance deposit wagering, the holder
of a class 1 racing association license must have conducted at least
one full live racing season. All class 1 racing associations must
complete a live race meet within each succeeding twelve-month period to
maintain eligibility to continue participating in advance deposit
wagering.
(5) When more than one class 1 racing association is participating
in advance deposit wagering the moneys paid to the racing associations
shall be allocated proportionate to the gross amount of all sources of
parimutuel wagering during each twelve-month period derived from the
associations' live race meets. This percentage must be calculated
annually. Revenue derived from advance deposit wagers placed on races
conducted by the class 1 racing association shall all be allocated to
that association.
(6) The commission shall adopt rules regulating advance deposit
wagering.
(((7) This section expires October 1, 2007.))

--- END ---