BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.02.190 and 2004 c 260 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Organization" means every insurer, as defined in RCW
48.01.050, having a certificate of authority to do business in this
state ((and)), every health care service contractor, as defined in RCW
48.44.010, every health maintenance organization, as defined in RCW
48.46.020, or (([self-funded])) a self-funded multiple employer welfare
arrangement, as defined in RCW 48.125.010, registered to do business in
this state. "Class one" organizations shall consist of all insurers as
defined in RCW 48.01.050. "Class two" organizations shall consist of
all organizations registered under provisions of chapters 48.44 and
48.46 RCW. "Class three" organizations shall consist of self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangements as defined in RCW 48.125.010.
(b)(i) "Receipts" means (A) net direct premiums consisting of
direct gross premiums, as defined in RCW 48.18.170, paid for insurance
written or renewed upon risks or property resident, situated, or to be
performed in this state, less return premiums and premiums on policies
not taken, dividends paid or credited to policyholders on direct
business, and premiums received from policies or contracts issued in
connection with qualified plans as defined in RCW 48.14.021, and (B)
prepayments to health care service contractors, as ((set forth))
defined in RCW 48.44.010(((3))), health maintenance organizations, as
defined in RCW 48.46.020, or participant contributions to self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangements, as defined in RCW 48.125.010,
less experience rating credits, dividends, prepayments returned to
subscribers, and payments for contracts not taken.
(ii) Participant contributions, under chapter 48.125 RCW, used to
determine the receipts in this state under this section shall be
determined in the same manner as premiums taxable in this state are
determined under RCW 48.14.090.
(2) The annual cost of operating the office of insurance
commissioner shall be determined by legislative appropriation. A pro
rata share of the cost shall be charged to all organizations. Each
class of organization shall contribute sufficient in fees to the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account to pay the reasonable
costs, including overhead, of regulating that class of organization.
(3) Fees charged shall be calculated separately for each class of
organization. The fee charged each organization shall be that portion
of the cost of operating the insurance commissioner's office, for that
class of organization, for the ensuing fiscal year that is represented
by the organization's portion of the receipts collected or received by
all organizations within that class on business in this state during
the previous calendar year: PROVIDED, That the fee shall not exceed
one-eighth of one percent of receipts: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
minimum fee shall be one thousand dollars.
(4) The commissioner shall annually, on or before June 1st,
calculate and bill each organization for the amount of its fee. Fees
shall be due and payable no later than June 15th of each year:
PROVIDED, That if the necessary financial records are not available or
if the amount of the legislative appropriation is not determined in
time to carry out such calculations and bill such fees within the time
specified, the commissioner may use the fee factors for the prior year
as the basis for the fees and, if necessary, the commissioner may
impose supplemental fees to fully and properly charge the
organizations. ((The penalties for failure to pay fees when due shall
be the same as the penalties for failure to pay taxes pursuant to)) Any
organization failing to pay the fees by June 30th shall pay the same
penalties as the penalties for failure to pay taxes when due under RCW
48.14.060. The fees required by this section are in addition to all
other taxes and fees now imposed or that may be subsequently imposed.
(5) All moneys collected shall be deposited in the insurance
commissioner's regulatory account in the state treasury which is hereby
created.
(6) Unexpended funds in the insurance commissioner's regulatory
account at the close of a fiscal year shall be carried forward in the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account to the succeeding fiscal
year and shall be used to reduce future fees. ((During the 2003-2005
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the insurance
commissioner's regulatory account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the account.))

Sec. 2 RCW 48.46.120 and 1987 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner may make an examination of the operations of
any health maintenance organization as often as he deems necessary in
order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(2) Every health maintenance organization shall submit its books
and records relating its operation for financial condition and market
conduct examinations and in every way facilitate them. The quality or
appropriateness of medical services or systems shall not be examined
except to the extent that such items are incidental to an examination
of the financial condition or the market conduct of a health
maintenance organization. For the purpose of examinations, the
commissioner may issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and examine the
officers and principals of the health maintenance organization and the
principals of such providers concerning their business.
(3) The commissioner may elect to accept and rely on audit reports
made by an independent certified public accountant for the health
maintenance organization in the course of that part of the
commissioner's examination covering the same general subject matter as
the audit. The commissioner may incorporate the audit report in his
report of the examination.
(((4) Health maintenance organizations licensed in the state shall
be equitably assessed to cover the cost of financial condition and
market conduct examinations, the costs of promulgating rules, and the
costs of enforcing the provisions of this chapter. The assessments
shall be levied not less frequently than once every twelve months and
shall be in an amount expected to fund the examinations, promulgation
of rules, and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, including
a reasonable margin for cost variations. The assessments shall be
established by rules promulgated by the commissioner but shall not
exceed five and one-half cents per month per person entitled to health
care services pursuant to a health maintenance agreement, excluding
such persons who are not residents of this state: PROVIDED, That the
minimum fee shall be one thousand dollars. Assessment receipts shall
be deposited in the insurance commissioner's regulatory account in the
state treasury; shall be used for the purpose of funding the
examinations authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the costs of
promulgating rules, and the costs of enforcing the provisions of this
chapter; and shall be accounted for jointly with fees from health care
service contractors but separately from insurers. Assessment receipts
received from health maintenance organizations shall be used to pay a
pro rata share of the costs, including overhead, of regulating health
care service contractors and health maintenance organizations. Amounts
remaining in the separate account at the end of a biennium shall be
applied to reduce the assessments in the succeeding biennium.))

--- END ---