BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that young people
should have the knowledge and skills necessary to build healthy
relationships, and to protect themselves from unintended pregnancy and
sexually transmitted diseases, including HIV infection. The primary
responsibility for sexual health education is with parents and
guardians. However, this responsibility also extends to schools,
religious organizations, and other community groups. It is in the
public's best interest to ensure that young people are equipped with
medically and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate information that
will help them avoid unintended pregnancies, remain free of sexually
transmitted diseases, and make informed, responsible decisions
throughout their lives.
(2) The legislature intends to support and advance the standards
established in the January 2005 guidelines for sexual health
information and disease prevention developed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the department of health.
These guidelines are a fundamental tool to help school districts,
teachers, guest speakers, health and counseling providers, community
groups, parents, and guardians choose, develop, and evaluate sexual
health curricula to better meet the health and safety needs of
adolescents and young adults in their communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2008, every school that offers sexual health
education must assure that sexual health education is medically and
scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, appropriate for students
regardless of gender, race, disability status, or sexual orientation,
and includes information about abstinence and other methods of
preventing unintended pregnancy and sexually transmitted diseases. All
sexual health information, instruction, and materials must be medically
and scientifically accurate. Abstinence may not be taught to the
exclusion of other materials and instruction on contraceptives and
disease prevention. Sexual health education must be consistent with
the January 2005 guidelines for sexual health information and disease
prevention developed by the department of health and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) As used in this act, "medically accurate" means information
that is verified or supported by research in compliance with scientific
methods, is published in peer-review journals, where appropriate, and
is recognized as accurate and objective by professional organizations
and agencies with expertise in the field of sexual health including but
not limited to the American college of obstetricians and gynecologists,
the Washington state department of health, and the federal centers for
disease control and prevention.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction and the department of
health shall make the January 2005 guidelines for sexual health
information and disease prevention available to school districts,
teachers, and guest speakers on their web sites. Within available
resources, the superintendent of public instruction and the department
of health shall make any related information, model policies,
curricula, or other resources available as well.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the department of health, shall develop a list of sexual health
education curricula that are consistent with the 2005 guidelines for
sexual health information and disease prevention. This list shall be
intended to serve as a resource for schools, teachers, or any other
organization or community group, and shall be updated no less
frequently than annually and made available on the web sites of the
office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department
of health.
(5) Schools that offer sexual health education are encouraged to
review their sexual health curricula and choose a curriculum from the
list developed under subsection (4) of this section. Any school that
offers sexual health education may identify, choose, or develop any
other curriculum, if the curriculum chosen or developed complies with
the requirements of this section.
(6) Consistent with WAC 392-410-140, any parent or legal guardian
who wishes to have his or her child excused from any planned
instruction in sexual health education may do so upon filing a written
request with the school district board of directors of its designee.
In addition, any parent may review the sexual health education
curriculum offered in his or her child's school by filing a written
request with the school district board of directors, the principal of
the school his or her child attends, or the principal's designee.
(7) The department of health may adopt such rules as are necessary
to determine whether a curriculum constitutes a sexual health education
curriculum that is consistent with the 2005 guidelines for sexual
health information and disease prevention.
(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall,
through its Washington state school health profiles survey or other
existing reporting mechanism, ask schools to identify any curricula
used to provide sexual health education, and shall report the results
of this inquiry to the legislature on an annual basis, beginning with
the 2008-09 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
healthy youth act.

--- END ---