BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.29.056 and 1997 c 37 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to section 3 of this act and (c) of this subsection,
dental hygienists licensed under this chapter with two years' practical
clinical experience with a licensed dentist within the preceding five
years may be employed or retained by health care facilities to perform
authorized dental hygiene operations and services without dental
supervision, limited to removal of deposits and stains from the
surfaces of the teeth, application of topical preventive or
prophylactic agents, polishing and smoothing restorations, and
performance of root planing and soft-tissue curettage, but shall not
perform injections of anesthetic agents, administration of nitrous
oxide, or diagnosis for dental treatment.
(b) The performance of dental hygiene operations and services in
health care facilities shall be limited to patients, students, and
residents of the facilities.
(c) A dental hygienist employed or retained to perform services
under this section in a senior center must, before providing services:
(i) Enter into a written practice arrangement plan, approved by the
department, with a dentist licensed in this state, under which the
dentist will provide off-site supervision of the dental services
provided. This agreement does not create an obligation for the dentist
to accept referrals of patients receiving services under the program;
(ii) Collect data on the patients treated by dental hygienists
under the program, including age, treatments rendered, insurance
coverage, if any, and patient referral to dentists. This data must be
made available to the department of health on request; and
(iii) Obtain information from the patient's primary health care
provider about any health conditions of the patient that would be
relevant to the provision of preventive dental care. The information
may be obtained by the dental hygienist's direct contact with the
provider or through a written document from the provider that the
patient presents to the dental hygienist.
(d) For dental planning and dental treatment, dental hygienists
shall refer patients to licensed dentists.
(2) For the purposes of this section((,)):
(a) "Health care facilities" are limited to hospitals; nursing
homes; home health agencies; group homes serving the elderly,
((handicapped)) individuals with disabilities, and juveniles; state-operated institutions under the jurisdiction of the department of
social and health services or the department of corrections; and
federal, state, and local public health facilities, state or federally
funded community and migrant health centers, and tribal clinics. Until
July 1, 2009, "health care facilities" also include senior centers.
(b) "Senior center" means a multipurpose community facility
operated and maintained by a nonprofit organization or local government
for the organization and provision of a broad spectrum of health,
social, nutritional, and educational services and recreational
activities for persons sixty years of age or older.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.29.220 and 2001 c 93 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) For low-income, rural, and other at-risk populations and in
coordination with local public health jurisdictions and local oral
health coalitions, a dental hygienist licensed in this state ((as of
April 19, 2001,)) may assess for and apply sealants and apply fluoride
varnishes, and may remove deposits and stains from the surfaces of
teeth, in community-based sealant programs carried out in schools:
(1) Without attending the department's school sealant endorsement
program((.)) if the dental hygienist was licensed as of April 19, 2001;
or
(2) ((For low-income, rural, and other at-risk populations and in
coordination with local public health jurisdictions and local oral
health coalitions,)) If the dental hygienist((s who are)) is school
sealant endorsed under RCW 43.70.650 ((may assess for and apply
sealants and fluoride varnishes in community-based sealant programs
carried out in schools)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.29 RCW
to read as follows:
A dental hygienist participating in a program under RCW 18.29.056
that involves providing services at senior centers, as defined in RCW
18.29.056, or under RCW 18.29.220 that involves removing deposits and
stains from the surfaces of teeth in a community-based sealant program
must:
(1) Provide the patient or, if the patient is a minor, the parent
or legal guardian of the patient, if reasonably available, with written
information that includes at least the following:
(a) A notice that the treatment being given under the program is
not a comprehensive oral health care service, but is provided as a
preventive service only; and
(b) A recommendation that the patient should be examined by a
licensed dentist for comprehensive oral health care services; and
(2) Assist the patient in obtaining a referral for further dental
planning and treatment, including providing a written description of
methods and sources by which a patient may obtain a referral, if
needed, to a dentist, and a list of licensed dentists in the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The secretary of health, in consultation
with representatives of dental hygienists, shall provide a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008,
that:
(1) Provides a summary of the information about patients receiving
dental services in senior centers that is collected under RCW
18.29.056(1)(c)(ii), and describing the dental health outcomes,
including both positive impacts on dental health and adverse incidents,
if any, related to the services these patients receive under the
program; and
(2) Makes recommendations, as appropriate, with regard to the
services that could be appropriately provided in senior centers by
dental hygienists.

--- END ---