BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.120.030 and 2004 c 227 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The owner or operator in charge of any vessel covered by this
chapter is required to ensure that the vessel under their ownership or
control does not discharge ballast water into the waters of the state
except as authorized by this section.
(1) Discharge into waters of the state is authorized if the vessel
has conducted an open sea exchange of ballast water. A vessel is
exempt from this requirement if the vessel's master reasonably
determines that such a ballast water exchange operation will threaten
the safety of the vessel or the vessel's crew, or is not feasible due
to vessel design limitations or equipment failure. If a vessel relies
on this exemption, then it may discharge ballast water into waters of
the state, subject to any requirements of treatment under subsection
(2) of this section and subject to RCW 77.120.040.
(2) After July 1, 2007, discharge of ballast water into waters of
the state is authorized only if there has been an open sea exchange or
if the vessel has treated its ballast water to meet standards set by
the department consistent with applicable state and federal laws. When
weather or extraordinary circumstances make access to treatment unsafe
to the vessel or crew, the master of a vessel may delay compliance with
any treatment required under this subsection until it is safe to
complete the treatment. Nothing in this subsection (2) may be
interpreted to require a master of a vessel to take any action that
would jeopardize the safety of the vessel, its passengers, or crew as
long as the master has made every reasonable effort to first comply
with the requirements of this section.
(3) Masters, owners, operators, or persons-in-charge shall submit
to the department an interim ballast water management report by July 1,
2006, in the form and manner prescribed by the department. The report
shall describe actions needed to implement the ballast water
requirements in subsection (2) of this section, including treatment
methods applicable to the class of the vessel. Reports may include a
statement that there are no treatment methods applicable to the vessel
for which the report is being submitted.
(4) The ballast water work group created in section 1, chapter 282,
Laws of 2002 shall develop recommendations for the interim ballast
water management report. The recommendations must include, but are not
limited to:
(a) Actions that the vessel owner or operator will take to
implement the ballast water requirements in subsection (2) of this
section, including treatment methods applicable to the class of the
vessel;
(b) Necessary plan elements when there are not treatment methods
applicable to the vessel for which the report is being submitted, or
which would meet the requirements of this chapter; and
(c) The method, form, and content of reporting to be used for such
reports.
(5) For treatment technologies requiring shipyard modification that
cannot reasonably be performed prior to July 1, 2007, the department
shall provide the vessel owner or operator with an extension to the
first scheduled drydock or shipyard period following July 1, 2007.
(6) The department shall make every effort to align ballast water
standards with adopted international and federal standards while
ensuring that the goals of this chapter are met.
(7) The requirements of this section do not apply to a vessel
discharging ballast water or sediments that originated solely within
the waters of Washington state, the Columbia river system, ((or)) the
internal waters of British Columbia south of latitude fifty degrees
north, including the waters of the Straits of Georgia and Juan de Fuca,
or the waters of Alaska north of latitude fifty-four degrees thirty
minutes north. The department may further limit the waters of British
Columbia or the waters of Alaska from which the ballast water or
sediments may originate under this subsection (7) if the department
determines that ballast water or sediments from areas designated in
this subsection (7) pose a danger to the waters of Washington state.
(8) Open sea exchange is an exchange that occurs fifty or more
nautical miles offshore. If the United States coast guard requires a
vessel to conduct an exchange further offshore, then that distance is
the required distance for purposes of compliance with this chapter.

--- END ---