BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that degraded air quality can have a
substantial negative effect on the value and productivity of the
state's natural resources, including the public's enjoyment of the
outdoor recreation available in Washington. As such, the legislature
finds that the department of ecology, as the lead state clean air
regulatory body, should aid in the development of demonstration
projects that raise awareness about options available to enhance the
state's air quality.
(2) The department shall provide technical advice and funding for,
at a minimum, a demonstration project developed with a science museum
that has an existing program designed to bring science education to
children by way of a mobile learning vehicle. The demonstration
project must enhance the existing program in a way that will provide
traveling exhibits to help students learn about the connection between
energy generation and clean air, the impact different sources of energy
have on clean air and the environment, the scientific properties of
energy, and the different uses of energy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of four hundred forty-nine thousand
nine hundred sixty-three dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008,
from the general fund to the department of ecology for the purposes of
this act.

--- END ---