BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the number of
asbestos-related claims has increased significantly in recent years and
threatens the continued viability of one or more uniquely situated
companies that have not ever manufactured, sold, or distributed
asbestos or asbestos products, and are liable only as successor
corporations. This liability has created an overpowering public
necessity to provide an immediate, remedial, legislative solution. The
legislature intends that the cumulative recovery by all asbestos
claimants from innocent successors be limited, and intends to simply
change the form of asbestos claimants' remedies without impairing their
substantive rights, and finds that there are no alternative means to
meet this public necessity. The legislature finds that public interest
as a whole is best served by providing relief to these innocent
successors, so that they may remain viable and continue to contribute
to this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Asbestos claim" means any claim, wherever or whenever made,
for damages, losses, indemnification, contribution, or other relief
arising out of, based on, or in any way related to asbestos, including:
(a) The health effects of exposure to asbestos, including any claim
for:
(i) Personal injury or death;
(ii) Mental or emotional injury;
(iii) Risk of disease or other injury; or
(iv) The costs of medical monitoring or surveillance, to the extent
such claims are recognized under state law;
(b) Any claim made by or on behalf of any person exposed to
asbestos, or a representative, spouse, parent, child, or other relative
of the person; and
(c) Any claim for damage or loss caused by the installation,
presence, or removal of asbestos.
(2) "Corporation" means a corporation for profit, including a
domestic corporation organized under the laws of this state, or a
foreign corporation organized under laws other than the laws of this
state.
(3) "Successor" means a corporation that assumes or incurs, or has
assumed or incurred, successor asbestos-related liabilities.
(4) "Successor asbestos-related liabilities" means any liabilities,
whether known or unknown, asserted or unasserted, absolute or
contingent, accrued or unaccrued, liquidated or unliquidated, or due or
to become due, that are related in any way to asbestos claims, as
defined in this section, and that were assumed or incurred by a
corporation as a result of or in connection with a merger or
consolidation, or the plan of merger or consolidation related to the
merger or consolidation, with or into another corporation or that are
related in any way to asbestos claims based on the exercise of control
or the ownership of stock of the corporation before the merger or
consolidation. The term includes liabilities that, after the time of
the merger or consolidation for which the fair market value of total
gross assets is determined under section 5 of this act, were or are
paid or otherwise discharged, or committed to be paid or otherwise
discharged, by or on behalf of the corporation, or by a successor of
the corporation, or by or on behalf of a transferor, in connection with
settlements, judgments, or other discharges in this state or another
jurisdiction.
(5) "Transferor" means a corporation from which successor asbestos-related liabilities are or were assumed or incurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The limitations in section 4 of this act
shall apply to a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation that is
a successor, which became a successor before January 1, 1972, or which
is any of that successor corporation's successors.
(2) The limitations in section 4 of this act shall not apply to:
(a) Workers' compensation benefits paid by or on behalf of an
employer to an employee under this state's workers' compensation act or
a comparable workers' compensation law of another jurisdiction;
(b) Any claim against a corporation that does not constitute a
successor asbestos-related liability;
(c) An insurance corporation, as that term is used in Title 48 RCW;
(d) Any obligations under the national labor relations act (29
U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.), as amended, or under any collective
bargaining agreement; or
(e) A successor that, after a merger or consolidation, continued in
the business of mining asbestos or in the business of selling or
distributing asbestos fibers or in the business of manufacturing,
distributing, removing, or installing asbestos-containing products
which were the same or substantially the same as those products
previously manufactured, distributed, removed, or installed by the
transferor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as further limited in subsection
(2) of this section, the cumulative successor asbestos-related
liabilities of a corporation are limited to the fair market value of
the total gross assets of the transferor determined as of the time of
the merger or consolidation. The corporation does not have any
responsibility for successor asbestos-related liabilities in excess of
this limitation.
(2) If the transferor had assumed or incurred successor asbestos-related liabilities in connection with a prior merger or consolidation
with a prior transferor, then the fair market value of the total assets
of the prior transferor, determined as of the time of such earlier
merger or consolidation, shall be substituted for the limitation set
forth in subsection (1) of this section for purposes of determining the
limitation of liability of a corporation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A corporation may establish the fair
market value of total gross assets for the purpose of the limitations
under section 4 of this act through any method reasonable under the
circumstances, including: (a) By reference to the going-concern value
of the assets or to the purchase price attributable to or paid for the
assets in an arm's-length transaction; or (b) in the absence of other
readily available information from which fair market value can be
determined, by reference to the value of the assets recorded on a
balance sheet.
(2) Total gross assets include intangible assets.
(3) Total gross assets include the aggregate coverage under any
applicable liability insurance that was issued to the transferor whose
assets are being valued for purposes of this section and which
insurance has been collected or is collectable to cover successor
asbestos-related liabilities, except compensation for liabilities
arising from workers' exposure to asbestos solely during the course of
their employment by the transferor. A settlement of a dispute
concerning such insurance coverage entered into by a transferor or
successor with the insurers of the transferor before the effective date
of this act will be determinative of the aggregate coverage of such
liability insurance to be included in the calculation of the
transferor's total gross assets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2),
(3), and (4) of this section, the fair market value of total gross
assets at the time of a merger or consolidation increases annually at
a rate equal to the sum of: (a) The prime rate as listed in the first
edition of the Wall Street Journal published for each calendar year
since the merger or consolidation, unless the prime rate is not
published in that edition of the Wall Street Journal, in which case any
reasonable determination of the prime rate on the first day of the year
may be used; and (b) one percent.
(2) The rate in subsection (1) of this section is not compounded.
(3) The adjustment of fair market value of total gross assets
continues as provided under subsection (1) of this section until the
date the adjusted value is first exceeded by the cumulative amounts of
successor asbestos-related liabilities paid or committed to be paid by
or on behalf of the corporation or a predecessor, or by or on behalf of
a transferor, after the time of the merger or consolidation for which
the fair market value of total gross assets is determined.
(4) No adjustment of the fair market value of total gross assets
shall be applied to any liability insurance otherwise included in the
definition of total gross assets by section 5(3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act may be known and cited as the
successor asbestos-related liability fairness act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act applies to all causes of action
commenced on or after the effective date of this section, regardless of
when the action arose. To this extent, this act applies retroactively,
but in all other respects it applies prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 23 RCW.

--- END ---