BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that excessive
dependence on fossil fuels jeopardizes Washington's economic security,
environmental integrity, and public health. Accelerated development
and use of clean fuels and clean vehicle technologies will reduce the
drain on Washington's economy from importing fossil fuels. As fossil
fuel prices rise, clean fuels and vehicles can save money for consumers
while promoting the development of a major, sustainable industry that
provides good jobs and a new source of rural prosperity.
(2) Clean fuels and vehicles will protect public health by reducing
toxic air pollution and reduce our largest source of global warming
pollution. The state must better understand and prepare for the
effects of global warming and the challenges and opportunities
associated with evolving climate policies and carbon markets.
(3) To reduce fossil fuel dependence and build our clean energy
economy, the state should develop policies and incentives that help
businesses, consumers, and farmers gain greater access to affordable
clean fuels and vehicles and to produce clean fuels in the state.
These policies and incentives should include: Incentives for
replacement of the most polluting diesel engines, especially in school
buses; transitional incentives for development of the most promising
in-state clean fuels and fuel feedstocks, including biodiesel crops,
ethanol from plant waste, and liquid natural gas from landfill or
wastewater treatment gases; reduced fossil fuel consumption by state
fleets; development of promising new technologies for displacing
petroleum with electricity, such as "plug-in hybrids"; and impact
analysis and emission accounting procedures that prepare Washington to
respond and prosper as global warming impacts occur and as policies and
markets to reduce global warming pollution are developed.

PART 1
INVESTING IN CLEAN AIR
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature finds that fine
particle air pollution attributable to diesel fuel is a significant
health hazard to school children and other residents in our state.
Sources of diesel emissions include diesel-powered trucks, buses and
cars, diesel-powered marine vessels, construction equipment, trains,
aircraft support equipment, cargo handling equipment, and a variety of
other on and off-road engines. Reducing fine particles and toxic
emissions from diesel emissions and other sources of pollution reduces
the adverse health impacts on children, reduces cancer risk, and
reduces the incidence and severity of asthma attacks and chronic
bronchitis. Reducing diesel emissions, in addition to strategies to
reduce wood smoke, will also aid areas of the state facing potential
nonattainment of new fine particle standards established by the United
States environmental protection agency and help avoid the adverse
health and economic impacts of nonattainment.
(2) Under the current Washington state clean school bus program,
approximately seven thousand five hundred diesel school buses, over
three-quarters of the existing fleet statewide, will be retrofitted by
2008. Reduced exhaust emissions from these retrofitted buses provide
cleaner air to breathe for the children riding the buses and the
citizens in the communities served by the buses.
(3) The legislature finds that it is not cost-effective to retrofit
much older buses because of their mechanical condition and very high
emissions. Replacement with new, ultra-low emission buses, beginning
with the model year 2007, is the most effective means to nearly
eliminate the toxic emissions generated by the use of these older
buses. In addition, newer buses are safer, more reliable, provide
significantly higher fuel economy, and have lower overall operating
costs. An incentive program to accelerate purchase of newer buses and
replacement of older buses will more quickly achieve these gains and
result in a lower health risk to children.
(4) Even with new federal diesel fuel and engine standards going
into effect in 2006 and 2007, and due to the long life of diesel
engines, diesel emissions will continue to be an air pollution concern
for many years.
(5) Many public and private fleets continue to use diesel equipment
that has not been retrofitted to reduce emissions. Therefore, the
legislature finds that it is important to continue to take measures to
reduce diesel emissions in our state so we protect the health of our
citizens and create healthier communities. Reducing diesel emissions
will also allow continued growth in major ports in the state by
maintaining air quality within federal standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
implement a school bus replacement incentive program. As part of the
program, the office shall fund up to ten percent of the cost of a new
2007 or later model year school bus that meets the 2007 federal motor
vehicle emission control standards and is purchased by a school
district by no later than June 30, 2009, provided that the new bus is
replacing a 1994 or older school bus in the school district's fleet.
Replacement of the oldest buses must be given highest priority.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
ensure that buses being replaced through this program are surplused
under RCW 28A.335.180. As part of the surplus process, school
districts must provide written documentation to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction demonstrating that buses being
replaced are scrapped and not purchased for road use. The
documentation must include bus make, model, year, vehicle
identification number, engine make, engine serial number, and salvage
yard receipts; and must demonstrate that the engine and body of the bus
being replaced has been rendered unusable.

Sec. 103 RCW 70.94.017 and 2005 c 295 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Money deposited in the segregated subaccount of the air
pollution control account under RCW 46.68.020(2) shall be distributed
as follows:
(a) Eighty-five percent shall be distributed to air pollution
control authorities created under this chapter. The money must be
distributed in direct proportion with the amount of fees imposed under
RCW 46.12.080, 46.12.170, and 46.12.181 that are collected within the
boundaries of each authority. However, an amount in direct proportion
with those fees collected in counties for which no air pollution
control authority exists must be distributed to the department.
(b) The remaining fifteen percent shall be distributed to the
department.
(2) Money distributed to air pollution control authorities and the
department under subsection (1) of this section must be used as
follows:
(a) Eighty-five percent of the money received by an air pollution
control authority or the department is available on a priority basis to
retrofit school buses with exhaust emission control devices or to
provide funding for fueling infrastructure necessary to allow school
bus fleets to use alternative, cleaner fuels. In addition, the
director of ecology or the air pollution control officer may direct
funding under this section for other publicly or privately owned diesel
equipment if the director of ecology or the air pollution control
officer finds that funding for other publicly or privately owned diesel
equipment will provide public health benefits and further the purposes
of this chapter.
(b) The remaining fifteen percent may be used by the air pollution
control authority or department to reduce transportation-related air
contaminant emissions and clean up air pollution, or reduce and monitor
toxic air contaminants.
(3) Money in the air pollution control account may be spent by the
department only after appropriation.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2020.

Sec. 104 RCW 53.08.040 and 1989 c 298 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A district may improve its lands by dredging, filling,
bulkheading, providing waterways or otherwise developing such lands for
industrial and commercial purposes. A district may also acquire,
construct, install, improve, and operate sewer and water utilities to
serve its own property and other property owners under terms,
conditions, and rates to be fixed and approved by the port commission.
A district may also acquire, by purchase, construction, lease, or in
any other manner, and may maintain and operate other facilities for the
control or elimination of air, water, or other pollution, including,
but not limited to, facilities for the treatment and/or disposal of
industrial wastes, and may make such facilities available to others
under terms, conditions and rates to be fixed and approved by the port
commission. Such conditions and rates shall be sufficient to reimburse
the port for all costs, including reasonable amortization of capital
outlays caused by or incidental to providing such other pollution
control facilities((: PROVIDED, That)). However, no part of such
costs of providing any pollution control facility to others shall be
paid out of any tax revenues of the port((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER,
That)) and no port shall enter into an agreement or contract to provide
sewer and/or water utilities or pollution control facilities if
substantially similar utilities or facilities are available from
another source (or sources) which is able and willing to provide such
utilities or facilities on a reasonable and nondiscriminatory basis
unless such other source (or sources) consents thereto.
(2) In the event that a port elects to make such other pollution
control facilities available to others, it shall do so by lease, lease
purchase agreement, or other agreement binding such user to pay for the
use of said facilities for the full term of the revenue bonds issued by
the port for the acquisition of said facilities, and said payments
shall at least fully reimburse the port for all principal and interest
paid by it on said bonds and for all operating or other costs, if any,
incurred by the port in connection with said facilities((:
PROVIDED,)). However, ((That)) where there is more than one user of
any such facilities, each user shall be responsible for its pro rata
share of such costs and payment of principal and interest. Any port
intending to provide pollution control facilities to others shall first
survey the port district to ascertain the potential users of such
facilities and the extent of their needs. The port shall conduct a
public hearing upon the proposal and shall give each potential user an
opportunity to participate in the use of such facilities upon equal
terms and conditions.
(3) "Pollution control facility," as used in this section and RCW
53.08.041, does not include air quality improvement equipment that
provides emission reductions for engines, vehicles, and vessels.

PART 2
PUBLIC SECTOR FUEL USE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) The legislature finds that it is in
the state's interest and to the benefit of the people of the state to
encourage the use of electrical vehicle technology that will reduce
fossil fuel dependence and toxic air pollution. Displacing petroleum
with electricity will keep more energy expenditures and jobs in
Washington's economy instead of being lost to fossil fuel imports.
(2) Motor vehicles produce more than half of the global warming
pollution in the state of Washington. Reducing the use of fossil fuels
through alternatives such as electrification is one of the most
practical, beneficial climate solutions available to the state and its
citizens.
(3) The legislature finds that cleaner fuels and vehicles,
including vehicles that use electricity, can help the state achieve
better public health, increased energy security, and substantial
economic benefits.
(4) The legislature finds that there is a compelling public
interest in reducing fossil fuel dependence and emissions of global
warming pollution. It is important for the state of Washington to
demonstrate leadership in this regard and achieve reductions in the use
of fossil fuels by state fleets.

Sec. 202 RCW 43.19.642 and 2006 c 338 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All state agencies are encouraged to use a fuel blend of twenty
percent biodiesel and eighty percent petroleum diesel for use in
diesel-powered vehicles and equipment.
(2) Effective June 1, 2006, for agencies complying with the ultra-low sulfur diesel mandate of the United States environmental protection
agency for on-highway diesel fuel, agencies shall use biodiesel as an
additive to ultra-low sulfur diesel for lubricity, provided that the
use of a lubricity additive is warranted and that the use of biodiesel
is comparable in performance and cost with other available lubricity
additives. The amount of biodiesel added to the ultra-low sulfur
diesel fuel shall be not less than two percent.
(3) Effective June 1, 2009, state agencies are required to use a
minimum of twenty percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of all
diesel purchases made by the agencies for the operation of the
agencies' diesel-powered vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment.
(4)(a) Effective June 1, 2015, all state agencies and local
government subdivisions of the state, to the extent determined
practicable by the energy freedom coordinator created in section 303 of
this act, are required to satisfy one hundred percent of their fuel
needs for operating publicly owned vessels, vehicles, and construction
equipment from electricity or biofuel certified by the energy freedom
coordinator.
(b) If, on or after June 1, 2015, the energy freedom coordinator
finds that it is not practicable for all units of state and local
government to satisfy their complete fuel needs from electricity or
biofuel, the energy freedom coordinator may determine the minimum
percentage of biofuel that must be included in a state or local
agency's purchasing, the date of compliance with the one hundred
percent biofuel mandate, and any other conditions on an agency's fuel
purchasing schedule deemed necessary by the energy freedom coordinator
for the successful satisfaction of the one hundred percent biofuel
mandate.
(5) All state agencies using biodiesel fuel shall, beginning on
July 1, 2006, file quarterly reports with the department of general
administration documenting the use of the fuel and a description of how
any problems encountered were resolved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 43.19
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By no later than January 1, 2020, the annual fossil fuel usage
by the state must be at least twenty-five percent below the annual
usage for the year 2006.
(2) Except for cars owned or operated by the Washington state
patrol, when tires on vehicles in the state's motor vehicle fleet are
replaced, they must be replaced with tires that have the same or better
rolling resistance as the original tires.
(3) All state agencies shall report to the energy freedom
coordinator created in section 303 of this act at the beginning of each
biennium until January 1, 2020, on progress towards meeting the goals
in this section and any barriers to achieving the goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 A new section is added to chapter 43.19
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In order to allow the motor vehicle fuel needs of state and
local government to be satisfied by Washington-produced biofuels as
provided in RCW 43.19.642, the department of general administration may
contract in advance and execute contracts with public or private
producers, suppliers, or other parties, for the purchase of biofuels,
as that term is defined in RCW 15.110.010 (as recodified by this act).
Contract provisions may address items including, but not limited to,
fuel standards, price, and delivery date.
(2) The department of general administration may combine the needs
of local government agencies, including ports, special districts,
school districts, and municipal corporations, for the purposes of
executing contracts for biofuels and to secure a sufficient and stable
supply of alternative fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 A new section is added to chapter 43.01
RCW to read as follows:
(1) It is in the state's interest and to the benefit of the people
of the state to encourage the use of electrical vehicles in order to
reduce emissions and provide the public with cleaner air. This section
expressly authorizes the purchase of power at state expense to recharge
privately and publicly owned plug-in electrical vehicles at state
office locations where the vehicles are used for state business, are
commute vehicles, or where the vehicles are at the state location for
the purpose of conducting business with the state.
(2) The director of the department of general administration shall
provide reports to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature, as deemed necessary by the director, on the estimated
amount of state-purchased electricity consumed by plug-in electrical
vehicles if the director of general administration determines that the
use has a significant cost to the state, and on the number of plug-in
electric vehicles using state office locations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 A new section is added to chapter 89.08
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, conservation
districts are authorized to enter into crop purchase contracts for a
dedicated energy crop for the purposes of producing, selling, and
distributing biodiesel produced from Washington state feedstocks,
cellulosic ethanol, and cellulosic ethanol blend fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 A new section is added to chapter 35.21
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, public
development authorities are authorized to enter into crop purchase
contracts for a dedicated energy crop for the purposes of producing,
selling, and distributing biodiesel produced from Washington state
feedstocks, cellulosic ethanol, and cellulosic ethanol blend fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to chapter 35.92
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, municipal
utilities are authorized to produce and distribute biodiesel, ethanol,
and ethanol blend fuels, including entering into crop purchase
contracts for a dedicated energy crop for the purpose of generating
electricity or producing biodiesel produced from Washington feedstocks,
cellulosic ethanol, and cellulosic ethanol blend fuels for use in
internal operations of the electric utility and for sale or
distribution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 A new section is added to chapter 54.04
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, public utility
districts are authorized to produce and distribute biodiesel, ethanol,
and ethanol blend fuels, including entering into crop purchase
contracts for a dedicated energy crop for the purpose of generating
electricity or producing biodiesel produced from Washington feedstocks,
cellulosic ethanol, and cellulosic ethanol blend fuels for use in
internal operations of the electric utility and for sale or
distribution.

PART 3
ENERGY FREEDOM AUTHORITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 (1) The legislature finds that the
development of a Washington-based feedstock agricultural and forest
products market is highly desirable for producing biodiesel and
ethanol. Research and incentive programs are needed to develop a
market in Washington to produce cellulosic ethanol from wood waste and
other organic materials. Cellulosic ethanol is a preferred biofuel
because it provides much greater reductions in petroleum dependence and
carbon emissions as compared to starch-based ethanol.
(2) The legislature further finds that the development of a market
for renewable liquid natural gas fuel products made from Washington-based feedstock waste biogases is highly desirable to meet Washington's
clean fuel needs.
(3) It is important for the state of Washington to develop a
complete supply chain infrastructure that allows the state government,
including its local government subdivisions, to supply its complete
fuel needs with biofuels produced from feedstocks completely produced
in Washington. The goal of suppling one hundred percent of state and
local government's fuel needs with biofuels should be a reality by
2015.

Sec. 302 RCW 15.110.010 and 2006 c 171 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means any political subdivision of the state,
including port districts, counties, cities, towns, special purpose
districts, and other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal
corporations. "Applicant" may also include federally recognized tribes
and state institutions of higher education with appropriate research
capabilities.
(2) "Assistance" includes loans, leases, product purchases, or
other forms of financial or technical assistance.
(3) "Biofuel" includes, but is not limited to, biodiesel, ethanol,
and ethanol blend fuels that are made from recycled products,
Washington feedstocks, and renewable liquid natural gas or liquid
compressed natural gas made from biogas.
(4) "Biogas" includes waste gases derived from landfills and
wastewater treatment plants and dairy and farm wastes.
(5) "Cellulosic ethanol" means ethanol derived from any
lignocellulosic or hemicellulosic matter that is available on a
renewable or recurring basis, including dedicated energy crops and
trees, wood and wood residues, plants, grasses, agricultural residues,
fibers, animal wastes and other waste materials, and municipal solid
waste.
(6) "Coordinator" means the energy freedom coordinator created in
section 303 of this act.
(7) "Department" means the department of ((agriculture)) community,
trade, and economic development.
(((4) "Director" means the director of the department of
agriculture.
(5))) (8) "Green highway zone" means an area in the state
designated by the department that is within reasonable proximity of
state route number 5, state route number 90, and state route number 82.
(9) "Peer review committee" means a board, appointed by the
((director)) coordinator, that includes bioenergy specialists, energy
conservation specialists, scientists, and individuals with specific
recognized expertise.
(((6))) (10) "Project" means the construction of facilities,
including the purchase of equipment, to convert farm products or wastes
into electricity or gaseous or liquid fuels or other coproducts
associated with such conversion. These specifically include fixed or
mobile facilities to generate electricity or methane from the anaerobic
digestion of organic matter, and fixed or mobile facilities for
extracting oils from canola, rape, mustard, and other oilseeds.
"Project" may also include the construction of facilities associated
with such conversion for the distribution and storage of such
feedstocks and fuels.
(((7))) (11) "Refueling project" means the construction of new
alternative fuel refueling facilities, as well as upgrades and
expansion of existing refueling facilities, that will enable these
facilities to offer alternative fuels to the public.
(12) "Research and development project" means research and
development, by an institution of higher education as defined in
subsection (1) of this section, relating to:
(a) Bioenergy sources including but not limited to biomass and
associated gases; or
(b) The development of markets for bioenergy coproducts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 (1) The energy freedom authority, together
with the position of the energy freedom coordinator, is created within
the department.
(2) The coordinator is responsible for:
(a) Managing and directing the energy freedom authority;
(b) Inventorying and coordinating all state efforts to develop,
encourage, or mandate a biofuels market in Washington;
(c) Developing, coordinating, and overseeing the implementation of
a plan, or series of plans, for the development of a complete supply
chain that allows for the production, transport, distribution, and
delivery to public sector end users of biofuels produced exclusively
from recycled products or Washington feedstocks;
(d) Certifying that biofuels produced for use by state and local
government in Washington is produced exclusively from recycled products
or Washington feedstocks;
(e) Judging the practicability of the one hundred percent biofuels
mandate in RCW 43.19.642;
(f) Working with the departments of transportation and general
administration, or other applicable state and local governmental
entities, to develop biofuel fueling stations for use by state and
local motor vehicle fleets;
(g) Using any appropriations specifically provided for the purposes
of this subsection to provide greater access to public sector fueling
capacity for biofuels; and
(h) Working with the department of general administration, in
conjunction with private sector suppliers, to develop a pilot program
for providing E85 fueling capacity at appropriate intervals and
locations along at least interstate routes 5, 82, and 90 throughout the
state for the use of public and private vehicles.

Sec. 304 RCW 15.110.020 and 2006 c 171 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The energy freedom program is established within the
department, to be administered by the energy freedom authority created
in section 303 of this act. The ((director)) coordinator may establish
policies and procedures necessary for processing, reviewing, and
approving applications made under this chapter.
(2) When reviewing applications submitted under this program, the
((director)) coordinator shall consult with those agencies and other
public entities having expertise and knowledge to assess the technical
and business feasibility of the project and probability of success.
These agencies may include, but are not limited to, the department,
Washington State University, the University of Washington, the
department of ecology, ((the department of community, trade, and
economic development,)) the department of natural resources, the
department of agriculture, the department of general administration,
local clean air authorities, and the Washington state conservation
commission.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
((director)) coordinator, in cooperation with the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)), may approve an
application only if the ((director)) coordinator finds:
(a) The project will convert farm products or wastes, including
biogas, directly into electricity or ((into gaseous or liquid fuels))
biofuel or other coproducts associated with such conversion;
(b) The project demonstrates technical feasibility and directly
assists in moving a commercially viable project into the marketplace
for use by Washington state citizens;
(c) The facility will produce long-term economic benefits to the
state, a region of the state, or a particular community in the state;
(d) The project does not require continuing state support;
(e) The assistance will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state;
(f) The state is provided an option under the assistance agreement
to purchase a portion of the fuel or feedstock to be produced by the
project, exercisable by the department of general administration;
(g) The project will increase energy independence or diversity for
the state;
(h) The project will use feedstocks produced in the state, if
feasible, except this criterion does not apply to the construction of
facilities used to distribute and store fuels that are produced from
farm products or wastes;
(i) Any product produced by the project will be suitable for its
intended use, will meet accepted national or state standards, and will
be stored and distributed in a safe and environmentally sound manner;
(j) The application provides for adequate reporting or disclosure
of financial and employment data to the ((director)) coordinator, and
permits the ((director)) coordinator to require an annual or other
periodic audit of the project books; and
(k) For research and development projects, the application has been
independently reviewed by a peer review committee as defined in RCW
15.110.010 (as recodified by this act) and the findings delivered to
the ((director)) coordinator.
(4) Cellulosic ethanol production facilities and biogas-to-biofuel
production facilities are eligible for assistance under the energy
freedom program.
(5) When reviewing an application for a refueling project, the
coordinator may award a grant or a loan to an applicant if the director
finds:
(a) The project will offer alternative fuels to the motoring
public;
(b) The project does not require continued state support;
(c) The project is located within a green highway zone as defined
in RCW 15.110.010 (as recodified by this act);
(d) The project will contribute towards an efficient and adequately
spaced alternative fuel refueling network along the green highways
designated in RCW 47.17.020, 47.17.135, and 47.17.140; and
(e) The project will result in increased access to alternative
fueling infrastructure for the motoring public along the green highways
designated in RCW 47.17.020, 47.17.135, and 47.17.140.
(6)(a) The ((director)) coordinator may approve ((an)) a project
application for assistance under subsection (3) of this section up to
five million dollars. In no circumstances shall this assistance
constitute more than fifty percent of the total project cost.
(((5))) (b) The director may approve a refueling project
application for a grant or a loan under subsection (5) of this section
up to fifty thousand dollars. In no circumstances shall a grant or a
loan award constitute more than fifty percent of the total project
cost.
(7) The ((director)) coordinator shall enter into agreements with
approved applicants to fix the terms and rates of the assistance to
minimize the costs to the applicants, and to encourage establishment of
a viable bioenergy or biofuel industry. The agreement shall include
provisions to protect the state's investment, including a requirement
that a successful applicant enter into contracts with any partners that
may be involved in the use of any assistance provided under this
program, including services, facilities, infrastructure, or equipment.
Contracts with any partners shall become part of the application
record.
(((6))) (8) The ((director)) coordinator may defer any payments for
up to twenty-four months or until the project starts to receive revenue
from operations, whichever is sooner.

Sec. 305 RCW 15.110.030 and 2006 c 171 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon written notice to the recipient of any assistance under
this program, the ((director)) coordinator may suspend or cancel the
assistance if any of the following occur:
(a) The recipient fails to make satisfactory and reasonable
progress to complete the project, or the ((director)) coordinator
concludes the recipient will be unable to complete the project or any
portion of it; or
(b) The recipient has made misrepresentations in any information
furnished to the ((director)) coordinator in connection with the
project.
(2) In the event that any assistance has been awarded to the
recipient under this program at the time of breach, or failure of the
recipient to satisfactorily perform, the ((director)) coordinator may
require that the full amount or value of the assistance, or a portion
thereof, be repaid within a period specified by the ((director))
coordinator.

Sec. 306 RCW 15.110.040 and 2006 c 171 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the total requested dollar amount of assistance awarded for
projects under RCW 15.110.020(3) (as recodified by this act) exceeds
the amount available in the energy freedom account created in RCW
15.110.050 (as recodified by this act), the applications must be
prioritized based upon the following criteria:
(((1))) (a) The extent to which the project will help reduce
dependence on petroleum fuels and imported energy either directly or
indirectly;
(((2))) (b) The extent to which the project will reduce air and
water pollution either directly or indirectly;
(((3))) (c) The extent to which the project will establish a viable
bioenergy or biofuel production capacity in Washington;
(((4))) (d) The benefits to Washington's agricultural producers;
((and
(5))) (e) The benefits to the health of Washington's forests;
(f) The beneficial uses of biogas; and
(g) The number and quality of jobs and economic benefits created by
the project.
(2) This section does not apply to grants or loans awarded for
refueling projects under RCW 15.110.020(4) (as recodified by this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 (1) If the total requested dollar amount
of funds for refueling projects under RCW 15.110.020(5) (as recodified
by this act) exceeds the amount available for refueling projects in the
energy freedom account created in RCW 15.110.050 (as recodified by this
act), the applications must be prioritized based upon the following
criteria:
(a) The extent to which the project will help reduce dependence on
petroleum fuels and imported energy either directly or indirectly;
(b) The extent to which the project will reduce air and water
pollution either directly or indirectly;
(c) The extent to which the project will establish a viable
bioenergy production capacity in Washington;
(d) The extent to which the project will make biofuels more
accessible to the motoring public;
(e) The benefits to Washington's agricultural producers; and
(f) The number and quality of jobs and economic benefits created by
the project.
(2) This section does not apply to assistance awarded for projects
under RCW 15.110.020(3) (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 308 RCW 15.110.050 and 2006 c 371 s 223 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The energy freedom account is created in the state treasury.
All receipts from appropriations made to the account and any loan
payments of principal and interest derived from loans made under this
chapter must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for assistance for projects consistent with this chapter
or otherwise authorized by the legislature. ((Administrative costs of
the department may not exceed three percent of the total funds
available for this program.))
(2) The following goals and criteria should be considered in
evaluating potential biofuel incentives to be offered by the energy
freedom account: To assist Washington farmers and businesses in the
development of economically viable, sustained instate biofuel and
biofuel feedstock production; to leverage and encourage private
investment in biofuel and biofuel feedstock production; and to assist
in the development of biofuel feedstocks and production techniques that
deliver the greatest net reductions in petroleum dependence and carbon
emissions.
(3) Any state agency receiving funding from the energy freedom
account is prohibited from retaining greater than three percent of any
funding provided from the energy freedom account for administrative
overhead or other deductions not directly associated with conducting
the research, projects, or other end products that the funding is
designed to produce.
(4) Any university, institute, or other entity that is not a state
agency receiving funding from the energy freedom account is prohibited
from retaining greater than fifteen percent of any funding provided
from the energy freedom account for administrative overhead or other
deductions not directly associated with conducting the research,
projects, or other end products that the funding is designed to
produce.

Sec. 309 RCW 15.110.060 and 2006 c 171 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((director)) coordinator shall report to the legislature and
governor on the status of the energy freedom program created under this
chapter, on or before December 1, 2006, and annually thereafter. This
report must include information on the projects that have been funded,
the status of these projects, and their environmental, energy savings,
and job creation benefits as well as an assessment of the availability
of alternative fuels in the state.

PART 4
PLANNING FOR THE FUTURE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 (1) The legislature finds that climate
change is expected to have significant impacts in the Pacific Northwest
region in the near and long-term future. These impacts include, among
other things, increased temperatures, declining snowpack, more frequent
heavy rainfall and flooding, receding glaciers, rising sea levels,
increased risks to public health due to insect and rodent-borne
diseases, declining salmon populations, and increased drought and risk
of forest fires.
(2) The legislature recognizes the need at this time to continue to
gather and analyze information related to climate protection. This
will allow prudent steps to be taken to avoid, mitigate, or respond to
climate impacts and protect our communities.
(3) The analysis of the health impacts of climate protection is
needed to help prepare the state for and avoid health impacts such as
West Nile virus and respiratory disease. At the same time, this
analysis will contribute to our strategic thinking and planning for the
impacts of climate change.
(4) The legislature finds that it is important for the state of
Washington to participate in emerging regional, national, and
international markets to mitigate climate change. The state has a
strong interest in ensuring that climate policies and emission markets
are designed to appropriately recognize our unique energy assets.
Further, the legislature recognizes that any market system related to
climate protection must be based on credible and durable accounting
principles and have equally applicable rules across sectors in order to
promote economically and environmentally effective trading.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 (1) The vehicle electrification work group
is established. Members of the group must be appointed by the governor
or the governor's designee and must include representatives of state
and local government agencies, ports, private and public electrical
power utilities, automobile manufacturers, trucking industry interests,
environmental interests, regional air quality agencies, and other
stakeholder groups. Staff for the work group must be provided by the
department of community, trade, and economic development, with
additional staff to be provided by other state agencies, as may be
required or requested.
(2) The vehicle electrification work group shall review, study,
evaluate, and make recommendations on at least the following items:
(a) Use by the state of plug-in hybrid vehicles and developing
plug-in availability at state locations;
(b) Incentives to encourage the use of plug-in truck auxiliary
power units and truck stop electrification;
(c) Use of plug-in shore power for cargo and cruise ship terminals,
shipside technology, and use of electric power alternatives for port-related operations and equipment such as switching locomotives, vessels
and harborcraft, and cargo-handling equipment;
(d) Potential uses for and availability of plug-in hybrid school
buses;
(e) Potential environmental and electrical grid impacts on
electrical power consumption of the conversion of a meaningful portion
of the state's private and public fleet to plug-in electrical power;
(f) Tax and fee incentives to encourage individual and fleet
purchases of plug-in hybrid vehicles;
(g) State laws, rules, tariffs, and policies that impact
transportation electrification and plug-in adoption, including pricing
with incentives for off-peak charging;
(h) Measures to encourage the use of plug-in vehicles by public
fleets, and resulting cost savings, and whether state and local fleets
should be required to purchase plug-in hybrid vehicles if it is
determined that plug-in hybrid vehicles are commercially available at
a reasonably comparable life-cycle cost;
(i) Explore the potential for the use of electrification of fixed
transit routes for magnetic levitation propulsion systems;
(j) Actions by the state to help industries located in the state
participate in developing and manufacturing plug-in vehicles and
vehicle-to-grid technologies;
(k) Additional ways the state can promote transportation
electrification in the private and public sectors, including cars and
light-duty vehicles, and truck stop and port electrification; and
(l) Potential partners for vehicle-to-grid pilot projects that test
the use of parked plug-in vehicles for power grid energy storage and
support.
(3) The vehicle electrification work group must complete its work
by December 1, 2008. The work group must submit an interim report to
the governor stating its findings, conclusions, and interim
recommendations by December 1, 2007. The group must submit a final
report to the governor stating its findings, conclusions, and final
recommendations by December 1, 2008.
(4) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall supply staff support and research to the vehicle electrification
work group.
(5) This section expires July 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 A new section is added to chapter 28B.30
RCW to read as follows:
Washington State University is directed to analyze and recommend
models for possible implementation by the legislature or the executive
office for at least the following potential biofuels incentive
programs:
(1) Market incentives to encourage instate production of brassica-based biodiesel, and cellulosic ethanol, including such market methods
as direct grants, production tax credits, and the issuance by the state
of advance guaranteed purchase contracts;
(2) Possible preferred research programs, grants, or other forms of
assistance for accelerating the development of instate production of
cellulosic ethanol and in-state biodiesel crops and their coproducts;
(3) Coordinate with the Western Washington University alternative
automobile program for opportunities to support new Washington state
technology for conversion of fossil fuel fleets to biofuel, hybrid, or
alternative fuel propulsion;
(4) Coordinate with the University of Washington's college of
forest management and the Olympic natural resources center for the
identification of barriers to using the state's forest resources for
fuel production, including the economic and transportation barriers of
physically bringing forest biomass to the market;
(5) Coordinate with the department of agriculture for the
identification of other barriers for future biofuels development; and
(6) Strategies for furthering the penetration of the Washington
state fossil fuel market with Washington produced biofuels,
particularly among public entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 (1) The department of community, trade,
and economic development shall develop and recommend, in consultation
with the department of ecology, a framework for the state of Washington
to participate in emerging regional, national, and global markets to
mitigate climate change, on a multisector basis, including the forest
sector. This framework must include, but not be limited to, credible,
verifiable, replicable inventory and accounting methodologies for each
sector involved, along with the completion of the stakeholder process
identified in executive order number 07-02.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall work closely with the department of natural resources on any
elements of this section's administration that studies or makes
recommendations on the role and opportunities of the forest sector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 (1) The climate impacts group at the
University of Washington shall:
(a) Produce an analysis of the potential human health impacts of
climate change on the state of Washington; and
(b) Produce a fifty-year comprehensive state climate change
assessment.
(2)(a) The object of the analysis of potential human health impacts
of climate change under this section is to assist state and local
public health authorities in preparing for climate change.
(b) The analysis must:
(i) Evaluate the implications of climate change for human morbidity
and mortality; and
(ii) Establish qualitative and, to the extent possible,
quantitative links between climate and risks to human health in such
areas as air quality, disease vectors, and heat stress.
(c) To ensure the appropriateness of this assessment for public
health planning, the climate impacts groups shall consult with state
and local public health agencies.
(d) If adequate funding is not made available for the completion of
all elements required under this section, the climate impacts group
shall prioritize which of the enumerated research projects have the
greatest cost/benefit ratio in terms of providing information important
for planning decisions. The prioritization process may include the
addition of any new studies that may be appropriate in addition to, or
in place of, studies listed in this section.
(3)(a) The fifty-year comprehensive state climate change assessment
under this section will serve as the baseline for future analyses of
climate change impacts and response strategies for critical economic
and ecological sectors, including agriculture, forests, shorelines,
fisheries, and urban centers.
(b) The assessment must:
(i) Develop scenarios and the range of associated uncertainty for
the state's climate over the next century;
(ii) Determine how water resources in specific watersheds will
respond to these climate change scenarios, including assessment of the
risk of current and future extreme events, such as floods and droughts;
(iii) Develop climate change streamflow scenarios for use in water
resources and salmon recovery planning;
(iv) Create scenarios of salmon and cold water ecosystem
vulnerability to water temperature and low-flows associated with future
climate scenarios;
(v) Assess sea level rise scenarios for infrastructure planning
purposes. Identify locations and patterns of coastal vulnerability to
sea level rise and hydrologic changes;
(vi) Evaluate current legal, regulatory, and institutional barriers
to climate change adaptation or preparation; and
(vii) Identify information or data gaps that might preclude
adequate state planning for climate change.
(c) If adequate funding is not made available for the completion of
all research required under this section, the climate impacts group
shall prioritize which of the enumerated research projects have the
greatest cost/benefit ratio in terms of providing information important
for planning decisions. The prioritization process may include the
addition of any new studies that may be appropriate in addition to, or
in place of, studies listed in this section.
(d) To ensure the appropriateness of this assessment for local and
state decision making, the climate impacts group shall consult with
state and local resource planning and management agencies.
(4) The climate impacts group shall report the assessments to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December
15, 2008.

Sec. 406 RCW 47.17.020 and 1970 ex.s. c 51 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 5, and designated
as a Washington green highway, is established as follows:
Beginning at the Washington-Oregon boundary line on the interstate
bridge over the Columbia river at Vancouver, thence northerly by way of
Kelso, Chehalis, Centralia, Olympia, Tacoma, Seattle, Everett and Mt.
Vernon, thence northwesterly to the east of Lake Samish, thence
northeasterly and northerly by way of Bellingham to the international
boundary line in the vicinity of Blaine in Whatcom county.

Sec. 407 RCW 47.17.135 and 1979 ex.s. c 33 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 82, and
designated as a Washington green highway, is established as follows:
Beginning at a junction with state route number 90 in the vicinity
of Ellensburg, thence southerly and easterly by way of Yakima, Union
Gap, Sunnyside, Prosser, Kiona, and Goose Gap west of Richland, thence
southeasterly near Kennewick and southwesterly by way of the vicinity
of Plymouth to a crossing of the Columbia river at the Washington-Oregon boundary line.

Sec. 408 RCW 47.17.140 and 1991 c 56 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 90, and
designated as the American Veterans Memorial Highway as well as a
Washington green highway, is established as follows:
Beginning at a junction with state route number 5, thence, via the
west approach to the Lake Washington bridge in Seattle, in an easterly
direction by way of Mercer Island, North Bend, Snoqualmie pass,
Ellensburg, Vantage, Moses Lake, Ritzville, Sprague and Spokane to the
Washington-Idaho boundary line.

PART 5
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may adopt any rules necessary for the implementation of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 The following sections are codified and
recodified as a new chapter in Title 43 RCW entitled "Energy Freedom
Authority":
RCW 15.110.005;
RCW 15.110.010;
RCW 15.110.020;
RCW 15.110.030;
RCW 15.110.040;
RCW 15.110.050;
RCW 15.110.060;
RCW 15.110.900;
RCW 15.110.901;
Section 303 of this act;
Section 307 of this act; and
Section 404 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 Sections 302 through 309 and 404 of this
act expire June 30, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 A new section is added to chapter 43.135
RCW to read as follows:
RCW 43.135.035(4) does not apply to the transfers established in
this act.

--- END ---