BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that it
is the policy of the state of Washington to prevent the loss of human
lives and the loss of property and vehicles, and to protect the
traveling environment of the state of Washington through sound and
consistent regulatory provisions for interstate and intrastate motor
carriers.
The legislature further finds and declares that it is a policy of
the state of Washington to require commercial motor vehicles operating
on state roadways to comply with rigorous federal and state safety
regulations. The legislature also finds that intrastate and interstate
commercial motor vehicles should comply with consistent state and
federal commercial vehicle regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the Tony
Qamar and Daniel Johnson act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise:
(1) "Commercial motor vehicle," for the purposes of requiring a
department of transportation number, means the same as defined in RCW
46.25.010(6), or a motor vehicle used in commerce when the motor
vehicle: (a) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 11,794 kilograms or
more (26,001 pounds or more) inclusive of a towed unit of a gross
vehicle weight rating of more than 4,536 kilograms (10,000 pounds or
more); (b) has a gross vehicle weight rating of 11,794 kilograms or
more (26,001 pounds or more); or (c) is used in the transportation of
hazardous materials, as defined in RCW 46.25.010(13);
(2) "Department" means the department of licensing;
(3) "Department of transportation number" means a department of
transportation number from the federal motor carrier safety
administration;
(4) "Interstate commercial motor vehicle" means a commercial
vehicle that operates in more than one state;
(5) "Intrastate commercial motor vehicle" means a commercial
vehicle that operates exclusively within the state of Washington;
(6) "Motor carrier" means a person or entity who has been issued a
department of transportation number and who owns a commercial motor
vehicle.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.04.480 and 1995 c 332 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Revoke," in all its forms, means the invalidation for a period of
one calendar year and thereafter until reissue((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, under the provisions of RCW 46.20.285, 46.20.311, 46.20.265,
or 46.61.5055, and chapters 46.32 and 46.65 RCW, the invalidation may
last for a period other than one calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall refuse to register a commercial motor
vehicle that is owned by a motor carrier subject to RCW 46.32.080,
46.87.294, and 46.87.296 upon notification to the department by the
Washington state patrol or the federal motor carrier safety
administration that an out-of-service order has been placed on the
department of transportation number issued to the motor carrier.
(2) The department shall revoke the vehicle registration of all
commercial motor vehicles that are owned by a motor carrier subject to
RCW 46.32.080, upon notification to the department by the Washington
state patrol or the federal motor carrier safety administration that an
out-of-service order has been placed on the department of
transportation number issued to the motor carrier. The revocation must
remain in effect until the department has been notified by the
Washington state patrol that the out-of-service order has been
rescinded.
(3) By June 30, 2009, any original or renewal application for
registration of a commercial motor vehicle that is owned by a motor
carrier subject to RCW 46.32.080 that is submitted to the department
must be accompanied by:
(a) The department of transportation number issued to the motor
carrier; and
(b) The federal taxpayer identification number of the motor
carrier.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.16.160 and 2002 c 352 s 8 and 2002 c 168 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The owner of a vehicle which under reciprocal relations with
another jurisdiction would be required to obtain a license registration
in this state or an unlicensed vehicle which would be required to
obtain a license registration for operation on public highways of this
state may, as an alternative to such license registration, secure and
operate such vehicle under authority of a trip permit issued by this
state in lieu of a Washington certificate of license registration, and
licensed gross weight if applicable. The licensed gross weight may not
exceed eighty thousand pounds for a combination of vehicles nor forty
thousand pounds for a single unit vehicle with three or more axles.
Trip permits are required for movement of mobile homes or park model
trailers and may only be issued if property taxes are paid in full.
For the purpose of this section, a vehicle is considered unlicensed if
the licensed gross weight currently in effect for the vehicle or
combination of vehicles is not adequate for the load being carried.
Vehicles registered under RCW 46.16.135 shall not be operated under
authority of trip permits in lieu of further registration within the
same registration year.
(2) Each trip permit shall authorize the operation of a single
vehicle at the maximum legal weight limit for such vehicle for a period
of three consecutive days commencing with the day of first use. No
more than three such permits may be used for any one vehicle in any
period of thirty consecutive days, except that in the case of a
recreational vehicle as defined in RCW 43.22.335, no more than two trip
permits may be used for any one vehicle in a one-year period. Every
permit shall identify, as the department may require, the vehicle for
which it is issued and shall be completed in its entirety and signed by
the operator before operation of the vehicle on the public highways of
this state. Correction of data on the permit such as dates, license
number, or vehicle identification number invalidates the permit. The
trip permit shall be displayed on the vehicle to which it is issued as
prescribed by the department.
(3) Vehicles operating under authority of trip permits are subject
to all laws, rules, and regulations affecting the operation of like
vehicles in this state.
(4) Prorate operators operating commercial vehicles on trip permits
in Washington shall retain the customer copy of such permit for four
years.
(5) Trip permits may be obtained from field offices of the
department of transportation, ((Washington state patrol,)) department
of licensing, or other agents appointed by the department. The fee for
each trip permit is ((fifteen)) twenty dollars. Five dollars from
every twenty-dollar trip permit fee shall be deposited into the state
patrol highway account and must be used for commercial motor vehicle
inspections. For each permit issued, the fee includes a filing fee as
provided by RCW 46.01.140 and an excise tax of one dollar. The
remaining portion of the trip permit fee must be deposited to the
credit of the motor vehicle fund as an administrative fee. If the
filing fee amount of three dollars as prescribed in RCW 46.01.140 is
increased or decreased after July 1, 2002, the administrative fee must
be increased or decreased by the same amount so that the total trip
permit would be adjusted equally to compensate. These fees and taxes
are in lieu of all other vehicle license fees and taxes. No exchange,
credits, or refunds may be given for trip permits after they have been
purchased.
(6) The department may appoint county auditors or businesses as
agents for the purpose of selling trip permits to the public. County
auditors or businesses so appointed may retain the filing fee collected
for each trip permit to defray expenses incurred in handling and
selling the permits.
(7) Commercial motor vehicles that are owned by a motor carrier
subject to RCW 46.32.080, must not be operated on trip permits
authorized by RCW 46.16.160 or 46.16.162 if the motor carrier's
department of transportation number has been placed out of service by
the Washington state patrol. A violation of or a failure to comply
with this subsection is a gross misdemeanor, subject to a minimum
monetary penalty of two thousand five hundred dollars for the first
violation and five thousand dollars for each subsequent violation.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, a
violation of or a failure to comply with any provision of this section
is a gross misdemeanor.
(((8))) (9) The department of licensing may adopt rules as it deems
necessary to administer this section.
(((9))) (10) A surcharge of five dollars is imposed on the issuance
of trip permits. The portion of the surcharge paid by motor carriers
must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund for the purpose of
supporting vehicle weigh stations, weigh-in-motion programs, and the
commercial vehicle information systems and networks program. The
remaining portion of the surcharge must be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund for the purpose of supporting congestion relief programs.
All other administrative fees and excise taxes collected under the
provisions of this chapter shall be forwarded by the department with
proper identifying detailed report to the state treasurer who shall
deposit the administrative fees to the credit of the motor vehicle fund
and the excise taxes to the credit of the general fund. Filing fees
will be forwarded and reported to the state treasurer by the department
as prescribed in RCW 46.01.140.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.32.010 and 1993 c 403 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The chief of the Washington state patrol may operate, maintain,
or designate, throughout the state of Washington, stations for the
inspection of commercial motor vehicles, school buses, and private
carrier buses, with respect to vehicle equipment, drivers'
qualifications, and hours of service and to set reasonable times when
inspection of vehicles shall be performed.
(2) The state patrol may inspect a commercial motor vehicle while
the vehicle is operating on the public highways of this state with
respect to vehicle equipment, hours of service, and driver
qualifications.
(3) It is unlawful for any vehicle required to be inspected to be
operated over the public highways of this state unless and until it has
been approved periodically as to equipment.
(4) Inspections shall be performed by a responsible employee of the
chief of the Washington state patrol, who shall be duly authorized and
who shall have authority to secure and withhold, with written notice to
the director of licensing, the certificate of license registration and
license plates of any vehicle found to be defective in equipment so as
to be unsafe or unfit to be operated upon the highways of this state,
and it shall be unlawful for any person to operate ((such)) a vehicle
placed out of service by an officer unless and until it has been placed
in a condition satisfactory to pass a subsequent equipment inspection.
The ((police)) officer in charge of such vehicle equipment inspection
shall grant to the operator of such defective vehicle the privilege to
move such vehicle to a place for repair under such restrictions as may
be reasonably necessary.
(5) In the event any insignia, sticker, or other marker is adopted
to be displayed upon vehicles in connection with the inspection of
vehicle equipment, it shall be displayed as required by the rules of
the chief of the Washington state patrol, and it is a traffic
infraction for any person to mutilate, destroy, remove, or otherwise
interfere with the display thereof.
(6) It is a traffic infraction for any person to refuse to have his
motor vehicle examined as required by the chief of the Washington state
patrol, or, after having had it examined, to refuse to place an
insignia, sticker, or other marker, if issued, upon the vehicle, or
fraudulently to obtain any such insignia, sticker, or other marker, or
to refuse to place his motor vehicle in proper condition after having
had it examined, or in any manner, to fail to conform to the provisions
of this chapter.
(7) It is a traffic infraction for any person to perform false or
improvised repairs, or repairs in any manner not in accordance with
acceptable and customary repair practices, upon a motor vehicle.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.32.020 and 1993 c 403 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The chief of the Washington state patrol may adopt
reasonable rules regarding types of vehicles to be inspected,
inspection criteria, times for the inspection of vehicle equipment,
drivers' qualifications, hours of service, and all other matters with
respect to the conduct of vehicle equipment and driver inspections.
(b) The chief of the Washington state patrol shall prepare and
furnish such stickers, tags, record and report forms, stationery, and
other supplies as shall be deemed necessary. The chief of the
Washington state patrol is empowered to appoint and employ such
assistants as he may consider necessary and to fix hours of employment
and compensation.
(2) The chief of the Washington state patrol shall use data-driven
analysis to prioritize for inspections and compliance reviews those
motor carriers whose relative safety fitness identify them as higher
risk motor carriers.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.32.040 and 1986 c 123 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, vehicle
equipment inspection shall be at such intervals as required by the
chief of the Washington state patrol and shall be made without charge.
(2) When a motor carrier is identified as a high-risk carrier
through a data driven analysis due to formerly or recently identified
deficiencies or violations, the fee for each motor carrier compliance
review follow-up to ensure those deficiencies or violations have been
corrected is two hundred fifty dollars. The fee shall be collected by
the Washington state patrol and shall be deposited into the state
patrol highway account. This fee applies to motor carriers already
identified as a high-risk carrier or a motor carrier that has been
reclassified as a high-risk carrier due to recently identified
deficiencies or violations.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.32.080 and 1995 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state patrol is responsible for enforcement of
safety requirements for commercial motor vehicles((,)) including, but
not limited to ((terminal)), safety audits and compliance reviews.
Those motor carriers that have ((terminal)) operations in this state
are subject to the patrol's ((terminal)) safety audits and compliance
review programs. Compliance reviews may result in the initiation of an
enforcement action, which may include monetary penalties.
(2) ((This section does not apply to:
(a))) Motor vehicles owned and operated by farmers in the
transportation of their own farm, orchard, or dairy products, including
livestock and plant or animal wastes, from point of production to
market or disposal((;)), or supplies or commodities to be used on the
farm, orchard, or dairy((;
(b) Commercial motor carriers subject to economic regulation under
chapters 81.68 (auto transportation companies), 81.70 (passenger
charter carriers), 81.77 (solid waste collection companies), 81.80
(motor freight carriers), and 81.90 (limousine charter carriers) RCW;
and
(c) Vehicles exempted from registration by RCW 46.16.020.)), must
have a department of transportation number, as defined in section 3 of
this act, but are exempt from safety audits and compliance reviews.
(3) All records and documents required of motor carriers with
operations in this state must be available for review and inspection
during normal business hours. Duly authorized agents of the state
patrol conducting safety audits and compliance reviews may enter the
motor carrier's place of business, or any location where records or
equipment are located, at reasonable times and without advanced notice.
Motor carriers who do not permit duly authorized agents to enter their
place of business, or any location where records or equipment are
located, for safety audits and compliance reviews are subject to
enforcement action, including a monetary penalty.
(4)(a) All motor carriers with a commercial motor vehicle, as
defined in section 3 of this act, that operate in this state must apply
for a department of transportation number, as defined in section 3 of
this act, by January 1, 2008.
(b) The state patrol may deny an application if the motor carrier
does not meet the requirements and standards under this chapter. The
state patrol shall not issue a department of transportation number to
a motor carrier who at the time of application has been placed out of
service by the federal motor carrier safety administration. Commercial
motor vehicles must be marked as prescribed by the state patrol. Those
motor carriers with a current United States department of
transportation number are exempt from applying for a department of
transportation number.
(c) The state patrol may (i) place a motor carrier out of service
or (ii) refuse to issue or recognize as valid a department of
transportation number to a motor carrier who: (A) Formerly held a
department of transportation number that was placed out of service for
cause, and where cause has not been removed; (B) is a subterfuge for
the real party in interest whose department of transportation number
was placed out of service for cause, and where cause has not been
removed; (C) as an individual licensee, or officer, director, owner, or
managing employee of a nonindividual licensee, had a department of
transportation number and was placed out of service for cause, and
where cause has not been removed; or (D) has an unsatisfied debt to the
state assessed under this chapter.
(d) Upon a finding by the chief of the state patrol or the chief's
designee that a motor carrier is an imminent hazard or danger to the
public health, safety, or welfare, the state patrol shall notify the
department, and the department shall revoke the registrations for all
commercial motor vehicles that are owned by the motor carrier subject
to RCW 46.32.080. In determining whether a motor carrier is an
imminent hazard or danger to the public health, safety, or welfare, the
chief or the chief's designee shall consider safety factors.

Sec. 11 RCW 46.32.090 and 1996 c 86 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall collect a fee of ((ten)) sixteen dollars, in
addition to all other fees and taxes, for each motor vehicle base
plated in the state of Washington that is subject to highway
inspections and ((terminal audits)) compliance reviews under RCW
46.32.080, at the time of registration and renewal of registration
under chapter 46.16 or 46.87 RCW, or the international registration
plan if ((based [base])) base plated in a foreign jurisdiction. The
((ten-dollar)) fee must be apportioned for those vehicles operating
interstate and registered under the international registration plan.
This fee does not apply to nonmotor-powered vehicles, including
trailers. Refunds will not be provided for fees paid under this
section when the vehicle is no longer subject to RCW 46.32.080. The
department may deduct an amount equal to the cost of administering the
program. All remaining fees shall be deposited with the state
treasurer and credited to the state patrol highway account of the motor
vehicle fund.

Sec. 12 RCW 46.32.100 and 2005 c 444 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to all other penalties provided by law, a
commercial motor vehicle that is subject to ((terminal safety audits))
compliance reviews under this chapter and an officer, agent, or
employee of a company operating a commercial motor vehicle who violates
or who procures, aids, or abets in the violation of this title or any
order or rule of the state patrol is liable for a penalty of one
hundred dollars for each violation, except for each violation of 49
C.F.R. Pt. 382, controlled substances and alcohol use and testing, 49
C.F.R. Sec. 391.15, disqualification of drivers, and 49 C.F.R. Sec.
396.9(c)(2), moving a vehicle placed out of service before the out of
service defects have been satisfactorily repaired, for which the person
is liable for a penalty of five hundred dollars. The driver of a
commercial motor vehicle who violates an out-of-service order is liable
for a penalty of at least one thousand one hundred dollars but not more
than two thousand seven hundred fifty dollars. An employer who allows
a driver to operate a commercial motor vehicle when there is an out-of-service order is liable for a penalty of at least two thousand seven
hundred fifty dollars but not more than eleven thousand dollars. Each
violation is a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a
continuing violation every day's continuance is a separate and distinct
violation.
(b) In addition to all other penalties provided by law, any motor
carrier, company, or any officer or agent of a motor carrier or company
operating a commercial motor vehicle subject to compliance reviews
under this chapter who refuses entry or to make the required records,
documents, and vehicles available to a duly authorized agent of the
state patrol is liable for a penalty of at least five thousand dollars
as well as an out-of-service order being placed on the department of
transportation number, as defined in section 3 of this act, and vehicle
registration to operate. Each violation is a separate and distinct
offense, and in case of a continuing violation every day's continuance
is a separate and distinct violation.
(c) A motor carrier operating a commercial motor vehicle after
receiving a final unsatisfactory rating or being placed out of service
is liable for a penalty of not more than eleven thousand dollars. Each
violation is a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a
continuing violation every day's continuance is a separate and distinct
violation.
(2) The Washington state patrol may place an out-of-service order
on a department of transportation number, as defined in section 3 of
this act, for violations of this chapter or for nonpayment of any
monetary penalties assessed by the state patrol or the utilities and
transportation commission, as a result of compliance reviews, or for
violations of cease and desist orders issued by the utilities and
transportation commission. The state patrol shall notify the
department of licensing when an out-of-service order has been placed on
a motor carrier's department of transportation number. The state
patrol shall notify the motor carrier when there has been an out-of-service order placed on the motor carrier's department of
transportation number and the vehicle registrations have been revoked
by sending a notice by first class mail using the last known address
for the registered or legal owner or owners, and recording the
transmittal on an affidavit of first class mail. Notices under this
section fulfill the requirements of RCW 46.12.160. Motor carriers may
not be eligible for a new department of transportation number, vehicle
registration, or temporary permits to operate unless the violations
that resulted in the out-of-service order have been corrected.
((The)) (3) Any penalty provided in this section is due and payable
when the person incurring it receives a notice in writing from the
state patrol describing the violation and advising the person that the
penalty is due. ((The patrol may, upon written application for review,
received within fifteen days, remit or mitigate a penalty provided for
in this section or discontinue a prosecution to recover the penalty
upon such terms it deems proper and may ascertain the facts upon all
such applications in such manner and under such rules as it deems
proper.)) If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the state patrol
within ((fifteen)) twenty days after the later of (a) receipt of the
notice imposing the penalty, or ((application for remission or
mitigation has not been made within fifteen days after the violator has
received notice of the)) (b) disposition of ((the application)) an
adjudicative proceeding regarding the penalty, the state patrol may
commence an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW in the name
of the state of Washington to confirm the violation and recover the
penalty. In all such proceedings the procedure and rules of evidence
are as specified in chapter 34.05 RCW except as otherwise provided in
this chapter. All penalties recovered under this section shall be paid
into the state treasury and credited to the state patrol highway
account of the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 13 RCW 46.44.105 and 2006 c 297 s 1 and 2006 c 50 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter is a traffic
infraction, and upon the first finding thereof shall be assessed a
basic penalty of not less than fifty dollars; and upon a second finding
thereof shall be assessed a basic penalty of not less than seventy-five
dollars; and upon a third or subsequent finding shall be assessed a
basic penalty of not less than one hundred dollars.
(2) In addition to the penalties imposed in subsection (1) of this
section, any person violating RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047,
46.44.090, 46.44.091, or 46.44.095 shall be assessed a penalty for each
pound overweight, as follows:
(a) One pound through four thousand pounds overweight is three
cents for each pound;
(b) Four thousand one pounds through ten thousand pounds overweight
is one hundred twenty dollars plus twelve cents per pound for each
additional pound over four thousand pounds overweight;
(c) Ten thousand one pounds through fifteen thousand pounds
overweight is eight hundred forty dollars plus sixteen cents per pound
for each additional pound over ten thousand pounds overweight;
(d) Fifteen thousand one pounds through twenty thousand pounds
overweight is one thousand six hundred forty dollars plus twenty cents
per pound for each additional pound over fifteen thousand pounds
overweight;
(e) Twenty thousand one pounds and more is two thousand six hundred
forty dollars plus thirty cents per pound for each additional pound
over twenty thousand pounds overweight.
Upon a first violation in any calendar year, the court may suspend
the penalty for five hundred pounds of excess weight for each axle on
any vehicle or combination of vehicles, not to exceed a two thousand
pound suspension. In no case may the basic penalty assessed in
subsection (1) of this section or the additional penalty assessed in
subsection (2) of this section, except as provided for the first
violation, be suspended.
(3) ((Whenever any vehicle or combination of vehicles is involved
in two violations of RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090,
46.44.091, or 46.44.095 during any twelve-month period, the court may
suspend the certificate of license registration of the vehicle or
combination of vehicles for not less than thirty days. Upon a third or
succeeding violation of RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090,
46.44.091, or 46.44.095, during any twelve-month period or a third or
succeeding out-of-service violation, as defined in the code of federal
regulations as of June 7, 2006, during any twelve-month period, the
court shall suspend the certificate of license registration for not
less than thirty days. Whenever the certificate of license
registration is suspended, the court shall secure such certificate and
immediately forward the same to the director with information
concerning the suspension.
(4))) Any person found to have violated any posted limitations of
a highway or section of highway shall be assessed a monetary penalty of
not less than one hundred and fifty dollars, and the court shall in
addition thereto upon second violation within a twelve-month period
involving the same power unit, suspend the certificate of license
registration for not less than thirty days.
(((5))) (4) It is unlawful for the driver of a vehicle to fail or
refuse to stop and submit the vehicle and load to a weighing, or to
fail or refuse, when directed by an officer upon a weighing of the
vehicle to stop the vehicle and otherwise comply with the provisions of
this section. It is unlawful for a driver of a commercial motor
vehicle as defined in RCW 46.32.005, other than the driver of a bus as
defined in RCW 46.32.005(3) or a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight
rating or gross combination weight rating of 7,257 kilograms or less
(16,000 pounds or less) and not transporting hazardous materials in
accordance with RCW 46.32.005(4), to fail or refuse to stop at a
weighing station when proper traffic control signs indicate scales are
open. However, unladen tow trucks regardless of weight and farm
vehicles carrying farm produce with a gross vehicle weight rating or
gross combination weight rating of 11,794 kilograms or less (26,000
pounds or less) may fail or refuse to stop at a weighing station when
proper traffic control signs indicate scales are open.
Any police officer is authorized to require the driver of any
vehicle or combination of vehicles to stop and submit to a weighing
either by means of a portable or stationary scale and may require that
the vehicle be driven to the nearest public scale. Whenever a police
officer, upon weighing a vehicle and load, determines that the weight
is unlawful, the officer may require the driver to stop the vehicle in
a suitable location and remain standing until such portion of the load
is removed as may be necessary to reduce the gross weight of the
vehicle to the limit permitted by law. If the vehicle is loaded with
grain or other perishable commodities, the driver shall be permitted to
proceed without removing any of the load, unless the gross weight of
the vehicle and load exceeds by more than ten percent the limit
permitted by this chapter. The owner or operator of the vehicle shall
care for all materials unloaded at the risk of the owner or operator.
Any vehicle whose driver or owner represents that the vehicle is
disabled or otherwise unable to proceed to a weighing location shall
have its load sealed or otherwise marked by any police officer. The
owner or driver shall be directed that upon completion of repairs, the
vehicle shall submit to weighing with the load and markings and/or seal
intact and undisturbed. Failure to report for weighing, appearing for
weighing with the seal broken or the markings disturbed, or removal of
any cargo prior to weighing is unlawful. Any person so convicted shall
be fined one thousand dollars, and in addition the certificate of
license registration shall be suspended for not less than thirty days.
(((6))) (5) Any other provision of law to the contrary
notwithstanding, district courts having venue have concurrent
jurisdiction with the superior courts for the imposition of any
penalties authorized under this section.
(((7))) (6) For the purpose of determining additional penalties as
provided by subsection (2) of this section, "overweight" means the
poundage in excess of the maximum allowable gross weight or axle/axle
grouping weight prescribed by RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047,
46.44.091, and 46.44.095.
(((8))) (7) The penalties provided in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW or RCW
10.82.070. For the purpose of computing the basic penalties and
additional penalties to be imposed under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, the convictions shall be on the same vehicle or
combination of vehicles within a twelve-month period under the same
ownership.
(((9))) (8) Any state patrol officer or any weight control officer
who finds any person operating a vehicle or a combination of vehicles
in violation of the conditions of a permit issued under RCW 46.44.047,
46.44.090, and 46.44.095 may confiscate the permit and forward it to
the state department of transportation which may return it to the
permittee or revoke, cancel, or suspend it without refund. The
department of transportation shall keep a record of all action taken
upon permits so confiscated, and if a permit is returned to the
permittee the action taken by the department of transportation shall be
endorsed thereon. Any permittee whose permit is suspended or revoked
may upon request receive a hearing before the department of
transportation or person designated by that department. After the
hearing the department of transportation may reinstate any permit or
revise its previous action.
Every permit issued as provided for in this chapter shall be
carried in the vehicle or combination of vehicles to which it refers
and shall be open to inspection by any law enforcement officer or
authorized agent of any authority granting such a permit.
Upon the third finding within a calendar year of a violation of the
requirements and conditions of a permit issued under RCW 46.44.095, the
permit shall be canceled, and the canceled permit shall be immediately
transmitted by the court or the arresting officer to the department of
transportation. The vehicle covered by the canceled permit is not
eligible for a new permit for a period of thirty days.
(((10))) (9) For the purposes of determining gross weights the
actual scale weight taken by the arresting officer is prima facie
evidence of the total gross weight.
(((11))) (10) It is a traffic infraction to direct the loading of
a vehicle with knowledge that it violates the requirements in RCW
46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090, 46.44.091, or 46.44.095 and
that it is to be operated on the public highways of this state.
(((12))) (11) The chief of the state patrol, with the advice of the
department, may adopt reasonable rules to aid in the enforcement of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 46.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the department of
licensing, shall adopt rules consistent with this chapter to regulate
vehicle safety requirements for motor carriers who own, control,
manage, or operate a commercial motor vehicle within this state.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the rules adopted by the
state patrol under this section must be as rigorous as federal
regulations governing certain interstate motor carriers at 49 C.F.R.
Parts 40 and 380 through 397, which cover the areas of commercial motor
carrier driver training, controlled substance and alcohol use and
testing, compliance with the federal driver's license requirements and
penalties, vehicle equipment and safety standards, hazardous material
practices, financial responsibility, driver qualifications, hours of
service, vehicle inspection and corrective actions, and assessed
penalties for noncompliance. The state patrol shall amend these rules
periodically to maintain, to the extent permissible under this chapter,
standards as rigorous as the federal regulations governing certain
interstate motor carriers. The state patrol shall submit a report to
the legislature by December 31st of each year that outlines new rules
or rule changes and explains how the state rules compare to the federal
regulations.

Sec. 15 RCW 46.87.294 and 2003 c 85 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall refuse to register a vehicle under this
chapter if the registrant or motor carrier responsible for the safety
of the vehicle has been prohibited under federal law from operating by
the federal motor carrier safety administration. The department shall
not register a vehicle if the Washington state patrol has placed an
out-of-service order on the vehicle's department of transportation
number, as defined in section 3 of this act.

Sec. 16 RCW 46.87.296 and 2003 c 85 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall suspend or revoke the registration of a
vehicle registered under this chapter if the registrant or motor
carrier responsible for the safety of the vehicle has been prohibited
under federal law from operating by the federal motor carrier safety
administration. The department shall not register a vehicle if the
Washington state patrol has placed an out-of-service order on the
vehicle's department of transportation number, as defined in section 3
of this act.

Sec. 17 RCW 82.38.100 and 1999 c 270 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any special fuel user operating a motor vehicle into this state
for commercial purposes may make application for a trip permit that
shall be good for a period of three consecutive days beginning and
ending on the dates specified on the face of the permit issued, and
only for the vehicle for which it is issued.
(2) Every permit shall identify, as the department may require, the
vehicle for which it is issued and shall be completed in its entirety,
signed, and dated by the operator before operation of the vehicle on
the public highways of this state. Correction of data on the permit
such as dates, vehicle license number, or vehicle identification number
invalidates the permit. A violation of, or a failure to comply with,
this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.
(3) For each permit issued, there shall be collected a filing fee
of one dollar, an administrative fee of ((ten)) fifteen dollars, and an
excise tax of nine dollars. Such fees and tax shall be in lieu of the
special fuel tax otherwise assessable against the permit holder for
importing and using special fuel in a motor vehicle on the public
highways of this state, and no report of mileage shall be required with
respect to such vehicle. Trip permits will not be issued if the
applicant has outstanding fuel taxes, penalties, or interest owing to
the state or has had a special fuel license revoked for cause and the
cause has not been removed. Five dollars from every fifteen-dollar
administration fee shall be deposited into the state patrol highway
account and must be used for commercial motor vehicle inspections.
(4) Blank permits may be obtained from field offices of the
department of transportation, Washington state patrol, department of
licensing, or other agents appointed by the department. The department
may appoint county auditors or businesses as agents for the purpose of
selling trip permits to the public. County auditors or businesses so
appointed may retain the filing fee collected for each trip permit to
defray expenses incurred in handling and selling the permits.
(5) A surcharge of five dollars is imposed on the issuance of trip
permits. The portion of the surcharge paid by motor carriers must be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund for the purpose of supporting
vehicle weigh stations, weigh-in-motion programs, and the commercial
vehicle information systems and networks program. The remaining
portion of the surcharge must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
for the purpose of supporting congestion relief programs. All other
fees and excise taxes collected by the department for trip permits
shall be credited and deposited in the same manner as the special fuel
tax collected under this chapter and shall not be subject to exchange,
refund, or credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 This act does not apply to:
(1) Commercial motor vehicles that are operated under a permit and
subject to economic regulation under chapters 81.68, 81.70, 81.77, and
81.80 RCW; and
(2) Vehicles exempted from registration by RCW 46.16.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Section 10 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---