BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.02.110 and 2000 c 171 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the licenses processed under the master license
system prior to April 1, 1982, on July 1, 1982, use of the master
license system shall be expanded as provided by this section.
Applications for the following shall be filed with the business
license center and shall be processed, and renewals shall be issued,
under the master license system:
(1) Nursery dealer's licenses required by chapter 15.13 RCW;
(2) Seed dealer's licenses required by chapter 15.49 RCW;
(3) Pesticide dealer's licenses required by chapter 15.58 RCW;
(4) Shopkeeper's licenses required by chapter 18.64 RCW;
(5) ((Refrigerated locker licenses required by chapter 19.32 RCW;
(6))) Egg dealer's licenses required by chapter 69.25 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.900 and 1990 c 33 s 580 are each amended to read
as follows:
All references to the secretary or department of social and health
services in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean
the secretary or department of health when referring to the functions
transferred in RCW 43.70.080, ((15.36.005,)) 18.104.005, ((19.32.005,
28A.210.005,)) 43.83B.005, 43.99D.005, 43.99E.005, ((70.05.005,))
70.08.005, ((70.12.005,)) 70.22.005, 70.24.005, 70.40.005, 70.41.005,
and 70.54.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 19.32.005 (Transfer of duties to the department of health)
and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 238;
(2) RCW 19.32.010 (Declaration of police power) and 1943 c 117 s 1;
(3) RCW 19.32.020 (Definitions) and 1982 c 182 s 31 & 1943 c 117 s
2;
(4) RCW 19.32.030 (Director -- Duties) and 1943 c 117 s 7;
(5) RCW 19.32.040 (Licensing required -- Application) and 1982 c 182
s 32 & 1943 c 117 s 3;
(6) RCW 19.32.050 (License fees -- Expiration -- Annual renewal fees)
and 1982 c 182 s 33, 1967 c 240 s 39, & 1943 c 117 s 4;
(7) RCW 19.32.055 (Stipulated license fee to replace existent
charges) and 1943 c 117 s 15;
(8) RCW 19.32.060 (Revocation or suspension of licenses -- Grounds--Notice -- Review) and 1997 c 58 s 849 & 1943 c 117 s 5;
(9) RCW 19.32.090 (Revocation or suspension of licenses--Witnesses -- Evidence) and 1943 c 117 s 10;
(10) RCW 19.32.100 (Equipment -- Operation -- Controls -- Temperatures)
and 1943 c 117 s 9;
(11) RCW 19.32.110 (Diseased persons not to be employed -- Health
certificates) and 1991 c 3 s 287, 1985 c 213 s 11, & 1943 c 117 s 6;
(12) RCW 19.32.150 (Inspection of lockers and vehicles) and 2000 c
171 s 49 & 1943 c 117 s 8;
(13) RCW 19.32.160 (Liability for loss of goods) and 1943 c 117 s
12;
(14) RCW 19.32.165 (Owners or operators not warehousemen) and 1943
c 117 s 14;
(15) RCW 19.32.170 (Operator's lien -- Liability for game law
violations) and 1995 c 62 s 3, 1969 c 82 s 10, & 1943 c 117 s 13;
(16) RCW 19.32.180 (Violations -- Penalty) and 1943 c 117 s 11; and
(17) RCW 19.32.900 (Severability -- 1943 c 117) and 1943 c 117 s 16.

--- END ---