BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The sale of real property is exempt from tax under this
chapter, if the seller claiming the exemption: (a) Occupied the
property as a principal place of residence on the date military
relocation orders were issued that require the seller, or seller's
spouse, to relocate for continued active duty service; (b) purchased
the residence within the five years preceding the date of issuance of
the military relocation orders; (c) sold the property within the twelve
months following the issuance of the military relocation orders; and
(d) was an active duty member of the military on the date the property
was sold, or the seller's spouse was an active duty member on such
date.
(2)(a) When a real estate tax affidavit is submitted to the county
treasurer and the affidavit specifies the exemption under this section,
the treasurer may request to verify, or maintain copies of, documents
required in accordance with (b) of this subsection.
(b) The seller taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section including, but not limited to: (i) The permanent change of
station orders, or other documentation substantiating military
relocation orders; (ii) the instrument of sale or conveyance
substantiating the seller's purchase of the residence within the three
years preceding the date of issuance of the military relocation orders;
(iii) documentation indicating active duty status in the military on
the date the property was sold; (iv) the seller's Washington state
driver's license and certificate of vehicle license registration, if
the seller owns and operates a vehicle; and (v) the seller's voter
registration card, or other documentation indicating that the seller is
registered to vote in the state of Washington, if the seller is
registered to vote.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "military" means the armed
forces of the United States, the national guard, or the reserves of the
armed forces of the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect October 1, 2007.

--- END ---