BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.64.050 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The small farm direct marketing assistance program is created.
(2) The director shall employ a small farm direct marketing
assistant.
(3) The small farm direct marketing assistance program shall assist
small farms in their direct marketing efforts. In carrying out this
duty the program shall:
(a) Assist small farms in complying with federal, state, and local
rules and regulations as they apply to direct marketing of agricultural
products;
(b) Assist in developing infrastructure to increase direct
marketing opportunities for small farms;
(c) Provide information on direct marketing opportunities for small
farms;
(d) Promote localized food production systems;
(e) Increase access to information for farmers wishing to sell farm
products directly to consumers;
(f) Identify and help reduce market barriers facing small farms in
direct marketing;
(g) Assist in developing and submitting proposals to grant programs
to assist small farm direct marketing efforts; and
(h) Perform other functions that will assist small farms in
directly marketing their products.
(((4) This section expires July 1, 2007.))

--- END ---