BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.76.240 and 1995 c 380 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state, counties, local communities, ports, railroads, labor,
and shippers all benefit from continuation of rail service and should
participate in its preservation. Lines that provide benefits to the
state and local jurisdictions, such as avoided roadway costs, reduced
traffic congestion, economic development potential, environmental
protection, and safety, should be assisted through the joint efforts of
the state, local jurisdictions, and the private sector.
State funding for rail service, rail preservation, and corridor
preservation projects must benefit the state's interests. The state's
interest is served by reducing public roadway maintenance and repair
costs, increasing economic development opportunities, increasing
domestic and international trade, preserving jobs, and enhancing
safety. State funding for projects is contingent upon appropriate
local jurisdiction and private sector participation and cooperation.
Before spending state moneys on projects the department shall seek
federal, local, and private funding and participation to the greatest
extent possible.
(1) The department of transportation shall continue to monitor the
status of the state's mainline and branchline common carrier railroads
and preserved rail corridors through the state rail plan and various
analyses, ((and)) shall seek alternatives to abandonment prior to
((interstate commerce commission)) proceedings of the surface
transportation board, or its successor agency, where feasible((.
(2) The utilities and transportation commission shall)), and may
intervene in ((interstate commerce commission)) proceedings ((on
abandonments)) of the surface transportation board, or its successor
agency, regarding abandonment of lines, or rates, fares, charges,
classifications, practices, or rules in relation to the transportation
of persons or property in this state that are excessive or
discriminatory, when necessary((,)) to protect the state's interest.
The department shall consult with the utilities and transportation
commission regarding railroad safety impacts when considering
intervention.
(((3))) (2) The department of transportation, in consultation with
the Washington state freight rail policy advisory committee, shall
establish criteria for evaluating rail projects and corridors of
significance to the state.
(((4))) (3) Local jurisdictions may implement rail service
preservation projects in the absence of state participation.
(((5))) (4) The department of transportation shall continue to
monitor projects for which it provides assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 81.28.250 (Commission may complain of
interstate rates) and 1961 c 14 s 81.28.250 are each repealed.

--- END ---