BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.24.067 and 1992 c 62 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The use of the county law library shall be free to the judges of
the state, to state and county officials, ((and)) to members of the
bar, to residents of the county, and to such others as the board of
trustees may by rule provide. ((Residents of counties with a
population of three hundred thousand or more shall have free use of the
law library.))

Sec. 2 RCW 27.24.068 and 1991 c 363 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
In each county with a population of less than eight thousand, there
may be a county law library which shall be governed and maintained by
the prosecuting attorney who shall also serve as trustee of such
library without additional salary or other compensation.
The use of the county law library shall be free to the judges of
the state, to state and county officials, ((and)) to members of the
bar, to residents of the county, and to such others as the prosecuting
attorney may by rule provide.

--- END ---