BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in order to
protect life, property, and health, and to promote public welfare it is
in the public interest to regulate the practice of soil science to:
(1) Define the practice of soil science as a profession by establishing
minimum standards of ethical conduct and professional responsibility
and by establishing professional education and experience requirements;
and (2) prevent abuses in the practice of soil science by untrained or
unprincipled individuals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory committee" means a group of either certified
professional soil classifiers or certified professional soil scientists
or licensed soil scientists with broad knowledge and experience in
their profession, appointed under this chapter to offer recommendations
to the board and the director on the administration of the program
established under this chapter.
(2) "Board" means the geologist licensing board as defined in RCW
18.220.010.
(3) "Certified crop adviser" means an agronomist certified by and
under the rules set by the American society of agronomy's international
certified crop adviser program. A certified crop adviser practices
agronomic advising related to four areas: Nutrient management; soil
and water management; integrated pest management; and crop management.
(4) "Certified professional soil classifier" means a soil
classifier certified by, and under rules set by, the soil science
society of America.
(5) "Certified professional soil scientist" means a soil scientist
certified by, and under rules set by, the soil science society of
America.
(6) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(7) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(8) "Practice of soil science" means performance of soil science
service or work including but not limited to the collection of soil
science data, consultation, investigation, evaluation, interpretation,
planning, soil mapping, or inspection relating to a service or work
that applies to soil science, and the responsible supervision of that
service or work, the performance of which is related to public welfare
or the safeguarding of life, health, property, and the environment,
except as otherwise exempted by this chapter. The practice of soil
science does not include work, such as would be carried out by either
engineers as defined in RCW 18.43.020, or architects as defined in RCW
18.08.320.
(9) "Practice of soil science for others" includes, but is not
limited to:
(a) The preparation of soil science reports, documents, or exhibits
by any commission, board, department, district, or division of the
state or any political subdivision or of any county, city, or other
public body, or by the employees or staff members of the commission,
board, department, district, or division of the state or any political
subdivision or of any county, city, or other public body when the
reports, documents, or exhibits are disseminated or made available to
the public in such a manner that the public may reasonably be expected
to rely upon or be affected by them; and
(b) The performance of soil science services by an individual,
firm, partnership, corporation, or other association or by their
employees or staff members, whether or not the principal business of
the organization is the practice of soil science, which the soil
science reports, documents, or exhibits constituting the practice of
soil science are disseminated or made available to the public or an
individual or organization in such a manner that the public or
individual or combination of individuals may reasonably be expected to
rely upon or be affected by them. However, soil science reports,
documents, or exhibits that are prepared by the employees or staff
members of an individual, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
association or commission, board, department, district, or division of
the state or political subdivision or a county, city, or other public
body that are for use solely within the organizations are considered
in-house reports, documents, or exhibits and are not the practice of
soil science for others unless or until the reports are disseminated or
made available as set forth in this subsection.
(10) "Responsible charge" means the exercise of fully independent
control and direction of soil science work or the supervision of such
work, and being fully responsible, answerable, accountable, or liable
for the results.
(11) "Soil" means a complex living system that develops over time
in the upper portion of the regolith at the surface of the earth. Soil
is composed of living and once-living organic materials combined with
inorganic mineral materials derived from the break-down and weathering
of rocks at the earth's surface. Soil, in its undisturbed form, is a
highly structured ecosystem that develops over time, forming a vertical
soil profile with distinct chemical and physical attributes that change
with depth from the soil surface. The changes, on both a micro and
macro scale, are the result of weathering processes that reflect
effects of climate, topography, and biology acting on the original
parent material over time. Soil extends from the surface of the earth
down to undifferentiated or unweathered parent material.
(12) "Soil science" means the science that:
(a) Involves the study of various aspects of the living soil
ecosystem and includes the following focused subject areas: (i) Soil
physics, which is the study of water and heat transfer through soil;
(ii) soil chemistry and mineralogy; (iii) soil biochemistry; (iv) soil
fertility; (v) soil genesis, morphology, and classification; and (vi)
land use management;
(b) Is distinguished from geology, as defined in RCW 18.220.010, by
the fact that the living soil ecosystem that is the primary study
target of a soil scientist forms a thin skin on the geologist's focus
which is the greater earth's crust. Geology deals with relatively
undisturbed materials formed at the earth surface or within the earth's
crust by large-scale tectonic or depositional processes. Soil
scientists study how the surface of that material changes over time in
response to weather, biology, and topography on a comparative
microscale;
(c) Is distinguished from engineering, as defined in RCW 18.43.020,
by the fact that engineering generally considers soil as a medium to
support infrastructure or as an inanimate unstructured material, while
a soil scientist considers soil as a complex, highly structured living
ecosystem; and
(d) Is distinguished from agronomy, forestry, and horticulture by
the fact that those disciplines apply aspects of soil science, but are
focused almost exclusively on the efficiencies or deficiencies of soil
in relation to plant growth.
(13) "Soil scientist" means a person who, by reason of the person's
knowledge of soil science, mathematics, the environment, and the
supporting physical and life sciences, acquired by education and
practical experience, has met the qualifications established under this
chapter, and has been issued a license as a soil scientist by the
board.
(14) "Subordinate" means a person who assists in the practice of
soil science by a licensed soil scientist without assuming the
responsible charge of the work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following activities do not require a
certificate of licensing under this chapter:
(1) Soil science work performed by an employee or a subordinate of
a soil scientist licensed under this chapter, provided that the work
does not include responsible charge of soil science work as covered by
this section, and is performed under the direct supervision of a soil
scientist licensed under this chapter, who shall be and remains
responsible for such work;
(2) Soil science work performed by officers and employees of the
United States practicing solely as such officers and employees;
(3) Soil science research conducted through academic institutions
by agencies of the federal or state governments, nonprofit research
institutions, or for-profit organizations, including submission of
reports of research to public agencies;
(4) Teaching soil science or related physical or natural sciences;
(5) The practice of engineering or other licensed or registered
professions: (a) The acquisition of engineering data involving soil,
rock, groundwater, and other earth materials; evaluation of the
physical and chemical properties of soil, rock, groundwater, and other
earth materials; and the utilization of these data in analysis, design,
and construction by professional engineers appropriately registered or
licensed in this state; and (b) similar work performed by persons or
organizations licensed or registered in any other profession or
occupation related to soil science such as licensed on-site wastewater
treatment designers, certified crop advisers, certified professional
agronomists, or individuals who hold any pesticide license administered
through the Washington state department of agriculture, provided that
such work is permitted under the applicable licensing or registration
law, and is incidental to the practice or the profession or occupation
for which licensing or registration is required. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to permit the use of the title soil
scientist, or any other specialty as defined by the director, by an
engineer or other licensed professional except as licensed under this
chapter;
(6) General scientific work customarily performed by such physical
or natural scientists as chemists, archaeologists, geologists,
geographers, hydrologists, oceanographers, wetland scientists,
agronomists, crop scientists, horticulturists, and foresters, providing
such work does not include the design and execution of soil science
investigations, being in responsible charge of soil science, and the
drawing of soil science conclusions and making recommendations in a way
that can be shown to negatively impact the public health, safety, or
welfare; or
(7) The giving of testimony or preparation and presentation of
exhibits or documents for the sole purpose of being placed in evidence
before any administrative or judicial tribunal or hearing, providing
such testimony, exhibits, or documents do not imply that the person is
licensed under the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) It is unlawful for a person to practice
or offer to practice soil science for others in this state, or to use
in connection with the person's name or otherwise assume or advertise
any title or description tending to convey the impression that the
person is a licensed soil scientist, unless the person has been
licensed under the provisions of this chapter.
(2) A person shall be construed to practice or offer to practice
soil science within the meaning and intent of this chapter, if the
person:
(a) Practices any branch of the profession of soil science;
(b) Represents by verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead,
card, or in any other way himself or herself to be a soil scientist;
(c) Implies through the use of some other title that he or she is
a soil scientist or that he or she is licensed under this chapter; or
(d) Holds himself or herself out as able to perform or does perform
any soil science services or work recognized by the board as the
practice of soil science for others.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An advisory committee is created to
provide recommendations to the board and the director concerning the
administration of this chapter. The advisory committee consists of
five members who are conversant with and experienced in the soil
science profession, and who are otherwise eligible for licensure under
this chapter. Subsequent to the initial appointments, all members must
be licensed under this chapter. All advisory committee members must be
soil science society of America certified professional soil scientists
or certified professional soil classifiers. Each member of the
advisory committee must be a resident of the state.
(2) The director shall appoint to the advisory committee
individuals from across the state, utilizing geographic and
experiential diversity as much as possible. The terms of the members
of the advisory committee are a maximum of three years, except that the
initial appointees to the advisory committee serve the following terms:
Two members for two years and three members for three years. No member
of the advisory committee is eligible for reappointment to a third
consecutive term, but any member is eligible for reappointment after an
absence of at least one year from the advisory committee. Any member
who is reappointed following an absence of at least one year from the
advisory committee is eligible for reappointment to a second
consecutive term and is again eligible for reappointment after an
absence of at least one year from the advisory committee.
(3) Members of the advisory committee serve until replaced by a
subsequent appointment even if their appointment exceeds the length of
their term, but may resign prior to completing the term of appointment.
The director may for just cause remove an advisory committee member.
The director shall appoint a new member to fill any vacancy on the
advisory committee for the remainder of the unexpired term. Members of
the advisory committee may not be compensated, but shall be reimbursed
for expenses incurred in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Three members constitute a quorum.
(4) At the request of the advisory committee, the director may
appoint additional temporary members to the advisory committee for
assistance with rule development, examination development, and
technical advice on complaints. Temporary members must meet the same
minimum qualifications as regular members of the advisory committee.
Temporary members have all the powers, duties, and immunities of
regular members of the advisory committee and shall be reimbursed for
expenses incurred in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The
director shall limit the term of temporary members to one year, but may
extend the original appointment up to one additional year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The advisory committee shall make
recommendations to the board regarding:
(1) Developing and adopting rules to administer this chapter
including, but not limited to, evaluating the experience, scope, and
standards of practice of soil science;
(2) Reviewing complaints and investigations pertaining to the
practice of soil science; and
(3) Performing other duties deemed necessary by the director or the
board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The director has the following authority in
administering this chapter:
(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind rules approved by the board as
deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;
(2) To adopt fees as provided in RCW 43.24.086;
(3) To administer licensing examinations approved by the board and
to adopt or recognize examinations prepared by other organizations as
approved by the board;
(4) To adopt standards of professional conduct and practice as
approved by the board; and
(5) To enter into an assurance of discontinuance in lieu of issuing
a statement of charges or conducting a hearing. The assurance must
consist of a statement of the law in question and an agreement to not
violate the stated provision. Violation of an assurance under this
subsection is grounds for disciplinary action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 In order to become a licensed soil
scientist, an applicant must meet the following requirements:
(1) An applicant who applies for soil scientist licensing before
July 1, 2008, is considered qualified for licensing, without further
written examination, if the applicant possesses the specific record of
being a current soil science society of America certified professional
soil scientist or certified professional soil classifier in good
standing.
(2) On or after July 1, 2008, in order to become a licensed soil
scientist, an applicant must:
(a) Be of good moral and ethical character as attested to by
letters of reference submitted by the applicant or as otherwise
determined by the board;
(b) Have graduated from a course of study in soil science
satisfactory to the board or satisfy educational equivalents determined
by the board;
(c) Have a documented record of a minimum of five years of
experience obtained after the completion of the academic requirements
specified in this section, in soil science work of a character
satisfactory to the board, demonstrating that the applicant is
qualified to assume responsible charge of such work upon licensing as
a soil scientist. The board requires that three years of the
experience be gained under the supervision of a soil scientist licensed
in this or any other state, or under the supervision of others who, in
the opinion of the board, are qualified to have responsible charge of
soil science work;
(d) Pass an examination covering the fundamentals and practice of
soil science prescribed or accepted by the board; and
(e) Meet other general or individual requirements established by
the board under its authority under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Experience in professional practice as
required under section 8(2)(c) of this act, of a character acceptable
to the board and acquired prior to July 1, 2008, is acceptable if the
experience: (a) Was acquired under the direct supervision of a soil
scientist who meets the educational and experience requirements for
licensing under this chapter, or who is licensed in another state that
has licensing requirements that are substantially similar to this
chapter; or (b) would constitute responsible charge of professional
soil science work, as determined by the board;
(2) Each year of full-time graduate study in soil science qualifies
as one year of professional experience, up to a maximum of two years.
The board may accept soil science research or teaching of soil science
at the college or university level as qualifying experience, provided
that such research or teaching, in the judgment of the board, is
comparable to experience obtained in the practice of soil science.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 An application for licensing shall be filed
with the director on a form provided by the director and must contain
statements made under oath demonstrating the applicant's education and
practical experience. The director may require any information and
documentation that reasonably relates to the need to determine whether
the applicant meets the criteria for licensing. The application fee
for initial licensing shall be determined by the director as provided
in RCW 43.24.086. The application, together with the fee, must be
submitted to the department prior to the application deadline
established by the director. Fees for initial licensing shall include
the examination and issuance of a certificate. If the director finds
an applicant ineligible for licensing, the fee is retained as an
application fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Examinations of applicants for licensing,
when required, shall be held at such times and places as determined by
the board with the director's approval. The scope of the examination
must be directed to an applicant's ability to practice soil science in
a manner that ensures the safety of life, health, and property. A
candidate failing an examination may apply for reexamination.
Subsequent examinations will be granted upon payment of a fee to be
determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The director shall issue a license to
any applicant who has satisfactorily met all of the requirements of
this chapter for licensing as a soil scientist. The license must show
the full name of the license holder, have a number, and be signed by
the director. The issuance by the director of a license to an
individual is prima facie evidence that the person is entitled to all
the rights and privileges of a licensed soil scientist while the
license remains unrevoked or unexpired.
(2) Each license holder must obtain a seal of the design authorized
by the director, bearing the licensee's name, number, and the legend
"licensed soil scientist." Soil science reports, plans, and other
technical documents prepared by or under the responsible charge of the
license holder must be signed, dated, and stamped with the seal or
facsimile of the seal. Each signature and stamping constitutes a
certification by the license holder that the document was prepared by
or under the license holder's responsible charge and that to the
license holder's knowledge and belief the document was prepared in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The director may, upon application and
payment of a fee determined by the director as provided in RCW
43.24.086, issue a license without further examination as a soil
scientist to any person who holds a valid license or certificate of
qualification issued by the proper authority of any state, territory,
or possession of the United States, District of Columbia, or any
foreign country, if the applicant's qualifications, as evaluated by the
board, meet the requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted by
the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Licenses issued under this chapter shall be
renewed periodically on a date to be set by the director in conformance
with RCW 43.24.140. A license holder who fails to pay the prescribed
fee within ninety days after expiration of his or her license shall
have his or her license classified as invalid until the license holder
pays a renewal fee equal to the current fee plus an amount equal to one
year's renewal fee. Any license that has been expired or suspended for
five years or more may be reinstated in conformance with rules adopted
by the director. Reinstatement conditions may include demonstration of
continued practice or competency in the practice of soil science.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 All receipts from fees and fines collected
under this chapter must be deposited into the geologists' account
created in RCW 18.220.120. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the purposes described in the geologist account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 In addition to the unprofessional conduct
described in RCW 18.235.130, the following conduct, acts, and
conditions constitute unprofessional conduct:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter;
(2) Committing any other act, or failing to act, which act or
failure are customarily regarded as being contrary to the accepted
professional conduct or standard generally expected of those practicing
soil science;
(3) Aiding or abetting the unlicensed or unsupervised practice of
soil science in the state by a person or firm that is not registered in
accordance with this chapter or aiding or abetting an unlicensed person
to practice or operate a soil science business or profession when a
license is required;
(4) The practice of soil science by a licensee when that person's
license is expired, suspended, or revoked;
(5) Failing to comply with the terms and conditions of an order
issued by the board;
(6) Failing to respond to inquiries from clients or other
professionals regarding conflicts with the licensee's work, opinions,
or procedures, in a manner that would be expected from a prudent
practitioner;
(7) Modifying another licensee's work without notifying that
licensee and clearly describing the modifications in writing and
signing the report describing the modifications. However, this
subsection (7) does not apply when the plans, maps, or documents are
modified by the owner to reflect changes over time for their own
purposes and are not used for submittals or bid documents;
(8) Offering or accepting money, goods, or other favors as
inducement to receive favorable consideration for a professional
assignment or as an inducement to approve, authorize, or influence the
granting of a professional assignment;
(9) Soliciting or accepting gratuities, directly or indirectly,
from contractors, their agents, or other parties dealing with clients
or employers in connection with work for which the licensee is
responsible;
(10) Using privileged information coming to the licensee in the
course of his or her assignments as a means of making personal profit
beyond their professional compensation
(11) Requesting, proposing, or accepting professional commissions
on a contingent basis under circumstances in which the registrant's
integrity may be compromised;
(12) Willfully attempting to interfere with a board investigation
by falsifying records, making false statements and intimidating or
influencing witnesses; or
(13) Willfully attempting to suborn another person to violate the
law, public policy, or their code of professional ethics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A person, including but not limited to
consumers, licensees, corporations, organizations, and state and local
governments or agencies, may submit a written complaint to the
department charging a license holder or applicant with unprofessional
conduct and specifying the grounds for the charge. If the director
determines that the complaint merits investigation, or if the director
has reason to believe, without a formal complaint, that a license
holder or applicant may have engaged in unprofessional conduct, the
director may investigate to determine if there has been unprofessional
conduct. A person who files a complaint under this section in good
faith is immune from suit in any civil action related to the filing or
contents of the complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The board shall immediately suspend the
license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320
by the department of social and health services as a person who is not
in compliance with a child support order. If the person has continued
to meet all other requirements for a license under this chapter during
the suspension, reissuance of the license shall be automatic upon the
board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and
health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the
child support order. The procedure in RCW 74.20A.320 is the exclusive
administrative remedy for contesting the establishment of noncompliance
with a child support order, and suspension of a license under this
subsection, and satisfies the requirements of RCW 34.05.422.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The uniform regulation of business and
professions act, chapter 18.235 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the
issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 18.220
RCW to read as follows:
The board has the following authority in administering chapter
18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 19, 21, and 23 of this act):
(1) To establish rules, including committee organization and
assignment of terms, and meeting frequency and timing, for adoption by
the director;
(2) To establish the minimum qualifications for applicants for
licensure as provided by chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 19, 21,
and 23 of this act);
(3) To approve the method of administration for examinations
required by chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 19, 21, and 23 of
this act) or by rule as established by the director. To approve the
adoption or recognition of examinations prepared by other organizations
for adoption by the director. To set the time and place of
examinations with the approval of the director; and
(4) To establish and review standards of professional conduct and
practice for adoption by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Sections 1 through 19, 21, and 23 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---