BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.250 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 26 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Until July 1, 2007, any member who has attained the age of
sixty years shall be retired on the first day of the calendar month
next succeeding that in which ((said)) the member ((shall have)) has
attained the age of sixty((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the
requirement to retire at age sixty ((shall)) does not apply to a member
serving as chief of the Washington state patrol.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2007, any active member who has obtained the
age of sixty-five years shall be retired on the first day of the
calendar month next succeeding that in which the member has attained
the age of sixty-five. However, the requirement to retire at age
sixty-five does not apply to a member serving as chief of the
Washington state patrol.
(2) Any member who has completed twenty-five years of credited
service or has attained the age of fifty-five may apply to retire as
provided in RCW 43.43.260, by completing and submitting an application
form to the department, setting forth at what time the member desires
to be retired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---