BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.07.020 and 1985 c 370 s 47 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have
the following meanings, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Authority" means the Washington higher education facilities
authority created under RCW 28B.07.030 or any board, body, commission,
department or officer succeeding to the principal functions of the
authority or to whom the powers conferred upon the authority shall be
given by law.
(2) "Bonds" means bonds, notes, commercial paper, certificates of
indebtedness, or other evidences of indebtedness of the authority
issued under this chapter.
(3) "Bond resolution" means any resolution of the authority,
adopted under this chapter, authorizing the issuance and sale of bonds.
(4) "Higher education institution" means a private, nonprofit
educational institution, the main campus of which is permanently
situated in the state, which is open to residents of the state, which
neither restricts entry on racial or religious grounds, which provides
programs of education beyond high school leading at least to the
baccalaureate degree, and which is accredited by the Northwest
Association of Schools and Colleges or by an accrediting association
recognized by the higher education coordinating board.
(5) "Participant" means a higher education institution which, under
this chapter, undertakes the financing of a project or projects or
undertakes the refunding or refinancing of obligations, mortgages, or
advances previously incurred for a project or projects.
(6) "Project" means any land or any improvement, including, but not
limited to, buildings, structures, fixtures, utilities, machinery,
excavations, paving, and landscaping, and any interest in such land or
improvements, and any personal property pertaining or useful to such
land and improvements, which are necessary, useful, or convenient for
the operation of a higher education institution, including but not
limited to, the following: Dormitories or other multi-unit housing
facilities for students, faculty, officers, or employees; dining halls;
student unions; administration buildings; academic buildings;
libraries; laboratories; research facilities; computer facilities;
classrooms; athletic facilities; health care facilities; maintenance,
storage, or utility facilities; parking facilities; or any combination
thereof, or any other structures, facilities, or equipment so related.
(7) "Project cost" means any cost related to the acquisition,
construction, improvement, alteration, or rehabilitation by a
participant or the authority of any project and the financing of the
project through the authority, including, but not limited to, the
following costs paid or incurred: Costs of acquisition of land or
interests in land and any improvement; costs of contractors, builders,
laborers, ((materialmen)) materialpersons, and suppliers of tools and
equipment; costs of surety and performance bonds; fees and
disbursements of architects, surveyors, engineers, feasibility
consultants, accountants, attorneys, financial consultants, and other
professionals; interest on bonds issued by the authority during any
period of construction; principal of and interest on interim financing
of any project; debt service reserve funds; depreciation funds, costs
of the initial start-up operation of any project; fees for title
insurance, document recording, or filing; fees of trustees and the
authority; taxes and other governmental charges levied or assessed on
any project; and any other similar costs. Except as specifically set
forth in this definition, the term "project cost" does not include
books, fuel, supplies, and similar items which are required to be
treated as a current expense under generally accepted accounting
principles.
(8) "Trust indenture" means any agreement, trust indenture, or
other similar instrument by and between the authority and one or more
corporate trustees.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.04.155 and 2001 c 284 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section provides uniform small works roster provisions to
award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling,
alteration, repair, or improvement of real property that may be used by
state agencies and by any local government that is expressly authorized
to use these provisions. These provisions may be used in lieu of other
procedures to award contracts for such work with an estimated cost of
two hundred thousand dollars or less. The small works roster process
includes the limited public works process authorized under subsection
(3) of this section and any local government authorized to award
contracts using the small works roster process under this section may
award contracts using the limited public works process under subsection
(3) of this section.
(2)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may create a
single general small works roster, or may create a small works roster
for different specialties or categories of anticipated work. Where
applicable, small works rosters may make distinctions between
contractors based upon different geographic areas served by the
contractor. The small works roster or rosters shall consist of all
responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list, and where
required by law are properly licensed or registered to perform such
work in this state. A state agency or local government establishing a
small works roster or rosters may require eligible contractors desiring
to be placed on a roster or rosters to keep current records of any
applicable licenses, certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance,
or other appropriate matters on file with the state agency or local
government as a condition of being placed on a roster or rosters. At
least once a year, the state agency or local government shall publish
in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction a notice
of the existence of the roster or rosters and solicit the names of
contractors for such roster or rosters. In addition, responsible
contractors shall be added to an appropriate roster or rosters at any
time they submit a written request and necessary records. Master
contracts may be required to be signed that become effective when a
specific award is made using a small works roster.
(b) A state agency establishing a small works roster or rosters
shall adopt rules implementing this subsection. A local government
establishing a small works roster or rosters shall adopt an ordinance
or resolution implementing this subsection. Procedures included in
rules adopted by the department of general administration in
implementing this subsection must be included in any rules providing
for a small works roster or rosters that is adopted by another state
agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage in these
activities has been delegated to it by the department of general
administration under chapter 43.19 RCW. An interlocal contract or
agreement between two or more state agencies or local governments
establishing a small works roster or rosters to be used by the parties
to the agreement or contract must clearly identify the lead entity that
is responsible for implementing the provisions of this subsection.
(c) Procedures shall be established for securing telephone,
written, or electronic quotations from contractors on the appropriate
small works roster to assure that a competitive price is established
and to award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, as defined in
RCW 43.19.1911. Invitations for quotations shall include an estimate
of the scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as
materials and equipment to be furnished. However, detailed plans and
specifications need not be included in the invitation. This subsection
does not eliminate other requirements for architectural or engineering
approvals as to quality and compliance with building codes. Quotations
may be invited from all appropriate contractors on the appropriate
small works roster. As an alternative, quotations may be invited from
at least five contractors on the appropriate small works roster who
have indicated the capability of performing the kind of work being
contracted, in a manner that will equitably distribute the opportunity
among the contractors on the appropriate roster. However, if the
estimated cost of the work is from one hundred thousand dollars to two
hundred thousand dollars, a state agency or local government, other
than a port district, that chooses to solicit bids from less than all
the appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster must
also notify the remaining contractors on the appropriate small works
roster that quotations on the work are being sought. The government
has the sole option of determining whether this notice to the remaining
contractors is made by: (i) Publishing notice in a legal newspaper in
general circulation in the area where the work is to be done; (ii)
mailing a notice to these contractors; or (iii) sending a notice to
these contractors by facsimile or other electronic means. For purposes
of this subsection (2)(c), "equitably distribute" means that a state
agency or local government soliciting bids may not favor certain
contractors on the appropriate small works roster over other
contractors on the appropriate small works roster who perform similar
services.
(d) A contract awarded from a small works roster under this section
need not be advertised.
(e) Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained
shall be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by
telephone inquiry.
(3) In lieu of awarding contracts under subsection (2) of this
section, a state agency or authorized local government may award a
contract for work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement
((project [projects])) projects estimated to cost less than thirty-five
thousand dollars using the limited public works process provided under
this subsection. Public works projects awarded under this subsection
are exempt from the other requirements of the small works roster
process provided under subsection (2) of this section and are exempt
from the requirement that contracts be awarded after advertisement as
provided under RCW 39.04.010.
For limited public works projects, a state agency or authorized
local government shall solicit electronic or written quotations from a
minimum of three contractors from the appropriate small works roster
and shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder as
defined under RCW 43.19.1911. After an award is made, the quotations
shall be open to public inspection and available by electronic request.
A state agency or authorized local government shall attempt to
distribute opportunities for limited public works projects equitably
among contractors willing to perform in the geographic area of the
work. A state agency or authorized local government shall maintain a
list of the contractors contacted and the contracts awarded during the
previous twenty-four months under the limited public works process,
including the name of the contractor, the contractor's registration
number, the amount of the contract, a brief description of the type of
work performed, and the date the contract was awarded. For limited
public works projects, a state agency or authorized local government
may waive the payment and performance bond requirements of chapter
39.08 RCW and the retainage requirements of chapter 60.28 RCW, thereby
assuming the liability for the contractor's nonpayment of laborers,
mechanics, subcontractors, ((materialmen)) materialpersons, suppliers,
and taxes imposed under Title 82 RCW that may be due from the
contractor for the limited public works project, however the state
agency or authorized local government shall have the right of recovery
against the contractor for any payments made on the contractor's
behalf.
(4) The breaking of any project into units or accomplishing any
projects by phases is prohibited if it is done for the purpose of
avoiding the maximum dollar amount of a contract that may be let using
the small works roster process or limited public works process.
(5) As used in this section, "state agency" means the department of
general administration, the state parks and recreation commission, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife,
the department of transportation, any institution of higher education
as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated
authority by the department of general administration to engage in
construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration,
improvement, or repair activities.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.08.010 and 1989 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any board, council, commission, trustees, or body acting
for the state or any county or municipality or any public body shall
contract with any person or corporation to do any work for the state,
county, or municipality, or other public body, city, town, or district,
such board, council, commission, trustees, or body shall require the
person or persons with whom such contract is made to make, execute, and
deliver to such board, council, commission, trustees, or body a good
and sufficient bond, with a surety company as surety, conditioned that
such person or persons shall faithfully perform all the provisions of
such contract and pay all laborers, mechanics, and subcontractors and
((materialmen)) materialpersons, and all persons who supply such person
or persons, or subcontractors, with provisions and supplies for the
carrying on of such work, which bond in cases of cities and towns shall
be filed with the clerk or comptroller thereof, and any person or
persons performing such services or furnishing material to any
subcontractor shall have the same right under the provisions of such
bond as if such work, services or material was furnished to the
original contractor: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the provisions of RCW
39.08.010 through 39.08.030 shall not apply to any money loaned or
advanced to any such contractor, subcontractor or other person in the
performance of any such work: PROVIDED FURTHER, That on contracts of
twenty-five thousand dollars or less, at the option of the contractor
the respective public entity may, in lieu of the bond, retain fifty
percent of the contract amount for a period of thirty days after date
of final acceptance, or until receipt of all necessary releases from
the department of revenue and the department of labor and industries
and settlement of any liens filed under chapter 60.28 RCW, whichever is
later: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for contracts of one hundred thousand
dollars or less, the public entity may accept a full payment and
performance bond from an individual surety or sureties: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the surety must agree to be bound by the laws of the
state of Washington and subjected to the jurisdiction of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.08.030 and 2003 c 301 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The bond mentioned in RCW 39.08.010 shall be in an amount equal
to the full contract price agreed to be paid for such work or
improvement, except under subsection (2) of this section, and shall be
to the state of Washington, except as otherwise provided in RCW
39.08.100, and except in cases of cities and towns, in which cases such
municipalities may by general ordinance fix and determine the amount of
such bond and to whom such bond shall run: PROVIDED, The same shall
not be for a less amount than twenty-five percent of the contract price
of any such improvement, and may designate that the same shall be
payable to such city, and not to the state of Washington, and all such
persons mentioned in RCW 39.08.010 shall have a right of action in his,
her, or their own name or names on such bond for work done by such
laborers or mechanics, and for materials furnished or provisions and
goods supplied and furnished in the prosecution of such work, or the
making of such improvements: PROVIDED, That such persons shall not
have any right of action on such bond for any sum whatever, unless
within thirty days from and after the completion of the contract with
an acceptance of the work by the affirmative action of the board,
council, commission, trustees, officer, or body acting for the state,
county or municipality, or other public body, city, town or district,
the laborer, mechanic or subcontractor, or ((materialman))
materialperson, or person claiming to have supplied materials,
provisions or goods for the prosecution of such work, or the making of
such improvement, shall present to and file with such board, council,
commission, trustees or body acting for the state, county or
municipality, or other public body, city, town or district, a notice in
writing in substance as follows:

Such notice shall be signed by the person or corporation making the
claim or giving the notice, and said notice, after being presented and
filed, shall be a public record open to inspection by any person, and
in any suit or action brought against such surety or sureties by any
such person or corporation to recover for any of the items hereinbefore
specified, the claimant shall be entitled to recover in addition to all
other costs, attorney's fees in such sum as the court shall adjudge
reasonable: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no attorney's fees shall be
allowed in any suit or action brought or instituted before the
expiration of thirty days following the date of filing of the notice
hereinbefore mentioned: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any city may avail
itself of the provisions of RCW 39.08.010 through 39.08.030,
notwithstanding any charter provisions in conflict herewith: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That any city or town may impose any other or further
conditions and obligations in such bond as may be deemed necessary for
its proper protection in the fulfillment of the terms of the contract
secured thereby, and not in conflict herewith.
(2) Under the job order contracting procedure described in RCW
39.10.130, bonds will be in an amount not less than the dollar value of
all open work orders.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.28.030 and 1999 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A state highway shall be constructed, altered, repaired, or
improved, and improvements located on property acquired for right of
way purposes may be repaired or renovated pending the use of such right
of way for highway purposes, by contract or state forces. The work or
portions thereof may be done by state forces when the estimated costs
thereof ((is [are])) are less than fifty thousand dollars and effective
July 1, 2005, sixty thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That when delay of
performance of such work would jeopardize a state highway or constitute
a danger to the traveling public, the work may be done by state forces
when the estimated cost thereof is less than eighty thousand dollars
and effective July 1, 2005, one hundred thousand dollars. When the
department of transportation determines to do the work by state forces,
it shall enter a statement upon its records to that effect, stating the
reasons therefor. To enable a larger number of small businesses, and
minority, and women contractors to effectively compete for department
of transportation contracts, the department may adopt rules providing
for bids and award of contracts for the performance of work, or
furnishing equipment, materials, supplies, or operating services
whenever any work is to be performed and the engineer's estimate
indicates the cost of the work would not exceed eighty thousand dollars
and effective July 1, 2005, one hundred thousand dollars. The rules
adopted under this section:
(1) Shall provide for competitive bids to the extent that
competitive sources are available except when delay of performance
would jeopardize life or property or inconvenience the traveling
public; and
(2) Need not require the furnishing of a bid deposit nor a
performance bond, but if a performance bond is not required then
progress payments to the contractor may be required to be made based on
submittal of paid invoices to substantiate proof that disbursements
have been made to laborers, ((materialmen)) materialpersons, mechanics,
and subcontractors from the previous partial payment; and
(3) May establish prequalification standards and procedures as an
alternative to those set forth in RCW 47.28.070, but the
prequalification standards and procedures under RCW 47.28.070 shall
always be sufficient.
The department of transportation shall comply with such goals and
rules as may be adopted by the office of minority and women's business
enterprises to implement chapter 39.19 RCW with respect to contracts
entered into under this chapter. The department may adopt such rules
as may be necessary to comply with the rules adopted by the office of
minority and women's business enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 60.28.010 and 1986 c 181 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Contracts for public improvements or work, other than for
professional services, by the state, or any county, city, town,
district, board, or other public body, herein referred to as "public
body", shall provide, and there shall be reserved by the public body
from the moneys earned by the contractor on estimates during the
progress of the improvement or work, a sum not to exceed five percent,
said sum to be retained by the state, county, city, town, district,
board, or other public body, as a trust fund for the protection and
payment of any person or persons, mechanic, subcontractor or
((materialman)) materialperson who shall perform any labor upon such
contract or the doing of said work, and all persons who shall supply
such person or persons or subcontractors with provisions and supplies
for the carrying on of such work, and the state with respect to taxes
imposed pursuant to Title 82 RCW which may be due from such contractor.
Every person performing labor or furnishing supplies toward the
completion of said improvement or work shall have a lien upon said
moneys so reserved: PROVIDED, That such notice of the lien of such
claimant shall be given in the manner and within the time provided in
RCW 39.08.030 as now existing and in accordance with any amendments
that may hereafter be made thereto: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the board,
council, commission, trustees, officer or body acting for the state,
county or municipality or other public body; (a) at any time after
fifty percent of the original contract work has been completed, if it
finds that satisfactory progress is being made, may make any of the
partial payments which would otherwise be subsequently made in full;
but in no event shall the amount to be retained be reduced to less than
five percent of the amount of the moneys earned by the contractor:
PROVIDED, That the contractor may request that retainage be reduced to
one hundred percent of the value of the work remaining on the project;
and (b) thirty days after completion and acceptance of all contract
work other than landscaping, may release and pay in full the amounts
retained during the performance of the contract (other than continuing
retention of five percent of the moneys earned for landscaping) subject
to the provisions of RCW 60.28.020.
(2) The moneys reserved under the provisions of subsection (1) of
this section, at the option of the contractor, shall be:
(a) Retained in a fund by the public body until thirty days
following the final acceptance of said improvement or work as
completed;
(b) Deposited by the public body in an interest bearing account in
a bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan association, not
subject to withdrawal until after the final acceptance of said
improvement or work as completed, or until agreed to by both parties:
PROVIDED, That interest on such account shall be paid to the
contractor;
(c) Placed in escrow with a bank or trust company by the public
body until thirty days following the final acceptance of said
improvement or work as completed. When the moneys reserved are to be
placed in escrow, the public body shall issue a check representing the
sum of the moneys reserved payable to the bank or trust company and the
contractor jointly. Such check shall be converted into bonds and
securities chosen by the contractor and approved by the public body and
such bonds and securities shall be held in escrow. Interest on such
bonds and securities shall be paid to the contractor as the said
interest accrues.
(3) The contractor or subcontractor may withhold payment of not
more than five percent from the moneys earned by any subcontractor or
sub-subcontractor or supplier contracted with by the contractor to
provide labor, materials, or equipment to the public project. Whenever
the contractor or subcontractor reserves funds earned by a
subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier, the contractor or
subcontractor shall pay interest to the subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier at a rate equal to that received by the
contractor or subcontractor from reserved funds.
(4) With the consent of the public body the contractor may submit
a bond for all or any portion of the amount of funds retained by the
public body in a form acceptable to the public body. Such bond and any
proceeds therefrom shall be made subject to all claims and liens and in
the same manner and priority as set forth for retained percentages in
this chapter. The public body shall release the bonded portion of the
retained funds to the contractor within thirty days of accepting the
bond from the contractor. Whenever a public body accepts a bond in
lieu of retained funds from a contractor, the contractor shall accept
like bonds from any subcontractors or suppliers from which the
contractor has retained funds. The contractor shall then release the
funds retained from the subcontractor or supplier to the subcontractor
or supplier within thirty days of accepting the bond from the
subcontractor or supplier.
(5) If the public body administering a contract, after a
substantial portion of the work has been completed, finds that an
unreasonable delay will occur in the completion of the remaining
portion of the contract for any reason not the result of a breach
thereof, it may, if the contractor agrees, delete from the contract the
remaining work and accept as final the improvement at the stage of
completion then attained and make payment in proportion to the amount
of the work accomplished and in such case any amounts retained and
accumulated under this section shall be held for a period of thirty
days following such acceptance. In the event that the work shall have
been terminated before final completion as provided in this section,
the public body may thereafter enter into a new contract with the same
contractor to perform the remaining work or improvement for an amount
equal to or less than the cost of the remaining work as was provided
for in the original contract without advertisement or bid. The
provisions of this chapter 60.28 RCW shall be deemed exclusive and
shall supersede all provisions and regulations in conflict herewith.
(6) Whenever the department of transportation has contracted for
the construction of two or more ferry vessels, thirty days after
completion and final acceptance of each ferry vessel, the department
may release and pay in full the amounts retained in connection with the
construction of such vessel subject to the provisions of RCW 60.28.020:
PROVIDED, That the department of transportation may at its discretion
condition the release of funds retained in connection with the
completed ferry upon the contractor delivering a good and sufficient
bond with two or more sureties, or with a surety company, in the amount
of the retained funds to be released to the contractor, conditioned
that no taxes shall be certified or claims filed for work on such ferry
after a period of thirty days following final acceptance of such ferry;
and if such taxes are certified or claims filed, recovery may be had on
such bond by the department of revenue and the ((materialmen))
materialpersons and laborers filing claims.
(7) Contracts on projects funded in whole or in part by farmers
home administration and subject to farmers home administration
regulations shall not be subject to subsections (1) through (6) of this
section.

Sec. 7 RCW 60.28.011 and 2003 c 301 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Public improvement contracts shall provide, and public bodies
shall reserve, a contract retainage not to exceed five percent of the
moneys earned by the contractor as a trust fund for the protection and
payment of: (a) The claims of any person arising under the contract;
and (b) the state with respect to taxes imposed pursuant to Title 82
RCW which may be due from such contractor.
(2) Every person performing labor or furnishing supplies toward the
completion of a public improvement contract shall have a lien upon
moneys reserved by a public body under the provisions of a public
improvement contract. However, the notice of the lien of the claimant
shall be given within forty-five days of completion of the contract
work, and in the manner provided in RCW 39.08.030.
(3) The contractor at any time may request the contract retainage
be reduced to one hundred percent of the value of the work remaining on
the project.
(a) After completion of all contract work other than landscaping,
the contractor may request that the public body release and pay in full
the amounts retained during the performance of the contract, and sixty
days thereafter the public body must release and pay in full the
amounts retained (other than continuing retention of five percent of
the moneys earned for landscaping) subject to the provisions of
chapters 39.12 and 60.28 RCW.
(b) Sixty days after completion of all contract work the public
body must release and pay in full the amounts retained during the
performance of the contract subject to the provisions of chapters 39.12
and 60.28 RCW.
(4) The moneys reserved by a public body under the provisions of a
public improvement contract, at the option of the contractor, shall be:
(a) Retained in a fund by the public body;
(b) Deposited by the public body in an interest bearing account in
a bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan association. Interest
on moneys reserved by a public body under the provision of a public
improvement contract shall be paid to the contractor;
(c) Placed in escrow with a bank or trust company by the public
body. When the moneys reserved are placed in escrow, the public body
shall issue a check representing the sum of the moneys reserved payable
to the bank or trust company and the contractor jointly. This check
shall be converted into bonds and securities chosen by the contractor
and approved by the public body and the bonds and securities shall be
held in escrow. Interest on the bonds and securities shall be paid to
the contractor as the interest accrues.
(5) The contractor or subcontractor may withhold payment of not
more than five percent from the moneys earned by any subcontractor or
sub-subcontractor or supplier contracted with by the contractor to
provide labor, materials, or equipment to the public project. Whenever
the contractor or subcontractor reserves funds earned by a
subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier, the contractor or
subcontractor shall pay interest to the subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier at a rate equal to that received by the
contractor or subcontractor from reserved funds.
(6) A contractor may submit a bond for all or any portion of the
contract retainage in a form acceptable to the public body and from a
bonding company meeting standards established by the public body. The
public body shall accept a bond meeting these requirements unless the
public body can demonstrate good cause for refusing to accept it. This
bond and any proceeds therefrom are subject to all claims and liens and
in the same manner and priority as set forth for retained percentages
in this chapter. The public body shall release the bonded portion of
the retained funds to the contractor within thirty days of accepting
the bond from the contractor. Whenever a public body accepts a bond in
lieu of retained funds from a contractor, the contractor shall accept
like bonds from any subcontractors or suppliers from which the
contractor has retained funds. The contractor shall then release the
funds retained from the subcontractor or supplier to the subcontractor
or supplier within thirty days of accepting the bond from the
subcontractor or supplier.
(7) If the public body administering a contract, after a
substantial portion of the work has been completed, finds that an
unreasonable delay will occur in the completion of the remaining
portion of the contract for any reason not the result of a breach
thereof, it may, if the contractor agrees, delete from the contract the
remaining work and accept as final the improvement at the stage of
completion then attained and make payment in proportion to the amount
of the work accomplished and in this case any amounts retained and
accumulated under this section shall be held for a period of sixty days
following the completion. In the event that the work is terminated
before final completion as provided in this section, the public body
may thereafter enter into a new contract with the same contractor to
perform the remaining work or improvement for an amount equal to or
less than the cost of the remaining work as was provided for in the
original contract without advertisement or bid. The provisions of this
chapter are exclusive and shall supersede all provisions and
regulations in conflict herewith.
(8) Whenever the department of transportation has contracted for
the construction of two or more ferry vessels, sixty days after
completion of all contract work on each ferry vessel, the department
must release and pay in full the amounts retained in connection with
the construction of the vessel subject to the provisions of RCW
60.28.020 and chapter 39.12 RCW. However, the department of
transportation may at its discretion condition the release of funds
retained in connection with the completed ferry upon the contractor
delivering a good and sufficient bond with two or more sureties, or
with a surety company, in the amount of the retained funds to be
released to the contractor, conditioned that no taxes shall be
certified or claims filed for work on the ferry after a period of sixty
days following completion of the ferry; and if taxes are certified or
claims filed, recovery may be had on the bond by the department of
revenue and the ((materialmen)) materialpersons and laborers filing
claims.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
reservation by a public body for any purpose from the moneys earned by
a contractor by fulfilling its responsibilities under public
improvement contracts is prohibited.
(10) Contracts on projects funded in whole or in part by farmers
home administration and subject to farmers home administration
regulations are not subject to subsections (1) through (9) of this
section.
(11) This subsection applies only to a public body that has
contracted for the construction of a facility using the general
contractor/construction manager procedure, as defined under RCW
39.10.061. If the work performed by a subcontractor on the project has
been completed within the first half of the time provided in the
general contractor/construction manager contract for completing the
work, the public body may accept the completion of the subcontract.
The public body must give public notice of this acceptance. After a
forty-five day period for giving notice of liens, and compliance with
the retainage release procedures in RCW 60.28.021, the public body may
release that portion of the retained funds associated with the
subcontract. Claims against the retained funds after the forty-five
day period are not valid.
(12) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Contract retainage" means an amount reserved by a public body
from the moneys earned by a person under a public improvement contract.
(b) "Person" means a person or persons, mechanic, subcontractor, or
materialperson who performs labor or provides materials for a public
improvement contract, and any other person who supplies the person with
provisions or supplies for the carrying on of a public improvement
contract.
(c) "Public body" means the state, or a county, city, town,
district, board, or other public body.
(d) "Public improvement contract" means a contract for public
improvements or work, other than for professional services, or a work
order as defined in RCW 39.10.020.

Sec. 8 RCW 60.28.020 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 104 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
After the expiration of the thirty day period, and after receipt of
the department of revenue's certificate, and the public body is
satisfied that the taxes certified as due or to become due by the
department of revenue are discharged, and the claims of ((materialmen))
materialpersons and laborers who have filed their claims, together with
a sum sufficient to defray the cost of foreclosing the liens of such
claims, and to pay attorneys' fees, have been paid, the public body
shall pay to the contractor the fund retained by it or release to the
contractor the securities and bonds held in escrow.
If such taxes have not been discharged or the claims, expenses, and
fees have not been paid, the public body shall either retain in its
fund, or in an interest bearing account, or retain in escrow, at the
option of the contractor, an amount equal to such unpaid taxes and
unpaid claims together with a sum sufficient to defray the costs and
attorney fees incurred in foreclosing the lien of such claims, and
shall pay, or release from escrow, the remainder to the contractor.

Sec. 9 RCW 60.28.021 and 1992 c 223 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
After the expiration of the forty-five day period for giving notice
of lien provided in RCW 60.28.011(2), and after receipt of the
department of revenue's certificate, and the public body is satisfied
that the taxes certified as due or to become due by the department of
revenue are discharged, and the claims of ((materialmen))
materialpersons and laborers who have filed their claims, together with
a sum sufficient to defray the cost of foreclosing the liens of such
claims, and to pay attorneys' fees, have been paid, the public body may
withhold from the remaining retained amounts for claims the public body
may have against the contractor and shall pay the balance, if any, to
the contractor the fund retained by it or release to the contractor the
securities and bonds held in escrow.
If such taxes have not been discharged or the claims, expenses, and
fees have not been paid, the public body shall either retain in its
fund, or in an interest bearing account, or retain in escrow, at the
option of the contractor, an amount equal to such unpaid taxes and
unpaid claims together with a sum sufficient to defray the costs and
attorney fees incurred in foreclosing the lien of such claims, and
shall pay, or release from escrow, the remainder to the contractor.

Sec. 10 RCW 85.28.130 and Code 1881 s 2517 are each amended to
read as follows:
Persons owning or desiring to improve contiguous tracts of tide
marsh or swampy lands exposed to the overflow of the tide and capable
of being made dry, may separate their respective tracts by a dike or
ditch, which shall make and designate their common boundary. In all
such cases said dike or ditch shall be constructed at the equal cost
and expense of the respective parties, and either party failing to pay
his or her contributive share of such expense shall be liable to the
party constructing the dike or ditch for such contributive share, or so
much thereof as may remain due and unpaid, to be recovered in a civil
action in a court of competent jurisdiction and the party constructing
such dike shall also be entitled to a lien upon the tract of the party
failing to pay his or her contributive share for the construction of
said dike, or so much thereof as shall be due, which lien shall be
secured and enforced as liens of ((materialmen)) materialpersons and
mechanics are now by law enforced.

Sec. 11 RCW 85.28.140 and Code 1881 s 2518 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person or persons who may hereafter take a tract of tide land
or marsh and shall desire to adopt as his or her boundary line any dike
or ditch heretofore constructed upon and entirely within the boundary
line of a neighboring contiguous tract he or she may join on to said
tract and adopt said dike as his or her boundary by paying to the owner
of the tract upon which said dike is constructed one-half of the cost
and expense of the construction thereof, and any person so adopting the
dike or ditch of another without contributing his or her half share of
the cost or expense thereof shall be liable for his or her said half
share, which may be recovered in a civil action in any court of
competent jurisdiction, or the owner of the dike or ditch so used may
secure a lien upon the tract of land bounded by said dike for the
amount due for the use of said dike in accordance with the provisions
of the law securing a lien to ((materialmen)) materialpersons and
mechanics: PROVIDED ALWAYS, That when such dike has become the common
boundary (([of two adjacent tracts, it shall be and remain the common
boundary])) of two adjacent tracts, it shall be and remain the common
boundary and the persons owning the said tracts shall be mutually
liable for the expense of keeping it in repair, share and share alike.

--- END ---