BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.85.040 and 1995 c 403 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A small business economic impact statement must include a brief
description of the reporting, recordkeeping, and other compliance
requirements of the proposed rule, and the kinds of professional
services that a small business is likely to need in order to comply
with such requirements. It shall analyze the costs of compliance for
businesses required to comply with the proposed rule adopted pursuant
to RCW 34.05.320, including costs of equipment, supplies, labor, and
increased administrative costs. It shall consider, based on input
received, whether compliance with the rule will cause businesses to
lose sales or revenue. To determine whether the proposed rule will
have a disproportionate impact on small businesses, the impact
statement must compare the cost of compliance for small business with
the cost of compliance for the ten percent of businesses that are the
largest businesses required to comply with the proposed rules using one
or more of the following as a basis for comparing costs:
(a) Cost per employee;
(b) Cost per hour of labor; or
(c) Cost per one hundred dollars of sales.
(2) A small business economic impact statement must also include:
(a) A statement of the steps taken by the agency to reduce the
costs of the rule on small businesses as required by RCW
19.85.030(((3))) (2), or reasonable justification for not doing so,
addressing the options listed in RCW 19.85.030(((3))) (2);
(b) A description of how the agency will involve small businesses
in the development of the rule; ((and))
(c) A list of industries that will be required to comply with the
rule. However, this subsection (2)(c) shall not be construed to
preclude application of the rule to any business or industry to which
it would otherwise apply; and
(d) The number of jobs that will be created or lost as the result
of compliance with the proposed rule.
(3) To obtain information for purposes of this section, an agency
may survey a representative sample of affected businesses or trade
associations and should, whenever possible, appoint a committee
((under)) to engage in negotiated rule making pursuant to RCW
34.05.310(2) to assist in the accurate assessment of the costs of a
proposed rule, and the means to reduce the costs imposed on small
business.

--- END ---