BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.92.015 and 2000 c 93 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(("Veterinary technician" means a person who has successfully
completed an examination administered by the board and who has either
successfully completed a post high school course approved by the board
in the care and treatment of animals or had five years' practical
experience, acceptable to the board, with a licensed veterinarian.))
(1) "Board" means the Washington state veterinary board of
governors.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.
(4) "Veterinary medication clerk" means a person who has
satisfactorily completed a board-approved training program developed in
consultation with the board of pharmacy and designed to prepare persons
to perform certain nondiscretionary functions defined by the board and
used in the dispensing of legend and nonlegend drugs (except controlled
substances as defined in or under chapter 69.50 RCW) associated with
the practice of veterinary medicine.
(5) "Veterinary technician" means a person who is licensed by the
board upon meeting the requirements of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall issue a veterinary technician license to an
individual who has:
(a) Successfully passed an examination administered by the board;
and
(b)(i) Successfully completed a posthigh school course approved by
the board in the care and treatment of animals; or
(ii) Had five years' practical experience, acceptable to the board,
with a licensed veterinarian.
(2) The board shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW identifying
standard tasks and procedures that must be included in the experience
of a person who qualifies to take the veterinarian technician
examination through the period of practical experience required in
subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section, and requirements for the
supervising veterinarian's attestation to completion of the practical
experience and that training included the required tasks and
procedures.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.92.021 and 1983 c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) There is created a Washington state veterinary board of
governors consisting of ((six)) seven members, five of whom shall be
licensed veterinarians, one of whom shall be a licensed veterinary
technician, and one of whom shall be a lay member.
(2)(a) The licensed members shall be appointed by the governor. At
the time of their appointment the licensed members of the board must be
actual residents of the state in active practice as licensed
practitioners of veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry, or
employed as a licensed veterinary technician, as applicable, and must
be citizens of the United States. Not more than one licensed
veterinary member shall be from the same congressional district. The
board shall not be deemed to be unlawfully constituted and a member of
the board shall not be deemed ineligible to serve the remainder of the
member's unexpired term on the board solely by reason of the
establishment of new or revised boundaries for congressional districts.
(b) The terms of the first licensed members of the board shall be
as follows: One member for five, four, three, two, and one years
respectively. Thereafter the terms shall be for five years and until
their successors are appointed and qualified.
(((3))) (c) The lay member shall be appointed by the governor for
a five year term and until the lay member's successor is appointed.
(((4))) (d) A member may be appointed to serve a second term, if
that term does not run consecutively.
(e) Vacancies in the board shall be filled by the governor, the
appointee to hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(((5))) (3) The licensed veterinarian technician member is a
nonvoting member with respect to board decisions related to the
discipline of a veterinarian involving standard of care.
(4) Officers of the board shall be a ((chairman)) chair and a
secretary-treasurer to be chosen by the members of the board from among
its members.
(((6))) (5) Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum at
meetings of the board.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.92.030 and 2000 c 93 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall develop and administer, or approve, or both, a
licensure examination in the subjects determined by the board to be
essential to the practice of veterinary medicine, surgery, and
dentistry. The board may approve an examination prepared or
administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing
authorities.
(2) The board, under chapter 34.05 RCW, may adopt rules necessary
to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including:
(a) Standards for the performance of the duties and
responsibilities of veterinary technicians and veterinary medication
clerks and fixing minimum standards of continuing education for
veterinary technicians. The rules shall be adopted in the interest of
good veterinary health care delivery to the consuming public and shall
not prevent veterinary technicians from inoculating an animal((. The
board also has the power to adopt by rule)); and
(b) Standards prescribing requirements for veterinary medical
facilities and fixing minimum standards of continuing veterinary
medical education.
(3) The department is the board's official office of record.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.92.013 and 2000 c 93 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A veterinarian legally prescribing drugs may delegate to a
registered veterinary medication clerk or a ((registered)) licensed
veterinary technician, while under the veterinarian's direct
supervision, certain nondiscretionary functions defined by the board
and used in the dispensing of legend and nonlegend drugs (except
controlled substances as defined in or under chapter 69.50 RCW)
associated with the practice of veterinary medicine. Upon final
approval of the packaged prescription following a direct physical
inspection of the packaged prescription for proper formulation,
packaging, and labeling by the veterinarian, the veterinarian may
delegate the delivery of the prescription to a registered veterinary
medication clerk or ((registered)) licensed veterinary technician,
while under the veterinarian's indirect supervision. Dispensing of
drugs by veterinarians, registered ((veterinary)) licensed technicians,
and registered veterinary medication clerks shall meet the applicable
requirements of chapters 18.64, 69.40, 69.41, and 69.50 RCW and is
subject to inspection by the board of pharmacy investigators.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Direct supervision" means the veterinarian is on the premises
and is quickly and easily available; and
(b) "Indirect supervision" means the veterinarian is not on the
premises but has given written or oral instructions for the delegated
task.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.92.140 and 2000 c 93 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each person now qualified to practice veterinary medicine, surgery,
and dentistry, ((registered)) licensed as a veterinary technician, or
registered as a veterinary medication clerk in this state or who
becomes licensed or registered to engage in practice shall comply with
administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees
determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.92.145 and 2000 c 93 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
Administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees
shall be established as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280 for the
issuance, renewal, or administration of the following licenses,
certificates of registration, permits, duplicate licenses, renewals, or
examination:
(1) For a license to practice veterinary medicine, surgery, and
dentistry issued upon an examination given by the examining board;
(2) For a license to practice veterinary medicine, surgery, and
dentistry issued upon the basis of a license issued in another state;
(3) For a ((certificate of registration)) license as a veterinary
technician;
(4) For a certificate of registration as a veterinary medication
clerk;
(5) For a temporary permit to practice veterinary medicine,
surgery, and dentistry. The temporary permit fee shall be accompanied
by the full amount of the examination fee; and
(6) For a license to practice specialized veterinary medicine.

--- END ---