BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Several tragic child fatalities in the state
over the past years have highlighted the need to look closely at
placement decisions for children in the care of the state. The courts
play a vital role in the placement decision making. In order to allow
courts to make the best decision for children, the courts must be
provided with accurate information.
In several of the reviews conducted following child fatality
identified situations, the caseworker provided summaries of relevant
material, rather than the documents themselves. These summaries were
relied upon and were later found to be inaccurate.
The legislature finds that in order to facilitate the court acting
in an oversight capacity, the caseworker must provide the court with
documentation supporting assertions or recommendations made by the
caseworker.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
In any proceeding under this chapter, if the department submits a
report to the court in which the department is recommending a child be
placed with a parent after the child was removed from the parent due to
abuse or neglect allegations, the department shall include the
documents listed in subsections (1) through (4) of this section to the
report. The department shall include only these relevant documents and
shall not attach the entire history of the parent or child.
(1) If the report contains a recommendation, opinion, or assertion
by the department relating to the parent's substance abuse treatment,
mental health treatment, anger management classes, or domestic violence
classes, the department shall attach the document upon which the
recommendation, opinion, or assertion was based. The documentation may
include the progress report or evaluation submitted by the provider,
but may not include the entire history with the provider.
(2) If the report contains a recommendation, opinion, or assertion
by the department relating to the parent's visitation with the child,
the department shall attach the document upon which the recommendation,
opinion, or assertion was based. The documentation may include the
most recent visitation report, a visitation report referencing a
specific incident alleged in the report, or summary of the visitation
prepared by the person who supervised the visitation. The
documentation attached to the report shall not include the entire
visitation history.
(3) If the report contains a recommendation, opinion, or assertion
by the department relating to the psychological status of the parent,
the department shall attach the document upon which the recommendation,
opinion, or assertion was based. The documentation may include the
progress report, evaluation, or summary submitted by the provider, but
shall not include the entire history of the parent.
(4) If the report contains a recommendation, opinion, or assertion
by the department relating to injuries to the child that occurred while
in the care of the parent, the department shall attach a summary of the
physician's report relating to the recommendation, opinion, or
assertion by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act shall be known and cited as the
Raphael Gomez act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---