BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Tragic child fatalities in the state over
the past several years have focused attention on the safety of children
in our child welfare system. In reviewing child safety issues within
the child welfare system, issues related to child welfare caseworkers
arise frequently. Child welfare caseworkers are asked to deal with the
difficult situations, often crisis situations, involving the lives of
children and families. Many of these caseworkers are inexperienced
workers who are new to the field, and some do not have an educational
background in social work. These workers are required to take on
challenging cases on their own and are expected to make good choices
without errors in judgment.
In other occupations dealing with crisis situations such as law
enforcement and emergency medical treatment providers, workers operate
under a very different model. Law enforcement and emergency medical
providers work in teams to provide the best care for the people they
serve. New workers are paired with more experienced workers, and they
both are given the opportunity to work as a team to reach decisions.
Employing a team approach in child welfare will also improve
outcomes and safety for children in the child welfare system. This
approach will lead to better caseworker decision making, more focus on
parents which will lead to an increase in safe reunifications, and an
increased retention of caseworkers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
To the extent funding is appropriated in the operating budget, the
department shall establish a pilot program to improve child welfare
casework through the development of a team approach to casework by
December 1, 2007. The pilot program shall extend through December 31,
2010, to the extent that funding is provided.
(1) The program sites shall be selected by September 1, 2007, and
shall consist of two sites, with at least one site located in eastern
Washington.
(2) The program shall assign caseworkers in teams of two to staff
all aspects of the child welfare case. The caseworkers shall be
assigned cases for which they are jointly responsible. The caseworkers
shall jointly staff the cases and make decisions as a team. However,
the caseworkers may divide the work to permit one caseworker to focus
on the child and one caseworker to focus on the parents in the case.
Decisions in the case, however, should be discussed and reached as a
team.
(3) The program shall include a caseworker to supervisor ratio of
no greater than twelve caseworkers to one supervisor.
(4) The department shall measure the performance and outcomes of
the program, including changes in any of the following:
Reunifications, child abuse or neglect re-referrals, continuances or
delays in the court case, progress in dependency cases, caseworker
satisfaction, retention, and safety. The department shall report its
preliminary findings to the legislature by December 2009 and a final
report by December 2010.

--- END ---