BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington is a leader in developing
innovative bioproducts for human therapy, animal therapy, and plant
life. The state of Washington would like to encourage further
development of plant, animal, and human therapy research and innovation
while still providing predictability and rules for such research.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to develop guidelines
for plant, animal, and human therapy research to be conducted in the
state to ensure that the state maintains its position as a leader in
this area and continues to spur further research and innovation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.350 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The policy of the state of Washington shall be as follows:
(a) That research involving the derivation and use of human
embryonic stem cells, human embryonic germ cells, and human adult stem
cells from any source, including somatic cell nuclear transplantation,
shall be permitted after full consideration of the ethical and medical
implications of this research.
(b) That research involving the derivation and use of human
embryonic stem cells, human embryonic germ cells, and human adult stem
cells, including somatic cell nuclear transplantation, shall be
reviewed by the human stem cell research advisory committee, created in
section 3 of this act.
(2)(a) A physician, surgeon, or other health care provider
delivering fertility treatment shall provide his or her patient with
timely, relevant, and appropriate information to allow the individual
to make an informed and voluntary choice regarding the disposition of
any human embryos remaining following the fertility treatment.
(b) An individual to whom information is provided under (a) of this
subsection must be presented with the option of storing any unused
embryos, donating them to another individual, discarding the embryos,
or donating the remaining embryos for research.
(c) An individual who elects to donate embryos remaining after
fertility treatments for research must provide written consent.
(3) A person may not knowingly, for valuable consideration,
purchase or sell embryonic or cadaveric fetal tissue for research
purposes under this chapter.
(4) For purposes of this section, valuable consideration does not
include reasonable payment for the removal, processing, disposal,
preservation, quality control, storage, transplantation, or
implantation of a part.
(5) Embryonic or cadaveric fetal tissue may be donated for research
purposes under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.350 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The human stem cell research advisory committee is created and
consists of the following members:
(a) The governor or the governor's designee;
(b) A representative from the University of Washington;
(c) A representative from Washington State University;
(d) The attorney general or an assistant attorney general with
relevant expertise; and
(e) A representative from the Washington state medical quality
assurance commission.
(2) The human stem cell research advisory committee shall develop
scientific, ethical, and legal guidelines for research involving the
derivation or use of human adult stem cells, human embryonic germ
cells, and human embryonic stem cells in Washington. The guidelines
must be submitted to the authority by July 1, 2008. The guidelines
must inform potential researchers of specific scientific, ethical, and
legal considerations that must be examined prior to a research project
being approved by the human stem cell research advisory committee.
(3) The human stem cell research advisory committee shall review
all stem cell research proposals prior to commencement of such research
in the state. After full consideration of the ethical and medical
implications of the research, the human stem cell research advisory
committee shall determine, by a majority vote, whether the research
project may go forward.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.23 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules that establish appropriate
management practices for coexistence of plant-based life sciences in
this state. In adopting these rules, the department shall, at a
minimum, consider the following issues:
(a) The possible spread of genetically engineered organisms by
pollen drift;
(b) The need for isolation distances to prevent pollen drift where
possible; and
(c) The possible financial liability for farmers, patent holders,
and manufacturers of genetically engineered organism products.
(2) In adopting these rules, the department shall consider best
available science.
(3) The imposition of controls on genetically engineered organisms
is of statewide significance and is preempted by the state. No city or
town may enact, maintain, or enforce ordinances or other provisions
that regulate the registration, labeling, sale, storage,
transportation, distribution, notification of use, or use of
genetically engineered organisms.

--- END ---