BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.89.070 and 2006 c 330 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Elect a chair and officers. The officers must include a
treasurer who is responsible for all receipts and disbursements by the
commission and the faithful discharge of whose duties shall be
guaranteed by a bond at the sole expense of the commission. The
commission must adopt rules for its own governance that provide for the
holding of an annual meeting for the election of officers and the
transaction of other business and for other meetings the commission may
direct;
(2) Do all things reasonably necessary to effect the purposes of
this chapter. However, the commission has no rule-making power except
as provided in this chapter;
(3) Employ and discharge managers, secretaries, agents, attorneys,
and employees and engage the services of independent contractors;
(4) Retain, as necessary, the services of private legal counsel to
conduct legal actions on behalf of the commission. The retention of a
private attorney is subject to review by the office of the attorney
general;
(5) Receive donations of beer from producers for promotional
purposes under subsections (6) and (7) of this section and for fund-raising purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Donations of
beer for promotional purposes may only be disseminated without charge;
(6) Engage directly or indirectly in the promotion of Washington
beer, including, without limitation, the acquisition in any lawful
manner and the dissemination without charge of beer. This
dissemination is not deemed a sale for any purpose and the commission
is not deemed a producer, supplier, or manufacturer, or the clerk,
servant, or agent of a producer, supplier, distributor, or
manufacturer. This dissemination without charge shall be for
agricultural development or trade promotion, and not for fund-raising
purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Dissemination for
promotional purposes may include promotional hosting and must in the
good faith judgment of the commission be in the aid of the marketing,
advertising, sale of beer, or of research related to such marketing,
advertising, or sale;
(7) Promote Washington beer by conducting unique beer tastings
without charge;
(8) Beginning July 1, 2007, fund the Washington beer commission
through sponsorship of up to twelve beer festivals annually at which
beer may be sold to festival participants. For this purpose, the
commission would qualify for issue of a special occasion license as an
exception to WAC 314-05-020 but must comply with laws under Title 66
RCW and rules adopted by the liquor control board under which such
events may be conducted;
(9) Participate in international, federal, state, and local
hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production,
regulation, distribution, sale, or use of beer including activities
authorized under RCW 42.17.190, including the reporting of those
activities to the public disclosure commission;
(10) Acquire and transfer personal and real property, establish
offices, incur expenses, and enter into contracts, including contracts
for the creation and printing of promotional literature. The contracts
are not subject to chapter 43.78 RCW, and are cancelable by the
commission unless performed under conditions of employment that
substantially conform to the laws of this state and the rules of the
department of labor and industries. The commission may create debt and
other liabilities that are reasonable for proper discharge of its
duties under this chapter;
(11) Maintain accounts with one or more qualified public
depositories as the commission may direct, for the deposit of money,
and expend money for purposes authorized by this chapter by drafts made
by the commission upon such institutions or by other means;
(12) Cause to be kept and annually closed, in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, accurate records of all
receipts, disbursements, and other financial transactions, available
for audit by the state auditor;
(13) Create and maintain a list of producers and disseminate
information among and solicit the opinions of producers with respect to
the discharge of the duties of the commission, directly or by
arrangement with trade associations or other instrumentalities;
(14) Employ, designate as an agent, act in concert with, and enter
into contracts with any person, council, commission, or other entity to
promote the general welfare of the beer industry and particularly to
assist in the sale and distribution of Washington beer in domestic and
foreign commerce. The commission shall expend money necessary or
advisable for this purpose and to pay its proportionate share of the
cost of any program providing direct or indirect assistance to the sale
and distribution of Washington beer in domestic or foreign commerce,
employing and paying for vendors of professional services of all kinds;
(15) Sue and be sued as a commission, without individual liability
for acts of the commission within the scope of the powers conferred
upon it by this chapter; ((and))
(16) Serve as liaison with the liquor control board on behalf of
the commission and not for any individual producer;
(17) Until July 1, 2009, receive such gifts, grants, and endowments
from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in
trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the
commission and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the
terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

--- END ---