BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that floods are an
issue of emergency preparedness in this state and pose threats to
public health and to public and private property including:
(a) Loss or endangerment of human life;
(b) Loss of public and private property;
(c) Damage to homes, farms, and other structures;
(d) Damage to fisheries and fish habitat;
(e) Damage to public roads, bridges, and other infrastructure;
(f) Destruction or degradation of environmentally sensitive areas;
(g) Erosion of land and stream banks and beds; and
(h) Reduction of water quality.
(2) The legislature further finds that:
(a) The prevention of flood damage to public and private property
is a matter of public concern;
(b) Projects that prevent and minimize flood damage may be planned
and approved in advance of the time that a flood occurs. However,
there are also emergencies requiring immediate project approval; and
(c) Many projects designed to protect public and private property
from flood damage are not approved due to conflicts with existing
permitting and regulatory requirements.
(3) The legislature therefore finds that a pilot program must be
developed for projects in select water resource inventory areas to
demonstrate and evaluate methods for authorizing flood control projects
that protect public and private property, protect or enhance habitat,
and protect fish life.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) An emergency preparedness flood control
and stream bank restoration pilot program is authorized to demonstrate
flood control projects that protect property, protect or enhance
habitat, and protect fish life.
(a) County legislative authorities within water resource inventory
areas three, four, five, and seven shall administer the pilot program.
The department of fish and wildlife shall delegate authority to approve
hydraulic project approvals to the county legislative authority for
projects selected for the pilot program. In determining permit
approval, the county legislative authority shall give equal
consideration to the protection of human life, public land or private
property, and fish life.
(b) The pilot program must test permit approval processes for flood
control and stream bank restoration projects and the effect of
approving projects designed to protect property, protect or enhance
habitat, and protect fish life. The objectives of the pilot program
include identifying:
(i) Methods for expediting and coordinating permit decision-making
processes for flood control and stream bank restoration projects that
involve multiple jurisdictions and state agencies;
(ii) Impediments during the permitting process for project approval
including conflicts with existing policies, rules, and laws; and
(iii) Differences between projects designed to protect property,
protect or enhance habitat, and protect fish life. The analysis shall
give equal consideration to the protection of human life, public land
or private property, and fish life.
(2) The pilot program must consist of up to ten projects in each
participating county within watershed resource inventory areas three,
four, five, and seven.
(3)(a) The departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and natural
resources shall participate in the pilot program. The department of
ecology shall act as the lead agency among the state agencies and shall
coordinate among the state agencies as necessary. The department of
fish and wildlife shall provide technical assistance to project
proponents to assist in developing projects that both protect property
and protect or enhance fish life. The department of natural resources
shall provide technical assistance with projects involving aquatic use
permits and removal of sand or gravel from aquatic lands.
(b) The department of ecology shall notify each of the eligible
counties of the pilot program, describe the nature of the pilot
program, and invite county participation. When a county receives an
application for a project that will require permits or authorizations
from multiple jurisdictions, and in the county's judgment the proposed
project offers an appropriate opportunity to test the pilot program's
intent under subsection (1) of this section, the county, with the
approval of the project applicant, may include the project as part of
the pilot program.
(c) In selecting projects for the pilot program, the county shall
provide an opportunity to test and evaluate a variety of projects,
including but not limited to dredging, stream bank stabilization, and
dike construction or repair.
(d) When a project has been selected for inclusion in the pilot
program, the county shall schedule an initial coordination meeting and
contact all appropriate agencies and the project applicant. Other
local jurisdictions, including but not limited to cities, diking
districts, and flood management districts, shall be invited to
participate when a project is selected for inclusion in the pilot
program and those jurisdictions have a role in the permitting process.
The purpose of the coordination meeting is to:
(i) Identify all necessary permit requirements;
(ii) Determine the sequence of permitting decisions and
opportunities where those decisions can be made concurrently;
(iii) Determine a timeline for the decisions and how those
decisions can be expedited; and
(iv) Work with the applicant to make sure that he or she
understands how the process will work, what the applicant is
responsible for, and when those responsibilities must be met in order
to adhere to the overall permitting timeline.
(4) The department of ecology, in cooperation with the
participating counties, other participating local jurisdictions, and
state agencies, shall submit a final report on the pilot program to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2009. The
report shall include an assessment of the degree to which the pilot
program achieved the objectives identified in subsection (1) of this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.55.021 and 2005 c 146 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 77.55.031, 77.55.051, ((and))
77.55.041, and section 2 of this act, in the event that any person or
government agency desires to undertake a hydraulic project, the person
or government agency shall, before commencing work thereon, secure the
approval of the department in the form of a permit as to the adequacy
of the means proposed for the protection of fish life.
(2) A complete written application for a permit may be submitted in
person or by registered mail and must contain the following:
(a) General plans for the overall project;
(b) Complete plans and specifications of the proposed construction
or work within the mean higher high water line in saltwater or within
the ordinary high water line in freshwater;
(c) Complete plans and specifications for the proper protection of
fish life; and
(d) Notice of compliance with any applicable requirements of the
state environmental policy act, unless otherwise provided for in this
chapter.
(3)(a) Protection of fish life is the only ground upon which
approval of a permit may be denied or conditioned. Approval of a
permit may not be unreasonably withheld or unreasonably conditioned.
Except as provided in this subsection and subsections (8), (10), and
(11) of this section, the department has forty-five calendar days upon
receipt of a complete application to grant or deny approval of a
permit. The forty-five day requirement is suspended if:
(i) After ten working days of receipt of the application, the
applicant remains unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely field
evaluation of the proposed project;
(ii) The site is physically inaccessible for inspection;
(iii) The applicant requests a delay; or
(iv) The department is issuing a permit for a storm water discharge
and is complying with the requirements of RCW 77.55.161(3)(b).
(b) Immediately upon determination that the forty-five day period
is suspended, the department shall notify the applicant in writing of
the reasons for the delay.
(c) The period of forty-five calendar days may be extended if the
permit is part of a multiagency permit streamlining effort and all
participating permitting agencies and the permit applicant agree to an
extended timeline longer than forty-five calendar days.
(4) If the department denies approval of a permit, the department
shall provide the applicant a written statement of the specific reasons
why and how the proposed project would adversely affect fish life.
Issuance, denial, conditioning, or modification of a permit shall be
appealable to the department or the board as specified in RCW 77.55.301
within thirty days of the notice of decision.
(5)(a) The permittee must demonstrate substantial progress on
construction of that portion of the project relating to the permit
within two years of the date of issuance.
(b) Approval of a permit is valid for a period of up to five years
from the date of issuance, except as provided in (c) of this subsection
and in RCW 77.55.151.
(c) A permit remains in effect without need for periodic renewal
for hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes and that involve seasonal construction or other
work. A permit for streambank stabilization projects to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020 remains in effect
without need for periodic renewal if the problem causing the need for
the streambank stabilization occurs on an annual or more frequent
basis. The permittee must notify the appropriate agency before
commencing the construction or other work within the area covered by
the permit.
(6) The department may, after consultation with the permittee,
modify a permit due to changed conditions. The modification becomes
effective unless appealed to the department or the board as specified
in RCW 77.55.301 within thirty days from the notice of the proposed
modification. For hydraulic projects that divert water for
agricultural irrigation or stock watering purposes, or when the
hydraulic project or other work is associated with streambank
stabilization to protect farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW
84.34.020, the burden is on the department to show that changed
conditions warrant the modification in order to protect fish life.
(7) A permittee may request modification of a permit due to changed
conditions. The request must be processed within forty-five calendar
days of receipt of the written request. A decision by the department
may be appealed to the board within thirty days of the notice of the
decision. For hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural
irrigation or stock watering purposes, or when the hydraulic project or
other work is associated with streambank stabilization to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020, the burden is on the
permittee to show that changed conditions warrant the requested
modification and that such a modification will not impair fish life.
(8) The department or the county legislative authority may declare
and continue an emergency. The county legislative authority shall
immediately notify the department if it declares an emergency under
this subsection. The department, through its authorized
representatives, shall issue immediately, upon request, oral approval
for a stream crossing, or work to remove any obstructions, repair
existing structures, restore streambanks, protect fish life, or protect
property threatened by the stream or a change in the stream flow
without the necessity of obtaining a written permit prior to commencing
work. Conditions of the emergency oral permit must be established by
the department and reduced to writing within thirty days and complied
with as provided for in this chapter. The department may not require
the provisions of the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C
RCW, to be met as a condition of issuing a permit under this
subsection.
(9) All state and local agencies with authority under this chapter
to issue permits or other authorizations in connection with emergency
water withdrawals and facilities authorized under RCW 43.83B.410 shall
expedite the processing of such permits or authorizations in keeping
with the emergency nature of such requests and shall provide a decision
to the applicant within fifteen calendar days of the date of
application.
(10) The department or the county legislative authority may
determine an imminent danger exists. The county legislative authority
shall notify the department, in writing, if it determines that an
imminent danger exists. In cases of imminent danger, the department
shall issue an expedited written permit, upon request, for work to
remove any obstructions, repair existing structures, restore banks,
protect fish resources, or protect property. Expedited permit requests
require a complete written application as provided in subsection (2) of
this section and must be issued within fifteen calendar days of the
receipt of a complete written application. Approval of an expedited
permit is valid for up to sixty days from the date of issuance. The
department may not require the provisions of the state environmental
policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition of issuing a
permit under this subsection.
(11) The department may issue an expedited written permit in those
instances where normal permit processing would result in significant
hardship for the applicant or unacceptable damage to the environment.
Expedited permit requests require a complete written application as
provided in subsection (2) of this section and must be issued within
fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a complete written application.
Approval of an expedited permit is valid for up to sixty days from the
date of issuance. The department may not require the provisions of the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a
condition of issuing a permit under this subsection.
(12) This section expires June 30, 2010.

--- END ---