BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that licensed massage
practitioners should be treated the same as other health professionals
under Title 18 RCW and that additional registrations or licenses
regulating massage or massage practitioners are not authorized.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.108.210 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 280 s 22 are each
amended to read as follows:
((The provisions of this chapter relating to the registration and
licensing of any massage business shall not be exclusive and any
political subdivision of the state of Washington within whose
jurisdiction the massage business is located may require any
registrations or licenses, or charge any fee for the same or similar
purpose; and nothing herein shall)) Nothing in this chapter limits or
abridges the authority of any political subdivision to levy and collect
a general and nondiscriminatory license fee levied upon all businesses,
or to levy a tax based upon gross business conducted by any firm within
said political subdivision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 18.108.100 (Provisions relating to
licensing of persons nonexclusive) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 280 s 11 are
each repealed.

--- END ---