BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall require emergency response plans for all
boarding homes licensed under this chapter. The emergency response
plans shall include detailed written plans and procedures to address
potential emergencies and disasters such as fires, earthquakes, floods,
and wind storms. The plans must provide for an alternative power
source that provides the facility with a minimum of seventy-two hours
of emergency power, unless additional hours are required by state or
federal regulations. The alternative power source must provide enough
power for any emergency life support systems and medical equipment,
lighting for emergency evacuations and in dining and recreation areas,
and heating equipment to provide heating for resident rooms or a room
or rooms to which all residents can be moved. The facility shall
coordinate its emergency response plan with a local organization for
emergency management established in accordance with the state
comprehensive emergency management plan, as provided in RCW 38.52.070.
(2) Boarding homes under this section shall train all employees in
emergency procedures when they begin working at the facility,
periodically review emergency procedures with existing staff, and carry
out quarterly drills using those procedures including fully evacuating
the facility once each calendar year.
(3) The department may adopt fire emergency evacuation drill
standards that consider the fire and life safety construction features
of the building.
(4) The department shall review emergency response plans as part of
the facility inspection, to determine compliance with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall require emergency response plans for all
nursing homes licensed under this chapter. The emergency response
plans shall include detailed written plans and procedures to address
potential emergencies and disasters such as fires, earthquakes, floods,
and wind storms. The plans must provide for an alternative power
source that provides the facility with a minimum of ninety-six hours of
emergency power. The alternative power source must provide enough
power for any emergency life support systems and medical equipment,
lighting for emergency evacuations and in dining and recreation areas,
and heating equipment to provide heating for resident rooms or a room
or rooms to which all residents can be moved. The facility shall
coordinate its emergency response plan with a local organization for
emergency management established in accordance with the state
comprehensive emergency management plan, as provided in RCW 38.52.070.
(2) Nursing homes under this section shall train all employees in
emergency procedures when they begin working at the facility,
periodically review emergency procedures with existing staff, and carry
out quarterly drills using those procedures.
(3) The department may adopt fire emergency evacuation drill
standards that consider the fire and life safety construction features
of the building.
(4) The department shall review emergency response plans as part of
the facility inspection, to determine compliance with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall require emergency response plans for all
adult family homes licensed under this chapter. The emergency response
plans shall include detailed written plans and procedures to address
potential emergencies and disasters such as fires, earthquakes, floods,
and wind storms. The plans must provide for an approved alternative
heat source. An adult family home that serves residents on life
support systems must provide an alternative power source. The facility
shall coordinate its emergency response plan with a local organization
for emergency management established in accordance with the state
comprehensive emergency management plan, as provided in RCW 38.52.070.
(2) Adult family homes under this section shall train all employees
in emergency procedures when they begin working at the facility,
periodically review emergency procedures with existing staff, and carry
out quarterly drills using those procedures including fully evacuating
the facility once each calendar year.
(3) The department may adopt fire emergency evacuation drill
standards that consider the fire and life safety construction features
of the building.
(4) The department is authorized to waive the requirement that an
adult family home have an approved alternative heat source if the home
demonstrates a financial hardship. Adult family homes receiving a
waiver under this subsection shall display prominently their absence of
a backup heat source to current and potential residents.
(5) The department shall review emergency response plans as part of
the facility inspection, to determine compliance with this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 71A.12.080 and 1988 c 176 s 208 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall adopt rules concerning the eligibility of
residents of residential habilitation centers for placement in
community residential programs under this title; determination of
ability of such persons or their estates to pay all or a portion of the
cost of care, support, and training; the manner and method of licensing
or certification and inspection and approval of such community
residential programs for placement under this title; and procedures for
the payment of costs of care, maintenance, and training in community
residential programs. The rules shall include standards for care,
maintenance, and training to be met by such community residential
programs. The rules may also include standards for health, safety, and
emergency response planning.
(2) The secretary shall coordinate state activities and resources
relating to placement in community residential programs to help
efficiently expend state and local resources and, to the extent
designated funds are available, create an effective community
residential program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department of social and health services
shall adopt rules implementing this act.

--- END ---