BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.400 and 2005 c 152 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a retailer's license, to be known and designated
as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, to sell spirituous
liquor by the individual glass, beer, and wine, at retail, for
consumption on the premises, including mixed drinks and cocktails
compounded or mixed on the premises only((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, a hotel, or club licensed under chapter 70.62 RCW with
overnight sleeping accommodations, that is licensed under this section
may sell liquor by the bottle to registered guests of the hotel or club
for consumption in guest rooms, hospitality rooms, or at banquets in
the hotel or club((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). A patron of a bona
fide hotel, restaurant, or club licensed under this section may remove
from the premises recorked or recapped in its original container any
portion of wine which was purchased for consumption with a meal, and
registered guests who have purchased liquor from the hotel or club by
the bottle may remove from the premises any unused portion of such
liquor in its original container. Such license may be issued only to
bona fide restaurants, hotels and clubs, and to dining, club and buffet
cars on passenger trains, and to dining places on passenger boats and
airplanes, and to dining places at civic centers with facilities for
sports, entertainment, and conventions, and to such other
establishments operated and maintained primarily for the benefit of
tourists, vacationers and travelers as the board shall determine are
qualified to have, and in the discretion of the board should have, a
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license under the provisions and
limitations of this title.
(2) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license to sell for off-premises consumption wine
vinted and bottled in the state of Washington and carrying a label
exclusive to the license holder selling the wine. Spirits and beer may
not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section, except as
provided in subsection (4) of this section. The annual fee for the
endorsement under this subsection is one hundred twenty dollars.
(3) The holder of a spirits, beer, and wine license or its manager
may furnish beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to the licensee's
employees free of charge as may be required for use in connection with
instruction on beer, wine, or spirituous liquor. The instruction may
include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer, wine,
or spirituous liquor, the use of wine lists, and the methods of
presenting, serving, storing, and handling beer, wine, and spirituous
liquor. The spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee must use the
beer, wine, or spirituous liquor it obtains under its license for the
sampling as part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on
the premises of the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee.
(4) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license to sell for off-premises consumption malt
liquor in kegs or other containers that are capable of holding four
gallons or more of liquid and are registered in accordance with RCW
66.28.200. The annual fee for the endorsement under this subsection is
one hundred twenty dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.28.200 and 2003 c 53 s 296 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine restaurant or a tavern
license in combination with an off-premises beer and wine retailer's
license or licensees holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license with an endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.400(4) may sell malt
liquor in kegs or other containers capable of holding four gallons or
more of liquid. Under a special endorsement from the board, a grocery
store licensee may sell malt liquor in containers no larger than five
and one-half gallons. The sale of any container holding four gallons
or more must comply with the provisions of this section and RCW
66.28.210 through 66.28.240.
(2) Any person who sells or offers for sale the contents of kegs or
other containers containing four gallons or more of malt liquor, or
leases kegs or other containers that will hold four gallons of malt
liquor, to consumers who are not licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW shall
do the following for any transaction involving the container:
(a) Require the purchaser of the malt liquor to sign a declaration
and receipt for the keg or other container or beverage in substantially
the form provided in RCW 66.28.220;
(b) Require the purchaser to provide one piece of identification
pursuant to RCW 66.16.040;
(c) Require the purchaser to sign a sworn statement, under penalty
of perjury, that:
(i) The purchaser is of legal age to purchase, possess, or use malt
liquor;
(ii) The purchaser will not allow any person under the age of
twenty-one years to consume the beverage except as provided by RCW
66.44.270;
(iii) The purchaser will not remove, obliterate, or allow to be
removed or obliterated, the identification required under RCW 66.28.220
to be affixed to the container;
(d) Require the purchaser to state the particular address where the
malt liquor will be consumed, or the particular address where the keg
or other container will be physically located; and
(e) Require the purchaser to maintain a copy of the declaration and
receipt next to or adjacent to the keg or other container, in no event
a distance greater than five feet, and visible without a physical
barrier from the keg, during the time that the keg or other container
is in the purchaser's possession or control.
(3) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.28.220 and 2003 c 53 s 298 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall adopt rules requiring retail licensees to affix
appropriate identification on all containers of four gallons or more of
malt liquor for the purpose of tracing the purchasers of such
containers. The rules may provide for identification to be done on a
statewide basis or on the basis of smaller geographical areas.
(2) The board shall develop and make available forms for the
declaration and receipt required by RCW 66.28.200. The board may
charge spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees with an endorsement
issued under RCW 66.24.400(4) and grocery store licensees for the costs
of providing the forms and that money collected for the forms shall be
deposited into the liquor revolving fund for use by the board, without
further appropriation, to continue to administer the cost of the keg
registration program.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale kegs or
other containers containing four gallons or more of malt liquor to
consumers who are not licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW if the kegs or
containers are not identified in compliance with rules adopted by the
board.
(4) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---