BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Civil marriage is a legal institution
recognized by the state in order to promote stable relationships and to
protect individuals who are in those relationships. Civil marriage is
based on a civil contract between two persons and does not require the
sanction or involvement of religious institutions. Civil marriage
provides important protections for the families of those who are
married, including not only children and other dependents they may
have, but also members of their extended families. The legislature and
the people of the state of Washington find that strong, healthy
families promote social stability and economic growth, and that these
families are supported and protected by the mutual obligations and
benefits conferred by civil marriage licenses. On these bases, the
state therefore has a strong interest in ending discrimination against
otherwise qualified applicants for a civil marriage license, including
discrimination on the basis of sex or sexual orientation of the
applicants.
(2) The legislature finds and declares as follows:
(a) Despite longstanding social and economic discrimination, many
gay and lesbian Washingtonians have formed lasting, committed, caring,
and mutually supportive relationships with persons of their same sex.
These couples live together, participate in their communities together,
and many raise children and care for family members together, just as
do heterosexual couples who have the option to marry under Washington
law.
(b) The state of Washington has a proud tradition of respect for
the principle that no human being should be denied his or her full
rights and responsibilities under the law.
(c) According to the 2000 census, Washington state is home to at
least sixteen thousand same sex couples, ranking ninth among the fifty
states in the number of same sex couples. Same sex couples live in all
thirty-nine counties in Washington, and nearly one in four of these
couples is raising children. While some of these couples may have
domestic partner registries in their jurisdictions, such arrangements
do not offer the same scope and depth of rights, responsibilities,
privileges, and protections offered by civil marriages, nor do they
provide any legal standing outside the jurisdiction in which they
occur.
(d) Marriage laws support the core values of commitment and
responsibility. Washington's discriminatory exclusion of same sex
couples from marriage harms those couples and their families by denying
those couples and their families specific and equal rights and
responsibilities under state and federal law. At least four hundred
twenty-three Washington state statutes confer rights, benefits, or
obligations depending upon marital status, nearly all of which are
currently unavailable to Washington's same sex couples. These include
the right to bring a wrongful death action, the right to inherit
property when there is no will, the right to invoke the evidentiary
privilege not to testify against a spouse, the right to certain
employment and pension benefits as well as other specific benefits, and
the right to transfer property between spouses without paying the real
estate excise tax.
(e) Washington's discriminatory exclusion of same sex couples from
marriage further harms same sex couples and their families by denying
them the unique public recognition and affirmation that civil marriage
confers on other couples, and the opportunity to express their mutual
dedication through the uniquely recognized rituals of marriage.
(f) The legislature has an interest in encouraging and supporting
loving, stable, committed, caregiving relationships regardless of the
sex or sexual orientation of the partners. The benefits that accrue to
the general community and to the state's economy when couples undertake
the mutual obligations of marriage accrue regardless of the sex or
sexual orientation of the partners.
(g) No official of any religious denomination or nonprofit
institution authorized to solemnize marriages shall be required to
solemnize any marriage in violation of his or her right to free
exercise of religion guaranteed by the First Amendment to the United
States Constitution or by the Washington state Constitution.
(h) It is the intent of this act to end discrimination in marriage
based on sex and sexual orientation in Washington, to ensure that all
persons in this state may enjoy the freedom to marry on equal terms,
while also respecting the religious freedom rights of clergy and
religious institutions to determine for whom to perform marriage
ceremonies and which marriages to recognize for religious purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.04.010 and 1998 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Marriage is a civil contract between ((a male and a female))
two persons who have each attained the age of eighteen years, and who
are otherwise capable.
(2) Every marriage entered into in which either ((the husband or
the wife)) person has not attained the age of seventeen years is void
except where this section has been waived by a superior court judge of
the county in which one of the parties resides on a showing of
necessity.
(3) Where necessary to implement the rights and responsibilities of
spouses under the law, gender specific terms such as husband and wife
shall be construed to be gender neutral.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.04.020 and 1998 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Marriages in the following cases are prohibited:
(a) When either party thereto has a ((wife or husband)) spouse
living at the time of such marriage; or
(b) When the ((husband and wife)) spouses are nearer of kin to each
other than second cousins, whether of the whole or half blood computing
by the rules of the civil law((; or
(c) When the parties are persons other than a male and a female)).
(2) It is unlawful for ((any man)) a person to marry his ((father's
sister, mother's sister, daughter, sister, son's daughter, daughter's
daughter, brother's daughter or sister's daughter; it is unlawful for
any woman to marry her father's brother, mother's brother, son,
brother, son's son, daughter's son, brother's son or sister's son)) or
her sibling, child, grandchild, aunt, uncle, niece, or nephew.
(3) A marriage between two persons that is recognized as valid in
another jurisdiction is valid in this state only if the marriage is not
prohibited or made unlawful under subsection (1)(a)((, (1)(c),)) or (2)
of this section.

--- END ---