BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2006 c 115 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic ((standards)) requirements. The objective alternative
assessments for each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the
skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the
Washington assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state ((standard)) academic requirements in the content areas
included in the certificate. With the exception of students satisfying
the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, acquisition of the certificate is
required for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state ((standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of)) academic requirements of subsection (4) of this
section on the high school Washington assessment of student learning
shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(a) If a student does not successfully meet the state ((standards))
academic requirement in one or more content areas required for the
certificate of academic achievement, then the student may retake the
assessment in the content area up to four times at no cost to the
student. If the student successfully meets the state ((standards))
academic requirements on a retake of the assessment then the student
shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(b) Once objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant
to subsection (10) of this section, a student may use the objective
alternative assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully
meets the state ((standards)) academic requirement for that content
area if the student has retaken the Washington assessment of student
learning at least once. If the student successfully meets the state
((standards)) academic requirements on the objective alternative
assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of academic
achievement.
(4) ((Beginning with the graduating class of 2010, a student must
meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content
areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the Washington
assessment of student learning or the objective alternative assessments
in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement)) To meet the
state academic requirements and earn a certificate of academic
achievement, students must achieve the following performance on the
high school Washington assessment of student learning or an approved
alternative assessment:
(a) A student in the graduating class of 2008, 2009, or 2010 must
meet or exceed the proficient level in one out of three and meet or
exceed the basic level in two out of three of the reading, writing, and
mathematics content areas;
(b) A student in the graduating class of 2011, 2012, 2013, or 2014
must meet or exceed the proficient level in two out of four and meet or
exceed the basic level in two out of four of the reading, writing,
mathematics, and science content areas;
(c) A student in the graduating class of 2015, 2016, or 2017 must
meet or exceed the proficient level in three out of four of the
reading, writing, mathematics, and science content areas; and
(d) A student in the graduating class of 2018 or any graduating
class thereafter must meet or exceed the proficient level in all four
content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) ((Beginning in 2006,)) School districts must make available to
students the following options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state ((standards)) academic requirements if the student is enrolled in
a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state ((standards)) academic requirements if the student is enrolled in
a high school completion program at a community or technical college.
The superintendent of public instruction and the state board for
community and technical colleges shall jointly identify means by which
students in these programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the ((standard)) state academic
requirement in a content area of the high school assessment but who
wish to improve their results shall pay for retaking the assessment,
using a uniform cost determined by the superintendent of public
instruction.
(9) ((Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall pilot
opportunities for retaking the high school assessment beginning in the
2004-05 school year. Beginning no later than September 2006,))
Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year shall be
available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process, for students to
demonstrate achievement of the state academic ((standards))
requirements. The objective alternative assessments shall be
comparable in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must
demonstrate on the Washington assessment of student learning and be
objective in its determination of student achievement of the state
((standards)) academic requirements. Before any objective alternative
assessments in addition to those authorized in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b)
of this subsection are used by a student to demonstrate that the
student has met the state ((standards)) academic requirements in a
content area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall
formally approve the use of any objective alternative assessments
through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent
resolution.
(b) A student's score on the mathematics portion of the preliminary
scholastic assessment test (PSAT), the scholastic assessment test
(SAT), or the American college test (ACT) may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the mathematics ((standards)) requirements
for the certificate of academic achievement. The state board of
education shall identify the scores students must achieve on the
mathematics portion of the PSAT, SAT, or ACT to meet or exceed the
state ((standard)) academic requirement for mathematics. The state
board of education shall identify the first scores by December 1, 2006,
and thereafter may increase but not decrease the scores required for
students to meet or exceed the state ((standard)) academic requirement
for mathematics.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for students as provided in this subsection (12).
(a)(i) Student learning plans are required for eighth through
twelfth grade students who were not ((successful)) proficient on any or
all of the content areas of the Washington assessment for student
learning during the previous school year. The plan shall include the
courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the
student to meet state academic ((standards)) requirements and stay on
track for graduation. ((This requirement shall be phased in as
follows:
(i) Beginning no later than the 2004-05 school year ninth grade
students as described in this subsection (12)(a) shall have a plan.
(ii) Beginning no later than the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter eighth grade students as described in this subsection
(12)(a) shall have a plan.
(iii))) (ii) The parent or guardian shall be notified, preferably
through a parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was ((unsuccessful)) not proficient, strategies to help them improve
their student's skills, and the content of the student's plan.
(((iv))) (iii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported
to the student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments
to the plan made as necessary.
(b) ((Beginning with the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter,)) All fifth grade students who were not ((successful))
proficient in one or more of the content areas of the fourth grade
Washington assessment of student learning shall have a student learning
plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of a student described in this
subsection (12)(b) shall be notified, preferably through a parent
conference, of the student's results on the Washington assessment of
student learning, actions the school intends to take to improve the
student's skills in any content area in which the student was
((unsuccessful)) not proficient, and provide strategies to help them
improve their student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

--- END ---