BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state
environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, requires a thorough
exploration and a careful analysis of a wide range of alternatives
based on the best available science. Further, the legislature finds
that any gaps in scientific data uncovered by the examination of
alternatives will provide a guidepost for future research, but will not
prevent protective action being taken by public agencies. The
legislature also finds that as new scientific data become available,
public agencies will review decisions and make adjustments when
warranted. The legislature reaffirms that each person has a
fundamental and inalienable right to a healthful environment and that
each person has a responsibility to contribute to the preservation and
enhancement of the environment. Therefore, the legislature declares
that where threats of serious or irreversible damage to people or
nature exist, lack of full scientific certainty about cause and effect
may not be viewed as sufficient reason for the state to postpone
measures to prevent the degradation of the environment or protect the
health of its residents.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21C.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 109 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature authorizes and directs that, to the fullest
extent possible: (((1))) (a) The policies, ((regulations)) rules, and
laws of the state of Washington shall be interpreted and administered
in accordance with the policies set forth in this chapter, and (((2)))
(b) all branches of government of this state, including state agencies,
municipal and public corporations, and counties shall:
(((a))) (i) Utilize a systematic, interdisciplinary approach which
will ((insure)) ensure the integrated use of the natural and social
sciences and the environmental design arts in planning and in decision
making which may have an impact on man's environment;
(((b))) (ii) Identify and develop methods and procedures, in
consultation with the department of ecology and the ecological
commission, which will ((insure)) ensure that presently unquantified
environmental and human health amenities and values will be given
appropriate consideration in decision making along with economic and
technical considerations;
(((c))) (iii) Include in every recommendation or report on
proposals for legislation and other major actions significantly
affecting the quality of the environment and human health, a detailed
statement by the responsible official on:
(((i))) (A) The environmental and human health impact of the
proposed action;
(((ii))) (B) Any adverse environmental and human health effects
which cannot be avoided should the proposal be implemented;
(((iii))) (C) Alternatives to the proposed action;
(((iv))) (D) The relationship between local short-term uses of
man's environment and the maintenance and enhancement of long-term
productivity; and
(((v))) (E) Any irreversible and irretrievable commitments of
resources which would be involved in the proposed action should it be
implemented;
(((d))) (iv) Prior to making any detailed statement, the
responsible official shall consult with and obtain the comments of any
public agency which has jurisdiction by law or special expertise with
respect to any environmental impact involved. Copies of such statement
and the comments and views of the appropriate federal, province, state,
and local agencies, which are authorized to develop and enforce
environmental and human health standards, shall be made available to
the governor, the department of ecology, the department of health, the
ecological commission, and the public, and shall accompany the proposal
through the existing agency review processes;
(((e))) (v) Study, develop, and describe appropriate alternatives
to recommended courses of action in any proposal which involves
unresolved conflicts concerning alternative uses of available
resources;
(((f))) (vi) Recognize the worldwide and long-range character of
environmental and human health problems and, where consistent with
state policy, lend appropriate support to initiatives, resolutions, and
programs designed to maximize international cooperation in anticipating
and preventing a decline in the quality of mankind's world environment;
(((g))) (vii) Make available to the federal government, other
states, provinces of Canada, municipalities, institutions, and
individuals, advice and information useful in restoring, maintaining,
and enhancing the quality of the environment and human health;
(((h))) (viii) Initiate and utilize ecological information in the
planning and development of natural resource-oriented projects.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, "human health" includes the
consideration of physical, mental, economic, and social well-being and
not merely the absence of disease or infirmity.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.21C.031 and 1995 c 347 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An environmental impact statement (the detailed statement
required by RCW 43.21C.030(((2)(c))) (1)(b)(iii)) shall be prepared on
proposals for legislation and other major actions having a probable
significant, adverse environmental and human health impact. The
environmental impact statement may be combined with the recommendation
or report on the proposal or issued as a separate document. The
substantive decisions or recommendations shall be clearly identifiable
in the combined document. Actions categorically exempt under RCW
43.21C.110(1)(a) do not require environmental review or the preparation
of an environmental impact statement under this chapter. In a county,
city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, a planned action, as
provided for in subsection (2) of this section, does not require a
threshold determination or the preparation of an environmental impact
statement under this chapter, but is subject to environmental review
and mitigation as provided in this chapter.
An environmental impact statement is required to analyze only those
probable adverse environmental and human health impacts which are
significant. Beneficial environmental and human health impacts may be
discussed. The responsible official shall consult with agencies and
the public to identify such impacts and limit the scope of an
environmental impact statement. The subjects listed in RCW
43.21C.030(((2)(c))) (1)(b)(iii) need not be treated as separate
sections of an environmental impact statement. Discussions of
significant short-term and long-term environmental and human health
impacts, significant irrevocable commitments of natural resources,
significant alternatives including mitigation measures, and significant
environmental and human health impacts which cannot be mitigated should
be consolidated or included, as applicable, in those sections of an
environmental impact statement where the responsible official decides
they logically belong.
(2)(a) For purposes of this section, a planned action means one or
more types of project action that:
(i) Are designated planned actions by an ordinance or resolution
adopted by a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040;
(ii) Have had the significant impacts adequately addressed in an
environmental impact statement prepared in conjunction with (A) a
comprehensive plan or subarea plan adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW, or
(B) a fully contained community, a master planned resort, a master
planned development, or a phased project;
(iii) Are subsequent or implementing projects for the proposals
listed in (a)(ii) of this subsection;
(iv) Are located within an urban growth area, as defined in RCW
36.70A.030;
(v) Are not essential public facilities, as defined in RCW
36.70A.200; and
(vi) Are consistent with a comprehensive plan adopted under chapter
36.70A RCW.
(b) A county, city, or town shall limit planned actions to certain
types of development or to specific geographical areas that are less
extensive than the jurisdictional boundaries of the county, city, or
town and may limit a planned action to a time period identified in the
environmental impact statement or the ordinance or resolution adopted
under this subsection.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.21C.034 and 1993 c 23 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Lead agencies are authorized to use in whole or in part existing
environmental documents for new project or nonproject actions, if the
documents adequately address environmental and human health
considerations set forth in RCW 43.21C.030. The prior proposal or
action and the new proposal or action need not be identical, but must
have similar elements that provide a basis for comparing their
environmental and human health consequences such as timing, types of
impacts, alternatives, or geography. The lead agency shall
independently review the content of the existing documents and
determine that the information and analysis to be used is relevant and
adequate. If necessary, the lead agency may require additional
documentation to ensure that all environmental and human health impacts
have been adequately addressed.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.21C.060 and 1983 c 117 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The policies and goals set forth in this chapter are supplementary
to those set forth in existing authorizations of all branches of
government of this state, including state agencies, municipal and
public corporations, and counties. Any governmental action may be
conditioned or denied pursuant to this chapter: PROVIDED, That such
conditions or denials shall be based upon policies identified by the
appropriate governmental authority and incorporated into regulations,
plans, or codes which are formally designated by the agency (or
appropriate legislative body, in the case of local government) as
possible bases for the exercise of authority pursuant to this chapter.
Such designation shall occur at the time specified by RCW 43.21C.120.
Such action may be conditioned only to mitigate specific adverse
environmental and human health impacts which are identified in the
environmental documents prepared under this chapter. These conditions
shall be stated in writing by the decisionmaker. Mitigation measures
shall be reasonable and capable of being accomplished. In order to
deny a proposal under this chapter, an agency must find that: (1) The
proposal would result in significant adverse impacts identified in a
final or supplemental environmental impact statement prepared under
this chapter; and (2) reasonable mitigation measures are insufficient
to mitigate the identified impact. Except for permits and variances
issued pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW, when such a governmental action,
not requiring a legislative decision, is conditioned or denied by a
nonelected official of a local governmental agency, the decision shall
be appealable to the legislative authority of the acting local
governmental agency unless that legislative authority formally
eliminates such appeals. Such appeals shall be in accordance with
procedures established for such appeals by the legislative authority of
the acting local governmental agency.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.21C.075 and 1997 c 429 s 49 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Because a major purpose of this chapter is to combine
environmental and human health considerations with public decisions,
any appeal brought under this chapter shall be linked to a specific
governmental action. The state environmental policy act provides a
basis for challenging whether governmental action is in compliance with
the substantive and procedural provisions of this chapter. The state
environmental policy act is not intended to create a cause of action
unrelated to a specific governmental action.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by this section:
(a) Appeals under this chapter shall be of the governmental action
together with its accompanying environmental determinations.
(b) Appeals of environmental determinations made (or lacking) under
this chapter shall be commenced within the time required to appeal the
governmental action which is subject to environmental review.
(3) If an agency has a procedure for appeals of agency
environmental determinations made under this chapter, such procedure:
(a) Shall allow no more than one agency appeal proceeding on each
procedural determination (the adequacy of a determination of
significance/nonsignificance or of a final environmental impact
statement);
(b) Shall consolidate an appeal of procedural issues and of
substantive determinations made under this chapter (such as a decision
to require particular mitigation measures or to deny a proposal) with
a hearing or appeal on the underlying governmental action by providing
for a single simultaneous hearing before one hearing officer or body to
consider the agency decision or recommendation on a proposal and any
environmental determinations made under this chapter, with the
exception of:
(i) An appeal of a determination of significance;
(ii) An appeal of a procedural determination made by an agency when
the agency is a project proponent, or is funding a project, and chooses
to conduct its review under this chapter, including any appeals of its
procedural determinations, prior to submitting an application for a
project permit;
(iii) An appeal of a procedural determination made by an agency on
a nonproject action; or
(iv) An appeal to the local legislative authority under RCW
43.21C.060 or other applicable state statutes;
(c) Shall provide for the preparation of a record for use in any
subsequent appeal proceedings, and shall provide for any subsequent
appeal proceedings to be conducted on the record, consistent with other
applicable law. An adequate record consists of findings and
conclusions, testimony under oath, and taped or written transcript. An
electronically recorded transcript will suffice for purposes of review
under this subsection; and
(d) Shall provide that procedural determinations made by the
responsible official shall be entitled to substantial weight.
(4) If a person aggrieved by an agency action has the right to
judicial appeal and if an agency has an administrative appeal
procedure, such person shall, prior to seeking any judicial review, use
such agency procedure if any such procedure is available, unless
expressly provided otherwise by state statute.
(5) Some statutes and ordinances contain time periods for
challenging governmental actions which are subject to review under this
chapter, such as various local land use approvals (the "underlying
governmental action"). RCW 43.21C.080 establishes an optional "notice
of action" procedure which, if used, imposes a time period for
appealing decisions under this chapter. This subsection does not
modify any such time periods. In this subsection, the term "appeal"
refers to a judicial appeal only.
(a) If there is a time period for appealing the underlying
governmental action, appeals under this chapter shall be commenced
within such time period. The agency shall give official notice stating
the date and place for commencing an appeal.
(b) If there is no time period for appealing the underlying
governmental action, and a notice of action under RCW 43.21C.080 is
used, appeals shall be commenced within the time period specified by
RCW 43.21C.080.
(6)(a) Judicial review under subsection (5) of this section of an
appeal decision made by an agency under subsection (3) of this section
shall be on the record, consistent with other applicable law.
(b) A taped or written transcript may be used. If a taped
transcript is to be reviewed, a record shall identify the location on
the taped transcript of testimony and evidence to be reviewed. Parties
are encouraged to designate only those portions of the testimony
necessary to present the issues raised on review, but if a party
alleges that a finding of fact is not supported by evidence, the party
should include in the record all evidence relevant to the disputed
finding. Any other party may designate additional portions of the
taped transcript relating to issues raised on review. A party may
provide a written transcript of portions of the testimony at the
party's own expense or apply to that court for an order requiring the
party seeking review to pay for additional portions of the written
transcript.
(c) Judicial review under this chapter shall without exception be
of the governmental action together with its accompanying environmental
determinations.
(7) Jurisdiction over the review of determinations under this
chapter in an appeal before an agency or superior court shall upon
consent of the parties be transferred in whole or part to the
shorelines hearings board. The shorelines hearings board shall hear
the matter and sign the final order expeditiously. The superior court
shall certify the final order of the shorelines hearings board and the
certified final order may only be appealed to an appellate court. In
the case of an appeal under this chapter regarding a project or other
matter that is also the subject of an appeal to the shorelines hearings
board under chapter 90.58 RCW, the shorelines hearings board shall have
sole jurisdiction over both the appeal under this section and the
appeal under chapter 90.58 RCW, shall consider them together, and shall
issue a final order within one hundred eighty days as provided in RCW
90.58.180.
(8) For purposes of this section and RCW 43.21C.080, the words
"action", "decision", and "determination" mean substantive agency
action including any accompanying procedural determinations under this
chapter (except where the word "action" means "appeal" in RCW
43.21C.080(2)). The word "action" in this section and RCW 43.21C.080
does not mean a procedural determination by itself made under this
chapter. The word "determination" includes any environmental and human
health document required by this chapter and state or local
implementing rules. The word "agency" refers to any state or local
unit of government. Except as provided in subsection (5) of this
section, the word "appeal" refers to administrative, legislative, or
judicial appeals.
(9) The court in its discretion may award reasonable attorneys'
fees of up to one thousand dollars in the aggregate to the prevailing
party, including a governmental agency, on issues arising out of this
chapter if the court makes specific findings that the legal position of
a party is frivolous and without reasonable basis.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.21C.110 and 1997 c 429 s 47 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty and function of the department of ecology:
(1) To adopt and amend thereafter rules of interpretation and
implementation of this chapter, subject to the requirements of chapter
34.05 RCW, for the purpose of providing uniform rules and guidelines to
all branches of government including state agencies, political
subdivisions, public and municipal corporations, and counties. The
proposed rules shall be subject to full public hearings requirements
associated with rule ((promulgation)) adoption. Suggestions for
modifications of the proposed rules shall be considered on their
merits, and the department shall have the authority and responsibility
for full and appropriate independent ((promulgation and)) adoption of
rules, assuring consistency with this chapter as amended and with the
preservation of protections afforded by this chapter. The rule-making
powers authorized in this section shall include, but shall not be
limited to, the following phases of interpretation and implementation
of this chapter:
(a) Categories of governmental actions which are not to be
considered as potential major actions significantly affecting the
quality of the environment and human health, including categories
pertaining to applications for water right permits pursuant to chapters
90.03 and 90.44 RCW. The types of actions included as categorical
exemptions in the rules shall be limited to those types which are not
major actions significantly affecting the quality of the environment
and human health. The rules shall provide for certain circumstances
where actions which potentially are categorically exempt require
environmental review. An action that is categorically exempt under the
rules adopted by the department may not be conditioned or denied under
this chapter.
(b) Rules for criteria and procedures applicable to the
determination of when an act of a branch of government is a major
action significantly affecting the quality of the environment and human
health for which a detailed statement is required to be prepared
pursuant to RCW 43.21C.030.
(c) Rules and procedures applicable to the preparation of detailed
statements and other environmental documents, including but not limited
to rules for timing of environmental review, obtaining comments, data
and other information, and providing for and determining areas of
public participation which shall include the scope and review of draft
environmental impact statements.
(d) Scope of coverage and contents of detailed statements assuring
that such statements are simple, uniform, and as short as practicable;
statements are required to analyze only reasonable alternatives and
probable adverse environmental and human health impacts which are
significant, and may analyze beneficial impacts.
(e) Rules and procedures for public notification of actions taken
and documents prepared.
(f) Definition of terms relevant to the implementation of this
chapter including the establishment of a list of elements of the
environment. Analysis of environmental and human health considerations
under RCW 43.21C.030(((2))) (1)(b) may be required only for those
subjects listed as elements of the environment (or portions thereof).
The list of elements of the environment shall consist of the "natural"
and "built" environment. The elements of the built environment shall
consist of public services and utilities (such as water, sewer,
schools, fire and police protection), transportation, environmental
health (such as explosive materials and toxic waste), and land and
shoreline use (including housing, and a description of the
relationships with land use and shoreline plans and designations,
including population).
(g) Rules for determining the obligations and powers under this
chapter of two or more branches of government involved in the same
project significantly affecting the quality of the environment and
human health.
(h) Methods to assure adequate public awareness of the preparation
and issuance of detailed statements required by RCW
43.21C.030(((2)(c))) (1)(b)(iii).
(i) To prepare rules for projects setting forth the time limits
within which the governmental entity responsible for the action shall
comply with the provisions of this chapter.
(j) Rules for utilization of a detailed statement for more than one
action and rules improving environmental analysis of nonproject
proposals and encouraging better interagency coordination and
integration between this chapter and other environmental laws.
(k) Rules relating to actions which shall be exempt from the
provisions of this chapter in situations of emergency.
(l) Rules relating to the use of environmental documents in
planning and decision making and the implementation of the substantive
policies and requirements of this chapter, including procedures for
appeals under this chapter.
(m) Rules and procedures that provide for the integration of
environmental review with project review as provided in RCW 43.21C.240.
The rules and procedures shall be jointly developed with the department
of community, trade, and economic development and shall be applicable
to the preparation of environmental documents for actions in counties,
cities, and towns planning under RCW 36.70A.040. The rules and
procedures shall also include procedures and criteria to analyze
planned actions under RCW 43.21C.031(2) and revisions to the rules
adopted under this section to ensure that they are compatible with the
requirements and authorizations of chapter 347, Laws of 1995, as
amended by chapter 429, Laws of 1997. Ordinances or procedures adopted
by a county, city, or town to implement the provisions of chapter 347,
Laws of 1995 prior to the effective date of rules adopted under this
subsection (1)(m) shall continue to be effective until the adoption of
any new or revised ordinances or procedures that may be required. If
any revisions are required as a result of rules adopted under this
subsection (1)(m), those revisions shall be made within the time limits
specified in RCW 43.21C.120.
(2) In exercising its powers, functions, and duties under this
section, the department may:
(a) Consult with the state agencies and with representatives of
science, industry, agriculture, labor, conservation organizations,
state and local governments, and other groups, as it deems advisable;
and
(b) Utilize, to the fullest extent possible, the services,
facilities, and information (including statistical information) of
public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals, in order
to avoid duplication of effort and expense, overlap, or conflict with
similar activities authorized by law and performed by established
agencies.
(3) Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall be subject to the
review procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.21C.240 and 2003 c 298 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the requirements of subsection (2) of this section are
satisfied, a county, city, or town reviewing a project action shall
determine that the requirements for environmental analysis, protection,
and mitigation measures in the county, city, or town's development
regulations and comprehensive plans adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW,
and in other applicable local, state, or federal laws and rules provide
adequate analysis of and mitigation for the specific adverse
environmental and human health impacts of the project action to which
the requirements apply. Rules adopted by the department according to
RCW 43.21C.110 regarding project specific impacts that may not have
been adequately addressed apply to any determination made under this
section. In these situations, in which all adverse environmental and
human health impacts will be mitigated below the level of significance
as a result of mitigation measures included by changing, clarifying, or
conditioning of the proposed action and/or regulatory requirements of
development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW or other
local, state, or federal laws, a determination of nonsignificance or a
mitigated determination of nonsignificance is the proper threshold
determination.
(2) A county, city, or town shall make the determination provided
for in subsection (1) of this section if:
(a) In the course of project review, including any required
environmental analysis, the local government considers the specific
probable adverse environmental and human health impacts of the proposed
action and determines that these specific impacts are adequately
addressed by the development regulations or other applicable
requirements of the comprehensive plan, subarea plan element of the
comprehensive plan, or other local, state, or federal rules or laws;
and
(b) The local government bases or conditions its approval on
compliance with these requirements or mitigation measures.
(3) If a county, city, or town's comprehensive plans, subarea
plans, and development regulations adequately address a project's
probable specific adverse environmental and human health impacts, as
determined under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the county,
city, or town shall not impose additional mitigation under this chapter
during project review. Project review shall be integrated with
environmental analysis under this chapter.
(4) A comprehensive plan, subarea plan, or development regulation
shall be considered to adequately address an impact if the county,
city, or town, through the planning and environmental review process
under chapter 36.70A RCW and this chapter, has identified the specific
adverse environmental and human health impacts and:
(a) The impacts have been avoided or otherwise mitigated; or
(b) The legislative body of the county, city, or town has
designated as acceptable certain levels of service, land use
designations, development standards, or other land use planning
required or allowed by chapter 36.70A RCW.
(5) In deciding whether a specific adverse environmental and human
health impact has been addressed by an existing rule or law of another
agency with jurisdiction with environmental expertise with regard to a
specific environmental impact, the county, city, or town shall consult
orally or in writing with that agency and may expressly defer to that
agency. In making this deferral, the county, city, or town shall base
or condition its project approval on compliance with these other
existing rules or laws.
(6) Nothing in this section limits the authority of an agency in
its review or mitigation of a project to adopt or otherwise rely on
environmental analyses and requirements under other laws, as provided
by this chapter.
(7) This section shall apply only to a county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040.

--- END ---