BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon request of the treating provider, the department must
authorize coverage for a trial on an individual worker entitled to
benefits under this title of an implantable medical device intended to
treat chronic intractable pain otherwise approved by the United States
food and drug administration and considered standard of care throughout
the interventional pain medical community.
(2) If, after conducting the trial under subsection (1) of this
section, the treating provider finds individual success in curing or
relieving the symptoms of the individual worker entitled to benefits
under this title, the department shall determine that the implantable
medical device intended to treat chronic intractable pain is proper and
necessary treatment for the worker under RCW 51.36.010 and shall
authorize coverage for full implantation and follow-up treatment.
(3) This section applies prospectively to all claims regardless of
the date of injury.

--- END ---