BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington
state's quality of life is based on a number of factors, including a
strong economy, affordable housing, and appropriate infrastructure.
The legislature finds that existing funding levels are insufficient to
meet current and future demands for infrastructure, especially
infrastructure that is necessary to accommodate new population growth.
The legislature finds also that the transportation improvement board's
urban corridor program provides a mechanism to ensure that
infrastructure funding is directed to projects that are necessary to
accommodate growth. The legislature, therefore, intends to establish
requirements pertaining to funding growth infrastructure projects from
the urban corridor program, and dedicate funding to the transportation
improvement board for grants to fund qualifying infrastructure programs
that are consistent with these requirements.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.26.282 and 2002 c 189 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In any project funded by the transportation improvement board,
except for projects in cities having a population of less than five
thousand persons, and in addition to any other items required to be
considered by statute, the board also shall consider the land use
implications of the project, such as whether the programs and projects:
(((1))) (a) Support development in and revitalization of existing
downtowns;
(((2))) (b) Implement local comprehensive plans for rural and urban
residential and nonresidential densities;
(((3))) (c) Have land use planning and regulations encouraging
compact development for rural and urban residential and nonresidential
densities; and
(((4))) (d) Promote the use of multimodal transportation.
(2)(a) In any project funded by the transportation improvement
board's urban corridor program, the board must consider, in addition to
any other considerations required by law, the following factors when
determining whether to make grants to local governments to accommodate
projected growth:
(i) Whether the project will improve the minimum levels of service
on transportation facilities that will accommodate planned growth. For
the purposes of this subsection, "minimum levels of service" means an
"a" through "d" level of service on an "a" to "f" scale or other
generally accepted transportation measurement scale;
(ii) Whether the project will enable the local government to
implement its comprehensive and capital facilities plans to accommodate
projected population and employment growth; and
(iii) Whether the local government has sufficient quantities of
buildable land and development regulations to accommodate projected
population and employment growth related to the project.
(b) In addition to the criteria in (a) of this subsection, the
board must give preference to proposals from local governments with
adopted policies that:
(i) Provide or encourage the provision of housing for all economic
segments of the community;
(ii) Ensure that land use regulations will not result in a net loss
of housing capacity; and
(iii) Provide receiving zones for the transfer of development
rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sum of ten million dollars is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general
fund to the transportation improvement board for the purpose of issuing
grants to local governments to accommodate growth under RCW 47.26.282.
(2) The sum of ten million dollars is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the transportation
improvement board for the purpose of issuing grants to local
governments to accommodate growth under RCW 47.26.282.

--- END ---