BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.360 and 1973 c 1 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Develop and provide forms for the reports and statements
required to be made under this chapter;
(2) Prepare and publish a manual setting forth recommended uniform
methods of bookkeeping and reporting for use by persons required to
make reports and statements under this chapter;
(3) Compile and maintain a current list of all filed reports and
statements;
(4) Investigate whether properly completed statements and reports
have been filed within the times required by this chapter;
(5) Upon complaint or upon its own motion, investigate and report
apparent violations of this chapter to the appropriate law enforcement
authorities;
(6) Prepare and publish an annual report to the governor as to the
effectiveness of this chapter and its enforcement by appropriate law
enforcement authorities; ((and))
(7) Prepare and submit to the appropriate committees of the
legislature any recommendations for campaign finance reforms
specifically directed to achieve goals toward (a) legislative and
judicial independence; (b) reducing the cost of campaigns; and (c)
reducing the influence of large organizational contributors; and
(8) Enforce this chapter according to the powers granted it by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.640 and 2006 c 348 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The contribution limits in this section apply to:
(a) Candidates for state legislative office;
(b) Candidates for state office other than state legislative
office;
(c) Candidates for county office in a county that has over two
hundred thousand registered voters;
(d) Candidates for special purpose district office if that district
is authorized to provide freight and passenger transfer and terminal
facilities and that district has over two hundred thousand registered
voters;
(e) Persons holding an office in (a) through (d) of this subsection
against whom recall charges have been filed or to a political committee
having the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall
of a person holding the office;
(f) Caucus political committees;
(g) Bona fide political parties.
(2) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus
political committee, may make contributions to a candidate for a state
legislative office or county office that in the aggregate exceed seven
hundred dollars or to a candidate for a public office in a special
purpose district or a state office other than a state legislative
office that in the aggregate exceed one thousand four hundred dollars
for each election in which the candidate is on the ballot or appears as
a write-in candidate. Contributions to candidates subject to the
limits in this section made with respect to a primary may not be made
after the date of the primary. However, contributions to a candidate
or a candidate's authorized committee may be made with respect to a
primary until thirty days after the primary, subject to the following
limitations: (a) The candidate lost the primary; (b) the candidate's
authorized committee has insufficient funds to pay debts outstanding as
of the date of the primary; and (c) the contributions may only be
raised and spent to satisfy the outstanding debt. Contributions to
candidates subject to the limits in this section made with respect to
a general election may not be made after the final day of the
applicable election cycle.
(3) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus
political committee, may make contributions to a state official, a
county official, or a public official in a special purpose district
against whom recall charges have been filed, or to a political
committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of
the recall of the state official, county official, or public official
in a special purpose district during a recall campaign that in the
aggregate exceed seven hundred dollars if for a state legislative
office or county office or one thousand four hundred dollars if for a
special purpose district office or a state office other than a state
legislative office.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, no bona fide
political party or caucus political committee may make contributions to
a candidate during an election cycle that in the aggregate exceed (i)
seventy cents multiplied by the number of eligible registered voters in
the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected if the contributor
is a caucus political committee or the governing body of a state
organization, or (ii) thirty-five cents multiplied by the number of
registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is
elected if the contributor is a county central committee or a
legislative district committee.
(b) No candidate may accept contributions from a county central
committee or a legislative district committee during an election cycle
that when combined with contributions from other county central
committees or legislative district committees would in the aggregate
exceed thirty-five cents times the number of registered voters in the
jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, no bona fide
political party or caucus political committee may make contributions to
a state official, county official, or a public official in a special
purpose district against whom recall charges have been filed, or to a
political committee having the expectation of making expenditures in
support of the state official, county official, or a public official in
a special purpose district during a recall campaign that in the
aggregate exceed (i) seventy cents multiplied by the number of eligible
registered voters in the jurisdiction entitled to recall the state
official if the contributor is a caucus political committee or the
governing body of a state organization, or (ii) thirty-five cents
multiplied by the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction from
which the candidate is elected if the contributor is a county central
committee or a legislative district committee.
(b) No official holding an office specified in subsection (1) of
this section against whom recall charges have been filed, no authorized
committee of the official, and no political committee having the
expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall of the
official may accept contributions from a county central committee or a
legislative district committee during an election cycle that when
combined with contributions from other county central committees or
legislative district committees would in the aggregate exceed thirty-five cents multiplied by the number of registered voters in the
jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected.
(6) For purposes of determining contribution limits under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the number of eligible
registered voters in a jurisdiction is the number at the time of the
most recent general election in the jurisdiction.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (2) through (5) of this section, no
person other than an individual, bona fide political party, or caucus
political committee may make contributions reportable under this
chapter to a caucus political committee that in the aggregate exceed
seven hundred dollars in a calendar year or to a bona fide political
party that in the aggregate exceed three thousand five hundred dollars
in a calendar year. This subsection does not apply to loans made in
the ordinary course of business.
(8) No candidate may accept contributions that, in the aggregate,
exceed five thousand dollars in an election cycle from all political
committees, except for bona fide political parties or caucus political
committees.
(9) For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, a
contribution to the authorized political committee of a candidate or of
an official specified in subsection (1) of this section against whom
recall charges have been filed is considered to be a contribution to
the candidate or official.
(((9))) (10) A contribution received within the twelve-month period
after a recall election concerning an office specified in subsection
(1) of this section is considered to be a contribution during that
recall campaign if the contribution is used to pay a debt or obligation
incurred to influence the outcome of that recall campaign.
(((10))) (11) The contributions allowed by subsection (3) of this
section are in addition to those allowed by subsection (2) of this
section, and the contributions allowed by subsection (5) of this
section are in addition to those allowed by subsection (4) of this
section.
(((11))) (12) RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790 apply to a special
election conducted to fill a vacancy in an office specified in
subsection (1) of this section. However, the contributions made to a
candidate or received by a candidate for a primary or special election
conducted to fill such a vacancy shall not be counted toward any of the
limitations that apply to the candidate or to contributions made to the
candidate for any other primary or election.
(((12))) (13) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this
section, no ((corporation or)) business entity not covered under
section 4 of this act not doing business in Washington state((, no
labor union with fewer than ten members who reside in Washington
state,)) and no political committee that has not received contributions
of ten dollars or more from at least ((ten)) one hundred fifty persons
registered to vote in Washington state during the preceding one hundred
eighty days may make contributions reportable under this chapter to a
candidate, to a state official against whom recall charges have been
filed, or to a political committee having the expectation of making
expenditures in support of the recall of the official. This subsection
does not apply to loans made in the ordinary course of business.
(((13))) (14) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this
section, no county central committee or legislative district committee
may make contributions reportable under this chapter to a candidate
specified in subsection (1) of this section, or an official specified
in subsection (1) of this section against whom recall charges have been
filed, or political committee having the expectation of making
expenditures in support of the recall of an official specified in
subsection (1) of this section if the county central committee or
legislative district committee is outside of the jurisdiction entitled
to elect the candidate or recall the official.
(((14))) (15) No person may accept contributions that exceed the
contribution limitations provided in this section.
(((15))) (16) The following contributions are exempt from the
contribution limits of this section:
(a) An expenditure or contribution earmarked for voter
registration, for absentee ballot information, for precinct caucuses,
for get-out-the-vote campaigns, for precinct judges or inspectors, for
sample ballots, or for ballot counting, all without promotion of or
political advertising for individual candidates; or
(b) An expenditure by a political committee for its own internal
organization or fund raising without direct association with individual
candidates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
No person may make contributions to a political committee that in
the aggregate, exceed one thousand dollars in any year. No political
committee shall accept a contribution from any person that, in the
aggregate, exceeds one thousand dollars in any year. No person may
make contributions to all political committees that, in the aggregate,
exceed three thousand five hundred dollars in any year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No corporation, limited liability partnership, or limited
liability company formed under the laws of this or any other state and
no labor organization may use its general treasury funds to make a
contribution or expenditure in connection with the election of a
candidate or a political convention or caucus held to select candidates
for any public office.
(2) No candidate for public office, political committee or other
person may accept or receive a contribution prohibited by this section.
(3) No officer or director of any corporation, limited liability
partnership, limited liability company, or labor organization may
consent to any contribution or expenditure by the corporation, limited
liability partnership, or labor organization prohibited by this
section.
(4) This section does not prohibit a corporation, limited liability
partnership, limited liability company, or labor organization from:
(a) Using its general treasury funds for the purpose of nonpartisan
registration and get-out-the-vote campaigns aimed at its stockholders
and executive or administrative personnel and their families or, in the
case of a labor organization, aimed at its members and their families;
(b) Establishing, administering, or soliciting contributions to a
separate segregated fund to be utilized for political purposes as long
as the solicitations are limited to stockholders and their families and
its executive or administrative personnel and their families in the
case of corporations, or from members and their families in the case of
labor organizations;
(c) Engaging in activities that do not constitute electioneering
communications as identified in RCW 42.17.020(21).
(5) This section does not apply to:
(a) Political committees that incorporate solely for liability
purposes; or
(b) Voluntary political associations that are formed solely to
promote political ideas and do not engage in business activities, do
not have shareholders or other affiliated persons who can lay a claim
to the assets or earnings, and are not established by a business
corporation or labor union and do not accept contributions from such
entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
No individual or entity that has a contract with the state valued
at one hundred thousand dollars or more, and no person employed by that
individual or entity as a manager, officer, director, partner, or
employee with managerial or discretionary responsibilities, may make a
political contribution to a candidate for state office or to a party
committee. No political committee established by such an individual or
entity may make a political contribution to a candidate for state
office or to a party committee. No candidate for state office and no
party committee may accept a contribution from an individual or entity
that has a contract with the state valued at one hundred thousand
dollars or more.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.17.510 and 2005 c 445 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All written political advertising, whether relating to
candidates or ballot propositions, shall include the sponsor's name and
address. All radio and television political advertising, whether
relating to candidates or ballot propositions, shall include the
sponsor's name. The use of an assumed name for the sponsor of
electioneering communications, independent expenditures, or political
advertising shall be unlawful. For partisan office, if a candidate has
expressed a party or independent preference on the declaration of
candidacy, that party or independent designation shall be clearly
identified in electioneering communications, independent expenditures,
or political advertising.
(2) In addition to the materials required by subsection (1) of this
section, except as specifically addressed in subsections (4) and (5) of
this section, all political advertising undertaken as an independent
expenditure by a person or entity other than a party organization, and
all electioneering communications, must include the following statement
as part of the communication "NOTICE TO VOTERS (Required by law): This
advertisement is not authorized or approved by any candidate. It is
paid for by (name, address, city, state)." If the advertisement
undertaken as an independent expenditure or electioneering
communication is undertaken by a nonindividual other than a party
organization, then the following notation must also be included:
"((Top Five)) Major Contributors," followed by a listing of the names
of ((the five)) persons or entities ((making the largest contributions
in excess of seven)) that have contributed more than five hundred
dollars reportable under this chapter during the twelve-month period
before the date of the advertisement or communication.
(3) The statements and listings of contributors required by
subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall:
(a) Appear on the first page or fold of the written advertisement
or communication in at least ten-point type, or in type at least ten
percent of the largest size type used in a written advertisement or
communication directed at more than one voter, such as a billboard or
poster, whichever is larger;
(b) Not be subject to the half-tone or screening process; and
(c) Be set apart from any other printed matter.
(4) In an independent expenditure or electioneering communication
transmitted via television or other medium that includes a visual
image, the following statement must either be clearly spoken, or appear
in print and be visible for at least four seconds, appear in letters
greater than four percent of the visual screen height, and have a
reasonable color contrast with the background: "No candidate
authorized this ad. Paid for by (name, city, state)." If the
advertisement or communication is undertaken by a nonindividual other
than a party organization, then the following notation must also be
included: "((Top Five)) Major Contributors" followed by a listing of
the names of ((the five)) persons or entities ((making the largest
contributions in excess of seven)) that have contributed more than five
hundred dollars reportable under this chapter during the twelve-month
period before the date of the advertisement. Abbreviations may be used
to describe contributing entities if the full name of the entity has
been clearly spoken previously during the broadcast advertisement.
(5) The following statement shall be clearly spoken in an
independent expenditure or electioneering communication transmitted by
a method that does not include a visual image: "No candidate
authorized this ad. Paid for by (name, city, state)." If the
independent expenditure or electioneering communication is undertaken
by a nonindividual other than a party organization, then the following
statement must also be included: "((Top Five)) Major Contributors"
followed by a listing of the names of ((the five)) persons or entities
making ((the largest)) contributions in excess of ((seven)) five
hundred dollars reportable under this chapter during the twelve-month
period before the date of the advertisement. Abbreviations may be used
to describe contributing entities if the full name of the entity has
been clearly spoken previously during the broadcast advertisement.
(6) Political yard signs are exempt from the requirement of
subsections (1) and (2) of this section that the name and address of
the sponsor of political advertising be listed on the advertising. In
addition, the public disclosure commission shall, by rule, exempt from
the identification requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this
section forms of political advertising such as campaign buttons,
balloons, pens, pencils, sky-writing, inscriptions, and other forms of
advertising where identification is impractical.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "yard sign" means any outdoor
sign with dimensions no greater than eight feet by four feet.

Sec. 7 RCW 42.17.105 and 2001 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Campaign)) Treasurers shall prepare and deliver to the
commission a special report regarding any contribution or aggregate of
contributions which: Is one thousand dollars or more; is from a single
person or entity; and is received during a special reporting period.
Any political committee making a contribution or an aggregate of
contributions to a single entity which is one thousand dollars or more
shall also prepare and deliver to the commission the special report if
the contribution or aggregate of contributions is made during a special
reporting period.
For the purposes of subsections (1) through (7) of this section:
(a) Each of the following intervals is a special reporting period:
(i) The interval beginning after the period covered by the last report
required by RCW 42.17.080 and 42.17.090 to be filed before a primary
and concluding on the end of the day before that primary; and (ii) the
interval composed of the twenty-one days preceding a general election;
and
(b) An aggregate of contributions includes only those contributions
received from a single entity during any one special reporting period
or made by the contributing political committee to a single entity
during any one special reporting period.
(2) If a ((campaign)) treasurer files a special report under this
section for one or more contributions received from a single entity
during a special reporting period, the treasurer shall also file a
special report under this section for each subsequent contribution of
any size which is received from that entity during the special
reporting period. If a political committee files a special report
under this section for a contribution or contributions made to a single
entity during a special reporting period, the political committee shall
also file a special report for each subsequent contribution of any size
which is made to that entity during the special reporting period.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
special report required by this section shall be delivered
electronically or in written form, including but not limited to
mailgram, telegram, or nightletter. The special report required of a
contribution recipient by subsection (1) of this section shall be
delivered to the commission within forty-eight hours of the time, or on
the first working day after: The contribution of one thousand dollars
or more is received by the candidate or treasurer; the aggregate
received by the candidate or treasurer first equals one thousand
dollars or more; or the subsequent contribution that must be reported
under subsection (2) of this section is received by the candidate or
treasurer. The special report required of a contributor by subsection
(1) of this section or RCW 42.17.175 shall be delivered to the
commission, and the candidate or political committee to whom the
contribution or contributions are made, within twenty-four hours of the
time, or on the first working day after: The contribution is made; the
aggregate of contributions made first equals one thousand dollars or
more; or the subsequent contribution that must be reported under
subsection (2) of this section is made.
(4) The special report may be transmitted orally by telephone to
the commission to satisfy the delivery period required by subsection
(3) of this section if the written form of the report is also mailed to
the commission and postmarked within the delivery period established in
subsection (3) of this section or the file transfer date of the
electronic filing is within the delivery period established in
subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The special report shall include at least:
(a) The amount of the contribution or contributions;
(b) The date or dates of receipt;
(c) The name and address of the donor;
(d) The name and address of the recipient; and
(e) Any other information the commission may by rule require.
(6) Contributions reported under this section shall also be
reported as required by other provisions of this chapter.
(7) The commission shall prepare daily a summary of the special
reports made under this section and RCW 42.17.175.
(8) It is a violation of this chapter for any person to make, or
for any candidate or political committee to accept from any one person,
contributions reportable under RCW 42.17.090 in the aggregate exceeding
fifty thousand dollars for any campaign for statewide office or
exceeding ((five)) three thousand dollars for any other campaign
subject to the provisions of this chapter within ((twenty-one)) forty-five days of a general election. This subsection does not apply to
contributions made by, or accepted from, a bona fide political party as
defined in this chapter, excluding the county central committee or
legislative district committee.
(9) Contributions governed by this section include, but are not
limited to, contributions made or received indirectly through a third
party or entity whether the contributions are or are not reported to
the commission as earmarked contributions under RCW 42.17.135.

Sec. 8 RCW 42.17.020 and 2005 c 445 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with
reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.
(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(4) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition
proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal
corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency from
and after the time when the proposition has been initially filed with
the appropriate election officer of that constituency prior to its
circulation for signatures.
(5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(6) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has filed a valid certificate of
nomination with the secretary of state under chapter 29A.20 RCW;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, that is the body
authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority
on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(7) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.
(8) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(9) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(10) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(11) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(12) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.
(13) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services
of any kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW
42.17.241, the term "compensation" shall not include per diem
allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse
a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged
in the official business of the governmental entity.
(14) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee
that is an organization of continuing existence not established in
anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(15)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising or electioneering communication
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the
individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(16) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or
special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill
a vacancy in any such office.
(17) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election
for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is
submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the
qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set
forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of
the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for
purposes of this chapter.
(18) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in
opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(19) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day
of December after the date of the last previous general election for
the office that the candidate seeks and ending on November 30th after
the next election for the office. In the case of a special election to
fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period
beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on November 30th
after the special election.
(20) "Electioneering communication" means any broadcast, cable, or
satellite television or radio transmission, United States postal
service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical that:
(a) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or judicial
office either by specifically naming the candidate, or identifying the
candidate without using the candidate's name;
(b) Is broadcast, transmitted, mailed, erected, distributed, or
otherwise published within sixty days before any election for that
office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking election;
and
(c) Either alone, or in combination with one or more communications
identifying the candidate by the same sponsor during the sixty days
before an election, has a fair market value of five thousand dollars or
more.
(21) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
(a) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by a
candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when
the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising
appearing at least twelve months preceding his or her becoming a
candidate;
(b) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the
advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor,
so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been
invited to participate in the debate or forum;
(c) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is:
(i) Of primary interest to the general public;
(ii) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that
news medium; and
(iii) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political
committee;
(d) Slate cards and sample ballots;
(e) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar works
(i) written by a candidate when the candidate entered into a contract
for such publications or media at least twelve months before becoming
a candidate, or (ii) written about a candidate;
(f) Public service announcements;
(g) A mailed internal political communication primarily limited to
the members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(h) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized committee
of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or
(i) Any other communication exempted by the commission through rule
consistent with the intent of this chapter.
(22) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of
value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure"
also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of
value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or
anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring
any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or
opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter,
agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be
reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made. The
term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete repayment
by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a loan, the
receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(23) "Final report" means the report described as a final report in
RCW 42.17.080(2).
(24) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
election that results in the election of a person to a state office.
It does not include a primary.
(25) "Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.
(26) "Immediate family" includes the spouse, dependent children,
and other dependent relatives, if living in the household. For the
purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, "immediate family" means
an individual's spouse, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister
of the individual and the spouse of any such person and a child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half
brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse and the
spouse of any such person.
(27) "Incumbent" means a person who is in present possession of an
elected office.
(28) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each
of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of five hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.
(29)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a
contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless the
contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family as
defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an
association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(30) "Labor organization" means any organization of any kind, or
any agency or employee representation committee or plan, in which
employees participate and which exists for the purpose, in whole or in
part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes,
wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or conditions of work.
(31) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments,
nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of
the state legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the
subject of action by either house or any committee of the legislature
and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both houses, are
pending approval by the governor.
(((31))) (32) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature
of the state of Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule,
standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency
under the state Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes an association's or other
organization's act of communicating with the members of that
association or organization.
(((32))) (33) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in
his or her own or another's behalf.
(((33))) (34) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by
whom a lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is
compensated for acting as a lobbyist.
(((34))) (35) "Participate" means that, with respect to a
particular election, an entity:
(a) Makes either a monetary or in-kind contribution to a candidate;
(b) Makes an independent expenditure or electioneering
communication in support of or opposition to a candidate;
(c) Endorses a candidate prior to contributions being made by a
subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or
that candidate's opponent;
(d) Makes a recommendation regarding whether a candidate should be
supported or opposed prior to a contribution being made by a subsidiary
corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that
candidate's opponent; or
(e) Directly or indirectly collaborates or consults with a
subsidiary corporation or local unit on matters relating to the support
of or opposition to a candidate, including, but not limited to, the
amount of a contribution, when a contribution should be given, and what
assistance, services or independent expenditures, or electioneering
communications, if any, will be made or should be made in support of or
opposition to a candidate.
(((35))) (36) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint
venture, public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or
local governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(((36))) (37) "Person in interest" means the person who is the
subject of a record or any representative designated by that person,
except that if that person is under a legal disability, the term
"person in interest" means and includes the parent or duly appointed
legal representative.
(((37))) (38) "Political advertising" includes any advertising
displays, newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles,
tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other
means of mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing,
directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support or
opposition in any election campaign.
(((38))) (39) "Political committee" means any person (except a
candidate or an individual dealing with his or her own funds or
property) having the expectation of receiving contributions or making
expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any
ballot proposition.
(((39))) (40) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
procedure for nominating a candidate to state office under chapter
29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in large
measure, the procedures established in chapter 29A.52 RCW.
(((40))) (41) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial,
county, city, town, school district, port district, special district,
or other state political subdivision elective office.
(((41) "Public record" includes any writing containing information
relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained
by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.))
(42) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the
date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29A.56.120 and ending
thirty days after the recall election.
(43) "Sponsor of an electioneering communications, independent
expenditures, or political advertising" means the person paying for the
electioneering communication, independent expenditure, or political
advertising. If a person acts as an agent for another or is reimbursed
by another for the payment, the original source of the payment is the
sponsor.
(44) "State legislative office" means the office of a member of the
state house of representatives or the office of a member of the state
senate.
(45) "State office" means state legislative office or the office of
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general,
commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of
public instruction, state auditor, or state treasurer.
(46) "State official" means a person who holds a state office.
(47) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or
candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the possession
or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the election
for which the contributions were received, and that are in excess of
the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the committee
or candidate prior to that election. In the case of a continuing
political committee, "surplus funds" mean those contributions remaining
in the possession or control of the committee that are in excess of the
amount necessary to pay all remaining debts when it makes its final
report under RCW 42.17.065.
(48) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.
((As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and
any gender, the other, as the context requires.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
"Public record" includes any writing containing information
relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained
by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.

--- END ---