BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that one of the most fundamental rights is
the right to vote, and it is the primary duty of government to actively
encourage voter registration and to make this opportunity widely
available to eligible citizens. It is the intent of the legislature
that all state agencies and their vendors, contractors, and partners
shall consider ways to increase and improve voter registration services
so that, of its eligible population, Washington has the highest
percentage of registered voters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
A person may register to vote, transfer a voter registration, or
change his or her name for voter registration purposes when he or she
applies in person for public assistance, disability services, or makes
an in-person report of an address change at an employment security
department facility or the department of social and health services.
Voter registration procedures at these agencies shall be pursuant to
RCW 29A.08.330.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) State agencies providing voter registration services, whether
designated by the governor or required by statute, shall keep records
reflecting the number of persons who:
(a) Request, apply for, or receive a service from those agencies,
including reporting a change of address;
(b) Register to vote, transfer a voter registration, or decline to
either register to vote or transfer a voter registration;
(c) Request a voter registration application but do not return it
to the agency staff.
(2) The secretary of state shall produce an annual report, with
appropriate performance measures, from this data on a county by county
basis. The data should be reported in aggregate terms and not with
reference to individual voters. The report must:
(a) Show the number of registered voters as a reflection of the
number of eligible voting population in each county;
(b) Identify the chief challenges in increasing voter registration;
and
(c) Recommend action for increasing the percentage of registered
voters.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.08.310 and 2003 c 111 s 222 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governor, in consultation with the secretary of state,
shall designate agencies to provide voter registration services in
compliance with federal statutes. New agencies, vendors, or
contractors, shall be added as appropriate on a biennial basis.
(2) Each state agency designated shall provide voter registration
services for employees and the public within each office of that
agency.
(3) The secretary of state shall design and provide a standard
notice informing the public of the availability of voter registration,
which notice shall be posted in each state agency where such services
are available.
(4) The secretary of state shall post on its web site the list of
state agencies that provide voter registration services and shall
update this list as new agencies are added.
(5) The secretary of state shall design and provide standard voter
registration forms for use by these state agencies.
(((5))) (6) Each ((institution of higher education shall put in
place an active prompt on its course registration web site, or similar
web site that students actively and regularly use, that, if selected,
will link the student)) state agency shall place a link on its web site
to the secretary of state's voter registration web site. ((The prompt
must ask the student if he or she wishes to register to vote.))

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.08.330 and 2005 c 246 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall prescribe the method of voter
registration for each designated agency. The agency shall use either
the state voter registration by mail form with a separate declination
form for the applicant to indicate that he or she declines to register
at this time, or the agency may use a separate form approved for use by
the secretary of state.
(2) The person providing service at the agency shall offer voter
registration services to every client whenever he or she applies for
service or assistance and with each renewal, recertification, or change
of address. The person providing service shall give the applicant the
same level of assistance with the voter registration application as is
offered to fill out the agency's forms and documents, including
information about age and citizenship requirements for voter
registration. The person providing service at the agency shall not
make any statement that would discourage the applicant from registering
to vote, or lead the applicant to believe that a decision to register
or not to register has any bearing on the eligibility or the
availability of the public service or assistance.
(3) The person providing service at the agency shall determine if
the prospective applicant wants to register to vote or transfer his or
her voter registration by asking the following question:

"Do you want to register to vote or transfer your voter
registration?"

If the applicant chooses to register or transfer a registration,
the service agent shall ask the following:

(a) "Are you a United States citizen?"
(b) "Are you or will you be eighteen years of age on or before the
next election?"

If the applicant answers in the affirmative to both questions, the
agent shall then provide the applicant with a voter registration form
and instructions and shall record that the applicant has requested to
register to vote or transfer a voter registration. If the applicant
answers in the negative to either question, the agent shall not provide
the applicant with a voter registration form.
(4) If an agency uses a computerized application process, it may,
in consultation with the secretary of state, develop methods to capture
simultaneously the information required for voter registration during
a person's computerized application process.
(5) Each designated agency shall provide for the voter registration
application forms to be collected from each agency office at least once
each week. The agency shall then forward the application forms to the
secretary of state each week. The secretary of state shall forward the
forms to the county in which the applicant has registered to vote no
later than ten days after the date on which the forms were received by
the secretary of state.

--- END ---