BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, no judicial, legislative, administrative, or other body
with the power to issue a subpoena or other compulsory process may
compel the news media to testify, produce, or otherwise disclose:
(a) The identity of a source of any news or information or any
information that would tend to identify the source where such source
has a reasonable expectation of confidentiality; or
(b) Any news or information obtained or prepared by the news media
in its capacity in gathering, receiving, or processing news or
information for potential communication to the public, including, but
not limited to, any notes, outtakes, photographs, video or sound tapes,
film, or other data of whatever sort in any medium now known or
hereafter devised. This does not include physical evidence of a crime.
(2) A court may compel disclosure of the news or information
described in subsection (1)(b) of this section if the court finds that
the party seeking such news or information established by clear and
convincing evidence:
(a)(i) In a criminal investigation or prosecution, based on
information other than that information being sought, that there are
reasonable grounds to believe that a crime has occurred; or
(ii) In a civil action or proceeding, based on information other
than that information being sought, that there is a prima facie cause
of action; and
(b) In all matters, whether criminal or civil, that:
(i) The news or information is highly material and relevant;
(ii) The news or information is critical or necessary to the
maintenance of a party's claim, defense, or proof of an issue material
thereto;
(iii) The party seeking such news or information has exhausted all
reasonable and available means to obtain it from alternative sources;
and
(iv) There is a compelling public interest in the disclosure. A
court may consider whether or not the news or information was obtained
from a confidential source in evaluating the public interest in
disclosure.
(3) The protection from compelled disclosure contained in
subsection (1) of this section also applies to any subpoena issued to,
or other compulsory process against, a nonnews media party where such
subpoena or process seeks records, information, or other communications
relating to business transactions between such nonnews media party and
the news media for the purpose of discovering the identity of a source
or obtaining news or information described in subsection (1) of this
section. Whenever a subpoena is issued to, or other compulsory process
is initiated against, a nonnews media party where such subpoena or
process seeks information or communications on business transactions
with the news media, the affected news media shall be given reasonable
and timely notice of the subpoena or compulsory process before it is
executed or initiated, as the case may be, and an opportunity to be
heard. In the event that the subpoena to, or other compulsory process
against, the nonnews media party is in connection with a criminal
investigation in which the news media is the express target, and
advance notice as provided in this section would pose a clear and
substantial threat to the integrity of the investigation, the
governmental authority shall so certify to such a threat in court and
notification of the subpoena or compulsory process shall be given to
the affected news media as soon thereafter as it is determined that
such notification will no longer pose a clear and substantial threat to
the integrity of the investigation.
(4) Publication or dissemination by the news media of news or
information described in subsection (1) of this section, or a portion
thereof, shall not constitute a waiver of the protection from compelled
disclosure that is contained in subsection (1) of this section. In the
event that the fact of publication of news or information must be
proved in any proceeding, that fact and the contents of the publication
may be established by judicial notice.
(5)(a) The term "news media" means:
(i) Any newspaper, magazine or other periodical, book publisher,
news agency, wire service, radio or television station or network,
cable or satellite station or network, or audio or audiovisual
production company, or any person or entity that is in the regular
business of disseminating news or information to the public by any
means, including, but not limited to, print, broadcast, photographic,
mechanical, internet, or electronic distribution;
(ii) Any person who is or has been a journalist, a scholar or
researcher employed by any institution of higher education, or other
individual who either: (A) At the time he or she obtained or prepared
the information that is sought was earning or about to earn a
substantial portion of his or her livelihood by obtaining or preparing
information for dissemination by any person or entity listed in (a)(i)
of this subsection, or (B) obtained or prepared the information that is
sought while serving in the capacity of an agent, assistant, employee,
or supervisor of any person or entity listed in (a)(i) or (ii)(A) of
this subsection; or
(iii) Any parent, subsidiary, or affiliate of the entities listed
in (a)(i) of this subsection.
(b) The term "news media" does not include a governmental entity or
an official or employee of a governmental entity while engaged in
official duties.
(6) In all matters adjudicated pursuant to this section, a court of
competent jurisdiction may exercise its inherent powers to conduct all
appropriate proceedings required in order to make necessary findings of
fact and enter conclusions of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 5 RCW.

--- END ---