BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.61.150 and 2002 c 88 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Metropolitan park commissioners selected by election according to
RCW 35.61.050(2) shall perform their duties and may provide, by
resolution passed by the commissioners, for the payment of compensation
to each of its commissioners at a rate of up to ((seventy)) ninety
dollars for each day or portion of a day devoted to the business of the
district. However, the compensation for each commissioner must not
exceed ((six)) eight thousand ((seven)) six hundred ((twenty)) forty
dollars per year.
Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
clerk of the board. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any
time after the commissioner's election and prior to the date on which
the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the
month or period of months for which it is made.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 2 RCW 52.14.010 and 1998 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The affairs of the district shall be managed by a board of fire
commissioners composed of three registered voters residing in the
district except as provided in RCW 52.14.015 and 52.14.020. Each
member shall each receive ((seventy)) ninety dollars per day or portion
thereof, not to exceed ((six)) eight thousand ((seven)) six hundred
((twenty)) forty dollars per year, for attendance at board meetings and
for performance of other services in behalf of the district.
In addition, they shall receive necessary expenses incurred in
attending meetings of the board or when otherwise engaged in district
business, and shall be entitled to receive the same insurance available
to all firefighters of the district: PROVIDED, That the premiums for
such insurance, except liability insurance, shall be paid by the
individual commissioners who elect to receive it.
Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to
the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
The board shall fix the compensation to be paid the secretary and
all other agents and employees of the district. The board may, by
resolution adopted by unanimous vote, authorize any of its members to
serve as volunteer firefighters without compensation. A commissioner
actually serving as a volunteer firefighter may enjoy the rights and
benefits of a volunteer firefighter.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 3 RCW 53.12.260 and 1998 c 121 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each commissioner of a port district shall receive ((seventy))
ninety dollars per day or portion thereof spent (a) in actual
attendance at official meetings of the port district commission, or (b)
in performance of other service in behalf of the district. The total
per diem compensation of a port commissioner shall not exceed ((six))
eight thousand ((seven)) six hundred ((twenty)) forty dollars in a
year, or ((eight)) ten thousand ((four)) eight hundred dollars in any
year for a port district with gross operating income of twenty-five
million or more in the preceding calendar year.
(2) Port commissioners shall receive additional compensation as
follows: (a) Each commissioner of a port district with gross operating
revenues of twenty-five million dollars or more in the preceding
calendar year shall receive a salary of five hundred dollars per month;
and (b) each commissioner of a port district with gross operating
revenues of from one million dollars to less than twenty-five million
dollars in the preceding calendar year shall receive a salary of two
hundred dollars per month.
(3) In lieu of the compensation specified in this section, a port
commission may set compensation to be paid to commissioners.
(4) For any commissioner who has not elected to become a member of
public employees retirement system before May 1, 1975, the compensation
provided pursuant to this section shall not be considered salary for
purposes of the provisions of any retirement system created pursuant to
the general laws of this state nor shall attendance at such meetings or
other service on behalf of the district constitute service as defined
in RCW 41.40.010(9): PROVIDED, That in the case of a port district
when commissioners are receiving compensation and contributing to the
public employees retirement system, these benefits shall continue in
full force and effect notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 53.12.260
and 53.12.265.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 4 RCW 54.12.080 and 1998 c 121 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Commissioners of public utility districts are eligible to
receive salaries as follows:
(a) Each public utility district commissioner of a district
operating utility properties shall receive a salary of one thousand
dollars per month during a calendar year if the district received total
gross revenue of over fifteen million dollars during the fiscal year
ending June 30th before the calendar year. However, the board of
commissioners of such a public utility district may pass a resolution
increasing the rate of salary up to thirteen hundred dollars per month.
(b) Each public utility district commissioner of a district
operating utility properties shall receive a salary of seven hundred
dollars per month during a calendar year if the district received total
gross revenue of from two million dollars to fifteen million dollars
during the fiscal year ending June 30th before the calendar year.
However, the board of commissioners of such a public utility district
may pass a resolution increasing the rate of salary up to nine hundred
dollars per month.
(c) Commissioners of other districts shall serve without salary.
However, the board of commissioners of such a public utility district
may pass a resolution providing for salaries not exceeding four hundred
dollars per month for each commissioner.
(2) In addition to salary, all districts may provide by resolution
for the payment of per diem compensation to each commissioner at a rate
not exceeding ((seventy)) ninety dollars for each day or major part
thereof devoted to the business of the district, and days upon which he
or she attends meetings of the commission of his or her district or
meetings attended by one or more commissioners of two or more districts
called to consider business common to them, but such compensation paid
during any one year to a commissioner shall not exceed ((nine thousand
eight)) twelve thousand six hundred dollars. Per diem compensation
shall not be paid for services of a ministerial or professional nature.
(3) Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
district as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to
the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
(4) Each district commissioner shall be reimbursed for reasonable
expenses actually incurred in connection with such business and
meetings, including his or her subsistence and lodging and travel while
away from his or her place of residence.
(5) Any district providing group insurance for its employees,
covering them, their immediate family, and dependents, may provide
insurance for its commissioner with the same coverage.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 5 RCW 57.12.010 and 2001 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The governing body of a district shall be a board of commissioners
consisting of three members, or five or seven members as provided in
RCW 57.12.015. The board shall annually elect one of its members as
president and another as secretary.
The board shall by resolution adopt rules governing the transaction
of its business and shall adopt an official seal. All proceedings
shall be by resolution recorded in a book kept for that purpose which
shall be a public record.
A district shall provide by resolution for the payment of
compensation to each of its commissioners at a rate of ((seventy))
ninety dollars for each day or portion thereof devoted to the business
of the district. However the compensation for each commissioner shall
not exceed ((six)) eight thousand ((seven)) six hundred ((twenty))
forty dollars per year. In addition, the secretary may be paid a
reasonable sum for clerical services.
Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during the commissioner's term of office, by a written waiver filed
with the district at any time after the commissioner's election and
prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid.
The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is
made.
No commissioner shall be employed full time by the district. A
commissioner shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses actually
incurred in connection with district business, including subsistence
and lodging while away from the commissioner's place of residence and
mileage for use of a privately-owned vehicle at the mileage rate
authorized in RCW 43.03.060.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 6 RCW 68.52.220 and 1998 c 121 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The affairs of the district shall be managed by a board of cemetery
district commissioners composed of three members. Members of the board
shall receive expenses necessarily incurred in attending meetings of
the board or when otherwise engaged in district business. The board
may provide, by resolution passed by the commissioners, for the payment
of compensation to each of its commissioners at a rate of up to
((seventy)) ninety dollars for each day or portion of a day devoted to
the business of the district. However, the compensation for each
commissioner must not exceed ((six)) eight thousand ((seven)) six
hundred ((twenty)) forty dollars per year.
Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
clerk of the board. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any
time after the commissioner's election and prior to the date on which
the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the
month or period of months for which it is made. The board shall fix
the compensation to be paid the secretary and other employees of the
district. Cemetery district commissioners and candidates for cemetery
district commissioner are exempt from the requirements of chapter 42.17
RCW.
The initial cemetery district commissioners shall assume office
immediately upon their election and qualification. Staggering of terms
of office shall be accomplished as follows: (1) The person elected
receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to a six-year
term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a
five-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered
year; (2) the person who is elected receiving the next greatest number
of votes shall be elected to a four-year term of office if the election
is held in an odd-numbered year or a three-year term of office if the
election is held in an even-numbered year; and (3) the other person who
is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office if the
election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office
if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The initial
commissioners shall assume office immediately after they are elected
and qualified but their terms of office shall be calculated from the
first day of January after the election.
Thereafter, commissioners shall be elected to six-year terms of
office. Commissioners shall serve until their successors are elected
and qualified and assume office as provided in RCW ((29.04.170))
29A.20.040.
The polling places for a cemetery district election may be located
inside or outside the boundaries of the district, as determined by the
auditor of the county in which the cemetery district is located, and no
such election shall be held irregular or void on that account.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.44.050 and 1998 c 121 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A district shall provide by resolution for the payment of
compensation to each of its commissioners at a rate of ((seventy))
ninety dollars for each day or portion thereof devoted to the business
of the district, and days upon which he or she attends meetings of the
commission of his or her own district, or meetings attended by one or
more commissioners of two or more districts called to consider business
common to them, except that the total compensation paid to such
commissioner during any one year shall not exceed ((six)) eight
thousand ((seven)) six hundred ((twenty)) forty dollars. The
commissioners may not be compensated for services performed of a
ministerial or professional nature.
Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
district as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to
the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
Any district providing group insurance for its employees, covering
them, their immediate family, and dependents, may provide insurance for
its commissioners with the same coverage. Each commissioner shall be
reimbursed for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection with
such business and meetings, including his or her subsistence and
lodging and travel while away from his or her place of residence. No
resolution shall be adopted without a majority vote of the whole
commission. The commission shall organize by election of its own
members of a president and secretary, shall by resolution adopt rules
governing the transaction of its business and shall adopt an official
seal. All proceedings of the commission shall be by motion or
resolution recorded in a book or books kept for such purpose, which
shall be public records.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 8 RCW 85.05.410 and 1998 c 121 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Members of the board of diking commissioners of any diking district
in this state may receive as compensation the sum of up to ((seventy))
ninety dollars for attendance at official meetings of the district and
for each day or major part thereof for all necessary services actually
performed in connection with their duties as commissioners, and shall
receive the same compensation as other labor of a like character for
all other necessary work or services performed in connection with their
duties: PROVIDED, That such compensation shall not exceed ((six))
eight thousand ((seven)) six hundred ((twenty)) forty dollars in one
calendar year, except when the commissioners declare an emergency.
Allowance of such compensation shall be established and approved at
regular meetings of the board, and when a copy of the extracts of
minutes of the board meeting relative thereto showing such approval is
certified by the secretary of such board and filed with the county
auditor, the allowance made shall be paid as are other claims against
the district.
Each commissioner is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable
expenses actually incurred in connection with such business, including
subsistence and lodging, while away from the commissioner's place of
residence, and mileage for use of a privately owned vehicle in
accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW.
Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to
the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 9 RCW 85.06.380 and 1998 c 121 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
In performing their duties under the provisions of this title the
board and members of the board of drainage commissioners may receive as
compensation up to ((seventy)) ninety dollars for attendance at
official meetings of the district and for each day or major part
thereof for all necessary services actually performed in connection
with their duties as commissioners: PROVIDED, That such compensation
shall not exceed ((six)) eight thousand ((seven)) six hundred
((twenty)) forty dollars in one calendar year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
such services and compensation are allowed and approved at a regular
meeting of the board. Upon the submission of a copy, certified by the
secretary, of the extracts of the relevant minutes of the board showing
such approval, to the county auditor, the same shall be paid as other
claims against the district are paid. Each commissioner is entitled to
reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection
with such business, including subsistence and lodging, while away from
the commissioner's place of residence and mileage for use of a
privately-owned vehicle in accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW.
Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to
the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 10 RCW 85.08.320 and 1998 c 121 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The compensation of the superintendent of construction, the board
of appraisers hereinafter provided for, and any special engineer,
attorney or agent employed by the district in connection with the
improvement, the maximum wages to be paid, and the maximum price of
materials to be used, shall be fixed by the district board of
supervisors. Members of the board of supervisors may receive
compensation up to ((seventy)) ninety dollars for attending each
official meeting of the district and for each day or major part thereof
for all necessary services actually performed in connection with their
duties as supervisors: PROVIDED, That such compensation shall not
exceed ((six)) eight thousand ((seven)) six hundred ((twenty)) forty
dollars in one calendar year. Each supervisor shall be entitled to
reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection
with business, including subsistence and lodging while away from the
supervisor's place of residence and mileage for use of a privately
owned vehicle in accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW. All costs of
construction or maintenance done under the direction of the board of
supervisors shall be paid upon vouchers or payrolls verified by two of
the said supervisors. All costs of construction and all other
expenses, fees and charges on account of such improvement shall be paid
by warrants drawn by the county auditor upon the county treasurer upon
the proper fund, and shall draw interest at a rate determined by the
county legislative authority until paid or called by the county
treasurer as warrants of the county are called.
Any supervisor may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the supervisor's election and prior to the
date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 11 RCW 85.24.080 and 1998 c 121 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The members of the board may receive as compensation up to
((seventy)) ninety dollars for attendance at official meetings of the
district and for each day or major part thereof for all necessary
services actually performed in connection with their duties as
commissioners: PROVIDED, That such compensation shall not exceed
((six)) eight thousand ((seven)) six hundred ((twenty)) forty dollars
in one calendar year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the board may fix a
different salary for the secretary thereof in lieu of the per diem.
Each commissioner is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable expenses
actually incurred in connection with such business, including
subsistence and lodging, while away from the commissioner's place of
residence, and mileage for use of a privately owned vehicle in
accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW. The salary and expenses shall be
paid by the treasurer of the fund, upon orders made by the board. Each
member of the board must before being paid for expenses, take vouchers
therefore from the person or persons to whom the particular amount was
paid, and must also make affidavit that the amounts were necessarily
incurred and expended in the performance of his or her duties.
Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to
the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 12 RCW 86.09.283 and 1998 c 121 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of directors may each receive up to ((seventy)) ninety
dollars for attendance at official meetings of the board and for each
day or major part thereof for all necessary services actually performed
in connection with their duties as director. The board shall fix the
compensation to be paid to the directors, secretary, and all other
agents and employees of the district. Compensation for the directors
shall not exceed ((six)) eight thousand ((seven)) six hundred
((twenty)) forty dollars in one calendar year. A director is entitled
to reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred in
connection with such business, including subsistence and lodging, while
away from the director's place of residence, and mileage for use of a
privately owned vehicle in accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW.
Any director may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the director's election and prior to the
date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 13 RCW 87.03.460 and 1998 c 121 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to their reasonable expenses in accordance with chapter
42.24 RCW, the directors shall each receive an amount for attending
meetings and while performing other services for the district. The
amount shall be fixed by resolution and entered in the minutes of the
proceedings of the board. It shall not exceed ((seventy)) ninety
dollars for each day or portion thereof spent by a director for such
attendance or performance. The total amount of such additional
compensation received by a director may not exceed ((six)) eight
thousand ((seven)) six hundred ((twenty)) forty dollars in a calendar
year. The board shall fix the compensation of the secretary and all
other employees.
Any director may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the director's election and prior to the
date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 14 RCW 36.57A.050 and 1998 c 121 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within sixty days of the establishment of the boundaries of the
public transportation benefit area the members of the county
legislative authority and the elected representative of each city
within the area shall provide for the selection of the governing body
of such area, the public transportation benefit area authority, which
shall consist of elected officials selected by and serving at the
pleasure of the governing bodies of component cities within the area
and the county legislative authority of each county within the area.
If at the time a public transportation benefit area authority assumes
the public transportation functions previously provided under the
Interlocal Cooperation Act (chapter 39.34 RCW) there are citizen
positions on the governing board of the transit system, those positions
may be retained as positions on the governing board of the public
transportation benefit area authority.
Within such sixty-day period, any city may by resolution of its
legislative body withdraw from participation in the public
transportation benefit area. The county legislative authority and each
city remaining in the public transportation benefit area may disapprove
and prevent the establishment of any governing body of a public
transportation benefit area if the composition thereof does not meet
its approval.
In no case shall the governing body of a single county public
transportation benefit area be greater than nine members and in the
case of a multicounty area, fifteen members. Those cities within the
transportation benefit area and excluded from direct membership on the
authority are hereby authorized to designate a member of the authority
who shall be entitled to represent the interests of such city which is
excluded from direct membership on the authority. The legislative body
of such city shall notify the authority as to the determination of its
authorized representative on the authority.
Each member of the authority is eligible to be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and to
receive compensation, as set by the authority, in an amount not to
exceed forty-four dollars for each day during which the member attends
official meetings of the authority or performs prescribed duties
approved by the chairman of the authority. Except that the authority
may, by resolution, increase the payment of per diem compensation to
each member from forty-four dollars up to ((seventy)) ninety dollars
per day or portion of a day for attendance at board meetings and for
performance of other services on behalf of the authority. In no event
may a member be compensated in any year for more than seventy-five
days, except the chairman who may be paid compensation for not more
than one hundred days: PROVIDED, That compensation shall not be paid
to an elected official or employee of federal, state, or local
government who is receiving regular full-time compensation from such
government for attending meetings and performing prescribed duties of
the authority.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 15 RCW 85.38.075 and 1998 c 121 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The members of the governing body may each receive up to
((seventy)) ninety dollars for attendance at official meetings of the
governing body and for each day or major part thereof for all necessary
services actually performed in connection with their duties as a
member. The governing body shall fix the compensation to be paid to
the members, secretary, and all other agents and employees of the
district. Compensation for the members shall not exceed ((six)) eight
thousand ((seven)) six hundred ((twenty)) forty dollars in one calendar
year. A member is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable expenses
actually incurred in connection with such business, including
subsistence and lodging, while away from the member's place of
residence, and mileage for use of a privately owned vehicle in
accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW.
Any member may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation
payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her
term of office, by a written waiver filed with the secretary as
provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed
any time after the member's election and prior to the date on which the
compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the
month or period of months for which it is made.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending a meeting or conducting business while representing more
than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may
receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of
all boards of the affected commissions.

--- END ---