BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.865 and 2006 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
diesel fuel, ((or)) aircraft fuel ((as defined in RCW 82.42.010(5))),
or propane fuel, to a farm fuel user for nonhighway use. This
exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. Fuel used for space or water heating for human habitation
is not exempt under this section.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.213 and this subsection apply to
this section.
(a) "Aircraft fuel" is defined as provided in RCW 82.42.010.
(b) "Diesel fuel" is defined as provided in 26 U.S.C. 4083, as
amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2006.
(((b))) (c) "Farm fuel user" means: (i) A farmer; or (ii) a person
who provides horticultural services for farmers, such as soil
preparation services, crop cultivation services, and crop harvesting
services.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.865 and 2006 c 7 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
nonhighway use of diesel fuel, ((or)) aircraft fuel ((as defined in RCW
82.42.010(5))), or propane fuel, by a farm fuel user. Fuel used for
space or water heating for human habitation is not exempt under this
section.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.865 apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2007.

--- END ---