BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.15.020 and 2006 c 265 s 401, 2006 c 90 s 1, and
2006 c 54 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter and RCW 74.13.031, and unless
otherwise clearly indicated by the context thereof, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility which receives children, expectant mothers, or
persons with developmental disabilities for control, care, or
maintenance outside their own homes, or which places, arranges the
placement of, or assists in the placement of children, expectant
mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities for foster care or
placement of children for adoption, and shall include the following
irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency or to the
children, expectant mothers or persons with developmental disabilities
for services rendered:
(a) "Child-placing agency" means an agency which places a child or
children for temporary care, continued care, or for adoption;
(b) "Community facility" means a group care facility operated for
the care of juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185.
A county detention facility that houses juveniles committed to the
department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant to a contract with the
department is not a community facility;
(c) "Crisis residential center" means an agency which is a
temporary protective residential facility operated to perform the
duties specified in chapter 13.32A RCW, in the manner provided in RCW
74.13.032 through 74.13.036;
(d) "Emergency respite center" is an agency that may be commonly
known as a crisis nursery, that provides emergency and crisis care for
up to seventy-two hours to children who have been admitted by their
parents or guardians to prevent abuse or neglect. Emergency respite
centers may operate for up to twenty-four hours a day, and for up to
seven days a week. Emergency respite centers may provide care for
children ages birth through seventeen, and for persons eighteen through
twenty with developmental disabilities who are admitted with a sibling
or siblings through age seventeen. Emergency respite centers may not
substitute for crisis residential centers or HOPE centers, or any other
services defined under this section, and may not substitute for
services which are required under chapter 13.32A or 13.34 RCW;
(e) "Foster-family home" means an agency which regularly provides
care on a twenty-four hour basis to one or more children, expectant
mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities in the family abode
of the person or persons under whose direct care and supervision the
child, expectant mother, or person with a developmental disability is
placed;
(f) "Group-care facility" means an agency, other than a foster-family home, which is maintained and operated for the care of a group
of children on a twenty-four hour basis;
(g) "HOPE center" means an agency licensed by the secretary to
provide temporary residential placement and other services to street
youth. A street youth may remain in a HOPE center for thirty days
while services are arranged and permanent placement is coordinated. No
street youth may stay longer than thirty days unless approved by the
department and any additional days approved by the department must be
based on the unavailability of a long-term placement option. A street
youth whose parent wants him or her returned to home may remain in a
HOPE center until his or her parent arranges return of the youth, not
longer. All other street youth must have court approval under chapter
13.34 or 13.32A RCW to remain in a HOPE center up to thirty days;
(h) "Maternity service" means an agency which provides or arranges
for care or services to expectant mothers, before or during
confinement, or which provides care as needed to mothers and their
infants after confinement;
(i) "Responsible living skills program" means an agency licensed by
the secretary that provides residential and transitional living
services to persons ages sixteen to eighteen who are dependent under
chapter 13.34 RCW and who have been unable to live in his or her
legally authorized residence and, as a result, the minor lived outdoors
or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the minor.
Dependent minors ages fourteen and fifteen may be eligible if no other
placement alternative is available and the department approves the
placement;
(j) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community
facility.
(2) "Agency" shall not include the following:
(a) Persons related to the child, expectant mother, or person with
developmental disability in the following ways:
(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and
including first cousins, second cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons
of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or
great-great;
(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;
(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as
well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons,
and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state
law;
(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (2)(a), even after the marriage is terminated; ((or))
(v) Relatives, as named in (i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this
subsection (2)(a), of any half sibling of the child; or
(vi) Extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of
the Indian child's tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a
person who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian
child's grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law
or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or
stepparent who provides care in the family abode on a twenty-four-hour
basis to an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);
(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child, expectant mother,
or persons with developmental disabilities;
(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or
children, with or without compensation, where the parent and person
providing care on a twenty-four-hour basis have agreed to the placement
in writing and the state is not providing any payment for the care;
(d) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that
provides placement or similar services to exchange students or
international student exchange visitors or persons who have the care of
an exchange student in their home;
(e) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that
provides placement or similar services to international children who
have entered the country by obtaining visas that meet the criteria for
medical care as established by the United States immigration and
naturalization service, or persons who have the care of such an
international child in their home;
(f) Schools, including boarding schools, which are engaged
primarily in education, operate on a definite school year schedule,
follow a stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children
and do not accept custody of children;
(g) Hospitals licensed pursuant to chapter 70.41 RCW when
performing functions defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, nursing homes
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW and boarding homes licensed under
chapter 18.20 RCW;
(h) Licensed physicians or lawyers;
(i) Facilities approved and certified under chapter 71A.22 RCW;
(j) Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years
prior to June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or
assistance from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part
by an endowment or trust fund;
(k) Persons who have a child in their home for purposes of
adoption, if the child was placed in such home by a licensed child-
placing agency, an authorized public or tribal agency or court or if a
replacement report has been filed under chapter 26.33 RCW and the
placement has been approved by the court;
(l) An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal
government or an agency licensed by an Indian tribe pursuant to RCW
74.15.190;
(m) A maximum or medium security program for juvenile offenders
operated by or under contract with the department;
(n) An agency located on a federal military reservation, except
where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to
the licensing requirements of this chapter.
(3) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(4) "Family child care licensee" means a person who: (a) Provides
regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home of the
provider for periods of less than twenty-four hours or, if necessary
due to the nature of the parent's work, for periods equal to or greater
than twenty-four hours; (b) does not receive child care subsidies; and
(c) is licensed by the state under RCW 74.15.030.
(5) "Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has
been sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the
department under RCW 13.40.185.
(6) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary
measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but
is out of compliance with licensing standards.
(7) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard of care
to be maintained by an agency.
(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(9) "Street youth" means a person under the age of eighteen who
lives outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy
by the minor and who is not residing with his or her parent or at his
or her legally authorized residence.
(10) "Transitional living services" means at a minimum, to the
extent funds are available, the following:
(a) Educational services, including basic literacy and
computational skills training, either in local alternative or public
high schools or in a high school equivalency program that leads to
obtaining a high school equivalency degree;
(b) Assistance and counseling related to obtaining vocational
training or higher education, job readiness, job search assistance, and
placement programs;
(c) Counseling and instruction in life skills such as money
management, home management, consumer skills, parenting, health care,
access to community resources, and transportation and housing options;
(d) Individual and group counseling; and
(e) Establishing networks with federal agencies and state and local
organizations such as the United States department of labor, employment
and training administration programs including the job training
partnership act which administers private industry councils and the job
corps; vocational rehabilitation; and volunteer programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.130 and 2003 c 227 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
If, after a fact-finding hearing pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, it has
been proven by a preponderance of the evidence that the child is
dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030 after consideration of
the social study prepared pursuant to RCW 13.34.110 and after a
disposition hearing has been held pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, the court
shall enter an order of disposition pursuant to this section.
(1) The court shall order one of the following dispositions of the
case:
(a) Order a disposition other than removal of the child from his or
her home, which shall provide a program designed to alleviate the
immediate danger to the child, to mitigate or cure any damage the child
has already suffered, and to aid the parents so that the child will not
be endangered in the future. In determining the disposition, the court
should choose those services, including housing assistance, that least
interfere with family autonomy and are adequate to protect the child.
(b) Order the child to be removed from his or her home and into the
custody, control, and care of a relative or the department or a
licensed child placing agency for ((placement)) supervision of the
child's placement. The department or agency supervising the child's
placement has the authority to place the child, subject to review and
approval by the court (i) with a relative as defined in RCW
74.15.020(2)(a), (ii) in a foster family home or group care facility
licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW, or ((in a home not required to
be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW)) (iii) in the home of
another suitable person if the child or family has a preexisting
relationship with the individual, and the person has completed all
required criminal history background checks and otherwise appears to
the department or supervising agency to be suitable and competent to
provide care for the child. The department or supervising agency may
only place a child with a person not related to the child as defined in
RCW 74.15.020(2)(a) when the court finds that such placement is in the
best interest of the child. Placement of the child with a relative
under this subsection shall be given preference by the court. Unless
there is reasonable cause to believe that the health, safety, or
welfare of the child would be jeopardized or that efforts to reunite
the parent and child will be hindered, such child shall be placed with
a person who is: (i) Related to the child as defined in RCW
74.15.020(2)(a) with whom the child has a relationship and is
comfortable; and (ii) willing and available to care for the child.
(2) ((Placement of the child with a relative under this subsection
shall be given preference by the court.)) An order for out-of-home
placement may be made only if the court finds that reasonable efforts
have been made to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the
child from the child's home and to make it possible for the child to
return home, specifying the services that have been provided to the
child and the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and that
preventive services have been offered or provided and have failed to
prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health, safety,
and welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the home,
and that:
(a) There is no parent or guardian available to care for such
child;
(b) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian is not willing to take
custody of the child; or
(c) The court finds, by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, a
manifest danger exists that the child will suffer serious abuse or
neglect if the child is not removed from the home and an order under
RCW 26.44.063 would not protect the child from danger.
(3) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home
pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court shall consider
whether it is in a child's best interest to be placed with, have
contact with, or have visits with siblings.
(a) There shall be a presumption that such placement, contact, or
visits are in the best interests of the child provided that:
(i) The court has jurisdiction over all siblings subject to the
order of placement, contact, or visitation pursuant to petitions filed
under this chapter or the parents of a child for whom there is no
jurisdiction are willing to agree; and
(ii) There is no reasonable cause to believe that the health,
safety, or welfare of any child subject to the order of placement,
contact, or visitation would be jeopardized or that efforts to reunite
the parent and child would be hindered by such placement, contact, or
visitation. In no event shall parental visitation time be reduced in
order to provide sibling visitation.
(b) The court may also order placement, contact, or visitation of
a child with a step-brother or step-sister provided that in addition to
the factors in (a) of this subsection, the child has a relationship and
is comfortable with the step-sibling.
(4) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home
pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court may order that
a petition seeking termination of the parent and child relationship be
filed if the requirements of RCW 13.34.132 are met.
(5) If there is insufficient information at the time of the
disposition hearing upon which to base a determination regarding the
suitability of a proposed placement with a relative, the child shall
remain in foster care and the court shall direct the supervising agency
to conduct necessary background investigations as provided in chapter
74.15 RCW and report the results of such investigation to the court
within thirty days. However, if such relative appears otherwise
suitable and competent to provide care and treatment, the criminal
history background check need not be completed before placement, but as
soon as possible after placement. Any placements with relatives,
pursuant to this section, shall be contingent upon cooperation by the
relative with the agency case plan and compliance with court orders
related to the care and supervision of the child including, but not
limited to, court orders regarding parent-child contacts, sibling
contacts, and any other conditions imposed by the court. Noncompliance
with the case plan or court order shall be grounds for removal of the
child from the relative's home, subject to review by the court.

--- END ---