BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.35.040 and 2002 c 310 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for licensure as a hearing instrument
fitter/dispenser must have the following minimum qualifications and
shall pay a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW
43.70.250. An applicant shall be issued a license under the provisions
of this chapter if the applicant has not committed unprofessional
conduct as specified by chapter 18.130 RCW, and:
(a)(i) Satisfactorily completes the hearing instrument
fitter/dispenser examination required by this chapter; ((or)) and
(ii) Satisfactorily completes a minimum of a two-year degree
program in hearing instrument fitter/dispenser instruction. The
program must be approved by the board; or
(b) Holds a current, unsuspended, unrevoked license from another
jurisdiction if the standards for licensing in such other jurisdiction
are substantially equivalent to those prevailing in this state((;
(b) Satisfactorily completes a minimum of a two-year degree program
in hearing instrument fitter/dispenser instruction. The program must
be approved by the board; and
(c) Has not committed unprofessional conduct as specified by the
uniform disciplinary act)) as provided in (a) of this subsection; or
(c)(i) Holds a current, unsuspended, unrevoked license from another
jurisdiction, has been actively practicing as a licensed hearing aid
fitter/dispenser in another jurisdiction for at least forty-eight of
the last sixty months, and submits proof of completion of advance
certification from either the international hearing society or the
national board for certification in hearing instrument sciences; and
(ii) Satisfactorily completes the hearing instrument
fitter/dispenser examination required by this chapter or a
substantially equivalent examination approved by the board.
The applicant must present proof of qualifications to the board in
the manner and on forms prescribed by the secretary and proof of
completion of a minimum of four clock hours of AIDS education and
training pursuant to rules adopted by the board.
(2) An applicant for licensure as a speech-language pathologist or
audiologist must have the following minimum qualifications:
(a) Has not committed unprofessional conduct as specified by the
uniform disciplinary act;
(b) Has a master's degree or the equivalent, or a doctorate degree
or the equivalent, from a program at a board-approved institution of
higher learning, which includes completion of a supervised clinical
practicum experience as defined by rules adopted by the board; and
(c) Has completed postgraduate professional work experience
approved by the board.
All qualified applicants must satisfactorily complete the speech-language pathology or audiology examinations required by this chapter.
The applicant must present proof of qualifications to the board in
the manner and on forms prescribed by the secretary and proof of
completion of a minimum of four clock hours of AIDS education and
training pursuant to rules adopted by the board.

--- END ---