BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.050 and 2005 c 515 s 2 and 2005 c 514 s 101 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible
personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:
(a) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(b) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(c) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(d) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; (([or])) or
(e) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of tangible personal
property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the
performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as provided in
(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use. The
term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons
engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (((2)))
(1) and (((7))) (6), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908; or
(f) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or
for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities,
and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and shall also include the sale of services or charges
made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to
constructing, repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or
under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by
title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such
construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such
construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original
owner;
(d) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to the cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but shall not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and
all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel,
trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real
property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real
property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real property
for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same.
For the purposes of this subsection, it shall be presumed that the sale
of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous
period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real
property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property,
labor and services to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e),
and (f) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property,
labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by
such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at
retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services
may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection shall be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term shall also include:
(i) The renting or leasing of tangible personal property to
consumers; and
(ii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this
is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to
perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (4)(a)(ii), an
operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible
personal property.
(b) The term shall not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term shall also include the providing of telephone service,
as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6) The term shall also include the sale of prewritten computer
software other than a sale to a person who presents a resale
certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery
to the end user, but shall not include custom software or the
customization of prewritten computer software.
(7) The term shall also include the sale of or charge made for an
extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection,
"extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to
perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property,
labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or
repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of
specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an
agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in
this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and
the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the
tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of
this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.010.
(8) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(9) The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state department of
fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that
the farmer owns or leases.
(10) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for
labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development.
(11) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for
labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements
providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway
equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the
labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency,
as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.250 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person ((except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260
(5) or (13), 82.04.272, or subsection (2) of this section)) engaging
within this state in the business of making sales at retail, including
any person making sales at retail of tangible personal property that it
has printed or published, and except persons explicitly taxable under
other provisions of this chapter on the business of making sales at
retail, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (11), as
to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.250 and 2006 c 177 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail, including any person making sales at retail of
tangible personal property that it has printed or published, and except
persons explicitly taxable ((as retailers)) under other provisions of
this chapter on the business of making sales at retail, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(11) or
subsection (3) of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(3) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, that is classified by the federal aviation administration
as a FAR part 145 certificated repair station with airframe and
instrument ratings and limited ratings for nondestructive testing,
radio, Class 3 Accessory, and specialized services, as to such persons,
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of
.2904 percent.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.270 and 2004 c 24 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at wholesale, including any person making sales at
wholesale of tangible personal property that it has printed or
published, and except persons explicitly taxable ((as wholesalers))
under other provisions of this chapter on the business of making sales
at wholesale; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of such business
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.120 and 2003 c 168 s 604 are each amended to
read as follows:
"To manufacture" embraces all activities of a commercial or
industrial nature wherein labor or skill is applied, by hand or
machinery, to materials so that as a result thereof a new, different or
useful substance or article of tangible personal property is produced
for sale or commercial or industrial use, and shall include: (1) The
production or fabrication of special made or custom made articles; (2)
the production or fabrication of dental appliances, devices,
restorations, substitutes, or other dental laboratory products by a
dental laboratory or dental technician; (3) cutting, delimbing, and
measuring of felled, cut, or taken trees; ((and)) (4) crushing and/or
blending of rock, sand, stone, gravel, or ore; and (5) printing.
"To manufacture" shall not include: Conditioning of seed for use
in planting; cubing hay or alfalfa; activities which consist of
cutting, grading, or ice glazing seafood which has been cooked, frozen,
or canned outside this state; the growing, harvesting, or producing of
agricultural products; packing of agricultural products, including
sorting, washing, rinsing, grading, waxing, treating with fungicide,
packaging, chilling, or placing in controlled atmospheric storage; or
the production of computer software if the computer software is
delivered from the seller to the purchaser by means other than tangible
storage media, including the delivery by use of a tangible storage
media where the tangible storage media is not physically transferred to
the purchaser.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.240 and 2004 c 24 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
manufacturer, including any person that manufactures by printing, and
except persons explicitly taxable ((as manufacturers)) under other
provisions of this chapter on engaging in business as a manufacturer;
as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the value of the products, including byproducts,
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including
byproducts, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact
that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.04.240 and 2003 c 149 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
manufacturer, including any person that manufacturers by printing, and
except persons explicitly taxable ((as manufacturers)) under other
provisions of this chapter on engaging in business as a manufacturer;
as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the value of the products, including byproducts,
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing semiconductor materials, as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of manufacturers,
be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or, in the case of
processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. For the purposes of this
subsection "semiconductor materials" means silicon crystals, silicon
ingots, raw polished semiconductor wafers, compound semiconductors,
integrated circuits, and microchips. This subsection (2) expires
twelve years after the effective date of ((this act)) chapter 149, Laws
of 2003.
(3) The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including
byproducts, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact
that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
publishing newspapers or periodicals; as to such persons, the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross
publishing income multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(2) Eligible publishers are entitled to a credit against the tax
imposed under this section. The amount of the credit is equal to the
amount of manufacturing tax imposed on the person for manufacturing the
printed material in respect to which tax is imposed under this section
on the publishing of such material. The amount of the credit shall not
exceed the amount of tax otherwise due under this section with respect
to the publishing of the printed material.
(3)(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Eligible publisher" means any person: (A) Taxable under this
section on the activity of publishing a newspaper or periodical; (B)
that is also subject to a manufacturing tax on the activity of printing
such newspaper or periodical; and (C) that does not make retail or
wholesale sales of such newspaper or periodical.
(ii) "Gross publishing income" means the gross income derived from
publishing activities other than selling printed materials, and
includes items such as advertising.
(iii) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, including
the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.240 and similar gross receipts taxes
imposed by other states.
(iv) "Newspaper" includes only a printed publication issued
regularly at stated intervals at least twice a month and printed on
newsprint in tabloid or broadsheet format folded loosely together
without stapling, glue, or any other binding of any kind, including any
supplement or special edition of the publication.
(v) "Periodical" includes only a printed publication, including a
magazine, issued regularly at stated intervals at least once every
three months, including any supplement or special edition of the
publication. "Periodical" does not include a newspaper.
(vi) "Supplement" means a printed publication distributed within
the circulation area of the publication to which it supplements, either
with or apart from such publication. To qualify as a supplement, a
publication distributed apart from the publication to which it
supplements must be clearly and consistently identified as a supplement
of such other publication.
(b) "Periodical" and "newspaper" do not include advertising
publications or materials. For purposes of this subsection (3)(b),
"advertising publications or materials" includes telephone or other
directories; catalogs; advertising leaflets, fliers, or circulars; real
estate guides; coupons; order forms; classified ad publications; and
similar publications or materials. "Advertising publications or
materials" does not include supplements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Gross income derived from publishing, distributing, or displaying
advertising publications or materials excluded from the definitions of
"newspaper" and "periodical" in section 8(3)(b) of this act, other than
income from the sale of tangible personal property, and including
income from the sale of advertising, is taxable under RCW 82.04.290(2).

Sec. 10 RCW 82.04.460 and 2004 c 174 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person
((rendering services)) engaging in business activities in this state
taxable under RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908, and ((maintaining places of
business both within and without this state which contribute to the
rendition of such services)) engaging in business activities outside
this state that contribute more than incidentally to such in-state
activities, shall, for the purpose of computing tax liability under RCW
82.04.290 or 82.04.2908, apportion to this state that portion of the
person's gross income ((which is)) derived from ((services rendered))
business activities performed within this state. Where such
apportionment cannot be accurately made by separate accounting methods,
the taxpayer shall apportion to this state that proportion of the
taxpayer's total income which the cost of doing business within the
state bears to the total cost of doing business both within and without
the state.
(2) ((Notwithstanding the provision of subsection (1) of this
section,)) Persons doing business both within and without the state who
receive gross income from service charges, as defined in RCW 63.14.010
(relating to amounts charged for granting the right or privilege to
make deferred or installment payments) or who receive gross income from
engaging in business as financial institutions within the scope of
chapter 82.14A RCW (relating to city taxes on financial institutions)
shall apportion or allocate gross income taxable under RCW 82.04.290 to
this state pursuant to rules promulgated by the department consistent
with uniform rules for apportionment or allocation developed by the
states.
(3) The department shall by rule provide a method or methods of
apportioning or allocating gross income derived from sales of telephone
services taxed under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales
subject to tax under this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of
the taxpayer's income attributable to this state. The rules shall be,
so far as feasible, consistent with the methods of apportionment
contained in this section and shall require the consideration of those
facts, circumstances, and apportionment factors as will result in an
equitable and constitutionally permissible division of the services.
(4) Persons doing business both within and without the state who
receive gross publishing income taxable under section 8 of this act
shall apportion or allocate income taxable under section 8 of this act
to this state as provided by the department by rule. In adopting any
rule for the apportionment of gross publishing income, the department
shall be guided by uniform rules for apportionment or allocation
developed by the states. The department shall also give due
consideration to the complexity of the apportionment or allocation
methods, and in particular, their effect on small businesses.
(5) Activities performed outside the state contribute more than
incidentally to in-state activities only to the extent that such
out-of-state activities would subject the taxpayer to the tax in this
chapter if performed in this state.

Sec. 11 RCW 34.05.328 and 2003 c 165 s 2 and 2003 c 39 s 13 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Before adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency shall:
(a) Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific
objectives of the statute that the rule implements;
(b) Determine that the rule is needed to achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection, and
analyze alternatives to rule making and the consequences of not
adopting the rule;
(c) Provide notification in the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320 that a preliminary cost-benefit analysis is
available. The preliminary cost-benefit analysis must fulfill the
requirements of the cost-benefit analysis under (d) of this subsection.
If the agency files a supplemental notice under RCW 34.05.340, the
supplemental notice shall include notification that a revised
preliminary cost-benefit analysis is available. A final cost-benefit
analysis shall be available when the rule is adopted under RCW
34.05.360;
(d) Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater
than its probable costs, taking into account both the qualitative and
quantitative benefits and costs and the specific directives of the
statute being implemented;
(e) Determine, after considering alternative versions of the rule
and the analysis required under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection,
that the rule being adopted is the least burdensome alternative for
those required to comply with it that will achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection;
(f) Determine that the rule does not require those to whom it
applies to take an action that violates requirements of another federal
or state law;
(g) Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent
performance requirements on private entities than on public entities
unless required to do so by federal or state law;
(h) Determine if the rule differs from any federal regulation or
statute applicable to the same activity or subject matter and, if so,
determine that the difference is justified by the following:
(i) A state statute that explicitly allows the agency to differ
from federal standards; or
(ii) Substantial evidence that the difference is necessary to
achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of
this subsection; and
(i) Coordinate the rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with
other federal, state, and local laws applicable to the same activity or
subject matter.
(2) In making its determinations pursuant to subsection (1)(b)
through (h) of this section, the agency shall place in the rule-making
file documentation of sufficient quantity and quality so as to persuade
a reasonable person that the determinations are justified.
(3) Before adopting rules described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency shall place in the rule-making file a rule
implementation plan for rules filed under each adopting order. The
plan shall describe how the agency intends to:
(a) Implement and enforce the rule, including a description of the
resources the agency intends to use;
(b) Inform and educate affected persons about the rule;
(c) Promote and assist voluntary compliance; and
(d) Evaluate whether the rule achieves the purpose for which it was
adopted, including, to the maximum extent practicable, the use of
interim milestones to assess progress and the use of objectively
measurable outcomes.
(4) After adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section regulating the same activity or subject matter as another
provision of federal or state law, an agency shall do all of the
following:
(a) Provide to the business assistance center a list citing by
reference the other federal and state laws that regulate the same
activity or subject matter;
(b) Coordinate implementation and enforcement of the rule with the
other federal and state entities regulating the same activity or
subject matter by making every effort to do one or more of the
following:
(i) Deferring to the other entity;
(ii) Designating a lead agency; or
(iii) Entering into an agreement with the other entities specifying
how the agency and entities will coordinate implementation and
enforcement.
If the agency is unable to comply with this subsection (4)(b), the
agency shall report to the legislature pursuant to (c) of this
subsection;
(c) Report to the joint administrative rules review committee:
(i) The existence of any overlap or duplication of other federal or
state laws, any differences from federal law, and any known overlap,
duplication, or conflict with local laws; and
(ii) Make recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary
to eliminate or mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap,
duplication, or difference.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this section
applies to:
(i) Significant legislative rules of the departments of ecology,
labor and industries, health, revenue, social and health services, and
natural resources, the employment security department, the forest
practices board, the office of the insurance commissioner, and to the
legislative rules of the department of fish and wildlife implementing
chapter 77.55 RCW; and
(ii) Any rule of any agency, if this section is voluntarily made
applicable to the rule by the agency, or is made applicable to the rule
by a majority vote of the joint administrative rules review committee
within forty-five days of receiving the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(i) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(ii) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that
are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;
(iii) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes,
rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs
other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(iv) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect;
(v) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute;
(vi) Rules that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative
standards; ((or))
(vii) Rules of the department of social and health services
relating only to client medical or financial eligibility and rules
concerning liability for care of dependents; or
(viii) Rules of the department of revenue relating only to the
apportionment of gross publishing income as provided in RCW
82.04.460(4).
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) A "procedural rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals
(A) any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to any agency
hearings; (B) any filing or related process requirement for making
application to an agency for a license or permit; or (C) any policy
statement pertaining to the consistent internal operations of an
agency.
(ii) An "interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does
not subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the
agency's interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.
(iii) A "significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a
procedural or interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions
of law pursuant to delegated legislative authority, the violation of
which subjects a violator of such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B)
establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification or standard for the
issuance, suspension, or revocation of a license or permit; or (C)
adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a policy or
regulatory program.
(d) In the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an
agency shall state whether this section applies to the proposed rule
pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection, or if the agency will apply this
section voluntarily.
(6) By January 31, 1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered
year thereafter, the office of financial management, after consulting
with state agencies, counties, and cities, and business, labor, and
environmental organizations, shall report to the governor and the
legislature regarding the effects of this section on the regulatory
system in this state. The report shall document:
(a) The rules proposed to which this section applied and to the
extent possible, how compliance with this section affected the
substance of the rule, if any, that the agency ultimately adopted;
(b) The costs incurred by state agencies in complying with this
section;
(c) Any legal action maintained based upon the alleged failure of
any agency to comply with this section, the costs to the state of such
action, and the result;
(d) The extent to which this section has adversely affected the
capacity of agencies to fulfill their legislatively prescribed mission;
(e) The extent to which this section has improved the acceptability
of state rules to those regulated; and
(f) Any other information considered by the office of financial
management to be useful in evaluating the effect of this section.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.04.280 and 2006 c 300 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of:
(1) ((Printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or
magazines; (2))) Building, repairing or improving any street, place,
road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation
terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned
by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by
the United States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot
or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind
and including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the
facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or
railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the
cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the
responsibility of the public authority whose street, place, road,
highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or
parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired
or improved; (((3))) (2) extracting for hire or processing for hire,
except persons taxable as extractors for hire or processors for hire
under another section of this chapter; (((4))) (3) operating a cold
storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not including the rental of
cold storage lockers; (((5))) (4) representing and performing services
for fire or casualty insurance companies as an independent resident
managing general agent licensed under the provisions of RCW 48.05.310;
(((6))) (5) radio and television broadcasting, excluding network,
national and regional advertising computed as a standard deduction
based on the national average thereof as annually reported by the
Federal Communications Commission, or in lieu thereof by itemization by
the individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of
revenue represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to
the station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal
strength and delivery by wire, if any; (((7))) (6) engaging in
activities which bring a person within the definition of consumer
contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on
such business shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
As used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
As used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise
are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses,
fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage
areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a
building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
((As used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated
intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or
special edition of the publication.))

Sec. 13 RCW 82.04.280 and 2006 c 300 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of:
(1) ((Printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or
magazines; (2))) Building, repairing or improving any street, place,
road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation
terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned
by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by
the United States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot
or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind
and including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the
facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or
railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the
cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the
responsibility of the public authority whose street, place, road,
highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or
parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired
or improved; (((3))) (2) extracting for hire or processing for hire,
except persons taxable as extractors for hire or processors for hire
under another section of this chapter; (((4))) (3) operating a cold
storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not including the rental of
cold storage lockers; (((5))) (4) representing and performing services
for fire or casualty insurance companies as an independent resident
managing general agent licensed under the provisions of RCW 48.05.310;
(((6))) (5) radio and television broadcasting, excluding network,
national and regional advertising computed as a standard deduction
based on the national average thereof as annually reported by the
Federal Communications Commission, or in lieu thereof by itemization by
the individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of
revenue represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to
the station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal
strength and delivery by wire, if any; (((7))) (6) engaging in
activities which bring a person within the definition of consumer
contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on
such business shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
As used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
As used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise
are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses,
fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage
areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a
building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
((As used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated
intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or
special edition of the publication.))

Sec. 14 RCW 82.08.0253 and 1980 c 37 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to the distribution
and newsstand sale of newspapers. For the purposes of this section,
"newspaper" has the same meaning as in section 8 of this act.

Sec. 15 RCW 82.08.806 and 2004 c 8 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales, to a
printer or publisher, of computer equipment, including repair parts and
replacement parts for such equipment, when the computer equipment is
used primarily in the printing or publishing of any printed material,
or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
computer equipment. This exemption applies only to computer equipment
not otherwise exempt under RCW 82.08.02565.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. This exemption is available only when the purchaser provides
the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection (3) apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Computer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(b) "Computer equipment" means a computer and the associated
physical components that constitute a computer system, including
monitors, keyboards, printers, modems, scanners, pointing devices, and
other computer peripheral equipment, cables, servers, and routers.
"Computer equipment" also includes digital cameras and computer
software.
(c) "Computer software" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(d) "Primarily" means greater than fifty percent as measured by
time.
(e) "Printer or publisher" means a person, as defined in RCW
82.04.030, who is subject to tax under: (i) RCW ((82.04.280(1)))
82.04.240 on the activity of manufacturing by printing; or (ii) section
8 of this act on the activity of publishing a newspaper or periodical
as those terms are defined in that section.
(4) "Computer equipment" does not include computer equipment that
is used primarily for administrative purposes including but not limited
to payroll processing, accounting, customer service, telemarketing, and
collection. If computer equipment is used simultaneously for
administrative and nonadministrative purposes, the administrative use
shall be disregarded during the period of simultaneous use for purposes
of determining whether the computer equipment is used primarily for
administrative purposes.

Sec. 16 RCW 82.08.820 and 2006 c 354 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
on:
(a) Material-handling and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment; or
(b) Construction of a warehouse or grain elevator, including
materials, and including service and labor costs,
are eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount
of the remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this section and
is based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;
(b) "Cold storage warehouse" has the meaning provided in RCW
82.74.010;
(c) "Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion if the expansion adds at least
twenty-five thousand square feet of additional space to an existing
cold storage warehouse, at least two hundred thousand square feet of
additional space to an existing warehouse other than a cold storage
warehouse, or additional storage capacity of at least one million
bushels to an existing grain elevator. "Construction" does not include
renovation, remodeling, or repair;
(d) "Department" means the department of revenue;
(e) "Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used
exclusively by a retailer solely for the storage and distribution of
finished goods to retail outlets of the retailer. "Distribution
center" does not include a warehouse at which retail sales occur;
(f) "Finished goods" means tangible personal property intended for
sale by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does not include
agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party warehouses, or
retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the person who
produced the agricultural product. "Finished goods" does not include
logs, minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products stored as
raw materials or in bulk;
(g) "Grain elevator" means a structure used for storage and
handling of grain in bulk;
(h) "Material-handling equipment and racking equipment" means
equipment in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used to
handle, store, organize, convey, package, or repackage finished goods.
The term includes tangible personal property with a useful life of one
year or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment,
including repair and replacement parts. The term does not include
equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space,
within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used for
nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes but is
not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized
systems, including containers that are an integral part of the system,
whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers
that control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal
property; and forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used
to lift or move tangible personal property and that cannot be operated
legally on roads and streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not
limited to, conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers,
pallets, and other containers and storage devices that form a necessary
part of the storage system;
(i) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;
(j) "Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;
(k) "Square footage" means the product of the two horizontal
dimensions of each floor of a specific warehouse. The entire footprint
of the warehouse shall be measured in calculating the square footage,
including space that juts out from the building profile such as loading
docks. "Square footage" does not mean the aggregate of the square
footage of more than one warehouse at a location or the aggregate of
the square footage of warehouses at more than one location;
(l) "Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under RCW
82.04.280(((4))) (3);
(m) "Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in which
finished goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may have
more than one storage room and more than one floor. Office space,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other space within the warehouse and
necessary for the operation of the warehouse are considered part of the
warehouse as are loading docks and other such space attached to the
building and used for handling of finished goods. Landscaping and
parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A storage yard
is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and
(n) "Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at wholesale" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property, but
"wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales exempt under RCW
82.04.330.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the department for remittance
of all or part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. For grain
elevators with bushel capacity of one million but less than two
million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or
more, other than cold storage warehouses, and for grain elevators with
bushel capacity of two million or more, the remittance is equal to one
hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying construction,
materials, service, and labor, and fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment,
and labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment. For cold storage
warehouses with square footage of twenty-five thousand or more, the
remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid
for qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor, and one
hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment;
location and size of warehouses and grain elevators; and construction
invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications during the
previous quarter.
(4) Warehouses, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment
and racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has
been or is being received under chapter 82.60, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or
RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any remittance
under this section. Warehouses and grain elevators upon which
construction was initiated before May 20, 1997, are not eligible for a
remittance under this section.
(5) The lessor or owner of a warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance under this section unless the underlying
ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and the material-handling
equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in the same person,
or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

Sec. 17 RCW 82.08.820 and 2006 c 354 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
on:
(a) Material-handling and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment; or
(b) Construction of a warehouse or grain elevator, including
materials, and including service and labor costs,
are eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount
of the remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this section and
is based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;
(b) "Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion if the expansion adds at least two
hundred thousand square feet of additional space to an existing
warehouse or additional storage capacity of at least one million
bushels to an existing grain elevator. "Construction" does not include
renovation, remodeling, or repair;
(c) "Department" means the department of revenue;
(d) "Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used
exclusively by a retailer solely for the storage and distribution of
finished goods to retail outlets of the retailer. "Distribution
center" does not include a warehouse at which retail sales occur;
(e) "Finished goods" means tangible personal property intended for
sale by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does not include
agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party warehouses, or
retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the person who
produced the agricultural product. "Finished goods" does not include
logs, minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products stored as
raw materials or in bulk;
(f) "Grain elevator" means a structure used for storage and
handling of grain in bulk;
(g) "Material-handling equipment and racking equipment" means
equipment in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used to
handle, store, organize, convey, package, or repackage finished goods.
The term includes tangible personal property with a useful life of one
year or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment,
including repair and replacement parts. The term does not include
equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space,
within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used for
nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes but is
not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized
systems, including containers that are an integral part of the system,
whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers
that control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal
property; and forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used
to lift or move tangible personal property and that cannot be operated
legally on roads and streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not
limited to, conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers,
pallets, and other containers and storage devices that form a necessary
part of the storage system;
(h) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;
(i) "Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;
(j) "Square footage" means the product of the two horizontal
dimensions of each floor of a specific warehouse. The entire footprint
of the warehouse shall be measured in calculating the square footage,
including space that juts out from the building profile such as loading
docks. "Square footage" does not mean the aggregate of the square
footage of more than one warehouse at a location or the aggregate of
the square footage of warehouses at more than one location;
(k) "Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under RCW
82.04.280(((4))) (3);
(l) "Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in which
finished goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may have
more than one storage room and more than one floor. Office space,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other space within the warehouse and
necessary for the operation of the warehouse are considered part of the
warehouse as are loading docks and other such space attached to the
building and used for handling of finished goods. Landscaping and
parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A storage yard
is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and
(m) "Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at wholesale" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property, but
"wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales exempt under RCW
82.04.330.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the department for remittance
of all or part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. For grain
elevators with bushel capacity of one million but less than two
million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or
more and for grain elevators with bushel capacity of two million or
more, the remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor,
and fifty percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment;
location and size of warehouses and grain elevators; and construction
invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications during the
previous quarter.
(4) Warehouses, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment
and racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has
been or is being received under chapter 82.60, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or
RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any remittance
under this section. Warehouses and grain elevators upon which
construction was initiated before May 20, 1997, are not eligible for a
remittance under this section.
(5) The lessor or owner of a warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance under this section unless the underlying
ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and the material-handling
equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in the same person,
or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

Sec. 18 RCW 82.12.020 and 2005 c 514 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from every
person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within
this state as a consumer: (a) Any article of tangible personal
property purchased at retail, or acquired by lease, gift, repossession,
or bailment, or extracted or produced or manufactured by the person so
using the same, or otherwise furnished to a person engaged in any
business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (((2))) (1) or (((7))) (6); (b)
any prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of delivery,
but excluding prewritten computer software that is either provided free
of charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing information, or
both; or (c) any extended warranty.
(2) This tax shall apply to the use of every extended warranty,
service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), and
the use of every article of tangible personal property, including
property acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including
byproducts used by the manufacturer thereof, except as hereinafter
provided, irrespective of whether the article or similar articles are
manufactured or are available for purchase within this state.
(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or
service taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), purchased at
retail or acquired by lease, gift, or bailment if the sale to, or the
use by, the present user or his bailor or donor has already been
subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the
tax has been paid by the present user or by his bailor or donor.
(4) Except as provided in this section, payment by one purchaser or
user of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or service of
the tax imposed by chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall not have the effect
of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property, extended
warranty, or service from the taxes imposed by such chapters. If the
sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her bailor or donor
has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this
chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by his or her
bailor or donor; or in respect to the use of property acquired by
bailment and the tax has once been paid based on reasonable rental as
determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value of the article at
time of first use multiplied by the tax rate imposed by chapter 82.08
RCW or this chapter as of the time of first use; or in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by bailment,
if the property was acquired by a previous bailee from the same bailor
for use in the same general activity and the original bailment was
prior to June 9, 1961, the tax imposed by this chapter does not apply.
(5) The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
value of the article used, value of the extended warranty used, or
value of the service used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rates in
effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020, except in the case
of a seller required to collect use tax from the purchaser, the tax
shall be collected in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied
by the rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

Sec. 19 2006 c 300 s 12 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) This act ((and)), section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and
sections 7 and 13, chapter ..., Laws of 2007 (sections 7 and 13 of this
act) are contingent upon the siting and commercial operation of a
significant semiconductor microchip fabrication facility in the state
of Washington.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of
commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.
(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing
semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.
(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings
and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement
of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.
(2) This act takes effect the first day of the month in which a
contract for the construction of a significant semiconductor
fabrication facility is signed, as determined by the director of the
department of revenue.
(3)(a) The department of revenue shall provide notice of the
effective date of this act to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and
others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been
signed and this act is effective, the department discovers that
commencement of commercial production did not take place within three
years of the date the contract was signed, the department shall make a
determination that this act is no longer effective, and all taxes that
would have been otherwise due shall be deemed deferred taxes and are
immediately assessed and payable from any person reporting tax under
RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit under section 2 or
5 through 10 of this act. The department is not authorized to make a
second determination regarding the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 RCW 82.04.214 ("Newspaper") and 1994 c 22
s 1 & 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 304 are each repealed.

Sec. 21 RCW 35.102.150 and 2006 c 272 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 35.102.130, a city that imposes a business and
occupation tax shall allocate a person's gross income from the
activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers((,)) or
periodicals((, or magazines)), to the principal place in this state
from which the taxpayer's business is directed or managed. As used in
this section, the activities of printing, and of publishing
newspapers((,)) or periodicals((, or magazines)), have the same
meanings as attributed to those terms in RCW ((82.04.280(1))) 82.04.240
and section 8 of this act by the department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this
section, this act takes effect January 1, 2008.
(2) Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2011.
(3) Sections 7 and 13 of this act take effect if the contingency in
section 19 of this act occurs.
(4) Section 17 of this act takes effect July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 Sections 6 and 12 of this act expire if the
contingency in section 19 of this act occurs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Section 16 of this act expires July 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---