BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Because of the uncertainty regarding the
constitutional limitations on the taxation of import and export sales
of tangible personal property, the legislature recognizes the need to
provide clarity in the taxation of imports and exports. It is the
legislature's intent to provide a statutory tax exemption for the sale
of tangible personal property in import or export commerce, which is
not dependent on future interpretation of the constitutional
limitations on the taxation of imports and exports by the courts. The
sole purpose of the legislature in enacting sections 2 and 3 of this
act is to codify current department practice in the taxation of import
and export sales of tangible personal property consistent with WAC
458-20-193C. It is not the intent of the legislature in enacting
sections 2 and 3 of this act to eliminate, narrow, or expand existing
exemptions under WAC 458-20-193C.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to the sale of tangible personal
property in import or export commerce.
(2) Tangible personal property is in import commerce while the
property is in the process of import transportation. Except as
provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection, property is in the
process of import transportation from the time the property begins its
transportation at a point outside of the United States until the time
that the property is delivered to the buyer in this state. Property is
also in the process of import transportation if it is merely flowing
through this state on its way to a destination in some other state or
country. However, property is no longer in the process of import
transportation when the property is:
(a) Put to actual use in any state, territory, or possession of the
United States for any purpose;
(b) Resold by the importer or any other person after the property
has arrived in this state or any other state, territory, or possession
of the United States, regardless of whether the property is in its
original unbroken package or container; or
(c) Processed, handled, or otherwise stopped in transit for a
business purpose other than shipping needs, if the processing, handling
or other stoppage of transit occurs within the United States, including
any of its possessions or territories, or the territorial waters of
this state or any other state, regardless of whether the processing,
handling, or other stoppage of transit occurs within a foreign trade
zone.
(3)(a) Tangible personal property is in export commerce when the
seller delivers the property to:
(i) The buyer at a destination in a foreign country;
(ii) A carrier consigned to and for transportation to a destination
in a foreign country;
(iii) The buyer at shipside or aboard the buyer's vessel or other
vehicle of transportation under circumstances where it is clear that
the process of exportation of the property has begun; or
(iv) The buyer in this state if the property is capable of being
transported to a foreign destination under its own power, the seller
files a shipper's export declaration with respect to the property
listing the seller as the exporter, and the buyer immediately
transports the property directly to a destination in a foreign country.
This subsection (3)(a)(iv) does not apply to sales of motor vehicles as
defined in RCW 46.04.320.
(b) The exemption under this subsection (3) applies with respect to
property delivered to the buyer in this state if, at the time of
delivery, there is a certainty of export, and the process of export has
begun. The process of exportation will not be deemed to have begun if
the property is merely in storage awaiting shipment, even though there
is reasonable certainty that the property will be exported. The
intention to export, as evidenced for example, by financial and
contractual relationships does not indicate certainty of export. The
process of exportation begins when the property starts its final and
certain continuous movement to a destination in a foreign country.
(4) Persons claiming an exemption under this section must keep and
maintain records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
their right to the exemption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
tangible personal property if the sale is exempt from business and
occupation tax under section 2 of this act.

--- END ---