BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that the
practices of body modification involve an invasive procedure with the
use of needles, single-use disposable sharps, reusable sharps,
instruments, and jewelry. These practices may be dangerous when
improperly sterilized, presenting a risk of infecting the client with
bloodborne pathogens including, but not limited to, HIV, hepatitis B,
and hepatitis C. It is in the interests of the public health, safety,
and welfare to establish requirements in the commercial practice of
body piercing in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 1 and 3
through 5 of this act and RCW 5.40.050 unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Body modification" means the practice of physical cosmetic
body adornment including body piercing and the use of branding and
scarification. "Body modification" also includes the intentional
production of scars upon the body. "Body modification" does not
include any health-related procedures performed by licensed health
practitioners under their scope of practice.
(2) "Body piercing" means the process of penetrating the skin or
mucous membrane for the purpose of insertion of an object, including
jewelry, for cosmetic purposes. "Body piercing" also includes any scar
tissue resulting from or relating to the piercing. "Body piercing"
does not include any health-related procedures performed by licensed
health practitioners under their scope of practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary of health shall adopt by rule requirements for
standard precautions, as recommended by the United States centers for
disease control and prevention, for preventing the spread of disease
and the sterilization of needles, single-use disposable sharps,
reusable sharps, instruments, and jewelry used by a person who
practices body modification in accordance with the standards of the
American national standards institute and the association for the
advancement of medical instrumentation for table-top steam sterilizers
in office sterilization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who practices body modification must comply with the
rules adopted by the secretary of health under section 3 of this act.
(2) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 5 RCW 5.40.050 and 2001 c 194 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A breach of a duty imposed by statute, ordinance, or administrative
rule shall not be considered negligence per se, but may be considered
by the trier of fact as evidence of negligence; however, any breach of
duty as provided by statute, ordinance, or administrative rule relating
to electrical fire safety, the use of smoke alarms, sterilization of
needles and instruments used in tattooing or electrology as required
under RCW 70.54.350, standard precautions for preventing the spread of
disease and sterilization of needles, single-use disposable sharps,
reusable sharps, instruments, and jewelry used in body modification as
required under section 3 of this act, or driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, shall be considered
negligence per se.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department of health shall conduct
a study of the body modification profession and make recommendations to
the legislature as to whether the professions should be regulated, and
to what extent, for the purpose of protecting the public interest under
the criteria set forth in RCW 18.120.030.
(2) The department shall submit a report detailing its finding and
recommendations under this section to the appropriate legislative
committees by January 1, 2009.

--- END ---