BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Any evergreen tree, including any fir, pine, spruce, cedar, or
other coniferous species, placed or located in the rotunda of the state
capitol building during the month of December is designated as the
official Christmas tree of the state of Washington.

--- END ---