BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that youth temporarily
detained in county detention facilities are often in need of medical or
mental health services. The legislature intends to use an opportunity
in federal law to provide medicaid funded services for medicaid
eligible youth temporarily detained in these facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
In determining payment for services under medicaid, Title XIX of
the federal social security act, the department shall interpret 42
C.F.R. 435.1008 and 42 C.F.R. 435.1009 to allow payment for services on
behalf of a medicaid enrolled youth who is temporarily placed in a
juvenile detention facility. Temporary placement shall be defined as
until adjudication or up to sixty continuous days, whichever occurs
first.

--- END ---