BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.27.020 and 1997 c 314 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every contractor shall register with the department.
(2) It is a misdemeanor for any contractor to:
(a) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor without being registered as required by this chapter;
(b) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor when the contractor's registration is suspended or
revoked;
(c) Use a false or expired registration number in purchasing or
offering to purchase an advertisement for which a contractor
registration number is required; or
(d) Transfer a valid registration to an unregistered contractor or
allow an unregistered contractor to work under a registration issued to
another contractor.
(3) It is a gross misdemeanor for any contractor to use the
registration number of another contractor to advertise, offer to do
work, submit a bid, or perform any work as a contractor.
(4) It is not unlawful for a general contractor to employ an
unregistered contractor who was registered at the time he or she
entered into a contract with the general contractor, unless the general
contractor or his or her representative has been notified in writing by
the department of labor and industries that the contractor has become
unregistered.
(((4))) (5) All misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor actions under
this chapter shall be prosecuted in the county where the ((infraction))
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor occurs.
(((5))) (6) A person is guilty of a separate misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor for each day worked if, after the person receives a
citation from the department, the person works while unregistered, or
while his or her registration is suspended or revoked, or works under
a registration issued to another contractor. A person is guilty of a
separate misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor for each worksite on which he
or she violates subsection (2) or (3) of this section. Nothing in this
subsection applies to a registered contractor.
(((6))) (7) The director by rule shall establish a two-year audit
and monitoring program for a contractor not registered under this
chapter who becomes registered after receiving an infraction or
conviction under this chapter as an unregistered contractor. The
director shall notify the departments of revenue and employment
security of the infractions or convictions and shall cooperate with
these departments to determine whether any taxes or registration,
license, or other fees or penalties are owed the state.

--- END ---