BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.27.100 and 2001 c 159 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 18.27.065 for partnerships and joint
ventures, no person who has registered under one name as provided in
this chapter shall engage in the business, or act in the capacity, of
a contractor under any other name unless such name also is registered
under this chapter.
(2) All advertising and all contracts, correspondence, cards,
signs, posters, papers, and documents which show a contractor's name or
address shall show the contractor's name or address as registered under
this chapter.
(3)(a) Except as provided in this subsection (3)(a), all
advertising that shows the contractor's name or address shall show the
contractor's current registration number.
(i) The registration number may be omitted in an alphabetized
listing of registered contractors stating only the name, address, and
telephone number((: PROVIDED, That)), signs on motor vehicles subject
to RCW 46.16.010 and on-premise signs ((shall not constitute
advertising as provided in this section)), and advertising by airwave
transmission.
(ii) The registration number shall be omitted in advertising in
print news media. The publisher shall retain a copy of the
contractor's current certificate of registration for a period of two
years after publication of the advertising.
(b) All materials used to directly solicit business from retail
customers who are not businesses shall show the contractor's current
registration number.
(c) A contractor shall not use a false or expired registration
number in purchasing or offering to purchase an advertisement for which
a contractor registration number is required. ((Advertising by airwave
transmission shall not be subject to this subsection (3)(a).
(b))) (d) The director may issue a subpoena to any person or entity
selling any advertising subject to this section for the name, address,
((and)) telephone number, and if required, the registration number
provided to the seller of the advertising by the purchaser of the
advertising. The subpoena must have enclosed a stamped, self-addressed
envelope and blank form to be filled out by the seller of the
advertising. If the seller of the advertising has the information on
file, the seller shall, within a reasonable time, return the completed
form to the department. The subpoena must be issued no more than two
days after the expiration of the issue or publication containing the
advertising or after the broadcast of the advertising. The good-faith
compliance by a seller of advertising with a written request of the
department for information concerning the purchaser of advertising
shall constitute a complete defense to any civil or criminal action
brought against the seller of advertising arising from such compliance.
Advertising by airwave or electronic transmission is subject to this
subsection (3)(((b))) (d).
(4) No contractor shall advertise that he or she is bonded and
insured because of the bond required to be filed and sufficiency of
insurance as provided in this chapter.
(5) A contractor shall not falsify a registration number and use
it, or use an expired registration number, in connection with any
solicitation or identification as a contractor. All individual
contractors and all partners, associates, agents, salesmen, solicitors,
officers, and employees of contractors shall use their true names and
addresses at all times while engaged in the business or capacity of a
contractor or activities related thereto.
(6) Any advertising by a person, firm, or corporation soliciting
work as a contractor when that person, firm, or corporation is not
registered pursuant to this chapter is a violation of this chapter.
(7)(a) The finding of a violation of this section by the director
at a hearing held in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act,
chapter 34.05 RCW, shall subject the person committing the violation to
a penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars as determined by the
director.
(b) Penalties under this section shall not apply to a violation
determined to be an inadvertent error.

--- END ---