BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.020 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except on a two-lane highway, every vehicle upon a highway
within this state at any time from a half hour after sunset to a half
hour before sunrise and at any other time when, due to insufficient
light or unfavorable atmospheric conditions, persons and vehicles on
the highway are not clearly discernible at a distance of one thousand
feet ahead shall display lighted headlights, other lights, and
illuminating devices as hereinafter respectively required for different
classes of vehicles, subject to exceptions with respect to parked
vehicles, and such stop lights, turn signals, and other signaling
devices shall be lighted as prescribed for the use of such devices.
(2) Every vehicle driving upon a two-lane highway shall display at
all times lighted headlights, dedicated daytime running lights, as
described in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.108(S5.5.11(a)), other lights, and
illuminating devices, as required for different classes of vehicles.

--- END ---