BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW
to read as follows:
All persons who provide services under this chapter and who will
have unsupervised access to persons with developmental disabilities are
required to submit to a record check through the Washington state
patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through
43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050, and through the federal bureau of
investigation. The record check shall include a fingerprint check
using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint
card. The requesting entity shall provide a copy of the record report
to the applicant. When necessary, persons may be employed on a
conditional basis pending completion of the investigation. If the
applicant has had a record check within the previous two years, the
agency may waive the requirement.

--- END ---