BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state of Washington promotes improving
medical services to persons with developmental disabilities. Subject
to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose,
medical students and faculty at the University of Washington may apply
for incentive grants to support medical research or medical training
projects focused upon improvement of services to persons with
developmental disabilities. By December 1, 2008, the University of
Washington shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature. This report shall include information regarding incentive
grants awarded pursuant to this act, as well as any other efforts or
progress in expanding or improving training for medical students in
treating individuals with developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is null and void if funds are not
appropriated to the University of Washington for the purposes of
incentive grants under this act by June 1, 2008.

--- END ---