BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington is just one of nine states that
authorize the use of marijuana for medical purposes. Qualified doctors
in these states may recommend marijuana for their patients who are
suffering from particular diseases and conditions such as cancers,
human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), multiple sclerosis, glaucoma, and
pain that cannot be treated by traditional medical treatments.
Washington's restriction on recognizing recommendations from doctors
from these other states denies patients the right to exercise these
laws while seeking advice from a qualified doctor of their choice.
Washington patients facing terminal or debilitating medical conditions
must have access to the most appropriate care available to guide their
choices of care and treatment, whether in this state or other states
with appropriate safeguards.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.51A.010 and 1999 c 2 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Medical use of marijuana" means the production, possession, or
administration of marijuana, as defined in RCW 69.50.101(q), for the
exclusive benefit of a qualifying patient in the treatment of his or
her terminal or debilitating illness.
(2) "Primary caregiver" means a person who:
(a) Is eighteen years of age or older;
(b) Is responsible for the housing, health, or care of the patient;
(c) Has been designated in writing by a patient to perform the
duties of primary caregiver under this chapter.
(3) "Qualifying patient" means a person who:
(a) Is a patient of (i) a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or
18.57 RCW, or (ii) a physician who is licensed in another state that
authorizes physicians to advise or recommend the medical use of
marijuana for individuals with a condition similar to that of the
patient and who had been actively practicing medicine in that state at
the time of the advice or recommendation;
(b) Has been diagnosed by ((that)) a physician as having a terminal
or debilitating medical condition;
(c) Is a resident of the state of Washington at the time of such
diagnosis;
(d) Has been advised by ((that)) the physician identified in (a) of
this subsection about the risks and benefits of the medical use of
marijuana; and
(e) Has been advised by ((that)) the physician identified in (a) of
this subsection that ((they)) he or she may benefit from the medical
use of marijuana.
(4) "Terminal or debilitating medical condition" means:
(a) Cancer, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), multiple sclerosis,
epilepsy or other seizure disorder, or spasticity disorders; or
(b) Intractable pain, limited for the purpose of this chapter to
mean pain unrelieved by standard medical treatments and medications; or
(c) Glaucoma, either acute or chronic, limited for the purpose of
this chapter to mean increased intraocular pressure unrelieved by
standard treatments and medications; or
(d) Any other medical condition duly approved by the Washington
state medical quality assurance ((board [commission])) commission as
directed in this chapter.
(5) "Valid documentation" means:
(a) A statement signed by a qualifying patient's physician, or a
copy of the qualifying patient's pertinent medical records, which
states that, in the physician's professional opinion, the potential
benefits of the medical use of marijuana would likely outweigh the
health risks for a particular qualifying patient; and
(b) Proof of identity such as a Washington state driver's license
or identicard, as defined in RCW 46.20.035.

--- END ---