BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.108.010 and 2002 c 277 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the
following meanings shall apply:
(1) "Board" means the Washington state board of massage.
(2) "Massage" and "massage therapy" mean a health care service
involving the external manipulation or pressure of soft tissue for
therapeutic purposes. Massage therapy includes techniques such as
tapping, compressions, friction, Swedish gymnastics or movements,
gliding, kneading, shaking, and fascial or connective tissue
stretching, with or without the aids of superficial heat, cold, water,
lubricants, or salts. Massage therapy does not include diagnosis or
attempts to adjust or manipulate any articulations of the body or spine
or mobilization of these articulations by the use of a thrusting force,
nor does it include genital manipulation.
(3) "Massage practitioner" means an individual licensed under this
chapter.
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(5) "Massage business" means the operation of a business where
massages are given.
(6) "Animal massage practitioner" means an individual with a
license to practice massage therapy in this state with additional
training in animal therapy.
(7) "Intraoral massage" means the manipulation or pressure of soft
tissue inside the mouth or oral cavity for therapeutic purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.108 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A massage practitioner licensed under this chapter may apply
for an endorsement to perform intraoral massage upon completion of
training determined by the board and specified in rules. Training must
include intraoral massage techniques, cranial anatomy, physiology, and
kinesiology, hygienic practices, safety and sanitation, pathology, and
contraindications.
(2) A massage practitioner who has obtained an intraoral massage
endorsement to his or her massage practitioner license may practice
intraoral massage.

--- END ---