BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.77.010 and 1989 c 431 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Motor vehicle" means any truck, trailer, semitrailer, tractor
or any self-propelled or motor driven vehicle used upon any public
highway of this state for the purpose of transporting solid waste, for
the collection and/or disposal thereof;
(2) "Public highway" means every street, road, or highway in this
state;
(3) "Common carrier" means any person who undertakes to transport
solid waste, for the collection and/or disposal thereof, by motor
vehicle for compensation, whether over regular or irregular routes, or
regular or irregular schedules;
(4) "Contract carrier" means all garbage and refuse transporters
not included under the terms "common carrier" and "private carrier," as
herein defined, and further, shall include any person who under special
and individual contracts or agreements transports solid waste by motor
vehicle for compensation;
(5) "Private carrier" means a person who, in his or her own
vehicle, transports solid waste purely as an incidental adjunct to some
other established private business owned or operated by ((him)) the
person in good faith((: PROVIDED, That a person who transports solid
waste from residential sources in a vehicle designed or used primarily
for the transport of solid waste shall not constitute a private
carrier)). "Private carrier" includes multifamily rental properties
and mobile home parks that transport solid waste from residential
sources and that are encouraged, but not required, to use equipment
originally designed or used primarily for the transport of solid waste;
(6) "Vehicle" means every device capable of being moved upon a
public highway and in, upon, or by which any solid waste is or may be
transported or drawn upon a public highway, excepting devices moved by
human or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rail or
tracks;
(7) "Solid waste collection company" means every person or his or
her lessees, receivers, or trustees, owning, controlling, operating or
managing vehicles used in the business of transporting solid waste for
collection and/or disposal for compensation, except septic tank
pumpers, over any public highway in this state whether as a "common
carrier" thereof or as a "contract carrier" thereof;
(8) Solid waste collection does not include collecting or
transporting recyclable materials from a drop-box or recycling buy-back
center, nor collecting or transporting recyclable materials by or on
behalf of a commercial or industrial generator of recyclable materials
to a recycler for use or reclamation. Transportation of these
materials is regulated under chapter 81.80 RCW; and
(9) "Solid waste" means the same as defined under RCW 70.95.030,
except for the purposes of this chapter solid waste does not include
recyclable materials except for source separated recyclable materials
collected from residences.

--- END ---