BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.10.020 and 2005 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this chapter, no person shall ((own,
transport, or)) operate any snowmobile within this state unless such
snowmobile has been registered in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter. ((However, a vintage snowmobile only requires
registration if operated within this state.))
(2) A registration number shall be assigned, without payment of a
fee, to snowmobiles owned by the state of Washington or its political
subdivisions, and the assigned registration number shall be displayed
upon each snowmobile in such manner as provided by rules adopted by the
department.

--- END ---