BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.12.070 and 1997 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each employing unit shall keep true and accurate work
records, containing such information as the commissioner may prescribe.
Such records shall be open to inspection and be subject to being copied
by the commissioner or his or her authorized representatives at any
reasonable time and as often as may be necessary. The commissioner may
require from any employing unit any sworn or unsworn reports with
respect to persons employed by it, which he or she deems necessary for
the effective administration of this title.
(b) An employer who contracts with another person or entity for
work subject to chapter 18.27 or 19.28 RCW shall obtain and preserve a
record of the unified business identifier account number for the person
or entity performing the work. Failure to obtain or maintain the
record is subject to RCW 39.06.010 and to a penalty determined by the
commissioner, but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars, to be
collected as provided in RCW 50.24.120.
(2)(a) Each employer shall register with the department and obtain
an employment security account number. Registration must include the
names and social security numbers of the owners, partners, members, or
corporate officers of the business, as well as their mailing addresses
and telephone numbers and other information the commissioner may by
rule prescribe. Registration of corporations must also include the
percentage of stock ownership for each corporate officer, delineated by
zero percent, less than ten percent, or ten percent or more. Any
changes in the owners, partners, members, or corporate officers of the
business, and changes in percentage of ownership of the outstanding
shares of stock of the corporation, must be reported to the department
at intervals prescribed by the commissioner under (b) of this
subsection.
(b) Each employer shall make periodic reports at such intervals as
the commissioner may by regulation prescribe, setting forth the
remuneration paid for employment to workers in its employ, the full
names and social security numbers of all such workers, and ((until
April 1, 1978, the number of weeks for which the worker earned the
"qualifying weekly wage", and beginning July 1, 1977,)) the total hours
worked by each worker and such other information as the commissioner
may by regulation prescribe.
(((b))) (c) If the employing unit fails or has failed to report the
number of hours in a reporting period for which a worker worked, such
number will be computed by the commissioner and given the same force
and effect as if it had been reported by the employing unit. In
computing the number of such hours worked, the total wages for the
reporting period, as reported by the employing unit, shall be divided
by the dollar amount of the state's minimum wage in effect for such
reporting period and the quotient, disregarding any remainder, shall be
credited to the worker: PROVIDED, That although the computation so
made will not be subject to appeal by the employing unit, monetary
entitlement may be redetermined upon request if the department is
provided with credible evidence of the actual hours worked. Benefits
paid using computed hours are not considered an overpayment and are not
subject to collections when the correction of computed hours results in
an invalid or reduced claim; however:
(i) A contribution paying employer who fails to report the number
of hours worked will have its experience rating account charged for all
benefits paid that are based on hours computed under this subsection;
and
(ii) An employer who reimburses the trust fund for benefits paid to
workers and fails to report the number of hours worked shall reimburse
the trust fund for all benefits paid that are based on hours computed
under this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.29.021 and 2006 c 13 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to benefits charged to the experience
rating accounts of employers for claims that have an effective date on
or after January 4, 2004.
(2)(a) An experience rating account shall be established and
maintained for each employer, except employers as described in RCW
50.44.010 ((and)), 50.44.030, and 50.50.030 who have properly elected
to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government
employers as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are
required to make payments in lieu of contributions, based on existing
records of the employment security department.
(b) Benefits paid to an eligible individual shall be charged to the
experience rating accounts of each of such individual's employers
during the individual's base year in the same ratio that the wages paid
by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to the
wages paid by all employers to that individual during that base year,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c) When the eligible individual's separating employer is a covered
contribution paying base year employer, benefits paid to the eligible
individual shall be charged to the experience rating account of only
the individual's separating employer if the individual qualifies for
benefits under:
(i) RCW 50.20.050(2)(b)(i), as applicable, and became unemployed
after having worked and earned wages in the bona fide work; or
(ii) RCW 50.20.050(2)(b) (v) through (x).
(3) The legislature finds that certain benefit payments, in whole
or in part, should not be charged to the experience rating accounts of
employers except those employers described in RCW 50.44.010 ((and)),
50.44.030, and 50.50.030 who have properly elected to make payments in
lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers described in
RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments in
lieu of contributions, as follows:
(a) Benefits paid to any individual later determined to be
ineligible shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer. However, when a benefit claim becomes
invalid due to an amendment or adjustment of a report where the
employer failed to report or inaccurately reported hours worked or
remuneration paid, or both, all benefits paid will be charged to the
experience rating account of the contribution paying employer or
employers that originally filed the incomplete or inaccurate report or
reports. An employer who reimburses the trust fund for benefits paid
to workers and who fails to report or inaccurately reported hours
worked or remuneration paid, or both, shall reimburse the trust fund
for all benefits paid that are based on the originally filed incomplete
or inaccurate report or reports.
(b) Benefits paid to an individual filing under the provisions of
chapter 50.06 RCW shall not be charged to the experience rating account
of any contribution paying employer only if:
(i) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after receiving
crime victims' compensation for a disability resulting from a nonwork-related occurrence; or
(ii) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(2).
(c) Benefits paid which represent the state's share of benefits
payable as extended benefits defined under RCW 50.22.010(6) shall not
be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(d) In the case of individuals who requalify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050 or 50.20.060, benefits based on wage credits earned prior to
the disqualifying separation shall not be charged to the experience
rating account of the contribution paying employer from whom that
separation took place.
(e) Individuals who qualify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050(2)(b)(iv), as applicable, shall not have their benefits
charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(f) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after the
first Sunday following April 22, 2005, benefits paid that exceed the
benefits that would have been paid if the weekly benefit amount for the
claim had been determined as one percent of the total wages paid in the
individual's base year shall not be charged to the experience rating
account of any contribution paying employer.
(4)(a) A contribution paying base year employer, not otherwise
eligible for relief of charges for benefits under this section, may
receive such relief if the benefit charges result from payment to an
individual who:
(i) Last left the employ of such employer voluntarily for reasons
not attributable to the employer;
(ii) Was discharged for misconduct or gross misconduct connected
with his or her work not a result of inability to meet the minimum job
requirements;
(iii) Is unemployed as a result of closure or severe curtailment of
operation at the employer's plant, building, worksite, or other
facility. This closure must be for reasons directly attributable to a
catastrophic occurrence such as fire, flood, or other natural disaster;
or
(iv) Continues to be employed on a regularly scheduled permanent
part-time basis by a base year employer and who at some time during the
base year was concurrently employed and subsequently separated from at
least one other base year employer. Benefit charge relief ceases when
the employment relationship between the employer requesting relief and
the claimant is terminated. This subsection does not apply to shared
work employers under chapter 50.06 RCW.
(b) The employer requesting relief of charges under this subsection
must request relief in writing within thirty days following mailing to
the last known address of the notification of the valid initial
determination of such claim, stating the date and reason for the
separation or the circumstances of continued employment. The
commissioner, upon investigation of the request, shall determine
whether relief should be granted.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.12.220 and 2006 c 47 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a))) If an employer fails to file ((in)) a timely ((and
complete manner a)) report as required by RCW 50.12.070, or the rules
adopted pursuant thereto, the employer ((shall be)) is subject to a
penalty ((to be determined by the commissioner, but not to exceed two
hundred fifty dollars or ten percent of the quarterly contributions for
each such offense, whichever is less)) of twenty-five dollars per
violation, unless the penalty is waived by the commissioner.
(((b))) (2) An employer who files an incomplete or incorrectly
formatted tax and wage report as required by RCW 50.12.070 must receive
a warning letter for the first occurrence. The warning letter will
provide instructions for accurate reporting or notify the employer how
to obtain technical assistance from the department. Except as provided
in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, for subsequent occurrences
within five years of the last occurrence, the employer is subject to a
penalty as follows:
(a) When no contributions are due: For the second occurrence, the
penalty is seventy-five dollars; for the third occurrence, the penalty
is one hundred fifty dollars; and for the fourth occurrence and for
each occurrence thereafter, the penalty is two hundred fifty dollars.
(b) When contributions are due: For the second occurrence, the
penalty is ten percent of the quarterly contributions due, but not less
than seventy-five dollars and not more than two hundred fifty dollars;
for the third occurrence, the penalty is ten percent of the quarterly
contributions due, but not less than one hundred fifty dollars and not
more than two hundred fifty dollars; and for the fourth occurrence and
each occurrence thereafter, the penalty is two hundred fifty dollars.
(3) If an employer knowingly misrepresents to the employment
security department the amount of his or her payroll upon which
contributions under this title are based, the employer shall be liable
to the state for up to ten times the amount of the difference in
contributions paid, if any, and the amount the employer should have
paid and for the reasonable expenses of auditing his or her books and
collecting such sums. Such liability may be enforced in the name of
the department.
(((2))) (4) If contributions are not paid on the date on which they
are due and payable as prescribed by the commissioner, there shall be
assessed a penalty of five percent of the amount of the contributions
for the first month or part thereof of delinquency; there shall be
assessed a total penalty of ten percent of the amount of the
contributions for the second month or part thereof of delinquency; and
there shall be assessed a total penalty of twenty percent of the amount
of the contributions for the third month or part thereof of
delinquency. No penalty so added shall be less than ten dollars.
These penalties are in addition to the interest charges assessed under
RCW 50.24.040.
(((3))) (5) Penalties shall not accrue on contributions from an
estate in the hands of a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee in
bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer
subsequent to the date when such receiver, executor, administrator,
trustee in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating
officer qualifies as such, but contributions accruing with respect to
employment of persons by a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee
in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer shall
become due and shall be subject to penalties in the same manner as
contributions due from other employers.
(((4))) (6) Where adequate information has been furnished to the
department and the department has failed to act or has advised the
employer of no liability or inability to decide the issue, penalties
shall be waived by the commissioner. Penalties may also be waived for
good cause if the commissioner determines that the failure to
((timely)) file timely, complete, and correctly formatted reports or
pay timely contributions was not due to the employer's fault.
(((5))) (7) Any decision to assess a penalty as provided by this
section shall be made by the chief administrative officer of the tax
branch or his or her designee.
(((6))) (8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny an
employer the right to appeal the assessment of any penalty. Such
appeal shall be made in the manner provided in RCW 50.32.030.

Sec. 4 RCW 50.04.165 and 1993 c 290 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Services performed by a person appointed as an officer of a
corporation under RCW 23B.08.400((, other than those covered by chapter
50.44 RCW, shall not be)) are considered services in employment.
However, a corporation, other than those covered by chapters 50.44 and
50.50 RCW, may elect to ((cover not less than all of its corporate
officers under RCW 50.24.160. If an employer does not elect to cover
its corporate officers under RCW 50.24.160, the employer must notify
its corporate officers in writing that they are ineligible for
unemployment benefits. If the employer fails to notify any corporate
officer, then that person shall not be considered to be a corporate
officer for the purposes of this section.)) exempt from coverage under
this title as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any bona fide
officer of a public company as defined in RCW 23B.01.400 who:
(i) Is voluntarily elected or voluntarily appointed in accordance
with the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation;
(ii) Is a shareholder of the corporation;
(iii) Exercises substantial control in the daily management of the
corporation; and
(iv) Whose primary responsibilities do not include the performance
of manual labor.
(b) A corporation that is not a public company as defined in RCW
23B.01.400 may exempt:
(i) Eight or fewer bona fide officers who: Voluntarily agree to be
exempted from coverage; are voluntarily elected or voluntarily
appointed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws of
the corporation; and who exercise substantial control in the daily
management of the corporation, from coverage under this title without
regard to the officers' performance of manual labor if the exempted
officer is a shareholder of the corporation; and
(ii) Any number of officers if all the exempted officers are
related by blood within the third degree or marriage.
(c) Determinations with respect to the status of persons performing
services for a corporation must be made, in part, by reference to Title
23B RCW and to compliance by the corporation with its own articles of
incorporation and bylaws. For the purpose of determining coverage
under this title, substance controls over form, and mandatory coverage
under this title extends to all workers of this state, regardless of
honorary titles conferred upon those actually serving as workers.
(2)(a) The corporation must notify the department when it elects to
exempt one or more corporate officers from coverage. The notice must
be in a format prescribed by the department and signed by the officer
or officers being exempted and by another corporate officer verifying
the decision to be exempt from coverage.
(b) The election to exempt one or more corporate officers from
coverage under this title may be made when the corporation registers as
required under RCW 50.12.070. The corporation may also elect exemption
at any time following registration; however, an exemption will be
effective only as of the first day of a calendar year. A written
notice from the corporation must be sent to the department by January
15th following the end of the last calendar year of coverage.
Exemption from coverage will not be retroactive, and the corporation is
not eligible for a refund or credit for contributions paid for
corporate officers for periods before the effective date of the
exemption.
(3) A corporation may elect to reinstate coverage for one or more
officers previously exempted under this section, subject to the
following:
(a) Coverage may be reinstated only at set intervals of five years
beginning with the calendar year that begins five years after the
effective date of this section.
(b) Coverage may only be reinstated effective the first day of the
calendar year. A written notice from the corporation must be sent to
the department by January 15th following the end of the last calendar
year the exemption from coverage will apply.
(c) Coverage will not be reinstated if the corporation: Has
committed fraud related to the payment of contributions within the
previous five years; is delinquent in the payment of contributions; or
is assigned the array calculation factor rate for nonqualified
employers because of a failure to pay contributions when due as
provided in RCW 50.29.025, or for related reasons as determined by the
commissioner.
(d) Coverage will not be reinstated retroactively.
(4) Except for corporations covered by chapters 50.44 and 50.50
RCW, personal services performed by bona fide corporate officers for
corporations described under RCW 50.04.080(3) and 50.04.090(2) are not
considered services in employment, unless the corporation registers
with the department as required in RCW 50.12.070 and elects to provide
coverage for its corporate officers under RCW 50.24.160.

Sec. 5 RCW 50.04.310 and 1984 c 134 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An individual ((shall be deemed to be)) is "unemployed" in any
week during which the individual performs no services and with respect
to which no remuneration is payable to the individual, or in any week
of less than full time work, if the remuneration payable to the
individual with respect to such week is less than one and one-third
times the individual's weekly benefit amount plus five dollars. The
commissioner shall prescribe regulations applicable to unemployed
individuals making such distinctions in the procedures as to such types
of unemployment as the commissioner deems necessary.
(2) An individual ((shall be deemed)) is not ((to be)) "unemployed"
during any week which falls totally within a period during which the
individual, pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement or individual
employment contract, is employed full time in accordance with a
definition of full time contained in the agreement or contract, and for
which compensation for full time work is payable. This subsection may
not be applied retroactively to an individual who had no guarantee of
work at the start of such period and subsequently is provided
additional work by the employer.
(3) An officer of a corporation who owns ten percent or more of the
outstanding stock of the corporation, or a corporate officer who is a
family member of an officer who owns ten percent or more of the
outstanding stock of the corporation, whose claim for benefits is based
on any wages with that corporation, is:
(a) Not "unemployed" in any week during the individual's term of
office or ownership in the corporation, even if wages are not being
paid;
(b) "Unemployed" in any week upon dissolution of the corporation or
if the officer permanently resigns or is permanently removed from their
appointment and responsibilities with that corporation in accordance
with its articles of incorporation or bylaws.
As used in this section, "family member" means persons who are
members of a family by blood or marriage as parents, stepparents,
grandparents, spouses, children, brothers, sisters, stepchildren,
adopted children, or grandchildren.

Sec. 6 RCW 50.24.160 and 1977 ex.s. c 292 s 12 are each amended
to read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 50.04.165, any employing unit ((for which
services that do not constitute employment as defined in this title are
performed may file with the commissioner a written election that all
such services performed by any distinct class or group of individuals
or by all individuals in its employ in one or more distinct
establishments or places of business shall be deemed to constitute
employment for all the purposes of this title for not less than two
calendar years. Upon the written approval of such election by the
commissioner, such services shall be deemed to constitute employment
subject to this title from and after the date stated in such approval.
Services covered pursuant to this section shall cease to be deemed
employment subject hereto as of January 1st of any calendar year
subsequent to such two calendar years, only if the employing unit files
with the commissioner prior to the fifteenth day of January of such
year a written application for termination of coverage)) for which
services that do not constitute employment as defined in this title are
performed may file with the commissioner a written election that all
such services performed by any distinct class or group of individuals
or by all individuals in its employment in one or more distinct
establishments or places of business shall be deemed to constitute
employment for all the purposes of this title for at least two calendar
years. Upon the written approval of such election by the commissioner,
such services shall be deemed to constitute employment subject to this
title on and after the date stated in the approval. Services covered
under this section shall cease to be deemed employment as of January
1st of any calendar year subsequent to the two-calendar year period,
only if the employing unit files with the commissioner before January
15th of that year a written application for termination of coverage.

Sec. 7 RCW 50.20.070 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 158 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
((Irrespective of any other provisions of this title)) (1) With
respect to determinations delivered or mailed before January 1, 2008,
an individual ((shall be)) is disqualified for benefits for any week
((with respect to which)) he or she has knowingly made a false
statement or representation involving a material fact or knowingly
failed to report a material fact and ((has thereby)), as a result, has
obtained or attempted to obtain any benefits under the provisions of
this title, and for an additional twenty-six weeks ((commencing))
beginning with the first week for which he or she completes an
otherwise compensable claim for waiting period credit or benefits
following the date of the delivery or mailing of the determination of
disqualification under this section((: PROVIDED, That)). However,
such disqualification shall not be applied after two years have elapsed
from the date of the delivery or mailing of the determination of
disqualification under this section((, but)).
(2) With respect to determinations delivered or mailed on or after
January 1, 2008:
(a) An individual is disqualified for benefits for any week he or
she has knowingly made a false statement or representation involving a
material fact or knowingly failed to report a material fact and, as a
result, has obtained or attempted to obtain any benefits under the
provisions of this title;
(b) An individual disqualified for benefits under this subsection
for the first time is also disqualified for an additional twenty-six
weeks beginning with the Sunday of the week in which the determination
is mailed or delivered;
(c) An individual disqualified for benefits under this subsection
for the second time is also disqualified for an additional fifty-two
weeks beginning with the Sunday of the week in which the determination
is mailed or delivered, and is subject to an additional penalty of
twenty-five percent of the amount of benefits overpaid or deemed
overpaid;
(d) An individual disqualified for benefits under this subsection
a third time and any time thereafter is also disqualified for an
additional one hundred four weeks beginning with the Sunday of the week
in which the determination is mailed or delivered, and is subject to an
additional penalty of fifty percent of the amount of benefits overpaid
or deemed overpaid.
(3) All penalties collected under this section must be expended for
the proper administration of this title as authorized under RCW
50.16.010 and for no other purposes.
(4) All overpayments and penalties established by such
determination of disqualification ((shall)) must be collected as
otherwise provided by this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this title:
(1) "Professional employer organization" means a person or entity
that enters into an agreement with one or more client employers to
provide professional employer services. "Professional employer
organization" includes entities that use the term "staff leasing
company," "permanent leasing company," "registered staff leasing
company," "employee leasing company," "administrative employer," or any
other name, when they provide professional employer services to client
employers. The following are not classified as professional employer
organizations: Independent contractors in RCW 50.04.140; temporary
staffing services companies and services referral agencies as defined
in RCW 50.04.245; third-party payers as defined in section 14 of this
act; or labor organizations.
(2) "Client employer" means any employer who enters into a
professional employer agreement with a professional employer
organization.
(3) "Coemployer" means either a professional employer organization
or a client employer that has entered into a professional employer
agreement.
(4) "Covered employee" means an individual performing services for
a client employer that constitutes employment under this title.
(5) "Professional employer services" means services provided by the
professional employer organization to the client employer, which
include, but are not limited to, human resource functions, risk
management, or payroll administration services, in a coemployment
relationship.
(6) "Coemployment relationship" means a relationship that is
intended to be ongoing rather than temporary or project-specific, where
the rights, duties, and obligations of an employer in an employment
relationship are allocated between coemployers pursuant to a
professional employer agreement and state law. A coemployment
relationship exists only if a majority of the employees performing
services to a client employer, or to a division or work unit of a
client employer, are covered employees. In determining the allocation
of rights and obligations in a coemployment relationship:
(a) The professional employer organization has only those employer
rights and is subject only to those obligations specifically allocated
to it by the professional employer agreement or state law;
(b) The client employer has those rights and obligations allocated
to it by the professional employer agreement or state law, as well as
any other right or obligation of an employer that is not specifically
allocated by the professional employer agreement or state law.
(7) "Professional employer agreement" means a written contract
between a client employer and a professional employer organization that
provides for: (a) The coemployment of covered employees; and (b) the
allocation of employer rights and obligations between the client and
the professional employer organization with respect to the covered
employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 50.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A professional employer organization must register with the
department and ensure that its client employers are registered with the
department as provided in RCW 50.12.070.
(2) By September 1, 2007, the professional employer organization
shall provide the department with:
(a) The names, addresses, unified business identifier numbers, and
employment security account numbers of all its existing client
employers who do business or have covered employees in Washington
state. This requirement applies whether or not the client employer
currently has covered employees performing services in Washington
state;
(b) The names and social security numbers of corporate officers,
owners, or limited liability company members of client employers; and
(c) The business location in Washington state where payroll records
of its client employers will be made available for review or inspection
upon request of the department.
(3) For client employers registering for the first time as required
in RCW 50.12.070, the professional employer organization must:
(a) Provide the names, addresses, unified business identifier
numbers, and employment security account numbers of the client
employers who do business or have covered employees in Washington
state. This requirement applies whether or not the client employer
currently has covered employees performing services in Washington
state;
(b) Provide the names and social security numbers of corporate
officers, owners, or limited liability company members of the client
employers; and
(c) Provide the business location in Washington state where payroll
records of its client employers will be made available for review or
inspection at the time of registration or upon request of the
department.
(4) The professional employer organization must notify the
department within thirty days each time it adds or terminates a
relationship with a client employer. Notification must take place on
forms provided by the department. The notification must include the
name, employment security account number, unified business identifier
number, and address of the client employer, as well as the effective
date the relationship began or terminated.
(5) The professional employer organization must provide a power of
attorney, confidential information authorization, or other evidence,
completed by each client employer as required by the department,
authorizing it to act on behalf of the client employer for unemployment
insurance purposes.
(6) The professional employer organization must file quarterly wage
and contribution reports with the department that reports separate and
distinct information for each client employer, using the employer
account number and tax rate assigned to that client employer by the
department.
(7) The professional employer organization must maintain accurate
payroll records for each client employer and make these records
available for review or inspection upon request of the department at
the location provided by the professional employer organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 50.29 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of this title, each client employer of a professional
employer organization is assigned its individual contribution rate
based on its own experience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 50.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The client employer of a professional employer organization is
liable for the payment of any taxes, interest, or penalties due.
(2) The professional employer organization may collect and pay
taxes due to the department for unemployment insurance coverage from
its client employers in accordance with its professional employer
agreement. If such payments have been made to the professional
employer organization by the client employer, the department shall
first attempt to collect the contributions due from the professional
employer organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 50.12 RCW
to read as follows:
A professional employer organization's authority to act as a
coemployer for purposes of this title may be revoked by the department
when it determines that the professional employer organization has
substantially failed to comply with the requirements of section 9 of
this act.

Sec. 13 RCW 50.04.245 and 1995 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the other provisions of this title, personal
services performed for, or for the benefit of, a third party pursuant
to a contract with a temporary staffing services ((agency, employee
leasing agency,)) company or services referral agency((, or other
entity shall be deemed to be)) constitutes employment for the temporary
staffing services ((agency, employee leasing agency,)) company or
services referral agency((, or other entity)) when the agency is
responsible, under contract or in fact, for the payment of wages in
remuneration for the services performed.
(2) The temporary staffing services company or services referral
agency is considered the employer as defined in RCW 50.04.080.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Temporary staffing services ((agency)) company" means an
individual or entity ((that is engaged in the business of furnishing
individuals to perform services on a part-time or temporary basis for
a third party)) that engages in: Recruiting and hiring its own
employees; finding other organizations that need the services of those
employees; and assigning those employees on a temporary basis to
perform work at or services for a client to support or supplement the
client's work forces, or to provide assistance in special work
situations, such as employee absences, skill shortages, and seasonal
workloads, or to perform special assignments or projects, all under the
direction and supervision of the client. "Temporary staffing services
company" does not include professional employer organizations as
defined in section 8 of this act, permanent employee leasing, or
permanent employee placement services.
(b) (("Employee leasing agency" means an individual or entity that
for a fee places the employees of a client onto its payroll and leases
such employees back to the client.
(c))) "Services referral agency" means an individual or entity
other than a professional employer organization as defined in section
8 of this act that is engaged in the business of offering the services
of ((an)) one or more individuals to perform specific tasks for a third
party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the other provisions of this title, personal
services performed for, or for the benefit of, an employer who utilizes
a third-party payer constitutes employment for the employer. The
third-party payer is not considered the employer as defined in RCW
50.04.080.
(2) For purposes of this section, "third-party payer" means an
individual or entity that enters into an agreement with one or more
employers to provide administrative, human resource, or payroll
administration services, but does not provide an employment or
coemployment relationship. Temporary staffing services companies,
services referral agencies, professional employer organizations, and
labor organizations are not third-party payers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this title, "common paymaster" or "common pay
agent" means an independent third party who contracts with, and
represents, two or more employers, and who files a combined tax report
for those employers.
(2) Common paymaster combined tax reporting is prohibited. "Common
paymaster" does not meet the definition of a joint account under RCW
50.24.170.
(3) A common pay agent or common paymaster is not an employer as
defined in RCW 50.04.080 or an employing unit as defined in RCW
50.04.090.

Sec. 16 RCW 50.24.170 and 1945 c 35 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall prescribe regulations for the
establishment, maintenance, and dissolution of joint accounts by two or
more employers, and shall, in accordance with such regulations and upon
application by two or more employers to establish such account, or to
merge their several individual accounts in a joint account, maintain
such joint account as if it constituted a single employer's account.
(2) Joint accounts may not be established for professional employer
organizations, as defined in section 8 of this act, or third-party
payers, as defined in section 14 of this act, and their clients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 50.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon termination, dissolution, or abandonment of a corporate or
limited liability company business, any officer, member, or owner who,
having control or supervision of payment of unemployment tax
contributions under RCW 50.24.010 or 50.24.014: (a) Willfully evades
any contributions imposed under this title; (b) willfully destroys,
mutilates, or falsifies any book, document, or record; or (c) willfully
fails to truthfully account for, or makes under oath, any false
statement relating to the financial condition of the corporation or
limited liability company business, is personally liable for any unpaid
contributions and interest and penalties on those contributions. For
purposes of this section, "willfully" means an intentional, conscious,
and voluntary course of action.
(2) Persons liable under subsection (1) of this section are liable
only for contributions that became due during the period he or she had
the control, supervision, responsibility, or duty to act for the
corporation or limited liability company, plus interest and penalties
on those contributions.
(3) Persons liable under subsection (1) of this section are exempt
from liability if all of the assets of the corporation or limited
liability company have been applied to its debts through bankruptcy or
receivership.
(4) Any person having been issued a notice of assessment under this
section is entitled to the appeal procedures under chapter 50.32 RCW.
(5) This section applies only when the employment security
department determines that there is no reasonable means of collecting
the contributions owed directly from the corporation or limited
liability company.
(6) This section does not relieve the corporation or limited
liability company of other tax liabilities under this title or impair
other tax collection remedies afforded by law.
(7) Collection authority and procedures described in this chapter
apply to collections under this section.

Sec. 18 RCW 50.04.080 and 1985 c 41 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Employer" means any individual or type of organization,
including any partnership, association, trust, estate, joint stock
company, insurance company, limited liability company, or corporation,
whether domestic or foreign, or the receiver, trustee in bankruptcy,
trustee, or the legal representative of a deceased person, having any
person in employment or, having become an employer, has not ceased to
be an employer as provided in this title.
(2) For the purposes of collection remedies available under chapter
50.24 RCW, "employer," in the case of a corporation or limited
liability company, includes persons found personally liable for any
unpaid contributions and interest and penalties on those contributions
under section 17 of this act.
(3) Except for corporations covered by chapters 50.44 and 50.50
RCW, "employer" does not include a corporation when all personal
services are performed only by bona fide corporate officers, unless the
corporation registers with the department as required in RCW 50.12.070
and elects to provide coverage for its corporate officers under RCW
50.24.160.

Sec. 19 RCW 50.04.090 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 11 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) "Employing unit" means any individual or any type of
organization, including any partnership, association, trust, estate,
joint stock company, insurance company, or corporation, whether
domestic or foreign, or the receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, trustee or
successor thereof, or the legal representative of a deceased person,
which has or subsequent to January 1, 1937, had in its employ or in its
"employment" one or more individuals performing services within this
state. The state and its political subdivisions shall be deemed
employing units as to any transactions occurring on or after September
21, 1977 which would render an employing unit liable for contributions,
interest, or penalties under RCW 50.24.130. "Employing unit" includes
Indian tribes as defined in RCW 50.50.010.
(2) Except for corporations covered by chapters 50.44 and 50.50
RCW, "employing unit" does not include a corporation when all personal
services are performed only by bona fide corporate officers, unless the
corporation registers with the department as required in RCW 50.12.070
and elects to provide coverage for its corporate officers under RCW
50.24.160.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Section 3 of this act applies for penalties
assessed on reports and contributions due beginning October 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 Section 4 of this act takes effect January
1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 5, 6, and 10 through 12 of this
act take effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---