BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.09.060 and 2005 c 274 s 357 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following shall apply to those forest practices administered
and enforced by the department and for which the board shall promulgate
regulations as provided in this chapter:
(1) The department shall prescribe the form and contents of the
notification and application. The forest practices rules shall specify
by whom and under what conditions the notification and application
shall be signed or otherwise certified as acceptable. The application
or notification shall be delivered in person to the department, sent by
first class mail to the department or electronically filed in a form
defined by the department. The form for electronic filing shall be
readily convertible to a paper copy, which shall be available to the
public pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW. The information required may
include, but is not limited to:
(a) Name and address of the forest landowner, timber owner, and
operator;
(b) Description of the proposed forest practice or practices to be
conducted;
(c) Legal description and tax parcel identification numbers of the
land on which the forest practices are to be conducted;
(d) Planimetric and topographic maps showing location and size of
all lakes and streams and other public waters in and immediately
adjacent to the operating area and showing all existing and proposed
roads and major tractor roads;
(e) Description of the silvicultural, harvesting, or other forest
practice methods to be used, including the type of equipment to be used
and materials to be applied;
(f) Proposed plan for reforestation and for any revegetation
necessary to reduce erosion potential from roadsides and yarding roads,
as required by the forest practices rules;
(g) Soil, geological, and hydrological data with respect to forest
practices;
(h) The expected dates of commencement and completion of all forest
practices specified in the application;
(i) Provisions for continuing maintenance of roads and other
construction or other measures necessary to afford protection to public
resources;
(j) An affirmation that the statements contained in the
notification or application are true; and
(k) All necessary application or notification fees.
(2) Long range plans may be submitted to the department for review
and consultation.
(3) The application for a forest practice or the notification of a
((Class II)) forest practice is subject to the ((three-year))
reforestation requirement of RCW 76.09.070.
(a) If the application states that any ((such)) land will be or is
intended to be ((so)) converted:
(i) The reforestation requirements of this chapter and of the
forest practices rules shall not apply if the land is in fact ((so))
converted unless applicable alternatives or limitations are provided in
forest practices rules issued under RCW 76.09.070 ((as now or hereafter
amended));
(ii) Completion of such forest practice operations shall be deemed
conversion of the lands to another use for purposes of chapters 84.33
and 84.34 RCW unless the conversion is to a use permitted under a
current use tax agreement permitted under chapter 84.34 RCW;
(iii) The forest practices described in the application are subject
to applicable county, city, town, and regional governmental authority
permitted under RCW 76.09.240 ((as now or hereafter amended)) as well
as the forest practices rules.
(b) Except as provided elsewhere in this section, if the landowner
harvests without an approved application or notification or the
landowner does not state that any land covered by the application or
notification will be or is intended to be ((so)) converted((:
(i) For six years after the date of the application the county,
city, town, and regional governmental entities shall deny any or all
applications for permits or approvals, including building permits and
subdivision approvals, relating to nonforestry uses of land subject to
the application;
(A) The department shall submit to the local governmental entity a
copy of the statement of a forest landowner's intention not to convert
which shall represent a recognition by the landowner that the six-year
moratorium shall be imposed and shall preclude the landowner's ability
to obtain development permits while the moratorium is in place. This
statement shall be filed by the local governmental entity with the
county recording officer, who shall record the documents as provided in
chapter 65.04 RCW, except that lands designated as forest lands of
long-term commercial significance under chapter 36.70A RCW shall not be
recorded due to the low likelihood of conversion. Not recording the
statement of a forest landowner's conversion intention shall not be
construed to mean the moratorium is not in effect.
(B) The department shall collect the recording fee and reimburse
the local governmental entity for the cost of recording the
application.
(C) When harvesting takes place without an application, the local
governmental entity shall impose the six-year moratorium provided in
(b)(i) of this subsection from the date the unpermitted harvesting was
discovered by the department or the local governmental entity.
(D) The local governmental entity shall develop a process for
lifting the six-year moratorium, which shall include public
notification, and procedures for appeals and public hearings.
(E) The local governmental entity may develop an administrative
process for lifting or waiving the six-year moratorium for the purposes
of constructing a single-family residence or outbuildings, or both, on
a legal lot and building site. Lifting or waiving of the six-year
moratorium is subject to compliance with all local ordinances.
(F) The six-year moratorium shall not be imposed on a forest
practices application that contains a conversion option harvest plan
approved by the local governmental entity unless the forest practice
was not in compliance with the approved forest practice permit. Where
not in compliance with the conversion option harvest plan, the six-year
moratorium shall be imposed from the date the application was approved
by the department or the local governmental entity;
(ii))), and the department or the county, city, town, or regional
governmental entity becomes aware of conversion activities to a use
other than commercial timber operations, as that term is defined in RCW
76.09.020, then the department shall send to the department of ecology
and the appropriate county, city, town, and regional governmental
entities the following documents:
(i) A notice of a conversion to nonforestry use;
(ii) A copy of the applicable forest practices application or
notification, if any; and
(iii) Copies of any applicable outstanding final orders or
decisions issued by the department related to the forest practices
application or notification.
(c) Failure to comply with the reforestation requirements contained
in any final order or decision shall constitute a removal of
designation under the provisions of RCW 84.33.140, and a change of use
under the provisions of RCW 84.34.080, and, if applicable, shall
subject such lands to the payments and/or penalties resulting from such
removals or changes((; and)).
(((iii))) (d) Conversion to a use other than commercial forest
product operations within six years after approval of the forest
practices application or notification without the consent of the
county, city, or town shall constitute a violation of each of the
county, municipal city, town, and regional authorities to which the
forest practice operations would have been subject if the application
had ((so)) stated an intent to convert.
(((c))) (e) Land that is the subject of a notice of conversion to
a nonforestry use produced by the department and sent to the department
of ecology and a local government under this subsection is subject to
the development prohibition and conditions provided in section 2 of
this act.
(f) Landowners who have not stated an intent to convert the land
covered by an application or notification and who decide to convert the
land to a nonforestry use within six years of receiving an approved
application or notification must do so in a manner consistent with
section 3 of this act.
(g) The application or notification ((shall be signed)) must
include a statement requiring an acknowledgment by the forest landowner
((and accompanied by a statement signed by the forest landowner
indicating)) of his or her intent with respect to conversion and
acknowledging that he or she is familiar with the effects of this
subsection.
(4) Whenever an approved application authorizes a forest practice
which, because of soil condition, proximity to a water course or other
unusual factor, has a potential for causing material damage to a public
resource, as determined by the department, the applicant shall, when
requested on the approved application, notify the department two days
before the commencement of actual operations.
(5) Before the operator commences any forest practice in a manner
or to an extent significantly different from that described in a
previously approved application or notification, there shall be
submitted to the department a new application or notification form in
the manner set forth in this section.
(6) Except as provided in RCW 76.09.350(4), the notification to or
the approval given by the department to an application to conduct a
forest practice shall be effective for a term of two years from the
date of approval or notification and shall not be renewed unless a new
application is filed and approved or a new notification has been filed.
At the option of the applicant, an application or notification may be
submitted to cover a single forest practice or a number of forest
practices within reasonable geographic or political boundaries as
specified by the department. An application or notification that
covers more than one forest practice may have an effective term of more
than two years. The board shall adopt rules that establish standards
and procedures for approving an application or notification that has an
effective term of more than two years. Such rules shall include
extended time periods for application or notification approval or
disapproval. On an approved application with a term of more than two
years, the applicant shall inform the department before commencing
operations.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no prior
application or notification shall be required for any emergency forest
practice necessitated by fire, flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other
emergency as defined by the board, but the operator shall submit an
application or notification, whichever is applicable, to the department
within forty-eight hours after commencement of such practice or as
required by local regulations.
(8) Forest practices applications or notifications are not required
for forest practices conducted to control exotic forest insect or
disease outbreaks, when conducted by or under the direction of the
department of agriculture in carrying out an order of the governor or
director of the department of agriculture to implement pest control
measures as authorized under chapter 17.24 RCW, and are not required
when conducted by or under the direction of the department in carrying
out emergency measures under a forest health emergency declaration by
the commissioner of public lands as provided in RCW 76.06.130.
(a) For the purposes of this subsection, exotic forest insect or
disease has the same meaning as defined in RCW 76.06.020.
(b) In order to minimize adverse impacts to public resources,
control measures must be based on integrated pest management, as
defined in RCW 17.15.010, and must follow forest practices rules
relating to road construction and maintenance, timber harvest, and
forest chemicals, to the extent possible without compromising control
objectives.
(c) Agencies conducting or directing control efforts must provide
advance notice to the appropriate regulatory staff of the department of
the operations that would be subject to exemption from forest practices
application or notification requirements.
(d) When the appropriate regulatory staff of the department are
notified under (c) of this subsection, they must consult with the
landowner, interested agencies, and affected tribes, and assist the
notifying agencies in the development of integrated pest management
plans that comply with forest practices rules as required under (b) of
this subsection.
(e) Nothing under this subsection relieves agencies conducting or
directing control efforts from requirements of the federal clean water
act as administered by the department of ecology under RCW 90.48.260.
(f) Forest lands where trees have been cut as part of an exotic
forest insect or disease control effort under this subsection are
subject to reforestation requirements under RCW 76.09.070.
(g) The exemption from obtaining approved forest practices
applications or notifications does not apply to forest practices
conducted after the governor, the director of the department of
agriculture, or the commissioner of public lands have declared that an
emergency no longer exists because control objectives have been met,
that there is no longer an imminent threat, or that there is no longer
a good likelihood of control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
If a county, city, town, or regional governmental entity receives
a notice of conversion to nonforestry use by the department under RCW
76.09.060, then the county, city, town, or regional governmental entity
must deny all applications for permits or approvals, including building
permits and subdivision approvals, relating to nonforestry uses of the
land that is the subject of the notification. The prohibition created
by this section must be enforced by the county, city, town, or regional
governmental entity:
(1) For a period of six years from the approval date of the
applicable forest practices application or notification or the date
that the department was made aware of the harvest activities; or
(2) Until the following activities are completed for the land that
is the subject of the notice of conversion to a nonforestry use:
(a) Full compliance with chapter 43.21C RCW, if applicable;
(b) The department has notified the county, city, town, or regional
governmental entity that the landowner has resolved any outstanding
final orders or decisions issued by the department; and
(c) A determination is made by the county, city, town, or regional
governmental entity as to whether or not the condition of the land in
question is in full compliance with local ordinances and regulations.
If full compliance is not found, a mitigation plan to address
violations of local ordinances or regulations must be required for the
parcel in question by the county, city, town, or regional governmental
entity. Required mitigation plans must be prepared by the landowner
and approved by the county, city, town, or regional governmental
entity. Once approved, the mitigation plan must be implemented by the
landowner. Mitigation measures that may be required include, but are
not limited to, revegetation requirements to plant and maintain trees
of sufficient maturity and appropriate species composition to restore
critical area and buffer function or to be in compliance with
applicable local government regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a landowner who did not state an intent to convert his or
her land to a nonforestry use decides to convert his or her land to a
nonforestry use within six years of receiving an approved forest
practices application or notification under this chapter, the landowner
must:
(a) Stop all forest practices activities on the parcels subject to
the proposed land use conversion to a nonforestry use;
(b) Contact the department of ecology and the applicable county,
city, town, or regional governmental entity to begin the permitting
process; and
(c) Notify the department and withdraw any applicable applications
or notifications or request a new application for conversion.
(2) Upon being contacted by a landowner under this section, the
county, city, town, or regional governmental entity must:
(a) Notify the department and request from the department the
status of any applicable forest practices applications, notifications,
or final orders or decisions; and
(b) Complete the following activities:
(i) Require that the landowner be in full compliance with chapter
43.21C RCW, if applicable;
(ii) Receive notification from the department that the landowner
has resolved any outstanding final orders or decisions issued by the
department; and
(iii) Make a determination as to whether or not the condition of
the land in question is in full compliance with local ordinances and
regulations. If full compliance is not found, a mitigation plan to
address violations of local ordinances or regulations must be required
for the parcel in question by the county, city, town, or regional
governmental entity. Required mitigation plans must be prepared by the
landowner and approved by the county, city, town, or regional
governmental entity. Once approved, the mitigation plan must be
implemented by the landowner. Mitigation measures that may be required
include, but are not limited to, revegetation requirements to plant and
maintain trees of sufficient maturity and appropriate species
composition to restore critical area and buffer function or to be in
compliance with applicable local government regulations.

Sec. 4 RCW 76.09.070 and 1987 c 95 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After the completion of a logging operation, satisfactory
reforestation, as defined by the rules and regulations promulgated by
the board, shall be completed within three years((: PROVIDED, That:
(1))). However:
(a) A longer period may be authorized if seed or seedlings are not
available; (((2)))
(b) A period of up to five years may be allowed where a natural
regeneration plan is approved by the department; and (((3)))
(c) The department may identify low-productivity lands on which it
may allow for a period of up to ten years for natural regeneration.
(2)(a) Upon the completion of a reforestation operation a report on
such operation shall be filed with the department of natural resources.
(b) Within twelve months of receipt of such a report the department
shall inspect the reforestation operation, and shall determine either
that the reforestation operation has been properly completed or that
further reforestation and inspection is necessary.
(3) Satisfactory reforestation is the obligation of the owner of
the land as defined by forest practices regulations, except the owner
of perpetual rights to cut timber owned separately from the land is
responsible for satisfactory reforestation. The reforestation
obligation shall become the obligation of a new owner if the land or
perpetual timber rights are sold or otherwise transferred.
(4)(a) Prior to the sale or transfer of land or perpetual timber
rights subject to a reforestation obligation or to a notice of
conversion to a nonforestry use issued under RCW 76.09.060, the seller
shall notify the buyer of the existence and nature of the obligation
and the buyer shall sign a notice ((of reforestation obligation))
indicating the buyer's knowledge ((thereof)) of all obligations.
(b) The notice shall be on a form prepared by the department and
shall be sent to the department by the seller at the time of sale or
transfer of the land or perpetual timber rights.
(c) If the seller fails to notify the buyer about the reforestation
obligation or the notice of conversion to a nonforestry use, the seller
shall pay the buyer's costs related to reforestation or mitigation
under section 3 of this act, including all legal costs which include
reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred by the buyer in enforcing the
reforestation obligation or mitigation requirements against the seller.
(d) Failure by the seller to send the required notice to the
department at the time of sale shall be prima facie evidence, in an
action by the buyer against the seller for costs related to
reforestation or mitigation, that the seller did not notify the buyer
of the reforestation obligation or potential mitigation requirements
prior to sale.
(5) The forest practices regulations may provide alternatives to or
limitations on the applicability of reforestation requirements with
respect to forest lands being converted in whole or in part to another
use which is compatible with timber growing. The forest practices
regulations may identify classifications and/or areas of forest land
that have the likelihood of future conversion to urban development
within a ten year period. The reforestation requirements may be
modified or eliminated on such lands((: PROVIDED, That)). However,
such identification and/or such conversion to urban development must be
consistent with any local or regional land use plans or ordinances.

Sec. 5 RCW 76.09.065 and 2000 c 11 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Effective July 1, 1997, an)) Applicants shall pay an
application fee ((and a recording fee, if applicable,)) at the time an
application or notification is submitted to the department or to the
local governmental entity as provided in this chapter.
(2) For applications and notifications submitted to the department,
the application fee shall be fifty dollars for class II, III, and IV
forest practices applications or notifications relating to the
commercial harvest of timber. ((However, the fee shall be five hundred
dollars for class IV forest practices applications on lands being
converted to other uses or on lands which are not to be reforested
because of the likelihood of future conversion to urban development or
on lands that are contained within "urban growth areas," designated
pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, except the fee shall be fifty dollars
on those lands where the forest landowner provides:
(a) A written statement of intent signed by the forest landowner
not to convert to a use other than commercial forest product operations
for ten years, accompanied by either a written forest management plan
acceptable to the department or documentation that the land is enrolled
under the provisions of chapter 84.33 RCW; or
(b) A conversion option harvest plan approved by the local
governmental entity and submitted to the department as part of the
forest practices application.
All money collected from fees under this subsection shall be deposited
in the state general fund.))
(3) For applications submitted to the local governmental entity for
timber harvest necessary to convert lands to a use other than
commercial timber operations or for road construction necessary to
convert lands to a use other than commercial timber operations, or for
applications for forest practices within an urban growth area
designated under chapter 36.70A RCW, the fee shall be ((five hundred
dollars for class IV forest practices on lands being converted to other
uses or lands that are contained within "urban growth areas,"
designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, except as otherwise provided
in this section, unless a different fee is otherwise provided by the
local governmental entity.
(4) Recording fees shall be as provided in chapter 36.18 RCW))
established by the local government.
(((5))) (4) An application fee under subsection (2) of this section
shall be refunded or credited to the applicant if either the
application or notification is disapproved by the department or the
application or notification is withdrawn by the applicant due to
restrictions imposed by the department.

Sec. 6 RCW 76.09.067 and 1998 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the
contrary, for the purposes of RCW 76.09.050(1)((,)) and 76.09.060(((3)
(b)(i)(A) and (c), and 76.09.065(2)(a))), where timber rights have been
transferred by deed to a perpetual owner who is different from the
forest landowner, the owner of perpetual timber rights may sign the
forest practices application ((and the statement of intent not to
convert for a set period of time)) or notification. The forest
practices application is not complete until the holder of perpetual
timber rights has submitted evidence to the department that the signed
forest practices application ((and the signed statement of intent
have)) or notification has been ((served on)) received by the forest
landowner.

Sec. 7 RCW 76.09.240 and 2002 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2005, each county and each city shall adopt
ordinances or promulgate regulations setting standards for those Class
IV forest practices regulated by local government. The regulations
shall: (a) Establish minimum standards for Class IV forest practices;
(b) set forth necessary administrative provisions; and (c) establish
procedures for the collection and administration of forest practices
and recording fees as set forth in this chapter.
(2) Class IV forest practices regulations shall be administered and
enforced by the counties and cities that promulgate them.
(3) The forest practices board shall continue to promulgate
regulations and the department shall continue to administer and enforce
the regulations promulgated by the board in each county and each city
for all forest practices as provided in this chapter until such time
as, in the opinion of the department, the county or city has
promulgated forest practices regulations that meet the requirements as
set forth in this section and that meet or exceed the standards set
forth by the board in regulations in effect at the time the local
regulations are adopted. Regulations promulgated by the county or city
thereafter shall be reviewed in the usual manner set forth for county
or city rules or ordinances. Amendments to local ordinances must meet
or exceed the forest practices rules at the time the local ordinances
are amended.
(a) Department review of the initial regulations promulgated by a
county or city shall take place upon written request by the county or
city. The department, in consultation with the department of ecology,
may approve or disapprove the regulations in whole or in part.
(b) Until January 1, 2006, the department shall provide technical
assistance to all counties or cities that have adopted forest practices
regulations acceptable to the department and that have assumed
regulatory authority over all Class IV forest practices within their
jurisdiction.
(c) Decisions by the department approving or disapproving the
initial regulations promulgated by a county or city may be appealed to
the forest practices appeals board, which has exclusive jurisdiction to
review the department's approval or disapproval of regulations
promulgated by counties and cities.
(4) For those forest practices over which the board and the
department maintain regulatory authority no county, city, municipality,
or other local or regional governmental entity shall adopt or enforce
any law, ordinance, or regulation pertaining to forest practices,
except that to the extent otherwise permitted by law, such entities may
exercise any:
(a) Land use planning or zoning authority: PROVIDED, That exercise
of such authority may regulate forest practices only: (i) Where the
application submitted under RCW 76.09.060 as now or hereafter amended
indicates that the lands have been or will be converted to a use other
than commercial forest product production; or (ii) on lands which have
been platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17 RCW:
PROVIDED, That no permit system solely for forest practices shall be
allowed; that any additional or more stringent regulations shall not be
inconsistent with the forest practices regulations enacted under this
chapter; and such local regulations shall not unreasonably prevent
timber harvesting;
(b) Taxing powers;
(c) Regulatory authority with respect to public health; and
(d) Authority granted by chapter 90.58 RCW, the "Shoreline
Management Act of 1971".
(5) All counties and cities adopting or enforcing regulations or
ordinances under this section shall include in the regulation or
ordinance a requirement that a verification accompany every permit
issued for forest land by that county or city associated with the
conversion to a use other than commercial timber operation, as that
term is defined in RCW 76.09.020, that verifies that the land in
question is not or has not been subject to a notice of conversion to
nonforestry uses under RCW 76.09.060 during the six-year period prior
to the submission of a permit application.

--- END ---