BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.0301 and 1994 c 301 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon review by any court, or appellate body, of a determination of
the valuation of property for purposes of taxation, when the increase
in valuation is five percent or less per year, it shall be presumed
that the determination of the public official charged with the duty of
establishing ((such)) this value is correct but this presumption shall
not be a defense against any correction indicated by clear, cogent, and
convincing evidence. When the increase in valuation is more than five
percent per year, it is the burden of the public official charged with
the duty of establishing this value to show that it is correct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act applies to court or
appellate reviews commenced on or after August 1, 2007.

--- END ---