BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to a
lodging business of amenities.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section:
(a) "Amenities" means tangible personal property exclusively
purchased for the consumption and use of lodging guests and includes,
but is not limited to: Body lotion; combs; conditioner; cotton balls;
cotton swabs; envelopes and pencils; gift baskets and their contents;
hairnets; magazines; matches; mouthwash; notepads; pens; postcards;
razors; sewing kits; shampoo; shaving foam and shaving cream; shoe
mitts; shower caps; slippers; soap; shower gels; stationery; tissue
paper; toilet paper; toothbrushes; and toothpaste.
(b) "Lodging business" means a person that furnishes lodging
taxable by the state under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of amenities by a lodging business.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

--- END ---