BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The department of ecology has clear authority, allowable under
federal law, to require enforceable schedules for the removal and
treatment of all hazardous wastes to the extent practicable, including
mixed wastes, stored in underground tanks, as well as cleanup of the
leaks and releases from the tanks to the extent practicable;
(b) Advisory boards at toxic cleanup and noncompliant sites are
valuable to the state in providing a vehicle for public input to the
department of ecology and the sites;
(c) One such board, the Hanford advisory board, is a product of
several years of negotiations resulting in a forum bringing all
stakeholders to the table, and provides significant assistance to the
state in exercising its responsibility to oversee cleanup of the
Hanford nuclear reservation. Changes to the Hanford advisory board
would be detrimental to the state of Washington;
(d) There is compelling evidence as set forth in an August 2006
petition signed by more than twenty members and alternates of the
Hanford advisory board that the board's continued existence is
threatened by proposals from the United States department of energy to
revise the board's charter and potentially damage this forum that
brings disparate parties together for mutually beneficial dialogue;
(e) Advice number 13 from the Hanford advisory board dated February
3, 1995, recommends that additional waste not be added to a site not in
compliance with state environmental laws, and this advice has not been
followed by site managers;
(f) Advice number 2 from the Hanford advisory board dated July 1994
recommends that disposal facilities on the Hanford nuclear reservation
should be reserved for waste from the site and not accept off-site
waste. This advice has not been followed;
(g) Advice numbers 170 and 153 from the Hanford advisory board
dated 2005 and 2003, among others, recommends that waste not be buried
in unlined burial grounds, and waste in unlined burial trenches should
be characterized and retrieved. This advice also has not been
followed; and
(h) Advice number 192 from the Hanford advisory board dated
September 2006 recommends a mandate of one hundred percent treatment
capacity for all wastes and that storage tanks be emptied to the extent
practicable. This advice also has not been followed.
(2) Therefore, it is the purpose of this act and the policy of the
state of Washington to ensure cleanup and compliance at sites at which
hazardous wastes have seriously contaminated the environment and where
ongoing violations of chapter 70.105D RCW are projected to take more
than twenty years to complete the cleanup and compliance. It is
further the purpose of this act to ensure public involvement in the
cleanup of these sites.
(3) It is further the policy of the state to ensure cleanup and
compliance at these sites before permitting the addition of more waste
that is not generated from the cleanup of the site, and which may add
to long-term cumulative impacts to health and the environment, until
the hazardous waste on-site has been cleaned up and is stored, treated,
or disposed of in compliance with all state and federal laws.
(4) It is further the policy of the state to discontinue the use
of, and ensure characterization and remediation of, unlined trenches
where hazardous wastes have been disposed. These policies must guide
state action for approval of plans, permits, orders, or agreements
under the federal facility compliance act of 1992 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6961
et seq.). It is not the intent of this act to interfere with the
transportation, manufacturing, storage, or use of any hazardous
substance necessary for medical research, medical treatment,
manufacturing or industrial processes, or national defense.
(5) This act applies to all sites with releases of hazardous waste
as defined in section 2 of this act that are not in compliance with
state or federal hazardous waste laws, including but not limited to the
Hanford nuclear reservation. This act does not expand the scope of
hazardous waste regulated under chapter 70.105 RCW or the level at
which hazardous wastes are regulated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.105 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 1 through
5 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise. Terms not
defined in this section have the same meaning as defined in RCW
70.105.010.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Federal resource conservation and recovery act" means the
federal resource conservation and recovery act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et
seq.).
(3) "Hanford" means the geographic area comprising the Hanford
nuclear reservation, owned and operated by the United States department
of energy or any successor federal agency.
(4) "Hazardous waste" includes all dangerous and extremely
hazardous waste. "Hazardous waste" also includes solid wastes composed
of both radioactive and hazardous components having the characteristics
of dangerous waste including, but not limited to, being carcinogenic,
mutagenic, or teratogenic, to the fullest extent authorized for state
regulation under the federal resource conservation and recovery act and
the federal facility compliance act of 1992 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6961 et
seq.). "Hazardous waste" does not include source, special nuclear, or
byproduct material as defined by the atomic energy act of 1954 (42
U.S.C. Sec. 2011 et seq.) except to the extent authorized by federal
law.
(5) "Site" means the contiguous geographic area under the same
ownership, lease, or operation where a hazardous waste facility or
units are located, or where there has been a release of hazardous
substances. In the event of a release of hazardous substances, "site"
includes any area, or body of surface or ground water, where a
hazardous substance has been deposited, stored, disposed of, placed,
migrated to, or otherwise come to be located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Permits issued under this chapter must provide for the
operation and funding of a broadly representative advisory board at any
site or facility at which all of the following apply:
(a) There has been a release of hazardous substances at levels
exceeding relevant state standards for remedial or corrective action
under this chapter or chapter 70.105D RCW;
(b) There are substantial violations of storage, treatment, and
disposal requirements under this chapter or the federal resource
conservation and recovery act; and
(c) The department estimates that it will require more than a total
of twenty years to remediate and bring the site into compliance with
this chapter.
(2) The advisory board must include:
(a) Seven representatives of elected local governing bodies;
(b) One representative of local business interests, the
representative having no financial interest in the site;
(c) Five representatives of local workers who are not in management
positions, at least two of whom must represent recognized labor unions
when present in the remediation workforce;
(d) One representative of local environmental interests;
(e) Five representatives of regional citizen, environmental, and
public interest organizations with an active interest in cleanup of the
site, drawn from and nominated by those regional organizations;
(f) One local representative of public health organizations;
(g) One regional representative of public health organizations;
(h) Three representatives of tribal governments, no two of which
may be members from the same tribe;
(i) Two representatives of any adjacent state potentially affected
by reason of being downstream of a release, one of whom must represent
the broad interests of the citizens of such a state and one of whom may
be selected by that state's governor; and
(j) Up to four at large representatives who have expressed a
general interest in cleanup issues at the site and who might otherwise
contribute to ethnic, racial, or gender diversity on the board. These
at large representatives should be selected to bring additional
leadership skills and technical, economic, and hazardous waste
expertise to the board. Other, nonvoting ex officio members may also
be appointed as necessary.
(3) If such an independent advisory board exists for a site or
sites on the effective date of this section, that board will be deemed
to fulfill the requirements of this act and must be maintained under a
charter agreed to by the department in its present form as a
requirement of any permit under this chapter for the site. To meet the
criteria of independence: (a) The advisory board must be able to
address relevant issues as selected by board members with advice of the
department without limitation by a permittee, potentially liable party
under chapter 70.105D RCW, or other entity; (b) the representatives of
the entities described as composing the board must be selected by those
entities, unless an individual's participation violates applicable
standards for conflicts of interest; and (c) adequate funding to meet
the duties of the board as described in this chapter is ensured. If
any provision of the charter is contrary to state law, the department
shall inform the board and provide a reasonable period for the charter
to be amended to eliminate any inconsistency with state law. If an
advisory board for a site or sites does not exist on the effective date
of this section, the department shall provide for the selection and
initial formation of the board.
(4) Permits issued under this chapter for such a site or facility
must specify that the advisory board be continued with adequate
funding, provided by the owner or operator of the site, to perform its
chartered functions until final closure or certification of the
completion of remedial or corrective action.
(5) The department shall request the advisory board created or
maintained under this section to advise the department on procedural
and substantive matters necessary for informed public involvement and
comment. The department shall provide the board a reasonable
opportunity to comment upon a proposed remedial, corrective, or closure
regulatory action by the department, and the department shall consider
and respond to timely comments from the board before making a decision.
(6) Within the charges assessed under RCW 70.105.280, the
department shall include the reasonable costs for public involvement.
Public involvement opportunities must be provided for all permits for
federal and for nonfederal facilities. Relevant public involvement
costs include those for programs administered by the department under
the model toxics control act, chapter 70.105D RCW. The charges must
not discriminate against federal functions, must be based on a fair
approximation of use of the regulatory system, and must be structured
to produce revenues that will not exceed the total cost to the state of
the benefits to be supplied by the public involvement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Facilities storing hazardous waste in underground tanks from
which there have been releases, or storing wastes in violation of
storage and treatment requirements under this chapter or the federal
resource conservation and recovery act, must be closed in compliance
with the requirements of this section. Permits issued under this
chapter governing the retrieval, treatment, and disposal of hazardous
waste in underground storage tanks must require retrieval of hazardous
wastes from the tanks, and characterization and removal and remediation
of releases, to the maximum extent practicable. Retrieval from single
shell tanks must be placed on an enforceable schedule designed to
prevent releases and reduce other risks from noncompliant storage. The
department may issue a permit relating to the closure of waste
management units containing tank systems consisting of one or more
interconnected tanks in which hazardous wastes were previously or are
currently stored only after the department considers the cumulative
impacts of all tank residuals and leaks from such systems at the site
under chapter 43.21C RCW. Permit actions may not be taken to close
individual tanks, or which may prevent the retrieval of residual
hazardous wastes remaining in a tank, in any element of the tank
system, or in the soil due to leaks from the tank system, prior to
compliance with this section and determination of the quantity, nature,
and potential impacts from the residuals or releases. The department
shall require all potentially effective and practicable actions to be
taken to characterize and remediate releases and potential releases
prior to authorizing use of a landfill closure, as defined by the
department in rules implementing this chapter, for underground
hazardous waste tank systems. The department may require research and
development of technologies for characterization or retrieval under
this section.
(2) The department shall adopt a plan to treat and dispose of one
hundred percent of the hazardous waste retrieved from underground
storage tanks. The department shall incorporate into permits for the
facility or site an enforceable schedule for constructing, or obtaining
the services of, treatment facilities on a timeline sufficient to
ensure that the waste will be treated when retrieved from the tanks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Permits under this chapter are required and conditioned under
this section for sites or facilities meeting the following criteria:
(a) A release of hazardous waste has occurred and it is estimated
that it will take twenty or more years to remediate following the best
available science;
(b) The release, or the cumulative impact of all hazardous waste
releases at the site, are projected by the department to have the
potential to exceed surface or ground water standards established under
federal or state laws, including but not limited to maximum
concentration limits, or to exceed cleanup standards adopted to protect
human health or the environment under RCW 70.105D.030; and
(c) The site contains units or facilities that are in substantial
noncompliance with the requirements of this chapter or any order or
agreement under this chapter or chapter 70.105D RCW. Evidence of
substantial noncompliance includes, but is not limited to: Storage of
hazardous wastes without treatment capacity in excess of relevant time
limitations; storage of hazardous wastes in unlined soil trenches
without characterization and appropriate retrieval and treatment;
storage of hazardous wastes in single shell or other noncompliant tanks
or units; failure to empty storage vessels in compliance with this
chapter; or failure to plan for or respond to emergencies or to report
releases.
(2) For facilities and sites meeting the criteria of subsection (1)
of this section, the department shall not issue a permit, or modify any
existing permit, to allow for the treatment, storage, or disposal of
any additional hazardous wastes not generated at the site or facility
as part of a remedial or corrective action, except as allowed under
subsection (3) of this section, until:
(a) The site or facility is in full compliance with the
requirements of this chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter and
the federal resource conservation and recovery act, for obtaining and
maintaining a closure permit for any facility or unit from which a
release of hazardous substances has occurred or is threatened to occur,
after characterization and corrective action;
(b) The department has issued a formal determination that no
further remedial action is necessary to remedy such a release under
chapter 70.105D RCW;
(c) Cumulative impacts from the facility and from other units and
releases at the site have been determined and a risk budget adopted for
the facility, which ensures that the cumulative impacts and health
risks, including cancer risk from all carcinogenic releases, will not
exceed relevant standards under chapter 70.105D RCW or other laws; and
(d) The department has formally determined that the noncompliant
conditions no longer exist at the site or facility and that the site or
facility remains in substantial compliance with all relevant orders or
agreements.
(3) The department may permit treatment capacity at sites subject
to the limitations of this section to be utilized for remediation or
cleanup wastes from other sites, consistent with a site treatment plan
approved by the department under the federal resource conservation and
recovery act, provided that the department determines, after public
notice and comment and consideration of impacts and alternatives in an
environmental impact statement prepared under chapter 43.21C RCW, that
use of the capacity will not:
(a) Significantly increase any emissions, discharges, risks, or
consequences of potential accidents;
(b) Result in permanent disposal of off-site wastes in the soil at
the site when the disposal would otherwise violate this section;
(c) Be stored in excess of any applicable time limits or any
applicable requirement;
(d) Decrease funding for cleanup and corrective actions at the
site; or
(e) Result in delay of treatment or remediation of wastes at the
site.
(4) The department shall ensure that permits require discontinuing
the use of, and require characterization and remediation of, unlined
trenches where hazardous wastes have been disposed. The department
shall order any site owner or operator utilizing landfills or burial
grounds containing unlined soil trenches in which hazardous wastes are
reasonably believed by the department to have been disposed to:
(a) Cease disposal of all hazardous or solid wastes in unlined soil
trenches, to the extent that the department is not preempted from
regulation of such wastes by the atomic energy act of 1954 (42 U.S.C.
Sec. 2011 et seq.) or other federal law, and provided that such an
order does not interfere with obligations of the state under the
Northwest interstate compact for low-level radioactive waste
management;
(b) Initiate an investigation to provide the department with an
inventory, based on actual characterization of trenches, of all
hazardous wastes disposed in unlined trenches;
(c) Initiate an investigation of releases or potential releases of
any hazardous substances from unlined trenches;
(d) Prepare a plan for waste retrieval, treatment, closure, and
monitoring for the unlined soil trenches; and
(e) Install within two years and maintain a ground water and soil
column monitoring system that is in compliance with all requirements of
this chapter and the federal resource conservation and recovery act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The provisions of this act are to be
liberally construed to effectuate the policies and purposes of this
act. In the event of conflict between the provisions of this act and
any other act, the provisions of this act shall govern.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---