BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 40.24.020 and 1991 c 23 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Address" means a residential street address, school address,
or work address of an individual, as specified on the individual's
application to be a program participant under this chapter.
(2) (("Program participant" means a person certified as a program
participant under RCW 40.24.030.
(3))) "Domestic violence" means an act as defined in RCW 10.99.020
and includes a threat of such acts committed against an individual in
a domestic situation, regardless of whether these acts or threats have
been reported to law enforcement officers.
(3) "Program participant" means a person certified as a program
participant under RCW 40.24.030.
(4) "Stalking" means an act defined in RCW 9A.46.110 and includes
a threat of such acts committed against an individual, regardless of
whether these acts or threats have been reported to law enforcement
officers.

Sec. 2 RCW 40.24.030 and 2001 c 28 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An adult person, a parent or guardian acting on behalf of a
minor, or a guardian acting on behalf of an incapacitated person, as
defined in RCW 11.88.010, may apply to the secretary of state to have
an address designated by the secretary of state serve as the person's
address or the address of the minor or incapacitated person. The
secretary of state shall approve an application if it is filed in the
manner and on the form prescribed by the secretary of state and if it
contains:
(a) A sworn statement, under penalty of perjury, by the applicant
that the applicant has good reason to believe (i) that the applicant,
or the minor or incapacitated person on whose behalf the application is
made, is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking;
and (ii) that the applicant fears for his or her safety or his or her
children's safety, or the safety of the minor or incapacitated person
on whose behalf the application is made;
(b) If applicable, a sworn statement, under penalty of perjury, by
the applicant, that the applicant has reason to believe they are a
victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking perpetrated by
an employee of a law enforcement agency;
(c) A designation of the secretary of state as agent for purposes
of service of process and for the purpose of receipt of mail;
(((c))) (d) The ((mailing)) residential address and any telephone
number where the applicant can be contacted by the secretary of state,
((and the phone number or numbers where the applicant can be called by
the secretary of state;
(d) The new address or addresses that the applicant requests))
which shall not be disclosed ((for the reason that)) because disclosure
will increase the risk of domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking;
(e) The signature of the applicant and of any individual or
representative of any office designated in writing under RCW 40.24.080
who assisted in the preparation of the application, and the date on
which the applicant signed the application.
(2) Applications shall be filed with the office of the secretary of
state.
(3) Upon filing a properly completed application, the secretary of
state shall certify the applicant as a program participant. Applicants
shall be certified for four years following the date of filing unless
the certification is withdrawn or invalidated before that date. The
secretary of state shall by rule establish a renewal procedure.
(4) A person who falsely attests in an application that disclosure
of the applicant's address would endanger the applicant's safety or the
safety of the applicant's children or the minor or incapacitated person
on whose behalf the application is made, or who knowingly provides
false or incorrect information upon making an application, shall be
punishable under RCW 40.16.030 or other applicable statutes.

Sec. 3 RCW 40.24.040 and 1991 c 23 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the program participant obtains a ((name)) legal change of
identity, he or she loses certification as a program participant.
(2) The secretary of state may cancel a program participant's
certification if there is a change in the residential address ((from
the one listed on the application)), unless the program participant
provides the secretary of state with ((seven)) at least two days' prior
notice in writing of the change of address.
(3) The secretary of state may cancel certification of a program
participant if mail forwarded by the secretary to the program
participant's address is returned as nondeliverable, refused, or
unclaimed.
(4) The secretary of state shall cancel certification of a program
participant who applies using false information.

Sec. 4 RCW 40.24.060 and 1991 c 23 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) A program participant who is otherwise qualified to vote
may ((apply as a service)) register as an ongoing absentee voter under
RCW ((29.01.155. The program participant shall automatically receive
absentee ballots for all elections in the jurisdictions for which that
individual resides in the same manner as absentee voters who qualify
under RCW 29.36.013, except that the program participant shall not be
required to reapply following January 1st of each odd-numbered year.))
29A.40.040 The county auditor shall transmit the absentee ballot to
the program participant at the mailing address ((designated by the
participant in his or her application as a service voter)) provided.
Neither the name nor the address of a program participant shall be
included in any list of registered voters available to the public.
(((2) The county auditor may not make the participant's address
contained in voter registration records available for public inspection
or copying except under the following circumstances:
(a) If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law
enforcement agency; and
(b) If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the
order.))

Sec. 5 RCW 40.24.070 and 1999 c 53 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state may not make any records in a program
participant's file available for inspection or copying, other than the
address designated by the secretary of state, except under the
following circumstances:
(1) If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law
enforcement agency; and
(a) The participant's application contains no indication that he or
she has been a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking
perpetrated by a law enforcement employee; and
(b) The request is in accordance with official law enforcement
duties and is in writing on official law enforcement letterhead
stationery and signed by the law enforcement agency's chief officer, or
his or her designee; or
(2) If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the
order; ((or
(3) To verify the participation of a specific program participant,
in which case the secretary may only confirm information supplied by
the requester)) and
(a) The request is made by a nonlaw enforcement agency; or
(b) The participant's file indicates he or she has reason to
believe he or she is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking perpetrated by a law enforcement employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 40.24 RCW
to read as follows:
A court order for address confidentiality program participant
information may only be issued upon a probable cause finding by a
judicial officer that release of address confidentiality program
participant information is legally necessary:
(1) In the course of a criminal investigation or prosecution; or
(2) To prevent immediate risk to a minor and meet the statutory
requirements of the Washington child welfare system.
Any court order so issued will prohibit the release of the
information to any other agency or person not a party to the order.

--- END ---