BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.145 and 2003 c 227 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A permanency plan shall be developed no later than sixty days
from the time the supervising agency assumes responsibility for
providing services, including placing the child, or at the time of a
hearing under RCW 13.34.130, whichever occurs first. The permanency
planning process continues until a permanency planning goal is achieved
or dependency is dismissed. The planning process shall include
reasonable efforts to return the child to the parent's home.
(a) Whenever a child is placed in out-of-home care pursuant to RCW
13.34.130, the agency that has custody of the child shall provide the
court with a written permanency plan of care directed towards securing
a safe, stable, and permanent home for the child as soon as possible.
The plan shall identify one of the following outcomes as the primary
goal and may also identify additional outcomes as alternative goals:
Return of the child to the home of the child's parent, guardian, or
legal custodian; adoption; guardianship; permanent legal custody; long-term relative or foster care, until the child is age eighteen, with a
written agreement between the parties and the care provider; a
responsible living skills program; and independent living, if
appropriate and if the child is age sixteen or older and the provisions
of subsection (2) of this section are met.
(b) The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency plan may
change over time based upon the circumstances of the particular case.
(c) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest
possible date, preferably before the child has been in out-of-home care
for fifteen months. In cases where parental rights have been
terminated, the child is legally free for adoption, and adoption has
been identified as the primary permanency planning goal, it shall be a
goal to complete the adoption within six months following entry of the
termination order.
(d) For purposes related to permanency planning:
(i) "Guardianship" means a dependency guardianship, a legal
guardianship pursuant to chapter 11.88 RCW, or equivalent laws of
another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(ii) "Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered
pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW.
(iii) "Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to
chapter 26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or of a federally
recognized Indian tribe.
(2) Whenever a permanency plan identifies independent living as a
goal, the plan shall also specifically identify the services that will
be provided to assist the child to make a successful transition from
foster care to independent living. Before the court approves
independent living as a permanency plan of care, the court shall make
a finding that the provision of services to assist the child in making
a transition from foster care to independent living will allow the
child to manage his or her financial, personal, social, educational,
and nonfinancial affairs. The department shall not discharge a child
to an independent living situation before the child is eighteen years
of age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64
RCW.
(3) A permanency planning hearing shall be held in all cases where
the child has remained in out-of-home care for at least nine months and
an adoption decree, guardianship order, or permanent custody order has
not previously been entered. The hearing shall take place no later
than twelve months following commencement of the current placement
episode.
(4) Whenever a child is removed from the home of a dependency
guardian or long-term relative or foster care provider, and the child
is not returned to the home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian
but is placed in out-of-home care, a permanency planning hearing shall
take place no later than twelve months, as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, following the date of removal unless, prior to the
hearing, the child returns to the home of the dependency guardian or
long-term care provider, the child is placed in the home of the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian, an adoption decree, guardianship order,
or a permanent custody order is entered, or the dependency is
dismissed.
(5) No later than ten working days prior to the permanency planning
hearing, the agency having custody of the child shall submit a written
permanency plan to the court and shall mail a copy of the plan to all
parties and their legal counsel, if any.
(6) At the permanency planning hearing, the court shall enter
findings as required by RCW 13.34.138 and shall review the permanency
plan prepared by the agency. If the child has resided in the home of
a foster parent or relative for more than six months prior to the
permanency planning hearing, the court shall also enter a finding
regarding whether the foster parent or relative was informed of the
hearing as required in RCW 74.13.280 and 13.34.138. If a goal of long-term foster or relative care has been achieved prior to the permanency
planning hearing, the court shall review the child's status to
determine whether the placement and the plan for the child's care
remain appropriate. In cases where the primary permanency planning
goal has not been achieved, the court shall inquire regarding the
reasons why the primary goal has not been achieved and determine what
needs to be done to make it possible to achieve the primary goal. In
all cases, the court shall:
(a)(i) Order the permanency plan prepared by the agency to be
implemented; or
(ii) Modify the permanency plan, and order implementation of the
modified plan; and
(b)(i) Order the child returned home only if the court finds that
a reason for removal as set forth in RCW 13.34.130 no longer exists; or
(ii) Order the child to remain in out-of-home care for a limited
specified time period while efforts are made to implement the
permanency plan.
(7) If the court orders the child returned home, casework
supervision shall continue for at least six months, at which time a
review hearing shall be held pursuant to RCW 13.34.138, and the court
shall determine the need for continued intervention.
(8) If a child is removed from home due to allegations of abuse or
neglect, returned home, and subsequently removed and placed in
out-of-home care, the court shall hold a permanency hearing no later
than thirty days from the date of the removal to determine the
appropriate action, including a change in the permanency plan or the
filing of a termination petition. The best interests of the child
shall be the primary consideration in determining the appropriate
action.
(9) The juvenile court may hear a petition for permanent legal
custody when: (a) The court has ordered implementation of a permanency
plan that includes permanent legal custody; and (b) the party pursuing
the permanent legal custody is the party identified in the permanency
plan as the prospective legal custodian. During the pendency of such
proceeding, the court shall conduct review hearings and further
permanency planning hearings as provided in this chapter. At the
conclusion of the legal guardianship or permanent legal custody
proceeding, a juvenile court hearing shall be held for the purpose of
determining whether dependency should be dismissed. If a guardianship
or permanent custody order has been entered, the dependency shall be
dismissed.
(((9))) (10) Continued juvenile court jurisdiction under this
chapter shall not be a barrier to the entry of an order establishing a
legal guardianship or permanent legal custody when the requirements of
subsection (((8))) (9) of this section are met.
(((10))) (11) Following the first permanency planning hearing, the
court shall hold a further permanency planning hearing in accordance
with this section at least once every twelve months until a permanency
planning goal is achieved or the dependency is dismissed, whichever
occurs first.
(((11))) (12) Except as provided in RCW 13.34.235, the status of
all dependent children shall continue to be reviewed by the court at
least once every six months, in accordance with RCW 13.34.138, until
the dependency is dismissed. Prior to the second permanency planning
hearing, the agency that has custody of the child shall consider
whether to file a petition for termination of parental rights.
(((12))) (13) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the
ability of the agency that has custody of the child to file a petition
for termination of parental rights or a guardianship petition at any
time following the establishment of dependency. Upon the filing of
such a petition, a fact-finding hearing shall be scheduled and held in
accordance with this chapter unless the agency requests dismissal of
the petition prior to the hearing or unless the parties enter an agreed
order terminating parental rights, establishing guardianship, or
otherwise resolving the matter.
(((13))) (14) The approval of a permanency plan that does not
contemplate return of the child to the parent does not relieve the
supervising agency of its obligation to provide reasonable services,
under this chapter, intended to effectuate the return of the child to
the parent, including but not limited to, visitation rights. The court
shall consider the child's relationships with siblings in accordance
with RCW 13.34.130.
(((14))) (15) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the
procedural due process rights of any party in a termination or
guardianship proceeding filed under this chapter.

--- END ---