BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.36.010 and 2001 c 270 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Blended fuel" means a mixture of motor vehicle fuel and
another liquid, other than a de minimis amount of the liquid, that can
be used as a fuel to propel a motor vehicle.
(2) "Bond" means a bond duly executed with a corporate surety
qualified under chapter 48.28 RCW, which bond is payable to the state
of Washington conditioned upon faithful performance of all requirements
of this chapter, including the payment of all taxes, penalties, and
other obligations arising out of this chapter.
(3) "Bulk transfer" means a transfer of motor vehicle fuel by
pipeline or vessel.
(4) "Bulk transfer-terminal system" means the motor vehicle fuel
distribution system consisting of refineries, pipelines, vessels, and
terminals. Motor vehicle fuel in a refinery, pipeline, vessel, or
terminal is in the bulk transfer-terminal system. Motor vehicle fuel
in the fuel tank of an engine, motor vehicle, or in a railcar, trailer,
truck, or other equipment suitable for ground transportation is not in
the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(5) (("Dealer" means a person engaged in the retail sale of motor
vehicle fuel.
(6))) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((7))) (6) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(((8))) (7) "Evasion" or "evade" means to diminish or avoid the
computation, assessment, or payment of authorized taxes or fees
through:
(a) A knowing: False statement; misrepresentation of fact; or
other act of deception; or
(b) An intentional: Omission; failure to file a return or report;
or other act of deception.
(((9))) (8) "Export" means to obtain motor vehicle fuel in this
state for sales or distribution outside the state.
(((10))) (9) "Highway" means every way or place open to the use of
the public, as a matter of right, for the purpose of vehicular travel.
(((11))) (10) "Import" means to bring motor vehicle fuel into this
state by a means of conveyance other than the fuel supply tank of a
motor vehicle.
(11) "International fuel tax agreement licensee" means a motor
vehicle fuel user operating qualified motor vehicles in interstate
commerce and licensed by the department under the international fuel
tax agreement.
(12) "Licensee" means a person holding a motor vehicle fuel
supplier, motor vehicle fuel importer, motor vehicle fuel exporter,
motor vehicle fuel blender, motor vehicle distributor, or international
fuel tax agreement license issued under this chapter.
(13) (("Marine fuel dealer" means a person engaged in the retail
sale of motor vehicle fuel whose place of business and/or sale outlet
is located upon a navigable waterway.
(14))) "Motor vehicle fuel blender" means a person who produces
blended motor fuel outside the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(((15))) (14) "Motor vehicle fuel distributor" means a person who
acquires motor vehicle fuel from a supplier, distributor, or licensee
for subsequent sale and distribution.
(((16))) (15) "Motor vehicle fuel exporter" means a person who
purchases motor vehicle fuel in this state and directly exports the
fuel by a means other than the bulk transfer-terminal system to a
destination outside of the state. If the exporter of record is acting
as an agent, the person for whom the agent is acting is the exporter.
If there is no exporter of record, the owner of the motor fuel at the
time of exportation is the exporter.
(((17))) (16) "Motor vehicle fuel importer" means a person who
imports motor vehicle fuel into the state by a means other than the
bulk transfer-terminal system. If the importer of record is acting as
an agent, the person for whom the agent is acting is the importer. If
there is no importer of record, the owner of the motor vehicle fuel at
the time of importation is the importer.
(((18))) (17) "Motor vehicle fuel supplier" means a person who
holds a federal certificate of registry that is issued under the
internal revenue code and authorizes the person to enter into federal
tax-free transactions on motor vehicle fuel in the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(((19))) (18) "Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle
designed for operation upon land utilizing motor vehicle fuel as the
means of propulsion.
(((20))) (19) "Motor vehicle fuel" means gasoline and any other
inflammable gas or liquid, by whatsoever name the gasoline, gas, or
liquid may be known or sold, the chief use of which is as fuel for the
propulsion of motor vehicles or motorboats.
(((21))) (20) "Person" means a natural person, fiduciary,
association, or corporation. The term "person" as applied to an
association means and includes the partners or members thereof, and as
applied to corporations, the officers thereof.
(((22))) (21) "Position holder" means a person who holds the
inventory position in motor vehicle fuel, as reflected by the records
of the terminal operator. A person holds the inventory position in
motor vehicle fuel if the person has a contractual agreement with the
terminal for the use of storage facilities and terminating services at
a terminal with respect to motor vehicle fuel. "Position holder"
includes a terminal operator that owns motor vehicle fuel in their
terminal.
(((23))) (22) "Rack" means a mechanism for delivering motor vehicle
fuel from a refinery or terminal into a truck, trailer, railcar, or
other means of nonbulk transfer.
(((24))) (23) "Refiner" means a person who owns, operates, or
otherwise controls a refinery.
(((25))) (24) "Removal" means a physical transfer of motor vehicle
fuel other than by evaporation, loss, or destruction.
(((26))) (25) "Terminal" means a motor vehicle fuel storage and
distribution facility that has been assigned a terminal control number
by the internal revenue service, is supplied by pipeline or vessel, and
from which reportable motor vehicle fuel is removed at a rack.
(((27))) (26) "Terminal operator" means a person who owns,
operates, or otherwise controls a terminal.
(((28))) (27) "Two-party exchange" or "buy-sell agreement" means a
transaction in which taxable motor vehicle fuel is transferred from one
licensed supplier to another licensed supplier under an exchange or
buy-sell agreement whereby the supplier that is the position holder
agrees to deliver taxable motor vehicle fuel to the other supplier or
the other supplier's customer at the rack of the terminal at which the
delivering supplier is the position holder.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.36.020 and 2001 c 270 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and imposed upon motor vehicle fuel
((users)) licensees, other than motor vehicle fuel distributors, a tax
at the rate computed in the manner provided in RCW 82.36.025 on each
gallon of motor vehicle fuel.
(2) The tax imposed by subsection (1) of this section is imposed
when any of the following occurs:
(a) Motor vehicle fuel is removed in this state from a terminal if
the motor vehicle fuel is removed at the rack unless the removal is to
a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the
state;
(b) Motor vehicle fuel is removed in this state from a refinery if
either of the following applies:
(i) The removal is by bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of
the motor vehicle fuel immediately before the removal is not a
licensee; or
(ii) The removal is at the refinery rack unless the removal is to
a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the
state;
(c) Motor vehicle fuel enters into this state ((for sale,
consumption, use, or storage)) if either of the following applies:
(i) The entry is by bulk transfer and the importer is not a
licensee; or
(ii) The entry is not by bulk transfer;
(d) Motor vehicle fuel is sold or removed in this state to an
unlicensed entity unless there was a prior taxable removal, entry, or
sale of the motor vehicle fuel;
(e) Blended motor vehicle fuel is removed or sold in this state by
the blender of the fuel. The number of gallons of blended motor
vehicle fuel subject to the tax is the difference between the total
number of gallons of blended motor vehicle fuel removed or sold and the
number of gallons of previously taxed motor vehicle fuel used to
produce the blended motor vehicle fuel;
(f) Motor vehicle fuel is sold by a licensed motor vehicle fuel
supplier to a motor vehicle fuel distributor, motor vehicle fuel
importer, ((or)) motor vehicle fuel blender, or international fuel tax
agreement licensee and the motor vehicle fuel is not removed from the
bulk transfer-terminal system.
(3) The proceeds of the motor vehicle fuel excise tax shall be
distributed as provided in RCW 46.68.090.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.36.025 and 2005 c 314 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A motor vehicle fuel tax rate of twenty-three cents per gallon
((applies to the sale, distribution, or use of)) on motor vehicle fuel
shall be imposed on motor vehicle fuel licensees, other than motor
vehicle fuel distributors.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative motor
vehicle fuel tax rate of five cents per gallon ((applies to the sale,
distribution, or use of)) on motor vehicle fuel shall be imposed on
motor vehicle fuel licensees, other than motor vehicle fuel
distributors. This subsection (2) expires when the bonds issued for
transportation 2003 projects are retired.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2005, an additional and cumulative motor
vehicle fuel tax rate of three cents per gallon ((applies to the sale,
distribution, or use of)) on motor vehicle fuel shall be imposed on
motor vehicle fuel licensees, other than motor vehicle fuel
distributors.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2006, an additional and cumulative motor
vehicle fuel tax rate of three cents per gallon ((applies to the sale,
distribution, or use of)) on motor vehicle fuel shall be imposed on
motor vehicle fuel licensees, other than motor vehicle fuel
distributors.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2007, an additional and cumulative motor
vehicle fuel tax rate of two cents per gallon ((applies to the sale,
distribution, or use of)) on motor vehicle fuel shall be imposed on
motor vehicle fuel licensees, other than motor vehicle fuel
distributors.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2008, an additional and cumulative motor
vehicle fuel tax rate of one and one-half cents per gallon ((applies to
the sale, distribution, or use of)) on motor vehicle fuel shall be
imposed on motor vehicle fuel licensees, other than motor vehicle fuel
distributors.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.36.026 and 2001 c 270 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A licensed supplier shall ((remit)) be liable for and pay tax
to the department as provided in RCW 82.36.020. On a two-party
exchange, or buy-sell agreement between two licensed suppliers, the
receiving exchange partner or buyer ((who)) shall (([buyer shall]
remit)) be liable for and pay the tax.
(2) A refiner shall ((remit)) be liable for and pay tax to the
department on motor vehicle fuel removed from a refinery as provided in
RCW 82.36.020(2)(b).
(3) ((An)) A licensed importer shall ((remit)) be liable for and
pay tax to the department on motor vehicle fuel imported into this
state as provided in RCW 82.36.020(2)(c).
(4) A licensed blender shall ((remit)) be liable for and pay tax to
the department on the removal or sale of blended motor vehicle fuel as
provided in RCW 82.36.020(2)(e).
(5) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the licensee liable for
payment of the tax under this chapter from including as a part of the
selling price an amount equal to the tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW
to read as follows:
International fuel tax agreement licensees, or persons operating
motor vehicles under other reciprocity agreements entered into with the
state of Washington, are liable for and must pay the tax under RCW
82.36.020 to the department on motor vehicle fuel used to operate motor
vehicles on the highways of this state. This provision does not apply
if the tax under RCW 82.36.020 has previously been imposed and paid by
the international fuel tax agreement licensee or if the use of such
fuel is exempt from the tax under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.36.027 and 1998 c 176 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
A terminal operator is jointly and severally liable for
((remitting)) payment of the tax imposed under RCW 82.36.020(1) if, at
the time of removal:
(1) The position holder with respect to the motor vehicle fuel is
a person other than the terminal operator and is not a licensee;
(2) The terminal operator is not a licensee;
(3) The position holder has an expired internal revenue service
notification certificate issued under 26 C.F.R. Part 48; or
(4) The terminal operator had reason to believe that information on
the notification certificate was false.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.36.031 and 1998 c 176 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of determining the amount of liability for the tax
imposed under this chapter, and to periodically update license
information, each licensee, other than a motor vehicle fuel distributor
or an international fuel tax agreement licensee, shall file monthly tax
reports with the department, on a form prescribed by the department.
An international fuel tax licensee shall file quarterly tax reports
with the department, on a form prescribed by the department.
A report shall be filed with the department even though no motor
vehicle fuel tax is due for the reporting period. Each tax report
shall contain a declaration by the person making the same, to the
effect that the statements contained therein are true and made under
penalties of perjury, which declaration has the same force and effect
as a verification of the report and is in lieu of the verification.
The report shall show information as the department may require for the
proper administration and enforcement of this chapter. Tax reports
shall be filed on or before the twenty-fifth day of the next succeeding
calendar month following the period to which the reports relate. If
the final filing date falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday the
next secular or business day shall be the final filing date.
The department, if it deems it necessary in order to ensure payment
of the tax imposed under this chapter, or to facilitate the
administration of this chapter, may require the filing of reports and
tax remittances at shorter intervals than one month.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.36.045 and 1998 c 176 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the department determines that the tax reported by a
licensee is deficient, the department shall assess the deficiency on
the basis of information available to it, and shall add a penalty of
two percent of the amount of the deficiency.
(2) If a licensee, or person acting as such, fails, neglects, or
refuses to file a motor vehicle fuel tax report the department shall,
on the basis of information available to it, determine the tax
liability of the licensee or person for the period during which no
report was filed. The department shall add the penalty provided in
subsection (1) of this section to the tax. An assessment made by the
department under this subsection or subsection (1) of this section is
presumed to be correct. In any case, where the validity of the
assessment is questioned, the burden is on the person who challenges
the assessment to establish by a fair preponderance of evidence that it
is erroneous or excessive, as the case may be.
(3) If a licensee or person acting as such files a false or
fraudulent report with intent to evade the tax imposed by this chapter,
the department shall add to the amount of deficiency a penalty equal to
twenty-five percent of the deficiency, in addition to the penalty
provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section and all other
penalties prescribed by law.
(4) Motor vehicle fuel tax, penalties, and interest payable under
this chapter bears interest at the rate of one percent per month, or
fraction thereof, from the first day of the calendar month after the
amount or any portion of it should have been paid until the date of
payment. If a licensee or person acting as such establishes by a fair
preponderance of evidence that the failure to pay the amount of tax due
was attributable to reasonable cause and was not intentional or
willful, the department may waive the penalty. The department may
waive the interest when it determines the cost of processing or
collection of the interest exceeds the amount of interest due.
(5) Except in the case of a fraudulent report, neglect or refusal
to make a report, or failure to pay or to pay the proper amount, the
department shall assess the deficiency under subsection (1) or (2) of
this section within five years from the last day of the succeeding
calendar month after the reporting period for which the amount is
proposed to be determined or within five years after the return is
filed, whichever period expires later.
(6) Except in the case of violations of filing a false or
fraudulent report, if the department deems mitigation of penalties and
interest to be reasonable and in the best interest of carrying out the
purpose of this chapter, it may mitigate such assessments upon whatever
terms the department deems proper, giving consideration to the degree
and extent of the lack of records and reporting errors. The department
may ascertain the facts regarding recordkeeping and payment penalties
in lieu of more elaborate proceedings under this chapter.
(7) A licensee or person acting as such against whom an assessment
is made under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may petition for a
reassessment within thirty days after service upon the licensee of
notice of the assessment. If the petition is not filed within the
thirty-day period, the amount of the assessment becomes final at the
expiration of that period.
If a petition for reassessment is filed within the thirty-day
period, the department shall reconsider the assessment and, if the
petitioner has so requested in its petition, shall grant the petitioner
an oral hearing and give the petitioner twenty days' notice of the time
and place of the hearing. The department may continue the hearing from
time to time. The decision of the department upon a petition for
reassessment becomes final thirty days after service of notice upon the
petitioner.
An assessment made by the department becomes due and payable when
it becomes final. If it is not paid to the department when due and
payable, the department shall add a penalty of ten percent of the
amount of the tax.
(8) In a suit brought to enforce the rights of the state under this
chapter, the assessment showing the amount of taxes, penalties,
interest, and cost unpaid to the state is prima facie evidence of the
facts as shown.
(9) A notice of assessment required by this section must be served
personally or by certified or registered mail. If it is served by
mail, service shall be made by deposit of the notice in the United
States mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the respondent at the most
current address furnished to the department.
(((10) The tax imposed by this chapter, if required to be collected
by the seller, is held in trust by the licensee until paid to the
department, and a licensee who appropriates or converts the tax
collected to his or her own use or to any use other than the payment of
the tax to the extent that the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is
guilty of a felony, or gross misdemeanor in accordance with the theft
and anticipatory provisions of Title 9A RCW. A person, partnership,
corporation, or corporate officer who fails to collect the tax imposed
by this section, or who has collected the tax and fails to pay it to
the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter, is personally
liable to the state for the amount of the tax.))

Sec. 9 RCW 82.36.060 and 2001 c 270 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An application for a license issued under this chapter shall be
made to the department on forms to be furnished by the department and
shall contain such information as the department deems necessary.
(2) Every application for a license must contain the following
information to the extent it applies to the applicant:
(a) Proof as the department may require concerning the applicant's
identity, including but not limited to his or her fingerprints or those
of the officers of a corporation making the application;
(b) The applicant's form and place of organization including proof
that the individual, partnership, or corporation is licensed to do
business in this state;
(c) The qualification and business history of the applicant and any
partner, officer, or director;
(d) The applicant's financial condition or history including a bank
reference and whether the applicant or any partner, officer, or
director has ever been adjudged bankrupt or has an unsatisfied judgment
in a federal or state court;
(e) Whether the applicant has been adjudged guilty of a crime that
directly relates to the business for which the license is sought and
the time elapsed since the conviction is less than ten years, or has
suffered a judgment within the preceding five years in a civil action
involving fraud, misrepresentation, or conversion and in the case of a
corporation or partnership, all directors, officers, or partners.
(3) An applicant for a license as a motor vehicle fuel importer
must list on the application each state, province, or country from
which the applicant intends to import motor vehicle fuel and, if
required by the state, province, or country listed, must be licensed or
registered for motor vehicle fuel tax purposes in that state, province,
or country.
(4) An applicant for a license as a motor vehicle fuel exporter
must list on the application each state, province, or country to which
the exporter intends to export motor vehicle fuel received in this
state by means of a transfer outside of the bulk transfer-terminal
system and, if required by the state, province, or country listed, must
be licensed or registered for motor vehicle fuel tax purposes in that
state, province, or country.
(5) An applicant for a license as a motor vehicle fuel supplier
must have a federal certificate of registry that is issued under the
internal revenue code and authorizes the applicant to enter into
federal tax-free transactions on motor vehicle fuel in the terminal
transfer system.
(6) After receipt of an application for a license, the director may
conduct an investigation to determine whether the facts set forth are
true. The director shall require a fingerprint record check of the
applicant through the Washington state patrol criminal identification
system and the federal bureau of investigation before issuance of a
license. The results of the background investigation including
criminal history information may be released to authorized department
personnel as the director deems necessary. The department shall charge
a license holder or license applicant a fee of fifty dollars for each
background investigation conducted.
An applicant who makes a false statement of a material fact on the
application may be prosecuted for false swearing as defined by RCW
9A.72.040.
(7) Except as provided by subsection (8) of this section, before
granting any license issued under this chapter, the department shall
require applicant to file with the department, in such form as shall be
prescribed by the department, a corporate surety bond duly executed by
the applicant as principal, payable to the state and conditioned for
faithful performance of all the requirements of this chapter, including
the payment of all taxes, penalties, and other obligations arising out
of this chapter. The total amount of the bond or bonds shall be fixed
by the department and may be increased or reduced by the department at
any time subject to the limitations herein provided. In fixing the
total amount of the bond or bonds, the department shall require a bond
or bonds equivalent in total amount to twice the estimated monthly
excise tax determined in such manner as the department may deem proper.
If at any time the estimated excise tax to become due during the
succeeding month amounts to more than fifty percent of the established
bond, the department shall require additional bonds or securities to
maintain the marginal ratio herein specified or shall demand excise tax
payments to be made weekly or semimonthly to meet the requirements
hereof.
The total amount of the bond or bonds required of any licensee
shall never be less than five thousand dollars nor more than one
hundred thousand dollars.
No recoveries on any bond or the execution of any new bond shall
invalidate any bond and no revocation of any license shall effect the
validity of any bond but the total recoveries under any one bond shall
not exceed the amount of the bond.
In lieu of any such bond or bonds in total amount as herein fixed,
a licensee may deposit with the state treasurer, under such terms and
conditions as the department may prescribe, a like amount of lawful
money of the United States or bonds or other obligations of the United
States, the state, or any county of the state, of an actual market
value not less than the amount so fixed by the department.
Any surety on a bond furnished by a licensee as provided herein
shall be released and discharged from any and all liability to the
state accruing on such bond after the expiration of thirty days from
the date upon which such surety has lodged with the department a
written request to be released and discharged, but this provision shall
not operate to relieve, release, or discharge the surety from any
liability already accrued or which shall accrue before the expiration
of the thirty day period. The department shall promptly, upon
receiving any such request, notify the licensee who furnished the bond;
and unless the licensee, on or before the expiration of the thirty day
period, files a new bond, or makes a deposit in accordance with the
requirements of this section, the department shall forthwith cancel the
license. Whenever a new bond is furnished by a licensee, the
department shall cancel the old bond as soon as the department and the
attorney general are satisfied that all liability under the old bond
has been fully discharged.
The department may require a licensee to give a new or additional
surety bond or to deposit additional securities of the character
specified in this section if, in its opinion, the security of the
surety bond theretofore filed by such licensee, or the market value of
the properties deposited as security by the licensee, shall become
impaired or inadequate; and upon the failure of the licensee to give
such new or additional surety bond or to deposit additional securities
within thirty days after being requested so to do by the department,
the department shall forthwith cancel his or her license.
(8) The department may waive the requirements of subsection (7) of
this section for licensed distributors if, upon determination by the
department, the licensed distributor has sufficient resources, assets,
other financial instruments, or other means, to adequately make
payments on the estimated monthly motor vehicle fuel tax payments,
penalties, and interest arising out of this chapter. The department
shall adopt rules to administer this subsection. An application for an
international fuel tax agreement license must be made to the
department. The application must be filed upon a form prescribed by
the department and contain such information as the department may
require. The department shall charge a fee of ten dollars per set of
international fuel tax agreement decals issued to each applicant or
licensee. The department shall transmit the fee to the state treasurer
for deposit in the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.36.080 and 1998 c 176 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in business in
this state as any of the following unless the person is the holder of
an uncanceled license issued by the department authorizing the person
to engage in that business:
(a) Motor vehicle fuel supplier;
(b) Motor vehicle fuel distributor;
(c) Motor vehicle fuel exporter;
(d) Motor vehicle fuel importer; ((or))
(e) Motor vehicle fuel blender; or
(f) International fuel tax agreement licensee.
(2) A person engaged in more than one activity for which a license
is required must have a separate license classification for each
activity, but a motor vehicle fuel supplier is not required to obtain
a separate license classification for any other activity for which a
license is required.
(3) If any person acts as a licensee without first securing the
license required herein the excise tax shall be immediately due and
payable on account of all motor vehicle fuel distributed or used by the
person. The director shall proceed forthwith to determine from the
best available sources, the amount of the tax, and the director shall
immediately assess the tax in the amount found due, together with a
penalty of one hundred percent of the tax, and shall make a certificate
of such assessment and penalty. In any suit or proceeding to collect
the tax or penalty, or both, such certificate shall be prima facie
evidence that the person therein named is indebted to the state in the
amount of the tax and penalty therein stated. Any tax or penalty so
assessed may be collected in the manner prescribed in this chapter with
reference to delinquency in payment of the tax or by an action at law,
which the attorney general shall commence and prosecute to final
determination at the request of the director. The foregoing remedies
of the state shall be cumulative and no action taken pursuant to this
section shall relieve any person from the penal provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.36.160 and 1998 c 176 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every licensee shall maintain in the office of his or her principal
place of business in this state, for a period of five years, records of
motor vehicle fuel received, sold, distributed, or used by the
licensee, in such form as the director may prescribe, together with
invoices, bills of lading, and other pertinent papers as may be
required under the provisions of this chapter.
((Every dealer purchasing motor vehicle fuel taxable under this
chapter for the purpose of resale, shall maintain within this state,
for a period of two years a record of motor vehicle fuels received, the
amount of tax paid to the licensee as part of the purchase price,
together with delivery tickets, invoices, and bills of lading, and such
other records as the director shall require.))

Sec. 12 RCW 82.36.180 and 1998 c 176 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director, or duly authorized agents, may make such examinations
of the records, stocks, facilities, and equipment of any licensee,
((and service stations,)) and make such other investigations as deemed
necessary in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. If such
examinations or investigations disclose that any reports of licensees
theretofore filed with the director pursuant to the requirements of
this chapter have shown incorrectly the gallonage of motor vehicle fuel
distributed or the tax ((accruing)) liability thereon, the director may
make such changes in subsequent reports and payments of such licensees
as deemed necessary to correct the errors disclosed.
Every such licensee or such other person not maintaining records in
this state so that an audit of such records may be made by the director
or a duly authorized representative shall be required to make the
necessary records available to the director upon request and at a
designated office within this state; or, in lieu thereof, the director
or a duly authorized representative shall proceed to any out-of-state
office at which the records are prepared and maintained to make such
examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW
to read as follows:
Motor vehicle fuel that is used exclusively for racing and is
illegal for use on the public highways of this state under state or
federal law is exempt from the tax imposed under this chapter.

Sec. 14 RCW 82.36.320 and 1961 c 15 s 82.36.320 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any person claiming refund on motor vehicle fuel used other than in
motor vehicles as herein provided((, and any person purchasing motor
vehicle fuel from a dealer who is claiming refund on account of the
sale of such fuel under RCW 82.36.305)) may be required by the director
to also furnish information regarding the amount of motor vehicle fuel
purchased from other sources or for other purposes during the period
reported for which no refund is claimed.

Sec. 15 RCW 82.36.340 and 1961 c 15 s 82.36.340 are each amended
to read as follows:
The director may in order to establish the validity of any claim
for refund require the claimant((, or, in the case of a dealer filing
a claim for refund as provided by RCW 82.36.305, the person to whom
such fuel was sold,)) to furnish such additional proof of the validity
of the claim as the director may determine, and may examine the books
and records of the claimant or said person to whom the fuel was sold
for such purpose. The records shall be sufficient to substantiate the
accuracy of the claim and shall be in such form and contain such
information as the director may require. The failure to maintain such
records or to accede to a demand for an examination of such records may
be deemed by the director as sufficient cause for denial of all right
to the refund claimed on account of the transaction in question.

Sec. 16 RCW 82.36.370 and 1998 c 176 s 42 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A refund shall be made in the manner provided in this chapter
or a credit given to a licensee allowing for the excise tax paid or
accrued on all motor vehicle fuel which is lost or destroyed, while
((applicant shall be the owner thereof)) the licensee was the owner,
through fire, lightning, flood, wind storm, or explosion.
(2) A refund shall be made in the manner provided in this chapter
or a credit given allowing for the excise tax paid or accrued on all
motor vehicle fuel of five hundred gallons or more which is lost or
destroyed, while ((applicant shall be)) the licensee was the owner
thereof, through leakage or other casualty except evaporation,
shrinkage or unknown causes: PROVIDED, That the director shall be
notified in writing as to the full circumstances surrounding such loss
or destruction and the amount of the loss or destruction within thirty
days from the day of discovery of such loss or destruction.
(3) Recovery for such loss or destruction under either subsection
(1) or (2) must be susceptible to positive proof thereby enabling the
director to conduct such investigation and require such information as
the director may deem necessary.
In the event that the director is not satisfied that the fuel was
lost or destroyed as claimed, wherefore required information or proof
as required hereunder is not sufficient to substantiate the accuracy of
the claim, the director may deem as sufficient cause the denial of all
right relating to the refund or credit for the excise tax on motor
vehicle fuel alleged to be lost or destroyed.

Sec. 17 RCW 82.36.380 and 2003 c 358 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person or corporation to:
(a) Evade a tax or fee imposed under this chapter;
(b) File a false statement of a material fact on a motor fuel
license application or motor fuel refund application;
(c) Act as a motor fuel importer, motor fuel blender, or motor fuel
supplier unless the person holds an uncanceled motor fuel license
issued by the department authorizing the person to engage in that
business;
(d) Knowingly assist another person to evade a tax or fee imposed
by this chapter;
(e) Knowingly operate a conveyance for the purpose of hauling,
transporting, or delivering motor vehicle fuel in bulk and not possess
an invoice, bill of sale, or other statement showing the name, address,
and tax license number of the seller or consignor, the destination, the
name, address, and tax license number of the purchaser or consignee,
and the number of gallons.
(2) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a class C
felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW. In addition to other penalties and
remedies provided by law, the court shall order a person or corporation
found guilty of violating subsection (1) of this section to:
(a) Pay the tax or fee evaded plus interest, commencing at the date
the tax or fee was first due, at the rate of twelve percent per year,
compounded monthly; and
(b) Pay a penalty of one hundred percent of the tax evaded, to the
multimodal transportation account of the state.
(3) The tax imposed by this chapter is held in trust by the
licensee until paid to the department, and a licensee who appropriates
the tax to his or her own use or to any use other than the payment of
the tax on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is guilty of a
felony or gross misdemeanor in accordance with the theft and
anticipatory provisions of Title 9A RCW. A person, partnership,
corporation, or corporate officer who fails to pay to the department
the tax imposed by this chapter is personally liable to the state for
the amount of the tax.

Sec. 18 RCW 82.36.450 and 1995 c 320 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The department of licensing may enter into an agreement with any
federally recognized Indian tribe located on a reservation within this
state regarding the imposition, collection, and use of this state's
motor vehicle fuel tax, or the budgeting or use of moneys in lieu
thereof, upon terms substantially the same as those in the consent
decree entered by the federal district court (Eastern District of
Washington) in Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation v. DOL,
et al., District Court No. CY-92-248-JLO.)) (1) The governor may enter
into an agreement with any federally recognized Indian tribe located on
a reservation within this state regarding motor vehicle fuel taxes
included in the price of fuel delivered to a retail station wholly
owned and operated by a tribe, tribal enterprise, or tribal member
licensed by the tribe to operate a retail station located on
reservation or trust property. The agreement may provide mutually
agreeable means to address any tribal immunities or any preemption of
the state motor vehicle fuel tax.
(2) The provisions of this section do not repeal existing
state/tribal fuel tax agreements or consent decrees in existence on the
effective date of this act. The state and the tribe may agree to
substitute an agreement negotiated under this section for an existing
agreement or consent decree, or to enter into an agreement using a
methodology similar to the state/tribal fuel tax agreements in effect
on the effective date of this act.
(3) If a new agreement is negotiated, the agreement must:
(a) Require that the tribe or the tribal retailer acquire all motor
vehicle fuel only from persons or companies operating lawfully in
accordance with this chapter as a motor vehicle fuel distributor,
supplier, importer, or blender, or from a tribal distributor, supplier,
importer, or blender lawfully doing business according to all
applicable laws;
(b) Provide that the tribe will expend fuel tax proceeds or
equivalent amounts on: Planning, construction, and maintenance of
roads, bridges, and boat ramps; transit services and facilities;
transportation planning; police services; and other highway-related
purposes;
(c) Include provisions for audits or other means of ensuring
compliance to certify the number of gallons of motor vehicle fuel
purchased by the tribe for resale at tribal retail stations, and the
use of fuel tax proceeds or their equivalent for the purposes
identified in (b) of this subsection. Compliance reports must be
delivered to the director of the department of licensing.
(4) Information from the tribe or tribal retailers received by the
state or open to state review under the terms of an agreement shall be
deemed to be personal information under RCW 42.56.230(3)(b) and exempt
from public inspection and copying.
(5) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate fuel tax
agreements to the department of licensing.
(6) The department of licensing shall prepare and submit an annual
report to the legislature on the status of existing agreements and any
ongoing negotiations with tribes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the intent and purpose of this chapter that the tax shall be
imposed at the time and place of the first taxable event and upon the
first taxable person within this state. Any person whose activities
would otherwise require payment of the tax imposed by RCW 82.36.020 but
who is exempt from the tax nevertheless has a precollection obligation
for the tax that must be imposed on the first taxable event within this
state. Failure to pay the tax with respect to a taxable event shall
not prevent tax liability from arising by reason of a subsequent
taxable event.

Sec. 20 RCW 82.38.030 and 2005 c 314 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and imposed upon special fuel ((users))
licensees, other than special fuel distributors, a tax at the rate of
twenty-three cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred
cubic feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of five cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel ((users)) licensees, other
than special fuel distributors. This subsection (2) expires when the
bonds issued for transportation 2003 projects are retired.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2005, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of three cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel ((users)) licensees, other
than special fuel distributors.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2006, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of three cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel ((users)) licensees, other
than special fuel distributors.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2007, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of two cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet
of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel ((users)) licensees, other
than special fuel distributors.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2008, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of one and one-half cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one
hundred cubic feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard
pressure and temperature shall be imposed on special fuel ((users))
licensees, other than special fuel distributors.
(7) Taxes are imposed when:
(a) Special fuel is removed in this state from a terminal if the
special fuel is removed at the rack unless the removal is to a licensed
exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the state, or
the removal is ((to)) by a special fuel ((distributor)) supplier for
direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under
RCW 82.38.320;
(b) Special fuel is removed in this state from a refinery if either
of the following applies:
(i) The removal is by bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of
the special fuel immediately before the removal is not a licensee; or
(ii) The removal is at the refinery rack unless the removal is to
a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the
state, or the removal is to a special fuel ((distributor)) supplier for
direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under
RCW 82.38.320;
(c) Special fuel enters into this state for sale, consumption, use,
or storage, unless the fuel enters this state for direct delivery to an
international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320, if
either of the following applies:
(i) The entry is by bulk transfer and the importer is not a
licensee; or
(ii) The entry is not by bulk transfer;
(d) Special fuel is sold or removed in this state to an unlicensed
entity unless there was a prior taxable removal, entry, or sale of the
special fuel;
(e) Blended special fuel is removed or sold in this state by the
blender of the fuel. The number of gallons of blended special fuel
subject to tax is the difference between the total number of gallons of
blended special fuel removed or sold and the number of gallons of
previously taxed special fuel used to produce the blended special fuel;
(f) Dyed special fuel is used on a highway, as authorized by the
internal revenue code, unless the use is exempt from the special fuel
tax;
(g) Dyed special fuel is held for sale, sold, used, or is intended
to be used in violation of this chapter;
(h) Special fuel purchased by an international fuel tax agreement
licensee under RCW 82.38.320 is used on a highway; and
(i) Special fuel is sold by a licensed special fuel supplier to a
special fuel distributor, special fuel importer, or special fuel
blender and the special fuel is not removed from the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(((8) The tax imposed by this chapter, if required to be collected
by the licensee, is held in trust by the licensee until paid to the
department, and a licensee who appropriates or converts the tax
collected to his or her own use or to any use other than the payment of
the tax to the extent that the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is
guilty of a felony, or gross misdemeanor in accordance with the theft
and anticipatory provisions of Title 9A RCW. A person, partnership,
corporation, or corporate officer who fails to collect the tax imposed
by this section, or who has collected the tax and fails to pay it to
the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter, is personally
liable to the state for the amount of the tax.))

Sec. 21 RCW 82.38.032 and 1998 c 176 s 52 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The tax under RCW 82.38.030, if not previously imposed and paid,
must be paid over to the department by special fuel users and persons
licensed under the international fuel tax agreement or other fuel tax
reciprocity agreements entered into with the state of Washington, on
the use of special fuel to operate motor vehicles on the highways of
this state, unless the use is exempt from the tax under this chapter.))
International fuel tax agreement licensees, or persons operating motor
vehicles under other reciprocity agreements entered into with the state
of Washington, are liable for and must pay the tax under RCW 82.38.030
to the department on special fuel used to operate motor vehicles on the
highways of this state. This provision does not apply if the tax under
RCW 82.38.030 has previously been imposed and paid by the international
fuel tax agreement licensee or if the use of such fuel is exempt from
the tax under this chapter.

Sec. 22 RCW 82.38.035 and 2005 c 314 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A licensed supplier shall ((remit)) be liable for and pay tax
on special fuel to the department as provided in RCW 82.38.030(7)(a).
On a two-party exchange, or buy-sell agreement between two licensed
suppliers, the receiving exchange partner or buyer shall ((remit)) be
liable for and pay the tax.
(2) A refiner shall ((remit)) be liable for and pay tax to the
department on special fuel removed from a refinery as provided in RCW
82.38.030(7)(b).
(3) ((An)) A licensed importer shall ((remit)) be liable for and
pay tax to the department on special fuel imported into this state as
provided in RCW 82.38.030(7)(c).
(4) A licensed blender shall ((remit)) be liable for and pay tax to
the department on the removal or sale of blended special fuel as
provided in RCW 82.38.030(7)(e).
(5) A licensed dyed special fuel user shall ((remit)) be liable for
and pay tax to the department on the use of dyed special fuel as
provided in RCW 82.38.030(7)(f).
(6) Nothing in this chapter prohibits the licensee liable for
payment of the tax under this chapter from including as a part of the
selling price an amount equal to such tax.

Sec. 23 RCW 82.38.050 and 1990 c 250 s 82 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, every special fuel
user shall be liable for the tax on special fuel used in motor vehicles
leased to the user for thirty days or more and operated on the highways
of this state to the same extent and in the same manner as special fuel
used in his own motor vehicles and operated on the highways of this
state: PROVIDED, That)) A lessor who is engaged regularly in the
business of leasing or renting for compensation motor vehicles and
equipment he owns without drivers to carriers or other lessees for
interstate operation, may be deemed to be the special fuel user when he
supplies or pays for the special fuel consumed in such vehicles, and
such lessor may be issued ((a)) an international fuel tax agreement
license ((as a special fuel user)) when application and bond have been
properly filed with and approved by the department for such license.
Any lessee may exclude motor vehicles of which he or she is the lessee
from reports and liabilities pursuant to this chapter, but only if the
motor vehicles in question have been leased from a lessor holding a
valid ((special fuel user's)) international fuel tax agreement license.
((Every such lessor shall file with the application for a special
fuel user's license one copy of the lease form or service contract the
lessor enters into with the various lessees of the lessor's motor
vehicles.)) When the ((special fuel user's)) license has been secured,
such lessor shall make and assign to each motor vehicle leased for
interstate operation a photocopy of such license to be carried in the
cab compartment of the motor vehicle and on which shall be typed or
printed on the back the unit or motor number of the motor vehicle to
which it is assigned and the name of the lessee. Such lessor shall be
responsible for the proper use of such photocopy of the license issued
and its return to the lessor with the motor vehicle to which it is
assigned.
The lessor shall be responsible for fuel tax licensing and
reporting, as required by this chapter, on the operation of all motor
vehicles leased to others for less than thirty days.

Sec. 24 RCW 82.38.100 and 1999 c 270 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any special fuel user operating a motor vehicle into this state
for commercial purposes may make application for a trip permit that
shall be good for a period of three consecutive days beginning and
ending on the dates specified on the face of the permit issued, and
only for the vehicle for which it is issued.
(2) Every permit shall identify, as the department may require, the
vehicle for which it is issued and shall be completed in its entirety,
signed, and dated by the operator before operation of the vehicle on
the public highways of this state. Correction of data on the permit
such as dates, vehicle license number, or vehicle identification number
invalidates the permit. A violation of, or a failure to comply with,
this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.
(3) For each permit issued, there shall be collected a filing fee
of one dollar, an administrative fee of ten dollars, and an excise tax
of nine dollars. Such fees and tax shall be in lieu of the special
fuel tax otherwise assessable against the permit holder for importing
and using special fuel in a motor vehicle on the public highways of
this state, and no report of mileage shall be required with respect to
such vehicle. Trip permits will not be issued if the applicant has
outstanding fuel taxes, penalties, or interest owing to the state or
has had a special fuel license revoked for cause and the cause has not
been removed.
(4) Blank permits may be obtained from field offices of the
department of transportation, ((Washington state patrol,)) department
of licensing, or other agents appointed by the department. The
department may appoint county auditors or businesses as agents for the
purpose of selling trip permits to the public. County auditors or
businesses so appointed may retain the filing fee collected for each
trip permit to defray expenses incurred in handling and selling the
permits.
(5) A surcharge of five dollars is imposed on the issuance of trip
permits. The portion of the surcharge paid by motor carriers must be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund for the purpose of supporting
vehicle weigh stations, weigh-in-motion programs, and the commercial
vehicle information systems and networks program. The remaining
portion of the surcharge must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
for the purpose of supporting congestion relief programs. All other
fees and excise taxes collected by the department for trip permits
shall be credited and deposited in the same manner as the special fuel
tax collected under this chapter and shall not be subject to exchange,
refund, or credit.

Sec. 25 RCW 82.38.130 and 1998 c 176 s 65 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may revoke the license of any licensee for any of
the grounds constituting cause for denial of a license set forth in RCW
82.38.120 or for other reasonable cause. Before revoking such license
the department shall notify the licensee to show cause within twenty
days of the date of the notice why the license should not be revoked:
PROVIDED, That at any time prior to and pending such hearing the
department may, in the exercise of reasonable discretion, suspend such
license.
The department shall cancel any special fuel license immediately
upon surrender thereof by the holder.
Any surety on a bond furnished by a licensee as provided in this
chapter shall be released and discharged from any and all liability to
the state accruing on such bond after the expiration of forty-five days
from the date which such surety shall have lodged with the department
a written request to be released and discharged, but this provision
shall not operate to relieve, release, or discharge the surety from any
liability already accrued or which shall accrue before the expiration
of the forty-five day period. The department shall promptly, upon
receiving any such request, notify the licensee who furnished the bond,
and unless the licensee, on or before the expiration of the forty-five
day period, files a new bond, in accordance with this section, the
department ((forthwith)) shall cancel the ((special fuel dealer's or
special fuel user's)) license.
The department may require a new or additional surety bond of the
character specified in RCW 82.38.020(3) if, in its opinion, the
security of the surety bond therefor filed by such licensee, shall
become impaired or inadequate. Upon failure of the licensee to give
such new or additional surety bond within forty-five days after being
requested to do so by the department, or after he or she shall fail or
refuse to file reports and remit or pay taxes at the intervals fixed by
the department, the department forthwith shall cancel his or her
license.

Sec. 26 RCW 82.38.140 and 1998 c 176 s 66 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every licensee and every person importing, manufacturing,
refining, ((dealing in,)) transporting, blending, or storing special
fuel in this state shall keep for a period of not less than five years
open to inspection at all times during the business hours of the day to
the department or its authorized representatives, a complete record of
all special fuel purchased or received and all of such products sold,
delivered, or used by them. Such records shall show:
(a) The date of each receipt;
(b) The name and address of the person from whom purchased or
received;
(c) The number of gallons received at each place of business or
place of storage in the state of Washington;
(d) The date of each sale or delivery;
(e) The number of gallons sold, delivered, or used for taxable
purposes;
(f) The number of gallons sold, delivered, or used for any purpose
not subject to the tax imposed in this chapter;
(g) The name, address, and special fuel license number of the
purchaser if the special fuel tax is not collected on the sale or
delivery;
(h) The inventories of special fuel on hand at each place of
business at the end of each month.
(2)(a) All international fuel tax agreement licensees and dyed
special fuel users authorized to use dyed special fuel on highway in
vehicles licensed for highway operation shall maintain detailed mileage
records on an individual vehicle basis.
(b) Such operating records shall show both on-highway and off-highway usage of special fuel on a daily basis for each vehicle.
(c) In the absence of operating records that show both on-highway
and off-highway usage of special fuel on a daily basis for each
vehicle, fuel consumption must be computed under RCW 82.38.060.
(3) The department may require a person other than a licensee
engaged in the business of selling, purchasing, distributing, storing,
transporting, or delivering special fuel to submit periodic reports to
the department regarding the disposition of the fuel. The reports must
be on forms prescribed by the department and must contain such
information as the department may require.
(4) Every person operating any conveyance for the purpose of
hauling, transporting, or delivering special fuel in bulk shall have
and possess during the entire time the person is hauling special fuel,
an invoice, bill of sale, or other statement showing the name, address,
and license number of the seller or consigner, the destination, name,
and address of the purchaser or consignee, license number, if
applicable, and the number of gallons. The person hauling such special
fuel shall at the request of any law enforcement officer or authorized
representative of the department, or other person authorized by law to
inquire into, or investigate those types of matters, produce for
inspection such invoice, bill of sale, or other statement and shall
permit such official to inspect and gauge the contents of the vehicle.

Sec. 27 RCW 82.38.150 and 1998 c 176 s 67 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of determining the amount of liability for the tax
herein imposed, and to periodically update license information, each
licensee, other than a special fuel distributor, an international fuel
tax agreement licensee, or a dyed special fuel user, shall file monthly
tax reports with the department, on forms prescribed by the department.
Dyed special fuel users whose estimated yearly tax liability is two
hundred fifty dollars or less, shall file a report yearly, and dyed
special fuel users whose estimated yearly tax liability is more than
two hundred fifty dollars, shall file reports quarterly. Special fuel
users licensed under the international fuel tax agreement shall file
reports quarterly. ((Special fuel distributors)) Heating oil dealers
subject to the pollution liability insurance agency fee and reporting
requirements shall remit pollution liability insurance agency returns
and any associated payment due to the department annually.
The department shall establish the reporting frequency for each
applicant at the time the special fuel license is issued. If it
becomes apparent that any licensee is not reporting in accordance with
the above schedule, the department shall change the licensee's
reporting frequency by giving thirty days' notice to the licensee by
mail to the licensee's address of record. A report shall be filed with
the department even though no special fuel was used, or tax is due, for
the reporting period. Each tax report shall contain a declaration by
the person making the same, to the effect that the statements contained
therein are true and are made under penalties of perjury, which
declaration shall have the same force and effect as a verification of
the report and is in lieu of such verification. The report shall show
such information as the department may reasonably require for the
proper administration and enforcement of this chapter. ((For counties
within which an additional excise tax on special fuel has been levied
by that jurisdiction under RCW 82.80.010, the report must show the
quantities of special fuel sold, distributed, or withdrawn from bulk
storage by the reporting dealer or user within the county's boundaries
and the tax liability from its levy.)) A licensee shall file a tax
report on or before the twenty-fifth day of the next succeeding
calendar month following the period to which it relates.
Subject to the written approval of the department, tax reports may
cover a period ending on a day other than the last day of the calendar
month. Taxpayers granted approval to file reports in this manner will
file such reports on or before the twenty-fifth day following the end
of the reporting period. No change to this reporting period will be
made without the written authorization of the department.
If the final filing date falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal
holiday the next secular or business day shall be the final filing
date. Such reports shall be considered filed or received on the date
shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped upon an envelope
containing such report properly addressed to the department, or on the
date it was mailed if proof satisfactory to the department is available
to establish the date it was mailed.
The department, if it deems it necessary in order to insure payment
of the tax imposed by this chapter, or to facilitate the administration
of this chapter, has the authority to require the filing of reports and
tax remittances at shorter intervals than one month if, in its opinion,
an existing bond has become insufficient.

Sec. 28 RCW 82.38.180 and 1998 c 176 s 71 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who has purchased special fuel on which tax has been
paid ((a special fuel tax either directly or to the vendor from whom it
was purchased)) may file a claim with the department for a refund of
the tax ((so paid and shall be reimbursed and repaid the amount of))
for:
(1) ((Any)) Taxes previously paid on special fuel used for purposes
other than for the propulsion of motor vehicles upon the public
highways in this state.
(2) ((Any)) Taxes previously paid on special fuel exported for use
outside of this state. Special fuel carried from this state in the
fuel tank of a motor vehicle is deemed to be exported from this state.
Special fuel distributed to a federally recognized Indian tribal
reservation located within the state of Washington is not considered
exported outside this state.
(3) ((Any)) Tax, penalty, or interest erroneously or illegally
collected or paid.
(4) ((Any)) Taxes previously paid on all special fuel which is lost
or destroyed, while ((applicant)) the licensee shall be the owner
thereof, through fire, lightning, flood, wind storm, or explosion.
(5) ((Any)) Taxes previously paid on all special fuel of five
hundred gallons or more which is lost or destroyed while ((applicant))
the licensee shall be the owner thereof, through leakage or other
casualty except evaporation, shrinkage, or unknown causes.
(6) ((Any)) Taxes previously paid on special fuel that is
inadvertently mixed with dyed special fuel.
Recovery for such loss or destruction under either subsection (4),
(5), or (6) of this section must be susceptible to positive proof
thereby enabling the department to conduct such investigation and
require such information as ((they)) it may deem necessary. In the
event that the department is not satisfied that the fuel was lost,
destroyed, or contaminated as claimed because information or proof as
required hereunder is not sufficient to substantiate the accuracy of
the claim, ((they)) it may deem such as sufficient cause to deny all
right relating to the refund or credit for the excise tax paid on
special fuel alleged to be lost or destroyed.
No refund or claim for credit shall be approved by the department
unless the gallons of special fuel claimed as nontaxable satisfy the
conditions specifically set forth in this section and the nontaxable
event or use occurred during the period covered by the refund claim.
Refunds or claims for credit ((by sellers or users of special fuel))
shall not be allowed for anticipated nontaxable use or events.

Sec. 29 RCW 82.38.270 and 2003 c 358 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person or corporation to:
(a) Have dyed diesel in the fuel supply tank of a vehicle that is
licensed or required to be licensed for highway use or maintain dyed
diesel in bulk storage for highway use, unless the person or
corporation maintains an uncanceled dyed diesel user license or is
otherwise exempted by this chapter;
(b) Evade a tax or fee imposed under this chapter;
(c) File a false statement of a material fact on a special fuel
license application or special fuel refund application;
(d) Act as a special fuel importer, special fuel blender, or
special fuel supplier unless the person holds an uncanceled special
fuel license issued by the department authorizing the person to engage
in that business;
(e) Knowingly assist another person to evade a tax or fee imposed
by this chapter;
(f) Knowingly operate a conveyance for the purpose of hauling,
transporting, or delivering special fuel in bulk and not possess an
invoice, bill of sale, or other statement showing the name, address,
and tax license number of the seller or consignor, the destination, the
name, address, and tax license number of the purchaser or consignee,
and the number of gallons.
(2)(a) A single violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section is
a gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(b) Multiple violations of subsection (1)(a) of this section and
violations of subsection (1)(b) through (f) of this section are a class
C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) In addition to other penalties and remedies provided by law,
the court shall order a person or corporation found guilty of violating
subsection (1)(b) through (f) of this section to:
(a) Pay the tax or fee evaded plus interest, commencing at the date
the tax or fee was first due, at the rate of twelve percent per year,
compounded monthly; and
(b) Pay a penalty of one hundred percent of the tax evaded, to the
multimodal transportation account of the state.
(4) The tax imposed by this chapter is held in trust by the
licensee until paid to the department, and a licensee who appropriates
the tax to his or her own use or to any use other than the payment of
the tax on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is guilty of a
felony or gross misdemeanor in accordance with the theft and
anticipatory provisions of Title 9A RCW. A person, partnership,
corporation, or corporate officer who fails to pay to the department
the tax imposed by this chapter is personally liable to the state for
the amount of the tax.

Sec. 30 RCW 82.38.310 and 1995 c 320 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The department of licensing may enter into an agreement with any
federally recognized Indian tribe located on a reservation within this
state regarding the imposition, collection, and use of this state's
special fuel tax, or the budgeting or use of moneys in lieu thereof,
upon terms substantially the same as those in the consent decree
entered by the federal district court (Eastern District of Washington)
in Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation v. DOL, et al.,
District Court No. CY-92-248-JLO.)) (1) The governor may enter into an
agreement with any federally recognized Indian tribe located on a
reservation within this state regarding special fuel taxes included in
the price of fuel delivered to a retail station wholly owned and
operated by a tribe, tribal enterprise, or tribal member licensed by
the tribe to operate a retail station located on reservation or trust
property. The agreement may provide mutually agreeable means to
address any tribal immunities or any preemption of the state special
fuel tax.
(2) The provisions of this section do not repeal existing
state/tribal fuel tax agreements or consent decrees in existence on the
effective date of this act. The state and the tribe may agree to
substitute an agreement negotiated under this section for an existing
agreement or consent decree, or to enter into an agreement using a
methodology similar to the state/tribal fuel tax agreements in effect
on the effective date of this act.
(3) If a new agreement is negotiated, the agreement must:
(a) Require that the tribe or the tribal retailer acquire all
special fuel only from persons or companies operating lawfully in
accordance with this chapter as a special fuel distributor, supplier,
importer, or blender, or from a tribal distributor, supplier, importer,
or blender lawfully doing business according to all applicable laws;
(b) Provide that the tribe will expend fuel tax proceeds or
equivalent amounts on: Planning, construction, and maintenance of
roads, bridges, and boat ramps; transit services and facilities;
transportation planning; police services; and other highway-related
purposes;
(c) Include provisions for audits or other means of ensuring
compliance to certify the number of gallons of special fuel purchased
by the tribe for resale at tribal retail stations, and the use of fuel
tax proceeds or their equivalent for the purposes identified in (b) of
this subsection. Compliance reports must be delivered to the director
of the department of licensing.
(4) Information from the tribe or tribal retailers received by the
state or open to state review under the terms of an agreement shall be
deemed personal information under RCW 42.56.230(3)(b) and exempt from
public inspection and copying.
(5) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate fuel tax
agreements to the department of licensing.
(6) The department of licensing shall prepare and submit an annual
report to the legislature on the status of existing agreements and any
ongoing negotiations with tribes.

Sec. 31 RCW 82.38.320 and 1998 c 176 s 83 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An international fuel tax agreement licensee who meets the
qualifications in subsection (2) of this section may be given special
authorization by the department to purchase special fuel delivered into
bulk storage without payment of the special fuel tax at the time the
fuel is purchased. The special authorization applies only to full
truck-trailer loads filled at a terminal rack and delivered directly to
the bulk storage facilities of the special authorization holder. The
licensee shall pay special fuel tax on the fuel at the time the
licensee files their international fuel tax agreement tax return and
accompanying schedule with the department. The accompanying schedule
shall be provided in a form and manner determined by the department and
shall contain information on purchases and usage of all nondyed special
fuel purchased during the reporting period. In addition, by the
fifteenth day of the month following the month in which fuel under the
special authorization was purchased, the licensee must report to the
department, the name of the seller and the number of gallons purchased
for each purchase of such fuel, and any other information as the
department may require.
(2) To receive or maintain special authorization under subsection
(1) of this section, the following conditions regarding the
international fuel tax agreement licensee must apply:
(a) During the period encompassing the four consecutive calendar
quarters immediately preceding the fourth calendar quarter of the
previous year, the number of gallons consumed outside the state of
Washington as reported on the licensee's international fuel tax
agreement tax returns must have been equal to at least twenty percent
of the nondyed special fuel gallons, including fuel used on-road and
off-road, purchased by the licensee in the state of Washington, as
reported on the accompanying schedules required under subsection (1) of
this section;
(b) The licensee must have been licensed under the provisions of
the international fuel tax agreement during each of the four
consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the fourth calendar
quarter of the previous year; and
(c) The licensee has not violated the reporting requirements of
this section.
(3) Only a licensed special fuel supplier or special fuel importer
may sell special fuel to a special authorization holder in the manner
prescribed by this section.
(4) A special fuel ((distributor)) supplier or importer who sells
special fuel under the special authorization provisions of this section
is not liable for the special fuel tax on the fuel. ((By the fifteenth
day of the month following the month in which the fuel was sold, the
special fuel distributor shall report to the department, the name and
special authorization number of the purchaser and the number of gallons
sold for each purchase of such special fuel, and any other information
as the department may require.)) The special fuel supplier or importer
will report such sales, in a manner prescribed by the department, at
the time the special fuel supplier or importer submits the monthly tax
report.
(((4) A supplier selling special fuel under the provisions of this
section shall not be responsible for taxes due for special fuel
purchased under the provisions of this section.
(5) An international fuel tax agreement licensee who qualifies for
a special authorization under this section for calendar year 1999 is
not subject to the special fuel user requirements of RCW 82.38.289.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 A new section is added to chapter 82.38 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the intent and purpose of this chapter that the tax shall be
imposed at the time and place of the first taxable event and upon the
first taxable person within this state. Any person whose activities
would otherwise require payment of the tax imposed by RCW 82.38.030 but
who is exempt from the tax nevertheless has a precollection obligation
for the tax that must be imposed on the first taxable event within this
state. Failure to pay the tax with respect to a taxable event shall
not prevent tax liability from arising by reason of a subsequent
taxable event.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.36.042 (Notice by supplier of distributor's failure to
pay tax -- License suspension -- Notice to suppliers -- Revocation or
suspension upon continued noncompliance) and 1998 c 176 s 14;
(2) RCW 82.36.273 (Refunds to licensee for fuel purchased by exempt
person -- Exception -- Invoice or proof) and 1998 c 176 s 35;
(3) RCW 82.36.305 (Refunds to dealer delivering fuel exclusively
for marine use -- Limitations -- Supporting certificate) and 1965 ex.s. c
79 s 12 & 1961 c 15 s 82.36.305;
(4) RCW 82.36.360 (Separate invoices for nontaxed fuel) and 1961 c
15 s 82.36.360;
(5) RCW 82.36.373 (Refund for worthless accounts receivable -- Rules -- Apportionment after receipt) and 1998 c 176 s 43;
(6) RCW 82.36.407 (Tax liability of user -- Payment -- Exceptions) and
1998 c 176 s 48;
(7) RCW 82.38.070 (Credit for sales for which no consideration was
received -- Report -- Adjustment) and 1998 c 176 s 58, 1990 c 250 s 83, &
1971 ex.s. c 175 s 8;
(8) RCW 82.38.071 (Refund for worthless accounts receivable -- Rules -- Apportionment after receipt) and 1998 c 176 s 59;
(9) RCW 82.38.081 (Exemptions -- Motor vehicle fuel used for racing)
and 1998 c 115 s 6;
(10) RCW 82.38.185 (Refunds -- Tax paid purchased by exempt person -- Application) and 1998 c 176 s 73;
(11) RCW 82.38.285 (Tax liability of user -- Exceptions) and 1998 c
176 s 81; and
(12) RCW 82.38.165 (Notice by supplier of distributor's failure to
pay tax -- License suspension -- Notice to suppliers -- Revocation or
suspension upon continued noncompliance) and 1998 c 176 s 69.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---