BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.44.050 and 2001 c 100 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in subsections (1) through (((4))) (3)
of this section, benefits based on services in employment covered by or
pursuant to this chapter shall be payable on the same terms and subject
to the same conditions as compensation payable on the basis of other
service subject to this title.
(1) Benefits based on any and all service in an instructional,
research, or principal administrative capacity for any and all
educational institutions shall not be paid to an individual for any
week of unemployment which commences during the period between two
successive academic years or between two successive academic terms
within an academic year (or, when an agreement provides instead for a
similar period between two regular but not successive terms within an
academic year, during such period) if such individual performs such
services in the first of such academic years or terms and if there is
a contract or reasonable assurance that such individual will perform
services in any such capacity for any educational institution in the
second of such academic years or terms. Any employee of a common
school district who is presumed to be reemployed pursuant to RCW
28A.405.210 shall be deemed to have a contract for the ensuing term.
(2) ((Benefits shall not be paid based on any and all services in
any other capacity for any and all educational institutions for any
week of unemployment which commences during the period between two
successive academic years or between two successive academic terms
within an academic year, if such individual performs such services in
the first of such academic years or terms and there is a reasonable
assurance that such individual will perform such services in the second
of such academic years or terms: PROVIDED, That if benefits are denied
to any individual under this subsection and that individual was not
offered an opportunity to perform such services for the educational
institution for the second of such academic years or terms, the
individual is entitled to a retroactive payment of benefits for each
week for which the individual filed a timely claim for benefits and for
which benefits were denied solely by reason of this subsection.
(3))) Benefits shall not be paid based on any services described in
subsection((s)) (1) ((and (2))) of this section for any week of
unemployment which commences during an established and customary
vacation period or holiday recess if such individual performs such
services for any educational institution in the period immediately
before such vacation period or holiday recess, and there is a
reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services
for any educational institution in the period immediately following
such vacation period or holiday recess.
(((4))) (3) Benefits shall not be paid (as specified in
subsection((s (1),)) (1) or (2)((, or (3))) of this section) based on
any services described in subsection((s)) (1) ((or (2))) of this
section to any individual who performed such services in any
educational institution while in the employ of an educational service
district which is established pursuant to chapter 28A.310 RCW and
exists to provide services to local school districts.
(((5))) (4) As used in this section, "academic year" means: Fall,
winter, spring, and summer quarters or comparable semesters unless,
based upon objective criteria including enrollment and staffing, the
quarter or comparable semester is not in fact a part of the academic
year for the particular institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to claims with an effective
date on or after June 3, 2007.

--- END ---