BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that sudden
cardiac arrest is the leading single cause of death in the United
States, accounting for more than three hundred twenty-five thousand
deaths each year. Effective cardiopulmonary resuscitation, including
defibrillation, that is provided immediately after cardiac arrest can
double a victim's chance of survival. Survival rates drop seven to ten
percent for each minute without defibrillation.
(2) The legislature further finds that on many days, as much as
twenty percent of the nation's combined adult and child population can
be found in a school. Installation of an automatic external
defibrillator is one component of an overall school medical emergency
response plan recommended by the American heart association.
(3) Therefore the legislature intends to protect the health and
lives of the state's citizens by ensuring that automatic external
defibrillators are placed in each public high school and by providing
the funding necessary to phase in this requirement by the 2010 school
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a plan to phase in the placement of automatic external
defibrillators in all public high schools in the state by September 1,
2010. Between September 1, 2007, and September 1, 2010, the plan shall
require an increasing number of public high schools in each successive
year to have an automatic external defibrillator located in the school.
(2) Subject to funding provided for the purposes of this section,
school district boards of directors shall:
(a) Provide for the placement of an automatic external
defibrillator in each public high school in the district according to
the plan developed by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Ensure that the automatic external defibrillator is placed in
a prominent location and is readily accessible during the school day
and for extracurricular activities such as sporting events outside the
school day;
(c) Comply with the requirements of RCW 70.54.310, including
training of personnel, use of the defibrillator, and notification of
the local emergency medical services organization about the location of
the defibrillator; and
(d) Include instruction in the use of the defibrillator in staff
training and the health and fitness curriculum.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "high school" includes any
public school that enrolls students in grades ten, eleven, or twelve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---