BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to assist
community and economic development by clarifying how cities, towns,
counties, public corporations, and port districts may fully participate
in the federal new markets tax credit program.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.21.735 and 1995 c 212 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature hereby declares that carrying out the purposes
of federal grants or programs is both a public purpose and an
appropriate function for a city, town, county, or public corporation.
The provisions of RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755 and RCW 35.21.660 and
35.21.670 and the enabling authority herein conferred to implement
these provisions shall be construed to accomplish the purposes of RCW
35.21.730 through 35.21.755.
(2) All cities, towns, counties, and public corporations shall have
the power and authority to enter into agreements with the United States
or any agency or department thereof, or any agency of the state
government or its political subdivisions, and pursuant to such
agreements may receive and expend, or cause to be received and expended
by a custodian or trustee, federal or private funds for any lawful
public purpose. Pursuant to any such agreement, a city, town, county,
or public corporation may issue bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness that are guaranteed or otherwise secured by funds or other
instruments provided by or through the federal government or by the
federal government or an agency or instrumentality thereof under
section 108 of the housing and community development act of 1974 (42
U.S.C. Sec. 5308), as amended, or its successor, and may agree to repay
and reimburse for any liability thereon any guarantor of any such
bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued by such
jurisdiction or public corporation, or issued by any other public
entity. For purposes of this subsection, federal housing mortgage
insurance shall not constitute a federal guarantee or security.
(3) A city, town, county, or public corporation may pledge, as
security for any such bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness
or for its obligations to repay or reimburse any guarantor thereof, its
right, title, and interest in and to any or all of the following: (a)
Any federal grants or payments received or that may be received in the
future; (b) any of the following that may be obtained directly or
indirectly from the use of any federal or private funds received as
authorized in this section: (i) Property and interests therein, and
(ii) revenues; (c) any payments received or owing from any person
resulting from the lending of any federal or private funds received as
authorized in this section; (d) any proceeds under (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection and any securities or investments in which (a), (b), or
(c) of this subsection or proceeds thereof may be invested; (e) any
interest or other earnings on (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection.
(4) A city, town, county, or public corporation may establish one
or more special funds relating to any or all of the sources listed in
subsection (3)(a) through (e) of this section and pay or cause to be
paid from such fund the principal, interest, premium if any, and other
amounts payable on any bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness
authorized under this section, and pay or cause to be paid any amounts
owing on any obligations for repayment or reimbursement of guarantors
of any such bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness. A city,
town, county, or public corporation may contract with a financial
institution either to act as trustee or custodian to receive,
administer, and expend any federal or private funds, or to collect,
administer, and make payments from any special fund as authorized under
this section, or both, and to perform other duties and functions in
connection with the transactions authorized under this section. If the
bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness and related agreements
comply with subsection (6) of this section, then any such funds held by
any such trustee or custodian, or by a public corporation, shall not
constitute public moneys or funds of any city, town, or county and at
all times shall be kept segregated and set apart from other funds.
(5) For purposes of this section, "lawful public purpose" includes,
without limitation, any use of funds, including loans thereof to public
or private parties, authorized by the agreements with the United States
or any department or agency thereof under which federal or private
funds are obtained, or authorized under the federal laws and
regulations pertinent to such agreements.
(6) If any such federal or private funds are loaned or granted to
any private party or used to guarantee any obligations of any private
party, then any bonds, notes, other evidences of indebtedness issued or
entered into for the purpose of receiving or causing the receipt of
such federal or private funds, and any agreements to repay or reimburse
guarantors, shall not be obligations of any city, town, or county and
shall be payable only from a special fund as authorized in this section
or from any of the security pledged pursuant to the authority of this
section, or both. Any bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness
to which this subsection applies shall contain a recital to the effect
that they are not obligations of the city, town, or county or the state
of Washington and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing
power of the state or any municipal corporation or subdivision of the
state or any agency of any of the foregoing, is pledged to the payment
of principal, interest, or premium, if any, thereon. Any bonds, notes,
other evidences of indebtedness, or other obligations to which this
subsection applies shall not be included in any computation for
purposes of limitations on indebtedness. To the extent expressly
agreed in writing by a city, town, county, or public corporation, this
subsection shall not apply to bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness issued for, or obligations incurred for, the necessary
support of the poor and infirm by that city, town, county, or public
corporation.
(7) Any bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued by,
or reimbursement obligations incurred by, a city, town, county, or
public corporation consistent with the provisions of this section but
prior to May 3, 1995, and any loans or pledges made by a city, town, or
county in connection therewith substantially consistent with the
provisions of this section but prior to May 3, 1995, are deemed
authorized and shall not be held void, voidable, or invalid due to any
lack of authority under the laws of this state.
(8) All cities, towns, counties, public corporations, and port
districts may create partnerships and limited liability companies and
enter into agreements with public or private entities, including
partnership agreements and limited liability company agreements, to
implement within their boundaries the federal new markets tax credit
program established by the community renewal tax relief act of 2000 (26
U.S.C. Sec. 45D) or its successor statute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The authority granted by this act is
additional and supplemental to any other authority of any city, town,
county, public corporation, or port district. This act may not be
construed to imply that any of the power or authority granted in this
act was not available to any city, town, county, public corporation, or
port district under prior law. Any previous actions consistent with
this act are ratified and confirmed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---