BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.637 and 2004 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When an offender has completed all requirements of the
sentence, including any and all legal financial obligations, and while
under the custody and supervision of the department, the secretary or
the secretary's designee shall notify the sentencing court, which shall
discharge the offender and provide the offender with a certificate of
discharge by issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by
mailing the certificate to the offender's last known address.
(b)(i) When an offender has reached the end of his or her
supervision with the department and has completed all the requirements
of the sentence except his or her legal financial obligations, the
secretary's designee shall provide the county clerk with a notice that
the offender has completed all nonfinancial requirements of the
sentence.
(ii) When the department has provided the county clerk with notice
that an offender has completed all the requirements of the sentence and
the offender subsequently satisfies all legal financial obligations
under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the sentencing court,
including the notice from the department, which shall discharge the
offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the
certificate to the offender's last known address.
(c) When an offender who is subject to requirements of the sentence
in addition to the payment of legal financial obligations either is not
subject to supervision by the department or does not complete the
requirements while under supervision of the department, it is the
offender's responsibility to provide the court with verification of the
completion of the sentence conditions other than the payment of legal
financial obligations. When the offender satisfies all legal financial
obligations under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the
sentencing court that the legal financial obligations have been
satisfied. When the court has received both notification from the
clerk and adequate verification from the offender that the sentence
requirements have been completed, the court shall discharge the
offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the
certificate to the offender's last known address.
(2) Every signed certificate and order of discharge shall be filed
with the county clerk of the sentencing county. In addition, the court
shall send to the department a copy of every signed certificate and
order of discharge ((to the auditor for the county in which the court
resides and to)) for offender sentences under the authority of the
department. The ((department shall create and maintain a data base
containing)) county clerk shall enter into a database maintained by the
administrator for the courts the names of all felons who have been
issued certificates of discharge, the date of discharge, and the date
of conviction and offense.
(3) An offender who is not convicted of a violent offense or a sex
offense and is sentenced to a term involving community supervision may
be considered for a discharge of sentence by the sentencing court prior
to the completion of community supervision, provided that the offender
has completed at least one-half of the term of community supervision
and has met all other sentence requirements.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
discharge shall have the effect of restoring all civil rights lost by
operation of law upon conviction, and the certificate of discharge
shall so state. Nothing in this section prohibits the use of an
offender's prior record for purposes of determining sentences for later
offenses as provided in this chapter. Nothing in this section affects
or prevents use of the offender's prior conviction in a later criminal
prosecution either as an element of an offense or for impeachment
purposes. A certificate of discharge is not based on a finding of
rehabilitation.
(5) Unless otherwise ordered by the sentencing court, a certificate
of discharge shall not terminate the offender's obligation to comply
with an order issued under chapter 10.99 RCW that excludes or prohibits
the offender from having contact with a specified person or coming
within a set distance of any specified location that was contained in
the judgment and sentence. An offender who violates such an order
after a certificate of discharge has been issued shall be subject to
prosecution according to the chapter under which the order was
originally issued.
(6) Upon release from custody, the offender may apply to the
department for counseling and help in adjusting to the community. This
voluntary help may be provided for up to one year following the release
from custody.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.96.050 and 2002 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
When a prisoner on parole has performed all obligations of his or
her release, including any and all legal financial obligations, for
such time as shall satisfy the indeterminate sentence review board that
his or her final release is not incompatible with the best interests of
society and the welfare of the paroled individual, the board may make
a final order of discharge and issue a certificate of discharge to the
prisoner. The certificate of discharge shall be issued to the offender
in person or by mail to the prisoner's last known address.
The board shall send to the department of corrections a copy of
every signed certificate of discharge ((to the auditor for the county
in which the offender was sentenced and to)) for offender sentences
under the authority of the department of corrections. ((The department
shall create and maintain a data base containing the names of all
felons who have been issued certificates of discharge, the date of
discharge, and the date of conviction and offense.))
The board retains the jurisdiction to issue a certificate of
discharge after the expiration of the prisoner's or parolee's maximum
statutory sentence. If not earlier granted, the board shall make a
final order of discharge three years from the date of parole unless the
parolee is on suspended or revoked status at the expiration of the
three years. Such discharge, regardless of when issued, shall have the
effect of restoring all civil rights lost by operation of law upon
conviction, and the certification of discharge shall so state. This
restoration of civil rights shall not restore the right to receive,
possess, own, or transport firearms.
The discharge provided for in this section shall be considered as
a part of the sentence of the convicted person and shall not in any
manner be construed as affecting the powers of the governor to pardon
any such person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.660 (Felony offender--Completion
of sentence) and 2005 c 246 s 12 are each repealed.

--- END ---