BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall review Washington law to determine all areas in
Washington law in which the age of consent is statutorily established
including but not limited to entering a marriage contract, entering
into a legal contractual obligation, executing a will, the ability to
vote, making health care decisions, receiving mental health or chemical
dependency treatment, and obtaining body piercings or tattoos.
(2) The institute shall review available studies and reports
pertaining to the ability of a minor to provide consent, including
studies on adolescent brain development. The review should include
information available on the ability of a minor to understand the
long-term effects or consequences of his or her decisions, his or her
ability to provide consent at various ages, and at what age a minor is
best able to provide consent.
(3) The institute shall provide a report to the appropriate
legislative committees by December 1, 2007. The report shall include
a comparison of the Washington statutes reviewed in subsection (1) of
this section that includes the age at which a minor is statutorily
permitted to consent.

--- END ---