BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. (1) The legislature recognizes that
although many regions of the state are thriving, there are still
distressed communities throughout rural and urban Washington where
investments in economic development and social services initiatives
could create vibrant local business districts and prosperous
neighborhoods. Communities, whether they are formed by cultural
identity, geography, or other characteristics, can grow strong with a
long-term vision and the synergy of crucial investments. Providing
these investments is critical for the economic health of local
communities, helps build strong relationships with the state, and
expands life opportunities for underserved populations.
(2) The legislature further recognizes that private nonprofit
corporations fill an important public purpose in providing health,
safety, and welfare services to our state's residents. Acting through
partnerships with governmental entities, these private sector providers
are able to increase the amount and quality of services available to
state residents, conferring a valuable benefit on the public.
(3) The legislature therefore finds that existing programs by
governmental entities and private nonprofit organizations to help
distressed communities and underserved populations could be enhanced by
creating the community development fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Access to human services" means resources to help people in
the communities access services including, but not limited to, health
care, state programs, education, and workforce development and
placement programs.
(2) "Capacity building" means supporting the development and
stability of community organizations and programs including building
cooperative relationships between communities with established
nonprofit organizations.
(3) "Committee" means the joint legislative community development
fund committee.
(4) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(5) "Director" means the executive officer of the joint legislative
community development fund committee.
(6) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization that is tax
exempt, or not required to apply for an exemption, under section
501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as
amended.
(7) "Technical assistance" means providing professional services
under contract to emerging or expanding nonprofit organizations that
will enable them to initiate or improve service to their customers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 FUND CREATION AND PURPOSE. The community
development fund is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the fund
may be spent only after appropriation. The fund shall be used for
capacity-building, technical assistance, and capital project grants
through a competitive process to qualifying governmental entities and
nonprofit organizations to:
(1) Support local economic development initiatives, particularly
those that encourage small business start-up and sustainability;
(2) Offer access to human services that help local communities care
for those in need;
(3) Provide education and recreational opportunities separate from
the public education system;
(4) Strengthen local capacity to establish goals, carry out
initiatives, and build cooperative relationships within their
communities; and
(5) Support capital projects that further community objectives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 GOVERNANCE. (1)(a) The joint legislative
community development fund committee is created, which shall consist of
three members of the senate and three members of the house of
representatives.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint three members to the
committee, two members from the majority caucus of the senate and one
member from the minority caucus of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint
three members to the committee, two members from the majority caucus of
the house of representatives and one member from the minority caucus of
the house of representatives.
(b) The committee may include legislators from rural and urban
distressed areas.
(c) Members shall be appointed to two-year terms.
(d) Vacancies on the committee shall be filled by the appointing
official as designated in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection. All
vacancies shall be filled from the same political party and from the
same house of the legislature as the member whose seat was vacated.
(2) The members of the committee shall serve without additional
compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 for attending meetings of the committee
or a subcommittee of the committee, or while engaged in other business
authorized by the committee.
(3) The administration of the committee is subject to RCW
44.04.260.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 COMMITTEE POWERS AND DUTIES. Subject to RCW
44.04.260, the committee has the power and duty to:
(1) Establish and conduct a competitive process to solicit,
evaluate, and prioritize project proposals to invest the community
development fund in economic development and social services
initiatives in distressed rural and urban areas;
(2) Hire and fix the salary of a director. Employee salaries,
other than the director's salary, shall be set by the director with the
approval of the committee;
(3) Appoint its own cochairs, one from the senate and one from the
house of representatives, and adopt rules and procedures for its
orderly operation. The committee may create subcommittees to perform
duties under this chapter; and
(4) Cooperate, act, and function with the Washington state
legislature including but not limited to: (a) Submitting a prioritized
list of projects for funding each biennium through the community
development fund; and (b) recommending statutory or budgetary changes
to enhance the effectiveness of, or the resources available in, the
community development fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 GRANT-MAKING PROCESS AND CRITERIA. The
committee shall establish and conduct a competitive process to solicit,
evaluate, and prioritize projects that propose to invest in economic
development and social services initiatives in distressed rural and
urban areas, as follows:
(1) The committee shall determine a process to notify qualifying
governmental entities and nonprofit organizations of the availability
of moneys through the community development fund.
(2) The committee shall conduct an application, evaluation, and
prioritization process according to the following criteria:
(a) The applicant demonstrates a long-term vision for the
development of the community, using the synergy of enhanced services,
infrastructure, and community improvements;
(b) The applicant demonstrates that the state's investment in the
project is critical; and
(c) The applicant demonstrates that the applicant has the ability
to fulfill the terms of the grant agreement.
(3) The committee may also consider the following criteria in its
evaluation of proposals:
(a) Severity of economic distress including poverty, unemployment,
low-income residents, dependence upon public assistance, job loss,
plant closures, outmigration, incidence of crime, abandoned housing
stock, deteriorated infrastructure, and other measures of distress;
(b) Evidence that there is an unmet need for human and social
services, youth education, or workforce training;
(c) Evidence that the project will achieve its stated goals
including:
(i) Creating new or retaining existing jobs;
(ii) Increasing local economic development opportunities;
(iii) Providing residents with needed human and social services; or
(iv) Providing the workforce and youth with needed education and
training opportunities;
(d) Extent to which the grassroots community, local leaders, and
partners are involved in developing and carrying out the project; and
(e) Other relevant criteria as determined by the committee.
(4) The committee must submit a prioritized list of recommended
projects for full legislative consideration either as a bill or as a
budget request. The list must include a description of each
prioritized project and the amount of recommended funding. In addition
to the prioritized list, an alternate list of prioritized grants may
also be submitted. The legislature may remove projects from the list
recommended by the committee; however, the legislature may not change
the prioritization of the list. If a project is removed from the list,
the legislature may add projects from the alternate list in order of
priority.
(5) After the legislature has approved a specific list of projects
in law, the department shall develop and manage appropriate contracts
with the selected applicants; monitor project expenditures and grantee
performance; report project and contract information as the committee
may request; and exercise due diligence and other contract management
responsibilities as required. The department may not sign agreements
or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the
legislature has approved a specific list of projects in law.
(6) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the
department shall include provisions which require that capital
improvements must be held by the grantee for a specific period of time
appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities must be used
for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be
out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall
repay to the community development fund the principal amount of the
grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of
Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.
(7) The grant-making process and criteria described in this section
shall be used by the committee for community development fund grants
beginning with the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, and each biennium
thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 ACCOUNTABILITY AND REPORTS. (1) The
committee shall develop accountability and reporting standards for
grant recipients.
(2) The committee shall submit a report each biennium to the
appropriate committees of the legislature, including at a minimum:
(a) The results of projects funded during the current biennium;
(b) Recommendations for policy and programmatic changes to the
community development fund; and
(c) A list of prioritized projects and amounts proposed for funding
in the subsequent biennium.
(3) The committee shall submit its initial report by January 1,
2009, when, in addition to providing the information required in
subsection (2) of this section, the committee shall propose one or more
sources of ongoing funding for the community development fund.

Sec. 8 RCW 44.04.260 and 2005 c 319 s 112 are each amended to
read as follows:
The joint legislative audit and review committee, the joint
transportation committee, the select committee on pension policy, the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the joint
legislative community development fund committee, and the joint
legislative systems committee are subject to such operational policies,
procedures, and oversight as are deemed necessary by the facilities and
operations committee of the senate and the executive rules committee of
the house of representatives to ensure operational adequacy of the
agencies of the legislative branch. As used in this section,
"operational policies, procedures, and oversight" includes the
development process of biennial budgets, contracting procedures,
personnel policies, and compensation plans, selection of a chief
administrator, facilities, and expenditures. This section does not
grant oversight authority to the facilities and operations committee of
the senate over any standing committee of the house of representatives
or oversight authority to the executive rules committee of the house of
representatives over any standing committee of the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 STATE GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATION TO THE
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT FUND. The sum of three hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, from the state general fund to
the community development fund for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT FUND APPROPRIATION TO
THE COMMITTEE. The sum of three hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2009, from the community development fund to the joint
legislative community development fund committee for the purposes of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are
not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 7 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 9 of this act is necessary for the
support of state government by providing funding for vital community
projects and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---