BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state building code council shall
develop a model pricing plan for private residential fire sprinkler
water charges by December 1, 2007. The council must survey other
states during the development process and make the supporting data
available to local jurisdictions upon request.

--- END ---