BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.110 and 2004 c 105 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The moneys collected by the department under this chapter shall be
distributed from time to time but at least once a year in the following
manner:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall retain enough money to cover expenses incurred in the
administration of this chapter((: PROVIDED, That such retention shall
never exceed eighteen)).
(2) The department may retain either a maximum of five percent of
fees collected or one hundred thousand dollars, whichever is less, to
cover expenses incurred in the administration of this chapter.
(3) The remaining moneys shall be distributed for ORV recreation
facilities by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation in
accordance with RCW 46.09.170(2)(d)(ii)(A).

--- END ---