BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.397 and 1999 c 232 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Main stem of the Columbia and Snake rivers" means the main
stem of the Columbia and Snake rivers from the Bonneville dam to the
upper limits of the pool behind the Chief Joseph dam on the Columbia
river, from the confluence of the Snake river and the Columbia river to
the upper limits of the pool behind the Ice Harbor dam.
(b) "Pool" means any surface water reservoir where water is
collected and stored for subsequent beneficial use.
(2) The department may approve a change of the point of diversion
prescribed in a permit to appropriate water for a beneficial use to a
point of diversion that is located downstream and is an ((existing))
approved intake structure ((with capacity to transport the additional
diversion,)) if the ownership, purpose of use, season of use, and place
of use of the permit remain the same. The department shall not approve
a change in the point of diversion prescribed in a permit if it will
result in a negative impact on fish habitat or archaeological sites.
(3) In addition to the authority granted in subsection (2) of this
section, the department may approve a change of the point of diversion
prescribed in a permit to appropriate water for a beneficial use to a
point of diversion that is located in the same pool of the main stem of
the Columbia and Snake rivers, and is an approved intake structure, if
the ownership, purpose of use, season of use, and place of use of the
permit remain the same.
(a) Prior to approving the transfer of such a permit, the
department must provide a thirty-day consultation with interested
government agencies, including tribal governments, regarding the
requested transfer and its potential to affect instream resources in
the Columbia river.
(b) The department shall report to the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature regarding implementation of this
authority by January 10, 2010.
(4) This section may not be construed as limiting in any manner
whatsoever other authorities of the department under RCW 90.03.380 or
other changes that may be approved under RCW 90.03.380 under
authorities existing before July 25, 1999.

--- END ---