BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.621 and 2005 c 249 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that active military and naval veterans,
reserve military and naval veterans, and national guard members called
to active duty have served their country and have risked their lives to
defend the lives of all Americans and the freedoms that define and
distinguish our nation. The legislature intends to honor active
military and naval veterans, reserve military and naval veterans, and
national guard members who have served on active military or naval duty
for the public service they have provided to this country.
(2) Subject to the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges, may waive all or
a portion of tuition and fees for ((the following persons:
(a))) an eligible veteran or national guard member((;
(b) A child and the spouse of an eligible veteran or national guard
member who became totally disabled as defined in RCW 28B.15.385 while
engaged in active federal military or naval service, or who is
determined by the federal government to be a prisoner of war or missing
in action;
(c) A child and the surviving spouse of an eligible veteran or
national guard member who lost his or her life while engaged in active
federal military or naval service. However, upon remarriage, the
surviving spouse of an eligible veteran or national guard member is
ineligible for a waiver under this section)).
(3) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community colleges,
may waive all or a portion of tuition and fees for a military or naval
veteran who is a Washington domiciliary, but who did not serve on
foreign soil or in international waters or in another location in
support of those serving on foreign soil or in international waters and
who does not qualify as an eligible veteran or national guard member
under subsection (((5))) (7) of this section. However, there shall be
no state general fund support for waivers granted under this
subsection.
(4) Subject to the conditions in subsection (5) of this section,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community colleges,
shall waive all tuition and fees for the following persons:
(a) A child and the spouse of an eligible veteran or national guard
member who became totally disabled as defined in RCW 28B.15.385 while
engaged in active federal military or naval service, or who is
determined by the federal government to be a prisoner of war or missing
in action; and
(b) A child and the surviving spouse of an eligible veteran or
national guard member who lost his or her life while engaged in active
federal military or naval service.
(5) The conditions in this subsection (5) apply to waivers under
subsection (4) of this section.
(a) A child must be a Washington domiciliary between the age of
seventeen and twenty-six to be eligible for the tuition waiver and a
child's marital status does not affect eligibility.
(b) A surviving spouse must be a Washington domiciliary, and has
ten years from the date of the death, total disability as defined in
RCW 28B.15.385, or federal determination of prisoner of war or missing
in action status of the eligible veteran or national guard member to
receive the benefit. Upon remarriage, the surviving spouse is
ineligible for the tuition waiver.
(c) Each recipient's continued participation is subject to the
school's satisfactory progress policy.
(6) Private vocational schools and private higher education
institutions are encouraged to provide waivers consistent with the
terms in subsections (2) ((and (3))) through (5) of this section.
(((5) As used in)) (7) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this section.
(a) "Eligible veteran or national guard member" means a Washington
domiciliary who was an active or reserve member of the United States
military or naval forces, or a national guard member called to active
duty, who served in active federal service, under either Title 10 or
Title 32 of the United States Code, in a war or conflict fought on
foreign soil or in international waters or in another location in
support of those serving on foreign soil or in international waters,
and if discharged from service, has received an honorable discharge.
(b) "Washington domiciliary" means a person whose true, fixed, and
permanent house and place of habitation is the state of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.910 and 2006 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to
public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived
under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and
unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations
act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen
State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial
management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to
all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.
(a) University of Washington 21 percent
(b) Washington State University 20 percent
(c) Eastern Washington University 11 percent
(d) Central Washington University 8 percent
(e) Western Washington University 10 percent
(f) The Evergreen State College 6 percent
(g) Community colleges as a whole 35 percent
(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to
waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the
following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.014;
(b) RCW 28B.15.100;
(c) RCW 28B.15.225;
(d) RCW 28B.15.380;
(e) RCW 28B.15.520;
(f) RCW 28B.15.526;
(g) RCW 28B.15.527;
(h) RCW 28B.15.543;
(i) RCW 28B.15.545;
(j) RCW 28B.15.555;
(k) RCW 28B.15.556;
(l) RCW 28B.15.615;
(m) RCW 28B.15.621(2);
(n) RCW 28B.15.730;
(o) RCW 28B.15.740;
(p) RCW 28B.15.750;
(q) RCW 28B.15.756;
(r) RCW 28B.50.259; and
(s) RCW 28B.70.050.
(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees
contained in the following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.522;
(b) RCW 28B.15.540; ((and))
(c) RCW 28B.15.558; and
(d) RCW 28B.15.621 (3) and (4).
(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the
western interstate commission for higher education western
undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.
(a) Washington State University 1 percent
(b) Eastern Washington University 3 percent
(c) Central Washington University 3 percent
(5) The institutions of higher education will participate in
outreach activities to increase the number of veterans who receive
tuition waivers. Colleges and universities shall revise the
application for admissions so that all applicants shall have the
opportunity to advise the institution that they are veterans who need
assistance. If a person indicates on the application for admissions
that the person is a veteran who is in need of assistance, then the
institution of higher education shall ask the person whether they have
any funds disbursed in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill available
to them. Each institution shall encourage veterans to utilize funds
available to them in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill prior to
providing the veteran a tuition waiver.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.15.385 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 191 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 28B.15.380, ((28B.15.385,)) 28B.15.520, and
((28B.40.361)) 28B.15.621, the phrase "totally disabled" ((as used in
RCW 28B.15.380, 28B.15.520 and 28B.40.361 shall)) means a person who
has become totally and permanently disabled for life by bodily injury
or disease, and is thereby prevented from performing any occupation or
gainful pursuit.

--- END ---