BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 8.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The condemnor must provide notice as required by this section
before:
(a) A state agency or other entity subject to chapter 8.04 RCW
takes a final action to authorize the condemnation of a specific
property;
(b) A county or other entity subject to chapter 8.08 RCW takes a
final action deeming a specific property to be "for county purposes" as
provided in RCW 8.08.010;
(c) A city or town or other entity subject to chapter 8.12 RCW
takes a final action authorizing condemnation as provided in RCW
8.12.040;
(d) A school district or other entity subject to chapter 8.16 RCW
takes a final action selecting property for condemnation as provided in
RCW 8.16.010;
(e) Any other corporation authorized to condemn property takes a
final action to authorize condemnation as provided in RCW 8.20.010; or
(f) Any other entity subject to chapter 8.04, 8.08, 8.12, 8.16, or
8.20 RCW takes any final action to authorize the condemnation of a
specific property.
(2)(a)(i) Notice of the planned final action shall be mailed by
certified mail to each and every property owner of record as indicated
on the tax rolls of the county to the address provided on such tax
rolls, for each property potentially subject to condemnation, at least
fifteen days before the final action. If no address is provided for a
property on the tax rolls of the county, the potential condemnor shall
conduct a diligent inquiry for the address for each and every property
owner of record and send the notice to that address. In case the
property sought to be appropriated is school or county land, such
notice shall be mailed to the auditor of the county in which the
property sought to be acquired and appropriated is situated.
(ii) The notice must contain a general description of the property
such as an address, lot number, or parcel number and specify that
condemnation of the property will be considered during the final
action. The notice must also describe the date, time, and location of
the final action at which the potential condemnor will decide whether
or not to authorize the condemnation of the property.
(iii) Mailing of the certified letter to the proper addressee or
addressees is deemed to be sufficient notice under this subsection
(2)(a).
(b)(i) Notice of a planned final action described in subsection (1)
of this section shall also be given by publication in the legal
newspaper with the largest circulation in the jurisdiction where such
property is located once a week for two successive weeks before the
final action. A second publication must also be given in the legal
newspaper routinely used by the potential condemnor, where such
newspaper does not also have the largest circulation in the
jurisdiction. Proof of circulation shall be established by publisher's
affidavit filed with the potential condemnor. Such publication shall
be deemed sufficient notice in lieu of a certified letter for each
property owner of record for the property whose address is unknown and
cannot be ascertained after a diligent inquiry.
(ii) The notice published under this subsection (2)(b) shall
contain the same information as is required under (a) of this
subsection.
(3) In a condemnation action subject to this section in which a
condemnee alleges insufficient notice under this section, the court may
determine whether the condemnor made a diligent attempt to provide
sufficient notice and issue a finding on the sufficiency of the notice.
Lack of sufficient notice under this section shall render the
subsequent proceedings void as to the person improperly notified, but
the subsequent proceedings shall not be void as to all persons or
parties having been notified as provided in this section, either by
publication or otherwise. A potential condemnor may cure insufficient
notice under this section by providing an additional sufficient notice
prior to taking a new final action, and filing a new petition if one
was previously filed, for condemnation for the property owner of record
who received insufficient notice. In such a case, RCW 8.12.530 shall
not apply and a subsequent proceeding may be filed sooner than one year
after discontinuance.
(4)(a) For potential condemnors subject to chapter 42.30 RCW, the
open public meetings act, "final action" has the same meaning as that
provided in RCW 42.30.020.
(b) For state agencies not subject to chapter 42.30 RCW, the office
of the attorney general shall publish procedures that define "final
action" for state agencies to ensure that property owners of record are
provided with notice and opportunity for comment before the agency
makes a final decision to authorize the condemnation of specific
property.
(c) For all other entities subject to this act, "final action"
means a public meeting at which the entity informs potentially affected
property owners of record about the scope and reasons for a potential
condemnation action. A meeting must be held in each county where
property being considered for condemnation is located. The meeting
must be open to the public and conducted by a duly authorized
representative of the entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 8.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings under this chapter are subject to the notice
requirements of section 1 of this act. Compliance with section 1 of
this act is required before an action can be filed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 8.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings under this chapter are subject to the notice
requirements of section 1 of this act. Compliance with section 1 of
this act is required before an action can be filed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 8.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings under this chapter are subject to the notice
requirements of section 1 of this act. Compliance with section 1 of
this act is required before an action can be filed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 8.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings under this chapter are subject to the notice
requirements of section 1 of this act. Compliance with section 1 of
this act is required before an action can be filed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 8.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings under this chapter are subject to the notice
requirements of section 1 of this act. Compliance with section 1 of
this act is required before an action can be filed under this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 8.12.530 and 1988 c 202 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
At any time within six months from the date of rendition of the
last judgment awarding compensation for any such improvement in the
superior court, or if appellate review is sought, then within two
months after the final determination of the proceeding in the supreme
court or the court of appeals, any such city may discontinue the
proceedings by ordinance passed for that purpose before making payment
or proceeding with the improvement by paying or depositing in court all
taxable costs incurred by any parties to the proceedings up to the time
of such discontinuance. Except as provided in section 1(3) of this
act, if any such improvement be discontinued, no new proceedings shall
be undertaken therefor until the expiration of one year from the date
of such discontinuance.

--- END ---