BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 78.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Until July 2013, the department may enter into a written
cost-reimbursement agreement with an applicant, permit holder, or
project operator to recover from the applicant, permit holder, or
project operator the reasonable costs incurred by the department in
carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies in support of permit processing, or orders issued by the oil
and gas supervisor and permit compliance. Cost-reimbursement
agreements are considered an interim measure until oil and gas
development activities necessitate additional department staffing
resources. Cost-reimbursement agreements must be initiated at the
request of an applicant for the purpose of assisting the department in
expediting and facilitating the permitting and compliance processes.
The cost-reimbursement agreement must identify the specific tasks,
costs, and schedule for work to be conducted under the agreement.
(2) The written cost-reimbursement agreement must be negotiated
with the applicant, permit holder, or project operator. Under the
provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant,
permit holder, or project operator must be used by the department to
contract with a third party to carry out the work covered by the
cost-reimbursement agreement and the department's administrative costs.
The administrative costs are those costs incurred by the department in
receiving an application for a drilling permit, establishment of a
development unit, or approval or issuance of a pooling order including
negotiating the cost-reimbursement agreement, negotiating the contracts
for services with third parties, management of the cost-reimbursement
and services contracts, reviewing the reports of the third party, and
issuing the permits, orders, or agreements. For the purposes of this
subsection, the department shall charge no more than forty dollars per
hour to recover administrative costs of the contract for services with
the third party. If departmental wages increase significantly, the
legislature may review and adjust this amount to reflect the additional
costs of administering third-party contracts.
(3) The department shall, in developing and implementing the
cost-reimbursement agreement, ensure that the department reviews and
oversees the work performed by the third party, including the actual
issuance of permits and reviewing reports and taking final action
related to permit compliance. Final decisions that involve policy
matters must be made by the department and not by the consultant. The
billing process must provide for accurate time and cost accounting and
may include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments. The
restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any cost-reimbursement
agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a cost-reimbursement
agreement.

--- END ---