BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.005 and 2006 c 265 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that:
(a) Parents are their children's first and most important teachers
and decision makers;
(b) Research across disciplines now demonstrates that what happens
in the earliest years makes a critical difference in children's
readiness to succeed in school and life;
(c) Washington's competitiveness in the global economy requires a
world-class education system that starts early and supports life-long
learning;
(d) Washington state currently makes substantial investments in
voluntary child care and early learning services and supports, but
because services are fragmented across multiple state agencies, and
early learning providers lack the supports and incentives needed to
improve the quality of services they provide, many parents have
difficulty accessing high quality early learning services;
(e) A more cohesive and integrated voluntary early learning system
would result in greater efficiencies for the state, increased
partnership between the state and the private sector, improved access
to high quality early learning services, and better employment and
early learning outcomes for families and all children.
(2) The legislature finds that the early years of a child's life
are critical to the child's healthy brain development and that the
quality of caregiving during the early years can significantly impact
the child's intellectual, social, and emotional development.
(3) The purpose of this chapter is:
(a) To establish the department of early learning;
(b) To coordinate and consolidate state activities relating to
child care and early learning programs;
(c) To safeguard and promote the health, safety, and well-being of
children receiving child care and early learning assistance;
(d) To provide tools to promote the hiring of suitable providers of
child care by:
(i) Providing parents with access to information regarding child
care providers;
(ii) Providing child care providers with known information
regarding applicants' sexual misconduct or other abusive conduct;
(iii) Providing parents with child care licensing complaint
histories regarding child care providers; and
(iv) Requiring background checks of applicants for employment in
any child care facility licensed or regulated under current law;
(e) To promote linkages and alignment between early learning
programs and elementary schools and support the transition of children
and families from prekindergarten environments to kindergarten;
(((e))) (f) To promote the development of a sufficient number and
variety of adequate child care and early learning facilities, both
public and private; and
(((f))) (g) To license agencies and to assure the users of such
agencies, their parents, the community at large and the agencies
themselves that adequate minimum standards are maintained by all child
care and early learning facilities.
(4) This chapter does not expand the state's authority to license
or regulate activities or programs beyond those licensed or regulated
under existing law.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.010 and 2006 c 265 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility that provides child care and early learning
services outside a child's own home and includes the following
irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency:
(a) "Child day care center" means an agency that regularly provides
child day care and early learning services for a group of children for
periods of less than twenty-four hours;
(b) "Early learning" includes but is not limited to programs and
services for child care; state, federal, private, and nonprofit
preschool; child care subsidies; child care resource and referral;
parental education and support; and training and professional
development for early learning professionals;
(c) "Family day care provider" means a child day care provider who
regularly provides child day care and early learning services for not
more than twelve children in the provider's home in the family living
quarters;
(d) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community
facility.
(2) "Agency" does not include the following:
(a) Persons related to the child in the following ways:
(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and
including first cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding
generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;
(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;
(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as
well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons,
and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state
law; or
(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (2)(a), even after the marriage is terminated;
(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child;
(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or
children, with or without compensation, where the person providing care
for periods of less than twenty-four hours does not conduct such
activity on an ongoing, regularly scheduled basis for the purpose of
engaging in business, which includes, but is not limited to,
advertising such care;
(d) Parents on a mutually cooperative basis exchange care of one
another's children;
(e) Nursery schools or kindergartens that are engaged primarily in
educational work with preschool children and in which no child is
enrolled on a regular basis for more than four hours per day;
(f) Schools, including boarding schools, that are engaged primarily
in education, operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a
stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children, and do not
accept custody of children;
(g) Seasonal camps of three months' or less duration engaged
primarily in recreational or educational activities;
(h) Facilities providing care to children for periods of less than
twenty-four hours whose parents remain on the premises to participate
in activities other than employment;
(i) Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years
before June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or assistance
from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part by an
endowment or trust fund;
(j) An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal
government or an agency, located within the boundaries of a federally
recognized Indian reservation, licensed by the Indian tribe;
(k) An agency located on a federal military reservation, except
where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to
the licensing requirements of this chapter;
(l) An agency that offers early learning and support services, such
as parent education, and does not provide child care services on a
regular basis.
(3) "Applicant" means a person who requests or seeks employment in
an agency.
(4) "Department" means the department of early learning.
(((4))) (5) "Director" means the director of the department.
(((5))) (6) "Employer" means a person or business that engages the
services of one or more people, especially for wages or salary to work
in an agency.
(7) "Enforcement action" means denial, suspension, revocation,
modification, or nonrenewal of a license pursuant to RCW 43.215.300(1)
or assessment of civil monetary penalties pursuant to RCW
43.215.300(3).
(((6))) (8) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a
disciplinary measure to an agency that has previously been issued a
full license but is out of compliance with licensing standards.
(((7))) (9) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard
of care to be maintained by an agency.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.215.200 and 2006 c 265 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the director's duty with regard to licensing:
(1) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of persons
representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to
designate categories of child care facilities for which separate or
different requirements shall be developed as may be appropriate whether
because of variations in the ages and other characteristics of the
children served, variations in the purposes and services offered or
size or structure of the agencies to be licensed, or because of any
other factor relevant thereto;
(2) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of persons
representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to adopt
and publish minimum requirements for licensing applicable to each of
the various categories of agencies to be licensed under this chapter((.
The minimum requirements shall be limited to:
(a) The size and suitability of a facility and the plan of
operation for carrying out the purpose for which an applicant seeks a
license;
(b) The character, suitability, and competence of an agency and
other persons associated with an agency directly responsible for the
care of children. In consultation with law enforcement personnel, the
director shall investigate the conviction record or pending charges and
dependency record information under chapter 43.43 RCW of each agency
and its staff seeking licensure or relicensure. No unfounded
allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020 may be
disclosed to a provider licensed under this chapter. In order to
determine the suitability of applicants for an agency license,
licensees, their employees, and other persons who have unsupervised
access to children in care, and who have not resided in the state of
Washington during the three-year period before being authorized to care
for children shall be fingerprinted. The fingerprints shall be
forwarded to the Washington state patrol and federal bureau of
investigation for a criminal history records check. The fingerprint
criminal history records checks will be at the expense of the licensee.
The licensee may not pass this cost on to the employee or prospective
employee, unless the employee is determined to be unsuitable due to his
or her criminal history record. The director shall use the information
solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for a license and for
determining the character, suitability, and competence of those persons
or agencies, excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are
authorized to care for children. Criminal justice agencies shall
provide the director such information as they may have and that the
director may require for such purpose;
(c) The number of qualified persons required to render the type of
care for which an agency seeks a license;
(d) The health, safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the
premises to provide for the comfort, care, and well-being of children;
(e) The provision of necessary care and early learning, including
food, supervision, and discipline; physical, mental, and social well-being; and educational and recreational opportunities for those served;
(f) The financial ability of an agency to comply with minimum
requirements established under this chapter; and
(g) The maintenance of records pertaining to the care of
children));
(3) In consultation with law enforcement personnel, the director
shall investigate the conviction record or pending charges and
dependency record information under chapter 43.43 RCW of each agency
and its staff seeking licensure or relicensure;
(4) To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant to this
chapter. Licenses shall specify the category of care that an agency is
authorized to render and the ages and number of children to be served;
(((4))) (5) To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents
of reports necessary for the administration of this chapter and to
require regular reports from each licensee;
(((5))) (6) To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether
or not there is compliance with this chapter and the requirements
adopted under this chapter;
(((6))) (7) To review requirements adopted under this chapter at
least every two years and to adopt appropriate changes after
consultation with affected groups for child day care requirements; and
(((7))) (8) To consult with public and private agencies in order to
help them improve their methods and facilities for the care and early
learning of children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS FOR LICENSING.
Applications for licensure shall request, at a minimum, the following:
(1) The size and suitability of a facility and the plan of
operation for carrying out the purpose for which an applicant seeks a
license;
(2) The character, suitability, and competence of an agency and
other persons associated with an agency directly responsible for the
care of children;
(3) The number of qualified persons required to render the type of
care for which an agency seeks a license;
(4) The health, safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the
premises to provide for the comfort, care, and well-being of children;
(5) The provision of necessary care and early learning, including
food, supervision, and discipline; physical, mental, and social
well-being; and educational and recreational opportunities for those
served;
(6) The financial ability of an agency to comply with minimum
requirements established under this chapter; and
(7) The maintenance of records pertaining to the care of children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 CHARACTER, SUITABILITY, AND COMPETENCE. (1)
In determining whether an individual is of appropriate character,
suitability, and competence to provide child care and early learning
services to children, the department may consider all child abuse and
neglect history information whether founded, unfounded, or inconclusive
regarding a prospective child care provider. No unfounded allegation
of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020 may be disclosed
to a provider licensed under this chapter.
(2) In order to determine the suitability of applicants for an
agency license, licensees, their employees, and other persons who have
unsupervised access to children in care, and who have not resided in
the state of Washington during the three-year period before being
authorized to care for children, shall be fingerprinted.
(a) The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Washington state
patrol and federal bureau of investigation for a criminal history
record check.
(b) The fingerprint criminal history record checks shall be at the
expense of the licensee. The licensee may not pass this cost on to the
employee or prospective employee, unless the employee is determined to
be unsuitable due to his or her criminal history record.
(c) The director shall use the information solely for the purpose
of determining eligibility for a license and for determining the
character, suitability, and competence of those persons or agencies,
excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to
care for children.
(d) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the director such
information as they may have and that the director may require for such
purpose.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.215.525 and 2006 c 209 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every child day-care center and family day-care provider shall
prominently post the following items, clearly visible to parents and
staff:
(a) The license issued under this chapter;
(b) The department's toll-free telephone number established by RCW
((74.15.310)) 43.215.520;
(c) The notice of any pending enforcement action. The notice must
be posted immediately upon receipt. The notice must be posted for at
least two weeks or until the violation causing the enforcement action
is corrected, whichever is longer;
(d) A notice that inspection reports and any notices of enforcement
actions for the previous three years are available from the licensee
and the department; and
(e) Any other information required by the department.
(2) The department shall disclose((, upon request,)) the receipt,
general nature, and resolution or current status of all complaints on
record with the department after July 24, 2005, against a child day-care center or family day-care provider that result in an enforcement
action. Information may be posted:
(a) On a web site; or
(b) In a physical location that is easily accessed by parents and
potential employers.
(3) This section shall not be construed to require the disclosure
of any information that is exempt from public disclosure under chapter
42.56 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.215.530 and 2006 c 209 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every child day-care center and family day-care provider shall
have readily available for review by the department, parents, and the
public a copy of each inspection report and notice of enforcement
action received by the center or provider from the department for the
past three years. This subsection only applies to reports and notices
received on or after July 24, 2005.
(2) The department shall make available to the public during
business hours all inspection reports and notices of enforcement
actions involving child day-care centers and family day-care providers
((consistent with chapter 42.56 RCW)). The department shall include in
the inspection report a statement of the corrective measures taken by
the center or provider.
(3) The department may make available on a publicly accessible web
site all inspection reports and notices of enforcement actions
involving child day-care centers and family day-care providers. The
department shall include in the inspection report a statement of the
corrective measures taken by the center or provider.
(4) This section shall not be construed to require the disclosure
of any information that is exempt from public disclosure under chapter
42.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 DISCLOSURE STATEMENT. (1) Before hiring an
applicant, an employer shall request the applicant to sign a statement:
(a) Authorizing the applicant's current and past employers to
disclose to the hiring agency sexual misconduct or abuse, if any, by
the applicant and making available to the hiring agency copies of all
documents in the previous employer's personnel, investigative, or other
files relating to sexual misconduct or abuse by the applicant; and
(b) Releasing the applicant's current and past employers, and
employees acting on behalf of that employer, from any liability for
providing such information.
(2) Before hiring an applicant, an employer shall request that the
applicant's current and past employers disclose to the hiring agency
sexual misconduct or abuse, if any, by the applicant. The request
shall include a copy of the statement signed by the applicant.
(3) Not later than twenty business days after receiving a request
under subsection (2) of this section, former employers shall provide
the information requested and make available to the requesting employer
copies of all documents in the applicant's personnel record relating to
the sexual misconduct or abuse. The employer, or an employee acting on
behalf of the employer, who in good faith discloses information under
this section is immune from civil liability for the disclosure.
(4) An employer shall not hire an applicant who does not sign the
statement described in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) Employers may employ applicants on a conditional basis pending
the review of information obtained under this section.
(6) Information received under this section shall be used by an
employer only for the purpose of evaluating an applicant's
qualifications for employment in the position for which he or she has
applied. Except as otherwise provided by law, an employer or any
employee of an agency shall not disclose the information to any person,
other than the applicant, who is not directly involved in the process
of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for employment. A person
who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(7) By September 1, 2007, the department shall adopt rules defining
"verbal abuse," "physical abuse," and "sexual misconduct" as used in
this section to apply to all applicants. The definitions of verbal
abuse, physical abuse, and sexual misconduct adopted by the department
must include the requirement that the department has made a
determination that there is sufficient information to conclude that the
abuse or misconduct occurred and that the abuse or misconduct resulted
in the employee's leaving his or her position at the agency.
(8) Except as limited by chapter 49.12 RCW, at the conclusion of an
agency's investigation, an applicant has the right to review his or her
entire personnel file, investigative file, or other file maintained by
the agency relating to sexual misconduct or abuse as addressed in this
section and to attach rebuttals to any documents as the employee deems
necessary. Rebuttal documents shall be disclosed in the same manner as
the documents to which they are attached. The provisions of this
subsection do not supersede the protections provided individuals under
the state whistleblower laws in chapter 42.41 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 PARENTAL NOTIFICATION. The department and
an agency must, at the first opportunity but in all cases within
forty-eight hours of receiving a report alleging sexual misconduct or
abuse by an agency employee, notify the parents of a child alleged to
be the victim, target, or recipient of the misconduct or abuse. The
department and an agency shall provide parents with information
regarding their rights under the public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW,
to request the public records regarding the employee. This information
shall be provided to all parents on an annual basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 REPORTING ACTIONS--POSTING ON WEB SITE.
For the purposes of reporting actions taken against agency employees or
licensees, the following actions shall be posted to the department's
web site accessible by the public: Suspension, surrender, revocation,
denial, stayed suspension, or reinstatement of a license, and any
written reprimand related to abuse and sexual misconduct or abuse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 4, 5, and 8 through 10 of this act
are each added to chapter 43.215 RCW.

--- END ---