BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.17.033 and 1987 c 104 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A proposed division of land, as defined in RCW 58.17.020, shall
be considered under the subdivision or short subdivision ordinance, and
zoning or other land use control ordinances, in effect on the land at
the time ((a fully completed application for preliminary plat approval
of the subdivision, or short plat approval of the short subdivision,
has been submitted to the appropriate county, city, or town official.
(2) The requirements for a fully completed application shall be
defined by local ordinance)) the county, city, or town legislative body
acts on the application for preliminary approval as provided in RCW
58.17.110.
(((3))) (2) The limitations imposed by this section shall not
restrict conditions imposed under chapter 43.21C RCW.
(3) If, prior to final plat approval and prior to substantial
construction of the plat in good faith reliance on the preliminary plat
approval, the development regulations applicable to the property are
changed, the preliminary plat shall be revised to be consistent with
the new development regulations.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.095 and 1991 c 281 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A valid and fully complete building permit application for a
structure, that is permitted under the zoning or other land use control
ordinances in effect on the date of the application shall be considered
under the building permit ordinance in effect ((at the time of
application)) on the day the application is approved or denied, and the
zoning or other land use control ordinances in effect on ((the date of
application)) that day.
(2) The requirements for a fully completed application shall be
defined by local ordinance but for any construction project costing
more than five thousand dollars the application shall include, at a
minimum:
(a) The legal description, or the tax parcel number assigned
pursuant to RCW 84.40.160, and the street address if available, and may
include any other identification of the construction site by the prime
contractor;
(b) The property owner's name, address, and phone number;
(c) The prime contractor's business name, address, phone number,
current state contractor registration number; and
(d) Either:
(i) The name, address, and phone number of the office of the lender
administering the interim construction financing, if any; or
(ii) The name and address of the firm that has issued a payment
bond, if any, on behalf of the prime contractor for the protection of
the owner, if the bond is for an amount not less than fifty percent of
the total amount of the construction project.
(3) The information required on the building permit application by
subsection (2)(a) through (d) of this section shall be set forth on the
building permit document which is issued to the owner, and on the
inspection record card which shall be posted at the construction site.
(4) The information required by subsection (2) of this section and
information supplied by the applicant after the permit is issued under
subsection (5) of this section shall be kept on record in the office
where building permits are issued and made available to any person on
request. If a copy is requested, a reasonable charge may be made.
(5) If any of the information required by subsection (2)(d) of this
section is not available at the time the application is submitted, the
applicant shall so state and the application shall be processed
forthwith and the permit issued as if the information had been
supplied, and the lack of the information shall not cause the
application to be deemed incomplete for the purposes of vesting under
subsection (1) of this section. However, the applicant shall provide
the remaining information as soon as the applicant can reasonably
obtain such information.
(6) If, prior to substantial construction in good faith reliance on
the building permit, the applicable development regulations are
changed, the building permit shall be revised or rescinded as necessary
to be consistent with the new development regulations.
(7) The limitations imposed by this section shall not restrict
conditions imposed under chapter 43.21C RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An application for a project permit shall be considered under
the development regulations in effect on the land at the time the local
government takes final action on the application, including ruling on
any lawful requests for reconsideration and any decisions made after
review and remand by an appellate body.
(2) If prior to substantial construction in good faith reliance on
the project permit the development regulations applicable to the
property are changed, the project permit shall be revised or rescinded
as necessary to be consistent with the new development regulations.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.302 and 1997 c 429 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A board may determine that part or all of a comprehensive plan
or development regulations are invalid if the board:
(a) Makes a finding of noncompliance and issues an order of remand
under RCW 36.70A.300;
(b) Includes in the final order a determination, supported by
findings of fact and conclusions of law, that the continued validity of
part or parts of the plan or regulation would substantially interfere
with the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter; and
(c) Specifies in the final order the particular part or parts of
the plan or regulation that are determined to be invalid, and the
reasons for their invalidity.
(2) A determination of invalidity is ((prospective in effect and
does not extinguish rights that vested under state or local law before
receipt of the board's order by the city or county. The determination
of invalidity does not apply to a completed development permit
application for a project that vested under state or local law before
receipt of the board's order by the county or city or to related
construction permits for that project.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section and (b) of this subsection, a development permit application
not vested under state or local law before receipt of the board's order
by the county or city vests to the local ordinance or resolution that
is determined by the board not to substantially interfere with the
fulfillment of the goals of this chapter.
(b) Even though the application is not vested under state or local
law before receipt by the county or city of the board's order, a
determination of invalidity does not apply to a development permit
application for)) remedial and retrospective and applies to any
decision on a project permit that the local government made based on
the project's consistency with the plan or regulation that the board
has determined to be invalid except:
(((i))) (a) A permit for construction by any owner, lessee, or
contract purchaser of a single-family residence for his or her own use
or for the use of his or her family on a lot existing before receipt by
the county or city of the board's order, except as otherwise
specifically provided in the board's order to protect the public health
and safety;
(((ii))) (b) A building permit and related construction permits for
remodeling, tenant improvements, or expansion of an existing structure
on a lot existing before receipt of the board's order by the county or
city; and
(((iii))) (c) A boundary line adjustment or a division of land that
does not increase the number of buildable lots existing before receipt
of the board's order by the county or city.
(((4))) (3) If the ordinance that adopts a plan or development
regulation under this chapter includes a savings clause intended to
revive prior policies or regulations in the event the new plan or
regulations are determined to be invalid, the board shall determine
under subsection (1) of this section whether the prior policies or
regulations are valid during the period of remand.
(((5))) (4) A county or city subject to a determination of
invalidity may adopt interim controls and other measures to be in
effect until it adopts a comprehensive plan and development regulations
that comply with the requirements of this chapter. A development
permit application may vest under an interim control or measure upon
determination by the board that the interim controls and other measures
do not substantially interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of
this chapter.
(((6))) (5) A county or city subject to a determination of
invalidity may file a motion requesting that the board clarify, modify,
or rescind the order. The board shall expeditiously schedule a hearing
on the motion. At the hearing on the motion, the parties may present
information to the board to clarify the part or parts of the
comprehensive plan or development regulations to which the final order
applies. The board shall issue any supplemental order based on the
information provided at the hearing not later than thirty days after
the date of the hearing.
(((7))) (6)(a) If a determination of invalidity has been made and
the county or city has enacted an ordinance or resolution amending the
invalidated part or parts of the plan or regulation or establishing
interim controls on development affected by the order of invalidity,
after a compliance hearing, the board shall modify or rescind the
determination of invalidity if it determines under the standard in
subsection (1) of this section that the plan or regulation, as amended
or made subject to such interim controls, will no longer substantially
interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter.
(b) If the board determines that part or parts of the plan or
regulation are no longer invalid as provided in this subsection, but
does not find that the plan or regulation is in compliance with all of
the requirements of this chapter, the board, in its order, may require
periodic reports to the board on the progress the jurisdiction is
making towards compliance.

Sec. 5 RCW 80.50.100 and 1989 c 175 s 174 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The council shall report to the governor its recommendations as
to the approval or rejection of an application for certification within
twelve months of receipt by the council of such an application, or such
later time as is mutually agreed by the council and the applicant. The
council's recommendation shall be based on the council's guidelines in
effect on the date the recommendation is made. If the council
recommends approval of an application for certification, it shall also
submit a draft certification agreement with the report. The council
shall include conditions in the draft certification agreement to
implement the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited
to, conditions to protect state or local governmental or community
interests affected by the construction or operation of the energy
facility, and conditions designed to recognize the purpose of laws or
ordinances, or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder, that are
preempted or superseded pursuant to RCW 80.50.110 as now or hereafter
amended.
(2) Within sixty days of receipt of the council's report the
governor shall take one of the following actions:
(a) Approve the application and execute the draft certification
agreement; or
(b) Reject the application; or
(c) Direct the council to reconsider certain aspects of the draft
certification agreement.
The council shall reconsider such aspects of the draft
certification agreement by reviewing the existing record of the
application or, as necessary, by reopening the adjudicative proceeding
for the purposes of receiving additional evidence. Such
reconsideration shall be conducted expeditiously. The council shall
resubmit the draft certification to the governor incorporating any
amendments deemed necessary upon reconsideration. Within sixty days of
receipt of such draft certification agreement, the governor shall
either approve the application and execute the certification agreement
or reject the application. The certification agreement shall be
binding upon execution by the governor and the applicant.
(3) The rejection of an application for certification by the
governor shall be final as to that application but shall not preclude
submission of a subsequent application for the same site on the basis
of changed conditions or new information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 36.70B.170 (Development agreements -- Authorized) and 1995 c
347 s 502;
(2) RCW 36.70B.180 (Development agreements -- Effect) and 1995 c 347
s 503;
(3) RCW 36.70B.190 (Development agreements -- Recording -- Parties and
successors bound) and 1995 c 347 s 504;
(4) RCW 36.70B.200 (Development agreements -- Public hearing) and
1995 c 347 s 505; and
(5) RCW 36.70B.210 (Development agreements -- Authority to impose
fees not extended) and 1995 c 347 s 506.

--- END ---