BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The budget stabilization fund is created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the fund may be spent only after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The debt retirement fund is created in the state treasury.
Appropriations from the account may be made only for the purposes of
principal and interest payments on state bonds. Moneys in the fund may
be spent only after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The budget stabilization fund is governed by the provisions in
Article VII, section . . . (House Joint Resolution No. . . . .
(H-1048/07)) and this section.
(2) By June 30th of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall
transfer an amount equal to three percent of the general state revenues
for that fiscal year to the budget stabilization fund.
(3) When the balance in the budget stabilization fund, including
investment earnings, equals more than seven percent of the estimated
general state revenues in the fiscal year, the state treasurer shall
deposit the balance into the debt retirement fund, to the extent the
balance exceeds seven percent of the estimated general state revenues.
For the purposes of this section, the treasurer shall transfer moneys
on June 30th of each fiscal year, if the balance exceeds seven percent
of the estimated general state revenues on June 30th of that fiscal
year.
(4) The state investment board has the full power to invest,
reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment moneys in the
budget stabilization fund. All investment and operating costs
associated with the investment of money shall be paid pursuant to RCW
43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of these expenses, the
earnings from the investment of the money shall be retained by the
account. All investments made by the state investment board shall be
made with the exercise of that degree of judgment and care pursuant to
RCW 43.33A.140 and the investment policies established by the state
investment board. As deemed appropriate by the state investment board,
moneys in the account may be commingled for investment with other funds
subject to investment by the board.
(5) For the purposes of Article VII, section . . . (House Joint
Resolution No. . . . . (H-1048/07)), "inflation" means inflation as
measured by the implicit price deflator for the United States published
by the federal bureau of labor statistics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.33 RCW
to read as follows:
The state economic and revenue forecast council shall perform the
general state revenue forecasts required by Article VII, section . . .
(House Joint Resolution No. . . . . (H-1048/07)).

Sec. 5 RCW 43.84.092 and 2006 c 337 s 11, 2006 c 311 s 23, 2006
c 171 s 10, 2006 c 56 s 10, and 2006 c 6 s 8 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The budget stabilization
account, the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River
channel construction and operation account, the Central Washington
University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal
and reformatory institutions account, the Columbia river basin water
supply development account, the common school construction fund, the
county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use
tax equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the debt retirement fund, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account,
the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental
disabilities community trust account, the drinking water assistance
account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the
drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington
University capital projects account, the education construction fund,
the education legacy trust account, the election account, ((the
emergency reserve fund,)) the energy freedom account, The Evergreen
State College capital projects account, the federal forest revolving
account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility
multimodal account, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway
infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations
account, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges'
retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the
judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax
account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and
use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster
reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the regional mobility grant program account, the
resource management cost account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the
state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.135.045 and 2005 c 518 s 931, 2005 c 314 s 401, and
2005 c 72 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) ((The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer
an amount from the state general fund to the emergency reserve fund.
The amount transferred shall equal the amount by which total state
revenue for the general fund and related funds exceeds the state
expenditure limit, multiplied by the percentage that general fund
expenditures are of total expenditures from the general fund and
related funds. Transfers shall be made at the end of each fiscal
quarter based on projections of state revenues, expenditures, and the
state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall make transfers between
these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues and the
expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter.
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to)) The student achievement fund is
hereby created in the state treasury ((and twenty-five percent to the
general fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter)).
(((4))) (2) The education construction fund is hereby created in
the state treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(((5))) (3) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be
appropriated to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for
distribution to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the
student achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per
full-time equivalent student basis to each school district.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.135.025 and 2005 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state shall not expend from the general fund and related
funds during any fiscal year state moneys in excess of the state
expenditure limit established under this chapter. Appropriations made
by the legislature from the general fund for expenditure into the
budget stabilization fund do not constitute expenditures for purposes
of this section.
(2) Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW
43.135.035 or pursuant to an appropriation under RCW 43.135.045(4)(b),
the state treasurer shall not issue or redeem any check, warrant, or
voucher that will result in a state general fund or related fund
expenditure for any fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure
limit established under this chapter. A violation of this subsection
constitutes a violation of RCW 43.88.290 and shall subject the state
treasurer to the penalties provided in RCW 43.88.300.
(3) The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the
previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit increased by a
percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.
(4) For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, the phrase "the previous fiscal
year's state expenditure limit" means the total state expenditures from
the state general fund and related funds, not including federal funds,
for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, plus the fiscal growth
factor.
(5) A state expenditure limit committee is established for the
purpose of determining and adjusting the state expenditure limit as
provided in this chapter. The members of the state expenditure limit
committee are the director of financial management, the attorney
general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs and ranking
minority members of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations. All actions of
the state expenditure limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter
require an affirmative vote of at least four members.
(6) Each November, the state expenditure limit committee shall
adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding fiscal year based on
actual expenditures and known changes in the fiscal growth factor and
then project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years.
Appropriations made from the state general fund for expenditure into
the budget stabilization fund do not constitute actual expenditures for
purposes of rebasing pursuant to this subsection. If, by November
30th, the state expenditure limit committee has not adopted the
expenditure limit adjustment and projected expenditure limit as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney general or his
or her designee shall adjust or project the expenditure limit, as
necessary.
(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average growth in state
personal income for the prior ten fiscal years.
(8) "General fund" means the state general fund.
(9) "Related fund" means the health services account, violence
reduction and drug enforcement account, public safety and education
account, water quality account, or student achievement fund.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.135.035 and 2005 c 72 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house, and then only if state expenditures in any fiscal year,
including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure limits
established under this chapter.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
state expenditure limit committee shall adjust the state expenditure
limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the voters under
this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of revenue
generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be
adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
personal income growth?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the nature of the
emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require immediate
government action to alleviate human suffering and provide humanitarian
assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no more
than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund or a related fund to another source of funding,
or if moneys are transferred from the state general fund or a related
fund to another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee,
acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a
transfer of money from the state general fund or a related fund to
another fund or account includes any state legislative action taken
that has the effect of reducing revenues from a particular source,
where such revenues would otherwise be deposited into the state general
fund or a related fund, while increasing the revenues from that
particular source to another state or local government account. This
subsection does not apply to: (a) The dedication or use of lottery
revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW 84.52.068,
in support of education or education expenditures; or (b) a transfer of
moneys to, or an expenditure from, the budget stabilization fund.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function and the ongoing
revenue necessary to fund the program or function are shifted to the
state general fund or a related fund on or after January 1, 2007, the
state expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW
43.135.025(5), shall increase the state expenditure limit to reflect
the shift.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 On the effective date of this section, the
state treasurer shall transfer all money remaining in the emergency
reserve fund to the budget stabilization fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.33A.220 (Emergency reserve fund -- Board's duties) and
1999 c 288 s 2; and
(2) RCW 43.135.051 (Emergency reserve fund -- State investment board
authority to invest or manage) and 1999 c 288 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act takes effect July 1, 2008, if the
proposed amendment to Article VII of the state Constitution (House
Joint Resolution No. . . . . (H-1048/07)) is validly submitted to and
is approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election.
If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is
void in its entirety.

--- END ---