BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.155.020 and 2001 c 131 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section ((shall)) apply throughout this chapter unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.
(2) "Capital facility plan" means a capital facility plan required
by the growth management act under chapter 36.70A RCW or, for local
governments not fully planning under the growth management act, a plan
required by the public works board.
(3) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) "Financing guarantees" means the pledge of money in the public
works assistance account, or money to be received by the public works
assistance account, to the repayment of all or a portion of the
principal of or interest on obligations issued by local governments to
finance public works projects.
(5) "Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, special
purpose districts, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state excluding school districts and port
districts.
(6) "Public works project" means a project of a local government
for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of: (a) Streets and
roads((,)); (b) bridges((,)); (c) water systems((,)); (d) fire
protection district stations in (i) towns and cities with fewer than
ten thousand residents; (ii) counties with fewer than fifty thousand
residents; or (iii) unincorporated rural areas with a population of
less than ten thousand; or (e) storm and sanitary sewage systems and
solid waste facilities, including recycling facilities. A planning
project may include the compilation of biological, hydrological, or
other data on a county, drainage basin, or region necessary to develop
a base of information for a capital facility plan.
(7) "Solid waste or recycling project" means remedial actions
necessary to bring abandoned or closed landfills into compliance with
regulatory requirements and the repair, restoration, and replacement of
existing solid waste transfer, recycling facilities, and landfill
projects limited to the opening of landfill cells that are in existing
and permitted landfills.
(8) "Technical assistance" means training and other services
provided to local governments to: (a) Help such local governments
plan, apply, and qualify for loans and financing guarantees from the
board, and (b) help local governments improve their ability to plan
for, finance, acquire, construct, repair, replace, rehabilitate, and
maintain public facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---