BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that one in five of
Washington's one and one-half million children are children of color.
Broken out by racial groups, approximately six percent of children are
Asian/Pacific Islander, six percent are multiracial, four and one-half
percent are African American, and two percent are Native American.
Thirteen percent of Washington children are of Hispanic origin, but
representation of this group increases in the lower age ranges. For
example, seventeen percent of children birth to four years of age are
Hispanic.
The legislature also finds that in counties such as Adams,
Franklin, Yakima, and Grant, more than half of the births are of
Hispanic origin. Three-quarters of the state's African American
children and two-thirds of Asian/Pacific Islander children live in King
and Pierce counties. The legislature finds further that despite some
progress closing the achievement gap in recent years, children of color
continue to lag behind their classmates on the Washington assessment of
student learning. In 2005 children of color trailed in every category
of the fourth-grade reading, writing, and math assessments. On the
reading test alone, sixty-nine percent of African American students,
sixty-four percent of native American students, and sixty-one percent
of Hispanic students met the standards, compared with eighty-five
percent of caucasian students. And, since 1993, the number of
Washington students for which English is not their first language has
doubled to more than seven percent of students statewide.
The legislature finds further that according to national research,
African American children enter the child welfare system at far higher
rates than caucasian children, despite no greater incidence of
maltreatment in African American families compared to caucasian
families. This trend holds true for Washington state, where African
American children represent approximately nine and one-half percent of
the children in out-of-home care even though they represent slightly
more than four percent of the state's total child population. Native
American children represent slightly over ten percent of the children
in out-of-home care although they represent only two percent of the
children in the state. In King county, African American and Native
American children are over represented at nearly every decision point
in the child welfare system. Although these two groups of children
represent only eight percent of the child population in King county,
they account for one-third of all children removed from their homes and
one-half of children in foster care for more than four years.
The legislature finds also that children of immigrants are the
fastest growing component of the United States' child population.
While immigrants are eleven percent of the nation's total population,
the children of immigrants make up twenty-two percent of the nation's
children under six years of age. These immigrant children are twice as
likely as native-born children to be poor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The secretary of the department of
social and health services shall convene an advisory committee to
analyze and make recommendations on the disproportionate representation
of children of color in Washington's child welfare system. The
department shall collaborate with the Washington institute for public
policy and private sector entities to develop a methodology for the
advisory committee to follow in conducting a baseline analysis of data
from the child welfare system to determine whether racial
disproportionality and racial disparity exist in this system. The
Washington institute for public policy shall serve as technical staff
for the advisory committee. In determining whether racial
disproportionality or racial disparity exists, the committee shall
utilize existing research and evaluations conducted within Washington
state, nationally, and in other states and localities that have
similarly analyzed the prevalence of racial disproportionality and
disparity in child welfare.
(2) At a minimum, the advisory committee shall examine and analyze:
(a) The level of involvement of children of color at each stage in the
state's child welfare system, including the points of entry and exit,
and each point at which a treatment decision is made; and (b) the
outcomes for children in the existing systems. This analysis shall be
disaggregated by racial and ethnic group, and by geographic region.
(3) The committee of not more than fifteen individuals shall
consist of experts in social work, law, child welfare, psychology, or
related fields, at least two tribal representatives, a representative
of the governor's juvenile justice advisory committee, a representative
of a community-based organization involved with child welfare issues,
a representative of the department of social and health services, a
current or former foster care youth, a current or former foster care
parent, and a parent previously involved with Washington's child
welfare system. Committee members shall be selected as follows: (a)
Five members selected by the senate majority leader; (b) five members
selected by the speaker of the house of representatives; and (c) five
members selected by the secretary of the department of social and
health services. The secretary, the senate majority leader, and the
speaker of the house of representatives shall coordinate appointments
to ensure the representation specified in this subsection is achieved.
After the advisory committee appointments are finalized, the committee
shall select two individuals to serve as cochairs of the committee, one
of whom shall be a representative from a nongovernmental entity.
(4) The secretary shall make reasonable efforts to seek public and
private funding for the advisory committee.
(5) Not later than September 1, 2007, the advisory committee
created in subsection (1) of this section shall report to the secretary
of the department of social and health services on the results of the
analysis. If the results of the analysis indicate disproportionality
or disparity exists for any racial or ethnic group in any region of the
state, the committee, in conjunction with the secretary of the
department of social and health services, shall develop a plan for
remedying the disproportionality or disparity. The remediation plan
shall include: (a) Recommendations for administrative and legislative
actions related to appropriate programs and services to reduce and
eliminate disparities in the system and improve the long-term outcomes
for children of color who are served by the system; and (b) performance
measures for implementing the remediation plan. To the extent possible
and appropriate, the remediation plan shall be developed to integrate
the recommendations required in this subsection with the department's
existing compliance plans, training efforts, and other practice
improvement and reform initiatives in progress. The advisory committee
shall be responsible for ongoing evaluation of current and prospective
policies and procedures for their contribution to or effect on racial
disproportionality and disparity.
(6) Not later than January 1, 2008, the secretary shall report the
results of the analysis conducted under subsection (2) of this section
and shall describe the remediation plan required under subsection (5)
of this section to the appropriate committees of the legislature with
jurisdiction over policy and fiscal matters relating to children,
families, and human services. Beginning January 1, 2009, the secretary
shall report annually to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on the implementation of the remediation plan, including any measurable
progress made in reducing and eliminating racial disproportionality and
disparity in the state's child welfare system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires June 30, 2013.

--- END ---