BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.88.080 and 2000 c 191 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall require hazardous liquid pipeline
companies, and gas pipeline companies with interstate pipelines, gas
transmission pipelines, or gas pipelines operating over two hundred
fifty pounds per square inch gauge, to provide accurate maps of their
pipeline to specifications developed by the commission sufficient to
meet the needs of first responders, including installation depth
information when known.
(2) The commission shall evaluate the sufficiency of the maps and
consolidate the maps into a statewide geographic information system.
The commission shall assist local governments in obtaining hazardous
liquid and gas pipeline location information and maps. The maps shall
be made available to the one-number locator services as provided in
chapter 19.122 RCW. The mapping system shall be consistent with the
United States department of transportation national pipeline mapping
program.
(3) The mapping system shall be completed by January 1, 2006, and
periodically updated thereafter. The commission shall develop a plan
for funding the geographic information system and report its
recommendations to the legislature by December 15, 2000.
(4) The commission shall provide to first responders, state
agencies, and local governments data that the commission develops or
gathers for the maps that are consolidated into the geographic
information system as described in this section. The commission shall
provide or make available for inspection by any other entity maps or
map images that illustrate line pipe location as long as the map or map
images are of no greater detail than a scale of one to twenty-four
thousand.
(5) For purposes of this section, "first responders" means
firefighters and law enforcement personnel.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.330 and 2006 c 209 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to public utilities and
transportation is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095;
(2) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order;
(3) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service; however, these records may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides;
(4) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons;
(5) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes and other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose this information to a person, employer,
educational institution, or other entity that is responsible, in whole
or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when reporting
on public transportation or public safety. This information may also
be disclosed at the agency's discretion to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety;
(6) Records of any person that belong to a public utility district
or a municipally owned electrical utility, unless the law enforcement
authority provides the public utility district or municipally owned
electrical utility with a written statement in which the authority
states that it suspects that the particular person to whom the records
pertain has committed a crime and the authority has a reasonable belief
that the records could determine or help determine whether the
suspicion might be true. Information obtained in violation of this
subsection is inadmissible in any criminal proceeding;
(7) Any information obtained by governmental agencies that is
collected by the use of a motor carrier intelligent transportation
system or any comparable information equipment attached to a truck,
tractor, or trailer; however, the information may be given to other
governmental agencies or the owners of the truck, tractor, or trailer
from which the information is obtained. As used in this subsection,
"motor carrier" has the same definition as provided in RCW 81.80.010;
((and))
(8) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transponders or other technology to facilitate payment of
tolls. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form as long as
the data does not contain any personally identifying information. For
these purposes aggregate data may include the census tract of the
account holder as long as any individual personally identifying
information is not released. Personally identifying information may be
released to law enforcement agencies only for toll enforcement
purposes. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies for other purposes only if the request is
accompanied by a court order; and
(9) Data developed or gathered by the utilities and transportation
commission under RCW 81.88.080 and other pipeline maps or pipeline
geographic information data filed with the commission. However, the
commission or other agencies with whom the commission shares the
information under RCW 81.88.080 shall make available for public
inspection and copying any maps or map images that illustrate line pipe
location as long as the map or map images are of no greater detail than
a scale of one to twenty-four thousand.

--- END ---