BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.52.120 and 2003 c 53 s 285 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for an attorney engaged in the
representation of any worker or beneficiary to charge for services in
the department any fee in excess of a reasonable fee, of not more than
thirty percent of the increase in the award secured by the attorney's
services. Such reasonable fee shall be fixed by the director or the
director's designee for services performed by an attorney for such
worker or beneficiary, if written application therefor is made by the
attorney, worker, or beneficiary within one year from the date the
final decision and order of the department is communicated to the party
making the application.
(2) If, on appeal to the board, the order, decision, or award of
the department is reversed or modified and additional relief is granted
to a worker or beneficiary, or in cases where a party other than the
worker or beneficiary is the appealing party and the worker's or
beneficiary's right to relief is sustained by the board, the board
shall fix a reasonable fee for the services of his or her attorney in
proceedings before the board if written application therefor is made by
the attorney, worker, or beneficiary within one year from the date the
final decision and order of the board is communicated to the party
making the application. In fixing the amount of such attorney's fee,
the board shall take into consideration the fee allowed, if any, by the
director, for services before the department, and the board may review
the fee fixed by the director. Any attorney's fee set by the
department or the board may be reviewed by the superior court upon
application of such attorney, worker, or beneficiary. The department
or self-insured employer, as the case may be, shall be served a copy of
the application and shall be entitled to appear and take part in the
proceedings. Where the board, pursuant to this section, fixes the
attorney's fee, it shall be unlawful for an attorney to charge or
receive any fee for services before the board in excess of that fee
fixed by the board.
(3) Any person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section
is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(4) If, on appeal to the board from a decision or order of the
department denying treatment or payment for treatment, the decision is
reversed or modified and the treatment is ordered to be allowed or paid
for, a reasonable fee for the services of the worker's attorney shall
be fixed by the board, and the board shall order reimbursement for all
reasonable costs of litigation, including but not limited to fees of
medical and other witnesses. In cases of self-insured employers, the
attorney fees fixed by the board and the costs set by the board shall
be payable directly by the self-insured employer. In all other cases,
the fees and costs shall be paid by the department out of the
administrative fund.
(5) If, on an appeal by a state fund or self-insured employer to a
department decision or order allowing treatment or paying for
treatment, the decision or order is affirmed in whole or part, a
reasonable fee for the services of the worker's attorney shall be fixed
by the board, and the board shall order reimbursement for all
reasonable costs of litigation, including but not limited to fees of
medical and other witnesses. Such fees and costs shall be payable
directly by the state fund or self-insured employer.
(6) The attorneys' fees and costs set out in subsections (4) and
(5) of this section shall be paid within ten days of the date of the
board's order. If such fees and costs are not paid within ten days,
interest shall be payable on the fees and costs at a rate of twelve
percent per annum. If such fees and costs are not paid within ten
days, the claimant may enforce the board's order pursuant to RCW
51.32.200 or 51.32.215. In such instances, the superior court may
award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs associated with the
proceedings before superior court.

--- END ---