BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a
significant disconnect in the state's medicaid program between
recipients and those delivering and paying for their care. Medicaid
recipients are not empowered to make decisions regarding their own
health care needs. Nor are there incentives for medicaid recipients to
be prudent purchasers of health care. The legislature further finds
that there are a significant number of medicaid recipients who are only
temporarily on medicaid and will need to transition to employer-sponsored health insurance or purchase health care in the private
market.
The federal deficit reduction act of 2005 allows states to redesign
their medicaid programs, creating more flexibility in benefit and cost-sharing designs and giving enrollees more opportunity to decide how
they use their health care benefits. Specifically, the deficit
reduction act allows for ten states to operate medicaid demonstration
programs to test alternative systems to deliver medicaid benefits
through a health opportunity account in combination with a high
deductible health plan. Washington state should continue to be a
leader in health care policy and submit a state plan amendment to the
center for medicaid and medicare to be one of the ten states to
implement a health opportunity account demonstration program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of social and health services
shall submit a state plan amendment to the center for medicaid and
medicare services to be one of the ten states to operate a medicaid
demonstration program to test alternative systems to deliver medicaid
benefits through a health opportunity account. The state plan
amendment shall be in compliance with federal deficit reduction act of
2005 and other rules or directives provided by the center for medicaid
and medicare services. The state plan amendment shall also identify
individuals eligible to receive transitional medical assistance as the
target population to participate in this demonstration project.

--- END ---