BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
insurance fair conduct act.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.30.010 and 1997 c 409 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person engaged in the business of insurance shall engage in
unfair methods of competition or in unfair or deceptive acts or
practices in the conduct of such business as such methods, acts, or
practices are defined pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(2) In addition to such unfair methods and unfair or deceptive acts
or practices as are expressly defined and prohibited by this code, the
commissioner may from time to time by regulation promulgated pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW, define other methods of competition and other
acts and practices in the conduct of such business reasonably found by
the commissioner to be unfair or deceptive after a review of all
comments received during the notice and comment rule-making period.
(3)(a) In defining other methods of competition and other acts and
practices in the conduct of such business to be unfair or deceptive,
and after reviewing all comments and documents received during the
notice and comment rule-making period, the commissioner shall identify
his or her reasons for defining the method of competition or other act
or practice in the conduct of insurance to be unfair or deceptive and
shall include a statement outlining these reasons as part of the
adopted rule.
(b) The commissioner shall include a detailed description of facts
upon which he or she relied and of facts upon which he or she failed to
rely, in defining the method of competition or other act or practice in
the conduct of insurance to be unfair or deceptive, in the concise
explanatory statement prepared under RCW 34.05.325(6).
(c) Upon appeal the superior court shall review the findings of
fact upon which the regulation is based de novo on the record.
(4) No such regulation shall be made effective prior to the
expiration of thirty days after the date of the order by which it is
promulgated.
(5) If the commissioner has cause to believe that any person is
violating any such regulation, the commissioner may order such person
to cease and desist therefrom. The commissioner shall deliver such
order to such person direct or mail it to the person by registered mail
with return receipt requested. If the person violates the order after
expiration of ten days after the cease and desist order has been
received by him or her, he or she may be fined by the commissioner a
sum not to exceed two hundred and fifty dollars for each violation
committed thereafter.
(6) If any such regulation is violated, the commissioner may take
such other or additional action as is permitted under the insurance
code for violation of a regulation.
(7) An insurer engaged in the business of insurance may not
unreasonably or negligently deny a claim for coverage or payment of
benefits to any first party claimant. "First party claimant" has the
same meaning as in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any first party claimant to a policy of insurance who is
unreasonably or negligently denied a claim for coverage or payment of
benefits by an insurer may bring an action in the superior court of
this state to recover the actual damages sustained, together with the
costs of the action, including reasonable attorneys' fees and
litigation costs, as set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The superior court may, after finding that an insurer has acted
unreasonably or negligently in denying a claim for coverage or payment
of benefits or has violated Title 284 of the Washington Administrative
Code, increase the total award of damages to an amount not to exceed
three times the actual damages.
(3) The superior court shall, after a finding of unreasonable or
negligent denial of a claim for coverage or payment of benefits, or
after a finding of a violation of Title 284 of the Washington
Administrative Code, award reasonable attorneys' fees and actual and
statutory litigation costs, including expert witness fees, to the first
party claimant of an insurance contract who is the prevailing party in
such an action.
(4) The remedies set forth in this chapter are separate from the
remedies prescribed by RCW 19.86.090 of the consumer protection act.
(5) "First party claimant" means an individual, corporation,
association, partnership, or other legal entity asserting a right to
payment under an insurance policy or insurance contract arising out of
the occurrence of the contingency or loss covered by such a policy or
contract.

--- END ---