BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the nature of
personal injury protection coverage and the types of disputes that
arise under such coverage requires a more expeditious and
cost-efficient mechanism to resolve them. The nature of these disputes
usually involves questions over the payment of ongoing health care
coverage, and the continuation of this coverage in a timely fashion is
necessary to restoring the health of the injured person. The
legislature further finds that the costs in dispute are usually in an
amount that will quickly be exceeded by the cost of having to go to
trial in superior court, and that such a remedy also is not timely
enough to provide the continuing health care coverage needed to regain
full health. Therefore, the legislature further finds that in order to
protect the integrity of an insureds' right to a remedy under the law,
under this form of no-fault automobile insurance, an expeditious and
low-cost arbitration mechanism is the best mechanism to provide an
insured with a remedy under the law.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.22.085 and 2003 c 115 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No new automobile liability insurance policy or renewal of such
an existing policy may be issued unless personal injury protection
coverage is offered as an optional coverage.
(2) A named insured may reject, in writing, personal injury
protection coverage and the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section shall not apply. If a named insured rejects personal injury
protection coverage:
(a) That rejection is valid and binding as to all levels of
coverage and on all persons who might have otherwise been insured under
such coverage; and
(b) The insurer is not required to include personal injury
protection coverage in any supplemental, renewal, or replacement policy
unless a named insured subsequently requests such coverage in writing.
(3) All automobile liability insurance policies sold in this state
that contain personal injury protection coverage benefits shall contain
binding arbitration clauses to resolve disputes between the insured and
the insurer regarding the amount of medical and hospital expenses,
funeral expenses, income continuation, and loss of services sustained
by an insured because of bodily injury caused by an automobile
accident.
When a dispute regarding the amount of personal injury protection
coverage benefits under a single policy arises, arbitration may be
requested by either the insurer or insured. In any event, a request
for arbitration must be made in writing and the parties shall select an
arbitrator to hear the dispute within thirty days of a written request.
The failure to agree on an arbitrator within the required time is
resolved under RCW 7.04A.110. The costs of the arbitrator shall be
paid by the insurer. When arbitration results in additional benefits
to the insured, actual arbitration costs, including expert witness
fees, incurred in establishing the insured's claim to additional
benefits shall be paid by the insurer.

--- END ---