BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.28.010 and 2001 c 231 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any accident occurs to any worker it shall be the duty
of such worker or someone in his or her behalf to forthwith report such
accident to his or her employer, superintendent, or supervisor in
charge of the work, and of the employer to at once report such accident
and the injury resulting therefrom to the department pursuant to RCW
51.28.025 where the worker has received treatment from a physician, has
been hospitalized, disabled from work, or has died as the apparent
result of such accident and injury.
(2) Upon receipt of such notice of accident, the department shall
immediately forward to the worker or his or her beneficiaries or
dependents notification, in nontechnical language, of their rights
under this title. The notice must specify the worker's right to
receive health services from a physician of the worker's choice under
RCW 51.36.010, including chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and
must list the types of providers authorized to provide these services.
(3) Employers shall not engage in the suppression of industrial
insurance claims for their employees.
(4) For the purposes of this section, claim suppression is defined
as expressly or repeatedly inducing employees to fail to report
injuries, inducing employees to treat injuries in the course of
employment as off-the-job injuries, or otherwise acting to suppress
legitimate industrial insurance claims.
(5) In determining whether an employer has engaged in claim
suppression, the department shall consider the employer's history of
compliance with industrial insurance reporting requirements, and
whether there are employment-related incentives to discourage employees
from reporting injuries or filing claims. The department will have the
burden of proving claims suppression by a preponderance of the
evidence.
(6) Claim suppression does not include an employer's provision at
the worksite of first aid as defined by the department. The department
shall adopt rules defining first aid.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.28.025 and 1987 c 185 s 32 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever an employer has notice or knowledge of an injury or
occupational disease sustained by any worker in his or her employment
who has received treatment from a physician, has been hospitalized,
disabled from work or has died as the apparent result of such injury or
occupational disease, the employer shall immediately report the same to
the department on forms prescribed by it. The report shall include:
(a) The name, address, and business of the employer;
(b) The name, address, and occupation of the worker;
(c) The date, time, cause, and nature of the injury or occupational
disease;
(d) Whether the injury or occupational disease arose in the course
of the injured worker's employment;
(e) All available information pertaining to the nature of the
injury or occupational disease including but not limited to any visible
signs, any complaints of the worker, any time lost from work, and the
observable effect on the worker's bodily functions, so far as is known;
and
(f) Such other pertinent information as the department may
prescribe by regulation.
(2) ((Failure or refusal to file the report required by subsection
(1) shall subject the offending employer to a penalty determined by the
director but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars for each offense,
to be collected in a civil action in the name of the department and
paid into the supplemental pension fund.)) The employer shall not
engage in the suppression of industrial insurance claims as defined in
RCW 51.28.010(4). An employer found to have engaged in such activity
shall be subject to a penalty of at least two hundred fifty dollars,
not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars, for each offense. The
penalty shall be payable to the supplemental pension fund. The
department shall adopt rules establishing the amount of penalties,
taking into account the size of the employer and whether there are
prior findings of claim suppression. When a determination of claim
suppression has been made, the employer shall be prohibited from any
current or future participation in a retrospective rating program. If
self-insured, the director shall withdraw certification as provided in
RCW 51.14.080.
(3) When a determination of claim suppression is made and the
penalty is assessed, the department shall serve the employer and any
affected retrospective rating group with a determination as provided in
RCW 51.52.050. Once the order is final, the amount due shall be
collected in accordance with the provisions of RCW 51.48.140 and
51.48.150.
(4) The director, or the director's designee, shall investigate
reports or complaints that an employer has acted to suppress claims as
prohibited in RCW 51.28.010(3). The complaints or allegations must be
received in writing, and must include the name or names of the
individuals or organizations submitting the complaint. The director
may subpoena records from the employer, medical providers, and any
other entity that the director believes may have relevant information.
The director's investigative and subpoena authority in this subsection
is limited solely to investigations into allegations of claims
suppression.
(5) If the director determines that an employer has engaged in acts
of claim suppression as described in RCW 51.28.010(4) and, as a result,
the worker has not filed a claim for industrial insurance benefits as
prescribed by law, then the director in his or her sole discretion may
waive the time limits for filing a claim provided in RCW 51.28.050, if
the complaint or allegation of claim suppression is received within two
years of the worker's accident or exposure.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.28.050 and 1984 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No application shall be valid or claim thereunder enforceable
unless filed within one year after the day upon which the injury
occurred or the rights of dependents or beneficiaries accrued, except
as provided in RCW 51.28.055 and 51.28.025(5).

--- END ---