BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.04.050 and 1961 c 23 s 51.04.050 are each amended
to read as follows:
In all ((hearings, actions or)) proceedings before the department
((or the board of industrial insurance appeals, or before any court on
appeal from the board,)) any physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner having theretofore examined or treated the claimant
may be required to ((testify fully)) make reports requested by the
department or self-insurer regarding such examination or treatment, and
shall not be exempt from ((so testifying)) making reports by reason of
the relation of the physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner to patient. In all hearings, actions, or proceedings
before the board of industrial insurance appeals, or before any court
on appeal from the board of industrial insurance appeals, the claimant
shall be deemed to waive the physician-patient privilege under RCW
5.60.060, subject to the limitations imposed pursuant to court rules
and section 3 of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.36.060 and 1991 c 89 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Physicians or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioners
examining or attending injured workers under this title shall comply
with rules and regulations adopted by the director, and shall make such
reports as may be requested by the department or self-insurer upon the
condition or treatment of any such worker, or upon any other matters
concerning such workers in their care. Except under RCW 49.17.210
((and)), 49.17.250, and section 3 of this act, all medical information
in the possession or control of any person and relevant to the
particular injury in the opinion of the department pertaining to any
worker whose injury or occupational disease is the basis of a claim
under this title shall be made available ((at any stage of the
proceedings)) to the employer, the claimant's representative, and the
department upon request, and no person shall incur any legal liability
by reason of releasing such information. In all hearings, actions, or
proceedings before the board of industrial insurance appeals, or before
any court on appeal from the board of industrial insurance appeals,
requests for medical information under this subsection are subject to
limitations imposed pursuant to court rules and section 3 of this act.
(2) Any time that an examining or attending physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner is contacted by the employer, or
a representative of the employer, a written report must be generated by
the person or entity initiating contact which fully discloses all
subjects discussed and responses given. This report must be completed
within five days of the meeting, and a copy must be mailed to the
worker no later than the fifth day. Failure to comply with this
section constitutes a violation of RCW 51.48.080 and the penalty shall
be paid to the worker.
(3) When an attorney, vocational counselor, nurse case manager, or
other representative of the employer seeks to meet with an examining or
attending physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner
to discuss an injured worker's physical capacities, medical treatment,
permanent partial disability, ability to work, or other issues
pertaining to the claim:
(a) The attorney, vocational counselor, nurse case manager, or
other representative of the employer shall give at least seven days'
prior written notice to the worker or the worker's designated
representative;
(b) The worker and the worker's representative have the right to
attend and participate in the meeting;
(c) The party scheduling the meeting shall make reasonable efforts
to coordinate the scheduling of the appointment for the convenience of
all parties;
(d) The employer or representative of the employer, within five
days of the completion of the meeting, shall create a complete report
of the meeting, including all questions asked and information provided,
and mail a copy to the worker and the worker's designated
representative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 51.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, after notice
of an appeal under RCW 51.52.060(2), the department, the employer, and
the representatives of each, shall not have ex parte contact, to
discuss the facts or issues in question in the appeal, with any medical
provider who has examined or treated the claimant at the request of the
claimant or a treating medical provider, unless written authorization
for such contact is given by the claimant or the claimant's
representative.
(b) Written authorization is not required if the claimant fails to
identify or confirm the examining or treating medical provider as a
witness as required by the board.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, after notice
of an appeal under RCW 51.52.060(2), the claimant and the
representative for the claimant, if any, shall not have ex parte
contact, to discuss the facts or issues in question in the appeal, with
any medical provider who examined the claimant pursuant to RCW
51.36.070, unless written authorization for such contact is given by
the department or self-insured employer.
(b) Written authorization is not required if the department or
self-insurer fails to identify or confirm the medical provider as a
witness as required by the board.
(3) This section only applies to issues set forth in a notice of
appeal under RCW 51.52.060(2).
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit reporting
requirements under RCW 51.04.050 and 51.36.060 for issues not set forth
in a notice of appeal.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.32.110 and 1997 c 325 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any worker entitled to receive any benefits or claiming such
under this title shall, if requested by the department or self-insurer,
submit himself or herself for medical examination, ((at a time and from
time to time, at a place reasonably convenient for the worker and as
may be provided by the rules of the department. An injured worker,
whether an alien or other injured worker, who is not residing in the
United States at the time that a medical examination is requested may
be required to submit to an examination at any location in the United
States determined by the department or self-insurer)) as authorized in
RCW 51.36.070.
(2) If the worker refuses to submit to medical examination, or
obstructs the same, or, if any injured worker shall persist in
unsanitary or injurious practices which tend to imperil or retard his
or her recovery, or shall refuse to submit to such medical or surgical
treatment as is reasonably essential to his or her recovery or refuse
or obstruct evaluation or examination for the purpose of vocational
rehabilitation or does not cooperate in reasonable efforts at such
rehabilitation, the department or the self-insurer upon approval by the
department, with notice to the worker may suspend any further action on
any claim of such worker so long as such refusal, obstruction,
noncooperation, or practice continues and reduce, suspend, or deny any
compensation for such period: PROVIDED, That the department or the
self-insurer shall not suspend any further action on any claim of a
worker or reduce, suspend, or deny any compensation if a worker has
good cause for refusing to submit to or to obstruct any examination,
evaluation, treatment or practice requested by the department or
required under this section.
(3) If the worker necessarily incurs traveling expenses in
attending the examination pursuant to the request of the department,
such traveling expenses shall be repaid to him or her out of the
accident fund upon proper voucher and audit or shall be repaid by the
self-insurer, as the case may be.
(4)(a) If the medical examination required by this section causes
the worker to be absent from his or her work without pay:
(i) In the case of a worker insured by the department, the worker
shall be paid compensation out of the accident fund in an amount equal
to his or her usual wages for the time lost from work while attending
the medical examination; or
(ii) In the case of a worker of a self-insurer, the self-insurer
shall pay the worker an amount equal to his or her usual wages for the
time lost from work while attending the medical examination.
(b) This subsection (4) shall apply prospectively to all claims
regardless of the date of injury.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.36.070 and 2001 c 152 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a medical examination is conducted under this title,
the worker may be accompanied by a person who may observe the
examination. This section does not limit the department or self-insurer's obligation to provide necessary interpreter services.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, whenever the
director or the self-insurer deems it necessary in order to resolve any
medical issue, the department or self-insurer may, at a time and from
time to time at a place reasonably convenient for the worker and as may
be provided by department rules, request a worker ((shall)) to submit
to examination ((by a physician or physicians selected by the director,
with the rendition of a report to the person ordering the
examination)). An injured worker, whether an alien or other injured
worker, who is not residing in the United States at the time that a
medical examination is ordered may be required to submit to an
examination at any location in the United States determined by the
department or self-insurer.
(3)(a) When requesting a medical examination under this section,
the department or self-insurer must first request in writing, with a
copy of the request submitted to the worker and the worker's
representative, if any, that the worker's attending physician or
treating provider conduct an examination and make a report on the
medical issue in question.
(b) If the medical issue is not resolved by the requested
examination and report, the department or self-insurer shall request
the attending physician or treating provider to make a consultation
referral to a provider approved by the director and, where appropriate,
licensed to practice in the same field or specialty as the worker's
attending physician or treating provider, where appropriate. The
consulting provider shall conduct an examination and make a report on
the medical issue in question.
(4)(a) A provider conducting a medical examination under this
section must submit a report to the department or self-insurer and, on
the same day that the report is submitted, submit a copy of the report
to the worker, the worker's representative, and the worker's attending
physician.
(b) If the department or self-insurer relies on the examination
report to deny, limit, or terminate benefits to a worker, the
department or self-insurer must give the workers' attending physician
or treating provider no less than thirty days from the physician's or
provider's receipt of the report to provide a written response to the
report.
(5) The department or self-insurer shall provide the physician
performing an examination with all relevant medical records from the
worker's claim file.
(6) The director, in his or her discretion, may charge the cost of
such examination or examinations to the self-insurer or to the medical
aid fund as the case may be. The cost of said examination shall
include payment to the worker of reasonable expenses connected
therewith.

Sec. 6 RCW 51.32.112 and 1993 c 515 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall ((develop standards for)) adopt rules
governing the conduct of ((special)) medical examinations ((to
determine permanent disabilities)) under this title, including, but not
limited to:
(a) The qualifications of persons conducting the examinations. To
conduct an examination, a provider must, at a minimum, be licensed to
practice, at the time of the examination, medicine or surgery under
chapter 18.71 RCW, osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapter 18.57
RCW, podiatric medicine and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW, dentistry
under chapter 18.30 RCW, chiropractic under chapter 18.25 RCW, or
psychology under chapter 18.83 RCW;
(b) The criteria for removing examiners from the list of approved
examiners, including but not limited to the department determining,
after reasonable investigation, that the provider:
(i) Committed professional or other misconduct, including a
violation of RCW 51.48.280, or demonstrated incompetency in connection
with providing medical examinations under this title;
(ii) Exceeded the limits of his or her professional competence in
conducting medical examinations or made materially false statements
regarding his or her qualifications in his or her application as an
examiner;
(iii) Failed to transmit copies of medical reports, or failed to
submit full and truthful medical reports of his or her findings, as
required by this title;
(iv) Knowingly made a false statement or representation as to a
material fact in any medical report made under this title or in
testifying or otherwise providing information for the purposes of this
title; or
(v) Refused to submit to deposition, appear before, testify, or
answer a material question of the department, or board of industrial
insurance appeals, or produce a material document concerning his or her
provision of services under this title;
(((b))) (c) The criteria for conducting the examinations, including
guidelines for the appropriate treatment of injured workers during the
examination; and
(((c))) (d) The content of examination reports, including a
requirement that examination reports contain a signed statement
certifying that the report is a full and truthful representation of the
examiner's professional opinion with respect to the injured worker's
condition.
(2) Within the appropriate scope of practice, chiropractors
licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW may conduct special medical
examinations to determine permanent disabilities in consultation with
physicians licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW. The department,
in its discretion, may request that a special medical examination be
conducted by a single chiropractor if the department determines that
the sole issues involved in the examination are within the scope of
practice under chapter 18.25 RCW. However, nothing in this section
authorizes the use as evidence before the board of a chiropractor's
determination of the extent of a worker's permanent disability if the
determination is not requested by the department.
(3) The department must examine the credentials of providers
conducting medical examinations ordered under this title and must
monitor the quality and objectivity of the examinations and examination
reports obtained by the department and self-insured employers. The
department's rules must ensure that examinations ordered under this
title are performed only by qualified providers meeting department
standards.
(4) The department shall investigate the amount of examination fees
received by persons conducting ((special)) medical examinations ((to
determine permanent disabilities)) under this title, including total
compensation received for examinations of department and self-insured
claimants, and establish compensation guidelines and compensation
reporting criteria.
(((4))) (5) The department shall investigate the level of
compliance of self-insurers with the requirement of full reporting of
claims information to the department, particularly with respect to
medical examinations, and develop effective enforcement procedures or
recommendations for legislation if needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 51.32.112 is recodified as a section in
chapter 51.36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 51.32.114 (Medical examination--Department to monitor quality and objectivity) and 1988 c 114 s 3 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act applies to all medical examinations
ordered under Title 51 RCW on or after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---