BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.48.080 and 1985 c 347 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person, firm or corporation who violates or fails to obey,
observe or comply with this title or any rule of the department
promulgated under authority of this title, shall be subject to a
penalty of not to exceed five hundred dollars.

--- END ---