BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The uniformed service shared leave pool is created to allow
employees to donate leave to be used as shared leave for any employee
who has been called to service in the uniformed services and who meets
the requirements of RCW 41.04.665. Participation in the pool shall, at
all times, be voluntary on the part of the employee. The military
department, in consultation with the department of personnel and the
office of financial management, shall administer the uniformed service
shared leave pool.
(2) Employees as defined in subsection (10) of this section who are
eligible to donate leave under RCW 41.04.665 may donate leave to the
uniformed service shared leave pool.
(3) An employee as defined in subsection (10) of this section who
has been called to service in the uniformed services and is eligible
for shared leave under RCW 41.04.665 may request shared leave from the
uniformed service shared leave pool.
(4) It shall be the responsibility of the employee who has been
called to service to provide an earnings statement verifying military
salary, orders of service, and notification of a change in orders of
service or military salary.
(5) Shared leave under this section may not be granted unless the
pool has a sufficient balance to fund the requested shared leave for
the expected term of service.
(6) Shared leave paid under this section, in combination with
military salary, shall not exceed the level of the employee's state
monthly salary.
(7) Any leave donated shall be removed from the personally
accumulated leave balance of the employee donating the leave.
(8) An employee who receives shared leave from the pool is not
required to recontribute such leave to the pool, except as otherwise
provided in this section.
(9) Leave that may be donated or received by any one employee shall
be calculated as in RCW 41.04.665.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) "Employee" has the meaning provided in RCW 41.04.655, except
that "employee" as used in this section does not include employees of
school districts and educational service districts.
(b) "Service in the uniformed services" has the meaning provided in
RCW 41.04.655.
(c) "Military salary" includes base, specialty, and other pay, but
does not include allowances such as the basic allowance for housing.
(d) "Monthly salary" includes monthly salary and special pay and
shift differential, or the monthly equivalent for hourly employees.
"Monthly salary" does not include:
(i) Overtime pay;
(ii) Call back pay;
(iii) Standby pay; or
(iv) Performance bonuses.
(11) The department of personnel, in consultation with the military
department and the office of financial management, shall adopt rules
and policies governing the donation and use of shared leave from the
uniformed service shared leave pool, including definitions of pay and
allowances and guidelines for agencies to use in recordkeeping
concerning shared leave.
(12) Agencies shall investigate any alleged abuse of the uniformed
service shared leave pool and on a finding of wrongdoing, the employee
may be required to repay all of the shared leave received from the
uniformed service shared leave pool.
(13) Higher education institutions shall adopt policies consistent
with the needs of the employees under their respective jurisdictions.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.04.665 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 12 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) An agency head may permit an employee to receive leave under
this section if:
(a)(i) The employee suffers from, or has a relative or household
member suffering from, an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or
mental condition which is of an extraordinary or severe nature; or
(ii) The employee has been called to service in the uniformed
services;
(b) The illness, injury, impairment, condition, or call to service
has caused, or is likely to cause, the employee to:
(i) Go on leave without pay status; or
(ii) Terminate state employment;
(c) The employee's absence and the use of shared leave are
justified;
(d) The employee has depleted or will shortly deplete his or her:
(i) Annual leave and sick leave reserves if he or she qualifies
under (a)(i) of this subsection; or
(ii) Annual leave and paid military leave allowed under RCW
38.40.060 if he or she qualifies under (a)(ii) of this subsection;
(e) The employee has abided by agency rules regarding:
(i) Sick leave use if he or she qualifies under (a)(i) of this
subsection; or
(ii) Military leave if he or she qualifies under (a)(ii) of this
subsection; and
(f) The employee has diligently pursued and been found to be
ineligible for benefits under chapter 51.32 RCW if he or she qualifies
under (a)(i) of this subsection.
(2) The agency head shall determine the amount of leave, if any,
which an employee may receive under this section. However, an employee
shall not receive a total of more than two hundred sixty-one days of
leave, except that shared leave received under the uniformed service
shared leave pool in section 1 of this act is not included in this
total.
(3) An employee may transfer annual leave, sick leave, and his or
her personal holiday, as follows:
(a) An employee who has an accrued annual leave balance of more
than ten days may request that the head of the agency for which the
employee works transfer a specified amount of annual leave to another
employee authorized to receive leave under subsection (1) of this
section. In no event may the employee request a transfer of an amount
of leave that would result in his or her annual leave account going
below ten days. For purposes of this subsection (3)(a), annual leave
does not accrue if the employee receives compensation in lieu of
accumulating a balance of annual leave.
(b) An employee may transfer a specified amount of sick leave to an
employee requesting shared leave only when the donating employee
retains a minimum of one hundred seventy-six hours of sick leave after
the transfer.
(c) An employee may transfer, under the provisions of this section
relating to the transfer of leave, all or part of his or her personal
holiday, as that term is defined under RCW 1.16.050, or as such
holidays are provided to employees by agreement with a school
district's board of directors if the leave transferred under this
subsection does not exceed the amount of time provided for personal
holidays under RCW 1.16.050.
(4) An employee of an institution of higher education under RCW
28B.10.016, school district, or educational service district who does
not accrue annual leave but does accrue sick leave and who has an
accrued sick leave balance of more than twenty-two days may request
that the head of the agency for which the employee works transfer a
specified amount of sick leave to another employee authorized to
receive leave under subsection (1) of this section. In no event may
such an employee request a transfer that would result in his or her
sick leave account going below twenty-two days. Transfers of sick
leave under this subsection are limited to transfers from employees who
do not accrue annual leave. Under this subsection, "sick leave" also
includes leave accrued pursuant to RCW 28A.400.300(2) or 28A.310.240(1)
with compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies.
(5) Transfers of leave made by an agency head under subsections (3)
and (4) of this section shall not exceed the requested amount.
(6) Leave transferred under this section may be transferred from
employees of one agency to an employee of the same agency or, with the
approval of the heads of both agencies, to an employee of another state
agency. However, leave transferred to or from employees of school
districts or educational service districts is limited to transfers to
or from employees within the same employing district.
(7) While an employee is on leave transferred under this section,
he or she shall continue to be classified as a state employee and shall
receive the same treatment in respect to salary, wages, and employee
benefits as the employee would normally receive if using accrued annual
leave or sick leave.
(a) All salary and wage payments made to employees while on leave
transferred under this section shall be made by the agency employing
the person receiving the leave. The value of leave transferred shall
be based upon the leave value of the person receiving the leave.
(b) In the case of leave transferred by an employee of one agency
to an employee of another agency, the agencies involved shall arrange
for the transfer of funds and credit for the appropriate value of
leave.
(i) Pursuant to rules adopted by the office of financial
management, funds shall not be transferred under this section if the
transfer would violate any constitutional or statutory restrictions on
the funds being transferred.
(ii) The office of financial management may adjust the
appropriation authority of an agency receiving funds under this section
only if and to the extent that the agency's existing appropriation
authority would prevent it from expending the funds received.
(iii) Where any questions arise in the transfer of funds or the
adjustment of appropriation authority, the director of financial
management shall determine the appropriate transfer or adjustment.
(8) Leave transferred under this section shall not be used in any
calculation to determine an agency's allocation of full time equivalent
staff positions.
(9) The value of any leave transferred under this section which
remains unused shall be returned at its original value to the employee
or employees who transferred the leave when the agency head finds that
the leave is no longer needed or will not be needed at a future time in
connection with the illness or injury for which the leave was
transferred. To the extent administratively feasible, the value of
unused leave which was transferred by more than one employee shall be
returned on a pro rata basis.
(10) An employee who uses leave that is transferred to him or her
under this section may not be required to repay the value of the leave
that he or she used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The uniformed service shared leave pool account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from leave donated under
the uniformed service shared leave pool under section 1 of this act and
any moneys appropriated or otherwise provided must be deposited into
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
providing shared leave to employees under the uniformed service shared
leave pool. Only the adjutant general or his or her designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is not subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, and no appropriation is
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect October 1, 2007.

--- END ---