BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.86A.030 and 2005 c 302 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Funds held in public depositaries not as demand deposits as
provided in RCW 43.86A.020 and 43.86A.030, shall be available for a
time certificate of deposit investment program according to the
following formula: The state treasurer shall apportion to all
participating depositaries an amount equal to five percent of the three
year average mean of general state revenues as certified in accordance
with Article VIII, section 1(b) of the state Constitution, or fifty
percent of the total surplus treasury investment availability,
whichever is less. Within thirty days after certification, those funds
determined to be available according to this formula for the time
certificate of deposit investment program shall be deposited in
qualified public depositaries. These deposits shall be allocated among
the participating depositaries on a basis to be determined by the state
treasurer.
(2) The state treasurer may use up to ((one)) two hundred million
dollars per year of all funds available under this section for the
purposes of RCW 43.86A.060. The amounts made available to these public
depositaries shall be equal to the amounts of outstanding loans made
under RCW 43.86A.060.
(3) The formula so devised shall be a matter of public record
giving consideration to, but not limited to deposits, assets, loans,
capital structure, investments or some combination of these factors.
However, if in the judgment of the state treasurer the amount of
allocation for certificates of deposit as determined by this section
will impair the cash flow needs of the state treasury, the state
treasurer may adjust the amount of the allocation accordingly.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.86A.060 and 2005 c 302 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state treasurer shall establish a linked deposit program
for investment of deposits in qualified public depositaries. As a
condition of participating in the program, qualified public
depositaries must make qualifying loans as provided in this section.
The state treasurer may purchase a certificate of deposit that is equal
to the amount of the qualifying loan made by the qualified public
depositary or may purchase a certificate of deposit that is equal to
the aggregate amount of two or more qualifying loans made by one or
more qualified public depositaries.
(2) Qualifying loans made under this section are those:
(a) Having terms that do not exceed ten years;
(b) Where an individual loan does not exceed one million dollars;
(c) That are made to a minority or women's business enterprise that
has received state certification under chapter 39.19 RCW;
(d) Where the interest rate on the loan to the minority or women's
business enterprise does not exceed an interest rate that is two
hundred basis points below the interest rate the qualified public
depositary would charge for a loan for a similar purpose and a similar
term, except that, if the preference given by the state treasurer to
the qualified public depositary under subsection (3) of this section is
less than two hundred basis points, the qualified public depositary may
reduce the preference given on the loan by an amount that corresponds
to the reduction in preference below two hundred basis points given to
the qualified public depositary; and
(e) Where the points or fees charged at loan closing do not exceed
one percent of the loan amount.
(3) In setting interest rates of time certificate of deposits, the
state treasurer shall offer rates so that a two hundred basis point
preference will be given to the qualified public depositary, except
that the treasurer shall lower the amount of the preference to ensure
that the effective interest rate on the time certificate of deposit is
not less than two percent.
(4) Upon notification by the state treasurer that a minority or
women's business enterprise is no longer certified under chapter 39.19
RCW, the qualified public depositary shall reduce the amount of
qualifying loans by the outstanding balance of the loan made under this
section to the minority or women's business enterprise.
(5) The office of minority and women's business enterprises has the
authority to promulgate, amend, and repeal rules in order to:
(a) Ensure that when making a qualified loan under the linked
deposit program, businesses that have never received a loan under the
linked deposit program are given first priority;
(b) Limit the total principal loan amount that any one business
receives in qualified loans under the linked deposit program over the
lifetime of the businesses;
(c) Limit the total principal loan amount that an owner of one or
more businesses receives in qualified loans under the linked deposit
program during the owner's lifetime; and
(d) Limit the total amount of any one qualified loan made under the
linked deposit program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.86A RCW
to read as follows:
The requirements upon the state treasurer in RCW 43.86A.030 are
contingent upon at least one additional full-time equivalent employee,
which must be dedicated to the deposit investment program, for the
purposes of RCW 43.86A.030 and this section, being funded from the
state treasurer's service fund created in RCW 43.08.190.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding from the state
treasurer's service fund created in RCW 43.08.190 for the purpose of
providing an additional full-time equivalent employee, dedicated to the
deposit investment program, for the purposes of this act, referencing
this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2007,
in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) This act takes effect the first day of
the month immediately following the state treasurer's determination
that the contingency in section 3 of this act has occurred.
(2) The state treasurer must provide notice of the effective date
of this act to the legislature, the office of the code reviser, and
others as deemed appropriate by the state treasurer.

--- END ---