BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.09.405 and 2006 c 300 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The forest and fish support account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Receipts from appropriations, the surcharge imposed under
RCW ((82.04.260(12))) 82.04.261, and other sources must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account shall be used for
activities pursuant to the state's implementation of the forests and
fish report as defined in this chapter ((76.09 RCW)) and related
activities((,)) including, but not limited to, adaptive management,
monitoring, and participation grants to tribes, state and local
agencies, and not-for-profit public interest organizations.
Expenditures from the account may be made only after appropriation by
the legislature.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.260 and 2006 c 354 s 4 and 2006 c 300 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2012, seafood products which remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
such business shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured
or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate
of 0.138 percent;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2012, dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including byproducts from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2012, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured or
the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business shall be equal
to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed
under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to
such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income of such
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of
commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, manufactured by
that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the airplanes
or components multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial
airplane," "component," and "final assembly of a superefficient
airplane" have the meanings given in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (11) must report
as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply after the earlier of: July
1, 2024; or December 31, 2007, if assembly of a superefficient airplane
does not begin by December 31, 2007, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business shall, in the case of extractors, be equal to the value of
products, including byproducts, extracted, or in the case of extractors
for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by
the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of products, including byproducts,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the
gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent
from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July
1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood
products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006,
through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through
June 30, 2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business shall be equal to
the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904
percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing
timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer
is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of
the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the
timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(ii) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(iii) "Timber products" means logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood
waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of
timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
and pulp((; and recycled paper products)), including market pulp and
pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products.
(((ii))) (iv) "Wood products" means paper and paper products;
dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard,
oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood
doors; and wood windows.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
shall be equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to any sale of standing timber excluded
from the definition of "sale" in RCW 82.45.010(3). The definitions in
RCW 82.04.260(12) apply to this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.261 and 2006 c 300 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(12), a
surcharge is imposed on those persons who are subject to any of the
taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(12). Except as otherwise provided in
this section, the surcharge is equal to 0.052 percent. The surcharge
is added to the rates provided in RCW 82.04.260(12) (a), (b), ((and))
(c), and (d). The surcharge and this section expire July 1, 2024.
(2) All receipts from the surcharge imposed under this section
shall be deposited into the forest and fish support account created in
RCW 76.09.405.
(3)(a) The surcharge imposed under this section shall be suspended
if:
(i) Receipts from the surcharge total at least eight million
dollars during any fiscal biennium; or
(ii) The office of financial management certifies to the department
that the federal government has appropriated at least two million
dollars for participation in forest and fish report-related activities
by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical
boundaries of the state of Washington for any federal fiscal year.
(b)(i) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(i) of this
subsection (3) shall take effect on the first day of the calendar month
that is at least thirty days after the end of the month during which
the department determines that receipts from the surcharge total at
least eight million dollars during the fiscal biennium. The surcharge
shall be imposed again at the beginning of the following fiscal
biennium.
(ii) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(ii) of this
subsection (3) shall take effect on the later of the first day of
October of any federal fiscal year for which the federal government
appropriates at least two million dollars for participation in forest
and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian
tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington, or the first day of a calendar month that is at least
thirty days following the date that the office of financial management
makes a certification to the department under subsection (5) of this
section. The surcharge shall be imposed again on the first day of the
following July.
(4)(a) If, by October 1st of any federal fiscal year, the office of
financial management certifies to the department that the federal
government has appropriated funds for participation in forest and fish
report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located
within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington but the
amount of the appropriation is less than two million dollars, the
department shall adjust the surcharge in accordance with this
subsection.
(b) The department shall adjust the surcharge by an amount that the
department estimates will cause the amount of funds deposited into the
forest and fish support account for the state fiscal year that begins
July 1st and that includes the beginning of the federal fiscal year for
which the federal appropriation is made, to be reduced by twice the
amount of the federal appropriation for participation in forest and
fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes
located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.
(c) Any adjustment in the surcharge shall take effect at the
beginning of a calendar month that is at least thirty days after the
date that the office of financial management makes the certification
under subsection (5) of this section.
(d) The surcharge shall be imposed again at the rate provided in
subsection (1) of this section on the first day of the following state
fiscal year unless the surcharge is suspended under subsection (3) of
this section or adjusted for that fiscal year under this subsection.
(e) Adjustments of the amount of the surcharge by the department
are final and shall not be used to challenge the validity of the
surcharge imposed under this section.
(f) The department shall provide timely notice to affected
taxpayers of the suspension of the surcharge or an adjustment of the
surcharge.
(5) The office of financial management shall make the certification
to the department as to the status of federal appropriations for tribal
participation in forest and fish report-related activities.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.333 and 1990 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((This chapter shall not apply to the gross receipts or value of
products proceeding or accruing from timber harvested by)) In computing
tax under this chapter, a person who is a small harvester as defined in
RCW ((84.33.073 and whose value of products, gross proceeds of sales,
or gross income of the business is less than)) 84.33.035(14) may deduct
an amount not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars per tax year from
the gross receipts or value of products proceeding or accruing from
timber harvested by that person. A deduction under this section may
not reduce the amount of tax due to less than zero.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.32.630 and 2006 c 300 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources, the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under RCW 82.04.260(12) shall
file a complete annual survey with the department. The survey is due
by March 31st following any year in which a person reports taxes under
RCW 82.04.260(12). The department may extend the due date for timely
filing of annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW
82.32.590. The survey shall include the amount of tax reduced under
the preferential rate in RCW 82.04.260(12). The survey shall also
include the following information for employment positions in
Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(b) The first survey filed under this subsection shall include
employment, wage, and benefit information for the twelve-month period
immediately before first use of a preferential tax rate under RCW
82.04.260(12).
(c) As part of the annual survey, the department may request
additional information, including the amount of investment in equipment
used in the activities taxable under the preferential rate in RCW
82.04.260(12), necessary to measure the results of, or determine
eligibility for, the preferential tax rate in RCW 82.04.260(12).
(d) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax reduced under the preferential rate in RCW 82.04.260(12), is
deemed taxpayer information under RCW 82.32.330. Information on the
amount of tax reduced is not subject to the confidentiality provisions
of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request,
except as provided in (e) of this subsection. If the amount of the tax
reduced as reported on the survey is different than the amount actually
reduced based on the taxpayer's excise tax returns or otherwise allowed
by the department, the amount actually reduced may be disclosed.
(e) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax reduction is less
than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the survey may
request the department to treat the amount of the tax reduction as
confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(f) Small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035 are not required
to file the annual survey under this section.
(3) If a person fails to submit a complete annual survey under
subsection (2) of this section by the due date or any extension under
RCW 82.32.590, the department shall declare the amount of taxes reduced
under the preferential rate in RCW 82.04.260(12) for the period covered
by the survey to be immediately due and payable. The department shall
assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes. Interest shall be
assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under this
chapter, retroactively to the date the reduced taxes were due, and
shall accrue until the amount of the reduced taxes is repaid.
(4) The department shall use the information from the annual survey
required under subsection (2) of this section to prepare summary
descriptive statistics by category. The department shall report these
statistics to the legislature each year by September 1st. The
requirement to prepare and report summary descriptive statistics shall
cease after September 1, 2025.
(5) By November 1, 2011, and November 1, 2023, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, shall report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of the preferential tax rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(12). The report shall measure the effect of the preferential
tax rate provided in RCW 82.04.260(12) on job retention, net jobs
created for Washington residents, company growth, and other factors as
the committees select. The report shall include a discussion of
principles to apply in evaluating whether the legislature should
continue the preferential tax rate provided in RCW 82.04.260(12).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
A sale of standing timber is exempt from tax under this chapter if
the gross income from such sale is taxable under RCW 82.04.260(12)(d).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The expiration of RCW 82.04.261 does not
affect any existing right acquired or liability or obligation incurred
under that section or under any rule or order adopted under that
section, nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under that
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---