BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.070 and 1992 c 69 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, it shall
remain under such classification and shall not be applied to other use
except as provided by subsection (2) of this section for at least ten
years from the date of classification ((and)). It shall continue under
such classification until and unless withdrawn from classification
after notice of request for withdrawal shall be made by the owner.
(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, during any year
after eight years of the initial ten-year classification period have
elapsed, notice of request for withdrawal of all or a portion of the
land may be given by the owner to the assessor or assessors of the
county or counties in which ((such)) the land is situated. In the
event that a portion of a parcel is removed from classification, the
remaining portion must meet the same requirements as did the entire
parcel when ((such)) the land was originally granted classification
((pursuant to)) under this chapter unless the remaining parcel has
different income criteria. Within seven days the assessor shall
transmit one copy of ((such)) the notice to the legislative body
((which)) that originally approved the application. The assessor or
assessors, as the case may be, shall, when two assessment years have
elapsed following the date of receipt of such notice, withdraw ((such))
the land from ((such)) the classification and the land shall be subject
to the additional tax and applicable interest due under RCW 84.34.108.
The open space taxation agreement to tax according to use shall not be
considered to be a contract and can be abrogated at any time by the
legislature in which event no additional tax or penalty shall be
imposed.
(b) In a county with a population of one million or greater, during
any year after the initial ten-year classification period has elapsed,
notice of request for withdrawal of all or a portion of the land may be
given by the owner to the assessor of the county in which the land is
situated. In the event that a portion of a parcel is removed from
classification, the remaining portion must meet the same requirements
as did the entire parcel when the land was originally granted
classification under this chapter unless the remaining parcel has
different income criteria. Within seven days the assessor shall
transmit one copy of the notice to the legislative body that originally
approved the application. Upon receipt of such notice, the assessor
shall withdraw the land from the classification and the land shall be
subject to the additional tax and applicable interest due under RCW
84.34.108. The open space taxation agreement to tax according to use
shall not be considered to be a contract and can be abrogated at any
time by the legislature in which event no additional tax or penalty
shall be imposed.
(2)(a) The following reclassifications are not considered
withdrawals or removals and are not subject to additional tax under RCW
84.34.108:
(((a))) (i) Reclassification between lands under RCW 84.34.020 (2)
and (3);
(((b))) (ii) Reclassification of land classified under RCW
84.34.020 (2) or (3) or chapter 84.33 RCW to open space land under RCW
84.34.020(1);
(((c))) (iii) Reclassification of land classified under RCW
84.34.020 (2) or (3) to forest land classified under chapter 84.33 RCW;
and
(((d))) (iv) Reclassification of land classified as open space land
under RCW 84.34.020(1)(c) and reclassified to farm and agricultural
land under RCW 84.34.020(2) if the land had been previously classified
as farm and agricultural land under RCW 84.34.020(2).
(b) In a county with a population of one million or greater, the
following reclassifications are not considered withdrawals or removals
and are not subject to additional tax under RCW 84.34.108:
(i) Reclassification of land from one current use classification
governed by this chapter to another current use classification governed
by this chapter;
(ii) Reclassification of land designated under chapter 84.33 RCW to
a current use classification governed by this chapter; and
(iii) Reclassification of land from a current use classification
governed by this chapter to forest land designated under chapter 84.33
RCW.
(3) Applications for reclassification shall be subject to
applicable provisions of RCW 84.34.037, 84.34.035, 84.34.041, and
chapter 84.33 RCW.
(4) The income criteria for land classified under RCW 84.34.020(2)
(b) and (c) may be deferred for land being reclassified from land
classified under RCW 84.34.020 (1)(c) or (3), or chapter 84.33 RCW into
RCW 84.34.020(2) (b) or (c) for a period of up to five years from the
date of reclassification.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.34.080 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 705 are each amended to
read as follows:
((When)) If land ((which)) that has been classified under this
chapter as open space land, farm and agricultural land, or timber land
is applied to some other use, except through reclassification in
compliance with RCW 84.34.070, or except as a result solely from any
one of the conditions listed in RCW 84.34.108(6), the owner shall
within sixty days notify the county assessor of ((such)) the change in
use ((and)). The assessor shall impose additional real property tax
((shall be imposed)) upon ((such)) the land in an amount equal to the
((sum of the)) following:
(1) The total amount of the additional tax and applicable interest
due under RCW 84.34.108; plus
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a penalty
amounting to twenty percent of the amount determined in subsection (1)
of this section.
(3) In a county with a population of one million or greater, if the
change of use occurs within ten years after the date the land was
classified under this chapter, a penalty amounting to twenty percent of
the total amount of the additional tax and applicable interest due
under RCW 84.34.108.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---