BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington
state:
(a) Is one of the most trade-dependent states in the United States,
where one in three jobs is directly connected to trade;
(b) Benefits from a thriving tourist trade;
(c) Encourages cultural understanding and tolerance for its
citizens; and
(d) Seeks a world-class education system.
(2) The legislature further finds that there is a current lack of
leadership and commitment at the state level to improve world language
instruction so that our students can secure their part in the global
community and remain competitive in the world.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall assign at least one
full-time equivalent staff position within the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to serve as the world language
supervisor. The world language supervisor shall have the following
duties and responsibilities:
(1) Develop, conduct, and oversee professional development for
teachers on grade level expectations, state and national standards, and
best practices in instruction for world languages;
(2) Provide technical assistance to schools in designing elementary
and middle school language programs, selecting and designing high
quality curriculum, and providing professional development;
(3) Advise in the development of online world language courses;
(4) Create a clearinghouse of information and materials to support
high quality world language instruction at the elementary and secondary
levels;
(5) Secure and implement grants, including federal grants, to
enhance world language programs;
(6) Encourage and foster an articulated curriculum for world
languages through elementary, secondary, and postsecondary grades;
(7) Establish and maintain a state database for world language
course offerings in schools and school districts;
(8) Implement memoranda of understanding with ministries of
education in other countries, including interviewing, selecting,
securing visas for, and providing orientation for visiting teachers;
(9) Serve in an advisory capacity on committees or work groups
regarding teacher certification, advanced placement programs, and
textbook publishing and selection; and
(10) Serve as an education liaison with the business, trade, and
economic development communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this
purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate grants, based on a competitive application process, for pilot
projects to enhance instruction in world languages at the elementary
and middle school level.
(2) At least one of the pilot projects shall implement a dual
language enrichment program using a major Asian language and English as
the dual languages. A dual language enrichment program is one where
all students in the class receive instruction in both languages,
spending approximately one-half of the class day learning in one
language and the other half of the school day learning in the other
language.
(3) At least one of the pilot projects shall implement a
technology-enhanced instructional model where instruction in a major
Asian language, preferably by a native speaker, is provided through a
combination of the K-20 telecommunications network, other online
technology, and supplemental direct instruction by the classroom
teacher.
(4) At the end of the grant period, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall evaluate the outcomes,
successes, and limitations of the pilot projects as strategies to
enhance world language instruction in public schools and report its
findings to the education committees of the legislature at the first
legislative session after the end of the grant period.

--- END ---