BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.44.010 and 1998 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All county and municipal peace officers are hereby charged with
the duty of investigating and prosecuting all violations of this title,
and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture,
importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of
liquor, and all fines imposed for violations of this title and the
penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture, importation,
transportation, possession, distribution and sale of liquor shall
belong to the county, city or town wherein the court imposing the fine
is located, and shall be placed in the general fund for payment of the
salaries of those engaged in the enforcement of the provisions of this
title and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture,
importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of
liquor: PROVIDED, That all fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties
collected or assessed by a district court because of the violation of
a state law shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now
exists or is later amended.
(2) In addition to any and all other powers granted, the board
shall have the power to enforce the penal provisions of this title and
the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture, importation,
transportation, possession, distribution and sale of liquor.
(3) In addition to the other duties under this section, the board
shall enforce chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW.
(4) The board may appoint and employ, assign to duty and fix the
compensation of, officers to be designated as liquor enforcement
officers.
(a) Such liquor enforcement officers shall have the power, under
the supervision of the board, to:
(i) Enforce the penal provisions of this title and the penal laws
of this state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation,
possession, distribution and sale of liquor((. They shall have the
power and authority to));
(ii) Serve and execute all warrants and process of law issued by
the courts in enforcing the penal provisions of this title or of any
penal law of this state relating to the manufacture, importation,
transportation, possession, distribution and sale of liquor, and the
provisions of chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW((. They shall have the
power to)); and
(iii) Arrest, without a warrant, any person or persons found in the
act of violating any of the penal provisions of this title or of any
penal law of this state relating to the manufacture, importation,
transportation, possession, distribution and sale of liquor, and the
provisions of chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW.
(b) A qualified liquor enforcement officer may, when acting within
the scope of his or her duties and when an offense occurs in his or her
presence, enforce all criminal laws of the state. For purposes of this
subsection, a liquor enforcement officer is qualified if he or she has
successfully completed the basic law enforcement academy course
sponsored by the criminal justice training commission or a course
approved by the criminal justice training commission and provided by
the board or the criminal justice training commission.

--- END ---