BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.58 RCW
to read as follows:
A law enforcement officer, prosecuting attorney, or other
government official may not ask or require a victim of an alleged sex
offense to submit to a polygraph examination or other truth telling
device as a condition for proceeding with the investigation of the
offense. The refusal of a victim to submit to a polygraph examination
or other truth telling device shall not prevent the investigation,
charging, or prosecution of the offense. For the purposes of this
section, "sex offense" is any offense under chapter 9A.44 RCW.

--- END ---