BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, all liquor and
tobacco enforcement officers hired by the liquor control board on or
after the effective date of this act shall complete basic law
enforcement training that complies with standards adopted by the
commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.080 no later than twelve months after
being hired.
(b) The training requirement in (a) of this subsection does not
apply to a person hired by the liquor control board on or after the
effective date of this act who completed, prior to the effective date
of this act, basic law enforcement training that complies with
standards adopted by the commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.080.
(c) Liquor and tobacco enforcement officers who were hired prior to
the effective date of this act shall have the option to complete the
training.
(2) The commission shall provide the training required in this
section, together with facilities, supplies, materials, and room and
board for noncommuting attendees. The liquor control board shall
provide its enforcement officers with the opportunity to participate in
the training required in this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.36.031 and 2005 c 458 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of assault in the third degree if he or she,
under circumstances not amounting to assault in the first or second
degree:
(a) With intent to prevent or resist the execution of any lawful
process or mandate of any court officer or the lawful apprehension or
detention of himself or another person, assaults another; or
(b) Assaults a person employed as a transit operator or driver, the
immediate supervisor of a transit operator or driver, a mechanic, or a
security officer, by a public or private transit company or a
contracted transit service provider, while that person is performing
his or her official duties at the time of the assault; or
(c) Assaults a school bus driver, the immediate supervisor of a
driver, a mechanic, or a security officer, employed by a school
district transportation service or a private company under contract for
transportation services with a school district, while the person is
performing his or her official duties at the time of the assault; or
(d) With criminal negligence, causes bodily harm to another person
by means of a weapon or other instrument or thing likely to produce
bodily harm; or
(e) Assaults a fire fighter or other employee of a fire department,
county fire marshal's office, county fire prevention bureau, or fire
protection district who was performing his or her official duties at
the time of the assault; or
(f) With criminal negligence, causes bodily harm accompanied by
substantial pain that extends for a period sufficient to cause
considerable suffering; or
(g) Assaults a law enforcement officer or other employee of a law
enforcement agency who was performing his or her official duties at the
time of the assault; or
(h) Assaults a peace officer with a projectile stun gun; or
(i) Assaults a nurse, physician, or health care provider who was
performing his or her nursing or health care duties at the time of the
assault. For purposes of this subsection: "Nurse" means a person
licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; "physician" means a person licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW; and "health care provider" means a
person certified under chapter 18.71 or 18.73 RCW who performs
emergency medical services or a person regulated under Title 18 RCW and
employed by, or contracting with, a hospital licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW; or
(j) Assaults a liquor or tobacco enforcement officer employed by
the liquor control board who was performing his or her official duties
at the time of the assault.
(2) Assault in the third degree is a class C felony.

--- END ---