BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) A vibrant and growing small business sector is critical to
creating jobs in a dynamic economy;
(2) Small businesses bear a disproportionate share of regulatory
costs and burdens;
(3) Fundamental changes that are needed in the regulatory and
enforcement culture of state agencies to make them more responsive to
small business can be made without compromising the statutory missions
of the agencies;
(4) When adopting rules to protect the health, safety, and economic
welfare of Washington, state agencies should seek to achieve statutory
goals as effectively and efficiently as possible without imposing
unnecessary burdens on small employers;
(5) Uniform regulatory and reporting requirements can impose
unnecessary and disproportionately burdensome demands including legal,
accounting, and consulting costs upon small businesses with limited
resources;
(6) The failure to recognize differences in the scale and resources
of regulated businesses can adversely affect competition in the
marketplace, discourage innovation, and restrict improvements in
productivity;
(7) Unnecessary regulations create entry barriers in many
industries and discourage potential entrepreneurs from introducing
beneficial products and processes;
(8) The practice of treating all regulated businesses the same
leads to inefficient use of regulatory agency resources, enforcement
problems, and, in some cases, to actions inconsistent with the
legislative intent of health, safety, environmental, and economic
welfare legislation;
(9) Alternative regulatory approaches which do not conflict with
the state objective of applicable statutes may be available to minimize
the significant economic impact of rules on small businesses; and
(10) The process by which state rules are developed and adopted
should be reformed to require agencies to solicit the ideas and
comments of small businesses, to examine the impact of proposed and
existing rules on such businesses, and to review the continued need for
existing rules.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.85.020 and 2003 c 166 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply through this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Industry" means all of the businesses in this state in any one
four-digit standard industrial classification as published by the
United States department of commerce, or the North American industry
classification system as published by the executive office of the
president and the office of management and budget. However, if the use
of a four-digit standard industrial classification or North American
industry classification system would result in the release of data that
would violate state confidentiality laws, "industry" means all
businesses in a three-digit standard industrial classification or the
North American industry classification system.
(2) "Minor cost" means a cost per business that is less than three-tenths of one percent of annual revenue or income, or one hundred
dollars, whichever is greater, or one percent of annual payroll.
Provided: That for the rules of the department of social and health
services "minor cost" means cost per business that is less than fifty
dollars of annual cost per client or other appropriate unit of service.
(3) "Small business" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that
is owned and operated independently from all other businesses, and that
has fifty or fewer employees.
(((2))) (4) "Small business economic impact statement" means a
statement meeting the requirements of RCW 19.85.040 prepared by a state
agency pursuant to RCW 19.85.030.
(((3) "Industry" means all of the businesses in this state in any
one four-digit standard industrial classification as published by the
United States department of commerce. However, if the use of a four-digit standard industrial classification would result in the release of
data that would violate state confidentiality laws, "industry" means
all businesses in a three-digit standard industrial classification.))

Sec. 3 RCW 19.85.030 and 2000 c 171 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the adoption of a rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, an agency
shall prepare a small business economic impact statement: (a) If the
proposed rule will impose more than minor costs on businesses in an
industry; or (b) if requested to do so by a majority vote of the joint
administrative rules review committee within forty-five days of
receiving the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320.
However, if the agency has completed the pilot rule process as defined
by RCW 34.05.313 before filing the notice of a proposed rule, the
agency is not required to prepare a small business economic impact
statement.
An agency shall prepare the small business economic impact
statement in accordance with RCW 19.85.040, and file it with the code
reviser along with the notice required under RCW 34.05.320. An agency
shall file a statement prepared at the request of the joint
administrative rules review committee with the code reviser upon its
completion before the adoption of the rule. An agency shall provide a
copy of the small business economic impact statement to any person
requesting it.
(2) Based upon the extent of disproportionate impact on small
business identified in the statement prepared under RCW 19.85.040, the
agency shall, where legal and feasible in meeting the stated objectives
of the statutes upon which the rule is based, reduce the costs imposed
by the rule on small businesses. Methods to reduce the costs on small
businesses may include:
(a) Reducing, modifying, or eliminating substantive regulatory
requirements;
(b) Simplifying, reducing, or eliminating recordkeeping and
reporting requirements;
(c) Reducing the frequency of inspections;
(d) Delaying compliance timetables;
(e) Reducing or modifying fine schedules for noncompliance; or
(f) Any other mitigation techniques.
(3) If the agency determines it cannot reduce the costs imposed by
the rule on small businesses, the agency shall provide a clear
explanation of why it has made that determination and include that
statement with its filing of the proposed rule pursuant to RCW
34.05.320.
(4)(a) All small business economic impact statements are subject to
selective review by the joint administrative rules review committee
pursuant to RCW 34.05.630.
(b) Any person affected by a proposed rule where there is small
business economic impact statement may petition the joint
administrative rules review committee for review pursuant to the
procedure in RCW 34.05.655.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.85.040 and 1995 c 403 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A small business economic impact statement must include a brief
description of the reporting, recordkeeping, and other compliance
requirements of the proposed rule, and the kinds of professional
services that a small business is likely to need in order to comply
with such requirements. It shall analyze the costs of compliance for
businesses required to comply with the proposed rule adopted pursuant
to RCW 34.05.320, including costs of equipment, supplies, labor,
professional services, and increased administrative costs. It shall
consider, based on input received, whether compliance with the rule
will cause businesses to lose sales or revenue. To determine whether
the proposed rule will have a disproportionate cost impact on small
businesses, the impact statement must compare the cost of compliance
for small business with the cost of compliance for the ten percent of
businesses that are the largest businesses required to comply with the
proposed rules using one or more of the following as a basis for
comparing costs:
(a) Cost per employee;
(b) Cost per hour of labor; or
(c) Cost per one hundred dollars of sales.
(2) A small business economic impact statement must also include:
(a) A statement of the steps taken by the agency to reduce the
costs of the rule on small businesses as required by RCW
19.85.030(((3))) (2), or reasonable justification for not doing so,
addressing the options listed in RCW 19.85.030(((3))) (2);
(b) A description of how the agency will involve small businesses
in the development of the rule; ((and))
(c) A list of industries that will be required to comply with the
rule. However, this subsection (2)(c) shall not be construed to
preclude application of the rule to any business or industry to which
it would otherwise apply; and
(d) The number of jobs that will be created or lost as the result
of compliance with the proposed rule.
(3) To obtain information for purposes of this section, an agency
may survey a representative sample of affected businesses or trade
associations and should, whenever possible, appoint a committee
((under)) to engage in negotiated rule making pursuant to RCW
34.05.310(2) to assist in the accurate assessment of the costs of a
proposed rule, and the means to reduce the costs imposed on small
business.

--- END ---