BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.40.110 and 2006 c 207 s 4 and 2006 c 206 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin upon receipt. The tabulation of
absentee ballots must not commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of
the primary or election.
(2) All received absentee return envelopes must be placed in secure
locations from the time of delivery to the county auditor until their
subsequent opening. After opening the return envelopes, the county
canvassing board shall place all of the ballots in secure storage
((until after 8:00 p.m. of the day of the primary or election)).
Absentee ballots that are to be tabulated on an electronic vote
tallying system may be taken from the inner envelopes and all the
normal procedural steps may be performed to prepare these ballots for
tabulation.
(3) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the postmark,
statement, and signature on the return envelope that contains the
security envelope and absentee ballot. All personnel assigned to
verify signatures must receive training on statewide standards for
signature verification. Personnel shall verify that the voter's
signature on the return envelope is the same as the signature of that
voter in the registration files of the county. Verification may be
conducted by an automated verification system approved by the secretary
of state. For any absentee ballot, a variation between the signature
of the voter on the return envelope and the signature of that voter in
the registration files due to the substitution of initials or the use
of common nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting
are clearly the same.
(4) For registered voters casting absentee ballots, the date on the
return envelope to which the voter has attested determines the
validity, as to the time of voting for that absentee ballot if the
postmark is missing or is illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas
voters, and service voters stationed in the United States, the date on
the return envelope to which the voter has attested determines the
validity as to the time of voting for that absentee ballot.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.40.150 and 2006 c 206 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall produce and furnish envelopes and
instructions for overseas voters and service voters. The information
on the envelopes or instructions must explain that:
(1) Return postage is free if the ballot is mailed through the
United States postal service, United States armed forces postal
service, or the postal service of a United States foreign embassy;
(2) The date of the signature is considered the date of mailing;
(3) The envelope must be signed by election day;
(4) The signed declaration on the envelope is the equivalent of
voter registration;
(5) A voter may ((fax)) return a voted ballot and the accompanying
signed envelope electronically if the voter agrees to waive secrecy((.
The ballot will be counted if the original documents are received
before certification of the election)); and
(6) A voter may obtain a ballot via electronic mail, which the
voter may print out, vote, and return ((by mail)). In order to
facilitate the electronic acquisition of ballots by overseas and
service voters, the ballot instructions shall include the web site of
the office of the secretary of state.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.44.090 and 2003 c 111 s 1109 are each amended to
read as follows:
((A registered voter shall not be allowed to vote in the precinct
in which he or she is registered at any election or primary for which
that voter has cast an absentee ballot. A registered voter who has
requested an absentee ballot for a primary or special or general
election but chooses to vote at the voter's precinct polling place in
that primary or election shall cast a provisional ballot. The
canvassing board shall not count the ballot if it finds that the voter
has also voted by absentee ballot in that primary or election.))
(1) If a registered voter who was issued an absentee or mail ballot
requests to vote at a polling place, the precinct election officer
shall attempt to confirm whether the voter has already returned a
ballot. Confirmation may be achieved by accessing the county voter
registration system by electronic, telephone, or other means.
(2) If the precinct election officer is able to confirm that the
voter has not already returned a ballot, the voter may be issued a
regular ballot. In order to prevent multiple voting, the voter must be
immediately credited or flagged in the voter registration system as
having voted. If an absentee or mail ballot is subsequently returned,
the canvassing board may not count the absentee or mail ballot.
(3) If the precinct election officer is unable to confirm whether
the voter has already returned a ballot, the voter must be issued a
provisional ballot. If the voter has already returned an absentee or
mail ballot, the canvassing board may not count the provisional ballot.
If the canvassing board counts the provisional ballot and an absentee
or mail ballot is subsequently returned, the canvassing board may not
count the absentee or mail ballot.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.48.060 and 2003 c 111 s 1206 are each amended to
read as follows:
All mail ballots authorized by RCW 29A.48.010, 29A.48.020, or
29A.48.030 must contain the same offices, names of nominees or
candidates, and propositions to be voted upon, including precinct
offices, as if the ballot had been voted in person at the polling
place. Except as otherwise provided by law, mail ballots must be
treated in the same manner as absentee ballots issued at the request of
the voter. If electronic vote tallying devices are used, political
party observers must be given the opportunity to be present, and a test
of the equipment must be performed as required by RCW 29A.12.130 before
tabulating ballots. ((Political party observers may select at random
ballots to be counted manually as provided by RCW 29A.60.170.))

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.60.110 and 2003 c 111 s 1511 are each amended to
read as follows:
Immediately after their tabulation, all ballots counted at a ballot
counting center must be sealed in containers that identify the primary
or election and be retained for at least sixty days or according to
federal law, whichever is longer. All ballots tallied by poll-site
ballot counting devices must be returned to the elections department in
sealed ballot containers on election day. Counties composed entirely
of islands or portions of counties composed of islands shall collect
the ballots within twenty-four hours of the close of the polls.
Ballots tabulated in poll-site ballot counting devices must be
sealed by two of the election precinct officers at the polling place,
and a log of the seal and the names of the people sealing the container
must be completed. One copy of this log must be retained by the
inspector, one copy must be placed in the ballot transfer case, and one
copy must be transported with the ballots to the elections department,
where the seal number must be verified by the county auditor or a
designated representative. Ballots may be transported by one election
employee if the container is sealed at the poll and then verified when
returned to the elections department. Auditors using poll-site ballot
counting devices may conduct early pickup of counted ballots on
election day.
In the presence of major party observers who are available, ballots
may be removed from the sealed containers at the elections department
and consolidated into one sealed container for storage purposes. The
containers may only be opened by the canvassing board as part of the
canvass, or to conduct recounts, or under RCW 29A.60.170(((3))), or by
order of the superior court in a contest or election dispute. If the
canvassing board opens a ballot container, it shall make a full record
of the additional tabulation or examination made of the ballots. This
record must be added to any other record of the canvassing process in
that county.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.60.165 and 2006 c 209 s 4 and 2006 c 208 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) If the voter neglects to sign the ((outside envelope of)) oath
on an absentee or provisional ballot envelope, signs the oath with a
mark and fails to have two witnesses attest to the signature, or signs
the ballot envelope but the signature on the envelope does not match
the signature on the voter registration record, the auditor shall
notify the voter by first class mail ((and advise the voter)) of the
correct procedures for ((completing the unsigned affidavit)) curing the
signature. If ((the)) such an absentee ballot is not received within
three business days of the final meeting of the canvassing board, or
the voter has been notified by first class mail and has not responded
by at least three business days before the final meeting of the
canvassing board, ((then)) the auditor shall attempt to notify the
voter by telephone, using information in the voter registration record
((information)).
((In order for the ballot to be counted)) (2) If the voter neglects
to sign the oath on an absentee or provisional ballot envelope, or
signs the oath with a mark and fails to have two witnesses attest to
the signature, the voter must either:
(a) Appear in person and sign the envelope no later than the day
before ((the)) certification of the primary or election; or
(b) Sign a copy of the envelope provided by the auditor, and return
it to the auditor no later than the day before ((the)) certification of
the primary or election.
(((2)(a) If the handwriting of the signature on an absentee or
provisional ballot envelope is not the same as the handwriting of the
signature on the registration file, the auditor shall notify the voter
by first class mail, enclosing a copy of the envelope affidavit, and
advise the voter of the correct procedures for updating his or her
signature on the voter registration file. If the absentee or
provisional ballot is received within three business days of the final
meeting of the canvassing board, or the voter has been notified by
first class mail and has not responded at least three business days
before the final meeting of the canvassing board, then the auditor
shall attempt to notify the voter by telephone, using the voter
registration record information. In order for the ballot to be
counted)) (3) If the signature on the oath of an absentee or
provisional ballot envelope does not match the signature on the voter
registration record, the voter must ((either)):
(((i)))(a) Appear in person and sign a new registration form no
later than the day before ((the)) certification of the primary or
election. The updated signature provided on the new registration form
becomes the signature on the voter registration record for the current
election and future elections; ((or
(ii))) (b) Sign a copy of the affidavit provided by the auditor and
((return it to the auditor no later than the day before the
certification of the primary or election. The voter may enclose with
the affidavit)) provide a photocopy of a valid government or tribal
issued identification document that includes the voter's current
signature. ((If)) The signatures on ((the copy of)) the affidavit
((does not match the signature on file or the signature on the copy
of)), the identification ((document, the voter must appear in person
and sign a new registration form)), and the ballot envelope must all
match. The voter must return the signed affidavit and the
identification to the auditor no later than the day before ((the))
certification of the primary or election ((in order for the ballot to
be counted)). The county auditor may also send the voter a new
registration form to update the signature on the voter registration
record for future elections; or
(c) Sign a copy of the affidavit provided by the auditor in front
of two witnesses who are registered voters and who attest to the
signature. The signature on the affidavit must match the signature on
the ballot envelope. The voter must return the signed affidavit to the
auditor no later than the day before certification of the primary or
election. The county auditor may also send the voter a new
registration form to update the signature on the voter registration
record for future elections.
(((b))) (4) If the signature on an absentee or provisional ballot
envelope is not the same as the signature on the registration ((file))
record because the name is different, the ballot may be counted as long
as the handwriting is clearly the same. The auditor shall send the
voter a change-of-name form under RCW 29A.08.440 and direct the voter
to complete the form. (((c))) If the signature on an absentee or
provisional ballot envelope is not the same as the signature on the
registration ((file)) record because the voter used initials or a
common nickname, the ballot may be counted as long as the surname and
handwriting are clearly the same.
(((3))) (5) A voter may not cure a missing or mismatched signature
for purposes of counting the ballot in a recount.
(((4))) (6) A record must be kept of all ballots with missing and
mismatched signatures. The record must contain the date on which the
voter was contacted or the notice was mailed, as well as the date on
which the voter signed the envelope, a copy of the envelope, a new
registration form, or a change-of-name form. That record is a public
record under chapter 42.56 RCW and may be disclosed to interested
parties on written request.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2006 c 344 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by subsection (3) of this section, fifteen
days after a primary or special election and twenty-one days after a
general election, the county canvassing board shall complete the
canvass and certify the results. Each absentee ballot that was
returned before the closing of the polls, and each absentee ballot
bearing a postmark on or before the date of the primary or election and
received on or before the date on which the primary or election is
certified, must be included in the canvass report. If a service voter
or overseas voter returned an absentee ballot by electronic
transmission, the original documents need not be received on or before
the date on which the primary or election is certified in order to be
included in the canvass report.
(2) At the request of a caucus of the state legislature, the county
auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and
legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house of representatives.
(3) On or before the thirtieth day after an election conducted
under the instant runoff voting method for the pilot project authorized
by RCW 29A.53.020, the canvassing board shall complete the canvass and
certify the results.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2006 c 344 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Fifteen days after a primary or special election and twenty-one
days after a general election, the county canvassing board shall
complete the canvass and certify the results. Each absentee ballot
that was returned before the closing of the polls, and each absentee
ballot bearing a postmark on or before the date of the primary or
election and received on or before the date on which the primary or
election is certified, must be included in the canvass report. If a
service voter or overseas voter returned an absentee ballot by
electronic transmission, the original documents need not be received on
or before the date on which the primary or election is certified in
order to be included in the canvass report.
(2) At the request of a caucus of the state legislature, the county
auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and
legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 7 of this act expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 8 of this act takes effect July 1,
2013.

--- END ---