BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who has a valid Washington state driver's license or
state identification card may submit a voter registration application
electronically on the secretary of state's web site.
(2) The applicant must attest to the truth of the information
provided on the application by affirmatively accepting the information
as true.
(3) The applicant must affirmatively assent to use of his or her
driver's license or state identification card signature for voter
registration purposes.
(4) A voter registration application submitted electronically is
otherwise considered a registration by mail.
(5) For each electronic application, the secretary of state must
obtain a digital copy of the applicant's driver's license or state
identification card signature from the department of licensing.
(6) The secretary of state may employ additional security measures
to ensure the accuracy and integrity of voter registration applications
submitted electronically.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---