BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.32.010 and 2003 c 111 s 801 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall((, whenever at least one statewide
measure or office is scheduled to appear on the general election
ballot,)) print and distribute a voters' pamphlet each even-numbered
year primary and every general election.
The secretary of state shall distribute the voters' pamphlet to
each household in the state, to public libraries, and to any other
locations he or she deems appropriate. The secretary of state shall
also produce taped or Braille transcripts of the voters' pamphlet,
publicize their availability, and mail without charge a copy to any
person who requests one.
The secretary of state may make the material required to be
distributed by this chapter available to the public in electronic form.
The secretary of state may provide the material in electronic form to
computer bulletin boards, print and broadcast news media, community
computer networks, and similar services at the cost of reproduction or
transmission of the data.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.32.036 and 2004 c 271 s 122 are each amended to
read as follows:
((If)) The secretary of state ((prints and distributes a)) voters'
pamphlet for a primary in an even-numbered year((, it)) must contain:
(1) A description of the office of precinct committee officer and
its duties;
(2) An explanation that, for partisan offices, only voters who
choose to affiliate with a major political party may vote in that
party's primary election, and that voters must limit their
participation in a partisan primary to one political party; and
(3) An explanation that minor political party candidates and
independent candidates will appear only on the general election ballot.

--- END ---