BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.03 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter applies to the financial analysis and examination of
insurers and other regulated entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be known and
cited as the market conduct oversight law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PURPOSE AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT. (1) The
purpose of this chapter is to establish a framework for the
commissioner's market conduct actions, including:
(a) Processes and systems for identifying, assessing, and
prioritizing market conduct problems that have a substantial adverse
impact on consumers, policyholders, and claimants;
(b) Market conduct actions by the commissioner to substantiate such
market conduct problems and a means to remedy significant market
conduct problems; and
(c) Procedures to communicate and coordinate market conduct actions
among state insurance regulators to foster the most efficient and
effective use of resources.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the market analysis or
market conduct process utilize available technology in the least
intrusive and most cost-efficient manner to develop a baseline
understanding of the market place and to identify insurers or practices
that deviate significantly from the norm or that pose a potential risk
to the insurance consumer. It is also the intent of the legislature
that this process include discretion for the commissioner to use market
conduct examinations when the continuum of available market conduct
actions have not sufficiently addressed issues concerning insurer
activities in Washington, or when the continuum of available market
conduct actions are not reasonably expected to address issues
concerning insurer activities in Washington.
(3) It is further the intent of the legislature that the
commissioner work with the national association of insurance
commissioners toward development of an accreditation process for market
conduct oversight and an effective process for domestic deference that
creates protections for Washington consumers and efficient and
effective regulation of the industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 SCOPE. This chapter applies to all entities
regulated by this title, and to all persons or entities acting as or
holding themselves out as insurers in this state, unless otherwise
exempted from the provisions of this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Best practices organization" means insurance marketplace
standards association or a similar generally recognized organization
whose purpose and central mission is the promotion of high ethical
standards in the insurance marketplace.
(2) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of this state.
(3) "Complaint" means a written or documented oral communication
primarily expressing a grievance, meaning an expression of
dissatisfaction.
(4) "Insurer" means every person engaged in the business of making
contracts of insurance and includes every such entity regardless of
name which is regulated by this title. For purposes of this chapter,
health care service contractors defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, health
maintenance organizations defined in chapter 48.46 RCW, fraternal
benefit societies defined in chapter 48.36A RCW, and self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangements defined in chapter 48.125 RCW
are defined as insurers.
(5) "Market analysis" means a process whereby market conduct
oversight personnel collect and analyze information from filed
schedules, surveys, required reports, and other sources in order to
develop a baseline understanding of the marketplace and to identify
patterns or practices of insurers that deviate significantly from the
norm or that may pose a potential risk to the insurance consumer.
(6) "Market conduct action" means any of the full range of
activities that the commissioner may initiate to assess and address the
market conduct practices of insurers admitted to do business in this
state, and entities operating illegally in this state, beginning with
market analysis and extending to examinations. The commissioner's
activities to resolve an individual consumer complaint or other report
of a specific instance of misconduct are not market conduct actions for
purposes of this chapter.
(7) "Market conduct oversight personnel" means those individuals
employed or contracted by the commissioner to collect, analyze, review,
or act on information on the insurance marketplace that identifies
patterns or practices of insurers.
(8) "National association of insurance commissioners" (NAIC) has
the same meaning as in RCW 48.02.140.
(9) "NAIC market regulation handbook" means the outline of the
elements and objectives of market analysis developed and adopted by the
NAIC, and the process by which states can establish and implement
market analysis programs, and the set of guidelines developed and
adopted by the NAIC that document established practices to be used by
market conduct oversight personnel in developing and executing an
examination, or a successor product.
(10) "NAIC market conduct uniform examination procedures" means the
set of guidelines developed and adopted by the NAIC designed to be used
by market conduct oversight personnel in conducting an examination, or
a successor product.
(11) "NAIC standard data request" means the set of field names and
descriptions developed and adopted by the NAIC for use by market
conduct oversight personnel in market analysis, market conduct
examination, or other market conduct actions, or a successor product.
(12) "Qualified contract examiner" means a person under contract to
the commissioner, who is qualified by education, experience, and, where
applicable, professional designations, to perform market conduct
actions.
(13)(a) "Market conduct examination" means the examination of the
insurance operations of an insurer licensed to do business in this
state and entities operating illegally in this state, in order to
evaluate compliance with the applicable laws and regulations of this
state. A market conduct examination may be either a comprehensive
examination or a targeted examination. A market conduct examination is
separate and distinct from a financial examination of any insurer
performed pursuant to chapter 48.03, 48.44, or 48.46 RCW, but may be
conducted at the same time.
(b) "Comprehensive market conduct examination" means a review of
one or more lines of business of an insurer. The term includes a
review of rating, tier classification, underwriting, policyholder
service, claims, marketing and sales, producer licensing, complaint
handling practices, or compliance procedures and policies.
(c) "Targeted examination" means a focused examination conducted
for cause, based on the results of market analysis indicating the need
to review either a specific line or lines of business, or specific
business practices, including but not limited to: (i) Underwriting and
rating; (ii) marketing and sales; (iii) complaint handling; (iv)
operations and management; (v) advertising; (vi) licensing; (vii)
policyholder services; (viii) nonforfeitures; (ix) claims handling; and
(x) policy forms and filings. A targeted examination may be conducted
by desk examination or by an on-site examination.
(d) "Desk examination" means an examination that is conducted by an
examiner at a location other than the insurer's premises. A desk
examination is usually performed at the commissioner's offices with the
insurer providing requested documents by hard copy, microfiche, discs,
or other electronic media, for review.
(e) "On-site examination" means an examination conducted at the
insurer's home office or the location where the records under review
are stored.
(14) "Third-party model or product" means a model or product
provided by an entity separate from and not under direct or indirect
corporate control of the insurer using the model or product.
(15) "Insurance compliance self-evaluative audit" means a
voluntary, internal evaluation, review, assessment, audit, or
investigation for the purpose of identifying or preventing
noncompliance with, or promoting compliance with laws, regulations,
orders, or industry or professional standards, which is conducted by or
on behalf of a company licensed or regulated under the insurance laws
of this state, or which involves an activity regulated under this
title.
(16) "Insurance compliance self-evaluative audit document" means
documents prepared as a result of or in connection with an insurance
compliance self-evaluative audit. An insurance compliance self-evaluative audit document may include:
(a) A written response to the findings of an insurance compliance
self-evaluative audit;
(b) Any supporting information that is collected or developed for
the primary purpose and in the course of an insurance compliance self-evaluative audit, including but not limited to field notes and records
of observations, findings, opinions, suggestions, conclusions, drafts,
memoranda, drawings, photographs, exhibits, computer generated or
electronically recorded information, phone records, maps, charts,
graphs, and surveys;
(c) Any of the following:
(i) An insurance compliance self-evaluative audit report prepared
by an auditor, who may be an employee of the company or an independent
contractor, which may include the scope of the audit, the information
gained in the audit, conclusions, and recommendations, with exhibits
and appendices;
(ii) Memoranda and documents analyzing portions or all of the
insurance compliance self-evaluative audit report and discussing
potential implementation issues;
(iii) An implementation plan that addresses correcting past
noncompliance, improving current compliance, and preventing future
noncompliance; or
(iv) Analytic data generated in the course of conducting the
insurance compliance self-evaluative audit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 MARKET ANALYSIS PROCEDURES. (1)(a) The
commissioner shall collect and report market data information
to the NAIC's market information systems, including the complaint data
base system, the examination tracking system, the regulatory retrieval
system, other successor systems, or to additional systems as the
commissioner determines is necessary for market analysis.
(b) Market data and information that is collected and maintained by
the commissioner shall be compiled and submitted in a manner that meets
the requirements of the NAIC and its systems.
(2)(a) Each entity subject to the provisions of this chapter shall
file a market conduct annual statement or successor product, in the
general form and context, in the time frame required by, and according
to instructions provided by the NAIC, for each line of business written
in the state of Washington. If a particular line of business does not
have an approved market conduct annual statement form, the company is
not required to file a report for that line of business until such time
as NAIC adopts an annual statement form for that line of business.
(b) The commissioner may, for good cause, grant an extension of
time for filing a market conduct annual statement, if written
application for extension is received at least five business days
before the filing due date. Any insurer that fails to file its market
conduct annual statement when due or by the end of any extension of
time for filing, which the commissioner in his or her sole discretion
may have granted, is subject to the penalty and enforcement provisions
applicable to the insurer as found in the Washington insurance code.
(3)(a) The commissioner shall gather information from data
currently available to the commissioner, surveys, required reports,
information collected by the NAIC, other sources in both the public or
private sectors, and information from within and outside the insurance
industry. The commissioner may request insurers to submit data and
information that is necessary to conduct market analysis and shall
adopt rules that provide for access to records and compliance with the
request, that do not cause undue burden or cost to the consumer or
insurer.
(b) The information shall be analyzed in order to develop a
baseline understanding of the marketplace and to identify for further
review insurers or practices that deviate significantly from the norm
or that may pose a potential risk to the insurance consumer. The
commissioner shall use the NAIC market regulation handbook as one
resource in performing this analysis.
(c) The commissioner shall adopt by rule a process for verification
by an insurer of Washington state-specific complaint information
concerning that insurer before using the complaint information for
market conduct surveillance purposes or transmitting it to NAIC data
bases after July 1, 2007.
(4)(a) If the commissioner determines, as a result of market
analysis, that further inquiry into a particular insurer or practice is
needed, the following continuum of market actions may be considered
before conducting a market conduct examination. The commissioner shall
not be required to follow the exact sequence of market conduct actions
in the continuum or to use all actions in the continuum. As part of
the chosen continuum action, the commissioner must discuss with the
insurer the data used to choose the option and provide the insurer with
an opportunity for data verification at that time. These actions may
include, but are not limited to:
(i) Correspondence with the insurer;
(ii) Insurer interviews;
(iii) Information gathering;
(iv) Policy and procedure reviews;
(v) Interrogatories;
(vi) Review of insurer self-evaluation and compliance programs.
This may include consideration of the insurer's membership in a best
practices organization, if the commissioner is satisfied that the
organization's qualification process is likely to provide reasonable
assurance of compliance with pertinent insurance laws;
(vii) Desk examinations; and
(viii) Investigations.
(b) Except in extraordinary circumstances, the commissioner shall
select the least intrusive and most cost-effective market conduct
action that the commissioner determines will provide the necessary
protections for consumers.
(5) The commissioner shall take those steps reasonably necessary to
eliminate duplicative inquiries. The commissioner shall not request
insurers to submit data or information provided as part of an insurer's
annual financial statement, the annual market conduct statement of the
NAIC, or other required schedules, surveys, or reports that are
regularly submitted to the commissioner, or with data requests made by
other states if that information is available to the commissioner,
unless the information is state specific. The commissioner shall
coordinate market conduct actions and findings with other state
insurance regulators.
(6) For purposes of conducting an examination or other market
conduct action on an insurer, the commissioner may examine or conduct
a market conduct action on any managing general agent or other person,
insofar as that examination or market conduct action is, in the sole
discretion of the commissioner, necessary or material to the
examination or market conduct action of the insurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 PROTOCOLS FOR MARKET CONDUCT ACTIONS. (1)
Market conduct actions shall be taken as a result of market analysis
and shall focus on the general business practices and compliance
activities of insurers, rather than identifying obviously infrequent or
unintentional random errors that do not cause significant consumer
harm.
(2)(a) The commissioner is authorized to determine the frequency
and timing of such market conduct actions. The timing shall depend
upon the specific market conduct action to be initiated, unless
extraordinary circumstances indicating a risk to consumers require
immediate action.
(b) If the commissioner has information that more than one insurer
is engaged in common practices that may violate statutes or rules, the
commissioner may schedule and coordinate multiple examinations
simultaneously.
(3) The insurer shall be given reasonable opportunity to resolve
matters that arise as a result of a market analysis to the satisfaction
of the commissioner before any additional market conduct actions are
taken against the insurer.
(4) The commissioner shall adopt by rule, under chapter 34.05 RCW,
procedures and documents that are substantially similar to the NAIC
work products defined or referenced in this chapter. Market analysis,
market conduct actions, and market conduct examinations shall be
performed in accordance with the rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 MARKET CONDUCT EXAMINATIONS. (1) When the
commissioner determines that other market conduct actions identified in
section 6(4)(a) of this act have not sufficiently addressed issues
raised concerning company activities in Washington state, the
commissioner has the discretion to conduct market conduct examinations
in accordance with the NAIC market conduct uniform examination
procedures and the NAIC market regulation handbook.
(2)(a) In lieu of an examination of an insurer licensed in this
state, the commissioner shall accept an examination report of another
state, unless the commissioner determines that the other state does not
have laws substantially similar to those of this state, or does not
have a market oversight system that is comparable to the market conduct
oversight system set forth in this law.
(b) The commissioner's determination under (a) of this subsection
is discretionary with the commissioner and is not subject to appeal.
(c) If the insurer to be examined is part of an insurance holding
company system, the commissioner may also seek to simultaneously
examine any affiliates of the insurer under common control and
management which are licensed to write the same lines of business in
this state.
(3) Before commencement of a market conduct examination, market
conduct oversight personnel shall prepare a work plan consisting of the
following:
(a) The name and address of the insurer being examined;
(b) The name and contact information of the examiner-in-charge;
(c) The name of all market conduct oversight personnel initially
assigned to the market conduct examination;
(d) The justification for the examination;
(e) The scope of the examination;
(f) The date the examination is scheduled to begin;
(g) Notice of any noninsurance department personnel who will assist
in the examination;
(h) A time estimate for the examination;
(i) A budget for the examination if the cost of the examination is
billed to the insurer; and
(j) An identification of factors that will be included in the
billing if the cost of the examination is billed to the insurer.
(4)(a) Within ten days of the receipt of the information contained
in subsection (3) of this section, insurers may request the
commissioner's discretionary review of any alleged conflict of
interest, pursuant to section 11(2) of this act, of market conduct
oversight personnel and noninsurance department personnel assigned to
a market conduct examination. The request for review shall
specifically describe the alleged conflict of interest in the proposed
assignment of any person to the examination.
(b) Within five business days of receiving a request for
discretionary review of any alleged conflict of interest in the
proposed assignment of any person to a market conduct examination, the
commissioner or designee shall notify the insurer of any action
regarding the assignment of personnel to a market conduct examination
based on the insurer's allegation of conflict of interest.
(5) Market conduct examinations shall, to the extent feasible, use
desk examinations and data requests before an on-site examination.
(6) Market conduct examinations shall be conducted in accordance
with the provisions set forth in the NAIC market regulation handbook
and the NAIC market conduct uniform examinations procedures, subject to
the precedence of the provisions of this act.
(7) The commissioner shall use the NAIC standard data request.
(8) Announcement of the examination shall be sent to the insurer
and posted on the NAIC's examination tracking system as soon as
possible but in no case later than sixty days before the estimated
commencement of the examination, except where the exam is conducted in
response to extraordinary circumstances as described in section 7(2)(a)
of this act. The announcement sent to the insurer shall contain the
examination work plan and a request for the insurer to name its
examination coordinator.
(9) If an examination is expanded significantly beyond the original
reasons provided to the insurer in the notice of the examination
required by subsection (3) of this section, the commissioner shall
provide written notice to the insurer, explaining the expansion and
reasons for the expansion. The commissioner shall provide a revised
work plan if the expansion results in significant changes to the items
presented in the original work plan required by subsection (3) of this
section.
(10) The commissioner shall conduct a preexamination conference
with the insurer examination coordinator and key personnel to clarify
expectations at least thirty days before commencement of the
examination, unless otherwise agreed by the insurer and the
commissioner.
(11) Before the conclusion of the field work for market conduct
examination, the examiner-in-charge shall review examination findings
to date with insurer personnel and schedule an exit conference with the
insurer, in accordance with procedures in the NAIC market regulation
handbook.
(12)(a) No later than sixty days after completion of each market
conduct examination, the commissioner shall make a full written report
of each market conduct examination containing only facts ascertained
from the accounts, records, and documents examined and from the sworn
testimony of individuals, and such conclusions and recommendations as
may reasonably be warranted from such facts.
(b) The report shall be certified by the commissioner or by the
examiner-in-charge of the examination, and shall be filed in the
commissioner's office subject to (c) of this subsection.
(c) The commissioner shall furnish a copy of the market conduct
examination report to the person examined not less than ten days and,
unless the time is extended by the commissioner, not more than thirty
days prior to the filing of the report for public inspection in the
commissioner's office. If the person so requests in writing within
such period, the commissioner shall hold a hearing to consider
objections of such person to the report as proposed, and shall not so
file the report until after such hearing and until after any
modifications in the report deemed necessary by the commissioner have
been made.
(d) Within thirty days of the end of the period described in (c) of
this subsection, unless extended by order of the commissioner, the
commissioner shall consider the report, together with any written
submissions or rebuttals and any relevant portions of the examiner's
work papers and enter an order:
(i) Adopting the market conduct examination report as filed or with
modification or corrections. If the market conduct examination report
reveals that the company is operating in violation of any law, rule, or
order of the commissioner, the commissioner may order the company to
take any action the commissioner considers necessary and appropriate to
cure that violation;
(ii) Rejecting the market conduct examination report with
directions to the examiners to reopen the examination for purposes of
obtaining additional data, documentation, or information, and refiling
under this subsection; or
(iii) Calling for an investigatory hearing with no less than twenty
days' notice to the company for purposes of obtaining additional
documentation, data, information, and testimony.
(e) All orders entered under (d) of this subsection must be
accompanied by findings and conclusions resulting from the
commissioner's consideration and review of the market conduct
examination report, relevant examiner work papers, and any written
submissions or rebuttals. The order is considered a final
administrative decision and may be appealed under the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and must be served upon the company
by certified mail, together with a copy of the adopted examination
report. A copy of the adopted examination report must be sent by
certified mail to each director at the director's residential address.
(f)(i) Upon the adoption of the market conduct examination report
under (d) of this subsection, the commissioner shall continue to hold
the content of the examination report as private and confidential
information for a period of five days except that the order may be
disclosed to the person examined. Thereafter, the commissioner may
open the report for public inspection so long as no court of competent
jurisdiction has stayed its publication.
(ii) If the commissioner determines that regulatory action is
appropriate as a result of any market conduct examination, he or she
may initiate any proceedings or actions as provided by law.
(iii) Nothing contained in this subsection requires the
commissioner to disclose any information or records that would indicate
or show the existence or content of any investigation or activity of a
criminal justice agency.
(g) The insurer's response shall be included in the commissioner's
order adopting the final report as an exhibit to the order. The
insurer is not obligated to submit a response.
(13) The commissioner may withhold from public inspection any
examination or investigation report for so long as he or she deems it
advisable.
(14)(a) Market conduct examinations within this state of any
insurer domiciled or having its home offices in this state, other than
a title insurer, made by the commissioner or the commissioner's
examiners and employees shall, except as to fees, mileage, and expense
incurred as to witnesses, be at the expense of the state.
(b) Every other examination, whatsoever, or any part of the market
conduct examination of any person domiciled or having its home offices
in this state requiring travel and services outside this state, shall
be made by the commissioner or by examiners designated by the
commissioner and shall be at the expense of the person examined; but a
domestic insurer shall not be liable for the compensation of examiners
employed by the commissioner for such services outside this state.
(c) When making a market conduct examination under this chapter,
the commissioner may contract, in accordance with applicable state
contracting procedures, for qualified attorneys, appraisers,
independent certified public accountants, contract actuaries, and other
similar individuals who are independently practicing their professions,
even though those persons may from time to time be similarly employed
or retained by persons subject to examination under this chapter, as
examiners as the commissioner deems necessary for the efficient conduct
of a particular examination. The compensation and per diem allowances
paid to such contract persons shall be reasonable in the market and
time incurred, shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the
compensation and per diem allowances for examiners set forth in the
guidelines adopted by the national association of insurance
commissioners, unless the commissioner demonstrates that one hundred
twenty-five percent is inadequate under the circumstances of the
examination, and subject to the provisions of (a) of this subsection.
(d)(i) The person examined and liable shall reimburse the state
upon presentation of an itemized statement thereof, for the actual
travel expenses of the commissioner's examiners, their reasonable
living expenses allowance, and their per diem compensation, including
salary and the employer's cost of employee benefits, at a reasonable
rate approved by the commissioner, incurred on account of the
examination. Per diem, salary, and expenses for employees examining
insurers domiciled outside the state of Washington shall be established
by the commissioner on the basis of the national association of
insurance commissioner's recommended salary and expense schedule for
zone examiners, or the salary schedule established by the director of
the Washington department of personnel and the expense schedule
established by the office of financial management, whichever is higher.
A domestic title insurer shall pay the examination expense and costs to
the commissioner as itemized and billed by the commissioner.
(ii) The commissioner or the commissioner's examiners shall not
receive or accept any additional emolument on account of any
examination.
(iii) Market conduct examination fees subject to being reimbursed
by an insurer shall be itemized and bills shall be provided to the
insurer on a monthly basis for review prior to submission for payment,
or as otherwise provided by state law.
(e) Nothing contained in this chapter limits the commissioner's
authority to terminate or suspend any examination in order to pursue
other legal or regulatory action under the insurance laws of this
state. Findings of fact and conclusions made pursuant to any
examination are prima facie evidence in any legal or regulatory action.
(f) The commissioner shall maintain active management and oversight
of market conduct examination costs, including costs associated with
the commissioner's own examiners, and with retaining qualified contract
examiners necessary to perform an examination. Any agreement with a
contract examiner shall:
(i) Clearly identify the types of functions to be subject to
outsourcing;
(ii) Provide specific timelines for completion of the outsourced
review;
(iii) Require disclosure to the insurer of contract examiners'
recommendations;
(iv) Establish and use a dispute resolution or arbitration
mechanism to resolve conflicts with insurers regarding examination
fees; and
(v) Require disclosure of the terms of the contracts with the
outside consultants that will be used, specifically the fees and/or
hourly rates that can be charged.
(g) The commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, shall review
and affirmatively endorse detailed billings from the qualified contract
examiner before the detailed billings are sent to the insurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 ACCESS TO RECORDS AND INFORMATION. (1)
Except as otherwise provided by law, market conduct oversight personnel
shall have free, convenient, and full access to all books, records,
employees, officers, and directors, as practicable, of the insurer
during regular business hours.
(2) An insurer using a third-party model or product for any of the
activities under examination shall cause, upon the request of market
conduct oversight personnel, the details of such models or products to
be made available to such personnel.
(3) Each officer, director, employee, and agent of an insurer shall
facilitate and aid in a market conduct action or examination.
(4) No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of
confidentiality in the documents, materials, or information shall occur
as a result of disclosure to the commissioner, any employee of the
office of the insurance commissioner, or any agent retained by the
office of the insurance commissioner to assist in the market conduct
examination under this chapter.
(5)(a) The commissioner may take depositions, subpoena witnesses or
documentary evidence, administer oaths, and examine under oath any
individual relative to the affairs of any person being examined, or
relative to the subject of any hearing or investigation: PROVIDED,
That the provisions of RCW 34.05.446 shall apply in lieu of the
provisions of this section as to subpoenas relative to hearings in
rule-making and adjudicative proceedings.
(b) The subpoena shall be effective if served within the state of
Washington and shall be served in the same manner as if issued from a
court of record.
(c) Witness fees and mileage, if claimed, shall be allowed the same
as for testimony in a court of record. Witness fees, mileage, and the
actual expenses necessarily incurred in securing attendance of
witnesses and their testimony shall be itemized, and shall be paid by
the person as to whom the examination is being made, or by the person
if other than the commissioner, at whose request the hearing is held.
(d) Enforcement of subpoenas shall be in accordance with RCW
34.05.588.
(6) In order to assist in the performance of the commissioner's
duties, the commissioner may:
(a) Share documents, materials, market conduct examination reports,
preliminary market conduct examination reports, and other matters
related to such reports, or other information, including the
confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information
subject to subsection (1) of this section, with other state, federal,
and international regulatory agencies and law enforcement authorities,
and the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries, provided that the
recipient agrees to and asserts that it has the legal authority to
maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the document,
material, communication, or other information;
(b) Receive documents, materials, communications, or information,
including otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials,
or information, from the NAIC and its affiliates or subsidiaries, and
from regulatory and law enforcement officials of other foreign or
domestic jurisdictions, and shall maintain as confidential or
privileged any document, material, or information received with notice
or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the
laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material,
or information; and
(c) Enter into agreements governing the sharing and use of
information consistent with this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 CONFIDENTIALITY. (1) All data and
documents, including but not limited to working papers, third-party
models or products, complaint logs, and copies thereof, created,
produced, or obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner, the
commissioner's authorized representative, or an examiner appointed by
the commissioner in the course of any market conduct actions or
examinations made under this chapter, or in the course of market
analysis by the commissioner of the market conditions of an insurer, or
obtained by the NAIC as a result of any of the provisions of this
chapter, to the extent the documents are in the possession of the
commissioner or the NAIC, shall be confidential by law and privileged,
shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW, shall not
be subject to subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery or
admissible in evidence in any private civil action.
(2) If the commissioner elects to issue a report of an examination,
a preliminary or draft market conduct examination report is
confidential and not subject to disclosure by the commissioner nor is
it subject to subpoena or discovery. This subsection does not limit
the commissioner's authority to use a preliminary or draft market
conduct examination report and related information in furtherance of
any legal or regulatory action, or to release it in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 48.02.065.
(3) An insurance compliance self-evaluative audit document in the
possession of the commissioner is confidential by law and privileged,
and shall not be:
(a) Made public by the commissioner;
(b) Subject to the provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW;
(c) Subject to subpoena; and
(d) Subject to discovery and admissible in evidence in any private
civil action.
(4) Neither the disclosure of any self-evaluative audit document to
the commissioner or to the commissioner's designee nor the citation to
this document in connection with an agency action shall constitute a
waiver of any privilege that may otherwise apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 MARKET CONDUCT OVERSIGHT PERSONNEL. (1)
Market conduct oversight personnel shall be qualified by education,
experience, and, where applicable, professional designations. The
commissioner may supplement the in-house market conduct oversight staff
with qualified outside professional assistance if the commissioner
determines that the assistance is necessary.
(2) Market conduct oversight personnel have a conflict of interest,
either directly or indirectly, if they are affiliated with the
management of, and have, within five years of any market conduct
action, been employed by, or own a pecuniary interest in the insurer,
subject to any examination under this chapter. This section shall not
be construed to automatically preclude an individual from being:
(a) A policyholder or claimant under an insurance policy;
(b) A grantor of a mortgage or similar instrument on the
individual's residence from a regulated entity, if done under customary
terms and in the ordinary course of business;
(c) An investment owner in shares of regulated diversified
investment companies; or
(d) A settlor or beneficiary of a "blind trust" into which any
otherwise impermissible holdings have been placed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 IMMUNITY FOR MARKET CONDUCT OVERSIGHT
PERSONNEL. (1) No cause of action shall arise, nor shall any liability
be imposed against the commissioner, the commissioner's authorized
representatives, market conduct oversight personnel, or an examiner
appointed by the commissioner for any statements made, or conduct
performed in good faith while carrying out the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) No cause of action shall arise, nor shall any liability be
imposed against any person for the act of communicating or delivering
information or data to the commissioner or the commissioner's
authorized representative, market conduct oversight personnel, or
examiner, under an examination made under this chapter, if the act of
communication or delivery was performed in good faith and without
fraudulent intent or the intent to deceive.
(3) A person identified in subsection (1) of this section is
entitled to an award of attorneys' fees and costs if he or she is the
prevailing party in a civil cause of action for libel, slander, or any
other relevant tort arising out of activities in carrying out the
provisions of this chapter, and the party bringing the action was not
substantially justified in doing so. For purposes of this section, a
proceeding is "substantially justified" if it had a reasonable basis in
law or fact at the time that it was initiated.
(4) If a claim is made or threatened as described in subsection (1)
of this section, the commissioner shall provide or pay for the defense
of himself or herself, the examiner or representative, and shall pay a
judgment or settlement, until it is determined that the person did not
act in good faith or did act with fraudulent intent or the intent to
deceive.
(5) The immunity, indemnification, and other protections under this
section are in addition to those now or hereafter existing under other
law.
(6) This section does not abrogate or modify in any way any common
law or statutory privilege or immunity, now or hereafter existing under
this section or other law, enjoyed by any person identified in
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 FINES AND PENALTIES. (1) Fines and
penalties, applicable to the insurer as found in the Washington
insurance code, levied as a result of a market conduct action or
examination shall be consistent, reasonable, and justified.
(2) The commissioner shall take into consideration actions taken by
insurers to maintain membership in, and comply with the standards of,
best practices organizations, and the extent to which insurers maintain
regulatory compliance programs to self-assess, self-report, and
remediate problems detected, and may include those considerations in
determining the appropriate fines or penalties levied in accordance
with subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Commissioner enforcement actions shall not be based solely on
violations identified in the insurer self-evaluative audit document,
unless the commissioner confirms both that the violations occurred and
that the insurer has not taken reasonable action based on the self-evaluative audit document to resolve and remediate the identified
violations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 DISPUTE RESOLUTION. (1) At any point in
the market analysis, the insurer may request a review and resolution of
issues by identifying the issues either orally or in writing to the
market conduct oversight manager, or deputy insurance commissioner
responsible for market conduct oversight. At each level, a response to
the insurer shall be provided within five business days.
(2) At any point in the market conduct examination, the insurer may
request a review and resolution of issues either orally or in writing
to the market conduct oversight manager, or deputy insurance
commissioner responsible for market conduct oversight. At each level,
a response to the insurer shall be provided within five business days.
This authorization for dispute resolution shall be secondary to the
specific procedures set forth in section 8 of this act.
(3) After the deputy insurance commissioner responsible for market
conduct oversight has responded to an insurer's issues, the insurer may
request mediation of the issues. The insurance commissioner shall
adopt by rule a process to govern mediation of insurer market conduct
oversight issues. That rule shall:
(a) Provide for the selection by the commissioner of a panel of
preapproved mediators;
(b) Require that insurers, upon notice of the start of a market
analysis process or the start of a market conduct examination, identify
from the preapproved list a mediator and an alternative mediator;
(c) Require the party requesting mediation to pay the costs of the
mediator; and
(d) Provide for other rule provisions as are reasonably necessary
for the efficient operation of a mediation process.
(4) At any point in the dispute resolution process contained in
this section, the insurer may commence an adjudicative proceeding under
chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 COORDINATION WITH OTHER STATE INSURANCE
REGULATORS THROUGH THE NAIC. (1) The commissioner shall share
information and coordinate the commissioner's market analysis, market
conduct actions, and examination efforts with other state insurance
regulators. Such matters will be coordinated in accordance with
guidelines adopted by the NAIC.
(2)(a) If a market conduct examination or action performed by
another state insurance regulator results in a finding that an insurer
should modify a specific practice or procedure, the commissioner shall,
in lieu of conducting a market conduct action or examination, accept
verification that the insurer made a similar modification in this
state, unless the commissioner determines that the other state does not
have laws substantially similar to those of this state, or does not
have a market conduct oversight system that is comparable to the market
conduct oversight system set forth in this chapter.
(b) The commissioner's determination under (a) of this subsection
is discretionary with the commissioner and is not subject to appeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 ADDITIONAL DUTIES OF THE COMMISSIONER. (1)
The commissioner shall designate a specific person or persons within
the commissioner's office whose responsibilities shall include the
receipt of information from employees of insurers and licensed entities
concerning violations of laws or rules by their employers, as defined
in this chapter. These persons shall be provided with proper training
on the handling of such information. The information shall be
confidential and not open to public inspection.
(2) At least once per year, or more frequently if deemed necessary,
the commissioner shall make available in an appropriate manner to
insurers and other entities subject to the scope of this title,
information on new laws and regulations, enforcement actions, and other
information the commissioner deems pertinent to ensure compliance with
market conduct requirements.

Sec. 17 RCW 42.56.400 and 2006 c 284 s 17 and 2006 c 8 s 210 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following information relating to insurance and financial
institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals
that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed
with the board under RCW 7.68.110;
(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW;
(3) The names and individual identification data of all viators
regulated by the insurance commissioner under chapter 48.102 RCW;
(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;
(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535,
48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600
through 48.46.625;
(6) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(7) Examination reports and information obtained by the department
of financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers
and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and
investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential
and privileged information;
(8) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW
48.110.040(3);
(9) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and
privileged;
(10) Confidential proprietary and trade secret information provided
to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050 and
48.31C.070;
(11) ((Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and
7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal
the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility,
insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a
collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).
(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(6).
(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(7).
(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).
(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);
and
(12))) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the
insurance commissioner under ((RCW 48.135.060)) section 8 of this act;
(12) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or produced by
the insurance commissioner and identified in section 10 of this act;
and
(13) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under section 16 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 2 through 16 and 18 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---