BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.20.111 and 2004 c 271 s 188 are each amended to
read as follows:
((A "convention" for the purposes of this chapter, is an organized
assemblage of registered voters representing an independent candidate
or candidates or a new or minor political party, organization, or
principle.)) As used in this chapter, ((the term)) "((election))
jurisdiction" ((shall)) means the state or any political subdivision or
jurisdiction of the state from which partisan officials are elected.
((This term shall include county commissioner districts or council
districts for members of a county legislative authority,))
"Jurisdiction" includes counties for county officials ((who are
nominated and elected on a county-wide basis)), legislative districts
for members of the legislature, congressional districts for members of
Congress, and the state for president and vice president, members of
the United States senate, and state officials who are elected on a
statewide basis.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.20.121 and 2006 c 344 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any nomination of a candidate for partisan public office by
other than a major political party may be made only((: (a) In a
convention held not earlier than the first Saturday in May and not
later than the second Saturday in May or during any of the seven days
immediately preceding the first day for filing declarations of
candidacy as fixed in accordance with RCW 29A.28.041; (b) as provided
by RCW 29A.60.021; or (c))) by ballot qualifying petition filed no
later than the second Monday in May, or as otherwise provided in this
section. Minor political party and independent candidates may appear
only on the general election ballot.
(2) Nominations of candidates for president and vice president of
the United States other than by a major political party may be made
((either at a convention conducted under subsection (1) of this
section, or at a similar convention taking place not earlier than the
first Saturday in June and not later than the fourth Saturday in July.
Conventions held during this time period may not nominate candidates
for any public office other than president and vice president of the
United States, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section))
by ballot qualifying petition filed no later than the first Monday in
August.
(3) If a special filing period for a partisan office is opened
under RCW 29A.24.211 or 29A.28.041, candidates of minor political
parties and independent candidates may file for office during that
special filing period. The names of those candidates may not appear on
the general election ballot unless they are nominated by ((convention
held)) petition filed no later than ((five)) seven days after the close
of the special filing period ((and a certificate of nomination is filed
with the filing officer no later than three days after the convention.
The requirements of RCW 29A.20.131 do not apply to such a convention)).
(4) Ballot qualifying petitions must be filed with the appropriate
filing officer as provided in RCW 29A.24.070.
(5) A minor political party may ((hold more than one convention but
in no case shall any such party)) not nominate more than one candidate
for any one partisan public office or position. ((For the purpose of
nominating candidates for the offices of president and vice president,
United States senator, United States representative, or a statewide
office, a minor party or independent candidate holding multiple
conventions may add together the number of signatures of different
individuals from each convention obtained in support of the candidate
or candidates in order to obtain the number required by RCW 29A.20.141.
For all other offices for which nominations are made, signatures of the
requisite number of registered voters must be obtained at a single
convention.))

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.20.151 and 2004 c 271 s 112 are each amended to
read as follows:
A ((nominating)) ballot qualifying petition submitted under this
chapter shall ((clearly identify the name of the minor party or
independent candidate convention as it appears on the certificate of
nomination as required by RCW 29A.20.161(3). The petition shall also
contain a statement that the person signing the petition is a
registered voter of the state of Washington and shall have a space for
the voter to sign his or her name and to print his or her name and
address)) include:
(1) The name and residential address of the candidate;
(2) The name of the minor political party or the fact that the
candidate is independent if not affiliated with a political party;
(3) The year and office for which the candidate is nominated;
(4) A statement that each person signing the petition is a
registered voter of the state of Washington and the jurisdiction of the
office;
(5) A space for each voter to sign his or her name and print his or
her name and address;
(6)(a) Valid signatures of at least one thousand registered voters
of the jurisdiction of the office if the nomination is for president
and vice president of the United States, United States senator, or
statewide office;
(b) Valid signatures of at least two hundred fifty registered
voters of the jurisdiction of the office if the nomination is for
United States representative; or
(c) Valid signatures of at least one hundred registered voters of
the jurisdiction of the office if the nomination is for any other
partisan office; and
(7) If the nomination is for president and vice president of the
United States, a sworn statement from both nominees consenting to the
nomination.
No person may sign more than one ((nominating)) ballot qualifying
petition under this chapter for an office for an election.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.20.171 and 2004 c 271 s 155 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If two or more ((valid certificates of nomination)) ballot
qualifying petitions are filed purporting to nominate different
candidates for the same position using the same party name, the filing
officer must give effect to both certificates. If conflicting claims
to the party name are not resolved either by mutual agreement or by a
judicial determination of the right to the name, the candidates must be
treated as independent candidates. Disputes over the right to the name
must not be permitted to delay the printing of either ballots or a
voters' pamphlet. Other candidates nominated by the same
((conventions)) political party may continue to use the partisan
affiliation unless a court of competent jurisdiction directs otherwise.
(2) A person affected may petition the superior court of the county
in which the filing officer is located for a judicial determination of
the right to the name of a minor political party, either before or
after documents are filed with the filing officer. The court shall
resolve the conflict between competing claims to the use of the same
party name according to the following principles: (a) The prior
established public use of the name during previous elections by a party
composed of or led by the same individuals or individuals in documented
succession; (b) prior established public use of the name earlier in the
same election cycle; (c) the nomination of a more complete slate of
candidates for a number of offices or in a number of different regions
of the state; (d) documented affiliation with a national or statewide
party organization with an established use of the name; (e) the first
date of filing of a ((certificate of nomination)) ballot qualifying
petition; and (f) such other indicia of an established right to use of
the name as the court may deem relevant. If more than one filing
officer is involved, and one of them is the secretary of state, the
petition must be filed in the superior court for Thurston county. Upon
resolving the conflict between competing claims, the court may also
address any ballot designation for the candidate who does not prevail.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.20.181 and 2004 c 271 s 156 are each amended to
read as follows:
((A)) Minor political party or independent ((candidate convention
nominating)) candidates for the offices of president and vice president
of the United States, or their designees, shall, not later than ten
days after the ((adjournment of the convention)) filing of ballot
qualifying petitions, submit a list of presidential electors to the
office of the secretary of state. The list shall contain the names and
the mailing addresses of the persons selected ((and shall be verified
by the presiding officer of the convention)).

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.20.191 and 2004 c 271 s 157 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the receipt of the ((certificate of nomination)) ballot
qualifying petitions, the officer with whom it is filed shall check the
((certificate)) petitions and canvass the signatures ((on the
accompanying nominating petitions)) to determine if the requirements of
RCW ((29A.20.141)) 29A.20.151 have been met. Once the determination
has been made, the filing officer shall notify the ((presiding officer
of the convention and any other persons requesting the notification,))
candidate of his or her decision regarding the sufficiency of the
((certificate or the nominating)) ballot qualifying petitions. Any
appeal regarding the filing officer's determination must be filed with
the superior court of the county in which the ((certificate or))
petitions were filed not later than five days from the date the
determination is made, and shall be heard and finally disposed of by
the court within five days of the filing. ((Nominating)) Ballot
qualifying petitions shall not be available for public inspection or
copying.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.20.201 and 2004 c 271 s 113 are each amended to
read as follows:
Not later than the Friday immediately preceding the first day for
candidates to file, the secretary of state shall notify the county
auditors of the names and designations of all minor party and
independent candidates who have filed valid ((convention certificates
and nominating)) ballot qualifying petitions with that office. Except
for the offices of president and vice president, persons nominated
under this chapter shall file declarations of candidacy as provided by
RCW 29A.24.031 and 29A.24.070. The name of a nominated candidate
((nominated at a convention)) shall not be printed upon the general
election ballot unless he or she pays one half of the fee required by
law to be paid by candidates for the same office to be nominated at a
primary.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.24.131 and 2004 c 271 s 115 are each amended to
read as follows:
A candidate may withdraw his or her declaration of candidacy at any
time before the close of business on the Thursday following the last
day for candidates to file under RCW 29A.24.050 by filing, with the
officer with whom the declaration of candidacy was filed, a signed
request that his or her name not be printed on the ballot. There shall
be no withdrawal period for declarations of candidacy filed during
special filing periods held under this title. ((The filing officer may
permit the withdrawal of a filing for the office of precinct committee
officer at the request of the candidate at any time if no absentee
ballots have been issued for that office and the ballots for that
precinct have not been printed.)) The filing officer may permit the
withdrawal of a filing for any elected office of a city, town, or
special district at the request of the candidate at any time before a
primary if the primary ballots for that city, town, or special district
have not been ordered. No filing fee may be refunded to any candidate
who withdraws under this section. Notice of the deadline for
withdrawal of candidacy and that the filing fee is not refundable shall
be given to each candidate at the time he or she files.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.24.320 and 2003 c 111 s 623 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall notify each county auditor of any
declarations filed with the secretary under RCW ((29A.24.310))
29A.24.311 for offices appearing on the ballot in that county. The
county auditor shall ensure that those persons charged with counting
the ballots for a primary or election are notified of all valid write-
in candidates before the tabulation of those ballots.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.28.041 and 2006 c 344 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the United States house of
representatives or the United States senate from this state, the
governor shall order a special election to fill the vacancy. Minor
political party candidates and independent candidates may be nominated
through the ((convention)) petition procedures provided in chapter
29A.20 RCW.
(2) Within ten days of such vacancy occurring, he or she shall
issue a writ of election fixing a date for the special vacancy election
not less than ninety days after the issuance of the writ, fixing a date
for the primary for nominating major political party candidates for the
special vacancy election not less than thirty days before the day fixed
for holding the special vacancy election, fixing the dates for the
special filing period, and designating the term or part of the term for
which the vacancy exists. If the vacancy is in the office of United
States representative, the writ of election shall specify the
congressional district that is vacant.
(3) If the vacancy occurs less than six months before a state
general election and before the second Friday following the close of
the filing period for that general election, the special primary((,))
and special vacancy election((, and minor party and independent
candidate nominating conventions)) must be held in concert with the
state primary and state general election in that year.
(4) If the vacancy occurs on or after the first day for filing
under RCW 29A.24.050 and on or before the second Friday following the
close of the filing period, a special filing period of three normal
business days shall be fixed by the governor and notice thereof given
to all media, including press, radio, and television within the area in
which the vacancy election is to be held, to the end that, insofar as
possible, all interested persons will be aware of such filing period.
The last day of the filing period shall not be later than the sixth
Tuesday before the primary at which major political party candidates
are to be nominated. The names of major political party candidates who
have filed valid declarations of candidacy during this three-day period
shall appear on the approaching primary ballot. ((The requirements of
RCW 29A.20.131 do not apply to a minor political party or independent
candidate convention held under this subsection.))
(5) If the vacancy occurs later than the second Friday following
the close of the filing period, a special primary((,)) and special
vacancy election((, and the minor party and independent candidate
conventions)) to fill the position shall be held after the next state
general election but, in any event, no later than the ninetieth day
following the November election.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.32.031 and 2008 c 1 s 12 (Initiative Measure No.
960) are each amended to read as follows:
The voters' pamphlet must contain:
(1) Information about each measure for an advisory vote of the
people and each ballot measure initiated by or referred to the voters
for their approval or rejection as required by RCW 29A.32.070;
(2) In even-numbered years, statements, if submitted, advocating
the candidacies of nominees for the office of president and vice
president of the United States, United States senator, United States
representative, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state,
state treasurer, state auditor, attorney general, commissioner of
public lands, superintendent of public instruction, insurance
commissioner, state senator, state representative, justice of the
supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or judge of the superior
court. Candidates may also submit a campaign mailing address and
telephone number and a photograph not more than five years old and of
a size and quality that the secretary of state determines to be
suitable for reproduction in the voters' pamphlet;
(3) In odd-numbered years, if any office voted upon statewide
appears on the ballot due to a vacancy, then statements and photographs
for candidates for any vacant office listed in subsection (2) of this
section must appear;
(4) In even-numbered years, a section explaining how voters may
participate in the election campaign process; the address and telephone
number of the public disclosure commission established under RCW
42.17.350; and a summary of the disclosure requirements that apply when
contributions are made to candidates and political committees;
(5) In even-numbered years the name, address, and telephone number
of each political party with nominees listed in the pamphlet, if filed
with the secretary of state ((by the state committee of a major
political party or the presiding officer of the convention of a minor
political party));
(6) In each odd-numbered year immediately before a year in which a
president of the United States is to be nominated and elected,
information explaining the precinct caucus and convention process used
by each major political party to elect delegates to its national
presidential candidate nominating convention. The pamphlet must also
provide a description of the statutory procedures by which minor
political parties are formed and the statutory methods used by the
parties to nominate candidates for president;
(7) An application form for an absentee ballot;
(8) A brief statement explaining the deletion and addition of
language for proposed measures under RCW 29A.32.080;
(9) Any additional information pertaining to elections as may be
required by law or in the judgment of the secretary of state is deemed
informative to the voters.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.36.121 and 2004 c 271 s 129 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The positions or offices on a primary consolidated ballot
shall be arranged in substantially the following order: United States
senator; United States representative; governor; lieutenant governor;
secretary of state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney general;
commissioner of public lands; superintendent of public instruction;
insurance commissioner; state senator; state representative; county
officers; justices of the supreme court; judges of the court of
appeals; judges of the superior court; and judges of the district
court. For all other jurisdictions on the primary consolidated ballot,
the offices in each jurisdiction shall be grouped together and be in
the order of the position numbers assigned to those offices, if any.
(b)(i) The positions or offices on a primary party ballot must be
arranged in substantially the following order: United States senator;
United States representative; governor; lieutenant governor; secretary
of state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney general;
commissioner of public lands; insurance commissioner; state senator;
state representative; and partisan county officers. For all other
jurisdictions on the primary party ballot, the offices in each
jurisdiction must be grouped together and be in the order of the
position numbers assigned to those offices, if any.
(ii) The positions or offices on a primary nonpartisan ballot must
be arranged in substantially the following order: Superintendent of
public instruction; justices of the supreme court; judges of the court
of appeals; judges of the superior court; and judges of the district
court. For all other jurisdictions on the primary nonpartisan ballot,
the offices in each jurisdiction must be grouped together and be in the
order of the position numbers assigned to those offices, if any.
(2) The order of the positions or offices on an election ballot
shall be substantially the same as on a primary consolidated ballot
except that state ballot issues must be placed before all offices. The
offices of president and vice president of the United States shall
precede all other offices on a presidential election ballot. The
positions on a ballot to be assigned to ballot measures regarding local
units of government shall be established by the secretary of state by
rule.
(3) The political party or independent candidacy of each candidate
for partisan office shall be indicated ((next to the name of the
candidate)) on the primary and election ballot. A candidate shall file
a written notice with the filing officer within three business days
after the close of the filing period designating the political party to
be indicated next to the candidate's name on the ballot if either: (a)
The candidate has been nominated by two or more minor political
((parties)) party or independent ((conventions)) candidacy petitions;
or (b) the candidate has both filed a declaration of candidacy
declaring an affiliation with a major political party and been
nominated by a minor political party or independent ((convention))
candidacy petition. If no written notice is filed the filing officer
shall give effect to the party designation shown upon the first
document filed. A minor political party or independent candidate may
be deemed nominated ((by a minor party or independent convention)) only
if all documentation required by chapter 29A.20 RCW has been timely
filed.

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.36.191 and 2004 c 271 s 133 are each amended to
read as follows:
The name of a candidate for a partisan office for which a primary
was conducted shall not be printed on the ballot for that office at the
subsequent general election unless, at the preceding primary, the
candidate receives ((a number of votes equal to at least one percent of
the total number of votes cast for all candidates for that office
and)):
(1) A plurality of the votes cast ((by voters affiliated with that
party)) for candidates for ((that)) the same office ((affiliated with
that)) of the same party; and
(2) At least:
(a) One thousand votes if the nomination is for United States
senate or a statewide office;
(b) Two hundred fifty votes if the nomination is for United States
house of representatives; or
(c) One hundred votes if the nomination is for any other partisan
office.

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.40.061 and 2004 c 271 s 134 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall issue an absentee ballot for the
primary or election for which it was requested, or for the next
occurring primary or election when ongoing absentee status has been
requested if the information contained in a request for an absentee
ballot or ongoing absentee status received by the county auditor is
complete and correct and the applicant is qualified to vote under
federal or state law. Otherwise, the county auditor shall notify the
applicant of the reason or reasons why the request cannot be accepted.
Whenever ((two or more candidates have)) a candidate has filed for the
position of precinct committee officer ((for the same party in the same
precinct, the contest for)), that position must be presented to
absentee voters from that precinct by either including the contest on
the regular absentee ballot or a separate absentee ballot. The ballot
must provide space designated for writing in the name of additional
candidates.
(2) A registered voter may obtain a replacement ballot if the
ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received by the voter. The
voter may obtain the ballot by telephone request, by mail,
electronically, or in person. The county auditor shall keep a record
of each replacement ballot provided under this subsection.
(3) A copy of the state voters' pamphlet must be sent to registered
voters temporarily outside the state, out-of-state voters, overseas
voters, and service voters along with the absentee ballot if such a
pamphlet has been prepared for the primary or election and is available
to the county auditor at the time of mailing. The county auditor shall
mail all absentee ballots and related material to voters outside the
territorial limits of the United States and the District of Columbia
under 39 U.S.C. 3406.

Sec. 15 RCW 29A.52.321 and 2004 c 271 s 146 are each amended to
read as follows:
No later than the day following the certification of the returns of
any primary, the secretary of state shall certify to the appropriate
county auditors the names of all persons nominated for offices at a
primary, or ((at)) by an independent candidate or minor party
((convention)) petition.

Sec. 16 RCW 29A.56.320 and 2003 c 111 s 1425 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the year in which a presidential election is held, each major or
minor political party that nominates candidates for president and vice
president of the United States and each ((minor political party or))
independent candidate ((convention held under chapter 29A.20 RCW that
nominates candidates)) nominated for president and vice president of
the United States shall nominate presidential electors for this state.
The party or ((convention)) independent candidate shall file with the
secretary of state a certificate ((signed by the presiding officer of
the convention at which the presidential electors were chosen,))
listing the names and addresses of the presidential electors. Each
presidential elector shall execute and file with the secretary of state
a pledge that, as an elector, he or she will vote for the candidates
nominated by that party. The names of presidential electors shall not
appear on the ballots. The votes cast for candidates for president and
vice president of each political party shall be counted for the
candidates for presidential electors of that political party.

Sec. 17 RCW 29A.80.051 and 2004 c 271 s 149 are each amended to
read as follows:
In an even-numbered year, the statutory requirements for filing as
a candidate at the primaries apply to candidates for precinct committee
officer. The office must be voted upon at the ((primaries, and))
primary. The names of all candidates must appear under the proper
party and office designations on the ballot ((for the primary for each
even-numbered year)), and the one receiving the highest number of votes
will be declared elected. ((However, to be declared elected, a
candidate must receive at least ten percent of the number of votes cast
for the candidate of the candidate's party receiving the greatest
number of votes in the precinct.)) The term of office of precinct
committee officer is two years, commencing the first day of December
following the primary.

Sec. 18 RCW 35.02.086 and 2006 c 344 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each candidate for a city or town elective position shall file a
declaration of candidacy with the county auditor of the county in which
all or the major portion of the city or town is located not more than
forty-five nor less than thirty days prior to the primary election at
which the initial elected officials are nominated((, according to RCW
29A.24.050)). The elective positions shall be as provided in law for
the type of city or town and form or plan of government specified in
the petition to incorporate, and for the population of the city or town
as determined by the county legislative authority or boundary review
board where applicable. Any candidate may withdraw his or her
declaration ((according to RCW 29A.24.131)) at any time within five
days after the last day allowed for filing declarations of candidacy.
All names of candidates to be voted upon shall be printed upon the
ballot alphabetically in groups under the designation of the respective
titles of offices for which they are candidates. Names of candidates
printed upon the ballot need not be rotated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 RCW 29A.28.011 and 29A.28.021 are each
recodified as sections in chapter 29A.24 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.20.131 (Convention--Notice) and 2004 c 271 s 189;
(2) RCW 29A.20.141 (Convention--Requirements for validity) and 2004
c 271 s 111; and
(3) RCW 29A.20.161 (Certificate of nomination--Requisites) and 2004
c 271 s 154.

--- END ---