BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by 82.08.020 RCW does not apply to the sale of
physical fitness equipment.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Aerobic exercise equipment" means treadmills, elliptical
trainers, exercise bikes, stationary recumbent bikes, pedal exercisers,
rowing machines, ski machines, stair steppers, and other similar
equipment.
(b) "Physical fitness equipment" means aerobic exercise equipment
and weight-bearing and resistance exercise equipment.
(c) "Weight-bearing and resistance exercise equipment" means
workout benches, incline benches, barbells, hand weights, weight sets,
weight benches, abdominal exercisers, resistance exercisers, and other
similar equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of physical
fitness equipment. The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to
this section.

--- END ---