BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of hands-free equipment for use with a wireless communications device. For the
purposes of this section, "hands-free equipment" means a speaker phone,
headset, earphone, or earpiece that is designed for use with a wireless
communications device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of hands-free equipment for use with a wireless communications device.
"Hands-free equipment" has the meaning provided in section 1 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---