BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who knowingly makes a false or misleading material
statement to a public servant that a child has been abducted and which
statement causes the activation of the voluntary broadcast notification
system commonly known as the "Amber alert," or as the same system may
otherwise be known, which is used to notify the public of abducted
children, is guilty of a class C felony.
(2) "Material statement" means a written or oral statement
reasonably likely to be relied upon by a public servant in the
discharge of his or her official powers or duties.

--- END ---