BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The office of the insurance commissioner
shall contract for an independent study of health benefit mandates,
rating requirements, and insurance statutes and rules to determine the
impact on premiums and individuals' health if those statutes or rules
were amended or repealed.
(2) The office of the insurance commissioner shall submit an
interim report to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2007, and a final report by December 1,
2008.

--- END ---