BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, a credit is allowed
against the tax imposed under this chapter for the total amount of
contributions or taxes paid by the employer to any state of Washington
or federal taxing authority on account of tip income of employees of
the employer that are includable in wages for the purposes of RCW
50.04.320(3) including, but not limited to: Contributions paid by the
employer under chapter 50.24 RCW, amounts paid to the United States
treasury on account of the employer's federal insurance contributions
act tax obligations, or amounts paid to the United States treasury on
account of the employer's federal unemployment tax act tax obligations.
(2) The credit or credits provided for by this section may be
claimed against taxes due for the calendar year in which the employer
pays contributions, federal insurance contributions act tax
obligations, or federal unemployment tax act tax obligations.
(3) Fifty percent of the dollar amount of any credit for which the
employer is eligible and has actually taken under this section must be
utilized for one or more of the following in the same calendar year as
the credit against such taxes was actually taken:
(a) Health care benefits for the employer's employees;
(b) Additional wages for any of the employer's nontip earning
employees; or
(c) Other increased employee benefits such as, but not limited to,
employee meals and paid sick leave.
(4) The amount of the credit claimed for a reporting period may not
exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for that reporting
period.
(5) Refunds may not be given in place of credits and credits may
not be carried over to subsequent calendar years or carried backward to
previous calendar years.
(6) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Contributions" are defined as provided in RCW 50.04.070.
(b) "Federal insurance contributions act tax obligation" means the
tax imposed under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3306 of the federal internal revenue
code.
(c) "Federal unemployment tax act tax obligation" means the tax
imposed under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3306 of the federal internal revenue code.
(d) "Employer" means any "employer" as defined under RCW 50.04.080
that operates a restaurant, as defined in this subsection.
(e) "Restaurant" means any business establishment where, in
consideration of payment, either food or beverages, or both, without
lodgings, is regularly furnished to the public, and some or all of the
establishment's employees regularly and customarily receive tips from
patrons of the establishment, but not including drug stores and soda
fountains.

--- END ---