BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.182.005 and 1993 c 476 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The federal fair credit reporting act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.)
requires that consumer reporting agencies adopt reasonable procedures
for meeting the needs of commerce for consumer credit, personnel,
insurance, and other information in a manner that is fair and equitable
to the consumer with regard to the confidentiality, accuracy, and
proper utilization of information contained in consumer reports.
The legislature finds and declares that consumers have a vital
interest in establishing and maintaining creditworthiness. The
legislature further finds that an elaborate mechanism using credit
reports has developed for investigating and evaluating a consumer's
creditworthiness, credit capacity, and general reputation and
character. As such, credit reports are used for evaluating credit
card, loan, mortgage, and small business financing applications, as
well as for decisions regarding employment and the rental or leasing of
dwellings. Moreover, financial institutions and other creditors depend
upon fair and accurate credit reports to efficiently and accurately
evaluate creditworthiness. Unfair or inaccurate reports undermine both
public and creditor confidences in the reliability of credit granting
systems.
The legislature finds and declares that consumers also have a vital
interest in maintaining their general reputation and character. The
legislature finds there has been an increased reliance on background
information obtained from web-based information brokers. This practice
increases the possibility of inaccurate reports. In order to ensure
the accuracy and completeness of this information, the legislature
finds that the provisions of this chapter also apply to background
checks.
Therefore, this chapter is necessary to ((assure)) ensure accurate
((credit)) data collection, maintenance, and reporting on the citizens
of the state. It is the policy of the state that ((credit)) consumer
reporting agencies maintain accurate information and credit reports,
resolve disputed reports promptly and fairly, and adopt reasonable
procedures to promote consumer confidentiality and the proper use of
((credit)) data in accordance with ((this chapter)) federal and state
law.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.182.010 and 1993 c 476 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Adverse action" includes:
(i) Denial of, increase in any charge for, or reduction in the
amount of insurance for personal, family, or household purposes;
(ii) Denial of employment or any other decision for employment
purposes that adversely affects a current or prospective employee;
(iii) Action or determination with respect to a consumer's
application for credit that is adverse to the interests of the
consumer; and
(iv) Action or determination with respect to a consumer's
application for the rental or leasing of residential real estate that
is adverse to the interests of the consumer.
(b) "Adverse action" does not include:
(i) A refusal to extend additional credit under an existing credit
arrangement if:
(A) The applicant is delinquent or otherwise in default with
respect to the arrangement; or
(B) The additional credit would exceed a previously established
credit limit; or
(ii) A refusal or failure to authorize an account transaction at a
point of sale.
(2) "Attorney general" means the office of the attorney general.
(3) "Consumer" means an individual.
(4)(a) "Consumer report" means a written, oral, or other
communication of information by a consumer reporting agency bearing on
a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing, credit capacity,
character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of
living that is used or expected to be used or collected in whole or in
part for:
(i) The purpose of serving as a factor in establishing the
consumer's eligibility for credit or insurance to be used primarily for
personal, family, or household purposes;
(ii) Employment purposes; or
(iii) Other purposes authorized under RCW 19.182.020.
(b) "Consumer report" includes both investigative consumer or
background check reports and credit reports.
(c) "Consumer report" does not include:
(i) A report containing information solely as to transactions or
experiences between the consumer and the person making the report;
(ii) An authorization or approval of a specific extension of credit
directly or indirectly by the issuer of a credit card or similar
device;
(iii) A report in which a person who has been requested by a third
party to make a specific extension of credit directly or indirectly to
a consumer conveys his or her decision with respect to the request, if
the third party advises the consumer of the name and address of the
person to whom the request was made and the person makes the
disclosures to the consumer required under RCW 19.182.070;
(iv) A list compiled by a consumer reporting agency to be used by
its client for direct marketing of goods or services not involving an
offer of credit;
(v) A report solely conveying a decision whether to guarantee a
check in response to a request by a third party; or
(vi) A report furnished for use in connection with a transaction
that consists of an extension of credit to be used for a commercial
purpose.
(5) "Consumer reporting agency" means a person who, for monetary
fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in
whole or in part in the business of assembling or evaluating consumer
credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of
furnishing consumer reports to third parties, and who uses any means or
facility of commerce for the purpose of preparing or furnishing
consumer reports. "Consumer reporting agency" does not include a
person solely by reason of conveying a decision whether to guarantee a
check in response to a request by a third party or a person who obtains
a consumer report and provides the report or information contained in
it to a subsidiary or affiliate of the person.
(6) "Credit transaction that is not initiated by the consumer" does
not include the use of a consumer report by an assignee for collection
or by a person with which the consumer has an account, for purposes of
(a) reviewing the account, or (b) collecting the account. For purposes
of this subsection "reviewing the account" includes activities related
to account maintenance and monitoring, credit line increases, and
account upgrades and enhancements.
(7) "Direct solicitation" means the process in which the consumer
reporting agency compiles or edits for a client a list of consumers who
meet specific criteria and provides this list to the client or a third
party on behalf of the client for use in soliciting those consumers for
an offer of a product or service.
(8) "Employment purposes," when used in connection with a consumer
report, means a report used for the purpose of evaluating a consumer
for employment, promotion, reassignment, or retention as an employee.
(9) "File," when used in connection with information on any
consumer, means all of the information on that consumer recorded and
retained by a consumer reporting agency regardless of how the
information is stored.
(10) "Investigative consumer report" means a background check or
consumer report or portion of it in which information on a consumer's
character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of
living is obtained through personal interviews with neighbors, friends,
or associates of the consumer reported on or with others with whom the
consumer is acquainted or who may have knowledge concerning any items
of information. However, the information does not include specific
factual information on a consumer's credit record obtained directly
from a creditor of the consumer or from a consumer reporting agency
when the information was obtained directly from a creditor of the
consumer or from the consumer.
(11) "Medical information" means information or records obtained,
with the consent of the individual to whom it relates, from a licensed
physician or medical practitioner, hospital, clinic, or other medical
or medically related facility.
(12) "Person" includes an individual, corporation, government or
governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership, association, and any other legal or commercial entity.
(13) "Prescreening" means the process in which the consumer
reporting agency compiles or edits for a client a list of consumers who
meet specific credit criteria and provides this list to the client or
a third party on behalf of the client for use in soliciting those
consumers for an offer of credit.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.182.040 and 1993 c 476 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as authorized under subsection (2) of this section, no
consumer reporting agency may make a consumer report containing any of
the following items of information:
(a) Bankruptcies that, from date of adjudication of the most recent
bankruptcy, antedate the report by more than ten years;
(b) Suits and judgments that, from date of entry, antedate the
report by more than seven years or until the governing statute of
limitations has expired, whichever is the longer period;
(c) Paid tax liens that, from date of payment, antedate the report
by more than seven years;
(d) Accounts placed for collection or charged to profit and loss
that antedate the report by more than seven years;
(e) ((Records of arrest, indictment, or conviction of crime that,
from date of disposition, release, or parole, antedate the report by
more than seven years;
(f))) Records of a conviction that have been vacated;
(f) Any other adverse item of information that antedates the report
by more than seven years.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section is not applicable in the case of
a consumer report to be used in connection with:
(a) A credit transaction involving, or that may reasonably be
expected to involve, a principal amount of fifty thousand dollars or
more; or
(b) The underwriting of life insurance involving, or that may
reasonably be expected to involve, a face amount of fifty thousand
dollars or more((; or
(c) The employment of an individual at an annual salary that
equals, or that may reasonably be expected to equal, twenty thousand
dollars or more)).

Sec. 4 RCW 19.182.070 and 1993 c 476 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A consumer reporting agency shall, upon request and proper
identification by the consumer, clearly and accurately disclose:
(((1))) (a) All information in the file on the consumer at the time
of request, except that medical information may be withheld. The
agency shall inform the consumer of the existence of medical
information, and the consumer has the right to have that information
disclosed to the health care provider of the consumer's choice.
Nothing in this chapter prevents, or authorizes a consumer reporting
agency to prevent, the health care provider from disclosing the medical
information to the consumer. The agency shall inform the consumer of
the right to disclosure of medical information at the time the consumer
requests disclosure of his or her file.
(((2))) (b) All items of information in its files on that consumer,
including disclosure of the sources of the information, except that
sources of information acquired solely for use in an investigative
report may only be disclosed to a plaintiff under appropriate discovery
procedures.
(((3))) (c) Identification of (((a))) (i) each person who for
employment purposes within the two-year period before the request, and
(((b))) (ii) each person who for any other purpose within the six-month
period before the request, procured a consumer report.
(((4))) (d) A record identifying all inquiries received by the
agency in the six-month period before the request that identified the
consumer in connection with a credit transaction that is not initiated
by the consumer.
(((5))) (e) An identification of a person under ((subsection (3)))
(c) or (((4))) (d) of this subsection must include (((a))) (i) the name
of the person or, if applicable, the trade name under which the person
conducts business; and (((b))) (ii) upon request of the consumer, the
address of the person.
(2) An employer who relies on a consumer report to support an
adverse action shall provide:
(a) The consumer with a preadverse action disclosure that includes
a copy of the consumer's consumer report and a summary of the
consumer's rights;
(b) Notice of the adverse action in writing;
(c) The name, address, and phone number of the consumer reporting
agency that supplied the report; and
(d) Notice of the consumer's right to dispute the accuracy or
completeness of any information the agency furnished, and the
consumer's right to an additional consumer report from the agency upon
request within sixty days.
(3) A consumer may be charged a reasonable fee for the reproduction
of materials in this section, with the exception of the consumer
report, which must be provided at no cost to the consumer.

--- END ---