BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The sea grant program at the University of Washington shall,
consistent with this section, commission a series of scientific
research studies that examines the possible effects, including the
cumulative effects, of the current prevalent geoduck aquaculture
techniques and practices on the natural environment in and around Puget
Sound, including the Strait of Juan de Fuca. The sea grant program
shall use funding provided from the geoduck aquaculture research
account created in section 2 of this act to directly perform the
research or to enter into and manage contracts with scientific
organizations or institutions.
(2) Prior to entering into a contract with a scientific
organization or institution, the sea grant program must:
(a) Analyze the credibility of the proposed party to the contract,
including whether the party has credible experience and knowledge and
has access to the facilities necessary to fully execute the research
required by the contract; and
(b) Require that all proposed parties to a contract fully disclose
any past, present, or planned future personal or professional
connections with the shellfish industry or public interest groups.
(3) All research commissioned under this section must be subjected
to a rigorous peer review process prior to being accepted and reported
by the sea grant program.
(4) To satisfy the minimum requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, the sea grant program shall commission and manage research
contracts examining the following potential effects of geoduck
aquaculture:
(a) At least one study that measures the environmental effects of
the structures commonly used in the aquaculture industry to protect
juvenile geoducks from predation. This study must focus on at least
two types of common structural predator exclusion devices: Dense
aggregations of plastic tubes and netting arrays. The exclusion
devices must be studied for their effects on the natural environment,
including:
(i) The physical and chemical characteristics of the sediment;
(ii) The abundances and diversity metrics for infauna, epifauna,
and submerged aquatic vegetation; and
(iii) The abundances and diversity indices of fouling organisms
associated with hard surface structures.
(b) At least one study that assesses the effects of harvesting
geoducks from intertidal commercial geoduck beds given the common
prevalent harvesting techniques. This study must assess the effects of
harvest disturbance and document patterns of postharvest succession in
species of benthic plants and animals. At a minimum, the study must
collect data for:
(i) The physical and chemical characteristics or sediments;
(ii) The abundances and diversity metrics for infauna, epifauna,
and submerged aquatic vegetation in sedimentary habitats;
(iii) The presence, size, and distribution of woody debris or other
large natural materials that provide solid substrata; and
(iv) The diversity of fouling organisms on solid substrata.
(c) At least one study that assesses the extent to which
unnaturally high densities of geoducks in standard aquaculture tracts
alter the ecological characteristics, including species diversity and
the abundance of other benthic organisms, of overlying waters when the
tracks are submerged. At a minimum, this study must address the
potential effects of:
(i) The removal of suspended phytoplankton and detritus by geoduck
filtration;
(ii) The enhancement of suspended detritus resulting from feces and
pseudofeces and its effect on light penetration; and
(iii) The alteration of concentrations of dissolved inorganic
nutrients and organic matter as a result of geoduck metabolism.
(d) At least one study to determine baseline information for
naturally existing parasites and diseases in wild geoduck populations.
(e) At least one study to explore whether genetic interactions
between cultured and wild geoduck may place wild stocks at risk by
measuring genetic differences between cultured and wild geoducks and
ascertaining the reproductive status of cultured geoduck relative to
wild geoduck. At a minimum, this study must include:
(i) A determination of age at maturation in cultured intertidal
geoducks;
(ii) An estimation of the proportion of cultured geoducks that
spawn during the course of a culture cycle;
(iii) The characterization of maturation synchrony between wild
subtidal geoduck and cultured intertidal geoduck;
(iv) A comparison of genetic variability between cultured geoduck
and wild geoduck;
(v) An estimation of the relative parental contributions to farmed
geoduck; and
(vi) Testing for evidence of local adaptation.
(f) At least one study that examines if the use of sterile triploid
geoducks would diminish the genetic interactions between wild and
cultured geoducks. At a minimum, this study must include:
(i) A comparison of maturation dynamics in triploid and diploid
geoducks; and
(ii) An investigation of the rate of reversion to diploidy in
triploid geoducks.
(g) At least one study that examines the carrying capacity of
intertidal lands as they relate to geoducks.
(h) At least one study that determines the reproductive success of
cultured geoducks. At a minimum, this study must address:
(i) An estimation of fecundity at age in geoducks aged two to six
years;
(ii) A determination of the effect of planting density on
fertilization success; and
(iii) A comparison of the larval viability of cultured and wild
geoducks.
(5) When appropriate, all research commissioned under this section
must address localized and cumulative effects of geoduck aquaculture.
(6) The sea grant program and the University of Washington are
prohibited from retaining greater than fifteen percent of any funding
provided to implement this section for administrative overhead or other
deductions not directly associated with conducting the research
required by this section.
(7) All research commissioned under this section must be completed
and the results reported to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2013. However, the sea grant program shall
prioritize the studies required by this section and complete and report
the results of studies that require a shorter timeline for completion
in advance of the 2013 deadline. In addition, the sea grant program
shall provide the appropriate committees of the legislature with annual
reports updating the status and progress of the required studies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The geoduck aquaculture research account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer to receive any legislative appropriations
earmarked for the account. Expenditures from the account may only be
used by the sea grant program for the geoduck research projects
identified by section 1 of this act. Only the president of the
University of Washington or the president's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.135.110 and 2005 c 155 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The beds of all navigable tidal waters in the state lying below
extreme low tide, except as otherwise prohibited by this section and by
Article XV, section 1 of the state Constitution shall be subject to
lease for the purposes of planting and cultivating oyster beds, or for
the purpose of cultivating clams or other edible shellfish, or for
other aquaculture use, for periods not to exceed thirty years.
(2) Except for contracts that have had a request for offer issued
prior to the effective date of this section, the department is
prohibited from entering into any leases that would permit the
commercial aquaculture of geoducks on state-owned aquatic lands
associated with Puget Sound, including the Strait of Juan de Fuca until
one full calendar year after the sea grant program at the University of
Washington reports to the legislature the results of the studies
required by section 1 of this act.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prevent any person from leasing
more than one parcel, as offered by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All geoduck aquaculture operations located or proposed to be
located on lands or waters associated with Puget Sound or the Strait of
Juan de Fuca, regardless of whether or not the operation would
otherwise require permitting under this chapter or whether or not the
operation is included in an approved local master program, may only
exist and operate if the operation receives a permit as a conditional
use under RCW 90.58.090(5).
(2) The department, prior to approving a geoduck aquaculture
operation as a conditional use, shall ensure that the permit requires
the geoduck aquaculture operation to satisfy, at a minimum, the
following standards:
(a) That an adequate baseline survey of the aquatic habitat in
existence on the land proposed to be planted with geoduck seed has been
completed to the department's satisfaction;
(b) The geoduck aquaculture operation is prepared and planted in a
way that establishes adequate setbacks and buffers, as determined by
the department, from eelgrass beds, herring and smelt spawning grounds,
and the habitat of species listed on the state or federal endangered
species list;
(c) The timing of physical operations on the geoduck aquaculture
operation is limited to times determined by the department to minimize
ecosystem and neighborhood impacts;
(d) The geoduck aquaculture operator has executed a bond in an
amount established by the department to adequately fund cleanup and
mitigation costs incurred by the operation;
(e) All equipment used on the geoduck aquaculture operation,
including the maintenance, placement, and design of the equipment, is
consistent with specifications adopted by the department to minimize
noise, bird entrapment, material escape, and other environmental
impacts;
(f) Geoduck seed used for planting will be generated from brood
stock native to the region of the planting and genetic profiling of the
brood stock will be completed on a time schedule developed by the
department;
(g) Brood stock and geoduck seed will be tested for shellfish
pathogens by a certified laboratory according to standards developed by
the department;
(h) Postharvest surveys will be completed according to
specifications identified by the department to determine potential
impacts to marine vegetation and other habitat alterations;
(i) All records will be kept and made available by the geoduck
aquaculture operator in a manner identified by the department; and
(j) A provision exists in the permit to allow the department or the
local government to revoke the permit of any geoduck aquaculture
operation that is found to have violated any of the conditions of this
section.
(3) The department shall, in the administration of this section:
(a) Consider all cumulative effects of geoduck aquaculture
operations as well as localized effects; and
(b) Consult with, and rely on the information provided by, the
department of fish and wildlife.
(4) Decisions made by the department under this section regarding
the approval of permitting for geoduck aquaculture operations are
subject to RCW 43.21C.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW
to read as follows:
The permit conditions placed on geoduck aquaculture operations by
section 4 of this act are intended to serve as minimal, basic
protections necessary to preserve the health and enjoyment of Puget
Sound while the sea grant program at the University of Washington
commissions a series of scientific studies on the effects of geoduck
aquaculture on the natural environment as provided in section 1 of this
act. It is the intent of the legislature to revisit these protections
after the sea grant program delivers its final report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department of ecology may adopt any
rules, consistent with chapter 34.05 RCW, that it deems necessary to
administer this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire July 1,
2014.

--- END ---