BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.128 and 1993 c 2 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
Public funds, whether derived through taxes, fees, penalties, or
any other sources, shall not be used to finance political campaigns for
state ((or local)) office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
A county, city, town, or district that establishes a program to
publicly finance local political campaigns may only use funds derived
from local sources to fund the program.

--- END ---