BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall study the effect of enacting tax preferences for
aerospace product development businesses. The committee shall
summarize its findings in the form of a report. The report shall
estimate the effect of enacting tax preferences for aerospace product
businesses on job retention, job growth, company growth,
diversification of the state's economy, cluster dynamics, and other
factors the committee may select. The report is due to the house
finance and senate ways and means committees by December 1, 2007.
(2) For the purposes of this section, aerospace product development
businesses are businesses not directly claiming currently authorized
aerospace tax incentives that are engaged in the development, design,
engineering, or manufacturing of:
(a) Tooling that is used: (i) In the manufacturing of commercial
airplanes; or (ii) by manufacturers of component parts for commercial
airplanes;
(b) Maintenance, repair, or overhaul support equipment that is used
by airline customers in the aftermarket support of commercial
airplanes;
(c) Ground support equipment, including test equipment, that is
used by airline customers in support of commercial airplanes; or
(d) General aviation aircraft and components of such aircraft.

--- END ---