BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for the purchase of an alternative power generation device by
an eligible person. The credit is equal to the lesser of fifty percent
of the cost of the alternative power generation device or fifteen
thousand dollars.
(2) The amount of the credit provided in subsection (1) of this
section may not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for the
tax reporting period.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section:
(a) "Alternative power generation device" means a device capable of
providing electrical power for gasoline service station pumps during
periods when regular electrical power is lost including, but not
limited to, portable generators, standby generators, emergency
generators, or other power generation devices.
(b) "Eligible person" means a person selling motor vehicle or
special fuel from a gasoline service station, or other facility, with
at least four fuel pumps.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2007.

--- END ---