BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A growth management needs and priorities
task force is established for the purposes of gathering information,
identifying issues, and developing recommendations on policy choices
related to the effective implementation of the state's growth
management act.
(2) The task force shall consist of community leaders appointed by
the governor after consultation with the president of the senate and
the speaker of the house of representatives. The task force is chaired
by the director of the department of community, trade, and economic
development. Staff support shall be provided by the department of
community, trade, and economic development.
(3) The task force shall convene its first meeting not later than
August 1, 2007. The task force shall consult with local governments
and other groups responsible for, affected by, or involved in the
implementation of the growth management act. The task force may secure
research and facilitation services by contract, and may establish work
teams or advisory groups, as needed, to support their work.
(4) The task force shall secure an independent assessment of the
effectiveness of land use programs in Washington in achieving the goals
of the state's growth management act. The assessment shall rely on
available information and focus on key benchmarks for each goal of the
act.
(5) By December 1, 2007, the task force shall issue a report with
recommendations on legislative and executive actions that address, at
a minimum, the following topics:
(a) How to improve the effectiveness of the growth management act
to meet the goals set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW;
(b) How to best meet the infrastructure and basic service needs of
growing communities, including schools, local roads, fire and police
service, and water, sewer, and other utilities, with recommendations
for financing these service and infrastructure needs;
(c) How to best provide incentives to accommodate projected growth,
protect resource lands, and protect critical areas;
(d) How local governments are prepared to address land use changes
associated with climate change; and
(e) Address any recommendations for additional topics that warrant
continued work by the task force or by other groups.
(6) This section expires December 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the
department of community, trade, and economic development for the
purposes of this act.

--- END ---