BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many students
graduate from high school without a clear understanding of the level of
college mathematics courses for which they are prepared. The
legislature further finds that this problem is made worse by the fact
that the state's institutions of higher education use different
examinations for determining readiness and placement in college
mathematics courses. Even when colleges use the same placement
examinations, they do not necessarily use the same scores to determine
a student's readiness and placement. Therefore, it is the intent of
the legislature that a common examination in mathematics, with common
scores for determining student qualifications for college-level
mathematics courses, be developed for use by all of the state's
institutions of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The state board for community and technical
colleges and the higher education coordinating board shall work in
consultation with the public four-year institutions of higher education
to develop a common placement examination for college mathematics
courses. The boards shall also set common scores for determining
student qualifications for college-level mathematics courses. All
public two and four-year institutions of higher education shall use the
common placement examination, with the common scores, when determining
student qualifications for college mathematics courses. The test and
scores shall be developed and implemented by the beginning of the 2008-09 academic year.

--- END ---