BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A pilot program for providing preschool
tuition scholarships and enrollment assistance for children in foster
care is established. The pilot program shall be administered by the
department of social and health services in consultation with the
Washington state child care resource and referral network and the
department of early learning. The department of social and health
services shall select for a two-year pilot program three regional
offices representing the geographic diversity of the state. The
primary purpose of the pilot program is to promote access to high-quality early learning programs for more children in foster care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of social and health
services in consultation with the department of early learning shall
establish criteria for identifying high-quality early learning programs
for which preschool tuition scholarships may be used.
(2) The regional offices selected in subsection (1) of this section
shall provide preschool tuition scholarships for children in foster
care who are three to five years of age not enrolled in kindergarten
and who have been in an out-of-home placement pursuant to chapter 13.34
RCW for sixty consecutive days or longer. A total of two hundred
preschool tuition scholarships shall be distributed across the three
pilot sites. The amount of the scholarship shall be not more than the
difference between the usual and customary rate charged by the
provider, taking into account the child's age and whether attendance
will be full-time or part-time, and the amount of any state child care
subsidy for which the child is otherwise eligible.
(3) Based upon the criteria developed in subsection (1) of this
section, the regional administrators of the offices selected for the
pilot program under section 1 of this act shall consult with the local
child care resource and referral network to identify community
providers where scholarships may be applied and where children in
foster care may be referred. The local child care resource and
referral network shall assist foster parents with assessing the type of
preschool program appropriate for the child's needs and with completing
the enrollment process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire July 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---