BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish an industrial insurance medical
advisory committee. The industrial insurance medical advisory
committee shall advise the department on matters related to the
provision of safe, effective, and cost-effective treatments for injured
workers, including but not limited to the development of practice
guidelines and coverage criteria, review of coverage decisions and
technology assessments, review of medical programs, and review of rules
pertaining to health care issues. The industrial insurance medical
advisory committee may provide peer review and advise and assist the
department in the resolution of controversies, disputes, and problems
between the department and the providers of medical care. The
industrial insurance medical advisory committee must consider the best
available scientific evidence and expert opinion of industrial
insurance medical advisory committee members. The department may hire
any expert or service or create an ad hoc committee, group, or
subcommittee it deems necessary to fulfill the purposes of the
industrial insurance medical advisory committee. In addition, the
industrial insurance medical advisory committee may consult nationally
recognized experts in evidence-based health care on particularly
controversial issues.
(2) The industrial insurance medical advisory committee is composed
of up to fifteen members appointed by the director. The members must
not include any department employees. The director must appoint
thirteen members from nominations from statewide clinical groups,
specialties, and associations, including but not limited to the
following: Family or general practice, orthopedics, neurology,
neurosurgery, general surgery, physical medicine and rehabilitation,
psychiatry, internal medicine, osteopathic, naturopathic, pain
management, radiology, and occupational medicine. The director may
appoint two members from any medical specialty in addition to the
thirteen members appointed from the list of nominations. At least two
members must be physicians who are recognized for expertise in
evidence-based medicine.
(3) The industrial insurance medical advisory committee shall
choose a chair from among its members.
(4) The members of the industrial insurance medical advisory
committee, including hired experts and any ad hoc group or
subcommittee: (a) Are immune from civil liability for any official
acts performed in good faith to further the purposes of the industrial
insurance medical advisory committee; and (b) may be compensated for
participation in the work of the industrial insurance medical advisory
committee in accordance with a personal services contract to be
executed after appointment and before commencement of activities
related to the work of the industrial insurance medical advisory
committee.
(5) The members of the industrial insurance medical advisory
committee shall disclose all potential financial conflicts of interest
including contracts with or employment by a manufacturer, provider, or
vendor of health technologies, drugs, medical devices, diagnostic
tools, or other medical services during their term or for eighteen
months before their appointment. As a condition of appointment, each
person must agree to the terms and conditions regarding conflicts of
interest as determined by the director.
(6) The industrial insurance medical advisory committee shall meet
at the times and places designated by the director and hold meetings
during the year as necessary to provide advice to the director.
Meetings of the industrial insurance medical advisory committee are
subject to chapter 42.30 RCW, the open public meetings act.
(7) The industrial insurance medical advisory committee shall
coordinate with the state health technology assessment program and
state prescription drug program as necessary. As provided by RCW
70.14.100 and 70.14.050, the decisions of the state health technology
assessment program and those of the state prescription drug program
hold greater weight than decisions made by the department's industrial
insurance medical advisory committee under Title 51 RCW.
(8) Neither the industrial insurance medical advisory committee nor
any group is an agency for purposes of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(9) The department shall provide administrative support to the
industrial insurance medical advisory committee and adopt rules to
carry out the purposes of this section.
(10) At the request of the house of representatives commerce and
labor committee or the senate labor, commerce, research, and
development committee, or successor committees, the industrial
insurance medical advisory committee shall review a medical issue
related to industrial insurance and provide a written report to the
house of representatives commerce and labor committee and the senate
labor, commerce, research, and development committee, or successor
committees.
(11) At the request of the workers' compensation advisory committee
created under RCW 51.04.110, the industrial insurance medical advisory
committee shall review a medical issue related to industrial insurance
and provide a written report to the workers' compensation advisory
committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish an industrial insurance
chiropractic advisory committee. The industrial insurance chiropractic
advisory committee shall advise the department on matters related to
the provision of safe, effective, and cost-effective chiropractic
treatments for injured workers. The industrial insurance chiropractic
advisory committee may provide peer review and advise and assist the
department in the resolution of controversies, disputes, and problems
between the department and the providers of chiropractic care.
(2) The industrial insurance chiropractic advisory committee is
composed of up to nine members appointed by the director. The members
must not include any department employees. The director must consider
nominations from recognized statewide chiropractic groups such as the
Washington state chiropractic association. At least two members must
be chiropractors who are recognized for expertise in evidence-based
practice or occupational health.
(3) The industrial insurance chiropractic advisory committee shall
choose a chair from among its members.
(4) The members of the industrial insurance chiropractic advisory
committee and any ad hoc group or subcommittee: (a) Are immune from
civil liability for any official acts performed in good faith to
further the purposes of the industrial insurance chiropractic advisory
committee; and (b) may be compensated for participation in the work of
the industrial insurance chiropractic advisory committee in accordance
with a personal services contract to be executed after appointment and
before commencement of activities related to the work of the industrial
insurance chiropractic advisory committee.
(5) The members of the industrial insurance chiropractic advisory
committee shall disclose all potential financial conflicts of interest
including contracts with or employment by a manufacturer, provider, or
vendor of health technologies, drugs, medical devices, diagnostic
tools, or other medical services during their term or for eighteen
months before their appointment. As a condition of appointment, each
person must agree to the terms and conditions regarding conflicts of
interest as determined by the director.
(6) The industrial insurance chiropractic advisory committee shall
meet at the times and places designated by the director and hold
meetings during the year as necessary to provide advice to the
director. Meetings of the industrial insurance chiropractic advisory
committee are subject to chapter 42.30 RCW, the open public meetings
act.
(7) The industrial insurance chiropractic advisory committee shall
coordinate with the state health technology assessment program and
state prescription drug program as necessary. As provided by RCW
70.14.100 and 70.14.050, the decisions of the state health technology
assessment program and those of the state prescription drug program
hold greater weight than decisions made by the department's industrial
insurance chiropractic advisory committee under Title 51 RCW.
(8) Neither the industrial insurance chiropractic advisory
committee nor any group is an agency for purposes of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(9) The department shall provide administrative support to the
industrial insurance chiropractic advisory committee and adopt rules to
carry out the purposes of this section.
(10) At the request of the house of representatives commerce and
labor committee or the senate labor, commerce, research, and
development committee, or successor committees, the industrial
insurance chiropractic advisory committee shall review a medical issue
related to industrial insurance and provide a written report to the
house of representatives commerce and labor committee and the senate
labor, commerce, research, and development committee, or successor
committees.
(11) At the request of the workers' compensation advisory committee
created under RCW 51.04.110, the industrial insurance chiropractic
advisory committee shall review a medical issue related to industrial
insurance and provide a written report to the workers' compensation
advisory committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The director, the industrial insurance
medical advisory committee, and the industrial insurance chiropractic
advisory committee shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on the following:
(1) A summary of the types of issues reviewed by the industrial
insurance medical advisory committee and the industrial insurance
chiropractic advisory committee and decisions in each matter;
(2) Whether the industrial insurance medical advisory committee and
the industrial insurance chiropractic advisory committee became
involved in the resolution of any disputes or controversies and the
results of those disputes or controversies as a result of the
involvement of the industrial insurance medical advisory committee and
the industrial insurance chiropractic advisory committee;
(3) The extent to which the industrial insurance medical advisory
committee and the industrial insurance chiropractic advisory committee
conducted any peer reviews and the results of those reviews;
(4) The extent of any practice guidelines or coverage criteria
developed by the industrial insurance medical advisory committee and
the industrial insurance chiropractic advisory committee and the
success of those developments; and
(5) The extent to which the industrial insurance medical advisory
committee and the industrial insurance chiropractic advisory committee
provided advice on coverage decisions and technology assessments.
The report is due no later than June 30, 2011, and must contain a
recommendation about whether the industrial insurance medical advisory
committee and the industrial insurance chiropractic advisory committee
should continue as originally configured or whether any changes are
needed.

--- END ---