BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.32A.200 and 2000 c 123 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All hearings pursuant to this chapter may be conducted at any
time or place within the county of the residence of the parent and such
cases shall ((not)) be heard in conjunction with the business of any
other division of the superior court, except as provided in subsections
(2) and (3) of this section.
(2) The public shall be excluded from a child in need of services
hearing if the judicial officer finds that it is in the best interest
of the child.
(3) The public shall be excluded from an at-risk youth hearing if:
(a) The judicial officer finds that it is in the best interest of
the child; or
(b) Either parent requests that the public be excluded from the
hearing.
(4) At the beginning of the at-risk youth hearing, the judicial
officer shall notify the parents that either parent has the right to
request that the public be excluded from the at-risk youth hearing.
(5) If the public ((shall be)) is excluded from hearings ((and))
under subsection (2) or (3) of this act, only such persons who are
found by the court to have a direct interest in the case or the work of
the court shall be admitted to the proceedings.

--- END ---