BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.84.092 and 2006 c 337 s 11, 2006 c 311 s 23, 2006
c 171 s 10, 2006 c 56 s 10, and 2006 c 6 s 8 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(((a))) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the capitol building construction
account, the Cedar River channel construction and operation account,
the Central Washington University capital projects account, the
charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account,
the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the common
school construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the
county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use
tax equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the emergency reserve fund, the energy freedom account, the
essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital
projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight mobility investment account, the freight
mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the
health services account, the public health services account, the health
system capacity account, the personal health services account, the high
capacity transportation account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the
highway safety account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations
account, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges'
retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the
judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax
account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and
use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety
education account, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster
reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account,
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1,
2004, the public health supplemental account, the public transportation
systems account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
safety and education account, the site closure account, the small city
pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the
state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the state patrol highway account, the supplemental pension
account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington
bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the urban arterial trust account the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(((b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.))
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---