BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The office of the insurance commissioner
shall explore the feasibility of entering into a multistate health
insurance pool compact for the purpose of providing affordable health
insurance coverage to individuals and small employers. Initially, the
multistate health insurance pool compact will include the states of
Oregon and California. The office of the insurance commissioner shall
propose model state legislation that each participating state would
enact prior to entering into the multistate health insurance pool
compact. If federal legislation is necessary to permit the operation
of the multistate health insurance pool, the office of the insurance
commissioner shall identify needed changes in federal statutes and
rules.
(2) The office of the insurance commissioner shall report the
findings and recommendations of the feasibility study to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 1, 2007.

--- END ---