BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) There are an estimated one hundred thousand chemicals
registered for use today in the United States, with another two
thousand added each year. Chemicals are found in many consumer
products including cosmetics, personal care products, pesticides,
cleaning products, fuels, and plastics. Some of these chemicals
persist in the environment, accumulate and remain in the body, and have
been shown to be toxic. Because chemicals are a part of everyday world
activities, Washington residents are exposed to multiple chemicals
every day. Young children and developing fetuses are especially
sensitive to some environmental chemicals, which can affect
neurodevelopment and cause behavioral and learning problems. The
state, the federal government, and other nations have targeted these
persistent, bioaccumulative, and toxic chemicals to reduce their impact
on human health and the environment. Many of the chemicals that build
up in the environment over time are the same chemicals that build up in
people.
(b) Biomonitoring of lead levels in children has been used for over
thirty years to identify how children are exposed to lead and identify
children who need environmental intervention and treatment.
Biomonitoring data was important in the decision to eliminate lead
additives in gasoline. As a result of these efforts, millions of
children have avoided the risk of reduced capacity to learn. Expanding
biomonitoring to focus on other important chemicals in vulnerable
groups can produce equally important public health protections.
(c) Biomonitoring information provides for the direct measurement
of environmental chemicals in the human body regardless of source. It
assists in making the connection between exposure and disease or
establishing that there is no connection. Biomonitoring information is
valuable for interpreting the public health significance of
environmental monitoring data, and is key for developing effective ways
to prevent human disease and death caused by exposure to environmental
chemicals.
(d) Biomonitoring data supports sound public health decisions by:
Determining exposures of chemicals to Washington residents; assessing
effectiveness of public health efforts to reduce exposure and current
regulations; setting priorities for chemical exposure reduction
strategies; establishing trends in chemical exposures; validating
modeling and survey methods, supporting epidemiological studies;
identifying emerging environmental problems; and assisting in emergency
health responses to unanticipated exposures.
(e) The federal centers for disease control and prevention have
conducted biomonitoring studies for one hundred forty-eight chemicals.
These studies have scientifically demonstrated that Americans of all
ages and races have levels of environmental chemicals in their bodies.
(f) The federal centers for disease control and prevention are
providing a grant to the Washington department of health to develop the
Washington state environmental public health tracking network, which is
designed to compile information regarding environmental chemicals,
human exposure to environmental chemicals, and potentially related
health outcomes. Biomonitoring and environmental public health
tracking are complementary public health efforts. Biomonitoring data
is valuable for understanding the links between environmental
contamination and human exposure and potentially related diseases, and
information from the Washington state environmental public health
tracking network helps to correctly interpret the results of
biomonitoring efforts.
(g) In 2001, the federal centers for disease control and prevention
provided a grant to the Washington department of health to develop a
state biomonitoring plan, however Washington state did not receive an
implementation grant for the biomonitoring plan.
(2) It is therefore the purpose of this chapter to authorize a
biomonitoring program in Washington and to identify and secure a long-term funding source for implementing priorities identified for
Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Biomonitoring" means the process by which the presence and
concentration of environmental chemicals or their metabolites are
identified within a biospecimen to assess bodily exposure.
(3) "Biospecimen" means a sample taken from a biophysical
substance, which is reasonably available within a human body, for use
as a medium to measure the presence and concentration of environmental
chemicals.
(4) "Environmental chemical" means those chemicals released into or
found in the environment that are known to adversely affect, or
strongly suspected of adversely affecting, human health or development,
based upon scientific, peer-reviewed animal, human, or in vitro
studies, and any substances as specified by the department under
section 3(4) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall implement a
biomonitoring program when feasible, in consultation with the
department of ecology, local health jurisdictions, and other public
health agencies, to assist public health agencies and policymakers in
allocating resources to maximize improvements in environmental public
health by:
(a) Determining levels of exposure to environmental chemicals in
population groups that may be at increased risk of exposure;
(b) Measuring the prevalence of elevated levels of environmental
chemicals in specific population groups;
(c) Interpreting the public health significance of environmental
monitoring data;
(d) Assessing effectiveness of public health efforts to reduce
exposure to specific populations to environmental chemicals; and
(e) Determining the impact of public health efforts to reduce high
levels of environmental chemicals.
(2) The department shall adopt guidelines and model protocols to
guide state and local agencies conducting biomonitoring that are
consistent with the requirements and priorities of this chapter. The
guidelines and model protocols shall address:
(a) Biomonitoring analytical methods with adequate accuracy,
precision, sensitivity, specificity, and output;
(b) Protection of human subject rights, such as confidentiality and
voluntary and informed consent; and
(c) Practices to ensure acknowledgement and respect of cultural
differences.
(3) The department shall establish a framework for interpretation
and communication of biomonitoring data for assessing health impacts of
these data by:
(a) Providing information to participants that includes the
purposes of biomonitoring and the uses of biomonitoring results and
data;
(b) Ensuring biomonitoring information is provided with a clear
explanation of the distinction between exposure data and analysis of
health effects that may occur from exposures;
(c) Providing an assessment of impacts associated with results of
the biomonitoring data;
(d) Providing information about chemical selection and what is and
is not known about the chemical; and
(e) Recommending follow-up steps to participants and communities,
as appropriate.
(4) The department may include environmental chemicals in the
biomonitoring program using the following criteria:
(a) Seriousness of health effects known or suspected to result from
some levels of exposure;
(b) Extent of exposure to the public or specific subgroups;
(c) Expected health risks based on peer-reviewed health data, the
chemical structures, or the toxicology of chemically related compounds;
and
(d) Incremental analytical cost to perform the biomonitoring
analysis for an additional chemical.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 By December 1, 2007, the department of
health shall, in consultation with the department of ecology and local
health jurisdictions, provide recommendations to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives for
funding the biomonitoring program. The recommendations shall provide
a proposed implementation plan for the ten highest priorities
identified by the department of health, and shall include
recommendations for funding sources and cost sharing among federal,
state, local, and nongovernmental entities. The department of health's
implementation recommendations shall include the objective of
integrating with and complementing nationwide monitoring programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect
July 1, 2008, if the department of health can identify funding for the
biomonitoring program described in section 5 of this act, and if funds
are appropriated for the activities described in section 3 of this act.
(2) The department of health shall provide written notice to the
legislature and the code reviser by July 1, 2008, indicating whether
the conditions in subsection (1) of this section have been met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The sum of ninety thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2008, from the state toxics control account to the
department of health for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---