BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.32.090 and 1993 c 521 s 3, 1993 c 299 s 1, and 1993
c 271 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When the total disability is only temporary, the schedule of
payments contained in RCW 51.32.060 (1) and (2) shall apply, so long as
the total disability continues.
(2) Any compensation payable under this section for children not in
the custody of the injured worker as of the date of injury shall be
payable only to such person as actually is providing the support for
such child or children pursuant to the order of a court of record
providing for support of such child or children.
(3)(a) As soon as recovery is so complete that the present earning
power of the worker, at any kind of work, is restored to that existing
at the time of the occurrence of the injury, the payments shall cease.
If and so long as the present earning power is only partially restored,
the payments shall:
(i) For claims for injuries that occurred before May 7, 1993,
continue in the proportion which the new earning power shall bear to
the old; or
(ii) For claims for injuries occurring on or after May 7, 1993,
equal eighty percent of the actual difference between the worker's
present wages and earning power at the time of injury, but: (A) The
total of these payments and the worker's present wages may not exceed
one hundred fifty percent of the average monthly wage in the state as
computed under RCW 51.08.018; (B) the payments may not exceed one
hundred percent of the entitlement as computed under subsection (1) of
this section; and (C) the payments may not be less than the worker
would have received if (a)(i) of this subsection had been applicable to
the worker's claim.
(b) No compensation shall be payable under this subsection (3)
unless the loss of earning power shall exceed five percent.
(c) The prior closure of the claim or the receipt of permanent
partial disability benefits shall not affect the entitlement to loss of
earning power benefits.
(4)(a) Whenever the employer of injury requests that a worker who
is entitled to temporary total disability under this chapter be
certified by a physician as able to perform available work other than
his or her usual work, the employer shall furnish to the physician,
with a copy to the worker, a statement describing the work available
with the employer of injury in terms that will enable the physician to
relate the physical activities of the job to the worker's disability.
The physician shall then determine whether the worker is physically
able to perform the work described. The worker's temporary total
disability payments shall continue until the worker is released by his
or her physician for the work, and begins the work with the employer of
injury. If the work thereafter comes to an end before the worker's
recovery is sufficient in the judgment of his or her physician to
permit him or her to return to his or her usual job, or to perform
other available work offered by the employer of injury, the worker's
temporary total disability payments shall be resumed. Should the
available work described, once undertaken by the worker, impede his or
her recovery to the extent that in the judgment of his or her physician
he or she should not continue to work, the worker's temporary total
disability payments shall be resumed when the worker ceases such work.
(b) Once the worker returns to work under the terms of this
subsection (4), he or she shall not be assigned by the employer to work
other than the available work described without the worker's written
consent, or without prior review and approval by the worker's
physician.
(c) If the worker returns to work under this subsection (4), any
employee health and welfare benefits that the worker was receiving at
the time of injury shall continue or be resumed at the level provided
at the time of injury. Such benefits shall not be continued or resumed
if to do so is inconsistent with the terms of the benefit program, or
with the terms of the collective bargaining agreement currently in
force.
(d) In the event of any dispute as to the worker's ability to
perform the available work offered by the employer, the department
shall make the final determination.
(5) No worker shall receive compensation for or during the day on
which injury was received or the three days following the same, unless
his or her disability shall continue for a period of fourteen
consecutive calendar days from date of injury: PROVIDED, That attempts
to return to work in the first fourteen days following the injury shall
not serve to break the continuity of the period of disability if the
disability continues fourteen days after the injury occurs.
(6) Should a worker suffer a temporary total disability and should
his or her employer at the time of the injury continue to pay him or
her the wages which he or she was earning at the time of such injury,
such injured worker shall not receive any payment provided in
subsection (1) of this section during the period his or her employer
shall so pay such wages: PROVIDED, That holiday pay, vacation pay,
sick leave, or other similar benefits shall not be deemed to be
payments by the employer for the purposes of this subsection.
(7) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in this section
exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(8) If the supervisor of industrial insurance determines that the
worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached to the work
force, benefits shall not be paid under this section.

--- END ---