BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.040 and 2006 c 263 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the
powers and duties of the superintendent of public instruction shall be:
(1) To have supervision over all matters pertaining to the public
schools of the state;
(2) To report to the governor and the legislature such information
and data as may be required for the management and improvement of the
schools;
(3) To prepare and have printed such forms, registers, courses of
study, rules for the government of the common schools, and such other
material and books as may be necessary for the discharge of the duties
of teachers and officials charged with the administration of the laws
relating to the common schools, and to distribute the same to
educational service district superintendents;
(4) To travel, without neglecting his or her other official duties
as superintendent of public instruction, for the purpose of attending
educational meetings or conventions, of visiting schools, and of
consulting educational service district superintendents or other school
officials;
(5) To prepare and from time to time to revise a manual of the
Washington state common school code, copies of which shall be provided
in such numbers as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction at no cost to those public agencies within the common
school system and which shall be sold at approximate actual cost of
publication and distribution per volume to all other public and
nonpublic agencies or individuals, said manual to contain Titles 28A
and 28C RCW, rules related to the common schools, and such other matter
as the state superintendent or the state board of education shall
determine. Proceeds of the sale of such code shall be transmitted to
the public printer who shall credit the state superintendent's account
within the state printing plant revolving fund by a like amount;
(6) To file all papers, reports and public documents transmitted to
the superintendent by the school officials of the several counties or
districts of the state, each year separately. Copies of all papers
filed in the superintendent's office, and the superintendent's official
acts, may, or upon request, shall be certified by the superintendent
and attested by the superintendent's official seal, and when so
certified shall be evidence of the papers or acts so certified to;
(7) To require annually, on or before the 15th day of August, of
the president, manager, or principal of every educational institution
in this state, a report as required by the superintendent of public
instruction; and it is the duty of every president, manager, or
principal, to complete and return such forms within such time as the
superintendent of public instruction shall direct;
(8) To keep in the superintendent's office a record of all teachers
receiving certificates to teach in the common schools of this state;
(9) To issue certificates as provided by law;
(10) To keep in the superintendent's office at the capital of the
state, all books and papers pertaining to the business of the
superintendent's office, and to keep and preserve in the
superintendent's office a complete record of statistics, as well as a
record of the meetings of the state board of education;
(11) With the assistance of the office of the attorney general, to
decide all points of law which may be submitted to the superintendent
in writing by any educational service district superintendent, or that
may be submitted to the superintendent by any other person, upon appeal
from the decision of any educational service district superintendent;
and the superintendent shall publish his or her rulings and decisions
from time to time for the information of school officials and teachers;
and the superintendent's decision shall be final unless set aside by a
court of competent jurisdiction;
(12) To administer oaths and affirmations in the discharge of the
superintendent's official duties;
(13) To deliver to his or her successor, at the expiration of the
superintendent's term of office, all records, books, maps, documents
and papers of whatever kind belonging to the superintendent's office or
which may have been received by the superintendent's for the use of the
superintendent's office;
(14) To administer family services and programs to promote the
state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025;
(15) To promote the adoption of school-based curricula and policies
that provide quality, daily physical education for all students, and to
encourage policies that provide all students with opportunities for
physical activity outside of formal physical education classes;
(16) To enter into, facilitate, or administer master price
agreements or joint purchasing contracts with vendors of goods and
services, private nonprofit organizations, school districts, and
educational service districts. These agreements or contracts shall be
in compliance with all applicable state or federal law. Administration
may include charging and collecting reasonable fees from participants
for the actual cost of administering such agreements or contracts. The
superintendent may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as are necessary
to implement this subsection. Nothing in this subsection affects the
authority of educational service districts or school districts to enter
into, facilitate, or administer joint contracts or purchasing
agreements; and
(17) To perform such other duties as may be required by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.320.080 and 1995 c 77 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every board of directors, unless otherwise specifically provided by
law, shall:
(1) Provide for the expenditure of a reasonable amount for suitable
commencement exercises;
(2) In addition to providing free instruction in lip reading for
children disabled by defective hearing, make arrangements for free
instruction in lip reading to adults disabled by defective hearing
whenever in its judgment such instruction appears to be in the best
interests of the school district and adults concerned;
(3) Join with boards of directors of other school districts or an
educational service district pursuant to RCW 28A.310.180(3) or the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, or ((both)) a
combination of such school districts and educational service district
and the office of the superintendent of public instruction in buying
supplies, equipment and services by establishing and maintaining a
joint purchasing agency, or otherwise, when deemed for the best
interests of the district, any joint agency formed hereunder being
herewith authorized and empowered to issue interest bearing warrants in
payment of any obligation owed: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That those agencies
issuing interest bearing warrants shall assign accounts receivable in
an amount equal to the amount of the outstanding interest bearing
warrants to the county treasurer issuing such interest bearing
warrants: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the joint purchasing agency shall
consider the request of any one or more private schools requesting the
agency to jointly buy supplies, equipment, and services including but
not limited to school bus maintenance services, and, after considering
such request, may cooperate with and jointly make purchases with
private schools of supplies, equipment, and services, including but not
limited to school bus maintenance services, so long as such private
schools pay in advance their proportionate share of the costs or
provide a surety bond to cover their proportionate share of the costs
involved in such purchases;
(4) Consider the request of any one or more private schools
requesting the board to jointly buy supplies, equipment and services
including but not limited to school bus maintenance services, and,
after considering such request, may provide such joint purchasing
services: PROVIDED, That such private schools pay in advance their
proportionate share of the costs or provide a surety bond to cover
their proportionate share of the costs involved in such purchases; and
(5) Prepare budgets as provided for in chapter 28A.505 RCW.

--- END ---