BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that
increasing academic success and increasing graduation rates be dual
goals for the K-12 system. The legislature finds that only seventy-four percent of the class of 2005 graduated on time. Students of
color, students living in poverty, students in foster care, students in
the juvenile justice system, students who are homeless, students for
whom English is not their primary language, and students with
disabilities have lower graduation rates than the average. The
legislature further finds that students who drop out experience more
frequent occurrences of early pregnancy, delinquency, substance abuse,
and mental health issues, and have greater need of publicly funded
health and social services. The legislature further finds that helping
all students be successful in school requires active participation in
coordinating services from schools, parents, and other stakeholders and
agencies in the local community. The legislature finds that existing
resources to vulnerable youth are used more efficiently and effectively
when there is significant coordination across local and state entities.
The legislature further finds that efficiency and accountability of the
K-12 system would be improved by creating a dropout prevention and
intervention grant program that implements research-based and emerging
best practices and evaluates results.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Subject to the availability of funds
appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall create a grant program and award grants to
local partnerships of schools, families, and communities to begin the
phase in of a statewide comprehensive dropout prevention, intervention,
and retrieval system. This program shall be known as the building
bridges program.
(1) For purposes of sections 2 through 7 of this act, a "building
bridges program" means a local partnership of schools, families, and
communities that provides all of the following programs or activities:
(a) A system that identifies individual students at risk of
dropping out from middle through high school based on local predictive
data, including state assessment data starting in the fourth grade, and
provides timely interventions for such students and for dropouts,
including a plan for educational success as already required by the
student learning plan as defined under RCW 28A.655.061. Students
identified shall include foster care youth, youth involved in the
juvenile justice system, and students receiving special education
services under chapter 28A.155 RCW;
(b) Coaches or mentors for students as necessary;
(c) Staff responsible for coordination of community partners that
provide a seamless continuum of academic and nonacademic support in
schools and communities;
(d) Retrieval or reentry activities; and
(e) Alternative educational programming, including, but not limited
to, career and technical education exploratory and preparatory programs
and online learning opportunities.
(2) One of the grants awarded under this section shall be for a
two-year demonstration project focusing on providing fifth through
twelfth grade students with a program that utilizes technology and is
integrated with state standards, basic academics, cross-cultural
exposures, and age-appropriate preemployment training. The project
shall:
(a) Establish programs in two western Washington and one eastern
Washington urban areas;
(b) Identify at-risk students in each of the distinct communities
and populations and implement strategies to close the achievement gap;
(c) Collect and report data on participant characteristics and
outcomes of the project, including the characteristics and outcomes
specified under section 3(1)(e) of this act; and
(d) Submit a report to the legislature by December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall:
(a) Identify criteria for grants and evaluate proposals for funding
in consultation with the workforce training and education coordinating
board;
(b) Develop and monitor requirements for grant recipients to:
(i) Identify eligible students, including students who both fail
the Washington assessment of student learning and drop out of school;
(ii) Identify their own strengths and gaps in services provided to
youth;
(iii) Set their own local goals for program outcomes;
(iv) Use research-based and emerging best practices that lead to
positive outcomes in implementing the building bridges program; and
(v) Coordinate an outreach campaign to bring public and private
organizations together and to provide information about the building
bridges program to the local community;
(c) In setting the requirements under (b) of this subsection,
encourage creativity and provide for flexibility in implementing the
local building bridges program;
(d) Identify and disseminate successful practices;
(e) Develop requirements for grant recipients to collect and report
data, including, but not limited to:
(i) The number of and demographics of students served including,
but not limited to, information regarding a student's race and
ethnicity, a student's household income, a student's housing status,
whether a student is a foster youth or youth involved in the juvenile
justice system, whether a student is disabled, and the primary language
spoken at a student's home;
(ii) Washington assessment of student learning scores;
(iii) Dropout rates;
(iv) On-time graduation rates;
(v) Extended graduation rates;
(vi) Credentials obtained;
(vii) Absenteeism rates;
(viii) Truancy rates; and
(ix) Credit retrieval;
(f) Contract with a third party to evaluate the infrastructure and
implementation of the partnership including the leveraging of outside
resources that relate to the goal of the partnership. The third-party
contractor shall also evaluate the performance and effectiveness of the
partnerships relative to the type of entity, as identified in section
4 of this act, serving as the lead agency for the partnership; and
(g) Report to the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(2) In performing its duties under this section, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction is encouraged to consult with the
work group identified in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In awarding the grants under section 2 of
this act, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
prioritize schools or districts with dropout rates above the statewide
average and shall attempt to award building bridges program grants to
different geographic regions of the state. Eligible recipients shall
be one of the following entities acting as a lead agency for the local
partnership: A school district, a tribal school, an area workforce
development council, an educational service district, an accredited
institution of higher education, a vocational skills center, a
federally recognized tribe, a community organization, or a nonprofit
501(c)(3) corporation. If the recipient is not a school district, at
least one school district must be identified within the partnership.
The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that at least
fifty percent of the total grant funds awarded under section 2 of this
act are awarded to recipients other than school districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 To be eligible for a grant under section 2
of this act, grant applicants shall:
(1) Build or demonstrate a commitment to building a broad-based
partnership of schools, families, and community members to provide an
effective and efficient building bridges program. The partnership
shall consider an effective model for school-community partnerships and
include local membership from, but not limited to, school districts,
tribal schools, secondary career and technical education programs,
skill centers that serve the local community, an educational service
district, the area workforce development council, accredited
institutions of higher education, tribes or other cultural
organizations, the parent teacher association, the juvenile court,
prosecutors and defenders, the local health department, health care
agencies, public transportation agencies, local division
representatives of the department of social and health services,
businesses, city or county government agencies, civic organizations,
and appropriate youth-serving community-based organizations.
Interested parents and students shall be actively included whenever
possible;
(2) Demonstrate how the grant will enhance any dropout prevention
and intervention programs and services already in place in the
district;
(3) Provide a twenty-five percent match that may include in-kind
resources from within the partnership;
(4) Track and report data required by the grant; and
(5) Describe how the dropout prevention, intervention, and
retrieval system will be sustained after initial funding, including
roles of each of the partners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Educational service districts, in
collaboration with area workforce development councils, shall:
(a) Provide technical assistance to local partnerships established
under a grant awarded under section 2 of this act in collecting and
using performance data; and
(b) At the request of a local partnership established under a grant
awarded under section 2 of this act, provide assistance in the
development of a functional sustainability plan, including the
identification of potential funding sources for future operation.
(2) Local partnerships established under a grant awarded under
section 2 of this act may contract with an educational service
district, workforce development council, or a private agency for
specialized training in such areas as cultural competency, identifying
diverse learning styles, and intervention strategies for students at
risk of dropping out of school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall establish a state-level work group that
includes K-12 and state agencies that work with youth who have dropped
out or are at risk of dropping out of school. The state-level
leadership group shall consist of one representative from each of the
following agencies and organizations: The workforce training and
education coordinating board; career and technical education including
skill centers; relevant divisions of the department of social and
health services; the juvenile courts; the employment security
department; accredited institutions of higher education; the
educational service districts; the area workforce development councils;
parent and educator associations; the department of health; local
school districts; agencies or organizations that provide services to
special education students; community organizations serving youth;
federally recognized tribes and urban tribal centers; each of the major
political caucuses of the senate and house of representatives; and the
minority commissions.
(2) To assist and enhance the work of the building bridges programs
established in section 5 of this act, the state-level work group shall:
(a) Identify and make recommendations to the legislature for the
reduction of fiscal, legal, and regulatory barriers that prevent
coordination of program resources across agencies at the state and
local level;
(b) Develop and track performance measures and benchmarks for each
partner agency or organization across the state including performance
measures and benchmarks based on student characteristics and outcomes
specified in section 3(1)(e) of this act; and
(c) Identify research-based and emerging best practices regarding
prevention, intervention, and retrieval programs.
(3) The work group shall report to the legislature and the governor
on an annual basis beginning December 1, 2007, with recommendations for
implementing emerging best practices, needed additional resources, and
eliminating barriers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) School districts may use basic education
allocations under RCW 28A.150.250 to fund contracts with alternative
educational service providers that provide education programs for
students who are at risk of dropping out of school, or who have dropped
out of school, if the educational service provider meets the following
criteria:
(a) Provides access to at least twenty-five hours of instruction
per week; however, funding need not be based on seat-time attendance
requirements;
(b) Provides GED content area instruction or high school credit
recovery instruction from recognized curriculum; and
(c) Has certificated teachers or community and technical college
faculty to provide and oversee instruction.
(2) The state-level work group established under section 7 of this
act shall examine issues related to school districts' use of basic
education allocations under this section including, but not limited to,
findings or other relevant communications by the state auditor. The
work group shall develop recommendations and submit a report to the
appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2009.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 8 of this act are each
added to chapter 28A.175 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---