BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.176.020 and 2004 c 237 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Business incubator" means a facility that offers:
(a) Space for start-up and expanding firms;
(b) The shared use of equipment and work areas;
(c) Daily management support services essential to high-quality
commercial operations; and
(d) Technical assistance.
(2) "Entrepreneurial support program" means a program offering, on
an ongoing basis, start-up or emerging businesses business-related
training and services as well as technical assistance, including
operational development, business development, and financing.
(3) "Emerging business" means a business: (a) That is engaged in
activities related to the development of initial project or service
offerings, such as prototype development or establishment of initial
production or services processes; or (b) that is less than three years
old and during the previous fiscal year had gross revenues of no more
than two million dollars.
(4) "Qualified small business incubator" means ((an)) a small
business incubator or entrepreneurial support program that is:
(a)(i) Designated as a nonprofit organization under section
501(c)(3) or (6) of the internal revenue code, or (ii) consists of a
partnership between a designated nonprofit organization under section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code and a government or quasi-government agency; and
(b) ((Focused on developing small businesses in an economically
distressed or disadvantaged area; and
(c))) Structured around a sound business plan.
(5) "Start-up business" means a formal business venture that: (a)
Is involved in activities related to the development of initial product
or service offerings, such as prototype development or establishment of
initial production or service processes; (b) during the preceding
fiscal year had gross revenues of no more than two million dollars; (c)
is less than three years old; and (d) has fewer than twenty employees.

--- END ---