BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.85.005 and 2005 c 309 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that repeated attempts to improve salmonid
fish runs throughout the state of Washington have failed to avert
listings of salmon and steelhead runs as threatened or endangered under
the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).
These listings threaten the sport, commercial, and tribal fishing
industries as well as the economic well-being and vitality of vast
areas of the state. It is the intent of the legislature to begin
activities required for the recovery of salmon stocks as soon as
possible, although the legislature understands that successful recovery
efforts may not be realized for many years because of the life cycle of
salmon and the complex array of natural and human-caused problems they
face.
The legislature finds that it is in the interest of the citizens of
the state of Washington for the state to retain primary responsibility
for managing the natural resources of the state, rather than abdicate
those responsibilities to the federal government, and that the state
may best accomplish this objective by integrating local and regional
recovery activities into a statewide strategy that can make the most
effective use of provisions of federal laws allowing for a state lead
in salmon recovery, delivered through implementation activities
consistent with regional and watershed recovery plans. The legislature
also finds that a statewide salmon recovery strategy must be developed
and implemented through an active public involvement process in order
to ensure public participation in, and support for, salmon recovery.
The legislature also finds that there is a substantial link between the
provisions of the federal endangered species act and the federal clean
water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.). The legislature further finds
that habitat restoration is a vital component of salmon recovery
efforts. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to
specifically address salmon habitat restoration in a coordinated manner
and to develop a structure that allows for the coordinated delivery of
federal, state, and local assistance to communities for habitat
projects that will assist in the recovery and enhancement of salmon
stocks. A strong watershed-based locally implemented plan is essential
for local, regional, and statewide salmon recovery.
The legislature also finds that credible scientific review and
oversight is essential for any salmon recovery effort to be successful.
The legislature further finds that it is important to monitor the
overall health of the salmon resource to determine if recovery efforts
are providing expected returns. It is important to monitor salmon
habitat projects and salmon recovery activities to determine their
effectiveness in order to secure federal acceptance of the state's
approach to salmon recovery. Adaptive management cannot exist without
monitoring. For these reasons, the legislature believes that a
coordinated and integrated monitoring system should be developed and
implemented.
The legislature therefore finds that a coordinated framework for
responding to the salmon crisis is needed immediately. To that end,
the statewide salmon recovery office ((should be)) is created within
the ((governor's)) office of the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation to provide overall coordination of the state's response; an
independent science panel is needed to provide scientific review and
oversight; a coordinated state funding process should be established
through a salmon recovery funding board; the appropriate local or
tribal government should provide local leadership in identifying and
sequencing habitat projects to be funded by state agencies; habitat
projects should be implemented without delay; and a strong locally
based effort to restore salmon habitat should be established by
providing a framework to allow citizen volunteers to work effectively.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.85.010 and 2005 c 309 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to
test the results of actions taken so that the management and related
policy can be changed promptly and appropriately.
(2) "Critical pathways methodology" means a project scheduling and
management process for examining interactions between habitat projects
and salmonid species, prioritizing habitat projects, and assuring
positive benefits from habitat projects.
(3) "Habitat project list" is the list of projects resulting from
the critical pathways methodology under RCW 77.85.060(2). Each project
on the list must have a written agreement from the landowner on whose
land the project will be implemented. Projects include habitat
restoration projects, habitat protection projects, habitat projects
that improve water quality, habitat projects that protect water
quality, habitat-related mitigation projects, and habitat project
maintenance and monitoring activities.
(4) "Habitat work schedule" means those projects from the habitat
project list that will be implemented during the current funding cycle.
The schedule shall also include a list of the entities and individuals
implementing projects, the start date, duration, estimated date of
completion, estimated cost, and funding sources for the projects.
(5) "Limiting factors" means conditions that limit the ability of
habitat to fully sustain populations of salmon. These factors are
primarily fish passage barriers and degraded estuarine areas, riparian
corridors, stream channels, and wetlands.
(6) "Project sponsor" is a county, city, special district, tribal
government, state agency, a combination of such governments through
interlocal or interagency agreements, a nonprofit organization,
regional fisheries enhancement group, or one or more private citizens.
A project sponsored by a state agency may be funded by the board only
if it is included on the habitat project list submitted by the lead
entity for that area and the state agency has a local partner that
would otherwise qualify as a project sponsor.
(7) "Regional recovery organization" or "regional salmon recovery
organization" means an entity formed under RCW 77.85.090 for the
purpose of recovering salmon, which is recognized in statute or by the
statewide salmon recovery office.
(8) "Salmon" includes all species of the family Salmonidae which
are capable of self-sustaining, natural production.
(9) "Salmon recovery plan" means a state or regional plan developed
in response to a proposed or actual listing under the federal
endangered species act that addresses limiting factors including, but
not limited to harvest, hatchery, hydropower, habitat, and other
factors of decline.
(10) "Salmon recovery region" means geographic areas of the state
identified or formed under RCW 77.85.090 that encompass groups of
watersheds in the state with common stocks of salmon identified for
recovery activities, and that generally are consistent with the
geographic areas within the state identified by the national oceanic
and atmospheric administration or the United States fish and wildlife
service for activities under the federal endangered species act.
(11) "Salmon recovery strategy" means the strategy adopted under
RCW 77.85.150 and includes the compilation of all subbasin and regional
salmon recovery plans developed in response to a proposed or actual
listing under the federal endangered species act with state hatchery,
harvest, and hydropower plans compiled in accordance with RCW
77.85.150.
(12) "Tribe" or "tribes" means federally recognized Indian tribes.
(13) "WRIA" means a water resource inventory area established in
chapter 173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 1997.
(14) "Owner" means the person holding title to the land or the
person under contract with the owner to lease or manage the legal
owner's property.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.85.020 and 2005 c 309 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((By December 1, 2006)) No later than January 31, 2009, and
every odd-numbered year thereafter, the ((governor)) statewide salmon
recovery office shall submit a biennial state of the salmon report to
the legislature and the governor regarding the implementation of the
state's salmon recovery strategy. The report may include the
following:
(a) A description of the amount of in-kind and financial
contributions, including volunteer, private, and state, federal, tribal
as available, and local government money directly spent on salmon
recovery in response to actual, proposed, or expected endangered
species act listings;
(b) A summary of habitat projects including but not limited to:
(i) A summary of accomplishments in removing barriers to salmon
passage and an identification of existing barriers;
(ii) A summary of salmon restoration efforts undertaken in the past
two years;
(iii) A summary of the role which private volunteer initiatives
contribute in salmon habitat restoration efforts; and
(iv) A summary of efforts taken to protect salmon habitat;
(c) A summary of collaborative efforts undertaken with adjoining
states or Canada;
(d) A summary of harvest and hatchery management activities
affecting salmon recovery;
(e) A summary of information regarding impediments to successful
salmon recovery efforts;
(f) A summary of the number and types of violations of existing
laws pertaining to: (i) Water quality; and (ii) salmon. The summary
shall include information about the types of sanctions imposed for
these violations;
(g) Information on the estimated carrying capacity of new habitat
created pursuant to chapter 246, Laws of 1998; and
(h) Recommendations to the legislature that would further the
success of salmon recovery. The recommendations may include:
(i) The need to expand or improve nonregulatory programs and
activities;
(ii) The need to expand or improve state and local laws and
regulations; and
(iii) Recommendations for state funding assistance to recovery
activities and projects.
(2) The report shall summarize the monitoring data coordinated by
the monitoring forum. The summary must include but is not limited to
data and analysis related to:
(a) Measures of progress in fish recovery;
(b) Measures of factors limiting recovery as well as trends in such
factors; and
(c) The status of implementation of projects and activities.
(3) The department, the department of ecology, the department of
natural resources, the state conservation commission, and the
governor's monitoring forum shall provide to the statewide salmon
recovery office information requested by the office necessary to
prepare the state of the salmon report and other reports produced by
the office.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.85.030 and 2005 c 309 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The statewide salmon recovery office is created within the
office of the ((governor)) interagency committee for outdoor recreation
to coordinate state strategy to allow for salmon recovery to healthy
sustainable population levels with productive commercial and
recreational fisheries. The primary purpose of the office is to
coordinate and assist in the development, implementation, and revision
of regional salmon recovery plans as an integral part of a statewide
strategy developed consistent with the guiding principles and
procedures under RCW 77.85.150. The ((governor's)) statewide salmon
recovery office shall gather regional recovery plans from regional
recovery organizations and submit the plans to the federal fish
services for adoption as federal recovery plans. The statewide salmon
recovery office shall work with regional salmon recovery organizations
including the southwest Washington salmon recovery region established
in RCW 77.85.090 and the Puget Sound partnership, created by chapter .
. ., ([House][Senate] Bill No. .... (Z-0369/07)), Laws of 2007 on
salmon recovery issues in order to ensure a coordinated and consistent
statewide approach to salmon recovery. The ((governor's)) statewide
salmon recovery office may also:
(((a))) (1) Assist state agencies, local governments, landowners,
and other interested parties in obtaining federal assurances that
plans, programs, or activities are consistent with fish recovery under
the federal endangered species act;
(((b))) (2) Act as liaison to local governments, the state
congressional delegation, the United States congress, federally
recognized tribes, and the federal executive branch agencies for issues
related to the state's salmon recovery plans; ((and
(c))) (3) Provide periodic reports pursuant to RCW 77.85.020; and
(4) Provide, as appropriate, technical and administrative support
to the independent science panel or other science-related panels on
issues pertaining to salmon recovery.
(((2) This section expires June 30, 2007.))

Sec. 5 RCW 77.85.040 and 2005 c 309 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor shall request the national academy of sciences,
the American fisheries society, or a comparable institution to screen
candidates to serve as members on the independent science panel. The
institution that conducts the screening of the candidates shall submit
a list of the nine most qualified candidates to the governor, the
speaker of the house of representatives, and the majority leader of the
senate. The candidates shall reflect expertise in habitat requirements
of salmon, protection and restoration of salmon populations, artificial
propagation of salmon, hydrology, or geomorphology.
(2) The speaker of the house of representatives and the majority
leader in the senate may each remove one name from the nomination list.
The governor shall consult with tribal representatives and the governor
shall appoint five scientists from the remaining names on the
nomination list.
(3) The members of the independent science panel shall serve four-year terms. Vacant positions on the panel shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointments. Members shall serve no more than
two full terms. The independent science panel members shall elect the
chair of the panel among themselves every two years. Based upon
available funding, the ((governor's)) statewide salmon recovery office
may contract for services with members of the independent science panel
for compensation under chapter 39.29 RCW.
(4) The independent science panel shall be governed by generally
accepted guidelines and practices governing the activities of
independent science boards such as the national academy of sciences.
The purpose of the independent science panel is to help ensure that
sound science is used in salmon recovery efforts. The ((governor's))
statewide salmon recovery office may request review of regional salmon
recovery plans by the science review panel. The science panel does not
have the authority to review individual projects or habitat project
lists developed under RCW 77.85.050 or 77.85.060 or to make policy
decisions. The panel shall periodically submit its findings and
recommendations under this subsection to the legislature and the
governor.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.85.090 and 2005 c 309 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The southwest Washington salmon recovery region, whose
boundaries are provided in chapter 60, Laws of 1998, is created.
(2) Lead entities within a salmon recovery region that agree to
form a regional salmon recovery organization may be recognized by the
statewide salmon recovery office as a regional recovery organization.
The regional recovery organization may plan, coordinate, and monitor
the implementation of a regional recovery plan in accordance with RCW
77.85.150. Regional recovery organizations existing as of July 24,
2005, that have developed draft recovery plans approved by the
governor's salmon recovery office by July 1, 2005, may continue to
plan, coordinate, and monitor the implementation of regional recovery
plans.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.85.150 and 2005 c 309 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor, with the assistance of the statewide salmon
recovery office, shall maintain and revise, as appropriate, a statewide
salmon recovery strategy.
(2) The governor and the statewide salmon recovery office shall be
guided by the following considerations in maintaining and revising the
strategy:
(a) The strategy should identify statewide initiatives and
responsibilities with regional recovery plans and local watershed
initiatives as the principal means for implementing the strategy;
(b) The strategy should emphasize collaborative, incentive-based
approaches;
(c) The strategy should address all factors limiting the recovery
of Washington's listed salmon stocks, including habitat and water
quality degradation, harvest and hatchery management, inadequate
streamflows, and other barriers to fish passage. Where other limiting
factors are beyond the state's jurisdictional authorities to respond
to, such as some natural predators and high seas fishing, the strategy
shall include the state's requests for federal action to effectively
address these factors;
(d) The strategy should identify immediate actions necessary to
prevent extinction of a listed salmon stock, establish performance
measures to determine if restoration efforts are working, recommend
effective monitoring and data management, and recommend to the
legislature clear and certain measures to be implemented if performance
goals are not met;
(e) The strategy shall rely on the best scientific information
available and provide for incorporation of new information as it is
obtained;
(f) The strategy should seek a fair allocation of the burdens and
costs upon economic and social sectors of the state whose activities
may contribute to limiting the recovery of salmon; and
(g) The strategy should seek clear measures and procedures from the
appropriate federal agencies for removing Washington's salmon stocks
from listing under the federal act.
(3) ((Beginning on September 1, 2000,)) If the strategy ((shall
be)) is updated ((through)), an active and thorough public involvement
process, including early and meaningful opportunity for public comment,
must be utilized. In obtaining public comment, the statewide salmon
recovery office shall ((hold public meetings)) work with regional
salmon recovery organizations throughout the state and shall encourage
regional and local recovery planning efforts to ((similarly)) ensure an
active public involvement process.
(4) This section shall apply prospectively only and not
retroactively. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
invalidate actions taken in recovery planning at the local, regional,
or state level prior to July 1, 1999.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.85.200 and 2005 c 308 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A program for salmon and steelhead recovery is established in
Clark, Cowlitz, Lewis, Skamania, and Wahkiakum counties within the
habitat areas classified as the lower Columbia evolutionarily
significant units by the federal national marine fisheries service.
The management board created under subsection (2) of this section is
responsible for developing and overseeing the implementation of the
habitat portion of the salmon and steelhead recovery plan and is
empowered to receive and disburse funds for the salmon and steelhead
recovery initiatives. The management board created pursuant to this
section shall constitute the lead entity and the committee established
under RCW 77.85.050 responsible for fulfilling the requirements and
exercising powers under this chapter.
(2) A management board consisting of fifteen voting members is
created within the lower Columbia evolutionarily significant units.
The members shall consist of one county commissioner or designee from
each of the five participating counties selected by each county
legislative authority; one member representing the cities contained
within the lower Columbia evolutionarily significant units as a voting
member selected by the cities in the lower Columbia evolutionarily
significant units; a representative of the Cowlitz Tribe appointed by
the tribe; one state legislator elected from one of the legislative
districts contained within the lower Columbia evolutionarily
significant units selected by that group of state legislators
representing the area; five representatives to include at least one
member who represents private property interests appointed by the five
county commissioners or designees; one hydro utility representative
nominated by hydro utilities and appointed by the five county
commissioners or designees; and one representative nominated from the
environmental community who resides in the lower Columbia
evolutionarily significant units appointed by the five county
commissioners or designees. The board shall appoint and consult a
technical advisory committee, which shall include four representatives
of state agencies one each appointed by the directors of the
departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and transportation, and the
commissioner of public lands. The board may also appoint additional
persons to the technical advisory committee as needed. The chair of
the board shall be selected from among the members of the management
board by the five county commissioners or designees and the legislator
on the board. In making appointments under this subsection, the county
commissioners shall consider recommendations of interested parties.
Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original
appointments were selected. No action may be brought or maintained
against any management board member, the management board, or any of
its agents, officers, or employees for any noncontractual acts or
omissions in carrying out the purposes of this section.
(3)(a) The management board shall participate in the development of
a habitat recovery plan to implement its responsibilities under (b) of
this subsection. The management board shall consider local watershed
efforts and activities as well as habitat conservation plans in the
development and implementation of the recovery plan. Any of the
participating counties may continue its own efforts for restoring
steelhead habitat. Nothing in this section limits the authority of
units of local government to enter into interlocal agreements under
chapter 39.34 RCW or any other provision of law.
(b) The management board is responsible for the development of a
lower Columbia salmon and steelhead habitat recovery plan and for
coordinating and monitoring the implementation of the plan. The
management board will submit all future plans and amendments to plans
to the ((governor's)) statewide salmon recovery office for the
incorporation of hatchery, harvest, and hydropower components of the
statewide salmon recovery strategy for all submissions to the national
marine fisheries service. In developing and implementing the habitat
recovery plan, the management board will work with appropriate federal
and state agencies, tribal governments, local governments, and the
public to make sure hatchery, harvest, and hydropower components
receive consideration in context with the habitat component. The
management board may work in cooperation with the state and the
national marine fisheries service to modify the plan, or to address
habitat for other aquatic species that may be subsequently listed under
the federal endangered species act. The management board may not
exercise authority over land or water within the individual counties or
otherwise preempt the authority of any units of local government.
(c) The management board shall prioritize as appropriate and
approve projects and programs related to the recovery of lower Columbia
river salmon and steelhead runs, including the funding of those
projects and programs, and coordinate local government efforts as
prescribed in the recovery plan. The management board shall establish
criteria for funding projects and programs based upon their likely
value in salmon and steelhead recovery. The management board may
consider local economic impact among the criteria, but jurisdictional
boundaries and factors related to jurisdictional population may not be
considered as part of the criteria.
(d) The management board shall assess the factors for decline along
each tributary basin in the lower Columbia. The management board is
encouraged to take a stream-by-stream approach in conducting the
assessment which utilizes state and local expertise, including
volunteer groups, interest groups, and affected units of local
government.
(4) The management board has the authority to hire and fire staff,
including an executive director, enter into contracts, accept grants
and other moneys, disburse funds, make recommendations to cities and
counties about potential code changes and the development of programs
and incentives upon request, pay all necessary expenses, and may choose
a fiduciary agent. The management board shall report on its progress
on a biennial basis to the legislative bodies of the five participating
counties and the state natural resource-related agencies. The
management board shall prepare a final report at the conclusion of the
program describing its efforts and successes in developing and
implementing the lower Columbia salmon and steelhead recovery plan.
The final report shall be transmitted to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, the legislative bodies of the participating counties,
and the state natural resource-related agencies.
(5) The program terminates on July 1, 2010.
(6) For purposes of this section, "evolutionarily significant unit"
means the habitat area identified for an evolutionarily significant
unit of an aquatic species listed or proposed for listing as a
threatened or endangered species under the federal endangered species
act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).

Sec. 9 RCW 43.41.270 and 2001 c 227 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall assist natural
resource-related agencies in developing outcome-focused performance
measures for administering natural resource-related and environmentally
based grant and loan programs. These performance measures are to be
used in determining grant eligibility, for program management and
performance assessment.
(2) The office of financial management and the ((governor's))
statewide salmon recovery office shall assist natural resource-related
agencies in developing recommendations for a monitoring program to
measure outcome-focused performance measures required by this section.
The recommendations must be consistent with the framework and
coordinated monitoring strategy developed by the monitoring oversight
committee established in RCW 77.85.210.
(3) Natural resource agencies shall consult with grant or loan
recipients including local governments, tribes, nongovernmental
organizations, and other interested parties, and report to the office
of financial management on the implementation of this section. The
office of financial management shall report to the appropriate
legislative committees of the legislature on the agencies'
implementation of this section, including any necessary changes in
current law, and funding requirements by July 31, 2002. Natural
resource agencies shall assist the office of financial management in
preparing the report, including complying with time frames for
submitting information established by the office of financial
management.
(4) For purposes of this section, "natural resource-related
agencies" include the department of ecology, the department of natural
resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the state conservation
commission, the interagency committee for outdoor recreation, the
salmon recovery funding board, and the public works board within the
department of community, trade, and economic development.
(5) For purposes of this section, "natural resource-related
environmentally based grant and loan programs" includes the
conservation reserve enhancement program; dairy nutrient management
grants under chapter 90.64 RCW; state conservation commission water
quality grants under chapter 89.08 RCW; coordinated prevention grants,
public participation grants, and remedial action grants under RCW
70.105D.070; water pollution control facilities financing under chapter
70.146 RCW; aquatic lands enhancement grants under RCW ((79.24.580))
79.105.150; habitat grants under the Washington wildlife and recreation
program under RCW 79A.15.040; salmon recovery grants under chapter
77.85 RCW; and the public ((work[s])) works trust fund program under
chapter 43.155 RCW. The term also includes programs administered by
the department of fish and wildlife related to protection or recovery
of fish stocks which are funded with moneys from the capital budget.

Sec. 10 RCW 79A.25.240 and 2003 c 39 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
The interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall provide
necessary grants and loan administration support to the salmon recovery
funding board as provided in RCW 77.85.120. The committee shall also
be responsible for tracking salmon recovery expenditures under RCW
77.85.140. The committee shall provide all necessary administrative
support to the board, and the board shall be located with the
committee. ((The committee shall provide necessary information to the
salmon recovery office.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 4 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 2007.

--- END ---