BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.33.035 and 2004 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agricultural methods" means the cultivation of trees that are
grown on land prepared by intensive cultivation and tilling, such as
irrigating, plowing, or turning over the soil, and on which all
unwanted plant growth is controlled continuously for the exclusive
purpose of raising trees such as Christmas trees and short-rotation
hardwoods.
(2) "Average rate of inflation" means the annual rate of inflation
as determined by the department averaged over the period of time as
provided in RCW 84.33.220 (1) and (2). This rate shall be published in
the state register by the department not later than January 1st of each
year for use in that assessment year.
(3) "Commercial purposes" means the use of the forest land on a
continuous and regular basis after application for designation that
demonstrates the owner will engage in and intends to obtain, through
lawful means, monetary profit from cash income by growing and
harvesting timber, including timber grown using the methods described
in subsection (1) of this section. However, this requirement does not
apply if there is a governmental restriction that prohibits, in whole
or in part, the owner from harvesting timber from the parcel.
(4) "Composite property tax rate" for a county means the total
amount of property taxes levied upon forest lands by all taxing
districts in the county other than the state, divided by the total
assessed value of all forest land in the county.
(((4))) (5) "Forest land" is synonymous with "designated forest
land" and means any parcel of land that is ((twenty)) five or more
acres or multiple parcels of land that are contiguous and total
((twenty)) five or more acres that is or are devoted primarily to
growing and harvesting timber for commercial purposes as defined in
this section. Designated forest land means the land only and does not
include a residential homesite. The term includes land used for
incidental uses that are compatible with the growing and harvesting of
timber but no more than ten percent of the land may be used for such
incidental uses. It also includes the land on which appurtenances
necessary for the production, preparation, or sale of the timber
products exist in conjunction with land producing these products.
(((5))) (6) "Harvested" means the time when in the ordinary course
of business the quantity of timber by species is first definitely
determined. The amount harvested shall be determined by the Scribner
Decimal C Scale or other prevalent measuring practice adjusted to
arrive at substantially equivalent measurements, as approved by the
department.
(((6))) (7) "Harvester" means every person who from the person's
own land or from the land of another under a right or license granted
by lease or contract, either directly or by contracting with others for
the necessary labor or mechanical services, fells, cuts, or takes
timber for sale or for commercial or industrial use. When the United
States or any instrumentality thereof, the state, including its
departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any
municipal corporation therein so fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale
or for commercial or industrial use, the harvester is the first person
other than the United States or any instrumentality thereof, the state,
including its departments and institutions and political subdivisions,
or any municipal corporation therein, who acquires title to or a
possessory interest in the timber. The term "harvester" does not
include persons performing under contract the necessary labor or
mechanical services for a harvester.
(((7))) (8) "Harvesting and marketing costs" means only those costs
directly associated with harvesting the timber from the land and
delivering it to the buyer and may include the costs of disposing of
logging residues. Any other costs that are not directly and
exclusively related to harvesting and marketing of the timber, such as
costs of permanent roads or costs of reforesting the land following
harvest, are not harvesting and marketing costs.
(((8))) (9) "Incidental use" means a use of designated forest land
that is compatible with its purpose for growing and harvesting timber.
An incidental use may include a gravel pit, a shed or land used to
store machinery or equipment used in conjunction with the timber
enterprise, and any other use that does not interfere with or indicate
that the forest land is no longer primarily being used to grow and
harvest timber.
(((9))) (10) "Local government" means any city, town, county,
water-sewer district, public utility district, port district,
irrigation district, flood control district, or any other municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other political
subdivision authorized to levy special benefit assessments for sanitary
or storm sewerage systems, domestic water supply or distribution
systems, or road construction or improvement purposes.
(((10))) (11) "Local improvement district" means any local
improvement district, utility local improvement district, local utility
district, road improvement district, or any similar unit created by a
local government for the purpose of levying special benefit assessments
against property specially benefited by improvements relating to the
districts.
(((11))) (12) "Owner" means the party or parties having the fee
interest in land, except where land is subject to a real estate
contract "owner" means the contract vendee.
(((12))) (13) "Primarily" or "primary use" means the existing use
of the land is so prevalent that when the characteristic use of the
land is evaluated any other use appears to be conflicting or
nonrelated.
(((13))) (14) "Short-rotation hardwoods" means hardwood trees, such
as but not limited to hybrid cottonwoods, cultivated by agricultural
methods in growing cycles shorter than fifteen years.
(((14))) (15) "Small harvester" means every person who from his or
her own land or from the land of another under a right or license
granted by lease or contract, either directly or by contracting with
others for the necessary labor or mechanical services, fells, cuts, or
takes timber for sale or for commercial or industrial use in an amount
not exceeding two million board feet in a calendar year. When the
United States or any instrumentality thereof, the state, including its
departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any
municipal corporation therein so fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale
or for commercial or industrial use, not exceeding these amounts, the
small harvester is the first person other than the United States or any
instrumentality thereof, the state, including its departments and
institutions and political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation
therein, who acquires title to or a possessory interest in the timber.
Small harvester does not include persons performing under contract the
necessary labor or mechanical services for a harvester, and it does not
include the harvesters of Christmas trees or short-rotation hardwoods.
(((15))) (16) "Special benefit assessments" means special
assessments levied or capable of being levied in any local improvement
district or otherwise levied or capable of being levied by a local
government to pay for all or part of the costs of a local improvement
and which may be levied only for the special benefits to be realized by
property by reason of that local improvement.
(((16))) (17) "Stumpage value of timber" means the appropriate
stumpage value shown on tables prepared by the department under RCW
84.33.091, provided that for timber harvested from public land and sold
under a competitive bidding process, stumpage value shall mean the
actual amount paid to the seller in cash or other consideration. The
stumpage value of timber from public land does not include harvesting
and marketing costs if the timber from public land is harvested by, or
under contract for, the United States or any instrumentality of the
United States, the state, including its departments and institutions
and political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation therein.
Whenever payment for the stumpage includes considerations other than
cash, the value shall be the fair market value of the other
consideration. If the other consideration is permanent roads, the
value of the roads shall be the appraised value as appraised by the
seller.
(((17))) (18) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on
privately or publicly owned land, and except as provided in RCW
84.33.170 includes Christmas trees and short-rotation hardwoods.
(((18))) (19) "Timber assessed value" for a county means the sum
of: (a) The total stumpage value of timber harvested from publicly
owned land in the county multiplied by the public timber ratio, plus;
(b) the total stumpage value of timber harvested from privately owned
land in the county multiplied by the private timber ratio. The
numerator of the public timber ratio is the rate of tax imposed by the
county under RCW 84.33.051 on public timber harvests for the year of
the calculation. The numerator of the private timber ratio is the rate
of tax imposed by the county under RCW 84.33.051 on private timber
harvests for the year of the calculation. The denominator of the
private timber ratio and the public timber ratio is the composite
property tax rate for the county for taxes due in the year of the
calculation, expressed as a percentage of assessed value. The
department shall use the stumpage value of timber harvested during the
most recent four calendar quarters for which the information is
available. The department shall calculate the timber assessed value
for each county before October 1st of each year.
(((19))) (20) "Timber assessed value" for a taxing district means
the timber assessed value for the county multiplied by a ratio. The
numerator of the ratio is the total assessed value of forest land in
the taxing district. The denominator is the total assessed value of
forest land in the county. As used in this section, "assessed value of
forest land" means the assessed value of forest land for taxes due in
the year the timber assessed value for the county is calculated plus an
additional value for public forest land. The additional value for
public forest land is the product of the number of acres of public
forest land that are available for timber harvesting determined under
RCW 84.33.089 and the average assessed value per acre of private forest
land in the county.
(((20))) (21) "Timber management plan" means a plan prepared by a
trained forester, or any other person with adequate knowledge of timber
management practices, concerning the use of the land to grow and
harvest timber. Such a plan ((includes)) may include:
(a) A legal description of the forest land;
(b) A statement that the forest land is held in contiguous
ownership of ((twenty)) five or more acres and is primarily devoted to
and used to grow and harvest timber;
(c) A brief description of the timber on the forest land or, if the
timber on the land has been harvested, the owner's plan to restock the
land with timber;
(d) A statement about whether the forest land is also used to graze
livestock;
(e) A statement about whether the land has been used in compliance
with the restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect and
disease control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW; and
(f) If the land has been recently harvested or supports a growth of
brush and noncommercial type timber, a description of the owner's plan
to restock the forest land within three years.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.33.130 and 2003 c 170 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a)(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, lands that
were assessed as classified forest land before July 22, 2001, or as
open space timber land under chapter 84.34 RCW before the merger date
adopted by the county under section 5 of this act, shall be designated
forest land for the purposes of this chapter.
(ii) The owners of ((previously classified forest)) land subject to
the requirements of (a)(i) of this subsection shall not be required to
apply for designation under this chapter. ((As of July 22, 2001,)) The
land and timber on such land shall be assessed and taxed in accordance
with the provisions of this chapter as of the date the land is
designated forest land under (a)(i) of this subsection.
(b) If a county legislative authority opts under section 5 of this
act to merge its open space timber land program with the designated
forest land program of the county, the following provisions apply
beginning on the adopted merger date:
(i) The date the property was classified as open space timber land
before the merger shall be considered to be the date the property was
designated as forest land under this chapter;
(ii) The county assessor shall notify each owner of open space
timber land of the merger by certified mail; and
(iii) For any forest land subject to the provisions of (b)(i) of
this subsection that is then removed from designation, only
compensating tax shall be collected as a result of the removal in
accordance with RCW 84.33.140(12), unless otherwise provided by law.
(2) An owner of land desiring that it be designated as forest land
and valued under RCW 84.33.140 as of January 1st of any year shall
submit an application to the assessor of the county in which the land
is located before January 1st of that year. The application shall be
accompanied by a reasonable processing fee when the county legislative
authority has established the requirement for such a fee.
(3) No application of designation is required when publicly owned
forest land is exchanged for privately owned forest land designated
under this chapter. The land exchanged and received by an owner
subject to ad valorem taxation shall be automatically granted
designation under this chapter if the following conditions are met:
(a) The land will be used to grow and harvest timber; and
(b) The owner of the land submits a document to the assessor's
office that explains the details of the forest land exchange within
sixty days of the closing date of the exchange. However, if the owner
fails to submit information regarding the exchange by the end of this
sixty-day period, the owner must file an application for designation as
forest land under this chapter and the regular application process will
be followed.
(4) The application shall be made upon forms prepared by the
department and supplied by the assessor, and shall include the
following:
(a) A legal description of, or assessor's parcel numbers for, all
land the applicant desires to be designated as forest land;
(b) The date or dates of acquisition of the land;
(c) A brief description of the timber on the land, or if the timber
has been harvested, the owner's plan for restocking;
(d) A copy of the timber management plan, if one exists, for the
land prepared by a trained forester or any other person with adequate
knowledge of timber management practices;
(e) If a timber management plan exists, an explanation of the
nature and extent to which the management plan has been implemented;
(f) Whether the land is used for grazing;
(g) Whether the land has been subdivided or a plat has been filed
with respect to the land;
(h) Whether the land and the applicant are in compliance with the
restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect and disease
control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable
rules under Title 76 RCW;
(i) Whether the land is subject to forest fire protection
assessments under RCW 76.04.610;
(j) Whether the land is subject to a lease, option, or other right
that permits it to be used for any purpose other than growing and
harvesting timber;
(k) A summary of the past experience and activity of the applicant
in growing and harvesting timber;
(l) A summary of current and continuing activity of the applicant
in growing and harvesting timber;
(m) A statement that the applicant is aware of the potential tax
liability involved when the land ceases to be designated as forest
land;
(n) An affirmation that the statements contained in the application
are true and that the land described in the application meets the
definition of forest land in RCW 84.33.035; and
(o) A description and/or drawing showing what areas of land for
which designation is sought are used for incidental uses compatible
with the definition of forest land in RCW 84.33.035.
(5) The assessor shall afford the applicant an opportunity to be
heard if the applicant so requests.
(6) The assessor shall act upon the application with due regard to
all relevant evidence and without any one or more items of evidence
necessarily being determinative, except that the application may be
denied for one of the following reasons, without regard to other items:
(a) The land does not contain a "merchantable stand of timber" as
defined in chapter 76.09 RCW and applicable rules. This reason shall
not alone be sufficient to deny the application (i) if the land has
been recently harvested or supports a growth of brush or noncommercial
type timber, and the application includes a plan for restocking within
three years or a longer period necessitated by unavailability of seed
or seedlings, or (ii) if only isolated areas within the land do not
meet the minimum standards due to rock outcroppings, swamps,
unproductive soil or other natural conditions;
(b) The applicant, with respect to the land, has failed to comply
with a final administrative or judicial order with respect to a
violation of the restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect
and disease control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or
any applicable rules under Title 76 RCW; or
(c) The land abuts a body of salt water and lies between the line
of ordinary high tide and a line paralleling the ordinary high tide
line and two hundred feet horizontally landward from the high tide
line. However, if the assessor determines that a higher and better use
exists for the land but this use would not be permitted or economically
feasible by virtue of any federal, state, or local law or regulation,
the land shall be assessed and valued under RCW 84.33.140 without being
designated as forest land.
(7) The application shall be deemed to have been approved unless,
prior to ((May)) July 1st of the year after the application was mailed
or delivered to the assessor, the assessor notifies the applicant in
writing of the extent to which the application is denied.
(8) An owner who receives notice that his or her application has
been denied, in whole or in part, may appeal the denial to the county
board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW
84.40.038.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.33.140 and 2005 c 303 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has been designated as forest land under RCW
84.33.130, a notation of the designation shall be made each year upon
the assessment and tax rolls. A copy of the notice of approval
together with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for
the land shall, at the expense of the applicant, be filed by the
assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded.
(2) In preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002, for
taxes payable in 2003 and each January 1st thereafter, the assessor
shall list each parcel of designated forest land at a value with
respect to the grade and class provided in this subsection and adjusted
as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The assessor shall
compute the assessed value of the land using the same assessment ratio
applied generally in computing the assessed value of other property in
the county. Values for the several grades of bare forest land shall be
as follows:

LAND
GRADE OPERABILITY
CLASS VALUES
PER ACRE

1 $234

1 2 229

3 217

4 157

1 198

2 2 190

3 183

4 132

1 154

3 2 149

3 148

4 113

1 117

4 2 114

3 113

4 86

1 85

5 2 78

3 77

4 52

1 43

6 2 39

3 39

4 37

1 21

7 2 21

3 20

4 20

8 1

(3) On or before December 31, 2001, the department shall adjust by
rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, the forest land values contained in
subsection (2) of this section in accordance with this subsection, and
shall certify the adjusted values to the assessor who will use these
values in preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002. For the
adjustment to be made on or before December 31, 2001, for use in the
2002 assessment year, the department shall:
(a) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1996, and June 30, 2001, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(b) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1995, and June 30, 2000, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(c) Adjust the forest land values contained in subsection (2) of
this section by a percentage equal to one-half of the percentage change
in the average values of harvested timber reflected by comparing the
resultant values calculated under (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(4) For the adjustments to be made on or before December 31, 2002,
and each succeeding year thereafter, the same procedure described in
subsection (3) of this section shall be followed using harvester excise
tax returns filed under RCW 84.33.074. However, this adjustment shall
be made to the prior year's adjusted value, and the five-year periods
for calculating average harvested timber values shall be successively
one year more recent.
(5) Land graded, assessed, and valued as forest land shall continue
to be so graded, assessed, and valued until removal of designation by
the assessor upon the occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove the designation;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership making the land exempt from ad
valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of forest land
designation continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or
devisee of a deceased owner, shall not, by itself, result in removal of
designation. The signed notice of continuance shall be attached to the
real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW 82.45.150. The
notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the department.
If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and
attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all compensating
taxes calculated under subsection (11) of this section shall become due
and payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor
shall not accept an instrument of conveyance regarding designated
forest land for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed the
notice of continuance or the compensating tax has been paid, as
evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the
treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the new
assessed valuation calculated under subsection (11) of this section to
the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of
equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that:
(i) The land is no longer primarily devoted to and used for growing
and harvesting timber. However, land shall not be removed from
designation if a governmental agency, organization, or other recipient
identified in subsection (13) or (14) of this section as exempt from
the payment of compensating tax has manifested its intent in writing or
by other official action to acquire a property interest in the
designated forest land by means of a transaction that qualifies for an
exemption under subsection (13) or (14) of this section. The
governmental agency, organization, or recipient shall annually provide
the assessor of the county in which the land is located reasonable
evidence in writing of the intent to acquire the designated land as
long as the intent continues or within sixty days of a request by the
assessor. The assessor may not request this evidence more than once in
a calendar year;
(ii) The owner has failed to comply with a final administrative or
judicial order with respect to a violation of the restocking, forest
management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest
debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules under Title
76 RCW; or
(iii) Restocking has not occurred to the extent or within the time
specified in the application for designation of such land.
(6) Land shall not be removed from designation if there is a
governmental restriction that prohibits, in whole or in part, the owner
from harvesting timber from the owner's designated forest land. If
only a portion of the parcel is impacted by governmental restrictions
of this nature, the restrictions cannot be used as a basis to remove
the remainder of the forest land from designation under this chapter.
For the purposes of this section, "governmental restrictions" includes:
(a) Any law, regulation, rule, ordinance, program, or other action
adopted or taken by a federal, state, county, city, or other
governmental entity; or (b) the land's zoning or its presence within an
urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110.
(7) The assessor shall have the option of requiring an owner of
forest land to file a timber management plan with the assessor upon the
occurrence of one of the following:
(a) An application for designation as forest land is submitted;
((or))
(b) Designated forest land is sold or transferred and a notice of
continuance, described in subsection (5)(c) of this section, is signed;
or
(c) The assessor has reason to believe that the land is no longer
being used as designated forest land. In this case, the assessor can
require such a plan to determine whether the land can continue as
designated forest land.
(8) If land is removed from designation because of any of the
circumstances listed in subsection (5)(a) through (c) of this section,
the removal shall apply only to the land affected. If land is removed
from designation because of subsection (5)(d) of this section, the
removal shall apply only to the actual area of land that is no longer
primarily devoted to the growing and harvesting of timber, without
regard to any other land that may have been included in the application
and approved for designation, as long as the remaining designated
forest land meets the definition of forest land contained in RCW
84.33.035.
(9) Within thirty days after the removal of designation as forest
land, the assessor shall notify the owner in writing, setting forth the
reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal
the removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(10) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal a copy of the notice
of removal with a notation of the action, if any, upon appeal, together
with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for the land
removed from designation shall, at the expense of the applicant, be
filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded and a
notation of removal from designation shall immediately be made upon the
assessment and tax rolls. The assessor shall revalue the land to be
removed with reference to its true and fair value as of January 1st of
the year of removal from designation. Both the assessed value before
and after the removal of designation shall be listed. Taxes based on
the value of the land as forest land shall be assessed and payable up
until the date of removal and taxes based on the true and fair value of
the land shall be assessed and payable from the date of removal from
designation.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c), (13), or (14) of this
section, a compensating tax shall be imposed on land removed from
designation as forest land. The compensating tax shall be due and
payable to the treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the
amount of this tax. As soon as possible after the land is removed from
designation, the assessor shall compute the amount of compensating tax
and mail a notice to the owner of the amount of compensating tax owed
and the date on which payment of this tax is due. The amount of
compensating tax shall be equal to the difference between the amount of
tax last levied on the land as designated forest land and an amount
equal to the new assessed value of the land multiplied by the dollar
rate of the last levy extended against the land, multiplied by a
number, in no event greater than nine, equal to the number of years for
which the land was designated as forest land, plus compensating taxes
on the land at forest land values up until the date of removal and the
prorated taxes on the land at true and fair value from the date of
removal to the end of the current tax year.
(12) Compensating tax, together with applicable interest thereon,
shall become a lien on the land which shall attach at the time the land
is removed from designation as forest land and shall have priority to
and shall be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance,
mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with
which the land may become charged or liable. The lien may be
foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in
the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent
real property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax
unpaid on its due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the
date of delinquency until paid, interest shall be charged at the same
rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(13) The compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation under
subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other forest
land located within the state of Washington;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) A donation of fee title, development rights, or the right to
harvest timber, to a government agency or organization qualified under
RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those
sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to a governmental entity
or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW
64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands
recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural
heritage council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70
RCW or approved for state natural resources conservation area purposes
as defined in chapter 79.71 RCW. At such time as the land is not used
for the purposes enumerated, the compensating tax specified in
subsection (11) of this section shall be imposed upon the current
owner;
(d) The sale or transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation
commission for park and recreation purposes;
(e) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located that disallows the
present use of the land;
(f) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(g) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040; or
(h) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34
RCW continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(((13)(h); or
(i) The sale or transfer of land after the death of the owner of at
least a fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been
assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated as forest
land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34 RCW
continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place after July
22, 2001, and on or before July 22, 2003, and the death of the owner
occurred after January 1, 1991. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(13)(i))).
(14) In a county with a population of more than one million
inhabitants, the compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation as forest
land under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) An action described in subsection (13) of this section; or
(b) A transfer of a property interest to a government entity, or to
a nonprofit historic preservation corporation or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or
enhance public resources, or to preserve, maintain, improve, restore,
limit the future use of, or otherwise to conserve for public use or
enjoyment, the property interest being transferred. At such time as
the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax shall be imposed upon the current owner.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.33.145 and 2001 c 249 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If no later than thirty days after removal of designation under
this chapter the owner applies for classification under:
(a) RCW 84.34.020(1)((,));
(b) RCW 84.34.020(2)((,)); or (((3)))
(c) RCW 84.34.030(3), unless the open space timber land program and
designated forest land program are merged under section 5 of this act,
then, for the purposes of (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, the
designated forest land shall not be considered removed from designation
for purposes of the compensating tax under RCW 84.33.140 until the
application for current use classification under chapter 84.34 RCW is
denied or the property is removed from classification under RCW
84.34.108.
(2) Upon removal of classification under RCW 84.34.108, the amount
of compensating tax due under this chapter shall be equal to:
(a) The difference, if any, between the amount of tax last levied
on the land as designated forest land and an amount equal to the new
assessed valuation of the land when removed from classification under
RCW 84.34.108 multiplied by the dollar rate of the last levy extended
against the land, multiplied by
(b) A number equal to:
(i) The number of years the land was designated under this chapter,
if the total number of years the land was designated under this chapter
and classified under chapter 84.34 RCW is less than ten; or
(ii) Ten minus the number of years the land was classified under
chapter 84.34 RCW, if the total number of years the land was designated
under this chapter and classified under chapter 84.34 RCW is at least
ten.
(((2))) (3) Nothing in this section authorizes the continued
designation under this chapter or defers or reduces the compensating
tax imposed upon forest land not transferred to classification under
subsection (1) of this section ((which)) that does not meet the
definition of forest land under RCW 84.33.035. Nothing in this section
affects the additional tax imposed under RCW 84.34.108.
(((3))) (4) In a county with a population of more than one million
inhabitants, no amount of compensating tax is due under this section if
the removal from classification under RCW 84.34.108 results from a
transfer of property described in RCW 84.34.108(6).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 84.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may opt to merge its open space
timber land program with the designated forest land program of the
county. To merge the programs, the authority must enact an ordinance
that (a) terminates the timber land program and (b) declares the land
that had been classified as timber land on the date the timber land
program is terminated to be designated forest land under chapter 84.33
RCW.
(2) After a county open space timber land program is terminated:
(a) Land that had been classified as open space timber land within
the county is deemed to be designated forest land under the provisions
of RCW 84.33.130(1) and is no longer considered to be classified timber
land for the purposes of this chapter.
(b) Any open space taxation agreement recorded with a county
legislative authority by an owner of land classified as open space
timber land is null and void.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.34.030 and 1989 c 378 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An owner of ((agricultural)) land desiring current use
classification under ((subsection (2) of)) RCW 84.34.020 shall make
application as follows:
(a) Application for classification under RCW 84.34.020(2) shall be
made to the county assessor upon forms prepared by the state department
of revenue and supplied by the county assessor. ((An owner of open
space or timber land desiring current use))
(b) Application for classification under ((subsections (1) and (3)
of)):
(i) RCW 84.34.020(1); or
(ii) RCW 84.34.020(3), unless the open space timber land program
and designated forest land program are merged under section 5 of this
act shall ((make application)) be made, for (i) or (ii) of this
subsection, to the county legislative authority upon forms prepared by
the state department of revenue and supplied by the county assessor.
(2) The application shall be accompanied by a reasonable processing
fee if ((such)) a processing fee is established by the city or county
legislative authority. Said application shall require only such
information reasonably necessary to properly classify an area of land
under this chapter with a notarized verification of the truth thereof
and shall include a statement that the applicant is aware of the
potential tax liability involved when ((such)) the land ceases to be
designated as open space, farm and agricultural or timber land.
Applications must be made during the calendar year preceding that in
which ((such)) classification is to begin.
(3) The assessor shall make necessary information, including copies
of this chapter and applicable regulations, readily available to
interested parties, and shall render reasonable assistance to such
parties upon request.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.34.041 and 2002 c 315 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An application for current use classification or
reclassification under RCW 84.34.020(3) shall be made to the county
legislative authority.
(((1))) The application shall be made upon forms prepared by the
department of revenue and supplied by the granting authority and shall
include the following elements that constitute a timber management
plan:
(a) A legal description of, or assessor's parcel numbers for, all
land the applicant desires to be classified as timber land;
(b) The date or dates of acquisition of the land;
(c) A brief description of the timber on the land, or if the timber
has been harvested, the owner's plan for restocking;
(d) Whether there is a forest management plan for the land;
(e) If so, the nature and extent of implementation of the plan;
(f) Whether the land is used for grazing;
(g) Whether the land has been subdivided or a plat filed with
respect to the land;
(h) Whether the land and the applicant are in compliance with the
restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect and disease
control, weed control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or
applicable rules under Title 76 RCW;
(i) Whether the land is subject to forest fire protection
assessments pursuant to RCW 76.04.610;
(j) Whether the land is subject to a lease, option, or other right
that permits it to be used for a purpose other than growing and
harvesting timber;
(k) A summary of the past experience and activity of the applicant
in growing and harvesting timber;
(l) A summary of current and continuing activity of the applicant
in growing and harvesting timber;
(m) A statement that the applicant is aware of the potential tax
liability involved when the land ceases to be classified as timber
land.
(2) An application made for classification of land under RCW
84.34.020(3) shall be acted upon after a public hearing and after
notice of the hearing is given by one publication in a newspaper of
general circulation in the area at least ten days before the hearing.
Application for classification of land in an incorporated area shall be
acted upon by a granting authority composed of three members of the
county legislative body and three members of the city legislative body
in which the land is located.
(3) The granting authority shall act upon the application with due
regard to all relevant evidence and without any one or more items of
evidence necessarily being determinative, except that the application
may be denied for one of the following reasons, without regard to other
items:
(a) The land does not contain a stand of timber as defined in
chapter 76.09 RCW and applicable rules, except this reason shall not
alone be sufficient to deny the application (i) if the land has been
recently harvested or supports a growth of brush or noncommercial type
timber, and the application includes a plan for restocking within three
years or the longer period necessitated by unavailability of seed or
seedlings, or (ii) if only isolated areas within the land do not meet
minimum standards due to rock outcroppings, swamps, unproductive soil,
or other natural conditions;
(b) The applicant, with respect to the land, has failed to comply
with a final administrative or judicial order with respect to a
violation of the restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect
and disease control, weed control, and forest debris provisions of
Title 76 RCW or applicable rules under Title 76 RCW;
(c) The land abuts a body of salt water and lies between the line
of ordinary high tide and a line paralleling the ordinary high tide
line and two hundred feet horizontally landward from the high tide
line.
(4) The timber management plan must be filed with the county
legislative authority either: (a) When an application for
classification under this chapter is submitted; (b) when a sale or
transfer of timber land occurs and a notice of continuance is signed;
or (c) within sixty days of the date the application for
reclassification under this chapter or from designated forest land is
received. The application for reclassification shall be accepted, but
shall not be processed until the timber management plan is received.
If the timber management plan is not received within sixty days of the
date the application for reclassification is received, the application
for reclassification shall be denied.
If circumstances require it, the county assessor may allow in
writing an extension of time for submitting a timber management plan
when an application for classification or reclassification or notice of
continuance is filed. When the assessor approves an extension of time
for filing the timber management plan, the county legislative authority
may delay processing an application until the timber management plan is
received. If the timber management plan is not received by the date
set by the assessor, the application or the notice of continuance shall
be denied.
The granting authority may approve the application with respect to
only part of the land that is described in the application, and if any
part of the application is denied, the applicant may withdraw the
entire application. The granting authority, in approving in part or
whole an application for land classified pursuant to RCW 84.34.020(3),
may also require that certain conditions be met.
Granting or denial of an application for current use classification
is a legislative determination and shall be reviewable only for
arbitrary and capricious actions. The granting authority may not
require the granting of easements for land classified pursuant to RCW
84.34.020(3).
The granting authority shall approve or disapprove an application
made under this section within six months following the date the
application is received.
(5) No application may be approved under this section, and land may
not otherwise be classified or reclassified under RCW 84.34.020(3), if
programs are merged under section 5 of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.34.070 and 1992 c 69 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, it shall
remain under such classification and shall not be applied to other use
except as provided by subsection (2) of this section for at least ten
years from the date of classification ((and)). It shall continue under
such classification until and unless withdrawn from classification
after notice of request for withdrawal shall be made by the owner.
During any year after eight years of the initial ten-year
classification period have elapsed, notice of request for withdrawal of
all or a portion of the land may be given by the owner to the assessor
or assessors of the county or counties in which ((such)) the land is
situated. In the event that a portion of a parcel is removed from
classification, the remaining portion must meet the same requirements
as did the entire parcel when ((such)) the land was originally granted
classification ((pursuant to)) under this chapter unless the remaining
parcel has different income criteria. Within seven days the assessor
shall transmit one copy of ((such)) the notice to the legislative body
((which)) that originally approved the application. The assessor or
assessors, as the case may be, shall, when two assessment years have
elapsed following the date of receipt of ((such)) the notice, withdraw
((such)) the land from ((such)) the classification and the land shall
be subject to the additional tax and applicable interest due under RCW
84.34.108. The open space taxation agreement to tax according to use
shall not be considered to be a contract and can be abrogated at any
time by the legislature in which event no additional tax or penalty
shall be imposed.
(2)(a) The following reclassifications are not considered
withdrawals or removals and are not subject to additional tax under RCW
84.34.108:
(((a))) (i) Reclassification between lands under RCW 84.34.020 (2)
and (3);
(((b))) (ii) Reclassification of land classified under RCW
84.34.020 (2) or (3) or designated under chapter 84.33 RCW to open
space land under RCW 84.34.020(1);
(((c))) (iii) Reclassification of land classified under RCW
84.34.020 (2) or (3) to forest land ((classified)) designated under
chapter 84.33 RCW; and
(((d))) (iv) Reclassification of land classified as open space land
under RCW 84.34.020(1)(c) and reclassified to farm and agricultural
land under RCW 84.34.020(2) if the land had been previously classified
as farm and agricultural land under RCW 84.34.020(2).
(b) Designation as forest land under RCW 84.33.130(1) as a result
of a merger of programs adopted under section 5 of this act is not
considered a withdrawal or removal and is not subject to additional tax
under RCW 84.34.108.
(3) Applications for reclassification shall be subject to
applicable provisions of RCW 84.34.037, 84.34.035, ((84.34.041,)) and
chapter 84.33 RCW.
(4) The income criteria for land classified under RCW 84.34.020(2)
(b) and (c) may be deferred for land being reclassified from land
classified under RCW 84.34.020(1)(c) ((or (3))), or chapter 84.33 RCW
into RCW 84.34.020(2) (b) or (c) for a period of up to five years from
the date of reclassification.

Sec. 9 RCW 84.34.330 and 1992 c 52 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever farm and agricultural land or timber land has once been
exempted from special benefit assessments ((pursuant to)) under RCW
84.34.320, and except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,
any withdrawal or removal from classification or change in use from
farm and agricultural land or timber land under chapter 84.34 RCW shall
result in the following:
(1) If the bonds used to fund the improvement in the local
improvement district have not been completely retired, ((such)) the
land shall immediately become liable for: (a) The amount of the
special benefit assessment listed in the notice provided for in RCW
84.34.320; plus (b) interest on the amount determined in (1)(a) of this
section, compounded annually at a rate equal to the average rate of
inflation from the time the initial notice is filed by the governmental
entity ((which)) that created the local improvement district as
provided in RCW 84.34.320 to the time the owner withdraws ((such)) or
removes the land from the exemption category provided by this
chapter((; or)).
(2) If the bonds used to fund the improvement in the local
improvement district have been completely retired, ((such)) the land
shall immediately become liable for: (a) The amount of the special
benefit assessment listed in the notice provided for in RCW 84.34.320;
plus (b) interest on the amount determined in (2)(a) of this section
compounded annually at a rate equal to the average rate of inflation
from the time the initial notice is filed by the governmental entity
((which)) that created the local improvement district as provided in
RCW 84.34.320, to the time the bonds used to fund the improvement have
been retired; plus (c) interest on the total amount determined in
(2)(a) and (b) of this section at a simple per annum rate equal to the
average rate of inflation from the time the bonds used to fund the
improvement have been retired to the time the owner withdraws ((such))
or removes the lands from the exemption category provided by this
chapter.
(3) The amount payable ((pursuant to)) under this section shall
become due on the date ((such)) the land is withdrawn or removed from
its current use or timber land classification and shall be a lien on
the land prior and superior to any other lien whatsoever except for the
lien for general taxes, and shall be enforceable in the same manner as
the collection of special benefit assessments are enforced by that
local government.
(4) Designation as forest land under RCW 84.33.130(1) as a result
of a merger of programs adopted under section 5 of this act is not
considered a withdrawal, removal, or a change in use under this
section.

Sec. 10 RCW 84.34.340 and 1992 c 52 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever farm and agricultural land or timber land is withdrawn
or removed from its current use classification as farm and agricultural
land or timber land, except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, the county assessor of the county in which ((such)) the land
is located shall forthwith give written notice of ((such)) the
withdrawal or removal to the local government or its successor ((which
had)) that filed with the assessor the notice required by RCW
84.34.320. Upon receipt of the notice from the assessor, the local
government shall mail a written statement to the owner of ((such)) the
land for the amounts payable as provided in RCW 84.34.330. ((Such))
The amounts due shall be delinquent if not paid within one hundred and
eighty days after the date of mailing of the statement, and shall be
subject to the same interest, penalties, lien priority, and enforcement
procedures that are applicable to delinquent assessments on the
assessment roll from which that land had been exempted, except that the
rate of interest charged shall not exceed the rate provided in RCW
84.34.330.
(2) Designation as forest land under RCW 84.33.130(1) as a result
of a merger of programs adopted under section 5 of this act is not
considered a withdrawal or removal under this section.

Sec. 11 RCW 84.34.370 and 1992 c 52 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, whenever
a portion of a parcel of land ((which)) that was classified as farm and
agricultural or timber land ((pursuant to)) under this chapter is
withdrawn or removed from classification or there is a change in use,
and ((such)) the land has been exempted from any benefit assessments
((pursuant to)) under RCW 84.34.320, the previously exempt benefit
assessments shall become due on only that portion of the land ((which))
that is withdrawn or changed.
(2) Designation as forest land under RCW 84.33.130(1) as a result
of a merger of programs adopted under section 5 of this act is not
considered a withdrawal, removal, or a change in use under this
section.

--- END ---