BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
performing custom farming services; as to such persons, the amount of
the tax must be equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by
the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Custom farming services" means the performance of specific
farming operations through the use of any farm machinery or equipment,
farm implement, or draft animal, together with an operator, when: (i)
The specific farming operation consists of activities directly related
to the growing, raising, or producing of any agricultural product to be
sold or consumed by a farmer; and (ii) the performance of the specific
farming operation is for, and under a contract with, or the direction
or supervision of, a farmer. "Custom farming services" does not
include the custom application of fertilizers, chemicals, or
biologicals unless the custom applicator is related to the person for
whom the service is rendered.
(b) "Specific farming operation" includes specific planting,
cultivating, or harvesting activities, or similar specific farming
operations. The term does not include veterinary services as defined
in RCW 18.92.010; farrier, boarding, training, or appraisal services;
artificial insemination or stud services, agricultural consulting
services; packing or processing of agricultural products; or pumping or
other waste disposal services.
(c) "Related" means having any of the relationships specifically
described in section 267(b) (1) through (13) of the internal revenue
code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 267(b) (1) through (13), as amended or
renumbered as of January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---