BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that it
is the policy of the state of Washington to encourage the safe and
efficient use of the roads by all citizens, regardless of mode of
transportation. In furtherance of this policy, the legislature further
finds and declares that driver training programs should enhance the
driver training curriculum in order to emphasize the importance of
safely sharing the road with bicyclists and pedestrians and educate
students regarding the availability of mass transit, bicycling, and
walking as mobility options.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the
Matthew "Tatsuo" Nakata act.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.82.420 and 2006 c 219 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The advisory committee shall consult with the department in the
development and maintenance of a basic minimum required curriculum and
the department shall furnish to each qualifying applicant for an
instructor's license or a driver training school license a copy of such
curriculum.
(2) In addition to information on the safe, lawful, and responsible
operation of motor vehicles on the state's highways, the basic minimum
required curriculum shall include information on:
(a) Intermediate driver's license issuance, passenger and driving
restrictions and sanctions for violating the restrictions, and the
effect of traffic violations and collisions on the driving privileges;
(b) The effects of alcohol and drug use on motor vehicle operators,
including information on drug and alcohol related traffic injury and
mortality rates in the state of Washington and the current penalties
for driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol; ((and))
(c) Motorcycle awareness, approved by the motorcycle safety
foundation, to ensure new operators of motor vehicles have been
instructed in the importance of safely sharing the road with
motorcyclists;
(d) Bicycle safety, to ensure that operators of motor vehicles have
been instructed in (i) the importance of safely sharing the road with
bicyclists and (ii) the availability and safe use of bicycling as a
mobility option; and
(e) Pedestrian safety, to ensure that operators of motor vehicles
have been instructed in (i) the importance of safely sharing the road
with pedestrians and (ii) the availability and safe use of walking as
a mobility option.
(3) Should the director be presented with acceptable proof that any
licensed instructor or driver training school is not showing proper
diligence in teaching such basic minimum curriculum as required, the
instructor or school shall be required to appear before the advisory
committee and show cause why the license of the instructor or school
should not be revoked for such negligence. If the committee does not
accept such reasons as may be offered, the director may revoke the
license of the instructor or school, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.220
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent shall include information on bicycle safety, to
ensure that operators of motor vehicles have been instructed in (1) the
importance of safely sharing the road with bicyclists and (2) the
availability and safe use of bicycling as a mobility option, in
instructional material used in traffic safety education courses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.220
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent shall include information on pedestrian safety,
to ensure that operators of motor vehicles have been instructed in (1)
the importance of safely sharing the road with pedestrians and (2) the
availability and safe use of walking as a mobility option, in
instructional material used in traffic safety education courses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A mobility education pilot program is
created in the department of licensing to develop a mobility education
curriculum for use in driver training schools in Washington and to
implement the curriculum as pilot programs in driver training programs
in King, Kitsap, and Spokane counties.
(2) The department of licensing must contract with an entity that
has recognized expertise in driver training education or mobility
education, or both, for the development of a mobility education
curriculum for the mobility education pilot program. At a minimum, the
curriculum must: Provide education regarding the importance of safely
sharing the road with bicyclists and pedestrians; educate students
regarding the availability of mass transit, bicycling, and walking as
mobility options; and contain both classroom and experiential
components. In awarding the contract, the department of licensing must
give preference to proposals from entities that (a) have obtained
additional funding for the development of the curriculum from nonstate
sources and (b) have recognized expertise in both driver training
education and mobility education.
(3) The department of licensing must fund pilot projects to
implement the mobility education curriculum in driver training programs
in King, Kitsap, and Spokane counties. These pilot projects will
provide the mobility education curriculum as an additional component to
the driver training program at no additional cost to the students
enrolled in the program.
(4) The department of licensing must consult with an advisory
committee on the mobility education pilot program.
(a) The advisory committee will consist of the driver instructors'
advisory committee established under RCW 46.82.300, plus a
representative selected by the director of the department of licensing
from each of the following communities:
(i) Health;
(ii) Transit;
(iii) Environmental;
(iv) Bicyclists;
(v) Pedestrians; and
(vi) Other communities the director deems appropriate.
(b) The advisory committee must:
(i) Consult with the department of licensing regarding the awarding
of contracts for the development of the mobility education curriculum
and the pilot projects;
(ii) Consult with the department of licensing and the contractor
regarding the development of the mobility education curriculum; and
(iii) Evaluate the pilot projects, with the assistance of the
department of licensing, and provide recommendations to the
transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2009,
regarding, at a minimum, curriculum content, cost, implementation,
funding, liability, whether mobility education should be a voluntary or
mandatory portion of the driver training curriculum, and whether and
how to provide the mobility education curriculum statewide.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2009.

--- END ---