BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.50.003 and 1984 c 258 s 125 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "City" means an incorporated city or town.
(2) "Contracting city" means any city that contracts with a hosting
jurisdiction for the delivery of judicial services.
(3) "Mayor((,))" ((as used in this chapter,)) means the mayor, city
manager, or other chief administrative officer of the city.
(4) "Hosting jurisdiction" means a county or city designated in an
interlocal agreement as receiving compensation for providing judicial
services to a contracting city.

Sec. 2 RCW 3.50.005 and 1984 c 258 s 101 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that ((there is a multitude of statutes
governing the municipal courts of the state. This situation is
confusing and misleading to attorneys, judges, court personnel, and
others who work with the municipal courts. The legislature therefore
finds that a reorganization of the municipal courts of the state would
allow those courts to operate in a more effective and efficient
manner)) continuing to permit cities to contract with counties or other
cities for judicial services will allow cities to provide more cost-effective services and encourage the creation of regional courts of
limited jurisdiction that provide the full range of judicial functions
and that are open and accessible to the citizens of the state of
Washington. This chapter provides a court structure which may be used
by cities and towns with a population of four hundred thousand or less
which choose to operate under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 3.50 RCW
to read as follows:
A city may meet the requirements of RCW 39.34.180 by entering into
an interlocal agreement with the county in which the city is located or
with one or more cities. The host jurisdiction in any such agreement
must be located within reasonable proximity to any contracting city or
cities. For purposes of this section, "reasonable proximity" shall be
determined after consideration of the factors set forth in RCW
39.34.010. The interlocal agreement shall provide that a judge of the
hosting jurisdiction sit as the municipal court judge for the
contracting city or cities and hear those cases specified in RCW
39.34.180.

Sec. 4 RCW 3.50.020 and 2005 c 282 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The municipal court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over
traffic infractions arising under city ordinances and exclusive
original criminal jurisdiction of all violations of city ordinances
duly adopted by the city ((in which the municipal court is located))
and shall have original jurisdiction of all other actions brought to
enforce or recover license penalties or forfeitures declared or given
by such ordinances or by state statutes. A hosting jurisdiction shall
have exclusive original criminal and other jurisdiction as described in
this section for all matters filed by a contracting city. The
municipal court shall also have the jurisdiction as conferred by
statute. The municipal court is empowered to forfeit cash bail or bail
bonds and issue execution thereon; and in general to hear and determine
all causes, civil or criminal, including traffic infractions, arising
under such ordinances and to pronounce judgment in accordance
therewith. A municipal court participating in the program established
by the administrative office of the courts pursuant to RCW 2.56.160
shall have jurisdiction to take recognizance, approve bail, and arraign
defendants held within its jurisdiction on warrants issued by any court
of limited jurisdiction participating in the program.

Sec. 5 RCW 3.50.805 and 2005 c 433 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((municipality)) city operating a municipal court under this
chapter shall not terminate that court or terminate an interlocal
agreement entered into under section 3 of this act unless the
((municipality)) city has reached an agreement with the appropriate
county or another ((municipality)) city under chapter 39.34 RCW under
which the county or ((municipality)) city is to be paid a reasonable
amount for costs associated with prosecution, adjudication, and
sentencing in criminal cases, or traffic infractions that are filed in
district or municipal court as a result of the termination. The
agreement shall provide for periodic review and renewal of the terms of
the agreement. If the ((municipality)) city and the county or
((municipality)) city are unable to agree on the terms for renewal of
the agreement, they shall be deemed to have entered into an agreement
to submit the issue to arbitration under chapter 7.04A RCW. Pending
conclusion of the arbitration proceeding, the terms of the agreement
shall remain in effect. The ((municipality)) city and the county or
((municipality)) city have the same rights and are subject to the same
duties as other parties who have agreed to submit to arbitration under
chapter 7.04A RCW. A ((municipality)) city that has entered into
agreements with other ((municipalities)) cities that have terminated
their municipal courts may not thereafter terminate its court unless
each ((municipality)) city has reached an agreement with the
appropriate county or city in accordance with this section.
(2) A ((municipality)) city operating a municipal court under this
chapter may not repeal in its entirety that portion of its municipal
code defining crimes while retaining the court's authority to hear and
determine traffic infractions under chapter 46.63 RCW unless the
((municipality)) city has reached an agreement with the county under
chapter 39.34 RCW under which the county is to be paid a reasonable
amount for costs associated with prosecution, adjudication, and
sentencing in criminal cases, or traffic infractions that are filed in
district court as a result of the repeal. The agreement shall provide
for periodic review and renewal of the terms of the agreement. If the
((municipality)) city and the county are unable to agree on the terms
for renewal of the agreement, they shall be deemed to have entered into
an agreement to submit the issue to arbitration under chapter 7.04A
RCW. Pending conclusion of the arbitration proceeding, the terms of
the agreement shall remain in effect. The ((municipality)) city and
the county have the same rights and are subject to the same duties as
other parties who have agreed to submit to arbitration under chapter
7.04A RCW.
(3) A ((municipality)) city operating a municipal court under this
chapter may not repeal a provision of its municipal code which defines
a crime equivalent to an offense listed in RCW 46.63.020 unless the
((municipality)) city has reached an agreement with the county under
chapter 39.34 RCW under which the county is to be paid a reasonable
amount for costs associated with prosecution, adjudication, and
sentencing in criminal cases, or traffic infractions that are filed in
district court as a result of the repeal. The agreement shall provide
for periodic review and renewal of the terms of the agreement. If the
((municipality)) city and the county are unable to agree on the terms
for renewal of the agreement, they shall be deemed to have entered into
an agreement to submit the issue to arbitration under chapter 7.04A
RCW. Pending conclusion of the arbitration proceeding, the terms of
the agreement shall remain in effect. The ((municipality)) city and
the county have the same rights and are subject to the same duties as
other parties who have agreed to submit to arbitration under chapter
7.04A RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.34.180 and 2001 c 68 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county, city, and town is responsible for the prosecution,
adjudication, sentencing, and incarceration of misdemeanor and gross
misdemeanor offenses and traffic infractions committed by adults in
their respective jurisdictions, and referred from their respective law
enforcement agencies, whether filed under state law or city ordinance,
and must carry out these responsibilities through the use of their own
courts, staff, and facilities, or by entering into contracts or
interlocal agreements under this chapter to provide these services.
Nothing in this section is intended to alter the statutory
responsibilities of each county for the prosecution, adjudication,
sentencing, and incarceration for not more than one year of felony
offenders, nor shall this section apply to any offense initially filed
by the prosecuting attorney as a felony offense or an attempt to commit
a felony offense.
(2) The following principles must be followed in negotiating
interlocal agreements or contracts: Cities and counties must consider
(a) anticipated costs of services; and (b) anticipated and potential
revenues to fund the services, including fines and fees, criminal
justice funding, and state-authorized sales tax funding levied for
criminal justice purposes.
(3) If an agreement as to the levels of compensation within an
interlocal agreement or contract for gross misdemeanor and misdemeanor
services cannot be reached between ((a city and county)) the parties,
then either party may invoke binding arbitration on the compensation
issued by notice to the other party. In the case of establishing
initial compensation, the notice shall request arbitration within
thirty days. In the case of nonrenewal of an existing contract or
interlocal agreement, the notice must be given one hundred twenty days
prior to the expiration of the existing contract or agreement and the
existing contract or agreement remains in effect until a new agreement
is reached or until an arbitration award on the matter of fees is made.
The ((city and county)) parties each select one arbitrator, and the
initial two arbitrators pick a third arbitrator.
(4) A city or county that wishes to terminate an agreement for the
provision of court services must provide written notice of the intent
to terminate the agreement in accordance with RCW 3.50.810 and
35.20.010.
(5) For cities or towns that have not adopted, in whole or in part,
criminal code or ordinance provisions related to misdemeanor and gross
misdemeanor crimes as defined by state law, this section shall have no
application until July 1, 1998.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---