BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes the
importance of appropriate regulation of shorelines of the state. The
legislature also recognizes that the shoreline management act properly
acknowledges the importance of granting regulatory relief from
inflexible mandates by requiring local master programs to contain
allowances for varying the application of regulations. This
requirement exists to ensure that the strict implementation of
regulations do not create unnecessary hardships or thwart the policy of
the act. An example further emphasizing the importance of appropriate
variances can be found in provisions of the act that exempt the
construction of qualifying private, noncommercial docks from certain
regulatory requirements.
(2) Recognizing that appropriate regulatory variances are
consistent with established policy and effective protection measures,
the legislature intends to: (a) Exempt qualifying private,
noncommercial docks and boat lifts in artificial lakes, including Moses
Lake, from certain regulatory requirements; (b) define the term
"artificial lake"; and (c) require that such docks and boat lifts in
artificial lakes be granted local permitting preferences. The
legislature also intends to establish provisions for the department of
natural resources pertaining to dock and boat lifts on artificial
lakes.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.58.030 and 2003 c 321 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the
following definitions and concepts apply:
(1) Administration:
(a) "Department" means the department of ecology;
(b) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology;
(c) "Local government" means any county, incorporated city, or town
which contains within its boundaries any lands or waters subject to
this chapter;
(d) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, organization, cooperative, public or municipal
corporation, or agency of the state or local governmental unit however
designated;
(e) "Hearing board" means the shoreline hearings board established
by this chapter.
(2) Geographical:
(a) "Artificial lake" means a lake that was created, and is
principally supplemented, by rainfall and the artificial diversion or
storage of water through man-made improvements, such as Moses Lake;
(b) "Extreme low tide" means the lowest line on the land reached by
a receding tide;
(((b))) (c) "Ordinary high water mark" on all lakes, streams, and
tidal water is that mark that will be found by examining the bed and
banks and ascertaining where the presence and action of waters are so
common and usual, and so long continued in all ordinary years, as to
mark upon the soil a character distinct from that of the abutting
upland, in respect to vegetation as that condition exists on June 1,
1971, as it may naturally change thereafter, or as it may change
thereafter in accordance with permits issued by a local government or
the department: PROVIDED, That in any area where the ordinary high
water mark cannot be found, the ordinary high water mark adjoining salt
water shall be the line of mean higher high tide and the ordinary high
water mark adjoining fresh water shall be the line of mean high water;
(((c))) (d) "Shorelines of the state" are the total of all
"shorelines" and "shorelines of statewide significance" within the
state;
(((d))) (e) "Shorelines" means all of the water areas of the state,
including reservoirs, and their associated shorelands, together with
the lands underlying them; except (i) shorelines of statewide
significance; (ii) shorelines on segments of streams upstream of a
point where the mean annual flow is twenty cubic feet per second or
less and the wetlands associated with such upstream segments; and (iii)
shorelines on lakes less than twenty acres in size and wetlands
associated with such small lakes;
(((e))) (f) "Shorelines of statewide significance" means the
following shorelines of the state:
(i) The area between the ordinary high water mark and the western
boundary of the state from Cape Disappointment on the south to Cape
Flattery on the north, including harbors, bays, estuaries, and inlets;
(ii) Those areas of Puget Sound and adjacent salt waters and the
Strait of Juan de Fuca between the ordinary high water mark and the
line of extreme low tide as follows:
(A) Nisqually Delta -- from DeWolf Bight to Tatsolo Point,
(B) Birch Bay -- from Point Whitehorn to Birch Point,
(C) Hood Canal -- from Tala Point to Foulweather Bluff,
(D) Skagit Bay and adjacent area -- from Brown Point to Yokeko Point,
and
(E) Padilla Bay -- from March Point to William Point;
(iii) Those areas of Puget Sound and the Strait of Juan de Fuca and
adjacent salt waters north to the Canadian line and lying seaward from
the line of extreme low tide;
(iv) Those lakes, whether natural, artificial, or a combination
thereof, with a surface acreage of one thousand acres or more measured
at the ordinary high water mark;
(v) Those natural rivers or segments thereof as follows:
(A) Any west of the crest of the Cascade range downstream of a
point where the mean annual flow is measured at one thousand cubic feet
per second or more,
(B) Any east of the crest of the Cascade range downstream of a
point where the annual flow is measured at two hundred cubic feet per
second or more, or those portions of rivers east of the crest of the
Cascade range downstream from the first three hundred square miles of
drainage area, whichever is longer;
(vi) Those shorelands associated with (i), (ii), (iv), and (v) of
this subsection (2)(((e))) (f);
(((f))) (g) "Shorelands" or "shoreland areas" means those lands
extending landward for two hundred feet in all directions as measured
on a horizontal plane from the ordinary high water mark; floodways and
contiguous floodplain areas landward two hundred feet from such
floodways; and all wetlands and river deltas associated with the
streams, lakes, and tidal waters which are subject to the provisions of
this chapter; the same to be designated as to location by the
department of ecology.
(i) Any county or city may determine that portion of a one-hundred-year-flood plain to be included in its master program as long as such
portion includes, as a minimum, the floodway and the adjacent land
extending landward two hundred feet therefrom.
(ii) Any city or county may also include in its master program land
necessary for buffers for critical areas, as defined in chapter 36.70A
RCW, that occur within shorelines of the state, provided that forest
practices regulated under chapter 76.09 RCW, except conversions to
nonforest land use, on lands subject to the provisions of this
subsection (2)(((f)(ii))) (g)(ii) are not subject to additional
regulations under this chapter;
(((g))) (h) "Floodway" means those portions of the area of a river
valley lying streamward from the outer limits of a watercourse upon
which flood waters are carried during periods of flooding that occur
with reasonable regularity, although not necessarily annually, said
floodway being identified, under normal condition, by changes in
surface soil conditions or changes in types or quality of vegetative
ground cover condition. The floodway shall not include those lands
that can reasonably be expected to be protected from flood waters by
flood control devices maintained by or maintained under license from
the federal government, the state, or a political subdivision of the
state;
(((h))) (i) "Wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated
by surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration sufficient
to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a
prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and
similar areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands
intentionally created from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited
to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined swales, canals,
detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm ponds, and
landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990, that
were unintentionally created as a result of the construction of a road,
street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands
intentionally created from nonwetland areas to mitigate the conversion
of wetlands.
(3) Procedural terms:
(a) "Guidelines" means those standards adopted to implement the
policy of this chapter for regulation of use of the shorelines of the
state prior to adoption of master programs. Such standards shall also
provide criteria to local governments and the department in developing
master programs;
(b) "Master program" shall mean the comprehensive use plan for a
described area, and the use regulations together with maps, diagrams,
charts, or other descriptive material and text, a statement of desired
goals, and standards developed in accordance with the policies
enunciated in RCW 90.58.020;
(c) "State master program" is the cumulative total of all master
programs approved or adopted by the department of ecology;
(d) "Development" means a use consisting of the construction or
exterior alteration of structures; dredging; drilling; dumping;
filling; removal of any sand, gravel, or minerals; bulkheading; driving
of piling; placing of obstructions; or any project of a permanent or
temporary nature which interferes with the normal public use of the
surface of the waters overlying lands subject to this chapter at any
state of water level;
(e) "Substantial development" shall mean any development of which
the total cost or fair market value exceeds five thousand dollars, or
any development which materially interferes with the normal public use
of the water or shorelines of the state. The dollar threshold
established in this subsection (3)(e) must be adjusted for inflation by
the office of financial management every five years, beginning July 1,
2007, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time
period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that
year's annual average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area,
for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the
bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect. The following shall not be considered
substantial developments for the purpose of this chapter:
(i) Normal maintenance or repair of existing structures or
developments, including damage by accident, fire, or elements;
(ii) Construction of the normal protective bulkhead common to
single family residences;
(iii) Emergency construction necessary to protect property from
damage by the elements;
(iv) Construction and practices normal or necessary for farming,
irrigation, and ranching activities, including agricultural service
roads and utilities on shorelands, and the construction and maintenance
of irrigation structures including but not limited to head gates,
pumping facilities, and irrigation channels. A feedlot of any size,
all processing plants, other activities of a commercial nature,
alteration of the contour of the shorelands by leveling or filling
other than that which results from normal cultivation, shall not be
considered normal or necessary farming or ranching activities. A
feedlot shall be an enclosure or facility used or capable of being used
for feeding livestock hay, grain, silage, or other livestock feed, but
shall not include land for growing crops or vegetation for livestock
feeding and/or grazing, nor shall it include normal livestock wintering
operations;
(v) Construction or modification of navigational aids such as
channel markers and anchor buoys;
(vi) Construction on shorelands by an owner, lessee, or contract
purchaser of a single family residence for his own use or for the use
of his or her family, which residence does not exceed a height of
thirty-five feet above average grade level and which meets all
requirements of the state agency or local government having
jurisdiction thereof, other than requirements imposed pursuant to this
chapter;
(vii) Construction of a dock, including a community dock, designed
for pleasure craft only, for the private noncommercial use of the
owner, lessee, or contract purchaser of single and multiple family
residences. This exception applies ((if either)): (A) In salt waters,
the fair market value of the dock does not exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars; ((or)) (B) in fresh waters, if the fair market value
of the dock does not exceed ten thousand dollars, but if subsequent
construction having a fair market value exceeding two thousand five
hundred dollars occurs within five years of completion of the prior
construction, the subsequent construction shall be considered a
substantial development for the purpose of this chapter; and (C) in
artificial lakes;
(viii) Construction of a boat lift including a community boat lift,
designed for pleasure craft only, for the private noncommercial use of
the owner, lessee, or contract purchaser of single and multiple family
residences. This exception applies only in artificial lakes;
(ix) Removal and reinstallation of a dock or boat lift in an
artificial lake if:
(A) The dock or lift was constructed in accordance with (e)(vii) or
(viii) of this subsection; and
(B) The reinstallation of the dock or lift is consistent with the
location and specifications of the removed structure and is completed
by the first day of June following the removal of the dock or lift;
(x) Operation, maintenance, or construction of canals, waterways,
drains, reservoirs, or other facilities that now exist or are hereafter
created or developed as a part of an irrigation system for the primary
purpose of making use of system waters, including return flow and
artificially stored ground water for the irrigation of lands;
(((ix))) (xi) The marking of property lines or corners on state
owned lands, when such marking does not significantly interfere with
normal public use of the surface of the water;
(((x))) (xii) Operation and maintenance of any system of dikes,
ditches, drains, or other facilities existing on September 8, 1975,
which were created, developed, or utilized primarily as a part of an
agricultural drainage or diking system;
(((xi))) (xiii) Site exploration and investigation activities that
are prerequisite to preparation of an application for development
authorization under this chapter, if:
(A) The activity does not interfere with the normal public use of
the surface waters;
(B) The activity will have no significant adverse impact on the
environment including, but not limited to, fish, wildlife, fish or
wildlife habitat, water quality, and aesthetic values;
(C) The activity does not involve the installation of a structure,
and upon completion of the activity the vegetation and land
configuration of the site are restored to conditions existing before
the activity;
(D) A private entity seeking development authorization under this
section first posts a performance bond or provides other evidence of
financial responsibility to the local jurisdiction to ensure that the
site is restored to preexisting conditions; and
(E) The activity is not subject to the permit requirements of RCW
90.58.550;
(((xii))) (xiv) The process of removing or controlling an aquatic
noxious weed, as defined in RCW 17.26.020, through the use of an
herbicide or other treatment methods applicable to weed control that
are recommended by a final environmental impact statement published by
the department of agriculture or the department jointly with other
state agencies under chapter 43.21C RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.58.100 and 1997 c 369 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The master programs provided for in this chapter, when adopted
or approved by the department shall constitute use regulations for the
various shorelines of the state. In preparing the master programs, and
any amendments thereto, the department and local governments shall to
the extent feasible:
(a) Utilize a systematic interdisciplinary approach which will
insure the integrated use of the natural and social sciences and the
environmental design arts;
(b) Consult with and obtain the comments of any federal, state,
regional, or local agency having any special expertise with respect to
any environmental impact;
(c) Consider all plans, studies, surveys, inventories, and systems
of classification made or being made by federal, state, regional, or
local agencies, by private individuals, or by organizations dealing
with pertinent shorelines of the state;
(d) Conduct or support such further research, studies, surveys, and
interviews as are deemed necessary;
(e) Utilize all available information regarding hydrology,
geography, topography, ecology, economics, and other pertinent data;
(f) Employ, when feasible, all appropriate, modern scientific data
processing and computer techniques to store, index, analyze, and manage
the information gathered.
(2) The master programs shall include, when appropriate, the
following:
(a) An economic development element for the location and design of
industries, industrial projects of statewide significance,
transportation facilities, port facilities, tourist facilities,
commerce and other developments that are particularly dependent on
their location on or use of the shorelines of the state;
(b) A public access element making provision for public access to
publicly owned areas;
(c) A recreational element for the preservation and enlargement of
recreational opportunities, including but not limited to parks,
tidelands, beaches, and recreational areas;
(d) A circulation element consisting of the general location and
extent of existing and proposed major thoroughfares, transportation
routes, terminals, and other public utilities and facilities, all
correlated with the shoreline use element;
(e) A use element which considers the proposed general distribution
and general location and extent of the use on shorelines and adjacent
land areas for housing, business, industry, transportation,
agriculture, natural resources, recreation, education, public buildings
and grounds, and other categories of public and private uses of the
land;
(f) A conservation element for the preservation of natural
resources, including but not limited to scenic vistas, aesthetics, and
vital estuarine areas for fisheries and wildlife protection;
(g) An historic, cultural, scientific, and educational element for
the protection and restoration of buildings, sites, and areas having
historic, cultural, scientific, or educational values;
(h) An element that gives consideration to the statewide interest
in the prevention and minimization of flood damages; and
(i) Any other element deemed appropriate or necessary to effectuate
the policy of this chapter.
(3) The master programs shall include such map or maps, descriptive
text, diagrams and charts, or other descriptive material as are
necessary to provide for ease of understanding.
(4) Master programs will reflect that state-owned shorelines of the
state are particularly adapted to providing wilderness beaches,
ecological study areas, and other recreational activities for the
public and will give appropriate special consideration to same.
(5) Each master program shall contain provisions to allow for the
varying of the application of use regulations of the program, including
provisions for permits for conditional uses and variances, to
((insure)) ensure that strict implementation of a program will not
create unnecessary hardships or thwart the policy enumerated in RCW
90.58.020. Any such varying shall be allowed only if extraordinary
circumstances are shown and the public interest suffers no substantial
detrimental effect. The concept of this subsection shall be
incorporated in the rules adopted by the department relating to the
establishment of a permit system as provided in RCW 90.58.140(3).
(6) Each master program shall contain standards governing the
protection of single family residences and appurtenant structures
against damage or loss due to shoreline erosion. The standards shall
govern the issuance of substantial development permits for shoreline
protection, including structural methods such as construction of
bulkheads, and nonstructural methods of protection. The standards
shall provide for methods which achieve effective and timely protection
against loss or damage to single family residences and appurtenant
structures due to shoreline erosion. The standards shall provide a
preference for permit issuance for measures to protect single family
residences occupied prior to January 1, 1992, where the proposed
measure is designed to minimize harm to the shoreline natural
environment.
(7) Each master program shall contain provisions providing a
preference for permit issuance for the construction of docks and boat
lifts, including community docks and boat lifts, in artificial lakes.
Docks and lifts subject to this subsection must be designed for
pleasure craft only and must be for the private noncommercial use of
owners, lessees, or contract purchasers of single and multiple family
residences. Master programs may not prohibit the construction of docks
or boat lifts in artificial lakes.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.58.140 and 1995 c 347 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A development shall not be undertaken on the shorelines of the
state unless it is consistent with the policy of this chapter and,
after adoption or approval, as appropriate, the applicable guidelines,
rules, or master program.
(2) A substantial development shall not be undertaken on shorelines
of the state without first obtaining a permit from the government
entity having administrative jurisdiction under this chapter.
A permit shall be granted:
(a) From June 1, 1971, until such time as an applicable master
program has become effective, only when the development proposed is
consistent with: (i) The policy of RCW 90.58.020; and (ii) after their
adoption, the guidelines and rules of the department; and (iii) so far
as can be ascertained, the master program being developed for the area;
(b) After adoption or approval, as appropriate, by the department
of an applicable master program, only when the development proposed is
consistent with the applicable master program and this chapter.
(3) The local government shall establish a program, consistent with
rules adopted by the department, for the administration and enforcement
of the permit system provided in this section. The administration of
the system so established shall be performed exclusively by the local
government.
(4) Except as otherwise specifically provided in subsection (11) of
this section, the local government shall require notification of the
public of all applications for permits governed by any permit system
established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section by ensuring that
notice of the application is given by at least one of the following
methods:
(a) Mailing of the notice to the latest recorded real property
owners as shown by the records of the county assessor within at least
three hundred feet of the boundary of the property upon which the
substantial development is proposed;
(b) Posting of the notice in a conspicuous manner on the property
upon which the project is to be constructed; or
(c) Any other manner deemed appropriate by local authorities to
accomplish the objectives of reasonable notice to adjacent landowners
and the public.
The notices shall include a statement that any person desiring to
submit written comments concerning an application, or desiring to
receive notification of the final decision concerning an application as
expeditiously as possible after the issuance of the decision, may
submit the comments or requests for decisions to the local government
within thirty days of the last date the notice is to be published
pursuant to this subsection. The local government shall forward, in a
timely manner following the issuance of a decision, a copy of the
decision to each person who submits a request for the decision.
If a hearing is to be held on an application, notices of such a
hearing shall include a statement that any person may submit oral or
written comments on an application at the hearing.
(5) The system shall include provisions to assure that construction
pursuant to a permit will not begin or be authorized until twenty-one
days from the date the permit decision was filed as provided in
subsection (6) of this section; or until all review proceedings are
terminated if the proceedings were initiated within twenty-one days
from the date of filing as defined in subsection (6) of this section
except as follows:
(a) In the case of any permit issued to the state of Washington,
department of transportation, for the construction and modification of
SR 90 (I-90) on or adjacent to Lake Washington, the construction may
begin after thirty days from the date of filing, and the permits are
valid until December 31, 1995;
(b) Construction may be commenced no sooner than thirty days after
the date of the appeal of the board's decision is filed if a permit is
granted by the local government and (i) the granting of the permit is
appealed to the shorelines hearings board within twenty-one days of the
date of filing, (ii) the hearings board approves the granting of the
permit by the local government or approves a portion of the substantial
development for which the local government issued the permit, and (iii)
an appeal for judicial review of the hearings board decision is filed
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. The appellant may request, within ten
days of the filing of the appeal with the court, a hearing before the
court to determine whether construction pursuant to the permit approved
by the hearings board or to a revised permit issued pursuant to the
order of the hearings board should not commence. If, at the conclusion
of the hearing, the court finds that construction pursuant to such a
permit would involve a significant, irreversible damaging of the
environment, the court shall prohibit the permittee from commencing the
construction pursuant to the approved or revised permit until all
review proceedings are final. Construction pursuant to a permit
revised at the direction of the hearings board may begin only on that
portion of the substantial development for which the local government
had originally issued the permit, and construction pursuant to such a
revised permit on other portions of the substantial development may not
begin until after all review proceedings are terminated. In such a
hearing before the court, the burden of proving whether the
construction may involve significant irreversible damage to the
environment and demonstrating whether such construction would or would
not be appropriate is on the appellant;
(c) If the permit is for a substantial development meeting the
requirements of subsection (11) of this section, construction pursuant
to that permit may not begin or be authorized until twenty-one days
from the date the permit decision was filed as provided in subsection
(6) of this section.
If a permittee begins construction pursuant to subsections (a),
(b), or (c) of this subsection, the construction is begun at the
permittee's own risk. If, as a result of judicial review, the courts
order the removal of any portion of the construction or the restoration
of any portion of the environment involved or require the alteration of
any portion of a substantial development constructed pursuant to a
permit, the permittee is barred from recovering damages or costs
involved in adhering to such requirements from the local government
that granted the permit, the hearings board, or any appellant or
intervener.
(6) Any decision on an application for a permit under the authority
of this section, whether it is an approval or a denial, shall,
concurrently with the transmittal of the ruling to the applicant, be
filed with the department and the attorney general. With regard to a
permit other than a permit governed by subsection (10) of this section,
"date of filing" as used herein means the date of actual receipt by the
department. With regard to a permit for a variance or a conditional
use, "date of filing" means the date a decision of the department
rendered on the permit pursuant to subsection (10) of this section is
transmitted by the department to the local government. The department
shall notify in writing the local government and the applicant of the
date of filing.
(7) Applicants for permits under this section have the burden of
proving that a proposed substantial development is consistent with the
criteria that must be met before a permit is granted. In any review of
the granting or denial of an application for a permit as provided in
RCW 90.58.180 (1) and (2), the person requesting the review has the
burden of proof.
(8) Any permit may, after a hearing with adequate notice to the
permittee and the public, be rescinded by the issuing authority upon
the finding that a permittee has not complied with conditions of a
permit. If the department is of the opinion that noncompliance exists,
the department shall provide written notice to the local government and
the permittee. If the department is of the opinion that the
noncompliance continues to exist thirty days after the date of the
notice, and the local government has taken no action to rescind the
permit, the department may petition the hearings board for a rescission
of the permit upon written notice of the petition to the local
government and the permittee if the request by the department is made
to the hearings board within fifteen days of the termination of the
thirty-day notice to the local government.
(9) The holder of a certification from the governor pursuant to
chapter 80.50 RCW shall not be required to obtain a permit under this
section.
(10) Any permit for a variance or a conditional use by local
government under approved master programs must be submitted to the
department for its approval or disapproval.
(11)(a) An application for a substantial development permit for a
limited utility extension or for the construction of a bulkhead or
other measures to protect a single family residence and its appurtenant
structures from shoreline erosion shall be subject to the following
procedures:
(i) The public comment period under subsection (4) of this section
shall be twenty days. The notice provided under subsection (4) of this
section shall state the manner in which the public may obtain a copy of
the local government decision on the application no later than two days
following its issuance;
(ii) The local government shall issue its decision to grant or deny
the permit within twenty-one days of the last day of the comment period
specified in (i) of this subsection; and
(iii) If there is an appeal of the decision to grant or deny the
permit to the local government legislative authority, the appeal shall
be finally determined by the legislative authority within thirty days.
(b) For purposes of this section, a limited utility extension means
the extension of a utility service that:
(i) Is categorically exempt under chapter 43.21C RCW for one or
more of the following: Natural gas, electricity, telephone, water, or
sewer;
(ii) Will serve an existing use in compliance with this chapter;
and
(iii) Will not extend more than twenty-five hundred linear feet
within the shorelines of the state.
(12) Local governments may not require permits for development
activities in artificial lakes if the activities do not qualify as
substantial development under RCW 90.58.030(3)(e).

Sec. 5 RCW 79.105.240 and 2005 c 155 s 147 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, annual rent rates for
the lease of state-owned aquatic lands for water-dependent uses shall
be determined as follows:
(1)(a) The assessed land value, exclusive of improvements, as
determined by the county assessor, of the upland tax parcel used in
conjunction with the leased area or, if there are no such uplands, of
the nearest upland tax parcel used for water-dependent purposes divided
by the parcel area equals the upland value.
(b) The upland value times the area of leased aquatic lands times
thirty percent equals the aquatic land value.
(2) As of July 1, 1989, and each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the real capitalization rate to be applied
to water-dependent aquatic land leases commencing or being adjusted
under subsection (3)(a) of this section in that fiscal year. The real
capitalization rate shall be the real rate of return, except that until
June 30, 1989, the real capitalization rate shall be five percent and
thereafter it shall not change by more than one percentage point in any
one year or be more than seven percent or less than three percent.
(3) The annual rent shall be:
(a) Determined initially, and redetermined every four years or as
otherwise provided in the lease, by multiplying the aquatic land value
times the real capitalization rate; and
(b) Adjusted by the inflation rate each year in which the rent is
not determined under (a) of this subsection.
(4) If the upland parcel used in conjunction with the leased area
is not assessed or has an assessed value inconsistent with the purposes
of the lease, the nearest comparable upland parcel used for similar
purposes shall be substituted and the lease payment determined in the
same manner as provided in this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "upland tax parcel" is a tax
parcel, some portion of which has upland characteristics. Filled
tidelands or shorelands with upland characteristics which abut state-owned aquatic land shall be considered as uplands in determining
aquatic land values.
(6) The annual rent for filled state-owned aquatic lands that have
the characteristics of uplands shall be determined in accordance with
RCW 79.105.270 in those cases in which the state owns the fill and has
a right to charge for the fill.
(7) For docks and boat lifts, including community docks and boat
lifts, that are built and maintained above or on any aquatic lands
administered by the department and located on the bed of an artificial
lake, as that term is defined in RCW 90.58.030, the annual rent for
each dock or lift is ten dollars.
(8) For all new leases for other water-dependent uses, issued after
December 31, 1997, the initial annual water-dependent rent shall be
determined by the methods in subsections (1) through (6) of this
section.

Sec. 6 RCW 79.105.430 and 2005 c 155 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The abutting residential owner to state-owned shorelands,
tidelands, or related beds of navigable waters, other than harbor areas
but including artificial lakes as that term is defined in RCW
90.58.030, may install and maintain without charge a dock on the areas
if used exclusively for private recreational purposes and the area is
not subject to prior rights, including any rights of upland, tideland,
or shoreland owners as provided in RCW 79.125.400, 79.125.460,
79.125.410, and 79.130.010. Residential owners abutting an artificial
lake may also install and maintain one boat lift without charge.
(b) The dock or boat lift cannot be sold or leased separately from
the upland residence((. The dock)) and cannot be used to moor boats
for commercial or residential use. ((This))
(c) Permission granted under this subsection (1) is subject to
applicable local, state, and federal rules and regulations governing
location, design, construction, size, and length of the dock. Nothing
in this subsection (1) prevents the abutting owner from obtaining a
lease if otherwise provided by law.
(2) The abutting residential owner to state-owned shorelands,
tidelands, or related beds of navigable waters, other than harbor
areas, may install and maintain a mooring buoy without charge if the
boat that is moored to the buoy is used for private recreational
purposes, the area is not subject to prior rights, including any rights
of upland, tideland, or shoreland owners as provided in RCW 79.125.400,
79.125.460, 79.125.410, and 79.130.010, and the buoy will not obstruct
the use of mooring buoys previously authorized by the department.
(a) The buoy must be located as near to the upland residence as
practical, consistent with applicable rules and regulations and the
provisions of this section. The buoy must be located, or relocated if
necessary, to accommodate the use of lawfully installed and maintained
buoys.
(b) If two or more residential owners, who otherwise qualify for
free use under the provisions of this section, are in dispute over
assertion of rights to install and maintain a mooring buoy in the same
location, they may seek formal settlement through adjudication in
superior court for the county in which the buoy site is located. In
the adjudication, preference must be given to the residential owner
that first installed and continually maintained and used a buoy on that
site, if it meets all applicable rules, regulations, and provisions of
this section, and then to the owner of the residential property nearest
the site. Nothing in this section requires the department to mediate
or otherwise resolve disputes between residential owners over the use
of the same site for a mooring buoy.
(c) The buoy cannot be sold or leased separately from the abutting
residential property. The buoy cannot be used to moor boats for
commercial or residential use, nor to moor boats over sixty feet in
length.
(d) If the department determines that it is necessary for secure
moorage, the abutting residential owner may install and maintain a
second mooring buoy, under the same provisions as the first, the use of
which is limited to a second mooring line to the boat moored at the
first buoy.
(e) The permission granted in this subsection (2) is subject to
applicable local, state, and federal rules and regulations governing
location, design, installation, maintenance, and operation of the
mooring buoy, anchoring system, and moored boat. Nothing in this
subsection (2) prevents a boat owner from obtaining a lease if
otherwise provided by law. This subsection (2) also applies to areas
that have been designated by the commissioner or the fish and wildlife
commission as aquatic reserves.
(3) This permission to install and maintain a recreational dock or
mooring buoy may be revoked by the department, or the department may
direct the owner of a recreational dock or mooring buoy to relocate
their dock or buoy, if the department makes a finding of public
necessity to protect waterward access, ingress rights of other
landowners, public health or safety, or public resources.
Circumstances prompting a finding of public necessity may include, but
are not limited to, the dock, buoy, anchoring system, or boat posing a
hazard or obstruction to navigation or fishing, contributing to
degradation of aquatic habitat, or contributing to decertification of
shellfish beds otherwise suitable for commercial or recreational
harvest. The revocation may be appealed as provided for under RCW
79.105.160.
(4) Nothing in this section authorizes a boat owner to abandon a
vessel at a recreational dock, mooring buoy, or elsewhere.

--- END ---