BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.95.011 and 2002 c 174 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the court commits a convicted person to the department of
corrections on or after July 1, 1986, for an offense committed before
July 1, 1984, the court shall, at the time of sentencing or revocation
of probation, fix the minimum term. The term so fixed shall not exceed
the maximum sentence provided by law for the offense of which the
person is convicted.
The court shall attempt to set the minimum term reasonably
consistent with the purposes, standards, and sentencing ranges adopted
under RCW 9.94A.850, but the court is subject to the same limitations
as those placed on the board under RCW 9.92.090, 9.95.040 (1) through
(4), 9.95.115, 9A.32.040, 9A.44.045, and chapter 69.50 RCW. The
court's minimum term decision is subject to review to the same extent
as a minimum term decision by the parole board before July 1, 1986.
Thereafter, the expiration of the minimum term set by the court
minus any time credits earned under RCW 9.95.070 and 9.95.110
constitutes the parole eligibility review date, at which time the board
may consider the convicted person for parole under RCW 9.95.100 and
9.95.110 and chapter 72.04A RCW. Nothing in this section affects the
board's authority to reduce or increase the minimum term, once set by
the court, under RCW 9.95.040, 9.95.052, 9.95.055, 9.95.070, 9.95.080,
9.95.100, 9.95.115, 9.95.125, or 9.95.047.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, not less than
ninety days prior to the expiration of the minimum term of a person
sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, for a sex offense committed on or after
September 1, 2001, less any time credits permitted by statute, the
board shall review the person for conditional release to community
custody as provided in RCW 9.95.420. If the board does not release the
person, it shall set a new minimum term not to exceed an additional
((two)) five years. The board shall review the person again not less
than ninety days prior to the expiration of the new minimum term. The
board's rules shall permit an offender to petition for an earlier
review if circumstances change or the board receives new information
that would warrant an earlier review.
(b) If at the time a person sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712 for a sex
offense committed on or after September 1, 2001, arrives at a
department of corrections facility, the offender's minimum term has
expired or will expire within one hundred twenty days of the offender's
arrival, then no later than one hundred twenty days after the
offender's arrival at a department of corrections facility, but after
the board receives the results from the end of sentence review process
and the recommendations for additional or modified conditions of
community custody from the department, the board shall review the
person for conditional release to community custody as provided in RCW
9.95.420. If the board does not release the person, it shall set a new
minimum term not to exceed an additional ((two)) five years. The board
shall review the person again not less than ninety days prior to the
expiration of the new minimum term. The board's rules shall permit an
offender to petition for an earlier review if circumstances change or
the board receives new information that would warrant an earlier
review.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.95.420 and 2006 c 313 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, before the
expiration of the minimum term, as part of the end of sentence review
process under RCW 72.09.340, 72.09.345, and where appropriate,
72.09.370, the department shall conduct, and the offender shall
participate in, an examination of the offender, incorporating
methodologies that are recognized by experts in the prediction of
sexual dangerousness, and including a prediction of the probability
that the offender will engage in sex offenses if released.
(b) The board may contract for an additional, independent
examination, subject to the standards in this section.
(c) If at the time the sentence is imposed by the superior court
the offender's minimum term has expired or will expire within one
hundred twenty days of the sentencing hearing, the department shall
conduct, within ninety days of the offender's arrival at a department
of corrections facility, and the offender shall participate in, an
examination of the offender, incorporating methodologies that are
recognized by experts in the prediction of sexual dangerousness, and
including a prediction of the probability that the offender will engage
in sex offenses if released.
(2) The board shall impose the conditions and instructions provided
for in RCW 9.94A.720. The board shall consider the department's
recommendations and may impose conditions in addition to those
recommended by the department. The board may impose or modify
conditions of community custody following notice to the offender.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no later than
ninety days before expiration of the minimum term, but after the board
receives the results from the end of sentence review process and the
recommendations for additional or modified conditions of community
custody from the department, the board shall conduct a hearing to
determine whether it is more likely than not that the offender will
engage in sex offenses if released on conditions to be set by the
board. The board may consider an offender's failure to participate in
an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in determining
whether to release the offender. The board shall order the offender
released, under such affirmative and other conditions as the board
determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a preponderance
of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more likely than
not that the offender will commit sex offenses if released. If the
board does not order the offender released, the board shall establish
a new minimum term, not to exceed an additional ((two)) five years.
(b) If at the time the offender's minimum term has expired or will
expire within one hundred twenty days of the offender's arrival at a
department of correction's facility, then no later than one hundred
twenty days after the offender's arrival at a department of corrections
facility, but after the board receives the results from the end of
sentence review process and the recommendations for additional or
modified conditions of community custody from the department, the board
shall conduct a hearing to determine whether it is more likely than not
that the offender will engage in sex offenses if released on conditions
to be set by the board. The board may consider an offender's failure
to participate in an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in
determining whether to release the offender. The board shall order the
offender released, under such affirmative and other conditions as the
board determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a
preponderance of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more
likely than not that the offender will commit sex offenses if released.
If the board does not order the offender released, the board shall
establish a new minimum term, not to exceed an additional ((two)) five
years.
(4) In a hearing conducted under subsection (3) of this section,
the board shall provide opportunities for the victims of any crimes for
which the offender has been convicted to present oral, video, written,
or in-person testimony to the board. The procedures for victim input
shall be developed by rule. To facilitate victim involvement, county
prosecutor's offices shall ensure that any victim impact statements and
known contact information for victims of record are forwarded as part
of the judgment and sentence.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.95.435 and 2003 c 218 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420
violates any condition or requirement of community custody, the board
may transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement status to
serve up to the remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any
period actually spent in community custody or in detention awaiting
disposition of an alleged violation and subject to the limitations of
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Following the hearing specified in subsection (3) of this
section, the board may impose sanctions such as work release, home
detention with electronic monitoring, work crew, community restitution,
inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling
sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any
other sanctions available in the community, or may suspend the release
and sanction up to sixty days' confinement in a local correctional
facility for each violation, or revoke the release to community custody
whenever an offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 violates
any condition or requirement of community custody.
(3) If an offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 is
accused of violating any condition or requirement of community custody,
he or she is entitled to a hearing before the board or a designee of
the board prior to the imposition of sanctions. The hearing shall be
considered as offender disciplinary proceedings and shall not be
subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall develop hearing
procedures and a structure of graduated sanctions consistent with the
hearing procedures and graduated sanctions developed pursuant to RCW
9.94A.737. The board may suspend the offender's release to community
custody and confine the offender in a correctional institution owned,
operated by, or operated under contract with the state prior to the
hearing unless the offender has been arrested and confined for a new
criminal offense.
(4) The hearing procedures required under subsection (3) of this
section shall be developed by rule and include the following:
(a) Hearings shall be conducted by members or designees of the
board unless the board enters into an agreement with the department to
use the hearing officers established under RCW 9.94A.737;
(b) The board shall provide the offender with ((written notice of
the violation,)) findings and conclusions which include the evidence
relied upon, and the reasons the particular sanction was imposed.
((The notice shall include a statement of the rights specified in this
subsection, and the offender's)) The offender will be notified of the
right to appeal the sanction and the right to file a personal restraint
petition under court rules after the final decision of the board;
(c) The hearing shall be held unless waived by the offender, and
shall be electronically recorded. For offenders not in total
confinement, the hearing shall be held within thirty days of service of
notice of the violation, but not less than twenty-four hours after
notice of the violation. For offenders in total confinement, the
hearing shall be held within thirty days of service of notice of the
violation, but not less than twenty-four hours after notice of the
violation. The board or its designee shall make a determination
whether probable cause exists to believe the violation or violations
occurred. The determination shall be made within forty-eight hours of
receipt of the allegation;
(d) The offender shall have the right to: (i) Be present at the
hearing; (ii) have the assistance of a person qualified to assist the
offender in the hearing, appointed by the ((hearing examiner))
presiding hearing officer if the offender has a language or
communications barrier; (iii) testify or remain silent; (iv) call
witnesses and present documentary evidence; (v) question witnesses who
appear and testify; and (vi) be represented by counsel if revocation of
the release to community custody upon a finding of violation is a
probable sanction for the violation. The board may not revoke the
release to community custody of any offender who was not represented by
counsel at the hearing, unless the offender has waived the right to
counsel; and
(e) The sanction shall take effect if affirmed by the ((hearing
examiner)) presiding hearing officer.
(5) Within seven days after the ((hearing examiner's)) presiding
hearing officer's decision, the offender may appeal the decision to the
full board or to a panel of three reviewing examiners designated by the
chair of the board or by the chair's designee. The sanction shall be
reversed or modified if a majority of the panel finds that the sanction
was not reasonably related to any of the following: (a) The crime of
conviction; (b) the violation committed; (c) the offender's risk of
reoffending; or (d) the safety of the community.
(6) For purposes of this section, no finding of a violation of
conditions may be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.96.050 and 2002 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) When ((a prisoner)) an offender on parole has performed all
obligations of his or her release, including any and all legal
financial obligations, for such time as shall satisfy the indeterminate
sentence review board that his or her final release is not incompatible
with the best interests of society and the welfare of the paroled
individual, the board may make a final order of discharge and issue a
certificate of discharge to the ((prisoner)) offender. ((The
certificate of discharge shall be issued to the offender in person or
by mail to the prisoner's last known address.))
(b) The board retains the jurisdiction to issue a certificate of
discharge after the expiration of the offender's or parolee's maximum
statutory sentence. If not earlier granted and any and all legal
financial obligations have been paid, the board shall issue a final
order of discharge three years from the date of parole unless the
parolee is on suspended or revoked status at the expiration of the
three years.
(c) The discharge, regardless of when issued, shall have the effect
of restoring all civil rights lost by operation of law upon conviction,
and the certification of discharge shall so state.
(d) This restoration of civil rights shall not restore the right to
receive, possess, own, or transport firearms.
(e) The board shall issue a certificate of discharge to the
offender in person or by mail to the offender's last known address.
(2) The board shall send a copy of every signed certificate of
discharge to the auditor for the county in which the offender was
sentenced and to the department of corrections. The department shall
create and maintain a data base containing the names of all felons who
have been issued certificates of discharge, the date of discharge, and
the date of conviction and offense.
((The board retains the jurisdiction to issue a certificate of
discharge after the expiration of the prisoner's or parolee's maximum
statutory sentence. If not earlier granted, the board shall make a
final order of discharge three years from the date of parole unless the
parolee is on suspended or revoked status at the expiration of the
three years. Such discharge, regardless of when issued, shall have the
effect of restoring all civil rights lost by operation of law upon
conviction, and the certification of discharge shall so state. This
restoration of civil rights shall not restore the right to receive,
possess, own, or transport firearms.))
(3) The discharge provided for in this section shall be considered
as a part of the sentence of the convicted person and shall not in any
manner be construed as affecting the powers of the governor to pardon
any such person.

--- END ---