BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.44.318 and 1995 c 100 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Licensees holding nonretail class liquor licenses are permitted to
allow their employees between (([the])) the ages of eighteen and
twenty-one to stock, merchandise, and handle beer or wine on or about
the nonretail premises if there is an adult twenty-one years of age or
older on duty supervising such activities on the premises, and
licensees holding grocery store or beer and/or wine specialty shop
licenses exclusively are permitted to allow employees of the nonretail
class liquor licensee between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one to
stock, merchandise, or handle beer or wine on or about the retail
licensee's premises as long as there is an adult twenty-one years of
age or older, employed by the retail licensee, present at the retail
licensee's premises during these activities. However, except as
provided in this section, nothing shall be construed to permit a
nonretail licensee's employee between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one to handle, transport, or otherwise possess beer or wine beyond the
premises of the retail licensee and any act or omission of the
nonretail licensee's employee occurring at or about the retail
licensee's premises, which violates any provision of this title, is the
sole responsibility of the nonretail licensee employer. Nothing in
this section absolves the retail licensee from responsibility for the
acts or omissions of its own employees which violate any provision of
this title.

--- END ---