BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the importance of
shellfish to Washington's environment, economy, and heritage, and
further recognizes that certain locations merit additional protective
measures than currently exist. This act intends to expand the
protection of shellfish to Clallam, Grays Harbor, Island, Jefferson,
King, Kitsap, Mason, Pacific, Pierce, San Juan, Skagit, Snohomish,
Thurston, and Whatcom counties.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.72.020 and 1985 c 417 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For purposes of this chapter,)) The definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Shellfish areas" means all saltwater areas, whether tidal or
subtidal, containing shellfish species typically grown or harvested for
human consumption.
(2) "Shellfish threatened area" means:
(a) Those commercial shellfish areas classified by the department
of health as approved or conditionally approved that meet the following
conditions:
(i) Are compliant with existing health standards;
(ii) Have at least one additional water quality sampling station in
the area that the department of health determines exceeds the ninetieth
percentile value of thirty fecal coliforms per one hundred milliliters
of water using the department of health's bacterial standards; and
(iii) Have been classified for at least five years; or
(b) Those recreational shellfish areas classified as open that meet
the same conditions as specified in (a)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this
subsection.
(3) "Shellfish tidelands" means all saltwater tidelands on which
shellfish are grown or harvested for human consumption.
(4) "Specified county" means Clallam, Grays Harbor, Island,
Jefferson, King, Kitsap, Mason, Pacific, Pierce, San Juan, Skagit,
Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.72 RCW
to read as follows:
For specified counties, the following applies to the legislative
authority of each county having shellfish areas within its boundaries:
(1) The legislative authority is authorized to establish a
shellfish protection district to include areas in which pollution
impacts the water quality upon which the continuation or restoration of
shellfish farming or harvesting is dependent, or when the department of
health identifies a shellfish threatened area as defined in this
chapter.
(2) The legislative authority constitutes the governing body of the
district and shall adopt a shellfish protection program to be effective
within the district.
(3) The legislative authority may appoint a local advisory council
to advise the legislative authority in preparation and implementation
of a shellfish protection program.
(4) The shellfish protection program must include any elements
deemed appropriate to deal with the nonpoint pollution threatening
water quality including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Requiring the elimination or decrease of contaminants in storm
water runoff;
(b) Establishing monitoring, inspection, and repair elements to
ensure that on-site sewage systems are adequately maintained and
working properly;
(c) Ensuring that animal grazing and manure management practices
are consistent with best management practices; and
(d) Establishing educational and public involvement programs to
inform citizens on the causes of the nonpoint pollution and what
citizens may do to decrease the amount of the pollution.
(5) The legislative authority shall consult with the department of
health, the department of ecology, the department of agriculture, the
department of natural resources, or the conservation commission as
appropriate as to the elements of the program.
(6) If the legislative authority is effectively addressing failing
on-site sewage systems within an existing marine recovery area, as
provided in RCW 70.118A.040, then such effective actions satisfy the
corresponding element requirement in the shellfish protection district.
(7) The legislative authority has full jurisdiction and authority,
within the limits of RCW 90.72.040 and 90.72.070, to do the following:
(a) Manage, regulate, and control its shellfish protection program;
and
(b) Fix, alter, regulate, and control the fees for services
provided and charges or rates as provided under those programs.
(8) The department of health shall grant funds to legislative
authorities, as available, to assist with the costs of creating,
establishing, implementing, and enforcing the provisions of shellfish
protection programs formed for shellfish threatened areas within the
specified counties.
(9) Programs established under this chapter may, but are not
required to, be part of a system of sewerage as defined in RCW
36.94.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.72 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The county legislative authority in a specified county shall
create a shellfish protection district and establish a shellfish
protection program, as provided in section 3 of this act, to address
the causes or suspected causes of pollution. The shellfish protection
district and shellfish protection program must be created within one
hundred eighty days after:
(a) The department of health, because of water quality degradation
due to ongoing sources of pollution, has closed, or downgraded the
classification of, a shellfish area; or
(b) A shellfish area has been identified as a shellfish threatened
area for greater than one year.
(2) The department of health may grant an extension to the one
hundred eighty-day time limit to create a shellfish protection district
and establish a shellfish protection program, provided that all of the
following conditions are met:
(a) Each extension may not be more than thirty days;
(b) No more than two extensions may be granted for each shellfish
area; and
(c) The legislative authority requires additional time to establish
a taxing or fee district, or a funding account or source, to pay for
the cost of creating, implementing, or enforcing the shellfish
protection program.
(3) The county legislative authority is encouraged to implement
elements of the shellfish protection program as soon as practicable
following the department of health action requiring the formation of
the shellfish protection district.
(4) The county legislative authority shall initiate implementation
of all elements of the shellfish protection program no later than sixty
days after it is established.
(5) If water-quality sampling or shoreline sanitary surveys
conducted by the department of health indicate that nonpoint sources of
pollution that are causing the closure of, or have caused the
downgraded classification or status of, a shellfish threatened area
have been corrected prior to the deadline for creating a shellfish
protection district, then the requirement to form the district is
waived.
(6) The county legislative authority shall enforce the provisions
of shellfish protection programs upon implementation.
(7) A copy of the shellfish protection program must be provided to
the departments of health, ecology, and agriculture, to the applicable
local conservation districts, and to the conservation commission. An
agency that has regulatory authority for any of the sources of nonpoint
pollution regulated by the shellfish protection program shall cooperate
with the county in its implementation. The county legislative
authority shall submit a written report to the department of health
annually that describes the status and progress of the shellfish
protection program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.72 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of health shall allocate available funding from the
shellfish contamination prevention and protection account, created in
section 6 of this act, with the following conditions:
(1) Funding to the specified counties must be restricted to the
creation, establishment, implementation, and enforcement of shellfish
protection districts for shellfish areas that have been identified as
shellfish threatened areas for greater than one year.
(2) Specified counties that apply for one-time funding from the
department of health are eligible to receive matching funds. For these
matching funds, the department of health shall contribute one dollar
for every one dollar spent by the county.
(3) Specified counties that establish ongoing funding through a
taxing or fee district are eligible to receive matching funds from the
department of health. For these matching funds, the department of
health shall contribute two dollars for every one dollar spent by the
county.
(4) Specified counties that demonstrate, to the department of
health, an economic hardship and an inability to afford the county's
matching share under:
(a) Subsection (2) of this section, are eligible, and may apply
for, full one-time funding from the department of health; and
(b) Subsection (3) of this section, are eligible, and may apply
for, full ongoing funding from the department of health.
(5) Applications for full one-time funding and for full ongoing
funding, as provided in this section, must be separate applications.
Economic hardship must be demonstrated separately for each application.
(6) The department of health may reimburse itself for
administrative and technical assistance costs incurred under sections
3 and 4 of this act.
(7) Reimbursement to the department of health, as specified in
subsection (6) of this section, may be no more than ten percent of the
total funds provided for the purposes of sections 3 through 5 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.72 RCW
to read as follows:
The shellfish contamination prevention and protection account is
created in the state treasury. Moneys from the aquatic lands
enhancement account that are directed for deposit to the shellfish
contamination prevention and protection account must be deposited into
the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 5 of this act, referencing section 5 of this act by bill or
chapter number and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2007, in
the omnibus appropriations act, section 5 of this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 90.72.030 (Shellfish protection districts -- Establishment -- Governing body -- Programs) and 1992 c 100 s 2 & 1985 c 417 s 3; and
(2) RCW 90.72.045 (Shellfish protection districts -- Programs
required after closure or downgrading of growing area classification)
and 1992 c 100 s 4.

--- END ---