BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that dishonest
construction contractors sometimes hire workers without proper
licenses, certificates, and permits to do electrical, plumbing, and
conveyance work. This practice gives these contractors an unfair
competitive advantage and leaves workers and customers vulnerable.
Requiring workers to have their licenses, certificates, and permits in
their possession while doing such work will help address the problems
of the underground economy in the construction industry, level the
playing field for honest contractors, and protect workers and
consumers.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.106.020 and 2006 c 185 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person may engage in or offer to engage in the trade of
plumbing without having a journeyman certificate, specialty
certificate, temporary permit, or trainee certificate in his or her
possession. A trainee must be supervised by a person who has a
journeyman certificate, specialty certificate, or temporary permit, as
specified in RCW 18.106.070. No contractor may employ a person to
engage in or offer to engage in the trade of plumbing unless the person
employed has a journeyman certificate, specialty certificate, temporary
permit, or trainee certificate. This section does not apply to a
contractor who is contracting for work on his or her own residence.
Until July 1, 2007, the department shall issue a written warning to any
specialty plumber defined by RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) not having a valid
plumber certification. The warning will state that the individual must
apply for a plumber training certificate or be qualified for and apply
for plumber certification under the requirements in RCW 18.106.040
within thirty calendar days of the warning. Only one warning will be
issued to any individual. If the individual fails to comply with this
section, the department shall issue a penalty or penalties as
authorized by this chapter.
(2) No person may engage in or offer to engage in medical gas
piping installation without having a certificate of competency as a
journeyman plumber and a medical gas piping installer endorsement in
his or her possession. A trainee may engage in medical gas piping
installation if he or she has a training certificate and is supervised
by a person with a medical gas piping installer endorsement. No
contractor may employ a person to engage in or offer to engage in
medical gas piping installation unless the person employed has a
certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber and a medical gas
piping installer endorsement.
(3) No contractor may advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or
perform any work under this chapter without being registered as a
contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW.
(4) Violation of this section is an infraction. Each day in which
a person engages in the trade of plumbing in violation of this section
or employs a person in violation of this section is a separate
infraction. Each worksite at which a person engages in the trade of
plumbing in violation of this section or at which a person is employed
in violation of this section is a separate infraction.
(5) Notices of infractions for violations of this section may be
issued to:
(a) The person engaging in or offering to engage in the trade of
plumbing in violation of this section;
(b) The contractor in violation of this section; and
(c) The contractor's employee who authorized the work assignment of
the person employed in violation of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.106.070 and 2006 c 185 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a certificate of competency to all
applicants who have passed the examination and have paid the fee for
the certificate. The certificate shall be wallet size, made of a
durable material, and include a photograph of the holder. The
certificate shall bear the date of issuance, and shall expire on the
birthdate of the holder immediately following the date of issuance.
The certificate shall be renewable every other year, upon application,
on or before the birthdate of the holder, except for specialty plumbers
defined by RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) who also have an electrical
certification issued jointly as provided by RCW 18.106.050(3) in which
case their certificate shall be renewable every three years on or
before the birthdate of the holder. The department shall renew a
certificate of competency if the applicant: (a) Pays the renewal fee
assessed by the department; and (b) during the past two years has
completed sixteen hours of continuing education approved by the
department with the advice of the advisory board, including four hours
related to electrical safety. For holders of the specialty plumber
certificate under RCW 18.106.010(10)(c), the continuing education may
comprise both electrical and plumbing education with a minimum of
twelve of the required twenty-four hours of continuing education in
plumbing. If a person fails to renew the certificate by the renewal
date, he or she must pay a doubled fee. If the person does not renew
the certificate within ninety days of the renewal date, he or she must
retake the examination and pay the examination fee.
The journeyman plumber and specialty plumber certificates of
competency, the medical gas piping installer endorsement, and the
temporary permit provided for in this chapter grant the holder the
right to engage in the work of plumbing as a journeyman plumber,
specialty plumber, or medical gas piping installer, in accordance with
their provisions throughout the state and within any of its political
subdivisions on any job or any employment without additional proof of
competency or any other license or permit or fee to engage in the work.
This section does not preclude employees from adhering to a union
security clause in any employment where such a requirement exists.
(2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the plumbing construction trade or
who is learning the plumbing construction trade may work in the
plumbing construction trade if supervised by a certified journeyman
plumber or a certified specialty plumber in that plumber's specialty.
All apprentices and individuals learning the plumbing construction
trade shall obtain a plumbing training certificate from the department.
The certificate shall authorize the holder to learn the plumbing
construction trade while under the direct supervision of a journeyman
plumber or a specialty plumber working in his or her specialty. The
certificate shall be wallet size, made of a durable material, and
include a photograph of the holder. The holder of the plumbing
training certificate shall renew the certificate annually. At the time
of renewal, the holder shall provide the department with an accurate
list of the holder's employers in the plumbing construction industry
for the previous year and the number of hours worked for each employer.
An annual fee shall be charged for the issuance or renewal of the
certificate. The department shall set the fee by rule. The fee shall
cover but not exceed the cost of administering and enforcing the
trainee certification and supervision requirements of this chapter.
((Apprentices and individuals learning the plumbing construction trade
shall have their plumbing training certificates in their possession at
all times that they are performing plumbing work. They shall show
their certificates to an authorized representative of the department at
the representative's request.))
(3) Any person who has been issued a plumbing training certificate
under this chapter may work if that person is under supervision.
Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same job site and
under the control of either a journeyman plumber or an appropriate
specialty plumber who has an applicable certificate of competency
issued under this chapter. Either a journeyman plumber or an
appropriate specialty plumber shall be on the same job site as the
noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each
working day unless otherwise provided in this chapter. The ratio of
noncertified individuals to certified journeymen or specialty plumbers
working on a job site shall be: (a) Not more than two noncertified
plumbers working on any one job site for every certified specialty
plumber or journeyman plumber working as a specialty plumber; and (b)
not more than one noncertified plumber working on any one job site for
every certified journeyman plumber working as a journeyman plumber.
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in a technical school program in the plumbing
construction trade in a school approved by the work force training and
education coordinating board, may work without direct on-site
supervision during the last six months of meeting the practical
experience requirements of this chapter.
(4) An individual who has a current training certificate and who
has successfully completed or is currently enrolled in a medical gas
piping installer training course approved by the department may work on
medical gas piping systems if the individual is under the direct
supervision of a certified medical gas piping installer who holds a
medical gas piping installer endorsement one hundred percent of a
working day on a one-to-one ratio.
(5) The training to become a certified plumber must include not
less than sixteen hours of classroom training established by the
director with the advice of the advisory board. The classroom training
must include, but not be limited to, electrical wiring safety,
grounding, bonding, and other related items plumbers need to know to
work under RCW 19.28.091.
(6) All persons who are certified plumbers before January 1, 2003,
are deemed to have received the classroom training required in
subsection (5) of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.106.090 and 1985 c 7 s 78 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to grant and issue temporary permits
in lieu of certificates of competency whenever a plumber coming into
the state of Washington from another state requests the department for
a temporary permit to engage in the trade of plumbing as a journeyman
plumber or as a specialty plumber during the period of time between
filing of an application for a certificate as provided in RCW
18.106.030 as now or hereafter amended and taking the examination
provided for in RCW 18.106.050((: PROVIDED, That)). The temporary
permit shall be wallet size, made of a durable material, and include a
photograph of the plumber. No temporary permit shall be issued to:
(1) Any person who has failed to pass the examination for a
certificate of competency;
(2) Any applicant under this section who has not furnished the
department with such evidence required under RCW 18.106.030;
(3) To any apprentice plumber.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.106.170 and 1983 c 124 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
An authorized representative of the department may investigate
alleged or apparent violations of this chapter. An authorized
representative of the department upon presentation of credentials may
inspect sites at which a person is doing plumbing work for the purpose
of determining whether that person has a certificate or permit issued
by the department in accordance with this chapter or is supervised by
a person who has such a certificate or permit. Upon request of the
authorized representative of the department, a person doing plumbing
work shall produce ((evidence that the person has a)) his or her
certificate or permit ((issued by the department in accordance with
this chapter)) or, if required by this chapter, evidence that he or she
is supervised by a person who has such a certificate or permit.

Sec. 6 RCW 19.28.271 and 2001 c 211 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity to employ an individual for purposes of RCW 19.28.161
through 19.28.271 who has not been issued a certificate of competency,
a temporary permit, or a training certificate. It is unlawful for any
individual to engage in the electrical construction trade or to
maintain or install any electrical equipment or conductors without
having in his or her possession a certificate of competency, a
temporary permit, or a training certificate under RCW 19.28.161 through
19.28.271. The individual shall produce the certificate of competency,
temporary permit, or training certificate upon request of an authorized
representative of the department.
(2) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
found in violation of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be assessed
a penalty of not less than fifty dollars or more than five hundred
dollars. The department shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for
violating RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271. An appeal may be made to
the board as is provided in RCW 19.28.131. The appeal shall be filed
within twenty days after the notice of the penalty is given to the
assessed party by certified mail, return receipt requested, sent to the
last known address of the assessed party and shall be made by filing a
written notice of appeal with the department. Any equipment maintained
or installed by any person who does not possess a certificate of
competency under RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not receive an
electrical work permit and electrical service shall not be connected or
maintained to operate the equipment. Each day that a person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity violates RCW 19.28.161
through 19.28.271 is a separate violation.
(((2))) (3) A civil penalty shall be collected in a civil action
brought by the attorney general in the county wherein the alleged
violation arose at the request of the department if any of RCW
19.28.161 through 19.28.271 or any rules adopted under RCW 19.28.161
through 19.28.271 are violated.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.28.161 and 2006 c 224 s 2 and 2006 c 185 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) No person may engage in the electrical construction trade
without having a valid master journeyman electrician certificate of
competency, journeyman electrician certificate of competency, master
specialty electrician certificate of competency, or specialty
electrician certificate of competency issued by the department in
accordance with this chapter. Electrician certificate of competency
specialties include, but are not limited to: Residential, pump and
irrigation, limited energy system, signs, nonresidential maintenance,
restricted nonresidential maintenance, and appliance repair. Until
July 1, 2007, the department of labor and industries shall issue a
written warning to any specialty pump and irrigation or domestic pump
electrician not having a valid electrician certification. The warning
will state that the individual must apply for an electrical training
certificate or be qualified for and apply for electrician certification
under the requirements in RCW 19.28.191(1)(g) within thirty calendar
days of the warning. Only one warning will be issued to any
individual. If the individual fails to comply with this section, the
department shall issue a penalty as defined in RCW 19.28.271 to the
individual.
(2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical construction trade
or who is learning the electrical construction trade may work in the
electrical construction trade if supervised by a certified master
journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty
electrician in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
in that electrician's specialty. All apprentices and individuals
learning the electrical construction trade shall obtain an electrical
training certificate from the department. The certificate shall
authorize the holder to learn the electrical construction trade while
under the direct supervision of a master journeyman electrician,
journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty. The certificate shall be wallet size, made of
a durable material, and include a photograph of the holder. The holder
of the electrical training certificate shall renew the certificate
biennially. At the time of renewal, the holder shall provide the
department with an accurate list of the holder's employers in the
electrical construction industry for the previous biennial period and
the number of hours worked for each employer, and proof of sixteen
hours of approved classroom electrical continuing education courses
covering this chapter, the national electrical code, or electrical
theory, or the equivalent electrical training courses taken as part of
an approved apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04 RCW or an
approved electrical training program under RCW 19.28.191(1)(h). This
education requirement is effective July 1, 2007. A biennial fee shall
be charged for the issuance or renewal of the certificate. The
department shall set the fee by rule. The fee shall cover but not
exceed the cost of administering and enforcing the trainee
certification and supervision requirements of this chapter.
Apprentices and individuals learning the electrical construction trade
shall have their electrical training certificates in their possession
at all times that they are performing electrical work. They shall show
their certificates to an authorized representative of the department at
the representative's request.
(3) Any person who has been issued an electrical training
certificate under this chapter may work if that person is under
supervision. Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same
job site and under the control of either a certified master journeyman
electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty. Either a certified master
journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty shall be on the
same job site as the noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each working day unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(4) The ratio of noncertified individuals to certified master
journeymen electricians, journeymen electricians, master specialty
electricians, or specialty electricians on any one job site is as
follows:
(a) When working as a specialty electrician, not more than two
noncertified individuals for every certified master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, master journeyman
electrician, or journeyman electrician, except that the ratio
requirements are one certified master specialty electrician working in
that electrician's specialty, specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, master journeyman electrician, or journeyman
electrician working as a specialty electrician to no more than four
students enrolled in and working as part of an electrical construction
program at public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit
nationally accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the work
force training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10
RCW. In meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in an
electrical construction program at a trade school, a trade school may
receive input and advice from the electrical board; and
(b) When working as a journeyman electrician, not more than one
noncertified individual for every certified master journeyman
electrician or journeyman electrician, except that the ratio
requirements shall be one certified master journeyman electrician or
journeyman electrician to no more than four students enrolled in and
working as part of an electrical construction program at public
community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the work force
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW. In
meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in an electrical
construction program at a trade school, a trade school may receive
input and advice from the electrical board.
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in an electrical construction program at
public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade schools licensed by the work force
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may
work without direct on-site supervision during the last six months of
meeting the practical experience requirements of this chapter.
(5) For the residential (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(a)),
pump and irrigation (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(b)), sign (as
specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(d)), limited energy (as specified in
WAC 296-46B-920(2)(e)), nonresidential maintenance (as specified in WAC
296-46B-920(2)(g)), restricted nonresidential maintenance as determined
by the department in rule, or other new nonresidential specialties, not
including appliance repair, as determined by the department in rule,
either a master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master
specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or
specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty must be
on the same job site as the noncertified individual for a minimum of
seventy-five percent of each working day. Other specialties must meet
the requirements specified in RCW 19.28.191 (1)(g)(ii). When the ratio
of certified electricians to noncertified individuals on a job site is
one certified electrician to three or four noncertified individuals,
the certified electrician must:
(a) Directly supervise and instruct the noncertified individuals
and the certified electrician may not directly make or engage in an
electrical installation; and
(b) Be on the same job site as the noncertified individual for a
minimum of one hundred percent of each working day.
(6) The electrical contractor shall accurately verify and attest to
the electrical trainee hours worked by electrical trainees on behalf of
the electrical contractor.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.28.211 and 2006 c 185 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a certificate of competency to all
applicants who have passed the examination provided in RCW 19.28.201,
and who have complied with RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 and the
rules adopted under this chapter. The certificate shall be wallet
size, made of a durable material, and include a photograph of the
holder. The certificate shall bear the date of issuance, and shall
expire on the holder's birthday. The certificate shall be renewed
every three years, upon application, on or before the holder's
birthdate. A fee shall be assessed for each certificate and for each
annual renewal.
(2) If the certificate holder demonstrates to the department that
he or she has satisfactorily completed an annual eight-hour continuing
education course, the certificate may be renewed without examination by
appropriate application unless the certificate has been revoked,
suspended, or not renewed within ninety days after the expiration date.
For pump and irrigation or domestic pump specialty electricians, the
continuing education course may combine both electrical and plumbing
education provided that there is a minimum of four hours of electrical
training in the course.
(a) The contents and requirements for satisfactory completion of
the continuing education course shall be determined by the director and
approved by the board.
(b) The department shall accept proof of a certificate holder's
satisfactory completion of a continuing education course offered in
another state as meeting the requirements for maintaining a current
Washington state certificate of competency if the department is
satisfied the course is comparable in nature to that required in
Washington state for maintaining a current certificate of competency.
(3) If the certificate is not renewed before the expiration date,
the individual shall pay twice the usual fee. The department shall set
the fees by rule for issuance and renewal of a certificate of
competency. The fees shall cover but not exceed the costs of issuing
the certificates and of administering and enforcing the electrician
certification requirements of this chapter.
(4) The certificates of competency and temporary permits provided
for in this chapter grant the holder the right to work in the
electrical construction trade as a master electrician, journeyman
electrician, or specialty electrician in accordance with their
provisions throughout the state and within any of its political
subdivisions without additional proof of competency or any other
license, permit, or fee to engage in such work.

Sec. 9 RCW 19.28.231 and 2001 c 211 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to grant and issue temporary permits
in lieu of certificates of competency whenever an electrician coming
into the state of Washington from another state requests the department
for a temporary permit to engage in the electrical construction trade
as an electrician during the period of time between filing of an
application for a certificate as provided in RCW 19.28.181 and the date
the results of taking the examination provided for in RCW 19.28.201 are
furnished to the applicant. The temporary permit shall be wallet size,
made of a durable material, and include a photograph of the holder.
The department is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements with
other states providing for the acceptance of such states' journeyman
and speciality electrician certificate of competency or its equivalent
when such states requirements are equal to the standards set by this
chapter. No temporary permit shall be issued to:
(1) Any person who has failed to pass the examination for a
certificate of competency, except that any person who has failed the
examination for competency under this section shall be entitled to
continue to work under a temporary permit for ninety days if the person
is enrolled in a journeyman electrician refresher course and shows
evidence to the department that he or she has not missed any classes.
The person, after completing the journeyman electrician refresher
course, shall be eligible to retake the examination for competency at
the next scheduled time.
(2) Any applicant under this section who has not furnished the
department with such evidence required under RCW 19.28.181.
(3) To any apprentice electrician.

Sec. 10 RCW 70.87.230 and 2003 c 143 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 70.87.270, a person may not perform
conveyance work within the state unless he or she is an elevator
mechanic who is regularly employed by and is working: (((1))) (a) For
an owner exempt from licensing requirements under RCW 70.87.270 and
performing maintenance; (((2))) (b) for a public agency performing
maintenance; or (((3))) (c) under the direct supervision of an elevator
contractor. A person, firm, public agency, or company is not required
to be an elevator contractor for removing or dismantling conveyances
that are destroyed as a result of a complete demolition of a secured
building or structure or where the building is demolished back to the
basic support structure whereby no access is permitted therein to
endanger the safety and welfare of a person.
(2) When performing conveyance work, an elevator mechanic must have
his or her license in his or her possession. The elevator mechanic
must produce the license upon request of an authorized representative
of the department.

Sec. 11 RCW 70.87.250 and 2003 c 143 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon approval of an application, the department may issue a
license that is biennially renewable. Each license must include a
photograph of the licensee. The fee for the license and for any
renewal shall be set by the department in rule.
(2) The department may issue temporary elevator mechanic licenses.
These temporary elevator mechanic licenses will be issued to those
certified as qualified and competent by licensed elevator contractors.
The company shall furnish proof of competency as the department may
require. Each license must include a photograph of the licensee. Each
license must recite that it is valid for a period of thirty days from
the date of issuance and for such particular conveyance or geographical
areas as the department may designate, and otherwise entitles the
licensee to the rights and privileges of an elevator mechanic license
issued in this chapter. A temporary elevator mechanic license may be
renewed by the department and a fee as established in rule must be
charged for any temporary elevator mechanic license or renewal.
(3) The renewal of all licenses granted under this section is
conditioned upon the submission of a certificate of completion of a
course designed to ensure the continuing education of licensees on new
and existing rules of the department. The course must consist of not
less than eight hours of instruction that must be attended and
completed within one year immediately preceding any license renewal.
(4) The courses must be taught by instructors through continuing
education providers that may include, but are not limited to,
association seminars and labor training programs. The department must
approve the continuing education providers. All instructors must be
approved by the department and are exempt from the requirements of
subsection (3) of this section with regard to his or her application
for license renewal, provided that such applicant was qualified as an
instructor at any time during the one year immediately preceding the
scheduled date for such renewal.
(5) A licensee who is unable to complete the continuing education
course required under this section before the expiration of his or her
license due to a temporary disability may apply for a waiver from the
department. This will be on a form provided by the department and
signed under the pains and penalties of perjury and accompanied by a
certified statement from a competent physician attesting to the
temporary disability. Upon the termination of the temporary
disability, the licensee must submit to the department a certified
statement from the same physician, if practicable, attesting to the
termination of the temporary disability. At which time a waiver
sticker, valid for ninety days, must be issued to the licensee and
affixed to his or her license.
(6) Approved training providers must keep uniform records, for a
period of ten years, of attendance of licensees and these records must
be available for inspection by the department at its request. Approved
training providers are responsible for the security of all attendance
records and certificates of completion. However, falsifying or
knowingly allowing another to falsify attendance records or
certificates of completion constitutes grounds for suspension or
revocation of the approval required under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The department of labor and industries
shall convene a work group to develop recommendations for enforcement
of laws requiring persons performing plumbing, electrical, and
conveyance work to have proper licenses, certificates, and permits.
(2) The work group shall report its recommendations to the house
commerce and labor committee and the senate labor, commerce, research,
and development committee by December 1, 2008. Any recommendations
requiring amendments or additions to the plumbing, electrical, or
conveyance code shall include proposed legislation. Any
recommendations requiring appropriations shall include proposed
decision packages.
(3) This section expires April 1, 2009.

--- END ---