BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Hood Canal is
suffering from periodic episodes of low levels of dissolved oxygen that
results in the death of many types of aquatic animals. Further, the
legislature finds that during the last three years, Hood Canal has
experienced a constant condition of anoxia that has killed indigenous
bottom dwelling fish species. Therefore, in an effort to save these
species from extinction, the legislature declares that a pilot project
is necessary to test and evaluate whether the introduction of oxygen
into the waters of Hood Canal will preserve and enhance aquatic life.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of fish and wildlife
shall implement a pilot program to test the viability and efficiency of
introducing oxygen to the waters of Hood Canal for the purpose of
protecting aquatic life. The pilot project must take place in a small
marine area where a large number of bottom dwelling fish species exist.
The pilot project has the following goals:
(a) To determine the feasibility and cost of designing and
constructing a mechanical system to inject oxygen into Hood Canal,
thereby reducing the impact of low levels of dissolved oxygen on
aquatic life; and
(b) To construct, operate, and evaluate a pilot facility to
increase levels of dissolved oxygen near Sund Rock on Hood Canal.
(2) In implementing the pilot project, the department of fish and
wildlife shall undertake the following activities:
(a) During the first year of the pilot project, the department of
fish and wildlife shall determine the best location, depth, size,
design, and cost of a device to inject oxygen into the waters; and
(b) During the second year of the pilot project, the department of
fish and wildlife shall construct and deploy a mechanical oxygen
delivery device. The department of fish and wildlife shall also
evaluate the impact of injected dissolved oxygen on aquatic life.
(3) The department of fish and wildlife shall seek the involvement
of other organizations, including state and federal agencies, tribes,
and affected counties.
(4) The department of fish and wildlife may contract with
universities or consultants to perform appropriate modeling, data
collection, and analysis. No more than fifteen percent of any funding
provided to implement this section may be expended for administrative
overhead or other deductions not directly associated with conducting
the research required by this section.
(5) Immediately following the evaluation of the pilot project, the
department of fish and wildlife must report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the pilot project results and include
recommendations whether to proceed with a larger scale project to
inject oxygen into Hood Canal.
(6) This section expires January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sum of one hundred thirty-five
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general
fund to the department of fish and wildlife for the purposes of this
act.
(2) The sum of six hundred forty-six thousand five hundred dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of
fish and wildlife for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---