BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.101.350 and 1997 c 351 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All law enforcement personnel initially hired to, transferred
to, or promoted to a supervisory or management position on or after
January 1, 1999, and all corrections personnel of the state and all
counties and municipal corporations transferred or promoted to a
supervisory or management position on or after January 1, 1982, shall,
within the first six months of entry into the position, successfully
complete the core training requirements prescribed by rule of the
commission for the position, or obtain a waiver or extension of the
core training requirements from the commission.
(2) Within one year after completion of the core training
requirements of this section, all law enforcement personnel and
corrections personnel shall successfully complete all remaining
requirements for career level certification prescribed by rule of the
commission applicable to their position or rank, or obtain a waiver or
extension of the career level training requirements from the
commission.
(3) The commission shall provide the training required in this
section, together with facilities, supplies, materials, and the room
and board for attendees who do not live within fifty miles of the
training center. The training shall be delivered in the least
disruptive manner to local law enforcement or corrections agencies, and
will include but not be limited to regional on-site training,
interactive training, and credit for training given by the home
department.
(4) Nothing in this section affects or impairs the employment
status of an employee whose employer does not provide the opportunity
to engage in the required training.

--- END ---