BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall adopt:
(a) A comprehensive set of objective improvement standards that
schools and school districts must meet annually that are in addition to
the standards established by the federal no child left behind act of
2001;
(b) An objective, systematic set of criteria to identify
consistently high performing schools that show exemplary progress with
respect to meeting state and federal academic standards and a system of
monetary and nonmonetary rewards for such schools; and
(c) A program of progressive interventions for schools or school
districts that fail to meet the annual improvement standards adopted by
the board pursuant to (a) of this subsection.
(2) By December 1, 2007, the board shall report to the K-12
education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
regarding the objective improvement standards, criteria for
consistently high performing schools, monetary and nonmonetary rewards,
and program of progressive interventions the board has adopted as
required by subsection (1) of this section.
(3) If approved by the legislature, the board shall implement the
objective improvement standards, criteria for consistently high
performing schools, rewards, and program of progressive interventions
no later than September 1st following the legislature's approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The program of progressive interventions adopted by the board
under section 1 of this act shall require that if a school or school
district fails for six consecutive years to meet federal academic
standards or fails for four consecutive years to meet state academic
standards adopted by the board, the educational service district within
which the school or school district is located shall take control of
all functions of the school or school district. For purposes of this
section, such a school or school district shall be referred to as an
"annexed school" or an "annexed school district."
(a) The educational service district shall retain control of the
annexed school or annexed school district until the school or school
district meets state and federal standards for six consecutive years.
(b) The board's program of progressive interventions shall include
a plan for reinstating local control of the annexed school or annexed
school district when the school or school district meets state and
federal standards for six consecutive years.
(2) The program of progress interventions adopted by the board
shall provide the educational service district with broad powers to
manage and operate an annexed school or annexed school district placed
under the educational service district's control pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section. Such powers include but are not limited to:
(a) Modifying existing budgets and creating new budgets;
(b) Adopting, deleting, and modifying curricula, standards, and
assessments, to the extent allowed by law; and
(c) Entering into, terminating, and amending existing and new
contracts, including employment contracts, to the extent allowed by
law.
(3) An educational service district that takes control of an
annexed school or annexed school district pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section is, to the extent allowed by law, exempt from all state
statutes and rules applicable to schools, school districts, and school
district boards of directors, including but not limited to statutes and
rules regarding expenditure of state allocations, except for:
(a) Health, safety, and civil rights requirements for school
districts or schools; and
(b) Those statutes and rules made specifically applicable to
educational service districts that take control of a school or school
district.
(4) The board's program of progressive interventions applies
retroactively from the date the board first implements the program. For
purposes of this section, a school or school district is considered to
have failed to meet state academic standards for the total number of
consecutive years that the superintendent of public instruction has
identified the school or school district as failing to make adequate
yearly progress immediately preceding implementation of the board's
program.
(5) In its report required under section 1 of this act, the state
board of education shall identify:
(a) What additional resources the board anticipates an educational
service district will require to effectively take control of and manage
an annexed school or annexed school district; and
(b) A process for the educational service district that takes
control of an annexed school or annexed school district:
(i) To identify what additional resources, if any, the educational
service district needs in a particular situation to bring the annexed
school or annexed school district to state and federal academic
standards; and
(ii) To request funding for such resources from the state.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.305.130 and 2006 c 263 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy
and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability system to improve student academic achievement and
to improve school and school district performance; provide leadership
in the creation of a system that personalizes education for each
student and respects diverse cultures, abilities, and learning styles;
and promote achievement of the goals of RCW 28A.150.210. In addition
to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of
education shall:
(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within
the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special
meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public
business;
(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently
conduct the work of the board;
(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding
the work of the board;
(4) For purposes of statewide accountability:
(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once
assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and
technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical
education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems
appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent
with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and
shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the
federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the
requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998,
each as amended. The goals may be established for all students,
economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient
students, students with disabilities, and students from
disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic
backgrounds. The board may establish school and school district goals
addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for
students in grades seven through twelve. The board shall adopt the
goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board
shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment
in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory
action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the
legislature;
(b) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the
standard on the Washington assessment of student learning and, for high
school students, to obtain a certificate of academic achievement. The
board shall also determine student scores that identify levels of
student performance below and beyond the standard. The board shall
consider the incorporation of the standard error of measurement into
the decision regarding the award of the certificates. The board shall
set such performance standards and levels in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any
recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that
may be established for this purpose. The initial performance standards
and any changes recommended by the board in the performance standards
for the tenth grade assessment shall be presented to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by November
30th of the school year in which the changes will take place to permit
the legislature to take statutory action before the changes are
implemented if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature. The
legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards and
any changes made to the elementary level performance standards and the
middle school level performance standards;
(c) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify successful
schools and school districts and recommend to the superintendent of
public instruction schools and districts to be recognized for two types
of accomplishments, student achievement and improvements in student
achievement. Recognition for improvements in student achievement shall
include consideration of one or more of the following accomplishments:
(i) An increase in the percent of students meeting standards. The
level of achievement required for recognition may be based on the
achievement goals established by the legislature and by the board under
(a) of this subsection;
(ii) Positive progress on an improvement index that measures
improvement in all levels of the assessment; and
(iii) Improvements despite challenges such as high levels of
mobility, poverty, English as a second language learners, and large
numbers of students in special populations as measured by either the
percent of students meeting the standard, or the improvement index.
When determining the baseline year or years for recognizing individual
schools, the board may use the assessment results from the initial
years the assessments were administered, if doing so with individual
schools would be appropriate;
(d) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify schools and
school districts in need of assistance and those in which significant
numbers of students persistently fail to meet state standards. In its
deliberations, the board shall consider the use of all statewide
mandated criterion-referenced and norm-referenced standardized tests;
(e) Adopt a system of progressive interventions as required by
section 1 of this act and, after the legislature has authorized a set
of interventions, identify on a continuing basis schools and school
districts in which state intervention measures ((will be)) are needed
((and a range of appropriate intervention strategies after the
legislature has authorized a set of intervention strategies. After the
legislature has authorized a set of intervention strategies, at the
request of the board, the superintendent shall intervene in the school
or school district and take corrective actions)). This chapter does
not provide additional authority for the board or the superintendent of
public instruction, beyond that authority specifically provided by this
section or section 1 or 2 of this act, to intervene in a school or
school district;
(f) Identify performance incentive systems that have improved or
have the potential to improve student achievement;
(g) Adopt a system of monetary and nonmonetary rewards for schools
that show exemplary progress with respect to meeting state and federal
academic standards and, if the system is approved by the legislature,
identify on a continuing basis schools and school districts for which
such rewards are warranted;
(h) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure
fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially
with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of
public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and
(((h))) (i) Include in the biennial report required under RCW
28A.305.035, information on the progress that has been made in
achieving goals adopted by the board;
(5) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and
procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all
private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to
the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a
program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve:
PROVIDED, That no private school may be approved that operates a
kindergarten program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no private schools
shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret
societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials;
(6) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, work
force representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to
coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;
(7) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to
reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be
appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020. The executive director,
administrative assistant, and all but one of the other personnel of the
board are exempt from civil service, together with other staff as now
or hereafter designated as exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW;
and
(8) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

--- END ---