BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.410 and 2002 c 353 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature shall establish for each school year in the
appropriations act a statewide salary ((allocation)) schedule((, for
allocation purposes only,)) to be used to distribute funds for basic
education certificated instructional staff salaries under RCW
28A.150.260.
(a) The statewide salary schedule shall be based on performance
categories of knowledge, skills, abilities, and levels of effort as
defined under section 2 of this act.
(b) School districts shall assign certificated instructional staff
to the appropriate performance category in the statewide salary
schedule using the performance evaluation process defined under section
3 of this act.
(2) Salary allocations for state-funded basic education
certificated instructional staff shall be calculated by the
superintendent of public instruction ((by determining the district's
average salary for certificated instructional staff,)) using the
statewide salary ((allocation)) schedule, district-reported assignments
of staff to the schedule, and related documents, conditions, and
limitations established by the omnibus appropriations act.
(((3) Beginning January 1, 1992, no more than ninety college
quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate
degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the
state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in the
omnibus appropriations act, or any replacement schedules and documents,
unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board shall define four
performance categories of knowledge, skills, abilities, and levels of
effort of certificated instructional staff employed in public schools
for purposes of the statewide salary schedule under RCW 28A.150.410.
The performance categories shall be entry, professional, lead, and
master. The professional educator standards board shall align the
state certification and licensing system and the state compensation
system for certificated instructional staff through the performance
categories of the statewide salary schedule.
(2) The general attributes of teachers in the four performance
categories are as provided in this subsection.
(a) Entry. Entry level teachers have successfully completed an
approved teacher preparation program with a student-teaching
experience, but have little additional experience in managing, leading,
and instructing in their own classroom. Entry level teachers require
mentoring and guidance; are learning to apply concepts of learning and
instructional theory to classroom situations and students; tend to
focus on classroom management; and use a limited range of instructional
strategies.
(b) Professional. Professional level teachers have successfully
completed a performance-based professional certificate program,
including demonstrating a positive impact on student learning.
Professional level teachers are continually expanding the range and
complexity of instructional and assessment strategies; use data to
analyze student performance; and adapt instruction to student needs and
student learning styles. All teachers are expected to reach a
professional level of performance and increase their competencies
thereafter.
(c) Lead. Lead teachers serve as a role model for above-average
skill and competency in teaching, although not yet to the level of
exemplary performance. Lead teachers regularly assume leadership
responsibilities in mentoring, coaching, curriculum development, and
other school or district improvement initiatives.
(d) Master. Master teachers are widely acknowledged by parents,
colleagues, administrators, and students as exemplary teachers and
leaders due to their knowledge and skills in classroom management,
adaptation of instruction, design and use of curriculum and
assessments, and parent involvement. Even the most academically and
personally challenged students demonstrate improved learning when
taught by a master teacher.
(3) The professional educator standards board shall delineate and
describe the attributes of teachers in each of the four performance
categories in greater detail than the general descriptions in
subsection (2) of this section to provide guidance to school districts
in assigning teachers to the appropriate category.
(4) The professional educator standards board shall also delineate
and describe the attributes of other types of certificated
instructional staff in each of the four performance categories to
reflect the specialized knowledge, skills, abilities, and levels of
effort of each staff type and to provide guidance to school districts
in assigning other certificated instructional staff to the appropriate
category.
(5) The professional educator standards board shall adopt rules to
implement this section no later than July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board shall develop an
objective, standard performance evaluation process for school districts
to determine the appropriate assignment of certificated instructional
staff to the performance categories of the statewide salary schedule as
defined in section 2 of this act. The evaluation process shall
include:
(a) Required procedures, evidence, documentation, and criteria to
be used by all school districts in assessing the knowledge, skills,
abilities, and levels of effort of certificated instructional staff for
the purposes of the statewide salary schedule;
(b) Evidence of a positive impact on student learning; and
(c) Appropriate due process protections for staff and procedures
for appeal of an assignment determination to the school district board
of directors.
(2) The evaluation process shall not include proxy indicators of
performance such as years of experience, credit hours, or degrees.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and
educational service districts shall provide regular training to school
districts on the performance evaluation process.
(4) The professional educator standards board shall conduct
periodic audits of school districts' use and application of the
performance evaluation process to ensure compliance.
(5) The professional educator standards board shall adopt rules to
implement this section no later than July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The professional educator standards board
shall submit a progress report to the governor and the education and
fiscal committees of the legislature on the implementation of sections
2 and 3 of this act by January 10, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee shall develop a new, performance-based
statewide salary schedule to be used beginning in the 2008-09 school
year to distribute funds for basic education certificated instructional
staff salaries under RCW 28A.150.260 and other state-funded
certificated staff salaries.
(a) The new schedule shall be based on the four performance
categories under section 2 of this act and shall include four steps of
increasing compensation amounts within each category.
(b) The first step of the first category in the new schedule shall
be an amount no less than the amount for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service from the previous
statewide salary allocation schedule authorized for the 2008-09 school
year in the omnibus appropriations act.
(c) The amounts of the steps after the first step in the new
schedule shall be based on a combination of two criteria:
(i) The amounts of each successive step shall increase in a logical
progression, given the levels of knowledge, skills, abilities, and
levels of effort expected from the staff; and
(ii) If state-funded certificated instructional staff are assigned
in the 2008-09 school year to a step on the new schedule at an amount
equal to or next highest compared to the step the staff would have been
assigned on the previous statewide salary allocation schedule for that
school year, the overall fiscal impact to the state of implementing the
new schedule is as close as possible to neutral for the 2008-09 school
year, based on the funds appropriated in the 2007 omnibus
appropriations act for the 2007-09 biennium.
(d) The committee shall adjust the calculations under this section
to reflect assignment to the new schedule of certificated instructional
staff in school districts that have historically received salary
allocations in excess of the statewide salary allocation schedule, and
the phase-out of these excess salary allocations over a four-year
period as provided under section 6 of this act. The committee shall
include in its calculations the additional funding for compensation
resulting from the implementation of section 6 of this act.
(2) The committee shall present the new statewide salary schedule
to the governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2007, for inclusion in the 2008 supplemental omnibus
appropriations act for the 2007-2009 biennium and implementation in the
2008-09 school year. The committee shall also report on the estimated
additional state cost, if any, necessary to implement the schedule in
the 2008-09 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the fiscal year 2008 appropriations for the
2007-08 school year, the legislature shall increase the appropriations
for salary allocations to school districts based on the statewide
salary allocation schedule in RCW 28A.150.410 by successive amounts
over a four-year period so that, by the fiscal year 2011 appropriations
for the 2010-11 school year, no school district receives salary
allocations for certificated instructional staff in excess of the
statewide salary allocation schedule.
(2) The amount of the annual increase in appropriations under this
section shall be calculated as follows:
(a) For the 2007-08 school year, the difference between the base
salary on the statewide salary allocation schedule and the base salary
of the school district with the highest historical salary allocation is
no more than four and three-fourths percent;
(b) For the 2008-09 school year, the difference between the base
salary on the statewide salary allocation schedule and the base salary
of the school district with the highest historical salary allocation is
no more than three and two-tenths percent; and
(c) For the 2009-10 school year, the difference between the base
salary on the statewide salary allocation schedule and the base salary
of the school district with the highest historical salary allocation is
no more than one and six-tenths percent.
(3) The increases in appropriations required under this section are
in addition to any increases required to implement RCW 28A.400.205.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2002 c 353 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter,
allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section.
(2)(a) ((Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be
less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and
(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a masters
degree shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
masters degree and zero years of service;)) All certificated
instructional staff shall be compensated using the statewide salary
schedule under RCW 28A.150.410 and section 2 of this act. A school
district board of directors may not adopt a salary schedule that is
different from the statewide salary schedule.
(b) For the 2008-09 school year, certificated instructional staff
shall be assigned to a step on the statewide salary schedule under RCW
28A.150.410 that is an amount equal to or next highest compared to the
step the staff would have been assigned on the previous statewide
salary allocation schedule for that school year.
(c) For the 2009-10 school year and thereafter, school districts
shall assign new and continuing certificated instructional staff to the
statewide salary schedule under RCW 28A.150.410 and section 2 of this
act based solely on the outcome of the performance evaluation process
under section 3 of this act. A change in assignment on the statewide
salary schedule shall take effect at the beginning of the school year
immediately following the performance evaluation process. Assignment
determinations are not subject to the collective bargaining provisions
of chapter 41.59 RCW.
(3)(a) The actual ((average)) salary paid to certificated
instructional staff, based on their assignment to the statewide salary
schedule, shall not exceed the ((district's average certificated
instructional staff salary)) statewide salary schedule used for the
state basic education allocations for that school year as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410.
(b) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional
staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
For purposes of this section, fringe benefits shall not include payment
for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer
contributions for old age survivors insurance, workers' compensation,
unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits under the Washington
state retirement system; or employer contributions for health benefits
in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.
(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary
and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic
education program.
(4) Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may
exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by
separate contract for additional time, additional responsibilities, or
incentives. Supplemental contracts shall not cause the state to incur
any present or future funding obligation. Supplemental contracts shall
be subject to the collective bargaining provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW
and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed one year, and
if not renewed shall not constitute adverse change in accordance with
RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No district may enter into a
supplemental contract under this subsection for the provision of
services which are a part of the basic education program required by
Article IX, section 3 of the state Constitution.
(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply
with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In addition to and not subject to the limitations of salaries
provided under RCW 28A.400.200, certificated instructional staff who
meet the eligibility criteria shall receive annual salary bonuses under
this section, beginning in the 2007-08 school year. Bonuses under this
section are provided on a year-to-year basis; are renewable subject to
continued eligibility; are not subject to the collective bargaining
provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW; and are not part of basic education.
Salary bonuses shall be paid in monthly increments and shall be
included in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW
41.32.010(10).
(2) Teachers who hold certification endorsements in mathematics,
science, a designated science, middle level math/science, special
education, or early childhood special education, and whose duty
assignment for the school year is to teach one or more of these subject
areas, shall receive a salary bonus of five thousand dollars.
(3) Teachers who hold a certification endorsement in bilingual
education or who are bilingual in a language spoken as a first language
by students enrolled in the school district shall receive a salary
bonus of five thousand dollars.
(4)(a) Certificated instructional staff employed in rural and
remote school districts shall receive a salary bonus of two thousand
dollars. For the purposes of this section, "rural and remote" means a
school district whose central administrative office is:
(i) Located in a county with a population of fewer than one hundred
persons per square mile; and
(ii) Located more than one hour travel time under normal travel
conditions from a city or town with a population of ten thousand or
more persons.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
identify rural and remote school districts under this section using the
most recent state population data collected by the office of financial
management and travel information from the department of
transportation.
(5) Teachers who hold a valid certificate from the national board
for professional teaching standards shall receive a salary bonus of
three thousand five hundred dollars. A teacher who attains
certification after the beginning of a school year shall receive the
bonus beginning the following school year.
(6)(a) Teachers who commit to teach in a challenged school for at
least three years shall receive a salary bonus of five thousand dollars
during each year that their duty assignment is to teach in that
challenged school. For the purposes of this section, "challenged
school" means:
(i) At least sixty percent of the students enrolled in the school
are eligible for free and reduced price lunch; and
(ii) The school is in federal "needs improvement" status under P.L.
107-110, the no child left behind act of 2001.
(b) A teacher who fails to fulfill the three-year commitment to
teach in the challenged school shall repay any bonus amounts previously
received to the superintendent of public instruction. Years of
teaching in a challenged school that occurred before the effective date
of this section shall not count toward the three-year commitment.
Nothing in this section precludes a teacher from teaching in a
challenged school for more than three years and continuing to receive
the salary bonus after the three-year commitment has been met.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to
implement this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.400.205 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) School district employees shall be provided an annual salary
cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
(a) The cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying the
rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base used in state funding formulas for teachers and
other school district employees. Beginning with the 2001-02 school
year, and for each subsequent school year, except for the 2003-04 and
2004-05 school years, each school district shall be provided a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to grant this cost-of-living increase.
(b) A school district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
compensation policies. No later than the end of the school year, each
school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) Any funded cost-of-living increase shall be included in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for school
employees in subsequent years. For teachers and other certificated
instructional staff, the rate of the annual cost-of-living increase
funded for certificated instructional staff shall be applied to the
((base salary used with)) steps of the statewide salary ((allocation))
schedule established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary
models used to recognize school district personnel costs.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any school year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.340.040 and 1990 c 33 s 369 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) School districts participating in a cooperative project
pursuant to RCW 28A.340.030 may adopt identical salary schedules
following compliance with chapter 41.59 RCW: PROVIDED, That if the
districts participating in a cooperative project adopt identical salary
schedules, the participating districts shall be considered a single
school district for purposes of establishing compliance with the salary
limitations of RCW 28A.400.200(3) but not for the purposes of
allocation of state funds.
(2))) For purposes of computing fringe benefit contributions for
purposes of establishing compliance with RCW 28A.400.200(3)(b), the
districts participating in a cooperative project pursuant to RCW
28A.340.030 may use the greater of: (((a))) (1) The highest amount
provided in the 1986-87 school year by a district participating in the
cooperative project; or (((b))) (2) the amount authorized for such
purposes in the state operating appropriations act in effect at the
time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.405.200 (Annual salary schedules as basis for salaries
of certificated employees) and 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 1;
(2) RCW 28A.415.020 (Credit on salary schedule for approved in-service training, continuing education, and internship) and 2006 c 263
s 808, 1995 c 284 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 415, & 1987 c 519 s 1;
(3) RCW 28A.415.023 (Credit on salary schedule for approved in-service training, continuing education, or internship -- Course content--Rules) and 2005 c 497 s 209, 2005 c 393 s 1, & 1997 c 90 s 1;
(4) RCW 28A.415.024 (Credit on salary schedule -- Accredited
institutions -- Verification -- Penalty for submitting credits from
unaccredited institutions) and 2006 c 263 s 809 & 2005 c 461 s 1; and
(5) RCW 28A.415.025 (Internship clock hours -- Rules) and 2006 c 263
s 810 & 1995 c 284 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1, 7, and 9 through 11 of this act
take effect September 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 6 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---