BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that an accountability
system for improved student academic achievement is incomplete without
recognition and rewards for exemplary effort by teachers, staff, and
principals as evidenced by outstanding school performance on statewide
assessments. Rewards can be a mechanism to focus a school's attention
on attaining specific goals; motivate teachers, staff, and principals
to excel in their own performance; and channel resources and energy in
the school toward improving student achievement. Rewards made on a
schoolwide basis reinforce the notion that each individual in the
school plays an important role in educating students, and each should
in turn be recognized when student academic performance in the school
is outstanding or makes significant improvement. The legislature also
finds that strong educational and managerial leadership by the
principal is a significant contributing factor to a school's high
performance and deserves special recognition and reward.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
The schoolwide academic achievement bonus program is established
under this section and sections 3 through 5 of this act to recognize
and reward the teachers, staff, and principal of public schools that
demonstrate exemplary performance as defined by section 4 of this act
and challenged schools that demonstrate significant performance
improvement as defined by section 5 of this act. The state board of
education shall adopt policies to implement the program, identify the
schools that are eligible to receive bonuses, and oversee operation of
the program with administrative assistance from the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for the
purposes of this section:
(1) Each school identified by the state board of education as
demonstrating exemplary performance as defined by section 4 of this act
or significant performance improvement as defined by section 5 of this
act is eligible to receive a schoolwide bonus of up to two hundred
dollars per student enrolled in the school, subject to a maximum total
bonus of one hundred fifty thousand dollars. The teachers and staff
assigned to the school shall determine collectively how the bonus shall
be expended, which may include the purchase of materials, supplies,
equipment, or services; temporary hiring of additional teachers or
staff; payments to individual teachers and staff assigned to the
school; or a combination of these or other expenditures. If the
teachers and staff assigned to the school cannot reach agreement on
expenditure of the bonus by November 15th of the year the bonus is
received, the superintendent of the school district in which the school
is located shall determine how the bonus shall be expended for the
benefit of the school. Any payments made to individual teachers and
staff assigned to the school shall be in a single lump sum, shall
include the costs of mandatory fringe benefits, and shall not be
considered "earnable compensation" under RCW 41.32.010(10) or
"compensation earnable" under RCW 41.35.010(6). The determination
under this section of how the schoolwide bonus shall be expended is not
subject to collective bargaining under chapter 41.56 or 41.59 RCW.
(2) In addition, the principal of each school identified by the
state board of education as demonstrating exemplary performance as
defined by section 4 of this act or significant performance improvement
as defined by section 5 of this act is eligible to receive a bonus of
up to twenty thousand dollars. Payment of the bonus to a principal
shall be in a single lump sum, shall include the costs of mandatory
fringe benefits, and shall not be considered "earnable compensation"
under RCW 41.32.010(10).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To identify schools that demonstrate exemplary performance, the
state board of education shall develop a performance index score for
each public school. The performance index score shall be weighted as
follows:
(a) One-half of the index score shall be the overall percent of
students in the school who met the state standard on the most recently
administered Washington assessment of student learning in grade four,
seven, or ten based on a composite of reading and mathematics
assessment results. A greater percent of students who met the state
standard generates a higher score; and
(b) One-half of the index score shall be the increase in the
percent of students in the school who met the state standard on the
most recently administered Washington assessment of student learning in
grade four, seven, or ten compared to the prior year, based on a
composite of reading and mathematics assessment results. A greater
increase in the percent of students who met the state standard
generates a higher score.
(2) A school that enrolls students in more than one of grades four,
seven, or ten shall have a performance index score for each applicable
grade.
(3) A school demonstrates exemplary performance if the performance
index score of the school falls within the highest two percent of
performance index scores of all schools with scores at the same grade
level. A school that has more than one performance index score may not
receive more than one schoolwide and principal bonus for exemplary
performance in the same year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To identify schools that demonstrate significant performance
improvement, the state board of education shall first identify
"challenged" schools using results from the Washington assessment of
student learning administered three years prior. A challenged school
is one where the overall percent of students in the school who met the
state standard on the Washington assessment of student learning in
grade four, seven, or ten based on a composite of reading and
mathematics assessment results was in the lowest ten percent of schools
with assessment results at the same grade level.
(2) A challenged school demonstrates significant performance
improvement if the overall percent of students in the school who met
the state standard on the most recently administered Washington
assessment of student learning in grade four, seven, or ten based on a
composite of reading and mathematics assessment results has increased
over the previous three years by a number of percentage points that is
more than one standard deviation above the mean of all schools with
assessment results at the same grade level.
(3) A school that enrolls students in more than one of grades four,
seven, or ten may be identified as a challenged school based on
assessment results from each applicable grade, but may not qualify for
more than one schoolwide and principal bonus for significant
performance improvement in the same year.
(4) A school may not receive bonuses for both exemplary performance
and significant performance improvement in the same year.

--- END ---