BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that there are
many challenges to children and families in achieving a high quality
basic education. Timely access to information about educational and
social service resources is essential for children and parents to
evaluate and make choices about educational opportunities. The
legislature finds that well-developed school counseling programs can
significantly increase academic achievement, improve building safety,
and reduce student dropout rates. The legislature further finds that
a comprehensive guidance and planning curriculum is now available to
all districts in the state. It is therefore the intent of the
legislature that all middle schools, junior high schools, and high
schools must implement a comprehensive guidance and planning program
for all students.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2006 c 263 s 322 are each amended to
read as follows:
The basic education allocation for each annual average full-time
equivalent student shall be determined in accordance with the following
procedures:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula based on a ratio of students
to staff for the distribution of a basic education allocation for each
annual average full-time equivalent student enrolled in a common
school. The distribution formula shall have the primary objective of
equalizing educational opportunities and shall provide appropriate
recognition of the following costs among the various districts within
the state:
(a) Certificated instructional staff and their related costs;
(b) Certificated administrative staff and their related costs;
(c) Classified staff and their related costs;
(d) Nonsalary costs;
(e) Extraordinary costs, including school facilities, of remote and
necessary schools as judged by the superintendent of public
instruction, with recommendations from the school facilities citizen
advisory panel under RCW 28A.525.025, and small high schools, including
costs of additional certificated and classified staff; and
(f) The attendance of students pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and
28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district.
(2)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall
be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature. The formula shall be for allocation
purposes only. While the legislature intends that the allocations for
additional instructional staff be used to increase the ratio of such
staff to students, nothing in this section shall require districts to
reduce the number of administrative staff below existing levels.
(b) The formula adopted by the legislature shall reflect the
following ratios at a minimum: (i) Forty-nine certificated
instructional staff to one thousand annual average full-time equivalent
students enrolled in grades kindergarten through three; (ii) forty-six
certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average full-
time equivalent students in grades four through twelve; (iii) four
certificated administrative staff to one thousand annual average full-
time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through twelve; and
(iv) sixteen and sixty-seven one-hundredths classified personnel to one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students enrolled in
grades kindergarten through twelve.
(c) In addition to the minimum ratios identified in (b) of this
subsection, certificated school counselors shall be included in the
formula according to the following ratios, phased in over four years:
(i) For the 2007-08 school year, two certificated school counselors
to one thousand annual average full-time equivalent students enrolled
in grades six through twelve;
(ii) For the 2008-09 school year, three certificated school
counselors to one thousand annual average full-time equivalent students
enrolled in grades six through twelve;
(iii) For the 2009-10 school year, four certificated school
counselors to one thousand annual average full-time equivalent students
enrolled in grades six through twelve;
(iv) For the 2010-11 school year and thereafter, five certificated
school counselors to one thousand annual average full-time equivalent
students enrolled in grades six through twelve.
(d) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect: PROVIDED, That the distribution formula developed
pursuant to this section shall be for state apportionment and
equalization purposes only and shall not be construed as mandating
specific operational functions of local school districts other than
those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 and
28A.150.100. The enrollment of any district shall be the annual
average number of full-time equivalent students and part time students
as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of
each month and shall exclude full-time equivalent students with
disabilities recognized for the purposes of allocation of state funds
for programs under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100. The definition
of full-time equivalent student shall be determined by rules of the
superintendent of public instruction: PROVIDED, That the definition
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any revision of the present
definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the office of financial management shall make
a monthly review of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent
students in the common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.
(3)(a) Certificated instructional staff shall include those persons
employed by a school district who are nonsupervisory employees within
the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(8): PROVIDED, That in exceptional cases,
people of unusual competence but without certification may teach
students so long as a certificated person exercises general
supervision: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the hiring of such classified
people shall not occur during a labor dispute and such classified
people shall not be hired to replace certificated employees during a
labor dispute.
(b) Certificated administrative staff shall include all those
persons who are chief executive officers, chief administrative
officers, confidential employees, supervisors, principals, or assistant
principals within the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(4).

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.600.045 and 2006 c 117 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The legislature encourages)) Each middle school, junior high
school, and high school ((to)) shall implement a comprehensive guidance
and planning program for all students. The purpose of the program is
to support students as they navigate their education and plan their
future; encourage an ongoing and personal relationship between each
student and an adult in the school; and involve parents in students'
educational decisions and plans.
(2) A comprehensive guidance and planning program is a program that
contains at least the following components:
(a) A curriculum intended to provide the skills and knowledge
students need to select courses, explore options, plan for their
future, and take steps to implement their plans. The curriculum may
include such topics as analysis of students' test results; diagnostic
assessments of students' academic strengths and weaknesses; use of
assessment results in developing students' short-term and long-term
plans; assessments of student interests and aptitude; goal-setting
skills; planning for high school course selection; independent living
skills; and postsecondary options and how to access them;
(b) Regular meetings between each student and a teacher who serves
as an advisor throughout the student's enrollment at the school;
(c) Student-led conferences with the student's parents, guardians,
or family members and the student's advisor for the purpose of
demonstrating the student's accomplishments; identifying weaknesses;
planning and selecting courses; and setting long-term goals; and
(d) Data collection that allows schools to monitor students'
progress.

--- END ---