BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that over the last
twenty-five years various aspects of the state funding formulas to
support basic education have been reviewed and revised based on study
findings. One aspect that has not undergone such a review is the
allocation for nonemployee-related costs within the general
apportionment program. The current nonemployee-related cost allocation
is based on an analysis of district expenditures conducted when the
basic education act was enacted and has been adjusted only for general
inflation since that time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee shall conduct a study of nonemployee-related costs based on a review of school district expenditures. The
purpose of the study is to:
(a) Make recommendations for revising and updating the amount of
the state allocation for nonemployee-related costs in the general
apportionment program funding formula, including the enhanced
allocation for vocational programs, to more accurately reflect costs of
such items as textbooks, fuel, utilities, vocational program equipment,
computer technology, and other common educational costs; and
(b) Recommend a division of the nonemployee-related cost allocation
into three components, each separately adjusted for inflation as
follows:
(i) An energy component, to be annually adjusted by the index for
fuels and utilities from the consumer price index for all urban
consumers, published by the United States bureau of labor statistics;
(ii) An instructional materials component, to be annually adjusted
by an aggregate index for educational books and supplies and
information technology from the consumer price index for all urban
consumers, published by the United States bureau of labor statistics;
and
(iii) A component for all other nonemployee-related costs covered
by the allocation, to be adjusted by the index for all items from the
consumer price index for all urban consumers, published by the United
States bureau of labor statistics.
(2) The legislative evaluation and accountability program committee
shall recommend the new allocations for nonemployee-related costs based
on the study findings to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2007.

--- END ---