BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) In a 2006 study of state funding for
kindergarten through twelfth grade student transportation, the joint
legislative audit and review committee found that:
(a) Because school districts are not required to track or report
the costs of transporting students to and from school, there is not
precise information on the extent that the state funding formula for
student transportation covers such costs;
(b) There is, however, a high probability that on a statewide
basis, the cost of transporting students to and from school exceeds
state revenues for this purpose;
(c) Significant structural and implementation problems exist with
the current funding method; and
(d) The legislature should carefully consider how to appropriate
funding for student transportation before decisions are made to provide
additional funding to districts.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to direct the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, in cooperation with the
legislative evaluation and accountability program, to develop a new
state funding formula for student transportation that addresses the
issues raised in the 2006 study.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.160.170 and 1990 c 33 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each district shall submit to the superintendent of public
instruction during October of each year a report containing the
following:
(((1)))(a)(i) The number of eligible students transported to and
from school as provided for in RCW 28A.160.150 for the current school
year and the number of miles estimated to be driven for pupil
transportation services, along with a map describing student route stop
locations and school locations, and (((b))) (ii) the number of miles
driven for pupil transportation services as authorized in RCW
28A.160.150 the previous school year; and
(((2))) (b) Other operational data and descriptions as required by
the superintendent to determine allocation requirements for each
district.
(2) Beginning with expenditures reported for the 2006-07 school
year, each district shall separate the costs of providing
transportation for eligible students to and from school as defined in
RCW 28A.160.160(3) from other transportation costs when reporting
expenditures for student transportation. The superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt rules, in consultation with the office of the
state auditor, that provide clear guidance for tracking and reporting
student transportation costs.
(3) Each district shall submit the information required in this
section on a timely basis as a condition of the continuing receipt of
school transportation moneys.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The superintendent of public
instruction, in cooperation with the legislative evaluation and
accountability program, shall develop and propose a new distribution
formula for allocating state funds for transportation costs under RCW
28A.160.150 through 28A.160.180.
(2) The distribution formula developed under this section should
seek to achieve the following objectives:
(a) More accurately reflect the costs of providing transportation
for eligible students to and from school based on data reported under
RCW 28A.160.170;
(b) Promote the efficient use of state and local resources; and
(c) Continue to allow local control of school district student
transportation programs, including determination of which individual
students are transported and by what manner and what routes are most
efficiently used.
(3) The superintendent and the legislative evaluation and
accountability program shall make a preliminary report on the proposed
distribution formula to the governor and the education and fiscal
committees of the legislature by September 1, 2007. A final report
with recommendations, estimates of the fiscal impact of the proposal on
the state and school districts, and draft legislation necessary to
implement the proposal shall be submitted by December 15, 2007.

--- END ---