BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the people of
Washington state intended through their approval of Initiative Measure
No. 728 to provide a stable funding source for the student achievement
fund through an allocation of the state property tax. The substitution
of funding from the education legacy trust fund breaks faith with the
people of the state and should be reversed so that state property tax
dollars are allocated to the support of local schools just as local
property tax dollars are.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.505.220 and 2005 c 514 s 1103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Total distributions from the student achievement fund to each
school district shall be based upon the average number of full-time
equivalent students in the school district during the previous school
year as reported to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction by August 31st of the previous school year.
(2) The allocation rate per full-time equivalent student shall be
((three hundred dollars in the 2005-06 school year, three hundred
seventy-five dollars in the 2006-07 school year, and)) four hundred
fifty dollars in the 2007-08 school year. For each subsequent school
year, the amount allocated per full-time equivalent student shall be
adjusted for inflation as defined in ((RCW 43.135.025(8))) this
section. These allocations per full-time equivalent student from the
student achievement fund shall be supported from ((the following
sources:
(a))) distributions from state property tax proceeds deposited into
the student achievement fund under RCW 84.52.068((; and
(b) Distributions from the education legacy trust account created
in RCW 83.100.230)).
(3) Any funds deposited in the student achievement fund under RCW
43.135.045 shall be allocated to school districts on a one-time basis
using a rate per full-time equivalent student. These funds are
provided in addition to any amounts allocated in subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) The school district annual amounts as defined in subsection (2)
of this section shall be distributed on the monthly apportionment
schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250.
(5) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for the United States for each fiscal year as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics.

Sec. 3 RCW 83.100.230 and 2005 c 514 s 1101 are each amended to
read as follows:
The education legacy trust account is created in the state
treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for ((deposit into the
student achievement fund and for)) expanding access to higher education
through funding for new enrollments and financial aid((,)) and other
educational improvement efforts.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.52.068 and 2005 c 514 s 1104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A portion of the proceeds of the state property tax levy shall
be deposited into the student achievement fund as provided in this
section.
(2)(a) The amount of the deposit shall be based upon the average
number of full-time equivalent students in the school districts during
the previous school year as reported to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by August 31st of the previous
school year.
(b) For the ((2004-2005 through 2007-2008 school years, an annual
amount equal to two hundred fifty-four dollars per full-time equivalent
student in all school districts shall be deposited in the student
achievement fund.
(c) For the 2008-2009 school year, an annual amount equal to two
hundred sixty-five dollars per full-time equivalent student in all
school districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(d) For the 2009-2010)) 2007-08 school year, an annual amount equal
to ((two hundred seventy-seven)) four hundred fifty dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school districts shall be deposited in
the student achievement fund.
(((e) For the 2010-2011 school year and each year thereafter, an
annual amount equal to two hundred seventy-eight dollars per full-time
equivalent student in all school districts shall be deposited in the
student achievement fund.
(f))) (c) Each subsequent year following the 2007-08 school year,
the amount deposited shall be adjusted for inflation as defined in RCW
28A.505.220.
(d) The school district annual amounts shall be deposited based on
the monthly apportionment schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall notify the
department of the monthly amounts to be deposited into the student
achievement fund to meet the apportionment schedule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect September 1, 2007.

--- END ---