BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that too many students
graduate from high school unprepared for college or entrance into the
workforce. There is no clear relation between the coursework required
for a high school diploma and the skills and knowledge needed to
succeed in college, whether the college program is academic or
technical in nature. There is also no common standard among the
state's two and four-year institutions of higher education as to what
constitutes readiness for college-level work as opposed to placement in
remedial courses. Therefore the legislature intends to direct the
responsible state agencies to work together to define and align
standards for high school graduation, college readiness, and college
admission.

Sec. 2 2006 c 263 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) The state board of education shall develop and propose a
revised definition of the ((purpose and)) expectations for high school
diplomas issued by public schools in Washington state. The revised
definition shall ((address whether attainment of a high school diploma
is intended to)) signify that a student is ready for success in
college((,)) as well as ready for successful and gainful employment in
the workplace((, or some combination of these and other objectives)).
In addition to identifying necessary courses and course content, the
revised definition shall ((focus on)) address the knowledge, skills,
and abilities that students are expected to ((demonstrate)) achieve to
receive a high school diploma, as well as the various methods to be
used to measure student performance((, rather than focusing on courses,
credits, seat time, and test scores)). The board shall recommend
college preparatory and career and technical pathways of equal rigor
for students to obtain a diploma. The board shall also recommend
enhancements to the college preparatory and career and technical
pathways for highly capable students.
(2) ((In developing the revised definition of the high school
diploma,)) The state board of education shall examine options for
creating endorsements on the standard diploma or creating honors
diplomas for students who successfully complete an advanced college
preparatory pathway or an advanced career and technical education
pathway.
(3) The state board of education shall consult with educators,
parents, institutions of higher education, employers, and community
leaders. The board shall also work with the state board for community
and technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, and
the workforce training and education coordinating board.
(((3))) (4) The state board of education shall submit the proposed
revised definition of the high school diploma, recommended pathways for
students to obtain the diploma, and recommendations regarding
endorsements or honors diplomas, along with any necessary revisions to
state statutes and rules, to the education committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The higher education coordinating board and
the state board for community and technical colleges, in consultation
with the public four-year institutions of higher education, shall
develop common college placement tests, one each in the areas of
mathematics and English. The boards shall also set common cutoff
scores for determining student qualifications for college-level
coursework in mathematics and English. All public two and four-year
institutions of higher education shall use the common college placement
tests and the common cutoff scores when determining student
qualifications for college-level coursework in mathematics and English.
The tests and scores shall be developed and implemented by the
beginning of the 2008-09 academic year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The higher education coordinating board, in
consultation with the state board of education, the state board for
community and technical colleges, and the public four-year institutions
of higher education, shall examine and revise minimum admissions
standards for four-year institutions of higher education so that the
standards are aligned with state minimum high school graduation
requirements and aligned with the standards and expectations for
college readiness, particularly in core academic subjects such as math,
science, and English. Revised minimum admissions standards shall be
implemented no later than September 1, 2008.

--- END ---