BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that families have a
major influence on their children's achievement in school. Families of
all income and education levels, and from all ethnic and cultural
backgrounds, should be supported and encouraged to be involved in
school and in their children's learning at home. Therefore the
legislature intends to establish first teacher parent mentor programs
to provide connections between schools, community organizations, and
parents; recruit and provide training for parent mentors; and expand
opportunities for involvement by parents in their children's schools,
particularly for parents from diverse communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Subject to the availability of funds
appropriated for this purpose, the superintendent of public instruction
shall allocate pilot grants on a competitive basis to school district
and community partnerships for the purpose of establishing first
teacher parent mentor programs.
(2) School districts that apply for a pilot grant under this
section must create partnerships with community organizations, state
and local government social service offices, and parent advisory
councils to establish the programs. In awarding the pilot grants, the
superintendent shall give priority to school districts with high
enrollment of students from diverse communities and school districts
where additional strategies such as expanded parent involvement are
needed to improve student achievement and reduce the achievement gap.
(3) The pilot grants may be used for the purposes of:
(a) Recruiting parents from diverse communities and training them
as mentors of other parents and advocates on behalf of their children's
education;
(b) Providing a stipend for parent mentors to conduct outreach with
other parents; serving as liaisons between parents, schools, and
community organizations; and acting as resources in helping parents
access educational, social, and governmental services from partners in
the program;
(c) Expanding parent involvement opportunities and multicultural
activities in schools, particularly for parents from diverse
communities;
(d) Conducting informational sessions for parents from diverse
communities to help them in their role as their children's first
teacher; and
(e) Conducting training for school staff on how to create "family-friendly" school environments, particularly for families from diverse
communities.

--- END ---