BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.110.230 and 2005 c 155 s 216 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The use of state-owned aquatic lands for public utility lines
owned by a governmental entity shall be granted by an agreement,
permit, or other instrument if the use is consistent with the purposes
of RCW 79.105.010, 79.105.030, 79.105.050, 79.105.210, 79.105.400, and
79.130.070 and does not obstruct navigation or other public uses. The
department may recover only its ((reasonable direct)) administrative
costs incurred in processing and approving the request or application,
and reviewing plans for construction of public utility lines as
determined under RCW 79.110.240. ((For purposes of this section,
"direct administrative costs" means the cost of hours worked directly
on an application or request, based on salaries and benefits, plus
travel reimbursement and other actual out-of-pocket costs. Direct))
Administrative costs recovered by the department must be deposited into
the resource management cost account.
(2) The use of state-owned aquatic lands for local public utility
lines owned by a nongovernmental entity will be granted by easement if
the use is consistent with the purpose of RCW 79.105.010, 79.105.030,
79.105.050, 79.105.210, 79.105.400, and 79.130.070 and does not
obstruct navigation or other public uses. The total charge for the
easement will be determined under RCW 79.110.240.
(3) Nothing in this section limits the ability of the department to
obtain payment for commodity costs, such as lost revenue from renewable
resources, resulting from the granted use of state-owned aquatic lands
for public utility lines.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.110.240 and 2005 c 155 s 162 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Until July 1, ((2008)) 2017, the charge for the term of an
easement granted under RCW ((79.105.220(2))) 79.110.230(2) will be
determined as follows and will be paid in advance upon grant of the
easement:
(a) Five thousand dollars for individual easement crossings that
are no longer than one mile in length;
(b) Twelve thousand five hundred dollars for individual easement
crossings that are more than one mile but less than five miles in
length; or
(c) Twenty thousand dollars for individual easement crossings that
are five miles or more in length.
(2) The charge for easements under subsection (1) of this section
must be adjusted annually by the rate of yearly increase in the most
recently published consumer price index, all urban consumers, for the
Seattle-Everett SMSA, over the consumer price index for the preceding
year, as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States
department of labor for the state of Washington rounded up to the
nearest fifty dollars.
(3) The term of the easement is thirty years or a period of less
than thirty years if requested by the person or entity seeking the
easement.
(4) In addition to the charge for the easement under subsection (1)
of this section, the department may recover its ((reasonable direct))
administrative costs incurred in receiving an application for the
easement, approving the easement, and reviewing plans for and
construction of the public utility lines. For the purposes of this
subsection, "((direct)) administrative costs" ((means the cost of hours
worked directly on an application, based on salaries and benefits, plus
travel reimbursement and other actual out-of-pocket costs)) is
equivalent to twenty percent of the fee for the easement as determined
under subsection (1) of this section and adjusted under subsection (2)
of this section. For public utility lines owned by a governmental
entity, the administrative costs will be calculated based on the length
of the easement and the fee that it would be charged if it were subject
to the easement charges in this section. When multiple public utility
lines are owned by the same entity and are authorized under the same
easement, the administrative fee for the easement shall be equal to
twenty percent of the easement fee for the single longest public
utility line. ((Direct)) Administrative costs recovered by the
department must be deposited into the resource management cost account.
(5) Applicants under RCW ((79.105.220(2))) 79.110.230(2) providing
a residence with an individual service connection for electrical,
natural gas, cable television, or telecommunications service are not
required to pay the charge for the easement under subsection (1) of
this section but shall pay administrative costs under subsection (4) of
this section.
(6) A final decision on applications for an easement must be made
within one hundred twenty days after the department receives the
completed application and after all applicable regulatory permits for
the aquatic easement have been acquired. This subsection applies to
applications submitted before June 13, 2002, as well as to applications
submitted on or after June 13, 2002. Upon request of the applicant,
the department may reach a decision on an application within sixty days
and charge an additional fee for an expedited processing. The fee for
an expedited processing is ((the greater of: (a))) ten percent of the
combined total of the easement charge and ((direct)) administrative
costs((; or (b) the cost of staff overtime, calculated at time and one-half, associated with the expedited processing)).
(7) By December 31, 2016, the legislature shall review the granting
of easements on state-owned aquatic lands under this chapter and
determine whether all applications for easements are processed within
one hundred twenty days for normal processing of applications and sixty
days for expedited processing of applications, and whether the granting
of easements on state-owned aquatic lands generates reasonable income
for the aquatic lands enhancement account.

--- END ---