BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A child may petition the juvenile court to reinstate the
previously terminated parental rights of his or her parent under the
following circumstances:
(a) The child must have been found to be a dependent child under
this chapter;
(b) The child must be at least twelve years of age at the time the
petition to reinstate parental rights is filed;
(c) At least three years have passed from the date of entry of an
order for the termination of parental rights;
(d) The child's permanent plan is adoption and the child has not
been adopted;
(e) The petition is signed by the child, unless the court finds
good cause not to require the child's signature; and
(f) The petition alleges facts demonstrating the parent is fit and
that reinstatement of parental rights is in the best interest of the
child.
(2) Upon the filing of a petition to reinstate parental rights, the
juvenile court shall order that a hearing be held. The court shall
give prior notice, or cause prior notice to be given, to the
department, the child's attorney, the child, the child's foster parent,
and the child's tribe, if applicable. The court shall also order the
department to give prior notice of the hearing to the child's former
parent or parents whose parental rights were terminated and to any
parent of the child whose parental rights were not terminated.
(3) The juvenile court shall conditionally grant the petition if it
finds the following by clear and convincing evidence:
(a) The parental deficiencies which led to the termination of
parental rights have been addressed to a degree that assures the court
that the reinstatement of parental rights will not present a risk to
the child's health, welfare, or safety;
(b) The parent is currently able to care for the child such that
placement of the child with the parent will not present a risk to the
child's health, welfare, or safety;
(c) The child is no longer likely to be adopted; and
(d) That reinstatement of parental rights is in the child's best
interest.
(4)(a) If the court conditionally grants the petition under
subsection (3) of this section, the case will be continued for one
year. During this period, the child shall be placed in the custody of
the parent. The department shall develop a permanency plan for the
child reflecting the plan to be reunification. The department shall
provide transition services to the family as appropriate. The court
shall conduct a minimum of two review hearings to determine the status
of the case and the well-being of the child.
(b) If the child must be removed from the parent due to abuse or
neglect allegations, the court shall dismiss the petition for
reinstatement of parental rights if the court finds the allegations
have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence.
(c) If the child has been successfully placed with the parent for
one year, the court order reinstating parental rights remains in effect
and the court shall dismiss the dependency if the court finds that
dismissal of the dependency is in the best interests of the child and
will not present a risk to the child's health, welfare, or safety.
(5) A child seeking to petition under this section shall be
provided counsel prior to the filing of the petition.
(6) The child's former parent or parents have the right to be
represented by counsel, and if indigent, to have counsel appointed for
him or her by the court after the petition for reinstatement of
parental rights has been filed. Unless waived in court, counsel shall
be provided to the child's parent if such person (a) has appeared in
the proceeding or requested the court to appoint counsel and (b) is
financially unable to obtain counsel because of indigency.
(7) A proceeding to reinstate parental rights is a separate action
from the termination of parental rights proceeding and does not vacate
the original termination of parental rights. An order granted under
this section reinstates the parental rights to the child. This
reinstatement is a recognition that the situation of the parent and
child have changed since the time of the termination of parental rights
and reunification is now appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Sections 1 through 5 of this act are
retroactive and apply to any child who is under the jurisdiction of the
juvenile court at the time of the hearing regardless of the date
parental rights were terminated.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.34.200 and 2003 c 227 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the termination of parental rights pursuant to RCW
13.34.180, all rights, powers, privileges, immunities, duties, and
obligations, including any rights to custody, control, visitation, or
support existing between the child and parent shall be severed and
terminated and the parent shall have no standing to appear at any
further legal proceedings concerning the child, except as provided in
section 1 of this act: PROVIDED, That any support obligation existing
prior to the effective date of the order terminating parental rights
shall not be severed or terminated. The rights of one parent may be
terminated without affecting the rights of the other parent and the
order shall so state.
(2) An order terminating the parent and child relationship shall
not disentitle a child to any benefit due the child from any third
person, agency, state, or the United States, nor shall any action under
this chapter be deemed to affect any rights and benefits that an Indian
child derives from the child's descent from a member of a federally
recognized Indian tribe.
(3) An order terminating the parent-child relationship shall
include a statement addressing the status of the child's sibling
relationships and the nature and extent of sibling placement, contact,
or visits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
The state or a person, individually or in a representative capacity
for the state, who is involved in the delivery of child welfare
services or child protective services through the children's
administration of the department of social and health services, is not
liable for selecting one of two or more alternative courses of action
even though the course of action chosen results in a poor outcome if
the person exercised reasonable care and skill in arriving at the
judgment to follow the particular course of action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Nothing in sections 1 through 5 of this act
may be construed to limit the application of other statutes specifying
a liability standard for the state's employees and agents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The legislature recognizes that the 2005
Washington state court improvement project re-assessment found that
Washington statutes fail to consistently address the health and safety
of children in care. Statutory language does not stress the safety and
welfare of the child as the paramount concerns. Additionally, the lack
of clarity in the statutes undermines the effectiveness of the hearings
and, ultimately, the safety and welfare of the child. The legislature
intends to clarify the purpose of the court hearings and the roles and
responsibilities of the parties.
The legislature finds that an investment of time into quality court
hearings results in better decisions for children and their families
and preserves the resources of the court and the child welfare system.
The legislature intends to clearly state that court hearings should
always strive to be independent, thorough, and timely inquiries into
the status of the case to ensure the department of social and health
services is responding to the needs of the family and child in a prompt
manner and that the case is progressing appropriately. The legislature
encourages the courts to develop clearer, stronger oversight and
leadership roles within the courts to achieve safe, timely permanency
for children. The court is encouraged to engage all parties to
question whether the case is progressing and, if not, to assist in
problem-solving to ensure progress is made towards permanency for the
child.

Sec. 7 RCW 13.34.060 and 2002 c 52 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A child taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or
26.44.050 shall be immediately placed in shelter care. A child taken
by a relative of the child in violation of RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070
shall be placed in shelter care only when permitted under RCW
13.34.055. No child may be held longer than seventy-two hours,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, after such child is taken
into custody unless a court order has been entered for continued
shelter care. In no case may a child who is taken into custody
pursuant to RCW 13.34.055, 13.34.050, or 26.44.050 be detained in a
secure detention facility.
(((a))) (2) Unless there is reasonable cause to believe that the
health, safety, or welfare of the child would be jeopardized or that
the efforts to reunite the parent and child will be hindered, priority
placement for a child in shelter care, pending a court hearing, shall
be with any person described in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a). The person must
be willing and available to care for the child and be able to meet any
special needs of the child. The person must be willing to facilitate
the child's visitation with siblings, if such visitation is part of the
supervising agency's plan or is ordered by the court. If a child is
not initially placed with a relative pursuant to this section, the
supervising agency shall make an effort within available resources to
place the child with a relative on the next business day after the
child is taken into custody. The supervising agency shall document its
effort to place the child with a relative pursuant to this section.
Nothing within this subsection (((1)(a))) (2) establishes an
entitlement to services or a right to a particular placement.
(((b))) (3) Whenever a child is taken into custody pursuant to this
section, the supervising agency may authorize evaluations of the
child's physical or emotional condition and educational and
developmental status, routine medical and dental examination and care,
and all necessary emergency care. ((In no case may a child who is
taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.055, 13.34.050, or 26.44.050
be detained in a secure detention facility. No child may be held
longer than seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and
holidays, after such child is taken into custody unless a court order
has been entered for continued shelter care. The child and his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian shall be informed that they have a right
to a shelter care hearing. The court shall hold a shelter care hearing
within seventy-two hours after the child is taken into custody,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. If a parent, guardian, or
legal custodian desires to waive the shelter care hearing, the court
shall determine, on the record and with the parties present, whether
such waiver is knowing and voluntary.
(2) Whenever a child is taken into custody by child protective
services pursuant to a court order issued under RCW 13.34.050 or when
child protective services is notified that a child has been taken into
custody pursuant to RCW 26.44.050 or 26.44.056, child protective
services shall make reasonable efforts to inform the parents, guardian,
or legal custodian of the fact that the child has been taken into
custody, the reasons why the child was taken into custody, and their
legal rights under this title as soon as possible and in no event shall
notice be provided more than twenty-four hours after the child has been
taken into custody or twenty-four hours after child protective services
has been notified that the child has been taken into custody. The
notice of custody and rights may be given by any means reasonably
certain of notifying the parents including, but not limited to,
written, telephone, or in person oral notification. If the initial
notification is provided by a means other than writing, child
protective services shall make reasonable efforts to also provide
written notification.))

Sec. 8 RCW 13.34.062 and 2004 c 147 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever a child is taken into custody by child protective
services pursuant to a court order issued under RCW 13.34.050 or when
child protective services is notified that a child has been taken into
custody pursuant to RCW 26.44.050 or 26.44.056, child protective
services shall make reasonable efforts to inform the parent, guardian,
or legal custodian of the fact that the child has been taken into
custody, the reasons why the child was taken into custody, and their
legal rights under this title, including the right to a shelter care
hearing, as soon as possible.
(b) In no event shall the notice required by this section be
provided to the parent, guardian, or legal custodian more than twenty-four hours after the child has been taken into custody or twenty-four
hours after child protective services has been notified that the child
has been taken into custody.
(2)(a) The notice of custody and rights may be given by any means
reasonably certain of notifying the parents including, but not limited
to, written, telephone, or in person oral notification. If the initial
notification is provided by a means other than writing, child
protective services shall make reasonable efforts to also provide
written notification.
(b) The written notice of custody and rights required by ((RCW
13.34.060)) this section shall be in substantially the following form:

"NOTICE

Your child has been placed in temporary custody under the
supervision of Child Protective Services (or other person or agency).
You have important legal rights and you must take steps to protect your
interests.
1. A court hearing will be held before a judge within 72 hours of
the time your child is taken into custody excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and holidays. You should call the court at (insert appropriate
phone number here) for specific information about the date, time,
and location of the court hearing.
2. You have the right to have a lawyer represent you at the
hearing. Your right to representation continues after the shelter care
hearing. You have the right to records the department intends to rely
upon. A lawyer can look at the files in your case, talk to child
protective services and other agencies, tell you about the law, help
you understand your rights, and help you at hearings. If you cannot
afford a lawyer, the court will appoint one to represent you. To get
a court-appointed lawyer you must contact: (explain local
procedure) .
3. At the hearing, you have the right to speak on your own behalf,
to introduce evidence, to examine witnesses, and to receive a decision
based solely on the evidence presented to the judge.
4. If your hearing occurs before a court commissioner, you have the
right to have the decision of the court commissioner reviewed by a
superior court judge. To obtain that review, you must, within ten days
after the entry of the decision of the court commissioner, file with
the court a motion for revision of the decision, as provided in RCW
2.24.050.
You should be present at any shelter care hearing. If you do not
come, the judge will not hear what you have to say.
You may call the Child Protective Services' caseworker for more
information about your child. The caseworker's name and telephone
number are: (insert name and telephone number) .
5. You have a right to a case conference to develop a written
service agreement following the shelter care hearing. The service
agreement may not conflict with the court's order of shelter care. You
may request that a multidisciplinary team, family group conference, or
prognostic staffing be convened for your child's case. You may
participate in these processes with your counsel present."

Upon receipt of the written notice, the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian shall acknowledge such notice by signing a receipt prepared
by child protective services. If the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian does not sign the receipt, the reason for lack of a signature
shall be written on the receipt. The receipt shall be made a part of
the court's file in the dependency action.
If after making reasonable efforts to provide notification, child
protective services is unable to determine the whereabouts of the
parents, guardian, or legal custodian, the notice shall be delivered or
sent to the last known address of the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian.
(((2))) (3) If child protective services is not required to give
notice under ((RCW 13.34.060(2) and subsection (1) of)) this section,
the juvenile court counselor assigned to the matter shall make all
reasonable efforts to advise the parents, guardian, or legal custodian
of the time and place of any shelter care hearing, request that they be
present, and inform them of their basic rights as provided in RCW
13.34.090.
(((3))) (4) Reasonable efforts to advise and to give notice, as
required in ((RCW 13.34.060(2) and subsections (1) and (2) of)) this
section, shall include, at a minimum, investigation of the whereabouts
of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian. If such reasonable
efforts are not successful, or the parent, guardian, or legal custodian
does not appear at the shelter care hearing, the petitioner shall
testify at the hearing or state in a declaration:
(a) The efforts made to investigate the whereabouts of, and to
advise, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian; and
(b) Whether actual advice of rights was made, to whom it was made,
and how it was made, including the substance of any oral communication
or copies of written materials used.
(((4) The court shall hear evidence regarding notice given to, and
efforts to notify, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian and shall
examine the need for shelter care. The court shall hear evidence
regarding the efforts made to place the child with a relative. The
court shall make an express finding as to whether the notice required
under RCW 13.34.060(2) and subsections (1) and (2) of this section was
given to the parent, guardian, or legal custodian. All parties have
the right to present testimony to the court regarding the need or lack
of need for shelter care. Hearsay evidence before the court regarding
the need or lack of need for shelter care must be supported by sworn
testimony, affidavit, or declaration of the person offering such
evidence.
(5)(a) A shelter care order issued pursuant to RCW 13.34.065 shall
include the requirement for a case conference as provided in RCW
13.34.067. However, if the parent is not present at the shelter care
hearing, or does not agree to the case conference, the court shall not
include the requirement for the case conference in the shelter care
order.
(b) If the court orders a case conference, the shelter care order
shall include notice to all parties and establish the date, time, and
location of the case conference which shall be no later than thirty
days prior to the fact-finding hearing.
(c) The court may order a conference or meeting as an alternative
to the case conference required under RCW 13.34.067 so long as the
conference or meeting ordered by the court meets all requirements under
RCW 13.34.067, including the requirement of a written agreement
specifying the services to be provided to the parent.
(6) A shelter care order issued pursuant to RCW 13.34.065 may be
amended at any time with notice and hearing thereon. The shelter care
decision of placement shall be modified only upon a showing of change
in circumstances. No child may be placed in shelter care for longer
than thirty days without an order, signed by the judge, authorizing
continued shelter care.
(7) Any parent, guardian, or legal custodian who for good cause is
unable to attend the initial shelter care hearing may request that a
subsequent shelter care hearing be scheduled. The request shall be
made to the clerk of the court where the petition is filed prior to the
initial shelter care hearing. Upon the request of the parent, the
court shall schedule the hearing within seventy-two hours of the
request, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. The clerk shall
notify all other parties of the hearing by any reasonable means.))

Sec. 9 RCW 13.34.065 and 2001 c 332 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When a child is taken into custody, the court shall hold a
shelter care hearing within seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays,
Sundays, and holidays. The primary purpose of the shelter care hearing
is to determine whether the child can be immediately and safely
returned home while the adjudication of the dependency is pending.
(b) Any parent, guardian, or legal custodian who for good cause is
unable to attend the shelter care hearing may request that a subsequent
shelter care hearing be scheduled. The request shall be made to the
clerk of the court where the petition is filed prior to the initial
shelter care hearing. Upon the request of the parent, the court shall
schedule the hearing within seventy-two hours of the request, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. The clerk shall notify all other
parties of the hearing by any reasonable means.
(2)(a) The ((juvenile court probation counselor)) department of
social and health services shall submit a recommendation to the court
as to the further need for shelter care ((unless the petition has been
filed by the department, in which case the recommendation shall be
submitted by the department)) in all cases in which it is the
petitioner. In all other cases, the recommendation shall be submitted
by the juvenile court probation counselor.
(b) All parties have the right to present testimony to the court
regarding the need or lack of need for shelter care.
(c) Hearsay evidence before the court regarding the need or lack of
need for shelter care must be supported by sworn testimony, affidavit,
or declaration of the person offering such evidence.
(3)(a) At the commencement of the hearing, the court shall notify
the parent, guardian, or custodian of the following:
(i) The parent, guardian, or custodian has the right to a shelter
care hearing;
(ii) The nature of the shelter care hearing and the proceedings
that will follow; and
(iii) If the parent, guardian, or custodian is not represented by
counsel, the right to be represented. If the parent, guardian, or
custodian is indigent, the court shall appoint counsel as provided in
RCW 13.34.090.
(b) If a parent, guardian, or legal custodian desires to waive the
shelter care hearing, the court shall determine, on the record and with
the parties present, whether such waiver is knowing and voluntary.
Regardless of whether the court accepts the parental waiver of the
shelter care hearing, the court must make the finding required under
subsection (4) of this section.
(4) At the shelter care hearing the court shall examine the need
for shelter care and inquire into the status of the case. The
paramount consideration for the court shall be the health, welfare, and
safety of the child. At a minimum, the court shall inquire into the
following:
(a) Whether the notice required under RCW 13.34.062 was given to
all known parents, guardians, or legal custodians of the child. The
court shall make an express finding as to whether the notice required
under RCW 13.34.062 was given to the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian. If actual notice was not given to the parent, guardian, or
legal custodian and the whereabouts of such person is known or can be
ascertained, the court shall order the supervising agency or the
department of social and health services to make reasonable efforts to
advise the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the status of the
case, including the date and time of any subsequent hearings, and their
rights under RCW 13.34.090;
(b) Whether the child can be safely returned home while the
adjudication of the dependency is pending;
(c) What efforts have been made to place the child with a relative;
(d) What services were provided to the family to prevent or
eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's home;
(e) Is the placement proposed by the agency the least disruptive
and most family-like setting that meets the needs of the child;
(f) Whether it is in the best interest of the child to remain
enrolled in the school, developmental program, or child care the child
was in prior to placement;
(g) Appointment of a guardian ad litem or attorney;
(h) Whether the child is or may be an Indian child as defined in 25
U.S.C. Sec. 1903, whether the provisions of the Indian child welfare
act apply, and whether there is compliance with the Indian child
welfare act, including notice to the child's tribe;
(i) Whether restraining orders, or orders expelling an allegedly
abusive parent from the home, will allow the child to safely remain in
the home;
(j) Whether any orders for examinations, evaluations, or immediate
services are needed;
(k) The terms and conditions for parental and sibling visitation.
(((2))) (5)(a) The court shall release a child alleged to be
dependent to the care, custody, and control of the child's parent,
guardian, or legal custodian unless the court finds there is reasonable
cause to believe that:
(((a))) (i) After consideration of the specific services that have
been provided, reasonable efforts have been made to prevent or
eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's home and
to make it possible for the child to return home; and
(((b)(i))) (ii)(A) The child has no parent, guardian, or legal
custodian to provide supervision and care for such child; or
(((ii))) (B) The release of such child would present a serious
threat of substantial harm to such child; or
(((iii))) (C) The parent, guardian, or custodian to whom the child
could be released has been charged with violating RCW 9A.40.060 or
9A.40.070.
(b) If the court does not release the child to his or her parent,
guardian, or legal custodian, and the child was initially placed with
a relative pursuant to RCW 13.34.060(1), the court shall order
continued placement with a relative, unless there is reasonable cause
to believe the health, safety, or welfare of the child would be
jeopardized or that the efforts to reunite the parent and child will be
hindered. The relative must be willing and available to:
(i) Care for the child and be able to meet any special needs of the
child;
(ii) Facilitate the child's visitation with siblings, if such
visitation is part of the supervising agency's plan or is ordered by
the court; and
(iii) Cooperate with the department in providing necessary
background checks and home studies.
(c) If the child was not initially placed with a relative, and the
court does not release the child to his or her parent, guardian, or
legal custodian, the supervising agency shall make reasonable efforts
to locate a relative pursuant to RCW 13.34.060(1).
(d) If a relative is not available, the court shall order continued
shelter care or order placement with another suitable person, and the
court shall set forth its reasons for the order. ((The court shall
enter a finding as to whether RCW 13.34.060(2) and subsections (1) and
(2) of this section have been complied with. If actual notice was not
given to the parent, guardian, or legal custodian and the whereabouts
of such person is known or can be ascertained, the court shall order
the supervising agency or the department of social and health services
to make reasonable efforts to advise the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian of the status of the case, including the date and time of any
subsequent hearings, and their rights under RCW 13.34.090.
(3))) If the court orders placement of the child with a person not
related to the child and not licensed to provide foster care, the
placement is subject to all terms and conditions of this section that
apply to relative placements.
(e) Any placement with a relative, or other person approved by the
court pursuant to this section, shall be contingent upon cooperation
with the agency case plan and compliance with court orders related to
the care and supervision of the child including, but not limited to,
court orders regarding parent-child contacts, sibling contacts, and any
other conditions imposed by the court. Noncompliance with the case
plan or court order is grounds for removal of the child from the home
of the relative or other person, subject to review by the court.
(6)(a) A shelter care order issued pursuant to this section shall
include the requirement for a case conference as provided in RCW
13.34.067. However, if the parent is not present at the shelter care
hearing, or does not agree to the case conference, the court shall not
include the requirement for the case conference in the shelter care
order.
(b) If the court orders a case conference, the shelter care order
shall include notice to all parties and establish the date, time, and
location of the case conference which shall be no later than thirty
days before the fact-finding hearing.
(c) The court may order another conference, case staffing, or
hearing as an alternative to the case conference required under RCW
13.34.067 so long as the conference, case staffing, or hearing ordered
by the court meets all requirements under RCW 13.34.067, including the
requirement of a written agreement specifying the services to be
provided to the parent.
(7)(a) A shelter care order issued pursuant to this section may be
amended at any time with notice and hearing thereon. The shelter care
decision of placement shall be modified only upon a showing of change
in circumstances. No child may be placed in shelter care for longer
than thirty days without an order, signed by the judge, authorizing
continued shelter care.
(b)(i) An order releasing the child on any conditions specified in
this section may at any time be amended, with notice and hearing
thereon, so as to return the child to shelter care for failure of the
parties to conform to the conditions originally imposed.
(ii) The court shall consider whether nonconformance with any
conditions resulted from circumstances beyond the control of the
parent, guardian, or legal custodian and give weight to that fact
before ordering return of the child to shelter care.
(((4))) (8)(a) If a child is returned home from shelter care a
second time in the case, or if the supervisor of the caseworker deems
it necessary, the multidisciplinary team may be reconvened.
(((5))) (b) If a child is returned home from shelter care a second
time in the case a law enforcement officer must be present and file a
report to the department.

Sec. 10 RCW 13.34.136 and 2004 c 146 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a child is ordered removed from the child's home, a
permanency plan shall be developed no later than sixty days from the
time the supervising agency assumes responsibility for providing
services, including placing the child, or at the time of a hearing
under RCW 13.34.130, whichever occurs first. The permanency planning
process continues until a permanency planning goal is achieved or
dependency is dismissed. The planning process shall include reasonable
efforts to return the child to the parent's home.
(2) The agency charged with ((his or her)) care of the child shall
provide the court with a written permanency plan of care directed
towards securing a safe, stable, and permanent home for the child as
soon as possible. The permanency plan shall include:
(a) A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the
following outcomes as a primary goal and may identify additional
outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the
child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian; adoption; guardianship;
permanent legal custody; long-term relative or foster care, until the
child is age eighteen, with a written agreement between the parties and
the care provider; successful completion of a responsible living skills
program; or independent living, if appropriate and if the child is age
sixteen or older. The department shall not discharge a child to an
independent living situation before the child is eighteen years of age
unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW;
(b) Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(4),
that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the
child will be placed, what steps will be taken to return the child
home, what steps the agency will take to promote existing appropriate
sibling relationships and/or facilitate placement together or contact
in accordance with the best interests of each child, and what actions
the agency will take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the
plan shall include the goal of achieving permanence for the child.
(i) The agency plan shall specify what services the parents will be
offered to enable them to resume custody, what requirements the parents
must meet to resume custody, and a time limit for each service plan and
parental requirement.
(ii) Visitation is the right of the family, including the child and
the parent, in cases in which visitation is in the best interest of the
child. Early, consistent, and frequent visitation is crucial for
maintaining parent-child relationships and making it possible for
parents and children to safely reunify. The agency shall encourage the
maximum parent and child and sibling contact possible, when it is in
the best interest of the child, including regular visitation and
participation by the parents in the care of the child while the child
is in placement. Visitation shall not be limited as a sanction for a
parent's failure to comply with court orders or services where the
health, safety, or welfare of the child is not at risk as a result of
the visitation. Visitation may be limited or denied only if the court
determines that such limitation or denial is necessary to protect the
child's health, safety, or welfare. The court and the agency should
rely upon community resources, relatives, foster parents, and other
appropriate persons to provide transportation and supervision for
visitation to the extent that such resources are available, and
appropriate, and the child's safety would not be compromised.
(iii) A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as
possible, preferably in the child's own neighborhood, unless the court
finds that placement at a greater distance is necessary to promote the
child's or parents' well-being.
(iv) The plan should ensure the child remains enrolled in the
school the child was attending at the time the child entered foster
care whenever it is practical and in the best interest of the child.
(v) The agency charged with supervising a child in placement shall
provide all reasonable services that are available within the agency,
or within the community, or those services which the department has
existing contracts to purchase. It shall report to the court if it is
unable to provide such services; and
(c) If the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(4), that a
termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child
will be placed, what steps will be taken to achieve permanency for the
child, services to be offered or provided to the child, and, if
visitation would be in the best interests of the child, a
recommendation to the court regarding visitation between parent and
child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination petition. The
agency shall not be required to develop a plan of services for the
parents or provide services to the parents if the court orders a
termination petition be filed. However, reasonable efforts to ensure
visitation and contact between siblings shall be made unless there is
reasonable cause to believe the best interests of the child or siblings
would be jeopardized.
(((2))) (3) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the
earliest possible date, preferably before the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen months. In cases where parental rights have been
terminated, the child is legally free for adoption, and adoption has
been identified as the primary permanency planning goal, it shall be a
goal to complete the adoption within six months following entry of the
termination order.
(4) If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable
efforts to prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from his
or her home or to safely return the child home should not be part of
the permanency plan of care for the child, reasonable efforts shall be
made to place the child in a timely manner and to complete whatever
steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.
(((3))) (5) The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency
plan may change over time based upon the circumstances of the
particular case.
(6) The court shall consider the child's relationships with the
child's siblings in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(3).
(7) For purposes related to permanency planning:
(a) "Guardianship" means a dependency guardianship or a legal
guardianship pursuant to chapter 11.88 RCW or equivalent laws of
another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(b) "Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered
pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW.
(c) "Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to
chapter 26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or a federally
recognized Indian tribe.

Sec. 11 RCW 13.34.138 and 2005 c 512 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for children whose cases are reviewed by a citizen
review board under chapter 13.70 RCW, the status of all children found
to be dependent shall be reviewed by the court at least every six
months from the beginning date of the placement episode or the date
dependency is established, whichever is first((, at a)). The purpose
of the hearing ((in which it)) shall be ((determined)) to review the
progress of the parties and determine whether court supervision should
continue.
(a) The initial review hearing shall be an in-court review and
shall be set six months from the beginning date of the placement
episode or no more than ninety days from the entry of the disposition
order, whichever comes first. The requirements for the initial review
hearing, including the in-court review requirement, shall be
accomplished within existing resources.
(b) The supervising agency shall provide a foster parent,
preadoptive parent, or relative with notice of, and his or her right to
an opportunity to be heard in, a review hearing pertaining to the
child, but only if that person is currently providing care to the child
at the time of the hearing. This section shall not be construed to
grant party status to any person who has been provided an opportunity
to be heard.
(c) The initial review hearing may be a permanency planning hearing
when necessary to meet the time frames set forth in RCW
13.34.145(((3))) (1)(a) or 13.34.134. ((The review shall include
findings regarding the agency and parental completion of disposition
plan requirements, and if necessary, revised permanency time limits.
This review shall consider both the agency's and parent's efforts that
demonstrate consistent measurable progress over time in meeting the
disposition plan requirements. The requirements for the initial review
hearing, including the in-court requirement, shall be accomplished
within existing resources. The supervising agency shall provide a
foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative with notice of, and
their right to an opportunity to be heard in, a review hearing
pertaining to the child, but only if that person is currently providing
care to that child at the time of the hearing. This section shall not
be construed to grant party status to any person who has been provided
an opportunity to be heard.))
(2)(a) A child shall not be returned home at the review hearing
unless the court finds that a reason for removal as set forth in RCW
13.34.130 no longer exists. The parents, guardian, or legal custodian
shall report to the court the efforts they have made to correct the
conditions which led to removal. If a child is returned, casework
supervision shall continue for a period of six months, at which time
there shall be a hearing on the need for continued intervention.
(b) If the child is not returned home, the court shall establish in
writing:
(i) ((Whether reasonable services have been provided to or offered
to the parties to facilitate reunion, specifying the services provided
or offered)) Whether the agency is making reasonable efforts to provide
services to the family and eliminate the need for placement of the
child. If additional services, including housing assistance, are
needed to facilitate the return of the child to the child's parents,
the court shall order that reasonable services be offered specifying
such services;
(ii) Whether there has been compliance with the case plan by the
child, the child's parents, and the agency supervising the placement;
(iii) Whether progress has been made toward correcting the problems
that necessitated the child's placement in out-of-home care;
(iv) Whether the services set forth in the case plan and the
responsibilities of the parties need to be clarified or modified due to
the availability of additional information or changed circumstances;
(v) Whether there is a continuing need for placement;
(vi) Whether the child is in an appropriate placement which
adequately meets all physical, emotional, and educational needs;
(((ii))) (vii) Whether ((the child has been placed in the least-restrictive setting appropriate to the child's needs, including whether
consideration and)) preference has been given to placement with the
child's relatives;
(((iii) Whether there is a continuing need for placement and
whether the placement is appropriate;
(iv) Whether there has been compliance with the case plan by the
child, the child's parents, and the agency supervising the placement;
(v) Whether progress has been made toward correcting the problems
that necessitated the child's placement in out-of-home care;
(vi))) (viii) Whether the parents have visited the child and any
reasons why visitation has not occurred or has been infrequent;
(((vii) Whether additional services, including housing assistance,
are needed to facilitate the return of the child to the child's
parents; if so, the court shall order that reasonable services be
offered specifying such services; and
(viii))) (ix) Whether terms of visitation need to be modified;
(x) Whether the court-approved long-term permanent plan for the
child remains the best plan for the child;
(xi) Whether any additional court orders need to be made to move
the case toward permanency; and
(xii) The projected date by which the child will be returned home
or other permanent plan of care will be implemented.
(c) The court at the review hearing may order that a petition
seeking termination of the parent and child relationship be filed.
(((2))) (3)(a) In any case in which the court orders that a
dependent child may be returned to or remain in the child's home, the
in-home placement shall be contingent upon the following:
(i) The compliance of the parents with court orders related to the
care and supervision of the child, including compliance with an agency
case plan; and
(ii) The continued participation of the parents, if applicable, in
available substance abuse or mental health treatment if substance abuse
or mental illness was a contributing factor to the removal of the
child.
(b) The following may be grounds for removal of the child from the
home, subject to review by the court:
(i) Noncompliance by the parents with the agency case plan or court
order;
(ii) The parent's inability, unwillingness, or failure to
participate in available services or treatment for themselves or the
child, including substance abuse treatment if a parent's substance
abuse was a contributing factor to the abuse or neglect; or
(iii) The failure of the parents to successfully and substantially
complete available services or treatment for themselves or the child,
including substance abuse treatment if a parent's substance abuse was
a contributing factor to the abuse or neglect.
(((3))) (4) The court's ability to order housing assistance under
RCW 13.34.130 and this section is: (a) Limited to cases in which
homelessness or the lack of adequate and safe housing is the primary
reason for an out-of-home placement; and (b) subject to the
availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose.
(((4))) (5) The court shall consider the child's relationship with
siblings in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(3).

Sec. 12 RCW 13.34.145 and 2003 c 227 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((A permanency plan shall be developed no later than sixty days
from the time the supervising agency assumes responsibility for
providing services, including placing the child, or at the time of a
hearing under RCW 13.34.130, whichever occurs first. The permanency
planning process continues until a permanency planning goal is achieved
or dependency is dismissed. The planning process shall include
reasonable efforts to return the child to the parent's home.
(a) Whenever a child is placed in out-of-home care pursuant to RCW
13.34.130, the agency that has custody of the child shall provide the
court with a written permanency plan of care directed towards securing
a safe, stable, and permanent home for the child as soon as possible.
The plan shall identify one of the following outcomes as the primary
goal and may also identify additional outcomes as alternative goals:
Return of the child to the home of the child's parent, guardian, or
legal custodian; adoption; guardianship; permanent legal custody; long-term relative or foster care, until the child is age eighteen, with a
written agreement between the parties and the care provider; a
responsible living skills program; and independent living, if
appropriate and if the child is age sixteen or older and the provisions
of subsection (2) of this section are met.
(b) The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency plan may
change over time based upon the circumstances of the particular case.
(c) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest
possible date, preferably before the child has been in out-of-home care
for fifteen months. In cases where parental rights have been
terminated, the child is legally free for adoption, and adoption has
been identified as the primary permanency planning goal, it shall be a
goal to complete the adoption within six months following entry of the
termination order.
(d) For purposes related to permanency planning:
(i) "Guardianship" means a dependency guardianship, a legal
guardianship pursuant to chapter 11.88 RCW, or equivalent laws of
another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(ii) "Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered
pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW.
(iii) "Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to
chapter 26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or of a federally
recognized Indian tribe.
(2) Whenever a permanency plan identifies independent living as a
goal, the plan shall also specifically identify the services that will
be provided to assist the child to make a successful transition from
foster care to independent living. Before the court approves
independent living as a permanency plan of care, the court shall make
a finding that the provision of services to assist the child in making
a transition from foster care to independent living will allow the
child to manage his or her financial, personal, social, educational,
and nonfinancial affairs. The department shall not discharge a child
to an independent living situation before the child is eighteen years
of age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64
RCW.
(3))) The purpose of a permanency planning hearing is to review the
permanency plan for the child, inquire into the welfare of the child
and progress of the case, and reach decisions regarding the permanent
placement of the child.
(a) A permanency planning hearing shall be held in all cases where
the child has remained in out-of-home care for at least nine months and
an adoption decree, guardianship order, or permanent custody order has
not previously been entered. The hearing shall take place no later
than twelve months following commencement of the current placement
episode.
(((4))) (b) Whenever a child is removed from the home of a
dependency guardian or long-term relative or foster care provider, and
the child is not returned to the home of the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian but is placed in out-of-home care, a permanency planning
hearing shall take place no later than twelve months, as provided in
((subsection (3) of)) this section, following the date of removal
unless, prior to the hearing, the child returns to the home of the
dependency guardian or long-term care provider, the child is placed in
the home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian, an adoption
decree, guardianship order, or a permanent custody order is entered, or
the dependency is dismissed.
(((5))) (c) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the
earliest possible date, preferably before the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen months. In cases where parental rights have been
terminated, the child is legally free for adoption, and adoption has
been identified as the primary permanency planning goal, it shall be a
goal to complete the adoption within six months following entry of the
termination order.
(2) No later than ten working days prior to the permanency planning
hearing, the agency having custody of the child shall submit a written
permanency plan to the court and shall mail a copy of the plan to all
parties and their legal counsel, if any.
(((6))) (3) At the permanency planning hearing, the court shall
((enter findings as required by RCW 13.34.138 and shall review the
permanency plan prepared by the agency)) conduct the following inquiry:
(a) If a goal of long-term foster or relative care has been
achieved prior to the permanency planning hearing, the court shall
review the child's status to determine whether the placement and the
plan for the child's care remain appropriate.
(b) In cases where the primary permanency planning goal has not
been achieved, the court shall inquire regarding the reasons why the
primary goal has not been achieved and determine what needs to be done
to make it possible to achieve the primary goal. The court shall
review the permanency plan prepared by the agency and make explicit
findings regarding each of the following:
(i) The continuing necessity for, and the safety and
appropriateness of, the placement;
(ii) The extent of compliance with the permanency plan by the
agency and any other service providers, the child's parents, the child,
and the child's guardian, if any;
(iii) The extent of any efforts to involve appropriate service
providers in addition to agency staff in planning to meet the special
needs of the child and the child's parents;
(iv) The progress toward eliminating the causes for the child's
placement outside of his or her home and toward returning the child
safely to his or her home or obtaining a permanent placement for the
child;
(v) The date by which it is likely that the child will be returned
to his or her home or placed for adoption, with a guardian or in some
other alternative permanent placement; and
(vi) If the child has been placed outside of his or her home for
fifteen of the most recent twenty-two months, not including any period
during which the child was a runaway from the out-of-home placement or
the first six months of any period during which the child was returned
to his or her home for a trial home visit, the appropriateness of the
permanency plan, whether reasonable efforts were made by the agency to
achieve the goal of the permanency plan, and the circumstances which
prevent the child from any of the following:
(A) Being returned safely to his or her home;
(B) Having a petition for the involuntary termination of parental
rights filed on behalf of the child;
(C) Being placed for adoption;
(D) Being placed with a guardian;
(E) Being placed in the home of a fit and willing relative of the
child; or
(F) Being placed in some other alternative permanent placement,
including independent living or long-term foster care.
(c)(i) If the permanency plan identifies independent living as a
goal, the court shall make a finding that the provision of services to
assist the child in making a transition from foster care to independent
living will allow the child to manage his or her financial, personal,
social, educational, and nonfinancial affairs prior to approving
independent living as a permanency plan of care.
(ii) The permanency plan shall also specifically identify the
services that will be provided to assist the child to make a successful
transition from foster care to independent living.
(iii) The department shall not discharge a child to an independent
living situation before the child is eighteen years of age unless the
child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW.
(d) If the child has resided in the home of a foster parent or
relative for more than six months prior to the permanency planning
hearing, the court shall also enter a finding regarding whether the
foster parent or relative was informed of the hearing as required in
RCW 74.13.280 and 13.34.138. ((If a goal of long-term foster or
relative care has been achieved prior to the permanency planning
hearing, the court shall review the child's status to determine whether
the placement and the plan for the child's care remain appropriate. In
cases where the primary permanency planning goal has not been achieved,
the court shall inquire regarding the reasons why the primary goal has
not been achieved and determine what needs to be done to make it
possible to achieve the primary goal.))
(4) In all cases, at the permanency planning hearing, the court
shall:
(a)(i) Order the permanency plan prepared by the agency to be
implemented; or
(ii) Modify the permanency plan, and order implementation of the
modified plan; and
(b)(i) Order the child returned home only if the court finds that
a reason for removal as set forth in RCW 13.34.130 no longer exists; or
(ii) Order the child to remain in out-of-home care for a limited
specified time period while efforts are made to implement the
permanency plan.
(((7))) (5) Following the first permanency planning hearing, the
court shall hold a further permanency planning hearing in accordance
with this section at least once every twelve months until a permanency
planning goal is achieved or the dependency is dismissed, whichever
occurs first.
(6) Prior to the second permanency planning hearing, the agency
that has custody of the child shall consider whether to file a petition
for termination of parental rights.
(7) If a child is removed from home due to allegations of abuse or
neglect, returned home, and subsequently removed and placed in
out-of-home care, the court shall hold a permanency hearing no later
than thirty days from the date of the removal to determine the
appropriate action, including a change in the permanency plan or the
filing of a termination petition. The best interests of the child
shall be the primary consideration in determining the appropriate
action.
(8) If the court orders the child returned home, casework
supervision shall continue for at least six months, at which time a
review hearing shall be held pursuant to RCW 13.34.138, and the court
shall determine the need for continued intervention.
(((8))) (9) The juvenile court may hear a petition for permanent
legal custody when: (a) The court has ordered implementation of a
permanency plan that includes permanent legal custody; and (b) the
party pursuing the permanent legal custody is the party identified in
the permanency plan as the prospective legal custodian. During the
pendency of such proceeding, the court shall conduct review hearings
and further permanency planning hearings as provided in this chapter.
At the conclusion of the legal guardianship or permanent legal custody
proceeding, a juvenile court hearing shall be held for the purpose of
determining whether dependency should be dismissed. If a guardianship
or permanent custody order has been entered, the dependency shall be
dismissed.
(((9))) (10) Continued juvenile court jurisdiction under this
chapter shall not be a barrier to the entry of an order establishing a
legal guardianship or permanent legal custody when the requirements of
subsection (((8))) (9) of this section are met.
(((10) Following the first permanency planning hearing, the court
shall hold a further permanency planning hearing in accordance with
this section at least once every twelve months until a permanency
planning goal is achieved or the dependency is dismissed, whichever
occurs first.
(11) Except as provided in RCW 13.34.235, the status of all
dependent children shall continue to be reviewed by the court at least
once every six months, in accordance with RCW 13.34.138, until the
dependency is dismissed. Prior to the second permanency planning
hearing, the agency that has custody of the child shall consider
whether to file a petition for termination of parental rights.
(12))) (11) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the
ability of the agency that has custody of the child to file a petition
for termination of parental rights or a guardianship petition at any
time following the establishment of dependency. Upon the filing of
such a petition, a fact-finding hearing shall be scheduled and held in
accordance with this chapter unless the agency requests dismissal of
the petition prior to the hearing or unless the parties enter an agreed
order terminating parental rights, establishing guardianship, or
otherwise resolving the matter.
(((13))) (12) The approval of a permanency plan that does not
contemplate return of the child to the parent does not relieve the
supervising agency of its obligation to provide reasonable services,
under this chapter, intended to effectuate the return of the child to
the parent, including but not limited to, visitation rights. The court
shall consider the child's relationships with siblings in accordance
with RCW 13.34.130.
(((14))) (13) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the
procedural due process rights of any party in a termination or
guardianship proceeding filed under this chapter.

Sec. 13 RCW 74.13.031 and 2006 c 266 s 1 and 2006 c 221 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The department shall have the duty to provide child welfare
services and shall:
(1) Develop, administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and
comprehensive plan that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for
the protection and care of runaway, dependent, or neglected children.
(2) Within available resources, recruit an adequate number of
prospective adoptive and foster homes, both regular and specialized,
i.e. homes for children of ethnic minority, including Indian homes for
Indian children, sibling groups, handicapped and emotionally disturbed,
teens, pregnant and parenting teens, and annually report to the
governor and the legislature concerning the department's success in:
(a) Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home placements; (b)
reducing the foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home studies
for legally free children; and (d) implementing and operating the
passport program required by RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include
a section entitled "Foster Home Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations."
(3) Investigate complaints of any recent act or failure to act on
the part of a parent or caretaker that results in death, serious
physical or emotional harm, or sexual abuse or exploitation, or that
presents an imminent risk of serious harm, and on the basis of the
findings of such investigation, offer child welfare services in
relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians, or persons
serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the attention
of an appropriate court, or another community agency: PROVIDED, That
an investigation is not required of nonaccidental injuries which are
clearly not the result of a lack of care or supervision by the child's
parents, legal custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis. If the
investigation reveals that a crime against a child may have been
committed, the department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement
agency.
(4) Offer, on a voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to
families who are in conflict.
(5) Monitor out-of-home placements, on a timely and routine basis,
to assure the safety, well-being, and quality of care being provided is
within the scope of the intent of the legislature as defined in RCW
74.13.010 and 74.15.010, and annually submit a report measuring the
extent to which the department achieved the specified goals to the
governor and the legislature.
(6) Have authority to accept custody of children from parents and
to accept custody of children from juvenile courts, where authorized to
do so under law, to provide child welfare services including placement
for adoption, to provide for the routine and necessary medical, dental,
and mental health care, or necessary emergency care of the children,
and to provide for the physical care of such children and make payment
of maintenance costs if needed. Except where required by Public Law
95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no private adoption agency which receives
children for adoption from the department shall discriminate on the
basis of race, creed, or color when considering applications in their
placement for adoption.
(7) Have authority to provide temporary shelter to children who
have run away from home and who are admitted to crisis residential
centers.
(8) Have authority to purchase care for children; and shall follow
in general the policy of using properly approved private agency
services for the actual care and supervision of such children insofar
as they are available, paying for care of such children as are accepted
by the department as eligible for support at reasonable rates
established by the department.
(9) Establish a children's services advisory committee which shall
assist the secretary in the development of a partnership plan for
utilizing resources of the public and private sectors, and advise on
all matters pertaining to child welfare, licensing of child care
agencies, adoption, and services related thereto. At least one member
shall represent the adoption community.
(10)(a) Have authority to provide continued foster care or group
care as needed to participate in or complete a high school or
vocational school program.
(b)(i) Beginning in 2006, the department has the authority to allow
up to fifty youth reaching age eighteen to continue in foster care or
group care as needed to participate in or complete a posthigh school
academic or vocational program, and to receive necessary support and
transition services.
(ii) In 2007 and 2008, the department has the authority to allow up
to fifty additional youth per year reaching age eighteen to remain in
foster care or group care as provided in (b)(i) of this subsection.
(iii) A youth who remains eligible for such placement and services
pursuant to department rules may continue in foster care or group care
until the youth reaches his or her twenty-first birthday. Eligibility
requirements shall include active enrollment in a posthigh school
academic or vocational program and maintenance of a 2.0 grade point
average.
(11) Refer cases to the division of child support whenever state or
federal funds are expended for the care and maintenance of a child,
including a child with a developmental disability who is placed as a
result of an action under chapter 13.34 RCW, unless the department
finds that there is good cause not to pursue collection of child
support against the parent or parents of the child. Cases involving
individuals age eighteen through twenty shall not be referred to the
division of child support unless required by federal law.
(12) Have authority within funds appropriated for foster care
services to purchase care for Indian children who are in the custody of
a federally recognized Indian tribe or tribally licensed child-placing
agency pursuant to parental consent, tribal court order, or state
juvenile court order; and the purchase of such care shall be subject to
the same eligibility standards and rates of support applicable to other
children for whom the department purchases care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through
13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through 74.13.036, or of this section all
services to be provided by the department of social and health services
under subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section, subject to the
limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program
offering such services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the
federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974.
(13) Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, provide
preventive services to families with children that prevent or shorten
the duration of an out-of-home placement.
(14) Have authority to provide independent living services to
youths, including individuals who have attained eighteen years of age,
and have not attained twenty-one years of age who are or have been in
foster care.
(15) Consult at least quarterly with the foster parent association
of Washington state for the purpose of receiving information and
comment regarding how the department is performing the duties and
meeting the obligations specified in this section and RCW 74.13.250 and
74.13.320 regarding the recruitment of foster homes, reducing foster
parent turnover rates, providing effective training for foster parents,
and administering a coordinated and comprehensive plan that strengthens
services for the protection of children. Consultation shall occur at
the regional and statewide levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) The secretary of the department of
social and health services shall work in conjunction with the
University of Washington to study the need for and the feasibility of
creating tiered classifications for foster parent licensing, including
a professional foster parent classification. The secretary of the
department of social and health services and the dean of the school of
social work, or his or her designee, at the University of Washington
jointly shall facilitate a work group composed of: (a) One or more
representatives from the Washington federation of state employees; (b)
two or more representatives from the foster parent association of
Washington state; (c) the director of the institute for children and
families at the University of Washington; and (d) four or more child
welfare professionals with subject matter expertise from the public,
private, or academic communities.
(2) To promote the exchange of ideas and collaboration, the
secretary and the director also shall convene at least two focused
stakeholder meetings seeking input from a broad range of foster
parents, social workers, and community members. To facilitate the
exchange of ideas, the department of social and health services shall
provide to the work group the contact information for licensed foster
parents for the sole purpose of communicating with foster parents
regarding issues relevant to foster parents. The work group shall keep
the contact information confidential and shall develop guidelines for
the use and maintenance of this contact information among work group
members.
(3) The secretary of the department of social and health services
and the dean of the school of social work, or his or her designee, at
the University of Washington shall report the recommendations of the
work group to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January
1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Section 14 of this act expires January 1,
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---