BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
operator of a street legal motorcycle approaching a left turn
intersection that is controlled by a triggered traffic control signal
using a vehicle detection device that is inoperative due to the size of
the street legal motorcycle shall come to a full and complete stop at
the intersection. If the left turn signal fails to operate after one
cycle of the traffic signal, the operator may, after exercising due
care, proceed to turn left, if the operator is insured under a motor
vehicle liability policy with liability limits of at least the amounts
provided in RCW 46.29.090, is self-insured as provided in RCW
46.29.630, is covered by a certificate of deposit in conformance with
RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a liability bond of at least the
amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. It is not a defense to a violation
of RCW 46.61.050 that the driver of a motorcycle proceeded under the
belief that a traffic control signal used a vehicle detection device or
was inoperative due to the size of the motorcycle when the signal did
not use a vehicle detection device or that any such device was not in
fact inoperative due to the size of the motorcycle.
(2) Turning left as provided for in subsection (1) of this section
while not insured under a motor vehicle liability policy with liability
limits of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090, not self-insured as provided in RCW 46.29.630, not covered by a certificate of
deposit in conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or not covered by a
liability bond of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090, is a
traffic infraction, and the operator is subject to the same penalty
imposed for violations under RCW 46.30.020(1)(d).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect September 1, 2007.

--- END ---