BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All cities and towns must deliver in person or by mail a
written public notice to all residential dwellings within five hundred
feet of a boundary line of a parcel or parcels on which a housing
development is proposed that:
(a) Consists of five or more units intended for permanent
residential occupancy, where "permanent residential occupancy" means
housing that provides either rental or owner occupancy on a
nontransient basis, including owner-occupied or rental accommodation
that is leased for a period of at least one month, but excluding hotels
and motels that predominantly offer rental accommodation on a daily or
weekly basis, as well as temporary housing shelters, transitional and
supportive living facilities, and group homes; and
(b) Is funded in whole or part by:
(i) A federal or state housing program administered by the
department of community, trade, and economic development;
(ii) A federal housing program administered by a city, town, code
city, or county government;
(iii) An affordable housing levy authorized under RCW 84.52.105; or
(iv) Any of the surcharges intended to fund housing programs under
chapters 36.22, 43.185, 43.185A, 43.185B, and 43.185C RCW.
(2) The notice required in subsection (1) of this section must be
mailed or delivered to the residential dwellings at least fifteen days
before any public hearing on the development and within one hundred
eighty days of the commencement of construction or renovation. The
notice must include information about any public hearing scheduled for
the development and information, at a minimum, related to the type of
housing to be developed and the number of units and size of the
development proposed.
(3) The requirements of this section are supplemental to any
notification requirements of the local jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All counties must deliver in person or by mail a written public
notice to all residential dwellings within five hundred feet of a
boundary line of a parcel or parcels on which a housing development is
proposed that:
(a) Consists of five or more units intended for permanent
residential occupancy, where "permanent residential occupancy" means
housing that provides either rental or owner occupancy on a
nontransient basis, including owner-occupied or rental accommodation
that is leased for a period of at least one month, but excluding hotels
and motels that predominantly offer rental accommodation on a daily or
weekly basis, as well as temporary housing shelters, transitional and
supportive living facilities, and group homes; and
(b) Is funded in whole or part by:
(i) A federal or state housing program administered by the
department of community, trade, and economic development;
(ii) A federal housing program administered by a city, town, code
city, or county government;
(iii) An affordable housing levy authorized under RCW 84.52.105; or
(iv) Any of the surcharges intended to fund housing programs under
chapters 36.22, 43.185, 43.185A, 43.185B, and 43.185C RCW.
(2) The notice required in subsection (1) of this section must be
mailed or delivered to the residential dwellings at least fifteen days
before any public hearing on the development and within one hundred
eighty days of the commencement of construction or renovation. The
notice must include information about any public hearing scheduled for
the development and information, at a minimum, related to the type of
housing to be developed and the number of units and size of the
development proposed.
(3) The requirements of this section are supplemental to any
notification requirements of the local jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All code cities must deliver in person or by mail a written
public notice to all residential dwellings within five hundred feet of
a boundary line of a parcel or parcels on which a housing development
is proposed that:
(a) Consists of five or more units intended for permanent
residential occupancy, where "permanent residential occupancy" means
housing that provides either rental or owner occupancy on a
nontransient basis, including owner-occupied or rental accommodation
that is leased for a period of at least one month, but excluding hotels
and motels that predominantly offer rental accommodation on a daily or
weekly basis, as well as temporary housing shelters, transitional and
supportive living facilities, and group homes; and
(b) Is funded in whole or part by:
(i) A federal or state housing program administered by the
department of community, trade, and economic development;
(ii) A federal housing program administered by a city, town, code
city, or county government;
(iii) An affordable housing levy authorized under RCW 84.52.105; or
(iv) Any of the surcharges intended to fund housing programs under
chapters 36.22, 43.185, 43.185A, 43.185B, and 43.185C RCW.
(2) The notice required in subsection (1) of this section must be
mailed or delivered to the residential dwellings at least fifteen days
before any public hearing on the development and within one hundred
eighty days of the commencement of construction or renovation. The
notice must include information about any public hearing scheduled for
the development and information, at a minimum, related to the type of
housing to be developed and the number of units and size of the
development proposed.
(3) The requirements of this section are supplemental to any
notification requirements of the local jurisdiction.

--- END ---