BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "contractor" means third-party
payor as defined in RCW 70.02.010 and any organization engaged in the
business of creating health care provider networks for use by a third-party payor.
(2) Contractors may not directly or indirectly through contract or
otherwise refuse to reimburse for the health care services legally
provided by employees of a contracted chiropractor if the service would
be a reimbursable benefit but for the contractor's refusal to recognize
or reimburse the services performed by employees of the contracted
chiropractor.
(3) Contractors may not refuse to contract with licensed health
care providers employed by a contracted chiropractor if such licensed
health care provider otherwise meets the fair credentialing standards
of the contractor.
(4) Contractors may not require directly or indirectly by contract
or otherwise that a chiropractor comply with health care reimbursement
or delivery standards that conflict with those standards and practices
authorized or adopted by the Washington state chiropractic quality
assurance commission. A contract may not prohibit a chiropractor from
delegating duties in accordance with rules governing the chiropractic
profession, nor may a contractor refuse to reimburse the contracted
chiropractor for such delegated services if those services would be
reimbursed if not delegated.
(5) Any term or condition of any contract between a chiropractor
and a contractor that violates a provision of this section and any
contractor attempt to waive, modify, or shift responsibility for
compliance with this section is invalid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) This act does not affect any existing
right acquired or liability or obligation incurred prior to the
effective date of this act.
(2) If any provision of this act or its application to any person
or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the
application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not
affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007, and applies to all contracts that are executed,
continued, or renewed on and after January 1, 2008.

--- END ---