BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of this section, "contractor" means third-party
payor as defined in RCW 70.02.010 and any organization engaged in the
business of creating health care provider networks for use by a third-party payor.
(2) Contractors may not develop and employ provider payment
methodologies that discriminate against chiropractors by setting
differing payment formulas for a chiropractor's services than for a
different profession's services when the contractor is reimbursing for
the same type of health care services. The contractor may not have a
methodology that would pay chiropractors less than any other provider
for the same payment code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007, and applies to all provider contracts that are executed,
continued, or renewed on and after January 1, 2008, and to all
reimbursement of services by contractors on and after January 1, 2008.

--- END ---