BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.05.090 and 1990 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the redistricting plan:
(1) Districts shall have a population as nearly equal as is
practicable, excluding nonresident military personnel, based on the
population reported in the federal decennial census.
(2) To the extent consistent with subsection (1) of this section
the commission plan should, insofar as practical, accomplish the
following:
(a) District lines should be drawn so as to coincide with the
boundaries of local political subdivisions and areas recognized as
communities of interest. The number of counties and municipalities
divided among more than one district should be as small as possible;
(b) Districts should be composed of convenient, contiguous, and
compact territory. Land areas may be deemed contiguous if they share
a common land border or are connected by a ferry, highway, bridge, or
tunnel. Areas separated by geographical boundaries or artificial
barriers that prevent transportation within a district should not be
deemed contiguous; and
(c) Whenever practicable, a precinct shall be wholly within a
single legislative district.
(3) The commission's plan and any plan adopted by the supreme court
under RCW 44.05.100(4) shall provide for ((forty-nine legislative))
thirty-three senate districts. The plan shall further provide for
three house districts within each of the senate districts so that each
house district shall comprise as nearly as possible one-third of the
population of the senate district, for a total of ninety-nine house
districts.
(4) The house of representatives shall consist of ((ninety-eight))
ninety-nine members, ((two)) one of whom shall be elected from ((and
run at large within)) each ((legislative)) house district. The senate
shall consist of ((forty-nine)) thirty-three members, one of whom shall
be elected from each ((legislative)) senate district.
(5) The commission shall exercise its powers to provide fair and
effective representation and to encourage electoral competition. The
commission's plan shall not be drawn purposely to favor or discriminate
against any political party or group.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.510 and 1975 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Composition of the corps shall consist of youths who are citizens
of the United States and residents of the state of Washington of good
character and health, and who are not more than twenty-one years of
age. In order to enroll, an individual must agree to comply with rules
and regulations promulgated by the commission. The period of
enrollment shall be for thirty, sixty or ninety days or for such
shorter period as determined by the commission. If permitted by the
commission an individual may reenroll. Enrollment shall basically be
allocated on a percentage basis to each ((of the forty-nine))
legislative district((s)) on the basis of the ratio that the population
of each district bears to the total population of the state of
Washington, but the commission may also take into account problems of
substantial unemployment in certain areas.

--- END ---