BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that: (a)
The United States Constitution, amendment II, guarantees that, "A
well-regulated militia being necessary to the security of a free state,
the right of the people to keep and bear arms, shall not be infringed";
(b) the Washington state Constitution, article I, section 24,
guarantees that, "The right of the individual citizen to bear arms in
defense of himself, or the state, shall not be impaired..."; (c) the
constitutionally protected right to bear arms is an individual right
intended to ensure that society and law-abiding persons remain
protected from criminal aggressors within their homes, neighborhoods,
and communities; (d) law-abiding citizens who are attacked in a place
where they have a right to be have no duty to retreat and have the
right to stand their ground and meet force with defensive force,
including deadly force in certain circumstances; (e) law-abiding
persons must be able to protect themselves, their families, and others
from criminal intruders and attackers without fear of prosecution for
acting in the lawful defense of themselves, their families, and others;
and (f) law-abiding citizens should not be required to surrender their
constitutional right to bear arms and thereby surrender their personal
safety and well-being to criminal aggressors at any time, but
especially during a state of emergency when law and order is at a much
higher risk of breaking down, law enforcement resources are frequently
strapped, and criminal predators are much more free to prey on those
unable to adequately protect themselves and their families.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that, during the
continuance of any proclaimed state of emergency, no person who is not
otherwise prohibited by law from the possession, transfer, sale,
transport, storage, display, or use of firearms or ammunition shall be
prohibited or restricted by either the governor or any governmental
entity or political subdivision of the state from the otherwise lawful
possession, transfer, sale, transport, storage, display, or use of
firearms or ammunition.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.06.220 and 2003 c 53 s 222 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor, after proclaiming a state of emergency and prior
to terminating such, may, in the area described by the proclamation,
issue an order prohibiting:
(a) Any person being on the public streets, or in the public parks,
or at any other public place during the hours declared by the governor
to be a period of curfew;
(b) Any number of persons, as designated by the governor, from
assembling or gathering on the public streets, parks, or other open
areas of this state, either public or private;
(c) The manufacture, transfer, use, possession, or transportation
of a molotov cocktail or any other device, instrument, or object
designed to explode or produce uncontained combustion;
(d) The transporting, possessing, or using of gasoline, kerosene,
or combustible, flammable, or explosive liquids or materials in a glass
or uncapped container of any kind except in connection with the normal
operation of motor vehicles, normal home use, or legitimate commercial
use;
(e) ((The possession of firearms or any other deadly weapon by a
person (other than a law enforcement officer) in a place other than
that person's place of residence or business;
(f))) The sale, purchase, or dispensing of alcoholic beverages;
(((g))) (f) The sale, purchase, or dispensing of other commodities
or goods, as he or she reasonably believes should be prohibited to help
preserve and maintain life, health, property, or the public peace;
(((h))) (g) The use of certain streets, highways, or public ways by
the public; and
(((i))) (h) Such other activities as he or she reasonably believes
should be prohibited to help preserve and maintain life, health,
property, or the public peace.
(2) In imposing the restrictions provided for by RCW 43.06.010, and
43.06.200 through 43.06.270, the governor may impose them for such
times, upon such conditions, with such exceptions, and in such areas of
this state he or she from time to time deems necessary.
(3) During the continuance of any state of emergency, neither the
governor nor any governmental entity or political subdivision of the
state shall impose any restriction on the possession, transfer, sale,
transport, storage, display, or use of firearms or ammunition that is
otherwise authorized or guaranteed by law.
(4) Any person willfully violating any provision of an order issued
by the governor under this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---