BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that students'
knowledge of mathematics must improve to enable them to be successful
in college and in an increasingly technological and complex workplace.
The only way to improve students' knowledge is to improve the
instruction in mathematics that students receive in public schools.
Therefore, the legislature intends to increase both the expectation and
the capacity for mathematics instruction in Washington's public
schools, focusing particularly at the high school level.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2006 c 114 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except those
equivalencies established by local high schools or school districts
under RCW 28A.230.097.
(a) Beginning with the class of students entering high school in
the fall of 2007, minimum high school graduation requirements shall
include three years of mathematics, with at least one year containing
content at a level that exceeds the Washington assessment of student
learning and is aligned with college preparation standards.
(b) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(((b))) (c) The certificate of academic achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement
requirements under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a
public high school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(((c))) (d) Any decision on whether a student has met the state
board's high school graduation requirements for a high school and
beyond plan shall remain at the local level.
(2) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of
education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board. The
state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements for students
enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and technical
education programs, particularly those programs that lead to a
certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized. The
purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in these
programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of academic
achievement, complete the program and earn the program's certificate or
credential, and complete other state and local graduation requirements.
The board shall ((reports [report])) report its findings and
recommendations for additional flexibility in graduation requirements,
if necessary, to the legislature by December 1, 2007.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To meet increased demand for high school mathematics teachers
resulting from increased graduation requirements in mathematics, the
fast track to math program is created under sections 3 through 5 of
this act. The intent of the program is to identify exemplary teachers,
create a fast track for these teachers to become endorsed to teach high
school mathematics, and provide incentives and financial support for
participants in the fast track.
(2) The professional educator standards board shall develop or
identify a performance evaluation instrument for school districts to
use in nominating teachers for the fast track to math program. The
instrument shall be objective and standard for use in all districts and
assess a teacher's knowledge, skills, and abilities. The board shall
recommend the standard for the level of knowledge, skill, and ability
expected from an exemplary teacher, but the decision of whether a
teacher meets the standard shall be made by the employing school
district.
(3) Using the performance evaluation instrument identified under
this section, school districts may nominate exemplary teachers who do
not have a certification endorsement in mathematics to obtain an
endorsement through the fast track to math program. Only a teacher who
is nominated by his or her employing school district as an exemplary
teacher may participate in the program.
(4) A participating teacher who successfully completes a fast track
to math preparation program approved by the professional educator
standards board under section 4 of this act and passes the assessment
of subject knowledge required under RCW 28A.410.220 shall receive a
certification endorsement in mathematics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board shall adopt
guidelines for fast track to math preparation programs. The programs
shall be specially designed to provide exemplary, experienced teachers
with content and pedagogical knowledge in mathematics to enable them to
teach high school mathematics. Programs shall be brief and intensive;
structured to permit most participants to complete the program during
a single summer; and widely accessible for teachers, including those in
rural areas. To maximize access and efficiency, programs shall
incorporate distance learning technologies. The board shall adopt the
guidelines no later than September 1, 2007.
(2) Any teacher preparation program approved under RCW 28A.410.210
to offer a certification endorsement in mathematics may propose a fast
track to math preparation program and submit it to the professional
educator standards board for approval, based on the guidelines adopted
under this section.
(3) It is the legislature's intent that teachers have the
opportunity to enroll in approved fast track to math preparation
programs by the summer of 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose:
(1) The professional educator standards board shall provide a one-time grant to teacher preparation programs that receive approval under
section 4 of this act to offer a fast track to math preparation program
to offset the costs of developing the curriculum, assessments, and
materials for the program.
(2) The professional educator standards board shall provide the
following financial support to teachers participating in a fast track
to math preparation program:
(a) A grant to offset the costs of program tuition, fees, and
materials;
(b) A stipend as compensation for the time teachers must dedicate
to complete the intensive program; and
(c) A grant to offset the cost of taking the assessment of subject
knowledge required under RCW 28A.410.220.
(3) For teachers who receive a certificate endorsement in
mathematics after completing a fast track to math preparation program,
the professional educator standards board shall provide an annual
incentive bonus of up to two thousand five hundred dollars for each
year that the teacher teaches mathematics in a Washington public
school, subject to a limit of four years.

--- END ---