BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of ecology is directed to
study and review innovative strategies and processes for supporting
conservation development strategies in the rural area, particularly
related to provision of water. The objectives of this study are to
provide certainty and improve water flows in impaired or at-risk basins
through a variety of strategies, while advancing innovative
conservation development. In particular, the purpose of this study is
to create a supporting water management and conservation strategy to
the land conservation strategy being explored in the rural village
concept, which proposes to consolidate growth from existing and zoned
lots into a compact and environmentally friendly footprint while
concurrently conserving large swaths of farm and forest lands and
natural areas. A combined effort to conserve water and land and
provide for a new style of development in keeping with rural character
will improve rural quality of life and economic health by: Providing
new alternatives for environmentally friendly, compact rural
development; providing housing that is affordable to people who live
and work in rural areas; reducing conversion of resource and rural
lands and protect the ecosystem services and products they provide; and
provide options for landowners to achieve the optimal real estate value
of their properties.
(2) The department of ecology, in partnership with the cascade land
conservancy, must contract for and coordinate a two-year study. The
scope of the study includes review and analysis of issues related to
establishing, siting, and obtaining regulatory approval for sustainable
water management associated with the rural village concept. The study
must involve the three watersheds selected to accept a rural village
demonstration project. Water management issues to be addressed include
but are not limited to the following:
(a) The use of a water banking system and trust water rights as a
mechanism to mange existing water rights within the pilot study areas;
(b) The exploration of feasibility and means for water right
transfers, including conversion of surface water rights to groundwater
withdrawals or other water right transfer alternatives;
(c) Issues involving determinations of current and future water
availability and a characterization of potential impairment of senior
water rights;
(d) Opportunities to compliment and support other local
environmental and land use goals as identified in watershed planning,
shared salmon strategy plans, and the growth management act;
(e) Applicability of the Ecology v. Campbell & Gwinn, L.L.C. (146
Wn.2d 1) decision, specifically local use of, and options to manage,
the number and density of exempt wells projected to support future
growth;
(f) Opportunities for enhancement of subbasin instream flows. This
includes examining specific strategies for achieving benefits to a
demonstration project's subbasin and overall watershed health from
innovative, low-impact development techniques for proposed rural
village, land conservation measures and reduced development footprint,
along with expansive water conservation measures within the rural
village, in the subbasin and across the landscape; and
(g) Explore the potential to use new septic/sewer technology, such
as membrane technology, to provide reclaimed water for nonpotable uses.
(3) The department of ecology, in partnership with the cascade land
conservancy, must seek matching federal resources, including technical
support from the United States environmental protection agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the
department of ecology for the purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of ecology for
the purposes of this act.

--- END ---