BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be cited as the revised
uniform anatomical gift act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adult" means an individual who is at least eighteen years old.
(2) "Agent" means an individual:
(a) Authorized to make health care decisions on the principal's
behalf by a power of attorney for health care; or
(b) Expressly authorized to make an anatomical gift on the
principal's behalf by any other record signed by the principal.
(3) "Anatomical gift" means a donation of all or part of a human
body to take effect after the donor's death for the purpose of
transplantation, therapy, research, or education.
(4) "Decedent" means a deceased individual whose body or part is or
may be the source of an anatomical gift.
(5) "Disinterested witness" means a witness other than the spouse
or state registered domestic partner, child, parent, sibling,
grandchild, grandparent, or guardian of the individual who makes,
amends, revokes, or refuses to make an anatomical gift. The term does
not include a person to which an anatomical gift could pass under
section 11 of this act.
(6) "Document of gift" means a donor card or other record used to
make an anatomical gift. The term includes a statement or symbol on a
driver's license, identification card, or donor registry.
(7) "Donor" means an individual whose body or part is the subject
of an anatomical gift.
(8) "Donor registry" means a database that contains records of
anatomical gifts and amendments to or revocations of anatomical gifts.
(9) "Driver's license" means a license or permit issued by the
department of licensing to operate a vehicle, whether or not conditions
are attached to the license or permit.
(10) "Eye bank" means a person that is licensed, accredited, or
regulated under federal or state law to engage in the recovery,
screening, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of human eyes
or portions of human eyes.
(11) "Guardian" means a person appointed by a court to make
decisions regarding the support, care, education, health, or welfare of
an individual. The term does not include a guardian ad litem.
(12) "Hospital" means a facility licensed as a hospital under the
law of any state or a facility operated as a hospital by the United
States, a state, or a subdivision of a state.
(13) "Identification card" means an identification card issued by
the department of licensing.
(14) "Know" means to have actual knowledge.
(15) "Minor" means an individual who is less than eighteen years
old.
(16) "Organ procurement organization" means a person designated by
the secretary of the United States department of health and human
services as an organ procurement organization.
(17) "Parent" means a parent whose parental rights have not been
terminated.
(18) "Part" means an organ, an eye, or tissue of a human being.
The term does not include the whole body.
(19) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
(20) "Physician" means an individual licensed or otherwise
authorized to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and
surgery under the law of any state.
(21) "Procurement organization" means an eye bank, organ
procurement organization, or tissue bank.
(22) "Prospective donor" means an individual whose death is
imminent and has been determined by a procurement organization to have
a part that could be medically suitable for transplantation, therapy,
research, or education. "Prospective donor" does not include an
individual who has made a refusal.
(23) "Reasonable costs" include: (a) Programming and software
installation and upgrades; (b) employee training that is specific to
the organ and tissue donor registry or the donation program created in
RCW 46.12.510; (c) literature that is specific to the organ and tissue
donor registry or the donation program created in RCW 46.12.510; and
(d) hardware upgrades or other issues important to the organ and tissue
donor registry or the donation program created in RCW 46.12.510 that
have been mutually agreed upon in advance by the department of
licensing and the Washington state organ procurement organizations.
(24) "Reasonably available" means able to be contacted by a
procurement organization without undue effort and willing and able to
act in a timely manner consistent with existing medical criteria
necessary for the making of an anatomical gift.
(25) "Recipient" means an individual into whose body a decedent's
part has been or is intended to be transplanted.
(26) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form.
(27) "Refusal" means a record created under section 7 of this act
that expressly states an intent to bar other persons from making an
anatomical gift of an individual's body or part.
(28) "Sign" means, with the present intent to authenticate or adopt
a record:
(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(b) To attach to or logically associate with the record an
electronic symbol, sound, or process.
(29) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.
(30) "Technician" means an individual determined to be qualified to
remove or process parts by an appropriate organization that is
licensed, accredited, or regulated under federal or state law. The
term includes an enucleator.
(31) "Tissue" means a portion of the human body other than an organ
or an eye. The term does not include blood unless the blood is donated
for the purpose of research or education.
(32) "Tissue bank" means a person that is licensed to conduct
business in this state, accredited, and regulated under federal or
state law to engage in the recovery, screening, testing, processing,
storage, or distribution of tissue.
(33) "Transplant hospital" means a hospital that furnishes organ
transplants and other medical and surgical specialty services required
for the care of transplant patients.
(34) "Washington state organ procurement organization" means an
organ procurement organization that has been designated by the United
States department of health and human services to coordinate organ
procurement activities for any portion of Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This chapter applies to an anatomical gift
or amendment to, revocation of, or refusal to make an anatomical gift,
whenever made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Subject to section 8 of this act, an
anatomical gift of a donor's body or part may be made during the life
of the donor in the manner provided in section 5 of this act by:
(1) The donor, if the donor is an adult or if the donor is a minor
and is:
(a) Emancipated; or
(b) Authorized under state law to apply for a driver's license
because the donor is at least fifteen and one-half years old;
(2) An agent of the donor, unless the power of attorney for health
care or other record prohibits the agent from making an anatomical
gift;
(3) A parent of the donor, if the donor is an unemancipated minor;
provided, however, that an anatomical gift made pursuant to this
subsection shall cease to be valid once the donor becomes either an
emancipated minor or an adult; or
(4) The donor's guardian.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A donor may make an anatomical gift:
(a) By authorizing a statement or symbol indicating that the donor
has made an anatomical gift to be imprinted on the donor's driver's
license or identification card;
(b) In a will;
(c) During a terminal illness or injury of the donor, by any form
of communication addressed to at least two adults, at least one of whom
is a disinterested witness; or
(d) As provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift
under section 4 of this act may make a gift by a donor card or other
record signed by the donor or other person making the gift or by
authorizing that a statement or symbol indicating that the donor has
made an anatomical gift be included on a donor registry. If the donor
or other person is physically unable to sign a record, the record may
be signed by another individual at the direction of the donor or other
person and must:
(a) Be witnessed by at least two adults, at least one of whom is a
disinterested witness, who have signed at the request of the donor or
the other person; and
(b) State that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in (a)
of this subsection.
(3) Revocation, suspension, expiration, or cancellation of a
driver's license or identification card through which an anatomical
gift has been made does not invalidate the gift.
(4) An anatomical gift made by will takes effect upon the donor's
death whether or not the will is probated. Invalidation of the will
after the donor's death does not invalidate the gift.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Subject to section 8 of this act, a
donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under
section 4 of this act may amend or revoke an anatomical gift by:
(a) A record signed by:
(i) The donor;
(ii) The other person; or
(iii) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, another individual
acting at the direction of the donor or the other person if the donor
or other person is physically unable to sign; or
(b) A later-executed document of gift that amends or revokes a
previous anatomical gift or portion of an anatomical gift, either
expressly or by inconsistency.
(2) A record signed pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this
section must:
(a) Be witnessed by at least two adults, at least one of whom is a
disinterested witness, who have signed at the request of the donor or
the other person; and
(b) State that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in (a)
of this subsection.
(3) Subject to section 8 of this act, a donor or other person
authorized to make an anatomical gift under section 4 of this act may
revoke an anatomical gift by the destruction or cancellation of the
document of gift, or the portion of the document of gift used to make
the gift, with the intent to revoke the gift. The donor or other
person shall notify the Washington organ procurement organization of
the destruction or cancellation of the document of gift for the purpose
of removing the individual's name from the organ and tissue donor
registry created in RCW 68.50.635 (as recodified by this act). If the
Washington state organ procurement organization that is notified does
not maintain a registry for Washington residents, it shall notify all
Washington state procurement organizations that do maintain such a
registry.
(4) A donor may amend or revoke an anatomical gift that was not
made in a will by any form of communication during a terminal illness
or injury addressed to at least two adults, at least one of whom is a
disinterested witness.
(5) A donor who makes an anatomical gift in a will may amend or
revoke the gift in the manner provided for amendment or revocation of
wills or as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) An individual may refuse to make an
anatomical gift of the individual's body or part by:
(a) A record signed by:
(i) The individual; or
(ii) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, another individual
acting at the direction of the individual if the individual is
physically unable to sign;
(b) The individual's will, whether or not the will is admitted to
probate or invalidated after the individual's death; or
(c) Any form of communication made by the individual during the
individual's terminal illness or injury addressed to at least two
adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness.
(2) A record signed pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(ii) of this
section must:
(a) Be witnessed by at least two adults, at least one of whom is a
disinterested witness, who have signed at the request of the
individual; and
(b) State that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in (a)
of this subsection.
(3) An individual who has made a refusal may amend or revoke the
refusal:
(a) In the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section for
making a refusal;
(b) By subsequently making an anatomical gift pursuant to section
5 of this act that is inconsistent with the refusal; or
(c) By destroying or canceling the record evidencing the refusal,
or the portion of the record used to make the refusal, with the intent
to revoke the refusal.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in section 8(8) of this act, in
the absence of an express, contrary indication by the individual set
forth in the refusal, an individual's unrevoked refusal to make an
anatomical gift of the individual's body or part bars all other persons
from making an anatomical gift of the individual's body or part.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (7) of this section and subject to subsection (6) of this
section, in the absence of an express, contrary indication by the
donor, a person other than the donor is barred from making, amending,
or revoking an anatomical gift of a donor's body or part if the donor
made an anatomical gift of the donor's body or part under section 5 of
this act or an amendment to an anatomical gift of the donor's body or
part under section 6 of this act.
(2) A donor's revocation of an anatomical gift of the donor's body
or part under section 6 of this act is not a refusal and does not bar
another person specified in section 4 or 9 of this act from making an
anatomical gift of the donor's body or part under section 5 or 10 of
this act.
(3) If a person other than the donor makes an unrevoked anatomical
gift of the donor's body or part under section 5 of this act or an
amendment to an anatomical gift of the donor's body or part under
section 6 of this act, another person may not make, amend, or revoke
the gift of the donor's body or part under section 10 of this act.
(4) A revocation of an anatomical gift of a donor's body or part
under section 6 of this act by a person other than the donor does not
bar another person from making an anatomical gift of the body or part
under section 5 or 10 of this act.
(5) In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor
or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under section 4
of this act, an anatomical gift of a part is neither a refusal to give
another part nor a limitation on the making of an anatomical gift of
another part at a later time by the donor or another person.
(6) In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor
or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under section 4
of this act, an anatomical gift of a part for one or more of the
permitted purposes is not a limitation on the making of an anatomical
gift of the part for any of the other purposes by the donor or any
other person under section 5 or 10 of this act.
(7) If a donor who is an unemancipated minor dies, a parent of the
donor who is reasonably available may revoke or amend an anatomical
gift of the donor's body or part.
(8) If an unemancipated minor who signed a refusal dies, a parent
of the minor who is reasonably available may revoke the minor's
refusal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of
this section and unless barred by section 7 or 8 of this act, an
anatomical gift of a decedent's body or part may be made by any member
of the following classes of persons who is reasonably available, in the
order of priority listed:
(a) An agent of the decedent at the time of death who could have
made an anatomical gift under section 4(2) of this act immediately
before the decedent's death;
(b) The spouse, or domestic partner registered as required by state
law, of the decedent;
(c) Adult children of the decedent;
(d) Parents of the decedent;
(e) Adult siblings of the decedent;
(f) Adult grandchildren of the decedent;
(g) Grandparents of the decedent;
(h) The persons who were acting as the guardians of the person of
the decedent at the time of death; and
(i) Any other person having the authority under applicable law to
dispose of the decedent's body.
(2) If there is more than one member of a class listed in
subsection (1)(a), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h) of this section
entitled to make an anatomical gift, an anatomical gift may be made by
a member of the class unless that member or a person to which the gift
may pass under section 11 of this act knows of an objection by another
member of the class. If an objection is known, the gift may be made
only by a majority of the members of the class who are reasonably
available.
(3) A person may not make an anatomical gift if, at the time of the
decedent's death, a person in a prior class under subsection (1) of
this section is reasonably available to make or to object to the making
of an anatomical gift.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) A person authorized to make an
anatomical gift under section 9 of this act may make an anatomical gift
by a document of gift signed by the person making the gift or by that
person's oral communication that is electronically recorded or is
contemporaneously reduced to a record and signed by the individual
receiving the oral communication.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, an anatomical gift
by a person authorized under section 9 of this act may be amended or
revoked orally or in a record by any member of a prior class who is
reasonably available. If more than one member of the prior class is
reasonably available, the gift made by a person authorized under
section 9 of this act may be:
(a) Amended only if a majority of the reasonably available members
agree to the amending of the gift; or
(b) Revoked only if a majority of the reasonably available members
agree to the revoking of the gift or if they are equally divided as to
whether to revoke the gift.
(3) A revocation under subsection (2) of this section is effective
only if, before an incision has been made to remove a part from the
donor's body or before transplant procedures have begun on the
recipient, the procurement organization, transplant hospital, or
physician or technician knows of the revocation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) An anatomical gift may be made to the
following persons named in the document of gift:
(a) For research or education: A hospital; an accredited medical
school, dental school, college, or university; or an organ procurement
organization;
(b) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, an individual
designated by the person making the anatomical gift if the individual
is the recipient of the part;
(c) An eye bank or tissue bank.
(2) If an anatomical gift to an individual under subsection (1)(b)
of this section cannot be transplanted into the individual, the part
passes in accordance with subsection (7) of this section in the absence
of an express, contrary indication by the person making the anatomical
gift.
(3) If an anatomical gift of one or more specific parts or of all
parts is made in a document of gift that does not name a person
described in subsection (1) of this section but identifies the purpose
for which an anatomical gift may be used, the following rules apply:
(a) If the part is an eye and the gift is for the purpose of
transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to the appropriate eye
bank.
(b) If the part is tissue and the gift is for the purpose of
transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to the appropriate tissue
bank.
(c) If the part is an organ and the gift is for the purpose of
transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to the appropriate organ
procurement organization as custodian of the organ.
(d) If the part is an organ, an eye, or tissue and the gift is for
the purpose of research or education, the gift passes to the
appropriate procurement organization.
(4) For the purpose of subsection (3) of this section, if there is
more than one purpose of an anatomical gift set forth in the document
of gift but the purposes are not set forth in any priority, the gift
must be used for transplantation or therapy, if suitable. If the gift
cannot be used for transplantation or therapy, the gift may be used for
research or education.
(5) If an anatomical gift of one or more specific parts is made in
a document of gift that does not name a person described in subsection
(1) of this section and does not identify the purpose of the gift, the
gift may be used only for transplantation or therapy, and the gift
passes in accordance with subsection (7) of this section.
(6) If a document of gift specifies only a general intent to make
an anatomical gift by words such as "donor," "organ donor," or "body
donor," or by a symbol or statement of similar import, the gift may be
used only for transplantation or therapy, and the gift passes in
accordance with subsection (7) of this section.
(7) For purposes of subsections (2), (5), and (6) of this section
the following rules apply:
(a) If the part is an eye, the gift passes to the appropriate eye
bank.
(b) If the part is tissue, the gift passes to the appropriate
tissue bank.
(c) If the part is an organ, the gift passes to the appropriate
organ procurement organization as custodian of the organ.
(8) An anatomical gift of an organ for transplantation or therapy,
other than an anatomical gift under subsection (1)(b) of this section,
passes to the organ procurement organization as custodian of the organ.
(9) If an anatomical gift does not pass pursuant to subsections (1)
through (8) of this section or the decedent's body or part is not used
for transplantation, therapy, research, or education, custody of the
body or part passes to the person under obligation to dispose of the
body or part.
(10) A person may not accept an anatomical gift if the person knows
that the gift was not effectively made under section 5 or 10 of this
act or if the person knows that the decedent made a refusal under
section 7 of this act that was not revoked. For purposes of this
subsection (10), if a person knows that an anatomical gift was made on
a document of gift, the person is deemed to know of any amendment or
revocation of the gift or any refusal to make an anatomical gift on the
same document of gift.
(11) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(b) of this
section, nothing in this chapter affects the allocation of organs for
transplantation or therapy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) A document of gift need not be
delivered during the donor's lifetime to be effective.
(2) Upon or after an individual's death, a person in possession of
a document of gift or a refusal to make an anatomical gift with respect
to the individual shall allow examination and copying of the document
of gift or refusal by a person authorized to make or object to the
making of an anatomical gift with respect to the individual or by a
person to which the gift could pass under section 11 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) When a hospital refers an individual at
or near death to a procurement organization, the organization shall
make a reasonable search of the records of the department of licensing
and any donor registry that it knows exists for the geographical area
in which the individual resides to ascertain whether the individual has
made an anatomical gift.
(2) A procurement organization must be allowed reasonable access to
information in the records of the department of licensing to ascertain
whether an individual at or near death is a donor.
(3) When a hospital refers an individual at or near death to a
procurement organization, the organization may conduct any reasonable
examination necessary to ensure the medical suitability of a part that
is or could be the subject of an anatomical gift for transplantation,
therapy, research, or education from a donor or a prospective donor.
During the examination period, measures necessary to ensure the medical
suitability of the part may not be withdrawn unless the hospital or
procurement organization knows that the individual expressed a contrary
intent.
(4) Unless prohibited by law other than this chapter, at any time
after a donor's death, the person to which a part passes under section
11 of this act may conduct any reasonable examination necessary to
ensure the medical suitability of the body or part for its intended
purpose.
(5) Unless prohibited by law other than this chapter, an
examination under subsection (3) or (4) of this section may include an
examination of all medical records of the donor or prospective donor.
(6) Upon the death of a minor who was a donor or had signed a
refusal, unless a procurement organization knows the minor is
emancipated, the procurement organization shall conduct a reasonable
search for the parents of the minor and provide the parents with an
opportunity to revoke or amend the anatomical gift or revoke the
refusal.
(7) Upon referral by a hospital under subsection (1) of this
section, a procurement organization shall make a reasonable search for
any person listed in section 9 of this act having priority to make an
anatomical gift on behalf of a prospective donor. If a procurement
organization receives information that an anatomical gift to any other
person was made, amended, or revoked, it shall promptly advise the
other person of all relevant information.
(8) Subject to sections 11(9), 21, and 22 of this act, the rights
of the person to which a part passes under section 11 of this act are
superior to the rights of all others with respect to the part. The
person may accept or reject an anatomical gift in whole or in part.
Subject to the terms of the document of gift and this chapter, a person
that accepts an anatomical gift of an entire body may allow embalming,
burial, or cremation, and use of remains in a funeral service. If the
gift is of a part, the person to which the part passes under section 11
of this act, upon the death of the donor and before embalming, burial,
or cremation, shall cause the part to be removed without unnecessary
mutilation.
(9) Neither the physician who attends the decedent at death nor the
physician who determines the time of the decedent's death may
participate in the procedures for removing or transplanting a part from
the decedent.
(10) A physician or technician may remove a donated part from the
body of a donor that the physician or technician is qualified to
remove.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 When English is not the first language of
the person or persons making, amending, revoking, or refusing
anatomical gifts as defined in this act, organ procurement
organizations are responsible for providing, at no cost, appropriate
interpreter services or translations to such persons for the purpose of
making such decisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Each hospital in this state shall enter
into agreements or affiliations with procurement organizations for
coordination of procurement and use of anatomical gifts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (2) of this section, a person who, for valuable
consideration, knowingly purchases or sells a part for transplantation
or therapy if removal of a part from an individual is intended to occur
after the individual's death is guilty of a class C felony under RCW
9A.20.010.
(2) A person may charge a reasonable amount for the removal,
processing, preservation, quality control, storage, transportation,
implantation, or disposal of a part.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A person who, in order to obtain financial
gain, intentionally falsifies, forges, conceals, defaces, or
obliterates a document of gift, an amendment or revocation of a
document of gift, or a refusal is guilty of a class C felony under RCW
9A.20.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) A person who acts in accordance with
this chapter or with the applicable anatomical gift law of another
state, or attempts in good faith to do so, is not liable for the act in
a civil action, criminal prosecution, or administrative proceeding.
(2) Neither the person making an anatomical gift nor the donor's
estate is liable for any injury or damage that results from the making
or use of the gift.
(3) In determining whether an anatomical gift has been made,
amended, or revoked under this chapter, a person may rely upon
representations of an individual listed in section 9(1) (b) through (g)
of this act relating to the individual's relationship to the donor or
prospective donor unless the person knows that the representation is
untrue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) A document of gift is valid if executed
in accordance with:
(a) This chapter;
(b) The laws of the state or country where it was executed; or
(c) The laws of the state or country where the person making the
anatomical gift was domiciled, has a place of residence, or was a
national at the time the document of gift was executed.
(2) If a document of gift is valid under this section, the law of
this state governs the interpretation of the document of gift.
(3) A person may presume that a document of gift or amendment of an
anatomical gift is valid unless that person knows that it was not
validly executed or was revoked.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) The definitions in this subsection
apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Advance health care directive" means a power of attorney for
health care or a "directive" as defined in RCW 70.122.020.
(b) "Declaration" means a record signed by a prospective donor
specifying the circumstances under which a life support system may be
withheld or withdrawn from the prospective donor.
(c) "Health care decision" means any decision made regarding the
health care of the prospective donor.
(2) If a prospective donor has a declaration or advance health care
directive, and the terms of the declaration or directive and the
express or implied terms of a potential anatomical gift are in conflict
with regard to the administration of measures necessary to ensure the
medical suitability of a part for transplantation or therapy, the
prospective donor's attending physician and the prospective donor shall
confer to resolve the conflict. If the prospective donor is incapable
of resolving the conflict, an agent acting under the prospective
donor's declaration or directive, or, if none or the agent is not
reasonably available, another person authorized by law other than this
chapter to make health care decisions on behalf of the prospective
donor, shall act for the donor to resolve the conflict. The conflict
must be resolved as expeditiously as possible. Information relevant to
the resolution of the conflict may be obtained from the appropriate
procurement organization and any other person authorized to make an
anatomical gift for the prospective donor under section 9 of this act.
Before resolution of the conflict, measures necessary to ensure the
medical suitability of the part may not be withheld or withdrawn from
the prospective donor if withholding or withdrawing the measures is not
contraindicated by appropriate end-of-life care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 (1)(a) A coroner or medical examiner shall
cooperate with procurement organizations, to the extent that such
cooperation does not prevent, hinder, or impede the timely
investigation of death, to facilitate the opportunity to recover
anatomical gifts for the purpose of transplantation or therapy.
However, a coroner or medical examiner may limit the number of
procurement organizations with which he or she cooperates.
(b) The coroner or medical examiner may release the initial
investigative information to the tissue or organ procurement
organization for the purpose of determining the suitability of the
potential donor by those organizations. The information released for
this purpose shall remain confidential. The coroner or medical
examiner is not liable for any release of confidential information by
the procurement organization.
(2)(a) Procurement organizations shall cooperate with the coroner
or medical examiner to ensure the preservation of and timely transfer
to the coroner or medical examiner any physical or biological evidence
from a prospective donor that the procurement organization may have
contact with or access to that is required by the coroner or medical
examiner for the investigation of death.
(b) If the coroner or medical examiner or a designee releases a
part for donation under subsection (4) of this section, the procurement
organization, upon request, shall cause the physician or technician who
removes the part to provide the coroner or medical examiner with a
record describing the condition of the part, biopsies, residual tissue,
photographs, and any other information and observations requested by
the coroner or medical examiner that would assist in the investigation
of death.
(3) A part may not be removed from the body of a decedent under the
jurisdiction of a coroner or medical examiner for transplantation,
therapy, research, or education unless the part is the subject of an
anatomical gift, and has been released by the coroner or medical
examiner. The body of a decedent under the jurisdiction of the coroner
or medical examiner may not be delivered to a person for research or
education unless the body is the subject of an anatomical gift. This
subsection does not preclude a coroner or medical examiner from
performing the medicolegal investigation upon the body or relevant
parts of a decedent under the jurisdiction of the coroner or medical
examiner.
(4) If an anatomical gift of a part from the decedent under the
jurisdiction of the coroner or medical examiner has been or might be
made, but the coroner or medical examiner initially believes that the
recovery of the part could interfere with the postmortem investigation
into the decedent's cause or manner of death, the collection of
evidence, or the description, documentation, or interpretation of
injuries on the body, the coroner or medical examiner may consult with
the procurement organization or physician or technician designated by
the procurement organization about the proposed recovery. After
consultation, the coroner or medical examiner may release the part for
recovery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 This chapter is subject to the laws of this
state governing the jurisdiction of the coroner or medical examiner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 In applying and construing this uniform
act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of
the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 This chapter modifies, limits, and
supersedes the federal electronic signatures in global and national
commerce act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.) with respect to electronic
signatures and anatomical gifts, but does not modify, limit, or
supersede section 101(a) of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001), or
authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in
section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b)).

Sec. 25 RCW 1.50.010 and 1998 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Organ donor" means an individual who makes an anatomical gift
as specified in ((RCW 68.50.530(1))) chapter 68.-- RCW (sections 1
through 24 of this act).
(2) "Organ procurement organization" ((means any accredited or
certified organ or eye bank)) has the same meaning as in section 2 of
this act.
(3) "Person" means a person specified in ((RCW 68.50.550)) section
9 of this act.

Sec. 26 RCW 46.12.510 and 2003 c 94 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant for a new or renewed registration for a vehicle
required to be registered under this chapter or chapter 46.16 RCW may
make a donation of one dollar or more to the organ and tissue donation
awareness account to promote the donation of organs and tissues under
the provisions of the uniform anatomical gift act, ((RCW 68.50.520
through 68.50.630)) chapter 68.-- RCW (sections 1 through 24 of this
act). The department shall collect the donations and credit the
donations to the organ and tissue donation awareness account, created
in RCW 68.50.640 (as recodified by this act). At least quarterly, the
department shall transmit donations made to the organ and tissue
donation awareness account to the foundation established for organ and
tissue donation awareness purposes by the Washington state organ
procurement organizations. All Washington state organ procurement
organizations will have proportional access to these funds to conduct
public education in their service areas. The donation of one or more
dollars is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant. The
department shall make available informational booklets or other
informational sources on the importance of organ and tissue donations
to applicants.
The department shall inquire of each applicant at the time the
completed application is presented whether the applicant is interested
in making a donation of one dollar or more and shall also specifically
inform the applicant of the option for organ and tissue donations as
required by RCW 46.20.113. The department shall also provide written
information to each applicant volunteering to become an organ and
tissue donor. The written information shall disclose that the
applicant's name shall be transmitted to the organ and tissue donor
registry created in RCW 68.50.635 (as recodified by this act), and that
the applicant shall notify a Washington state organ procurement
organization of any changes to the applicant's donor status.
All reasonable costs associated with the creation of the donation
program created under this section must be paid proportionally or by
other agreement by a Washington state organ procurement organization.
For the purposes of this section, "reasonable costs" and
"Washington state organ procurement organization" have the same meaning
as defined in ((RCW 68.50.530)) section 2 of this act.

Sec. 27 RCW 46.20.113 and 1993 c 228 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of licensing shall provide a statement whereby the
licensee may certify his or her willingness to make an anatomical gift
under ((RCW 68.50.540)) section 4 of this act, as now or hereafter
amended. The department shall provide the statement in at least one of
the following ways:
(1) On each driver's license; or
(2) With each driver's license; or
(3) With each in-person driver's license application.

Sec. 28 RCW 46.20.1131 and 2003 c 94 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall electronically transfer the information of all
persons who upon application for a driver's license or identicard
volunteer to donate organs or tissue to a registry created in RCW
68.50.635 (as recodified by this act), and any subsequent changes to
the applicant's donor status when the applicant renews a driver's
license or identicard or applies for a new driver's license or
identicard.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 Sections 1 through 24 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 68 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 RCW 68.50.500, 68.50.635, and 68.50.640 are
each recodified as sections in the new chapter created in section 29 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 68.50.510 (Good faith compliance with RCW 68.50.500--Hospital liability) and 1987 c 331 s 72 & 1986 c 129 s 2;
(2) RCW 68.50.520 (Anatomical gifts -- Findings -- Declaration) and
1993 c 228 s 1;
(3) RCW 68.50.530 (Anatomical gifts -- Definitions) and 2003 c 94 s
2, 1996 c 178 s 15, & 1993 c 228 s 2;
(4) RCW 68.50.540 (Anatomical gifts -- Authorized -- Procedures--Changes -- Refusal) and 2003 c 94 s 4, 1995 c 132 s 1, & 1993 c 228 s 3;
(5) RCW 68.50.550 (Anatomical gifts -- By person other than decedent)
and 2007 c 156 s 26 & 1993 c 228 s 4;
(6) RCW 68.50.560 (Anatomical gifts -- Hospital procedure -- Records--Liability) and 1993 c 228 s 5;
(7) RCW 68.50.570 (Anatomical gifts -- Donees) and 1993 c 228 s 6;
(8) RCW 68.50.580 (Anatomical gifts -- Document of gift -- Delivery)
and 1993 c 228 s 7;
(9) RCW 68.50.590 (Anatomical gifts -- Rights of donee -- Time of
death -- Actions by technician, enucleator) and 1993 c 228 s 8;
(10) RCW 68.50.600 (Anatomical gifts -- Hospitals -- Procurement and
use coordination) and 1993 c 228 s 9;
(11) RCW 68.50.610 (Anatomical gifts -- Illegal purchase or sale--Penalty) and 2003 c 53 s 312 & 1993 c 228 s 10; and
(12) RCW 68.50.620 (Anatomical gifts -- Examination for medical
acceptability -- Jurisdiction of coroner, medical examiner -- Liability
limited) and 1993 c 228 s 11.

--- END ---