BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2006 c 308 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
Part-time academic employees at community and technical colleges
are currently eligible for full health care benefits beginning the
second consecutive quarter of employment, at half-time or more of an
academic workload, as defined in RCW 28B.50.489. They are also
eligible for health benefits through the summer even if they receive no
work at all that quarter, if they have worked half-time or more of an
academic workload in each of the three ((of the four)) preceding
quarters. However, workload fluctuations below these thresholds may
result in the loss of employer contributions for health care benefits.
It is the intent of the legislature to provide for continuous health
care eligibility for part-time academic employees based on averaging
workload gained during the two preceding academic years.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.053 and 2006 c 308 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Part-time academic employees, as defined in RCW 28B.50.489, who
have established eligibility as determined from the payroll records of
the employing community or technical college districts, for employer
contributions for benefits under this chapter and who have worked an
average of half-time or more in each of the two preceding academic
years, through employment at one or more community or technical college
districts, are eligible for continuation of employer contributions for
the subsequent summer quarter period including the break between summer
and fall quarters.
(2) Once a part-time academic employee meets the criteria in
subsection (1) of this section, the employee shall continue to receive
uninterrupted employer contributions for benefits if the employee works
at least ((three)) two of the ((four)) three quarters of the academic
year with an average academic year workload of half-time or more.
Benefits provided under this section cease ((at the end of the academic
year)) if this criteria is not met. Continuous benefits shall be
reinstated once the employee reestablishes eligibility under subsection
(1) of this section ((and will be maintained as long as the employee
works at least three of the four quarters of the academic year with an
average academic workload of half-time or more)).
(3) As used in this section, "academic year" means ((summer,))
fall, winter, and spring quarters.
(4) This section does not modify rules in existence on June 7,
2006, adopted under this chapter regarding the initial establishment of
eligibility for benefits.
(5) This section does not preclude individuals from being eligible
for benefits under other laws or rules that may apply or for which they
may be eligible.
(6) The employer must notify part-time academic employees of their
potential right to benefits under this section.
(7) To be eligible for maintenance of benefits through averaging,
part-time academic employees must notify their employers of their
potential eligibility. The state board for community and technical
colleges shall report back to the legislature by November 15, 2009, on
the feasibility of eliminating the self-reporting requirement for
employees.

--- END ---