BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that sampling of
fish, wildlife, and shellfish by department of fish and wildlife
employees will ensure the conservation and management of fish,
shellfish, and wildlife. Because the harvest of fish and wildlife is
regulated by the department, the legislature finds that sampling by
departmental employees will benefit the resource, and will further the
department's research related to fish, wildlife, and shellfish. This
act does not apply to the harvest of private sector cultured aquatic
products as defined in RCW 15.85.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Department employees, in carrying out their duties under this
title on public lands or state waters, may:
(a) Collect samples of tissue, fluids, or other bodily parts of
fish, wildlife, or shellfish; or
(b) Board vessels in state waters engaged in commercial and
recreational harvest activities to collect samples of fish, wildlife,
or shellfish.
(i) Department employees shall ask permission from the owner or his
or her agent before boarding vessels in state waters.
(ii) If an employee of the department is denied access to any
vessel where access was sought for the purposes of (b) of this
subsection, the department employee may apply to any court of competent
jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access to the vessel in
order to carry out their duties under this section. The court may upon
application issue a search warrant for the purposes requested.
(2) Department employees must have official identification,
announce their presence and intent, and perform their duties in a safe
and professional manner while carrying out the activities in this
section.
(3) This section does not apply to the harvest of private sector
cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW 15.85.020.
(4) This section does not apply to fish and wildlife officers and
ex officio fish and wildlife officers carrying out their duties under
this title.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.360 and 2000 c 107 s 243 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful interfering in department
operations if the person prevents department employees from carrying
out duties authorized by this title, including but not limited to
interfering:
(a) In the operation of department vehicles, vessels, or aircraft;
or
(b) With the collection of samples of tissue, fluids, or other
bodily parts of fish, wildlife, and shellfish under section 2 of this
act.
(2) Unlawful interfering in department operations is a gross
misdemeanor.

--- END ---