BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that agricultural
operations are often subjected to nuisance lawsuits. The legislature
also finds that such lawsuits hasten premature conversion of
agricultural lands to other uses. The legislature further finds that
farm operations must be able to adopt new technologies and diversify
into new crops and products if the agricultural industry is to survive
and agricultural lands are to be conserved. Therefore, the legislature
intends to enhance the protection of agricultural operations and
activities from nuisance lawsuits, and to further the clear legislative
directive of the state growth management act to maintain and enhance
the agricultural industry and conserve productive agricultural lands.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.48.305 and 1992 c 151 s 1 and 1992 c 52 s 3 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, agricultural
((activities conducted on farmland)) and forest ((practices))
operations, if consistent with good agricultural and forest practices
and established prior to surrounding nonagricultural and nonforestry
activities, are presumed to be reasonable and shall not be found to
constitute a nuisance unless the operation, or related activity or
practice, has a substantial adverse effect on the public health and
safety.
If those agricultural and forest operations and related
agricultural and forest activities and ((forest)) practices are
undertaken in conformity with all applicable laws and rules, the
activities are presumed to be good agricultural and forest practices
not adversely affecting the public health and safety for purposes of
this section and RCW 7.48.300. An agricultural activity that is in
conformity with such laws and rules shall not be restricted as to the
hours of the day or day or days of the week during which it may be
conducted.
Nothing in this section shall affect or impair any right to sue for
damages.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.48.310 and 1992 c 52 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
As used in RCW 7.48.305:
(1) "Agricultural activity" means a condition or activity which
occurs on a farm in connection with the commercial production of farm
products and includes, but is not limited to, marketed produce at
roadside stands or farm markets; noise; odors; dust; fumes; operation
of machinery and irrigation pumps; movement, including, but not limited
to, use of current county road ditches, streams, rivers, canals, and
drains, and use of water for agricultural activities; ground and aerial
application of seed, fertilizers, conditioners, and plant protection
products; keeping of bees for pollination of agricultural products and
gardens; employment and use of labor; roadway movement of equipment and
livestock; protection from damage by wildlife; prevention of trespass;
construction and maintenance of buildings, fences, roads, bridges,
ponds, drains, waterways, and similar features and maintenance of
streambanks and watercourses; and conversion from one agricultural
activity to another.
(2) "Farm" means the land, buildings, freshwater ponds, freshwater
culturing and growing facilities, and machinery used in the commercial
production of farm products.
(3) "Farmland" means land or freshwater ponds devoted primarily to
the production, for commercial purposes, of livestock, freshwater
aquacultural, or other agricultural commodities.
(4) "Farm product" means those plants and animals useful to humans
and includes, but is not limited to, forages and sod crops, dairy and
dairy products, poultry and poultry products, livestock, including
breeding, grazing, and recreational equine use, fruits, vegetables,
flowers, seeds, grasses, trees, freshwater fish and fish products,
apiaries, equine and other similar products, or any other product which
incorporates the use of food, feed, fiber, or fur.
(5) "Forest practice" means "forest practice" as defined in RCW
76.09.020.
(6) "Operation" means the production of farm or forest products.

--- END ---