BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.118.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that even in the 1970s there were over
one million, two hundred thousand persons in the state ((are)) not
being served by sanitary sewers and that they ((must)) had to rely on
septic tank systems. Since that time, the number of state households
and businesses not being served by sanitary sewers has only increased.
Today, the number, location, and functionality of on-site sewage
disposal systems in operation in Washington is unknown. Creating a
locally designed inventory and inspection system for on-site sewage
disposal systems, and encouraging expansion of sanitary sewage systems,
are necessary first steps towards addressing the problems inherent with
failing systems. When prioritizing inventories and inspections, areas
within incorporated cities should be addressed as early as possible
because of the inherent proximity of sanitary sewage systems to
existing on-site sewage disposal systems in use within a city.
(2) The failure of large numbers of such systems has resulted in
significant health hazards, loss of property values, ((and)) water
quality degradation, and the expenditure of public health moneys.
((The legislature further finds that)) Failure of such systems could be
reduced by utilization of nonwater-carried sewage disposal systems, or
other alternative methods of effluent disposal, as a correctional
measure.
(3) Waste water volume diminution and disposal of most of the high
bacterial waste through composting or other alternative methods of
effluent disposal would result in restorative improvement or correction
of existing substandard systems.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.118.020 and 1994 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter, the terms defined)) The definitions in
this section ((shall have the meanings indicated)) apply throughout
this chapter unless the context clearly ((indicates)) requires
otherwise.
(1) "Nonwater-carried sewage disposal devices" means any device
that stores and treats nonwater-carried human urine and feces.
(2) "Alternative methods of effluent disposal" means systems
approved by the department of health, including at least, mound
systems, alternating drain fields, anaerobic filters,
evapotranspiration systems, and aerobic systems.
(3) "Failure" means: (a) Effluent has been discharged on the
surface of the ground prior to approved treatment; or (b) effluent has
percolated to the surface of the ground; or (c) effluent has
contaminated or threatens to contaminate a ground water supply.
(4) "Additive" means any commercial product intended to affect the
performance or aesthetics of an on-site sewage disposal system.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.
(6) "On-site sewage disposal system" means any system of piping,
treatment devices, or other facilities that convey, store, treat, or
dispose of sewage on the property where it originates or on nearby
property under the control of the user where the system is not
connected to a public sewer system. For purposes of this chapter, an
on-site sewage disposal system does not include indoor plumbing and
associated fixtures.
(7) "Chemical additive" means those additives containing acids,
bases, or other chemicals deemed unsafe by the department for use in an
on-site sewage disposal system.
(8) "Additive manufacturer" means any person who manufactures,
formulates, blends, packages, or repackages an additive product for
sale, use, or distribution within the state.
(9) "Board" means the state board of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All cities and towns with a population of thirty-one thousand
residents or greater, as forecasted by the office of financial
management as of the effective date of this section, not located within
a marine recovery area designated under RCW 70.118A.040, must, either
directly or by contract with a local health jurisdiction, consistent
with this section:
(a) Create and maintain an inventory of the households and
businesses within the boundaries of the city or town that do not
receive sanitary sewage services by January 1, 2009; and
(b) Institute a program for the inspection of all on-site sewage
disposal systems within the city's or town's jurisdiction by January 1,
2012.
(2) A city or town required to create and maintain an inventory
under this section may design the inventory in any manner that best
satisfies the needs of the community as long as the following minimum
criteria are satisfied:
(a) The maximum practicable effort has been made to identify all
households and businesses that do not receive sanitary sewage services;
(b) The inventory is updated no less than once every five years,
unless other state authority requires inspections more frequently; and
(c) The information included in the inventory must be summarized
and reported to the department. The report required by this subsection
must contain, at a minimum, the number and general location of
inventoried on-site sewage disposal systems.
(3)(a) A city or town required to institute a program for the
inspection of all on-site sewage disposal systems under this section
may design the inspection program in any manner that best satisfies the
needs of the community as long as the requirements of this section are
satisfied. Local decisions include whether the owners of the on-site
sewage disposal systems will be allowed to select and contract directly
with private inspectors, whether the local government will contract
with private inspectors at the owners' expense and merely file a report
with the local government, or whether the local governments will
inspect systems directly using public employees.
(b) An on-site sewage disposal systems inspection program must
satisfy the following minimum criteria:
(i) Each owner of an on-site sewage disposal system must have his
or her system inspected not less than once every five years, with the
initial inspection completed no later than two years after or two years
before the completion of the inventory required under subsection (1) of
this section;
(ii) Each inspection of an on-site sewage disposal system must
determine whether the system is in a state of failure and whether the
system is operating in a manner that satisfies, at a minimum,
applicable standards and requirements adopted by the board under RCW
43.20.050; and
(iii) The information gathered from the inspection program must be
summarized and reported to the department. The report required by this
subsection must contain information, at a minimum, regarding the
functionality or failure rates of the inspected on-site sewage disposal
systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The local on-site sewer inspection reimbursement account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
appropriations made to the account must be deposited in the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used by the department only in a
manner that is consistent with this section.
(2) The department may use moneys in the local on-site sewer
inspection reimbursement account to reimburse cities or towns for the
costs associated with the creation and maintenance of on-site sewage
disposal system inventories as required under section 3 of this act.
(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated to the
local on-site sewer inspection reimbursement account, the department
shall reimburse, upon application, cities and towns not less than
seventy-five percent of the costs incurred by the local jurisdiction in
satisfying the on-site sewage disposal system inventory requirements of
section 3 of this act. Actual reimbursement levels must be set by the
department to maximize the number of jurisdictions that receive a
reimbursement. If reimbursement applications are greater than
available funding, then the department shall develop a policy for
prioritization of reimbursements, including the establishment of
waiting lists for future bienniums.
(4) The department shall only provide reimbursement for reasonable
and auditable costs incurred by the applying local jurisdiction. Local
jurisdictions may contact the department prior to incurring expenses
for consultation as to what expenses are considered reasonable costs.
(5) The department may use up to five percent, as needed, of all
appropriations to the local on-site sewer inspection reimbursement
account to support implementation of this section and section 5 of this
act.
(6) A lack of available funding under this section does not excuse
a local jurisdiction from performing its duties as required under
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 15, 2009, the department shall submit to the
appropriate committees of the legislature a report summarizing the
information provided by cities and towns under section 3 of this act.
(2) The report required by this section must contain summarized
information regarding, at a minimum:
(a) The number and general location of inventoried on-site sewage
disposal systems;
(b) The functionality or failure rates of the state's on-site
sewage disposal systems;
(c) The number of jurisdictions in full compliance with section 3
of this act;
(d) The actual reimbursement requests received from local
jurisdictions under section 4 of this act; and
(e) Anticipated future reimbursement requests received from local
jurisdictions under section 4 of this act.
(3) The report required by this section must be updated no fewer
than three times, with each update reported to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by:
(a) January 15, 2011;
(b) January 15, 2013; and
(c) January 15, 2015.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW
to read as follows:
No permits may be issued for the installation of a new on-site
sewage disposal system within the boundaries of a city or town if that
city or town is not in compliance with section 3 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.05.072 and 1995 c 263 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The local health officer may grant a waiver from specific
requirements adopted by the state board of health for on-site sewage
systems if:
(((1))) (a) The on-site sewage system for which a waiver is
requested is for sewage flows under three thousand five hundred gallons
per day;
(((2))) (b) The waiver request is evaluated by the local health
officer on an individual, site-by-site basis;
(((3))) (c) The local health officer determines that the waiver is
consistent with the standards in, and the intent of, the state board of
health rules; ((and
(4))) (d) The jurisdiction in which the proposed on-site sewage
system is located is in compliance with section 3 of this act; and
(e) The local health officer submits quarterly reports to the
department regarding any waivers approved or denied.
(2) Based on review of the quarterly reports, if the department
finds that the waivers previously granted have not been consistent with
the standards in, and intent of, the state board of health rules, the
department shall provide technical assistance to the local health
officer to correct the inconsistency, and may notify the local and
state boards of health of the department's concerns.
(3) If upon further review of the quarterly reports, the department
finds that the inconsistency between the waivers granted and the state
board of health standards has not been corrected, the department may
suspend the authority of the local health officer to grant waivers
under this section until such inconsistencies have been corrected.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.118.030 and 1998 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Local boards of health shall identify failing septic tank
drainfield systems in the normal manner and will use reasonable effort
to determine new failures.
(2)(a) The local health officer, environmental health director, or
equivalent officer may apply for an administrative search warrant to a
court official authorized to issue a criminal search warrant. The
warrant may only be applied for after the local health officer or the
health officer's designee has requested inspection of the person's
property under ((the)) a specific administrative plan required in this
section, and the person has refused the health officer or the health
officer's designee access to the person's property.
(b) Timely notice must be given to any affected person that a
warrant is being requested and that the person may be present at any
court proceeding to consider the requested search warrant.
(c) The court official may issue the warrant upon probable cause.
A request for a search warrant must show (([that])) that the
inspection, examination, test, or sampling is in response to pollution
in commercial or recreational shellfish harvesting areas ((or)),
pollution in fresh water, or, until December 31, 2013, part of a
standard inspection program as required by section 3 of this act.
(d) If the warrant is requested because of pollution in a shellfish
harvesting area or fresh water, a specific administrative plan must be
developed expressly in response to the pollution. The local health
officer, environmental health director, or equivalent officer shall
submit the plan to the court as part of the justification for the
warrant, along with specific evidence showing that it is reasonable to
believe pollution is coming from the septic system on the property to
be accessed for inspection. The plan must include each of the
following elements:
(((a))) (i) The overall goal of the inspection;
(((b))) (ii) The location and identification by address of the
properties being authorized for inspection;
(((c))) (iii) Requirements for giving the person owning the
property and the person occupying the property if it is someone other
than the owner, notice of the plan, its provisions, and times of any
inspections;
(((d))) (iv) The survey procedures to be used in the inspection;
(((e))) (v) The criteria that would be used to define an on-site
sewage disposal system failure; and
(((f))) (vi) The follow-up actions that would be pursued once an
on-site sewage disposal system failure has been identified and
confirmed.
(((2))) (3) Discretionary judgment will be made in implementing
corrections by specifying nonwater-carried sewage disposal devices or
other alternative methods of treatment and effluent disposal as a
measure of ameliorating existing substandard conditions. Local
regulations shall be consistent with the intent and purposes stated in
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---