BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The boating activities account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only as authorized under
sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Grants, gifts, or other financial assistance received by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation from state and nonstate
sources for purposes of boating activities may be deposited into the
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The boating activities program is created in the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation.
(2) The interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall
distribute moneys appropriated from the boating activities account
created in section 1 of this act as follows, or as otherwise
appropriated by the legislature, after deduction for the committee's
expenses in administering the boating activities grant program and for
related studies:
(a) To the commission for boater safety, boater education, boating-related law enforcement activities, activities included in RCW
88.02.040, related administrative expenses, and boating-related
environmental programs, such as pumpout stations, to enhance clean
waters for boating;
(b) For grants to state agencies, counties, municipalities, federal
agencies, nonprofit organizations, and Indian tribes to improve boating
access to water and marine parks, enhance the boater experience, boater
safety, boater education, and boating-related law enforcement
activities, and to provide funds for boating-related environmental
programs, such as pumpout stations, to enhance clean waters for
boating; and
(c) If the amount available for distribution from the boating
activities account is equal to or less than two million five hundred
thousand dollars per fiscal year, then eighty percent of the amount
available must be distributed to the commission for the purposes of (a)
of this subsection and twenty percent for grants in (b) of this
subsection. Amounts available for distribution in excess of two
million five hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year shall be
distributed by the committee for purposes of (a) and (b) of this
subsection.
(3) The interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall
establish an application process for boating activities grants.
(4) Agencies receiving grants for capital purposes from the boating
activities account shall consider the possibility of contracting with
the commission, the department of natural resources, or other federal,
state, and local agencies to employ the youth development and
conservation corps or other youth crews in completing the project.
(5) To solicit input on the boating activities grant application
process, criteria for grant awards, and use of grant moneys, and to
determine the interests of the boating community, the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation shall solicit input from a boating
activities advisory committee. The interagency committee for outdoor
recreation may utilize a currently established boating issues committee
that has similar responsibility for input on recreational boating-related funding issues. Members of the boating activities advisory
committee are not eligible for compensation but may be reimbursed for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The interagency committee for outdoor recreation may adopt
rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2007, the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation shall complete an initial study of boater needs and make
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the
initial amount of funding that should be provided to the commission for
boating-related law enforcement purposes under section 2(2)(a) of this
act.
(2) The interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall
periodically update its study of boater needs as necessary and shall
make recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the legislature concerning funding allocations to state parks and other
grant applicants.

--- END ---