BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.60.160 and 2005 c 243 s 15 and 2005 c 153 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except for an election conducted under the instant runoff
voting method for the pilot project authorized by RCW 29A.53.020,
(([and] except Sundays and legal holidays,)) the county auditor, as
delegated by the county canvassing board, shall process absentee
ballots and canvass the votes cast at that primary or election on a
daily basis in counties with a population of seventy-five thousand or
more, or at least every third day for counties with a population of
less than seventy-five thousand, if the county auditor is in possession
of more than ((twenty-five)) five hundred ballots that have yet to be
canvassed. ((The county auditor, as delegated by the county canvassing
board, may use his or her discretion in determining when to process the
remaining absentee ballots and canvass the votes during the final four
days before the certification of election results in order to protect
the secrecy of any ballot. In counties where this process has not been
delegated to the county auditor, the county auditor shall convene the
county canvassing board to process absentee ballots and canvass the
votes cast at the primary or election as set forth in this section.
Except for an election conducted under the instant runoff voting
method for the pilot project authorized by RCW 29A.53.020, each
absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by the
county auditor two days or more before processing absentee ballots and
canvassing the votes as delegated by or processed by the county
canvassing board, that either was received by the county auditor before
the closing of the polls on the day of the primary or election for
which it was issued, or that bears a postmark on or before the primary
or election for which it was issued, must be processed at that time.
The tabulation of votes that results from that day's canvass must be
made available to the general public immediately upon completion of the
canvass.))
(2) Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are not counted for
purposes of this section.
(3) In order to protect the secrecy of a ballot, the county auditor
may use discretion to decide when to process absentee ballots and
canvass the votes.
(4) Tabulation results must be made available to the public
immediately upon completion of the canvass.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.60.160 and 2005 c 243 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Except Sundays and legal holidays,)) (1) The county auditor, as
delegated by the county canvassing board, shall process absentee
ballots and canvass the votes cast at that primary or election on a
daily basis in counties with a population of seventy-five thousand or
more, or at least every third day for counties with a population of
less than seventy-five thousand, if the county auditor is in possession
of more than ((twenty-five)) five hundred ballots that have yet to be
canvassed. ((The county auditor, as delegated by the county canvassing
board, may use his or her discretion in determining when to process the
remaining absentee ballots and canvass the votes during the final four
days before the certification of election results in order to protect
the secrecy of any ballot. In counties where this process has not been
delegated to the county auditor, the county auditor shall convene the
county canvassing board to process absentee ballots and canvass the
votes cast at the primary or election as set forth in this section.
Each absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by
the county auditor two days or more before processing absentee ballots
and canvassing the votes as delegated by or processed by the county
canvassing board, that either was received by the county auditor before
the closing of the polls on the day of the primary or election for
which it was issued, or that bears a postmark on or before the primary
or election for which it was issued, must be processed at that time.
The tabulation of votes that results from that day's canvass must be
made available to the general public immediately upon completion of the
canvass.))
(2) Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are not counted for
purposes of this section.
(3) In order to protect the secrecy of a ballot, the county auditor
may use discretion to decide when to process absentee ballots and
canvass the votes.
(4) Tabulation results must be made available to the public
immediately upon completion of the canvass.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.60.170 and 2003 c 111 s 1517 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The counting center in a county using voting systems is under
the direction of the county auditor and must be observed by one
representative from each major political party, if representatives have
been appointed by the respective major political parties and these
representatives are present while the counting center is operating.
The proceedings must be open to the public, but no persons except those
employed and authorized by the county auditor may touch any ballot or
ballot container or operate a vote tallying system.
(2) In counties in which ballots are not counted at the polling
place, the official political party observers, upon mutual agreement,
may request that a precinct be selected at random on receipt of the
ballots from the polling place and that a manual count be made of the
number of ballots and of the votes cast on any office or issue. The
ballots for that precinct must then be counted by the vote tallying
system, and this result will be compared to the results of the manual
count. This may be done as many as three times during the tabulation
of ballots on the day of the primary or election.
(3) In counties using poll-site ballot counting devices, the
political party observers, upon mutual agreement, may choose as many as
three precincts and request that a manual count be made of the number
of ballots and the votes cast on any office or issue. The results of
this count will be compared to the count of the precinct made by the
poll-site ballot counting device. These selections must be made no
later than thirty minutes after the close of the polls. The manual
count must be completed within forty-eight hours after the close of the
polls. The process must take place at a location designated by the
county auditor for that purpose. The political party observers must
receive timely notice of the time and location, and have the right to
be present. However, the process must proceed as scheduled if the
observers are unable to attend.
(4) In counties voting entirely by mail, a random check of the
ballot counting equipment may be conducted upon mutual agreement of the
political party observers or at the discretion of the county auditor.
The random check procedures must be adopted by the county canvassing
board prior to the processing of ballots. The random check process
shall involve a comparison of a manual count to the machine count and
may involve up to either three precincts or three batches depending on
the ballot counting procedures in place in the county. The random
check will be limited to one office or issue on the ballots in the
precincts or batches that are selected for the check. The selection of
the precincts or batches to be checked must be selected according to
procedures established by the county canvassing board and the check
must be completed no later than forty-eight hours after election day.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2013.

--- END ---