BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The amount of any monetary penalty prescribed by state law,
administrative rule, or court rule, whether civil or criminal in
nature, for traffic infractions on any state highway with at least
forty miles of high accident corridors as designated by the department
of transportation shall be doubled.
(2) Monetary penalties imposed under subsection (1) of this section
shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Sixty percent shall be deposited in the motor vehicle account
solely for safety improvements along state highways with at least forty
miles of high accident corridors;
(b) Thirty percent to the Washington traffic safety commission for
safety education regarding state highways with at least forty miles of
high accident corridors;
(c) Ten percent to county prosecutors of counties where the traffic
infractions occurred for additional court costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires two years after the
effective date of this act.

--- END ---