BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Although research about the conditions in
Puget Sound have been studied during the past several decades, the
legislature finds that there is no coordinated, focused, comprehensive
Puget Sound science program capable of setting research priorities for
Puget Sound science. The legislature finds that environmental problems
in Puget Sound are complex and research is needed to provide
information that can guide protective and restorative actions, and to
explore and understand the impacts of a changing environment. The
legislature also finds that there is no predictable funding process for
Puget Sound research projects, including the aquatic rehabilitation
zone one. The legislature declares that the state needs a process to
focus the scientific effort on the Puget Sound ecosystem and to
distribute research funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The action team or its successor agency shall:
(a) Identify gaps in science related to:
(i) The restoration of the aquatic rehabilitation zone one, created
in RCW 90.88.010;
(ii) Puget Sound environmental protection; and
(iii) Puget Sound environmental restoration;
(b) Formulate a research plan that narrows key science research
gaps identified in (a) of this subsection;
(c) Develop a competitive process for soliciting research on Puget
Sound and on the aquatic rehabilitation zone one;
(d) Solicit and strategically prioritize research programs and
projects in accordance with (b) and (c) of this subsection.
Prioritization shall be determined by criteria that result in the
greatest preservation or restoration progress;
(e) Select and fund the highest priority research programs and
projects identified under (d) of this subsection; and
(f) Develop and implement an appropriate peer review process to
review results from the research programs and projects selected and
funded under (e) of this subsection.
(2) The Puget Sound scientific research account is created in the
state treasury. All gifts, grants, federal moneys, or appropriations
made to the account must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for research programs and projects for the
purposes of subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The action team or its successor agency is subject to the open
public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

--- END ---