BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND DECLARATIONS. The legislature
finds that, although family and medical leave laws have assisted
individuals to balance the demands of the workplace with their family
responsibilities, more needs to be done to achieve the goals of family
care, children and family health, workforce stability, and economic
security. In particular, the legislature finds that many individuals
employed by employers with less than fifty employees do not have access
to family and medical leave laws, and those who do may not be in a
financial position to take family and medical leave that is unpaid, and
that employer-paid benefits, including family and medical leave and
disability benefits, meet only a relatively small part of this need.
The legislature declares it to be in the public interest to establish
a program that: (1) Allows parents to bond with a newborn or newly
placed child, and workers to care for seriously ill family members or
recover from their own serious health condition, regardless of the size
of their employer; (2) provides limited and additional income support
for a reasonable period while an individual is away from work on family
and medical leave; (3) reduces the impact on state income support
programs by increasing an individual's ability to provide caregiving
services for family members while maintaining an employment
relationship; and (4) establishes a wage replacement benefit to be
coordinated with current existing state and federal family and medical
leave laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Application year" means the twelve-month period beginning on
the first day of the calendar week in which an individual files an
application for family and medical leave insurance benefits and,
thereafter, the twelve-month period beginning with the first day of the
calendar week in which the individual next files an application for
family and medical leave insurance benefits after the expiration of the
individual's last preceding application year.
(2) "Average weekly wage" means the same as in RCW 50.04.355.
(3) "Calendar quarter" means the same as in RCW 50.04.050.
(4) "Child," "department," "director," "health care provider,"
"parent," "serious health condition," and "spouse" mean the same as in
RCW 49.78.020.
(5) "Domestic partner" means an unmarried person eighteen years of
age or older: (a) With whom the individual entered into a close
personal relationship when both parties were mentally competent and has
maintained a close personal relationship solely with that person for a
minimum of six continuous months; (b) with whom the individual shares
a regular and permanent residence; (c) with whom the individual has
agreed to be jointly responsible for basic living expenses incurred
during the domestic partnership; and (d) to whom the individual is not
related by blood as would bar marriage.
(6) "Employer" means: (a) The same as in RCW 50.04.080; and (b)
the state and its political subdivisions.
(7) "Employment" has the meaning provided in RCW 50.04.100.
(8) "Family and medical leave" means leave for a family member's
serious health condition, leave for the birth or placement of a child,
and leave for the employee's serious health condition as defined in RCW
49.78.020 and described in RCW 49.78.220.
(9) "Family and medical leave insurance benefits" means the
benefits payable under sections 6 and 7 of this act.
(10) "Family member" means a child, spouse or domestic partner, or
the parent of the individual.
(11) "Federal family and medical leave act" means the federal
family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107
Stat. 6).
(12) "Premium" or "premiums" means payments required by this
chapter to be made to the department for the family and medical leave
insurance account under section 20 of this act.
(13) "Qualifying year" means the first four of the last five
completed calendar quarters or the last four completed calendar
quarters immediately preceding the first day of the individual's
application year.
(14) "Regularly working" means the average number of hours per
workweek that an individual worked in the two quarters of the
individual's qualifying year in which total wages were highest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE INSURANCE PROGRAM.
(1) The department shall establish and administer a family and medical
leave insurance program and pay family and medical leave insurance
benefits as specified in this chapter.
(2) The department shall establish procedures and forms for filing
claims for benefits under this chapter. The department shall notify
the employer within five business days of a claim being filed under
section 4 of this act.
(3) The department may require that a claim for benefits under this
chapter be supported by a certification issued by the health care
provider providing health care to the individual or individual's family
member, as applicable.
(4) The department shall use information sharing and integration
technology to facilitate the disclosure of relevant information or
records by the employment security department, so long as an individual
consents to the disclosure as required under section 4(4) of this act.
(5) Information contained in the files and records pertaining to an
individual under this chapter are confidential and not open to public
inspection, other than to public employees in the performance of their
official duties. However, the individual or an authorized
representative of an individual may review the records or receive
specific information from the records on the presentation of the signed
authorization of the individual. An employer or the employer's duly
authorized representative may review the records of an individual
employed by the employer in connection with a pending claim. At the
department's discretion, other persons may review records when such
persons are rendering assistance to the department at any stage of the
proceedings on any matter pertaining to the administration of this
chapter.
(6) The department shall develop and implement an outreach program
to ensure that individuals who may be eligible to receive family and
medical leave insurance benefits under this chapter are made aware of
these benefits. Outreach information shall explain, in an easy to
understand format, eligibility requirements, the claims process, weekly
benefit amounts, maximum benefits payable, notice and medical
certification requirements, reinstatement and nondiscrimination rights,
confidentiality, and the relationship between employment protection,
leave from employment, and wage replacement benefits under this chapter
and other laws, collective bargaining agreements, and employer
policies. Outreach information shall be available in English and other
primary languages as defined in RCW 74.04.025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 ELIGIBILITY FOR BENEFITS. Beginning July 1,
2009, family and medical leave insurance benefits are payable to an
individual during a period in which the individual is unable to perform
his or her regular or customary work because he or she is on family and
medical leave if the individual:
(1) Files a claim for benefits in each week in which the individual
is on family and medical leave, and as required by rules adopted by the
director;
(2) Has been employed for at least six hundred eighty hours in
employment during the individual's qualifying year;
(3) Establishes an application year. An application year may not
be established if the qualifying year includes hours worked before
establishment of a previous application year;
(4) Consents to the disclosure of information or records deemed
private and confidential under chapter 50.13 RCW. Initial disclosure
of this information and these records by the employment security
department to the department is solely for purposes related to the
administration of this chapter. Further disclosure of this information
or these records is subject to sections 3(4) and 14(2)(b) of this act;
(5) Discloses whether or not he or she owes child support
obligations as defined in RCW 50.40.050;
(6) Documents that he or she has provided the employer from whom
family and medical leave is to be taken with written notice of the
individual's intention to take family and medical leave in the same
manner as an employee is required to provide notice in RCW 49.78.250;
and
(7) Authorizes the individual's health care provider or provides a
document authorizing the family member's health care provider, as
applicable, to disclose the individual's or family member's health care
information in the form of the certification of a serious health
condition. To be valid, the disclosure authorization must satisfy the
requirements set forth in RCW 70.02.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 DISQUALIFICATION FROM BENEFITS. An
individual is disqualified from family and medical leave insurance
benefits beginning with the first day of the calendar week, and
continuing for the next fifty-two consecutive weeks, in which the
individual:
(1) Willfully made a false statement or misrepresentation regarding
a material fact, or willfully failed to report a material fact, to
obtain benefits under this chapter; or
(2) With respect to family and medical leave, is suffering from a
serious health condition resulting from the individual's perpetration
of a gross misdemeanor or felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 DURATION OF BENEFITS. (1) The maximum
number of weeks during which family and medical leave insurance
benefits are payable in an application year is five weeks. However,
benefits are not payable during a waiting period consisting of the
first seven calendar days of family and medical leave taken in an
application year with respect to a particular type of family and
medical leave, whether the first seven calendar days of family and
medical leave are employer paid or unpaid.
(2)(a) The first payment of benefits must be made to an individual
within two weeks after the claim is filed or the family and medical
leave began, whichever is later, and subsequent payments must be made
semimonthly thereafter.
(b) The payment of benefits under this chapter shall not be
considered a binding determination of the obligations of the department
under this chapter. The acceptance of compensation by the individual
shall likewise not be considered a binding determination of his or her
rights under this chapter. Whenever any payment of benefits under this
chapter has been made and timely appeal therefrom has been made where
the final decision is that the payment was improper, the individual
shall repay it and recoupment may be made from any future payment due
to the individual on any claim under this chapter. The director may
exercise his or her discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the
amount of any such payments where the recovery would be against equity
and good conscience.
(c) If an individual dies before he or she receives a payment of
benefits, the payment shall be made to the surviving spouse or domestic
partner, or the child or children if there is no surviving spouse or
domestic partner. If there is no surviving spouse or domestic partner,
and no child or children, the payment shall be made by the department
and distributed consistent with the terms of the decedent's will or, if
the decedent dies intestate, consistent with the terms of RCW
11.04.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 AMOUNT OF BENEFITS. The amount of family
and medical leave insurance benefits shall be determined as follows:
(1) For weeks of family and medical leave beginning before July 1,
2010, the weekly benefit shall be two hundred fifty dollars per week
for an individual who at the time of beginning family and medical leave
was regularly working thirty-five hours or more per week. By June 30,
2010, and by each subsequent June 30th, the department shall calculate
to the nearest dollar an adjusted maximum weekly benefit to account for
inflation using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and
clerical workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve completed
calendar months before each June 30th as calculated by the United
States department of labor. The adjusted maximum weekly benefit takes
effect for weeks of family and medical leave beginning after the
relevant June 30th.
(2) If an individual who at the time of beginning family and
medical leave was regularly working thirty-five hours or more per week
is on family and medical leave for less than thirty-five hours but at
least eight hours in a week, the individual's weekly benefit shall be
.025 times the maximum weekly benefit times the number of hours of
family and medical leave taken in the week. Benefits are not payable
for less than eight hours of family and medical leave taken in a week.
(3) For an individual who at the time of beginning family and
medical leave was regularly working less than thirty-five hours per
week, the department shall calculate a prorated schedule for a weekly
benefit amount and a minimum number of hours of family and medical
leave that must be taken in a week for benefits to be payable, with the
prorated schedule based on the amounts and the calculations specified
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) If an individual discloses that he or she owes child support
obligations under section 4 of this act and the department determines
that the individual is eligible for benefits, the department shall
notify the applicable state or local child support enforcement agency
and deduct and withhold an amount from benefits in a manner consistent
with RCW 50.40.050.
(5) If the internal revenue service determines that family and
medical leave insurance benefits under this chapter are subject to
federal income tax and an individual elects to have federal income tax
deducted and withheld from benefits, the department shall deduct and
withhold the amount specified in the federal internal revenue code in
a manner consistent with section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 FEDERAL INCOME TAX. (1) If the internal
revenue service determines that family and medical leave insurance
benefits under this chapter are subject to federal income tax, the
department must advise an individual filing a new claim for family and
medical leave insurance benefits, at the time of filing such claim,
that:
(a) The internal revenue service has determined that benefits are
subject to federal income tax;
(b) Requirements exist pertaining to estimated tax payments;
(c) The individual may elect to have federal income tax deducted
and withheld from the individual's payment of benefits at the amount
specified in the federal internal revenue code; and
(d) The individual is permitted to change a previously elected
withholding status.
(2) Amounts deducted and withheld from benefits must remain in the
family and medical leave insurance account until transferred to the
federal taxing authority as a payment of income tax.
(3) The director shall follow all procedures specified by the
federal internal revenue service pertaining to the deducting and
withholding of income tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 ADJUSTMENT TO BENEFITS. If family and
medical leave insurance benefits are paid erroneously or as a result of
willful misrepresentation, or if a claim for family and medical leave
benefits is rejected after benefits are paid, RCW 51.32.240 shall
apply, except that appeals are governed by section 15 of this act,
penalties are paid into the family and medical leave insurance account,
and the department shall seek repayment of benefits from the recipient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 LEAVE AND EMPLOYMENT PROTECTION. (1)
During a period in which an individual receives family and medical
leave insurance benefits or earns waiting period credits under this
chapter, the individual is entitled to family and medical leave and, at
the established ending date of leave, to be restored to a position of
employment with the employer from whom leave was taken.
(2) Regardless of the number of employees employed by the employer:
(a) The individual entitled to leave under this section shall be
restored to a position of employment in the same manner as an employee
entitled to leave under chapter 49.78 RCW is restored to a position of
employment, as specified in RCW 49.78.280.
(b) The employer may deny restoration to any salaried employee who
is among the highest paid ten percent of the employees employed by the
employer within seventy-five miles of the facility at which the
employee is employed, in the same circumstances and the same manner
specified in RCW 49.78.280.
(3) This section applies only to an individual who has been
employed for at least twelve months by the employer from whom family
and medical leave is taken, and for at least one thousand two hundred
fifty hours of service with the employer during the previous twelve-month period.
(4) This section shall be enforced as provided in chapter 49.78
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 EMPLOYMENT BY SAME EMPLOYER. If spouses or
domestic partners entitled to leave under this chapter are employed by
the same employer, the maximum number of weeks of leave to which both
may be entitled may be limited to five workweeks during any twelve-month period, if such leave is taken: (1) For the birth or placement
of a child; or (2) for a parent's serious health condition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 ELECTIVE COVERAGE. (1) An employer of
individuals not covered by this chapter or a self-employed person,
including a sole proprietor, partner, or joint venturer, may elect
coverage under this chapter for all individuals in its employ for an
initial period of not less than three years or a subsequent period of
not less than one year immediately following another period of
coverage. The employer or self-employed person must file a notice of
election in writing with the director, as required by the department.
The election becomes effective on the date of filing the notice.
(2) An employer or self-employed person who has elected coverage
may withdraw from coverage within thirty days after the end of the
three-year period of coverage, or at such other times as the director
may prescribe by rule, by filing written notice with the director, such
withdrawal to take effect not sooner than thirty days after filing the
notice. Within five days of filing written notice of the withdrawal
with the director, an employer must provide written notice of the
withdrawal to all individuals in the employer's employ.
(3) The department may cancel elective coverage if the employer or
self-employed person fails to make required payments or reports. The
department may collect due and unpaid premiums and may levy an
additional premium for the remainder of the period of coverage. The
cancellation shall be effective no later than thirty days from the date
of the notice in writing advising the employer or self-employed person
of the cancellation. Within five days of receiving written notice of
the cancellation from the director, an employer must provide written
notice of the cancellation to all individuals in the employer's employ.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 AMOUNT OF PREMIUMS. (1) Beginning January
1, 2009, for each individual, each employer shall pay a premium of two
cents per hour worked, up to a maximum of forty hours per week, to the
department, and may retain from the earnings of each individual an
amount equal to the premium assessed for the individual. None of the
amount assessed for the family and medical leave insurance account,
however, may be retained from the earnings of individuals covered under
RCW 51.16.210.
(2) Payments shall be made in the manner and at such intervals as
the department directs for deposit in the family and medical leave
insurance account. In the payment of premiums, a fractional part of a
cent shall be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more,
in which case it shall be increased to one cent.
(3) The director shall adjust the amount of the premium from time
to time to ensure that the amount is the lowest rate necessary to pay
family and medical leave insurance benefits and administrative costs,
and maintain actuarial solvency in accordance with recognized insurance
principles, of the family and medical leave insurance program on a
current basis, and to repay loaned funds from the supplemental pension
fund, if any, as required in section 23 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 REPORTING AND RECORDKEEPING. (1) In the
form and at the times specified by the director, an employer shall make
reports, furnish information, and remit premiums as required by section
13 of this act to the department. If the employer is a temporary help
company that provides employees on a temporary basis to its customers,
the temporary help company is considered the employer for purposes of
this section. However, if the temporary help company fails to remit
the required premiums, the customer to whom the employees were provided
is liable for paying the premiums.
(2)(a) An employer must keep at his or her place of business a
record of employment from which the information needed by the
department for purposes of this chapter may be obtained. This record
shall at all times be open to the inspection of the director or
department employees designated by the director.
(b) Information obtained from employer records under this chapter
is confidential and not open to public inspection, other than to public
employees in the performance of their official duties. However, an
interested party shall be supplied with information from employer
records to the extent necessary for the proper presentation of the case
in question. An employer may authorize inspection of its records by
written consent.
(3) The requirements relating to the assessment and collection of
family and medical leave insurance premiums are the same as the
requirements relating to the assessment and collection of industrial
insurance premiums under Title 51 RCW, including but not limited to
penalties, interest, and department lien rights and collection
remedies. These requirements apply to:
(a) An employer that fails under this chapter to make the required
reports, or fails to remit the full amount of the premiums when due;
(b) An employer that willfully makes a false statement or
misrepresentation regarding a material fact, or willfully fails to
report a material fact, to avoid making the required reports or
remitting the full amount of the premiums when due under this chapter;
(c) A public entity that engages in work or lets a contract for
work, in the manner specified in RCW 51.12.050;
(d) A person, firm, or corporation who lets a contract for work, in
the manner specified in RCW 51.12.070;
(e) A successor, as defined in RCW 51.08.177, in the manner
specified in RCW 51.16.200; and
(f) An officer, member, manager, or other person having control or
supervision of payment and/or reporting of family and medical leave
insurance, or who is charged with the responsibility for the filing of
returns, in the manner specified in RCW 51.48.055.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, appeals are
governed by section 15 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 APPEALS. (1) A person aggrieved by a
decision of the department under this chapter must file a notice of
appeal with the director, by mail or personally, within thirty days
after the date on which a copy of the department's decision was
communicated to the person. Upon receipt of the notice of appeal, the
director shall request the assignment of an administrative law judge in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW to conduct a hearing and issue a
proposed decision and order. The hearing shall be conducted in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The administrative law judge's proposed decision and order
shall be final and not subject to further appeal unless, within thirty
days after the decision is communicated to the interested parties, a
party petitions for review by the director. If the director's review
is timely requested, the director may order additional evidence by the
administrative law judge. On the basis of the evidence before the
administrative law judge and such additional evidence as the director
may order to be taken, the director shall render a decision affirming,
modifying, or setting aside the administrative law judge's decision.
The director's decision becomes final and not subject to further appeal
unless, within thirty days after the decision is communicated to the
interested parties, a party files a petition for judicial review as
provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. The director is a party to any judicial
action involving the director's decision and shall be represented in
the action by the attorney general.
(3) If, upon administrative or judicial review, the final decision
of the department is reversed or modified, the administrative law judge
or the court in its discretion may award reasonable attorneys' fees and
costs to the prevailing party. Attorneys' fees and costs owed by the
department, if any, are payable from the family and medical leave
insurance account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 PROHIBITED ACTS. An employer, temporary
help company, employment agency, employee organization, or other person
may not discharge, expel, or otherwise discriminate against a person
because he or she has filed or communicated to the employer an intent
to file a claim, a complaint, or an appeal, or has testified or is
about to testify or has assisted in any proceeding, under this chapter,
at any time, including during the waiting period described in section
6 of this act and the period in which the person receives family and
medical leave insurance benefits under this chapter. This section
shall be enforced as provided in RCW 51.48.025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 COORDINATION WITH OTHER LAWS, AGREEMENTS,
AND POLICIES. (1) Employment protection under other laws. If an
individual is entitled to employment protection under this chapter and
under the federal family and medical leave act, chapter 49.78 RCW, or
other applicable federal, state, or local law, the individual is
entitled to employment protection under the other applicable law most
favorable to the individual.
(2) Leave from employment under other laws. Except as provided in
this subsection, if an individual is entitled to family and medical
leave under this chapter and under the federal family and medical leave
act, chapter 49.78 RCW, or other applicable federal, state, or local
law, the employer may require that leave under this chapter be taken
concurrently with leave under other applicable laws. The employer must
give individuals in its employ written notice of this requirement. An
individual may not increase the duration of his or her leave from
employment by tacking on leave under this chapter to leave under other
applicable laws. Leave from employment under this chapter is in
addition to leave from employment during which benefits are paid or are
payable under Title 51 RCW or other applicable federal or state
industrial insurance laws.
(3) Wage replacement benefits under other laws. In any week in
which an individual is earning waiting period credits or receiving
benefits under chapter 7.68 RCW, Title 50 RCW, or Title 51 RCW, or
other applicable federal or state crime victims' compensation,
unemployment compensation, industrial insurance, or disability
insurance laws, the individual is disqualified from receiving family
leave insurance benefits under this chapter.
(4) Collective bargaining agreements and employer policies. (a)
This chapter does not diminish an employer's obligation to comply with
a collective bargaining agreement or employer policy, as applicable,
that provides greater employment protection, leave from employment, or
wage replacement benefits than under this chapter.
(b) An individual's rights to employment protection, leave from
employment, and wage replacement benefits under this chapter may not be
diminished by a collective bargaining agreement entered into or renewed
or an employer policy adopted or retained after the effective date of
this section. Any agreement by an individual to waive his or her
rights under this chapter is void as against public policy.
(c) If an employer provides wage replacement benefits to an
individual while on family and medical leave through disability
insurance or any other means, the individual may elect whether first to
receive such benefits or receive family and medical leave insurance
benefits under this chapter. An individual may not be required to
receive the individual's wage replacement benefits, if any, before
receiving family and medical leave insurance benefits under this
chapter. In no case shall the individual's weekly benefit exceed the
individual's average weekly wage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 NO CONTINUING ENTITLEMENT OR CONTRACTUAL
RIGHT. This chapter does not create a continuing entitlement or
contractual right. The legislature reserves the right to amend or
repeal all or part of this chapter at any time, and a benefit or other
right granted under this chapter exists subject to the legislature's
power to amend or repeal this chapter. There is no vested private
right of any kind against such amendment or repeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 RULES. The director may adopt rules as
necessary to implement this chapter. In adopting rules, the director
shall maintain consistency with the rules adopted to implement the
federal family and medical leave act, and chapter 49.78 RCW, to the
extent such rules are not in conflict with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 ACCOUNT. The family and medical leave
insurance account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts from the premium imposed under section 13 of this act or
the penalties imposed under section 14 of this act must be deposited in
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purposes of the family and medical leave insurance program. Only the
director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW. An appropriation is required for administrative
expenses, but not for benefit payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 INVESTMENT OF FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE
INSURANCE ACCOUNT. Whenever, in the judgment of the state investment
board, there shall be in the family and medical leave insurance account
funds in excess of that amount deemed by the state investment board to
be sufficient to meet the current expenditures properly payable
therefrom, the state investment board shall have full power to invest,
reinvest, manage, contract, or sell or exchange investments acquired
with such excess funds in the manner prescribed by RCW 43.84.150, and
not otherwise.

Sec. 22 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2006 c 311 s 21 and 2006 c 120 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the family and medical leave insurance account, the fruit and vegetable
inspection account, the future teachers conditional scholarship
account, the game farm alternative account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the produce railcar pool account, the
regional transportation investment district account, the rural
rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the
youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the
sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's trust fund, the
Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund
account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund
account, the individual development account program account, the
Washington horse racing commission operating account (earnings from the
Washington horse racing commission operating account must be credited
to the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account),
the life sciences discovery fund, and the reading achievement account.
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 LOANS. If necessary to ensure that money
is available in the family and medical leave insurance account for the
initial administration of the family and medical leave insurance
program and the payment of benefits under this chapter, the director of
labor and industries may make one loan of funds from the supplemental
pension fund to the family and medical leave insurance account. These
loaned funds may be expended solely for the purposes of administering
the program and paying benefits under this chapter. The director shall
repay the supplemental pension fund, plus its proportionate share of
earnings from investment of moneys in the supplemental pension fund
during the loan period, from the family and medical leave insurance
account within twelve months of the date of the loan. This section
expires thirteen months after the date of the loan. The director shall
notify the office of the code reviser, in writing, of the date of the
loan.

Sec. 24 RCW 51.44.033 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 224 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
There shall be, in the office of the state treasurer, a fund to be
known and designated as the "supplemental pension fund". The director
shall be the administrator thereof. ((Said)) The fund shall be used
for the sole purposes of making the additional payments therefrom
prescribed in this title and the loans therefrom authorized in section
23 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 REPORTS TO THE LEGISLATURE. Beginning
September 1, 2010, the department shall report to the legislature by
September 1st of each year on projected and actual program
participation, premium rates, fund balances, and outreach efforts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are
not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 21 and 25
through 27 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

--- END ---