BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, although much
public debate is occurring regarding student performance on the high
school Washington assessment of student learning in mathematics,
student performance on the assessment in science should be of equal or
greater concern. In 2006, only thirty-five percent of tenth grade
students met the state standard on the science assessment. The
improvement trend in science scores since 2002 has been minimal.
Therefore the legislature intends to initiate revisions to the science
assessment while delaying the graduation requirement in science so that
there is adequate time to realign curriculum, instruction, and
assessment in science before students are required to meet the standard
on the Washington assessment of student learning in science for high
school graduation.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2006 c 115 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045, acquisition of the certificate is required for graduation
from a public high school but is not the only requirement for
graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once
objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection
(10) of this section, a student may use the objective alternative
assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully meets the
state standards for that content area if the student has retaken the
Washington assessment of student learning at least once. If the
student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(4) Beginning with the graduating class of ((2010)) 2015, a student
must meet the state standards in science in addition to the other
content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the
Washington assessment of student learning or the objective alternative
assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) ((Beginning in 2006,)) School districts must make available to
students the following options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) ((Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall pilot
opportunities for retaking the high school assessment beginning in the
2004-05 school year. Beginning no later than September 2006,))
Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year shall be
available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process, for students to
demonstrate achievement of the state academic standards. The objective
alternative assessments shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning and be objective in its determination of
student achievement of the state standards. Before any objective
alternative assessments in addition to those authorized in RCW
28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a student to
demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content
area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally
approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(b) A student's score on the mathematics portion of the preliminary
scholastic assessment test (PSAT), the scholastic assessment test
(SAT), or the American college test (ACT) may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the mathematics standards for the
certificate of academic achievement. The state board of education
shall identify the scores students must achieve on the mathematics
portion of the PSAT, SAT, or ACT to meet or exceed the state standard
for mathematics. The state board of education shall identify the first
scores by December 1, 2006, and thereafter may increase but not
decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state
standard for mathematics.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for students as provided in this subsection (12).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year. The plan shall include the courses,
competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the student to meet
state academic standards and stay on track for graduation. ((This
requirement shall be phased in as follows:
(i) Beginning no later than the 2004-05 school year ninth grade
students as described in this subsection (12)(a) shall have a plan.
(ii) Beginning no later than the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter eighth grade students as described in this subsection
(12)(a) shall have a plan.
(iii))) (i) The parent or guardian shall be notified, preferably
through a parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was unsuccessful, strategies to help them improve their student's
skills, and the content of the student's plan.
(((iv))) (ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported
to the student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments
to the plan made as necessary.
(b) ((Beginning with the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter,)) All fifth grade students who were not successful in one
or more of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment
of student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of a student described in this
subsection (12)(b) shall be notified, preferably through a parent
conference, of the student's results on the Washington assessment of
student learning, actions the school intends to take to improve the
student's skills in any content area in which the student was
unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them improve their
student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2005 c 497 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge
and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do
based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student
assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and
requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state
board of education.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four
and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential
academic learning requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the Washington
assessment of student learning and used for state or federal
accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and
identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an
emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content
expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content
expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of
expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven
working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content
expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing
the Washington assessment of student learning.
(3)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to
develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the
content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in
the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if
each student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements
identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall
administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system
shall include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
(b) As of the effective date of this section, the superintendent of
public instruction, in consultation with the state board of education,
shall initiate a transition of the Washington assessment of student
learning in science from a single comprehensive assessment to a limited
series of end-of-course assessments based on the major science content
areas addressed in the essential academic learning requirements. The
end-of-course assessments shall be able to be administered online. The
legislature's intent is that students shall receive instruction through
credited high school courses in particular science content areas and
have their knowledge and skills in those content areas assessed after
they complete the courses. For the purpose of the end-of-course
assessments, a course may be less than one year or one credit in
length, depending on the content expected to be covered in the course.
The transition under this subsection shall follow a timeline that
allows for development and field testing of the end-of-course
assessments, realignment of the essential academic learning
requirements and grade level expectations in science to the extent
necessary, development and provision of curriculum guides and
professional development for science teachers, revision of the state
assessment plan for purposes of Public Law 107-110, the no child left
behind act of 2001, and implementation of the end-of-course assessments
as a valid and reliable method of assessing whether students meet state
standards in science for purposes of high school graduation as required
under RCW 28A.655.061.
(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the
essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments,
then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5)(((a))) The assessment system shall be designed so that the
results under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to
evaluate instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate
educational support for students who have not mastered the essential
academic learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the
student's educational development.
(((b) Assessments measuring the essential academic learning
requirements in the content area of science shall be available for
mandatory use in middle schools and high schools by the 2003-04 school
year and for mandatory use in elementary schools by the 2004-05 school
year unless the legislature takes action to delay or prevent
implementation of the assessment.))
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall
be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and
easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall report to the
education committees of the legislature by January 15, 2008, and each
year thereafter until January 15, 2013, on the timelines, major
milestones, and progress of the transition of the high school
Washington assessment of student learning in science to end-of-course
assessments as required by RCW 28A.655.070.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2013.

--- END ---