BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The state community and technical colleges offer quality, cost-effective instructional programs to the citizens of our state;
(2) An experienced, educated faculty is essential to the quality of
community and technical colleges;
(3) The colleges benefit from a stable faculty work force with
little turnover, which is best ensured by equitable compensation
practices that encourage both recruitment and retention of high quality
faculty;
(4) In order to continue to develop and grow in their profession,
college faculty need salaries commensurate with their education and
training;
(5) In order to retain quality faculty, the colleges need to
compensate experienced faculty for their knowledge and their skills;
and
(6) Good business practice and faculty morale is best served by the
principle of equal pay for equal work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each community and technical college shall have only one salary
schedule for all faculty.
(2) Each community and technical college shall have only one
increment or step increase schedule for all faculty.
(3) Upon hiring, faculty must be placed on the appropriate step in
the salary schedule, based upon degree, experience, and other pertinent
factors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon hiring, part-time faculty must be placed on the
appropriate step in the salary schedule, based upon degree, experience,
and other pertinent factors, comparable to full-time faculty with
comparable qualifications and experience.
(2) Part-time faculty must be paid on a pro rata basis, based upon
the percentage of a full-time faculty teaching load. For example,
part-time faculty who work fifty percent of a full-time teaching load
must be paid fifty percent of the full-time salary.
(3) Part-time faculty must move up on the increment salary schedule
on a pro rata basis, based upon the percentage of a full-time faculty
teaching load. For example, part-time faculty who work fifty percent
of a full-time faculty teaching load must move up fifty percent of the
regular annual step increment.
(4) Part-time faculty will be allowed to teach up to a full-time
load in fall, winter, and spring quarters at each campus.
(5) Part-time faculty who teach at more than one institution of
higher education will have all of their experience counted at each
institution. A part-time faculty member who teaches fifty percent at
one community college, and fifty percent at another community college,
must move up one annual salary increment at each college.
(6) Part-time faculty may be assigned nonteaching duties by their
hiring department on a pro rata basis, based upon the percentage of a
full-time teaching load. For example, if full-time faculty work nine
hours a week in nonteaching duties, a part-time faculty who teaches a
fifty percent load may be asked to work four and one-half hours a week
in nonteaching assignments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Each community and technical college
must implement sections 2 and 3 of this act by July 1, 2007.
(2) The legislature intends to provide the necessary funds to the
community and technical colleges for the implementation of sections 2
and 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---