BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Develop and maintain a current list of veteran-owned
businesses; and
(b) Make the list available on the department's public web site.
(2) In order to qualify as a veteran-owned business, the business
must be at least fifty-one percent owned and controlled by:
(a) A veteran as defined in RCW 41.04.007; or
(b) An active or reserve member in any branch of the armed forces
of the United States, including the national guard, coast guard, and
armed forces reserves.
(3) The department shall create a logo for the purpose of
identifying veteran-owned businesses to the public. The department
shall put the logo on an adhesive sticker or decal suitable for display
in a business window and distribute the stickers or decals to veteran-owned businesses listed with the department.
(4) Businesses may submit an application on a form prescribed by
the department for inclusion on the list.
(5) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.

--- END ---