BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.250 and 2006 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it shall
be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each
professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. The
secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all
application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees,
permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing
or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered
by the department. In fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the
fees for each program at a sufficient level to defray the costs of
administering that program and the cost of regulating licensed
volunteer medical workers in accordance with RCW 18.130.360, except as
provided in RCW 18.79.202 until June 30, 2013. All such fees shall be
fixed by rule adopted by the secretary in accordance with the
provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) For all credentials issued after January 1, 2008, in addition
to the credentialing fee, the secretary shall impose an annual
surcharge of one dollar and fifty cents on all credentialed health
professionals operating under the health professions account created
under RCW 43.70.320. The surcharge shall be placed in the health
professions account and used to reduce the fee when the annual base
renewal fee for any credentialed health profession exceeds five hundred
dollars per year to conduct core credentialing and disciplinary
activities. Annual base renewal fees do not include special surcharges
that may also be collected at the time of the credential renewal. This
provision does not apply to regulated business entities whose funds
reside with the health professions account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of health shall review the
effectiveness of the equity surcharge established in RCW 43.70.250 with
respect to eliminating inequities in the level of credentialing fees
paid by health care providers regulated by the department of health.
The review shall specifically consider the effect of the surcharge in
reducing credentialing fees for professions with high fees and
increasing the number of health care providers in those professions.
The review shall provide any recommendations that would increase
administrative efficiency and provide greater equity in credentialing
fee amounts. The department of health shall submit its report to the
legislature by November 15, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---