BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the professional
school counselor is a certificated educator with unique qualifications
and skills to address all students' academic, personal, social, and
career development needs. School counselors serve a vital role in
maximizing student achievement, supporting a safe learning environment,
and addressing the needs of all students through prevention and
intervention programs that are part of a comprehensive school
counseling program. The legislature further finds that current state
statutes fail to mention anything about school counselors. Therefore,
the legislature intends to codify into law the importance and the role
of school counselors in public schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
A school counselor is a professional educator who holds a valid
school counselor certification as defined by the professional educator
standards board. The purpose and role of the school counselor is to
plan, organize, and deliver a comprehensive school guidance and
counseling program that personalizes education and supports, promotes,
and enhances the academic, personal, social, and career development of
all students, based on the national standards for school counseling
programs of the American school counselor association.

--- END ---