BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.06.152 and 2002 c 354 s 241 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall adopt only those job classification
revisions, class studies, and salary adjustments under RCW 41.06.150(4)
that:
(a) As defined by the director, are due to documented recruitment
((and)) or retention difficulties, salary compression or inversion,
((increased)) classification plan maintenance, higher level duties and
responsibilities, or inequities((. For these purposes, inequities are
defined as similar work assigned to different job classes with a salary
disparity greater than 7.5 percent)); and
(b) Are such that the office of financial management has reviewed
the affected agency's fiscal impact statement and has concurred that
the affected agency can absorb the biennialized cost of the
reclassification, class study, or salary adjustment within the agency's
current authorized level of funding for the current fiscal biennium and
subsequent fiscal biennia.
(2) ((In addition to reclassifications, class studies, and salary
adjustments under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the board may
approve other reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments
that meet the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section and
have been approved under the procedures established under this
subsection.
Before the department of personnel's biennial budget request is due
to the office of financial management, the board shall prioritize
requests for reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments
for the next fiscal biennium. The board shall prioritize according to
such criteria as are developed by the board consistent with RCW
41.06.150(4)(a). The board shall submit the prioritized list to the
governor's office and the fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and senate at the same time the department of
personnel's biennial budget request is submitted. The office of
financial management shall review the biennial cost of each proposed
salary adjustment on the board's prioritized list.
In the biennial appropriations acts, the legislature may establish
a level of funding, from the state general fund and other accounts, to
be applied by the board to the prioritized list. Upon enactment of the
appropriations act, the board may approve reclassifications, class
studies, and salary adjustments only to the extent that the total cost
does not exceed the level of funding established in the appropriations
acts and the board's actions are consistent with the priorities
established in the list. The legislature may also specify or otherwise
limit in the appropriations act the implementation dates for actions
approved by the board under this section.
(3) When the board develops its priority list in the 1999-2001
biennium, for increases proposed for funding in the 2001-2003 biennium,
the board shall give top priority to proposed increases to address
documented recruitment and retention increases, and shall give lowest
priority to proposed increases to recognize increased duties and
responsibilities. When the board submits its prioritized list for the
2001-2003 biennium, the board shall also provide: A comparison of any
differences between the salary increases recommended by the department
of personnel staff and those adopted by the board; a review of any
salary compression, inversion, or inequities that would result from
implementing a recommended increase; and a complete description of the
information relied upon by the board in adopting its proposals and
priorities.
(4))) This section does not apply to the higher education hospital
special pay plan or to any adjustments to the classification plan under
RCW 41.06.150(4) that are due to emergent conditions. Emergent
conditions are defined as emergency conditions requiring the
establishment of positions necessary for the preservation of the public
health, safety, or general welfare.

--- END ---