BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.06.070 and 2002 c 354 s 209 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) The members of the legislature or to any employee of, or
position in, the legislative branch of the state government including
members, officers, and employees of the legislative council, joint
legislative audit and review committee, statute law committee, and any
interim committee of the legislature;
(b) The justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of
appeals, judges of the superior courts or of the inferior courts, or to
any employee of, or position in the judicial branch of state
government;
(c) Officers, academic personnel, and employees of technical
colleges;
(d) The officers of the Washington state patrol;
(e) Elective officers of the state;
(f) The chief executive officer of each agency;
(g) In the departments of employment security and social and health
services, the director and the director's confidential secretary; in
all other departments, the executive head of which is an individual
appointed by the governor, the director, his or her confidential
secretary, and his or her statutory assistant directors;
(h) In the case of a multimember board, commission, or committee,
whether the members thereof are elected, appointed by the governor or
other authority, serve ex officio, or are otherwise chosen:
(i) All members of such boards, commissions, or committees;
(ii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on
a part-time basis and there is a statutory executive officer: The
secretary of the board, commission, or committee; the chief executive
officer of the board, commission, or committee; and the confidential
secretary of the chief executive officer of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve
on a full-time basis: The chief executive officer or administrative
officer as designated by the board, commission, or committee; and a
confidential secretary to the chair of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iv) If all members of the board, commission, or committee serve ex
officio: The chief executive officer; and the confidential secretary
of such chief executive officer;
(i) The confidential secretaries and administrative assistants in
the immediate offices of the elective officers of the state;
(j) Assistant attorneys general;
(k) Commissioned and enlisted personnel in the military service of
the state;
(l) Inmate, student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as defined by the ((Washington personnel
resources board)) director;
(m) The public printer or to any employees of or positions in the
state printing plant;
(n) Officers and employees of the Washington state fruit
commission;
(o) Officers and employees of the Washington ((state)) apple
((advertising)) commission;
(p) Officers and employees of the Washington state dairy products
commission;
(q) Officers and employees of the Washington tree fruit research
commission;
(r) Officers and employees of the Washington state beef commission;
(s) Officers and employees of any commission formed under chapter
15.66 RCW;
(t) Officers and employees of agricultural commissions formed under
chapter 15.65 RCW;
(u) Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed
under chapter 67.40 RCW;
(v) Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor
relations in all state agencies employing such executive assistants
including but not limited to all departments, offices, commissions,
committees, boards, or other bodies subject to the provisions of this
chapter and this subsection shall prevail over any provision of law
inconsistent herewith unless specific exception is made in such law;
(w) In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy agency
heads, assistant directors or division directors, and not more than
three principal policy assistants who report directly to the agency
head or deputy agency heads;
(x) All employees of the marine employees' commission;
(y) Staff employed by the department of community, trade, and
economic development to administer energy policy functions and manage
energy site evaluation council activities under RCW 43.21F.045(2)(m);
(z) Staff employed by Washington State University to administer
energy education, applied research, and technology transfer programs
under RCW 43.21F.045 as provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).
(2) The following classifications, positions, and employees of
institutions of higher education and related boards are hereby exempted
from coverage of this chapter:
(a) Members of the governing board of each institution of higher
education and related boards, all presidents, vice-presidents, and
their confidential secretaries, administrative, and personal
assistants; deans, directors, and chairs; academic personnel; and
executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions employed
by institutions of higher education; principal assistants to executive
heads of major administrative or academic divisions; other managerial
or professional employees in an institution or related board having
substantial responsibility for directing or controlling program
operations and accountable for allocation of resources and program
results, or for the formulation of institutional policy, or for
carrying out personnel administration or labor relations functions,
legislative relations, public information, development, senior computer
systems and network programming, or internal audits and investigations;
and any employee of a community college district whose place of work is
one which is physically located outside the state of Washington and who
is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned to an educational
program operating outside of the state of Washington;
(b) The governing board of each institution, and related boards,
may also exempt from this chapter classifications involving research
activities, counseling of students, extension or continuing education
activities, graphic arts or publications activities requiring
prescribed academic preparation or special training as determined by
the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee engaged in office,
clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be exempted by
the board under this provision;
(c) Printing craft employees in the department of printing at the
University of Washington.
(3) In addition to the exemptions specifically provided by this
chapter, the director of personnel may provide for further exemptions
pursuant to the following procedures. The governor or other
appropriate elected official may submit requests for exemption to the
director of personnel stating the reasons for requesting such
exemptions. The director of personnel shall hold a public hearing,
after proper notice, on requests submitted pursuant to this subsection.
If the director determines that the position for which exemption is
requested is one involving substantial responsibility for the
formulation of basic agency or executive policy or one involving
directing and controlling program operations of an agency or a major
administrative division thereof, the director of personnel shall grant
the request and such determination shall be final as to any decision
made before July 1, 1993. The total number of additional exemptions
permitted under this subsection shall not exceed one percent of the
number of employees in the classified service not including employees
of institutions of higher education and related boards for those
agencies not directly under the authority of any elected public
official other than the governor, and shall not exceed a total of
twenty-five for all agencies under the authority of elected public
officials other than the governor.
The salary and fringe benefits of all positions presently or
hereafter exempted except for the chief executive officer of each
agency, full-time members of boards and commissions, administrative
assistants and confidential secretaries in the immediate office of an
elected state official, and the personnel listed in subsections (1)(j)
through (u) and (x) and (2) of this section, shall be determined by the
director of personnel. Changes to the classification plan affecting
exempt salaries must meet the same provisions for classified salary
increases resulting from adjustments to the classification plan as
outlined in RCW 41.06.152.
Any person holding a classified position subject to the provisions
of this chapter shall, when and if such position is subsequently
exempted from the application of this chapter, be afforded the
following rights: If such person previously held permanent status in
another classified position, such person shall have a right of
reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a
position of similar nature and salary.
Any classified employee having civil service status in a classified
position who accepts an appointment in an exempt position shall have
the right of reversion to the highest class of position previously
held, or to a position of similar nature and salary.
A person occupying an exempt position who is terminated from the
position for gross misconduct or malfeasance does not have the right of
reversion to a classified position as provided for in this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.06.093 and 1993 c 281 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the Washington state
patrol to confidential secretaries of agency bureau chiefs, or their
functional equivalent, and a confidential secretary for the chief of
staff: PROVIDED, That each confidential secretary must meet the
minimum qualifications for the class of secretary II as determined by
the ((Washington personnel resources board)) director of the Washington
state department of personnel.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.06.150 and 2002 c 371 s 906, 2002 c 354 s 203, 2002
c 354 s 202, and 2002 c 110 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:
The director shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and
provisions of this chapter and with the best standards of personnel
administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:
(1) Certification of names for vacancies;
(2) Examinations for all positions in the competitive and
noncompetitive service;
(3) Appointments;
(4) Adoption and revision of a comprehensive classification plan((,
in accordance with rules adopted by the board under RCW 41.06.136,))
for all positions in the classified service, based on investigation and
analysis of the duties and responsibilities of each such position and
allocation and reallocation of positions within the classification
plan.
(a) The director shall not adopt job classification revisions or
class studies unless implementation of the proposed revision or study
will result in net cost savings, increased efficiencies, or improved
management of personnel or services, and the proposed revision or study
has been approved by the director of financial management in accordance
with chapter 43.88 RCW.
(b) Reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments are
governed by (a) of this subsection and RCW 41.06.152;
(5) Permitting agency heads to delegate the authority to appoint,
reduce, dismiss, suspend, or demote employees within their agencies if
such agency heads do not have specific statutory authority to so
delegate: PROVIDED, That the director may not authorize such
delegation to any position lower than the head of a major subdivision
of the agency;
(6) Assuring persons who are or have been employed in classified
positions before July 1, 1993, will be eligible for employment,
reemployment, transfer, and promotion in respect to classified
positions covered by this chapter;
(7) Affirmative action in appointment, promotion, transfer,
recruitment, training, and career development; development and
implementation of affirmative action goals and timetables; and
monitoring of progress against those goals and timetables.
The director shall consult with the human rights commission in the
development of rules pertaining to affirmative action. The department
of personnel shall transmit a report annually to the human rights
commission which states the progress each state agency has made in
meeting affirmative action goals and timetables.
Rules adopted under this section by the director shall provide for
local administration and management by the institutions of higher
education and related boards, subject to periodic audit and review by
the director.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.06.420 and 1980 c 118 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((board)) director, by rule, shall prescribe the conditions
under which an employee appointed to a supervisory or management
position after June 12, 1980, shall be required to successfully
complete an entry-level management training course as approved by the
director. Such training shall not be required of any employee who has
completed a management training course prior to the employee's
appointment which is, in the judgment of the director, at least
equivalent to the entry-level course required by this section.
(2) The ((board)) director, by rule, shall establish procedures for
the suspension of the entry-level training requirement in cases where
the ability of an agency to perform its responsibilities is adversely
affected, or for the waiver of this requirement in cases where a person
has demonstrated experience as a substitute for training.
(3) Agencies subject to the provisions of this chapter, in
accordance with rules prescribed by the board, shall designate
individual positions, or groups of positions, as being "supervisory" or
"management" positions. Such designations shall be subject to review
by the director as part of the director's evaluation of training and
career development programs prescribed by RCW 41.06.400(2).

Sec. 5 RCW 41.48.140 and 1993 c 281 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in RCW 41.48.120 or 41.48.130 shall affect the power of the
((Washington personnel resources board)) director of the Washington
state department of personnel or any other state personnel authority to
establish sick leave rules except as may be required under RCW
41.48.120 or 41.48.130: PROVIDED, That each personnel board and
personnel authority shall establish the maximum number of working days
an employee under its jurisdiction may be absent on account of sickness
or accident disability without a medical certificate.
"Personnel authority" as used in this section, means a state
agency, board, committee, or similar body having general authority to
establish personnel rules.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.04.670 and 1993 c 281 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((Washington personnel resources board)) director of the
Washington state department of personnel and other personnel
authorities shall each adopt rules applicable to employees under their
respective jurisdictions: (1) Establishing appropriate parameters for
the program which are consistent with the provisions of RCW 41.04.650
through 41.04.665; (2) providing for equivalent treatment of employees
between their respective jurisdictions and allowing transfers of leave
in accordance with RCW 41.04.665(5); (3) establishing procedures to
ensure that the program does not significantly increase the cost of
providing leave; and (4) providing for the administration of the
program and providing for maintenance and collection of sufficient
information on the program to allow a thorough legislative review.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.43.832 and 2006 c 263 s 826 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that businesses and organizations
providing services to children, developmentally disabled persons, and
vulnerable adults need adequate information to determine which
employees or licensees to hire or engage. The legislature further
finds that many developmentally disabled individuals and vulnerable
adults desire to hire their own employees directly and also need
adequate information to determine which employees or licensees to hire
or engage. Therefore, the Washington state patrol identification and
criminal history section shall disclose, upon the request of a business
or organization as defined in RCW 43.43.830, a developmentally disabled
person, or a vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 43.43.830 or his or her
guardian, an applicant's record for convictions as defined in chapter
10.97 RCW.
(2) The legislature also finds that the Washington professional
educator standards board may request of the Washington state patrol
criminal identification system information regarding a certificate
applicant's record for convictions under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) The legislature also finds that law enforcement agencies, the
office of the attorney general, prosecuting authorities, and the
department of social and health services may request this same
information to aid in the investigation and prosecution of child,
developmentally disabled person, and vulnerable adult abuse cases and
to protect children and adults from further incidents of abuse.
(4) The legislature further finds that the secretary of the
department of social and health services must establish rules and set
standards to require specific action when considering the information
listed in subsection (1) of this section, and when considering
additional information including but not limited to civil adjudication
proceedings as defined in RCW 43.43.830 and any out-of-state
equivalent, in the following circumstances:
(a) When considering persons for state employment in positions
directly responsible for the supervision, care, or treatment of
children, vulnerable adults, or individuals with mental illness or
developmental disabilities;
(b) When considering persons for state positions involving
unsupervised access to vulnerable adults to conduct comprehensive
assessments, financial eligibility determinations, licensing and
certification activities, investigations, surveys, or case management;
or for state positions otherwise required by federal law to meet
employment standards;
(c) When licensing agencies or facilities with individuals in
positions directly responsible for the care, supervision, or treatment
of children, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults,
including but not limited to agencies or facilities licensed under
chapter 74.15 or 18.51 RCW;
(d) When contracting with individuals or businesses or
organizations for the care, supervision, case management, or treatment
of children, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults,
including but not limited to services contracted for under chapter
18.20, ((18.48,)) 70.127, 70.128, 72.36, or 74.39A RCW or Title 71A
RCW;
(e) When individual providers are paid by the state or providers
are paid by home care agencies to provide in-home services involving
unsupervised access to persons with physical, mental, or developmental
disabilities or mental illness, or to vulnerable adults as defined in
chapter 74.34 RCW, including but not limited to services provided under
chapter 74.39 or 74.39A RCW.
(5) Whenever a state conviction record check is required by state
law, persons may be employed or engaged as volunteers or independent
contractors on a conditional basis pending completion of the state
background investigation. Whenever a national criminal record check
through the federal bureau of investigation is required by state law,
a person may be employed or engaged as a volunteer or independent
contractor on a conditional basis pending completion of the national
check. The ((Washington personnel resources board)) director of the
Washington state department of personnel shall adopt rules to
accomplish the purposes of this subsection as it applies to state
employees.
(6)(a) For purposes of facilitating timely access to criminal
background information and to reasonably minimize the number of
requests made under this section, recognizing that certain health care
providers change employment frequently, health care facilities may,
upon request from another health care facility, share copies of
completed criminal background inquiry information.
(b) Completed criminal background inquiry information may be shared
by a willing health care facility only if the following conditions are
satisfied: The licensed health care facility sharing the criminal
background inquiry information is reasonably known to be the person's
most recent employer, no more than twelve months has elapsed from the
date the person was last employed at a licensed health care facility to
the date of their current employment application, and the criminal
background information is no more than two years old.
(c) If criminal background inquiry information is shared, the
health care facility employing the subject of the inquiry must require
the applicant to sign a disclosure statement indicating that there has
been no conviction or finding as described in RCW 43.43.842 since the
completion date of the most recent criminal background inquiry.
(d) Any health care facility that knows or has reason to believe
that an applicant has or may have a disqualifying conviction or finding
as described in RCW 43.43.842, subsequent to the completion date of
their most recent criminal background inquiry, shall be prohibited from
relying on the applicant's previous employer's criminal background
inquiry information. A new criminal background inquiry shall be
requested pursuant to RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.842.
(e) Health care facilities that share criminal background inquiry
information shall be immune from any claim of defamation, invasion of
privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with any
dissemination of this information in accordance with this subsection.
(f) Health care facilities shall transmit and receive the criminal
background inquiry information in a manner that reasonably protects the
subject's rights to privacy and confidentiality.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection, "health care facility"
means a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, a boarding home
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, or an adult family home licensed
under chapter 70.128 RCW.
(7) If a federal bureau of investigation check is required in
addition to the state background check by the department of social and
health services, an applicant who is not disqualified based on the
results of the state background check shall be eligible for a one
hundred twenty day provisional approval to hire, pending the outcome of
the federal bureau of investigation check. The department may extend
the provisional approval until receipt of the federal bureau of
investigation check. If the federal bureau of investigation check
disqualifies an applicant, the department shall notify the requestor
that the provisional approval to hire is withdrawn and the applicant
may be terminated.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.24.300 and 1993 c 281 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((Washington personnel resources board)) director of the
Washington state department of personnel and each unit of local
government shall determine whether any employees under their
jurisdiction have a substantial likelihood of exposure in the course of
their employment to the human immunodeficiency virus. If so, the
agency or unit of government shall adopt rules requiring appropriate
training and education for the employees on the prevention,
transmission, and treatment of AIDS. The rules shall specifically
provide for such training and education for law enforcement,
correctional, and health care workers. The ((Washington personnel
resources board)) director and each unit of local government shall work
with the office on AIDS under RCW 70.24.250 to develop the educational
and training material necessary for employees.

Sec. 9 RCW 72.01.210 and 1993 c 281 s 62 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of corrections shall appoint chaplains for the state
correctional institutions for convicted felons; and the secretary of
social and health services shall appoint chaplains for the correctional
institutions for juveniles found delinquent by the juvenile courts; and
the secretary of corrections and the secretary of social and health
services shall appoint one or more chaplains for other custodial,
correctional and mental institutions under their control. The
chaplains so appointed shall have the qualifications and shall be
compensated in an amount, as shall hereafter be recommended by the
department and approved by the ((Washington personnel resources board))
director of the Washington state department of personnel.

Sec. 10 RCW 72.02.045 and 2005 c 382 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The superintendent of each institution has the powers, duties, and
responsibilities specified in this section.
(1) Subject to the rules of the department, the superintendent is
responsible for the supervision and management of the institution, the
grounds and buildings, the subordinate officers and employees, and the
prisoners committed, admitted, or transferred to the institution.
(2) Subject to the rules of the department and the director of the
division of prisons or his or her designee and the ((Washington
personnel resources board)) director of the Washington state department
of personnel, the superintendent shall appoint all subordinate officers
and employees.
(3) The superintendent, subject to approval by the secretary, has
the authority to determine the types and amounts of property that
convicted persons may possess in department facilities. This authority
includes the authority to determine the types and amounts that the
department will transport at the department's expense whenever a
convicted person is transferred between department institutions or to
other jurisdictions. Convicted persons are responsible for the costs
of transporting their excess property. If a convicted person fails to
pay the costs of transporting any excess property within ninety days
from the date of transfer, such property shall be presumed abandoned
and may be disposed of in the manner allowed by RCW 63.42.040 (1)
through (3). The superintendent shall be the custodian of all funds
and valuable personal property of convicted persons as may be in their
possession upon admission to the institution, or which may be sent or
brought in to such persons, or earned by them while in custody, or
which shall be forwarded to the superintendent on behalf of convicted
persons. All such funds shall be deposited in the personal account of
the convicted person and the superintendent shall have authority to
disburse moneys from such person's personal account for the personal
and incidental needs of the convicted person as may be deemed
reasonably necessary. When convicted persons are released from the
custody of the department either on parole, community placement,
community custody, community supervision, or discharge, all funds and
valuable personal property in the possession of the superintendent
belonging to such convicted persons shall be delivered to them. In no
case shall the state of Washington, or any state officer, including
state elected officials, employees, or volunteers, be liable for the
loss of such personal property, except upon a showing that the loss was
occasioned by the intentional act, gross negligence, or negligence of
the officer, official, employee, or volunteer, and that the actions or
omissions occurred while the person was performing, or in good faith
purporting to perform, his or her official duties. Recovery of damages
for loss of personal property while in the custody of the
superintendent under this subsection shall be limited to the lesser of
the market value of the item lost at the time of the loss, or the
original purchase price of the item or, in the case of hand-made goods,
the materials used in fabricating the item.
(4) The superintendent, subject to the approval of the director of
the division of prisons and the secretary, shall make, amend, and
repeal rules for the administration, supervision, discipline, and
security of the institution.
(5) When in the superintendent's opinion an emergency exists, the
superintendent may promulgate temporary rules for the governance of the
institution, which shall remain in effect until terminated by the
director of the division of prisons or the secretary.
(6) The superintendent shall perform such other duties as may be
prescribed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 41.06.136 (Board review of rules
affecting classified service -- Rules to be developed -- Goals) and 2002 c
354 s 205 are each repealed.

--- END ---