BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) State agencies required by law or rule to provide public
notices to a community or area to advise or inform the public about an
imminent or emergent public health, safety, or welfare risk shall
provide bilingual or multilingual notices when a significant segment of
residents speak a language other than English and have a limited
proficiency in English. This requirement applies to notices that
include, but are not limited to, proposed locations for criminal
facilities or facilities that would house sex offenders. This
requirement does not apply to the adoption of rules under chapter 34.05
RCW.
(2) "Significant segment," for purposes of this section, means five
percent or more of the residents residing in the affected city, town,
or county who are of limited English proficiency.
(3) Agencies shall implement the provisions of this section within
existing funds.

--- END ---