BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.011 and 2005 c 143 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.
(2) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(6) "Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees
of the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and
appointed officials of the executive branch of government, including
full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees; and includes
any or all part-time and temporary employees under the terms and
conditions established under this chapter by the authority; justices of
the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and the superior
courts; and members of the state legislature or of the legislative
authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office after
February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees of a
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if
the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of
the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with
the authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee
organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option
of each such employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995,
employees of employee organizations currently pooled with employees of
school districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at
the option of each such employee organization; and (c) employees of a
school district if the authority agrees to provide any of the school
districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as
provided in RCW 28A.400.350.
(7) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(8) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(9) "Benefits contribution plan" means a premium only contribution
plan, a medical flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan
whereby state and public employees may agree to a contribution to
benefit costs which will allow the employee to participate in benefits
offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(10) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(11) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.
(12) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(13) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(40), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(14) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
and reserve officers and firefighters as defined in RCW 41.24.010 who
die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment as
determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and
industries.
(15) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(16) "Employing agency" means a division, department, or separate
agency of state government and a county, municipality, school district,
educational service district, or other political subdivision, covered
by this chapter.
(17) "Retired plan 2 law enforcement officer or firefighter" means:
(a) A person who separated from employment with a county,
municipality, special district, or other political subdivision of the
state and is receiving a plan 2 retirement allowance under chapter
41.26 RCW before July 1, 2007; or
(b) A person who separated from employment with a county,
municipality, special district, or other political subdivision of the
state on or after July 1, 2007, and immediately upon separation
receives a plan 2 retirement allowance under chapter 41.26 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.022 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The health care authority is hereby designated as the single
state agent for purchasing health services.
(2) On and after January 1, 1995, at least the following state-purchased health services programs shall be merged into a single,
community-rated risk pool: Health benefits for groups of employees of
school districts and educational service districts that voluntarily
purchase health benefits as provided in RCW 41.05.011; health benefits
for state employees; health benefits for eligible retired or disabled
school employees not eligible for parts A and B of medicare; health
benefits for eligible retired plan 2 law enforcement officers or
firefighters not eligible for parts A and B of medicare; and health
benefits for eligible state retirees not eligible for parts A and B of
medicare.
(3) At a minimum, and regardless of other legislative enactments,
the state health services purchasing agent shall:
(a) Require that a public agency that provides subsidies for a
substantial portion of services now covered under the basic health plan
use uniform eligibility processes, insofar as may be possible, and
ensure that multiple eligibility determinations are not required;
(b) Require that a health care provider or a health care facility
that receives funds from a public program provide care to state
residents receiving a state subsidy who may wish to receive care from
them, and that an insuring entity that receives funds from a public
program accept enrollment from state residents receiving a state
subsidy who may wish to enroll with them;
(c) Strive to integrate purchasing for all publicly sponsored
health services in order to maximize the cost control potential and
promote the most efficient methods of financing and coordinating
services;
(d) Consult regularly with the governor, the legislature, and state
agency directors whose operations are affected by the implementation of
this section; and
(e) Ensure the control of benefit costs under managed competition
by adopting rules to prevent employers from entering into an agreement
with employees or employee organizations when the agreement would
result in increased utilization in public employees' benefits board
plans or reduce the expected savings of managed competition.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.05.080 and 2001 c 165 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Under the qualifications, terms, conditions, and benefits set
by the board:
(a) Retired or disabled state employees, retired or disabled school
employees, or employees of county, municipal, or other political
subdivisions covered by this chapter who are retired may continue their
participation in insurance plans and contracts after retirement or
disablement;
(b) Separated employees may continue their participation in
insurance plans and contracts if participation is selected immediately
upon separation from employment;
(c) Surviving spouses and dependent children of emergency service
personnel killed in the line of duty may participate in insurance plans
and contracts;
(d) Retired plan 2 law enforcement officers or firefighters may
participate in insurance plans and contracts.
(2) Rates charged surviving spouses of emergency service personnel
killed in the line of duty, retired plan 2 law enforcement officers or
firefighters, retired or disabled employees, separated employees,
spouses, or dependent children who are not eligible for parts A and B
of medicare shall be based on the experience of the community rated
risk pool established under RCW 41.05.022.
(3) Rates charged to surviving spouses of emergency service
personnel killed in the line of duty, retired plan 2 law enforcement
officers or firefighters, retired or disabled employees, separated
employees, spouses, or children who are eligible for parts A and B of
medicare shall be calculated from a separate experience risk pool
comprised only of individuals eligible for parts A and B of medicare;
however, the premiums charged to medicare-eligible retirees and
disabled employees shall be reduced by the amount of the subsidy
provided under RCW 41.05.085.
(4) Surviving spouses and dependent children of emergency service
personnel killed in the line of duty, retired plan 2 law enforcement
officers or firefighters, and retired or disabled and separated
employees shall be responsible for payment of premium rates developed
by the authority which shall include the cost to the authority of
providing insurance coverage including any amounts necessary for
reserves and administration in accordance with this chapter. These
self pay rates will be established based on a separate rate for the
employee, the spouse, and the children.
(5) The term "retired state employees" for the purpose of this
section shall include but not be limited to members of the legislature
whether voluntarily or involuntarily leaving state office.

--- END ---