BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the
competitiveness of the telecommunications marketplace has created
consumer choice and strengthened the state's position as a national
leader in the area of technology services and infrastructure. The
legislature finds that the state's leadership in technology and
communications provides the foundation for economic activity throughout
the whole state and it is the goal of the legislature to extend the
benefits of this activity to as many of the state's citizens as
possible. The legislature further finds that the competitiveness of
telecommunications services makes regulatory modernization necessary to
ensure fair regulatory treatment of telecommunications service
providers who provide similar services.
The legislature recognizes that it is vital to achieve regulatory
modernization for telecommunications service providers who are
responding to consumer choice by investing in infrastructure, which
directly benefits consumers and the state. Therefore, it is the intent
of the legislature to maintain and strengthen consumer choice, provide
incentive for increased private investment in technology
infrastructure, and provide regulatory fairness among competitive
telecommunications service providers by modernizing the state's
telecommunications laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A telecommunications company may elect to be
regulated by the commission exclusively under this chapter by filing
written notice with the commission, stating an effective date not
sooner than five days after filing. No provision of any other chapter
of this title applies to a telecommunications company making an
election under this section unless such provision is specifically set
forth in this chapter, and such provisions are as existing on the
effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The rates, terms, and conditions of an
electing company's services shall not be regulated by the commission
except as specifically set forth in this section.
(1) For a period of five years after an election, the rates for
basic telecommunications services, as defined by RCW 80.36.600(6)(b) as
of the filing of an election, shall not be increased by more than one
dollar in any twelve-month period.
(a) This limitation does not apply to packaged or bundled offerings
that include basic telecommunications service.
(b) Basic telecommunications service shall include mandatory
extended area service in effect for the electing company as of the
filing of its election.
(c) Rates for basic telecommunications service shall not be more
than twenty percent higher than the rate charged for such service in
the company's exchange that has the greatest number of basic
telecommunications service lines in service.
(2) Notwithstanding this section, any limitation on rate changes
for any service to which an electing company has agreed and which the
commission has approved prior to the filing of an election shall apply
according to the terms of such agreement.
(3) An electing company that is designated an eligible
telecommunications carrier in this state pursuant to 47 U.S.C. Sec.
214(e) shall not require that basic telecommunications services be
purchased only as part of a package or bundled offering.
(4) For a period of two years after the effective date of an
election, an electing company's rates for any telecommunications
services other than basic telecommunications services that would be
subject to regulation by the commission but for the company's election
shall not be more than fifty percent higher than the rate charged for
such service in the company's exchange in which the greatest quantity
of such service is being provided.
(5) For a period of not less than one hundred eighty days and not
more than two years from the effective date of its election under this
section, an electing company shall continue to maintain and continue to
file with the commission schedules setting forth the rates, terms, and
conditions of its telecommunications services that would be subject to
regulation by the commission but for the company's election. No more
than thirty days before the withdrawal of such a schedule, or part of
it, the company shall provide each customer of an affected service with
information about the rates, terms, and conditions under which the
service will continue to be provided. If the rates, terms, and
conditions do not change upon withdrawal of the schedule, such rates,
terms, and conditions shall be binding to the same extent as under the
filed schedule. If any of the rates, terms, and conditions do change
upon withdrawal, the company must provide each affected customer with
a reasonable opportunity to decide whether to accept the changed rate,
term, or condition. If a customer does not cancel service within
thirty days after notice of the change is given, the customer will be
deemed to have accepted all the rates, terms, and conditions offered by
the company.
(6) Other than the schedules described in subsection (5) of this
section, electing companies shall not file with the commission
contracts for telecommunications services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The operations of an electing company shall
not be regulated by the commission except as specifically set forth in
this section.
(1) An electing company that is designated an eligible
telecommunications carrier in this state pursuant to 47 U.S.C. Sec.
214(e) is subject to RCW 80.36.500 and to competitively neutral rules
of the commission necessary to implement the same.
(2) An electing company is subject to RCW 80.36.225 and to
competitively neutral rules of the commission necessary to implement
the same.
(3) An electing company is subject to RCW 80.36.390(7) and to
competitively neutral rules of the commission necessary to implement
the same.
(4) An electing company that is designated an eligible
telecommunications carrier in this state pursuant to 47 U.S.C. Sec.
214(e) is subject to RCW 80.36.410 through 80.36.475 and to
competitively neutral rules of the commission necessary to implement
the same.
(5) An electing company is subject to chapter 80.54 RCW and to
competitively neutral rules of the commission necessary to implement
the same.
(6) The following provisions of chapter 80.36 RCW and competitively
neutral rules of the commission necessary to implement the same apply
to the operations of electing companies: RCW 80.36.010, 80.36.020,
80.36.030, 80.36.040, 80.36.050, 80.36.060, 80.36.070, 80.36.145,
80.36.360, 80.36.370, 80.36.400, and 80.36.520.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The provisions of chapter 80.04 RCW other
than RCW 80.04.080, 80.04.090, 80.04.100, 80.04.270, 80.04.280,
80.04.290, 80.04.300 through 80.04.330, 80.04.350, and 80.04.360 apply
to electing companies, but only to the extent that they are
competitively neutral and consistent and compatible with the authority
of the commission as set forth in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The commission may informally or upon formal
complaint by an affected person resolve disputes concerning an electing
company's adherence to the rates, terms, or conditions of its services
that would be subject to commission regulation but for its election, or
its compliance with applicable commission rules or Washington statutes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The commission is authorized to take
actions, conduct proceedings, and enter orders as to an electing
company as permitted or contemplated for a state commission under the
federal telecommunications act of 1996, P.L. 104-104 (11 Stat. 56).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 80.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter applies to telecommunications companies electing to
operate under chapter 80.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 of this act) only
to the extent provided in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 80.08 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to telecommunications companies
electing to operate under chapter 80.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 of
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 80.12 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to telecommunications companies
electing to operate under chapter 80.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 of
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 80.16 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to telecommunications companies
electing to operate under chapter 80.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 of
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 80.20 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to telecommunications companies
electing to operate under chapter 80.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 of
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter applies to telecommunications companies electing to
operate under chapter 80.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 of this act) only
to the extent provided in section 4 of this act.

Sec. 14 RCW 80.24.010 and 2003 c 296 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, every
public service company subject to regulation by the commission shall,
on or before the date specified by the commission for filing annual
reports under RCW 80.04.080, file with the commission a statement on
oath showing its gross operating revenue from intrastate operations for
the preceding calendar year or portion thereof and pay to the
commission a fee equal to one-tenth of one percent of the first fifty
thousand dollars of gross operating revenue, plus two-tenths of one
percent of any gross operating revenue in excess of fifty thousand
dollars: PROVIDED, That the commission may, by rule, set minimum fees
that do not exceed the cost of collecting the fees. The commission may
by rule waive any or all of the minimum fee established pursuant to
this section.
The percentage rates of gross operating revenue to be paid in any
year may be decreased by the commission for any class of companies
subject to the payment of such fees, by general order entered before
March 1st of such year, and for such purpose such companies shall be
classified as follows:
Electrical, gas, water, telecommunications, and irrigation
companies shall constitute class one. Every other company subject to
regulation by the commission, for which regulatory fees are not
otherwise fixed by law shall pay fees as herein provided and shall
constitute additional classes according to kinds of businesses engaged
in.
Any payment of the fee imposed by this section made after its due
date shall include a late fee of two percent of the amount due.
Delinquent fees shall accrue interest at the rate of one percent per
month.
(2) A telecommunications company electing regulation under chapter
80.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 of this act) shall pay a regulatory fee
as follows:
(a) For the calendar year in which it makes its election and for
the first calendar year after its election, such company shall pay a
fee in the same amount as its fee paid for the year immediately
preceding its election.
(b) For the next three calendar years such company shall pay a fee
in the amount of two-thirds of the fee paid under (a) of this
subsection.
(c) Thereafter, such company shall pay a fee that is the lesser of
(i) the amount of the fee paid under (b) of this subsection; or (ii)
two-tenths of one percent of any gross operating revenue for basic
telecommunications service provided in this state during such period as
such company is an eligible telecommunications carrier in this state
pursuant to 47 U.S.C. Sec. 214(e).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

--- END ---