BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.200 and 2002 c 352 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an instruction permit, identicard, or a driver's license is
lost or destroyed, the person to whom it was issued may obtain a
duplicate of it upon furnishing proof of such fact satisfactory to the
department and payment of a fee of fifteen dollars to the department.
(2) A replacement permit, identicard, or driver's license may be
obtained to change or correct material information upon payment of a
fee of ten dollars and surrender of the permit, identicard, or driver's
license being replaced. The fee in this subsection (2) does not apply
to active duty members of the armed forces of the United States,
including active duty members of the national guard and armed forces
reserves.

--- END ---