BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.36.030 and 1996 c 54 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the following limitations and conditions, the owner,
the owner's immediate family member, the owner's documented employee,
or a tenant of real property may trap or kill on that property, without
the licenses required under RCW 77.32.010 or authorization from the
director under RCW 77.12.240, wild animals or wild birds that are
damaging crops, domestic animals, or fowl:
(a) Threatened or endangered species shall not be hunted, trapped,
or killed;
(b) Except in an emergency situation, deer, elk, and protected
wildlife shall not be killed without a permit issued and conditioned by
the director or the director's designee. In an emergency, the
department may give verbal permission followed by written permission to
trap or kill any deer, elk, or protected wildlife that is damaging
crops, domestic animals, or fowl; and
(c) On privately owned cattle ranching lands, the land owner or
lessee may declare an emergency only when the department has not
responded within forty-eight hours after having been contacted by the
land owner or lessee regarding damage caused by wild animals or wild
birds. In such an emergency, the owner or lessee may trap or kill any
deer, elk, or other protected wildlife that is causing the damage but
deer and elk may only be killed if such lands were open to public
hunting during the previous hunting season, or the closure to public
hunting was coordinated with the department to protect property and
livestock.
(2)(a) Except for deer, elk, coyotes, and Columbian ground
squirrels, wildlife trapped or killed under this section remain the
property of the state, and the person trapping or killing the wildlife
shall notify the department immediately. The department shall dispose
of wildlife so taken within three days of receiving such a notification
and in a manner determined by the director to be in the best interest
of the state.
(b) A person who kills a deer or elk under this section may opt to
retain the animal for personal use. Any deer or elk killed under this
section that is not intended to be put to personal use must be
surrendered to the department.

--- END ---