BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.380 and 2006 c 330 s 26 and 2006 c 75 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following information relating to agriculture and livestock is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Business-related information under RCW 15.86.110;
(2) Information provided under RCW 15.54.362;
(3) Production or sales records required to determine assessment
levels and actual assessment payments to commodity boards and
commissions formed under chapters 15.24, 15.26, 15.28, 15.44, 15.65,
15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.100, 15.89, and 16.67 RCW or required by the
department of agriculture to administer these chapters or the
department's programs;
(4) Consignment information contained on phytosanitary certificates
issued by the department of agriculture under chapters 15.13, 15.49,
and 15.17 RCW or federal phytosanitary certificates issued under 7
C.F.R. 353 through cooperative agreements with the animal and plant
health inspection service, United States department of agriculture, or
on applications for phytosanitary certification required by the
department of agriculture;
(5) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
persons (a) to the department of agriculture for the purpose of
conducting a referendum for the potential establishment of a commodity
board or commission; or (b) to the department of agriculture or
commodity boards or commissions formed under chapter 15.24, 15.28,
15.44, 15.65, 15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.100, 15.89, or 16.67 RCW with
respect to domestic or export marketing activities or individual
producer's production information;
(6) Except under RCW 15.19.080, information obtained regarding the
purchases, sales, or production of an individual American ginseng
grower or dealer;
(7) Information that can be identified to a particular business and
that is collected under ((section 3(1), chapter 235, Laws of 2002)) RCW
15.17.140(2) and 15.17.143 for certificates of compliance;
(8) Financial statements provided under RCW 16.65.030(1)(d);
(9) Information submitted by an individual or business for the
purpose of participating in a state or national animal identification
system. Disclosure to local, state, and federal officials is not
public disclosure. This exemption does not affect the disclosure of
information used in reportable animal health investigations under
chapter 16.36 RCW once they are complete; and
(10) Results of testing for animal diseases not required to be
reported under chapter 16.36 RCW that is done at the request of the
animal owner or his or her designee that can be identified to a
particular business or individual.

--- END ---