BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Cardiovascular disease is the second leading cause of death in
Washington state, accounting for approximately twenty-four percent of
all deaths, many of which occur in individuals under the age of
sixty-five. Through the work of the blue ribbon commission, the
governor and legislature have called for improving the health status of
Washington citizens through the use of evidence-based medicine. The
current system in this state of allowing hospitals without on-site open
heart surgery programs to perform adult emergency but not nonemergent
coronary interventions is an inefficient system that is not consistent
with evidence-based medicine.
(2) Appropriate and timely access to coronary interventions for
both emergency and nonemergent patients is an effective means of
reducing the rate of premature deaths or morbidity from cardiovascular
disease. In many communities, timely access is not available and the
current system negatively impacts all cardiac delivery such that
access, quality, and outcomes are adversely impacted. Negative
consequences include:
(a) Severe restrictions on access to the right cardiac care at the
right time resulting in adverse health outcomes, even death;
(b) Provider shortages due to communities' inability to recruit or
retain an adequate supply of cardiologists and related providers, which
affects not only access but also the quality of both emergency and
nonemergent cardiac care; and
(c) Unnecessary patient transfer and duplication of diagnostic
tests, evaluations, and other procedures, which leads to increased
patient risk as well as higher costs.
(3) Advancements in technology have expanded the ability to safely
and effectively perform adult nonemergent coronary interventions in
hospitals that do not have on-site open heart surgery programs.
Published literature demonstrates that these interventions can be
safely performed in hospitals without on-site surgical back-up as long
as certain volume levels and other quality controls are met. The
number of states allowing hospitals to perform these interventions
without on-site open heart surgery programs continues to grow in the
United States such that Washington state is now in the minority of
states.
(4) Current department of health certificate of need rules, in
effect since 1992, require hospitals to have an on-site open heart
surgery program in order to perform nonemergent coronary interventions.
Emergency coronary interventions are not subject to certificate of need
review in Washington, and therefore any hospital can perform these
procedures.
(5) Over the past fourteen years, technological advances have
affected the methods used and safety of these cardiac interventions.
The current rule limits patient access unreasonably.
(6) As recently as December 2001, the department of health released
the report of the advisory committee on certificate of need heart
surgery methodology review. The committee's report, required by
legislation passed in 2000, recommended the creation of a separate
certificate of need category for adult nonemergent interventional
cardiology that did not require a hospital to have on-site open heart
surgery.
In order to improve the cardiac delivery system in this state, the
legislature intends to allow hospitals without on-site open heart
surgery programs the opportunity to perform adult nonemergent coronary
interventions by applying for a separate certificate of need for these
services. This change will significantly improve the cardiac delivery
system in the state. It will strengthen the delivery of both emergency
and nonemergent cardiac care by assuring that more Washington residents
get the right cardiac care at the right time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Adult nonemergent coronary interventions are tertiary services
and shall be performed only in hospitals licensed pursuant to chapter
70.41 RCW that have obtained a certificate of need from the department
pursuant to rules adopted by the department. The department's rules
for granting a certificate of need to a licensed hospital to provide
adult nonemergent coronary interventions shall not require the hospital
to have an on-site open heart surgery program. If a hospital has an
existing open heart surgery program, the hospital shall not be required
to obtain a separate certificate of need to provide adult nonemergent
coronary interventions.
(2) For purposes of this section and section 3 of this act, "adult
nonemergent coronary interventions" means catheter-based nonsurgical
interventions in the coronary arteries performed on individuals age
eighteen or older. These interventions include insertion of coronary
artery stents and percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty.
(3) Nothing in this section or section 3 of this act is to be
interpreted as requiring a hospital to obtain a certificate of need
prior to performing emergency coronary interventions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of health shall adopt by rule, no later than
April 1, 2008, a separate certificate of need methodology and standards
implementing this section and section 2 of this act. The department
shall begin accepting nonemergent coronary intervention certificate of
need applications no later than May 1, 2008.
(2) In developing the standards under this section, the department
shall:
(a) Include evidence-based minimum volume standards for both the
applicant hospital and the performing cardiologists, taking into
consideration that standards may need to be different for rural areas
and other communities with special populations in order to provide
adequate access;
(b) Include standards to ensure that new adult nonemergent coronary
intervention programs do not adversely impact the ability of hospitals
currently performing these procedures to operate at volume levels noted
in (a) of this subsection;
(c) Establish standards to ensure that adult nonemergent coronary
intervention volumes at the University of Washington academic medical
center are maintained at levels required for training of cardiologists
consistent with applicable accreditation requirements;
(d) Establish standards to ensure that both emergency and
nonemergent adult coronary intervention volumes are included in the
count of volumes needed to attain the volume levels noted in (a) of
this subsection;
(e) Require applying hospitals to develop and maintain an agreement
with a hospital that has an on-site open heart surgery program for
transfer, case selection, and quality assurance review;
(f) Use geographic areas no larger than the hospital subplanning
areas defined in the 1987 Washington state health plan as the planning
areas for evaluating need;
(g) Require approved hospitals to submit outcome data to the
American college of cardiology-national cardiovascular data registry.
(3) Following the initial implementation of the rules, the
department shall convene an expert panel at least every three years to
review and recommend appropriate revision to these rules based on
advances in technology and treatment.

--- END ---