BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.05.190 and 1947 c 79 s .05.19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every insurer shall conduct its business in its own legal name.
(2) No insurer shall assume or use a name deceptively similar to
that of any other authorized insurer.
(3) Every insurer that changes its name, whether it is a trade name
or legal name, shall send a written notification to all affected
policyholders about the name change. The notification must be sent by
certified mail or other means requiring proof of delivery.

--- END ---