BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.06B.015 and 1999 c 385 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to increase efficiency, to reduce waste and duplication,
to enable people to access social and health services, to provide a
basic level of mobility, and to extend and improve transportation
services to people with special transportation needs, the state shall
((implement the Program for)) create the agency council on coordinated
transportation. The ((program)) council will improve transportation
efficiency and effectiveness to maximize the use of community resources
so that more people can be served within available funding levels.
The ((Program for)) agency council on coordinated transportation
will facilitate a statewide approach to coordination and will support
the development of community-based coordinated transportation systems
that ((exhibit the following characteristics:
(1) Organizations serving persons with special transportation needs
share responsibility for ensuring that customers can access services.
(2) There is a single entry process for customers to use to have
trips arranged and scheduled, so the customer does not have to contact
different locations based on which sponsoring agency or program is
paying for the trip.
(3) A process is in place so that when decisions are made by
service organizations on facility siting or program policy
implementation, the costs of client transportation and the potential
effects on the client transportation costs of other agencies or
programs are considered. Affected agencies are given an opportunity to
influence the decision if the potential impact is negative.
(4) Open local market mechanisms give all providers who meet
minimum standards an opportunity to participate in the program, and, in
addition, allow for cost comparisons so that purchasers can select the
least expensive trip most appropriate to the customer's needs.
(5) There is flexibility in using the available vehicles in a
community so that the ability to transport people is not restricted by
categorical claims to vehicles.
(6) There is maximum sharing of operating facilities and
administrative services, to avoid duplication of costly program
elements.
(7) Trip sponsors and service providers have agreed on a process
for allocating costs and billing when they share use of vehicles.
(8) Minimum standards exist for at least safety, driver training,
maintenance, vehicles, and technology to eliminate barriers that may
prevent sponsors from using each other's vehicles or serving each
other's clients.
(9) The system is user friendly. The fact that the system is
supported by a multitude of programs and agencies with different
eligibility, contracting, service delivery, payment, and funding
structures does not negatively affect the customer's ability to access
service.
(10) Support is provided for research, technology improvements, and
sharing of best practices from other communities, so that the system
can be continually improved.
(11) There are performance goals and an evaluation process that
leads to continuous system improvement)) identify and address barriers,
focus on results, and increase advocacy for special needs
transportation as directed and prioritized by the agency council on
coordinated transportation.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.06B.030 and 1999 c 385 s 5 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
To assure ((implementation)) the effectiveness of the ((Program
for)) agency council on coordinated transportation, the council, in
coordination with stakeholders, shall((:
(1) Develop guidelines for local planning of coordinated
transportation in accordance with this chapter;
(2) Initiate local planning processes by contacting the board of
commissioners and county councils in each county and encouraging them
to convene local planning forums for the purpose of implementing
special needs coordinated transportation programs at the community
level;
(3) Work with local community forums to designate a local lead
organization that shall cooperate and coordinate with private and
nonprofit transportation brokers and providers, local public
transportation agencies, local governments, and user groups;
(4) Provide a forum at the state level in which state agencies will
discuss and resolve coordination issues and program policy issues that
may impact transportation coordination and costs;
(5) Provide guidelines for state agencies to use in creating
policies, rules, or procedures to encourage the participation of their
constituents in community-based planning and coordination, in
accordance with this chapter;
(6) Facilitate state-level discussion and action on problems and
barriers identified by the local forums that can only be resolved at
either the state or federal level;
(7) Develop and test models for determining the impacts of facility
siting and program policy decisions on transportation costs;
(8) Develop methodologies and provide support to local and state
agencies in identifying transportation costs;
(9) Develop guidelines for setting performance measures and
evaluating performance;
(10) Develop monitoring reporting criteria and processes to assess
state and local level of participation with this chapter;
(11) Administer and manage grant funds to develop, test, and
facilitate the implementation of coordinated systems;
(12) Develop minimum standards for safety, driver training, and
vehicles, and provide models for processes and technology to support
coordinated service delivery systems;
(13) Provide a clearinghouse for sharing information about
transportation coordination best practices and experiences;
(14) Promote research and development of methods and tools to
improve the performance of transportation coordination in the state;
(15) Provide technical assistance and support to communities;
(16) Facilitate, monitor, provide funding as available, and give
technical support to local planning processes;
(17) Form, convene, and give staff support to stakeholder work
groups as needed to continue work on removing barriers to coordinated
transportation;
(18) Advocate for the coordination of transportation for people
with special transportation needs at the federal, state, and local
levels;
(19) Recommend to the legislature changes in laws to assist
coordination of transportation services;
(20) Petition the office of financial management to make whatever
changes are deemed necessary to identify transportation costs in all
executive agency budgets;
(21) Report to the legislature by December 1, 2000, on council
activities including, but not limited to, the progress of community
planning processes, what demonstration projects have been undertaken,
how coordination affected service levels, and whether these efforts
produced savings that allowed expansion of services. Reports must be
made once every two years thereafter, and other times as the council
deems necessary)) focus its efforts on projects that identify and
address barriers in laws, policies, operations, and procedures; focus
on results; and increase advocacy for transportation for persons with
special needs, as adopted and prioritized in the agency council on
coordinated transportation biennial work plan. The council will, as
necessary, convene work groups at the state, regional, or local level
to implement and develop coordinated approaches to special needs
transportation.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.06B.040 and 1999 c 385 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The council may request, and may require as a condition of
receiving coordination grants, selected county governments to convene
local planning forums and invite participation of all entities,
including tribal governments, that serve or transport persons with
special transportation needs. Counties are encouraged to coordinate
and combine their forums and planning processes with other counties, as
they find it appropriate. The local community forums must:
(1) Designate a lead organization to facilitate the community
planning process on an ongoing basis;
(2) Identify functional boundaries for the local coordinated
transportation system;
(3) Clarify roles and responsibilities of the various participants;
(4) Identify community resources and needs;
(5) Prepare a plan for developing a coordinated transportation
system that meets the intent of this chapter, addresses community
needs, and efficiently uses community resources to address unmet needs;
(6) Implement the community coordinated transportation plan;
(7) Develop performance measures consistent with council
guidelines;
(8) Develop a reporting process consistent with council guidelines;
(9) Raise issues and barriers to the council when resolution is
needed at either the state or federal level;
(10) Develop a process for open discussion and input on local
policy and facility siting decisions that may have an impact on the
special needs transportation costs and service delivery of other
programs and agencies in the community.))
The agency council on coordinated transportation shall review and
recommend certification of local plans developed with regional
transportation planning organizations based on meeting federal
requirements and the implementation of coordinated human service and
transportation plans. Each regional transportation planning
organization must submit to the council an updated plan that includes
the elements, consistent with federal planning requirements, identified
by the council beginning on July 1, 2007, and every other year
thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.06B RCW
to read as follows:
The agency council on coordinated transportation shall submit a
progress report on council activities to the legislature by December 1,
2009, and every other year thereafter. The report must describe the
council's progress in attaining the applicable goals identified in the
council's biennial work plan and highlight any problems encountered in
achieving these goals. The information will be reported in a form
established by the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The joint transportation committee, with
cooperation from the agency council on coordinated transportation,
shall study and review the legal and programmatic changes and best
practices necessary for providing effective coordination of special
needs transportation services at the subregional level.
(2) In conducting its review, the committee shall:
(a) Convene local and regional special needs transportation
providers, brokers, brokerages, representatives of users of transit
services, representatives of nonprofit organizations that provide
related transportation services, including hopelink, and
representatives of other agencies and organizations, including the
department of social and health services, that have related
transportation responsibilities;
(b) Identify and examine both obstacles to and opportunities for
improving effective coordination in relation to, but not limited to,
the following:
(i) Coordinating provider billing;
(ii) Establishing a uniform system for reporting trips;
(iii) Standardizing provider agreements and reporting requirements;
(iv) Streamlining or centralizing access to customer services;
(v) Opportunities for transit and community service providers to
work more closely with brokerages or clients;
(vi) Sharing eligibility information and trip requirements between
all participating agencies;
(vii) Using nontraditional service providers, such as public
utility districts;
(viii) Making facility siting decisions for state agencies with
special needs transportation responsibilities;
(ix) Identifying federal funding and related barriers, and
developing strategies to remove those barriers, including improving
state management plans necessary for federal programs with
transportation requirements for the purpose of identifying
opportunities to improve coordination and reasonable cost sharing;
(x) Establishing appropriate statewide standards, developing
strategies to maintain those standards in a decentralized system, and
identifying the state's role in this decentralized system;
(c) Review and consider other relevant model coordinated special
needs transportation systems throughout the nation as a source of best
practices for Washington state, including the ACCESS transportation
system in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania; and
(d) Conduct a comprehensive statewide survey of existing
transportation resources for persons with special needs.
(3) Staff support shall be provided by the committee.
(4) The committee shall provide a final report, with specific
recommendations on best practices to effectively coordinate
transportation services for persons with special needs at the
subregional level, to the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees by December 1, 2007.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.06B.900 and 1999 c 385 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The agency council on coordinated transportation is terminated on
June 30, ((2007)) 2010, as provided in RCW 47.06B.901.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.80.023 and 1998 c 171 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each regional transportation planning organization shall have the
following duties:
(1) Prepare and periodically update a transportation strategy for
the region. The strategy shall address alternative transportation
modes and transportation demand management measures in regional
corridors and shall recommend preferred transportation policies to
implement adopted growth strategies. The strategy shall serve as a
guide in preparation of the regional transportation plan.
(2) Prepare a regional transportation plan as set forth in RCW
47.80.030 that is consistent with county-wide planning policies if such
have been adopted pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, with county, city,
and town comprehensive plans, and state transportation plans.
(3) Certify by December 31, 1996, that the transportation elements
of comprehensive plans adopted by counties, cities, and towns within
the region reflect the guidelines and principles developed pursuant to
RCW 47.80.026, are consistent with the adopted regional transportation
plan, and, where appropriate, conform with the requirements of RCW
36.70A.070.
(4) Where appropriate, certify that county-wide planning policies
adopted under RCW 36.70A.210 and the adopted regional transportation
plan are consistent.
(5) Develop, in cooperation with the department of transportation,
operators of public transportation services and local governments
within the region, a six-year regional transportation improvement
program which proposes regionally significant transportation projects
and programs and transportation demand management measures. The
regional transportation improvement program shall be based on the
programs, projects, and transportation demand management measures of
regional significance as identified by transit agencies, cities, and
counties pursuant to RCW 35.58.2795, 35.77.010, and 36.81.121,
respectively. The program shall include a priority list of projects
and programs, project segments and programs, transportation demand
management measures, and a specific financial plan that demonstrates
how the transportation improvement program can be funded. The program
shall be updated at least every two years for the ensuing six-year
period.
(6) Designate a lead planning agency to coordinate preparation of
the regional transportation plan and carry out the other
responsibilities of the organization. The lead planning agency may be
a regional organization, a component county, city, or town agency, or
the appropriate Washington state department of transportation district
office.
(7) Review level of service methodologies used by cities and
counties planning under chapter 36.70A RCW to promote a consistent
regional evaluation of transportation facilities and corridors.
(8) Work with cities, counties, transit agencies, the department of
transportation, and others to develop level of service standards or
alternative transportation performance measures.
(9) Submit to the agency council on coordinated transportation, as
provided in chapter 47.06B RCW, beginning on July 1, 2007, and every
other year thereafter, an updated plan that includes the elements
identified by the council.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.06B.901 and 1999 c 385 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, ((2008)) 2011:
(1) RCW 47.06B.010 and 1999 c 385 s 1 & 1998 c 173 s 1;
(2) RCW 47.06B.012 and 1999 c 385 s 2;
(3) RCW 47.06B.015 and 2007 c ... s 1 (section 1 of this act) &
1999 c 385 s 3;
(4) RCW 47.06B.020 and ((1999 c 385 s 4 &)) 1998 c 173 s 2;
(5) RCW 47.06B.030 and 2007 c ... s 2 (section 2 of this act), 1999
c 385 s 5, & 1998 c 173 s 3; ((and))
(6) RCW 47.06B.040 and 2007 c ... s 3 (section 3 of this act) &
1999 c 385 s 6; and
(7) Section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 1999 c 372 s 13 is repealed.

--- END ---