BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
When the owner of a mobile home park, as defined in RCW 59.20.030,
is collecting garbage for that park's tenants on the effective date of
an annexation by a city or town, the owner may continue collecting
garbage for that mobile home park.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.13.280 and 1997 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except under section 1 of this act, the annexation by any city or
town of any territory pursuant to those provisions of chapter 35.10 RCW
which relate to the annexation of a city or town to a city or town, or
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 35.13 RCW shall cancel, as of the
effective date of such annexation, any franchise or permit theretofore
granted to any person, firm or corporation by the state of Washington,
or by the governing body of such annexed territory, authorizing or
otherwise permitting the operation of any public transportation,
garbage disposal or other similar public service business or facility
within the limits of the annexed territory, but the holder of any such
franchise or permit canceled pursuant to this section shall be
forthwith granted by the annexing city or town a franchise to continue
such business within the annexed territory for a term of not less than
seven years from the date of issuance thereof, and the annexing city or
town, by franchise, permit or public operation, shall not extend
similar or competing services to the annexed territory except upon a
proper showing of the inability or refusal of such person, firm or
corporation to adequately service said annexed territory at a
reasonable price: PROVIDED, That the provisions of this section shall
not preclude the purchase by the annexing city or town of said
franchise, business, or facilities at an agreed or negotiated price, or
from acquiring the same by condemnation upon payment of damages,
including a reasonable amount for the loss of the franchise or permit.
In the event that any person, firm or corporation whose franchise or
permit has been canceled by the terms of this section shall suffer any
measurable damages as a result of any annexation pursuant to the
provisions of the laws above-mentioned, such person, firm or
corporation shall have a right of action against any city or town
causing such damages.
After an annexation by a city or town, the utilities and
transportation commission shall continue to regulate solid waste
collection within the limits of the annexed territory until such time
as the city or town notifies the commission, in writing, of its
decision to contract for solid waste collection or provide solid waste
collection itself pursuant to RCW 81.77.020. In the event the annexing
city or town at any time decides to contract for solid waste collection
or decides to undertake solid waste collection itself, the holder of
any such franchise or permit that is so canceled in whole or in part
shall be forthwith granted by the annexing city or town a franchise to
continue such business within the annexed territory for a term of not
less than the remaining term of the original franchise or permit, or
not less than seven years, whichever is the shorter period, and the
city or town, by franchise, permit, or public operation, shall not
extend similar or competing services to the annexed territory except
upon a proper showing of the inability or refusal of such person, firm,
or corporation to adequately service the annexed territory at a
reasonable price. Upon the effective date specified by the city or
town council's ordinance or resolution to have the city or town
contract for solid waste collection or undertake solid waste collection
itself, the transition period specified in this section begins to run.
This section does not preclude the purchase by the annexing city or
town of the franchise, business, or facilities at an agreed or
negotiated price, or from acquiring the same by condemnation upon
payment of damages, including a reasonable amount for the loss of the
franchise or permit. In the event that any person, firm, or
corporation whose franchise or permit has been canceled by the terms of
this section suffers any measurable damages as a result of any
annexation pursuant to this chapter, such person, firm, or corporation
has a right of action against any city or town causing such damages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
When the owner of a mobile home park, as defined in RCW 59.20.030,
is collecting garbage for that park's tenants on the effective date of
an annexation by a code city, the owner may continue collecting garbage
for that mobile home park.

Sec. 4 RCW 35A.14.900 and 1997 c 171 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except under section 3 of this act, the annexation by any code city
of any territory pursuant to this chapter shall cancel, as of the
effective date of such annexation, any franchise or permit theretofore
granted to any person, firm or corporation by the state of Washington,
or by the governing body of such annexed territory, authorizing or
otherwise permitting the operation of any public utility, including but
not limited to, public electric, water, transportation, garbage
disposal or other similar public service business or facility within
the limits of the annexed territory, but the holder of any such
franchise or permit canceled pursuant to this section shall be
forthwith granted by the annexing code city a franchise to continue
such business within the annexed territory for a term of not less than
seven years from the date of issuance thereof, and the annexing code
city, by franchise, permit or public operation, shall not extend
similar or competing services to the annexed territory except upon a
proper showing of the inability or refusal of such person, firm or
corporation to adequately service said annexed territory at a
reasonable price: PROVIDED, That the provisions of this section shall
not preclude the purchase by the annexing code city of said franchise,
business, or facilities at an agreed or negotiated price, or from
acquiring the same by condemnation upon payment of damages, including
a reasonable amount for the loss of the franchise or permit. In the
event that any person, firm or corporation whose franchise or permit
has been canceled by the terms of this section shall suffer any
measurable damages as a result of any annexation pursuant to the
provisions of the laws above-mentioned, such person, firm or
corporation shall have a right of action against any code city causing
such damages.
After an annexation by a code city, the utilities and
transportation commission shall continue to regulate solid waste
collection within the limits of the annexed territory until such time
as the city notifies the commission, in writing, of its decision to
contract for solid waste collection or provide solid waste collection
itself pursuant to RCW 81.77.020. In the event the annexing city at
any time decides to contract for solid waste collection or decides to
undertake solid waste collection itself, the holder of any such
franchise or permit that is so canceled in whole or in part shall be
forthwith granted by the annexing city a franchise to continue such
business within the annexed territory for a term of not less than the
remaining term of the original franchise or permit, or not less than
seven years, whichever is the shorter period, and the city, by
franchise, permit, or public operation, shall not extend similar or
competing services to the annexed territory except upon a proper
showing of the inability or refusal of such person, firm, or
corporation to adequately service the annexed territory at a reasonable
price. Upon the effective date specified by the code city council's
ordinance or resolution to have the code city contract for solid waste
collection or undertake solid waste collection itself, the transition
period specified in this section begins to run. This section does not
preclude the purchase by the annexing city of the franchise, business,
or facilities at an agreed or negotiated price, or from acquiring the
same by condemnation upon payment of damages, including a reasonable
amount for the loss of the franchise or permit. In the event that any
person, firm, or corporation whose franchise or permit has been
canceled by the terms of this section suffers any measurable damages as
a result of any annexation pursuant to this chapter, such person, firm,
or corporation has a right of action against any city causing such
damages.

--- END ---