BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county that designates or expands an urban growth area under
RCW 36.70A.110, or approves a new or modified fully contained community
under RCW 36.70A.350 must, in coordination with affected cities,
develop an urban growth area capital facilities plan that:
(a) Identifies the public facilities and urban governmental
services needed to serve the designated or expanded urban growth area,
or the new or modified fully contained community to comply with the
level of service standards adopted by the applicable jurisdiction;
(b) Identifies the projected funding sources to pay for the
facilities and services identified in (a) of this subsection. Funding
projections developed under this subsection must be based on historic
funding levels, projected revenue growth, and changes in funding
sources that the jurisdiction anticipates to occur during the planning
period identified in (c) of this subsection. If anticipated funding
sources do not become available, the list of projected funding sources
identified under this subsection (1)(b) must be revised; and
(c) Identifies a schedule for providing the facilities and services
identified in (a) of this subsection.
(2) The urban growth area capital facilities plan required by this
section must be adopted as an amendment to the county's comprehensive
plan. The urban growth area capital facilities plan may be prepared
prior to or concurrent with the: (a) Designation or expansion of an
urban growth area; or (b) approval of a new or modified fully contained
community.
(3) If a facility or service identified under subsection (1)(a) of
this section is not provided by the county developing the urban growth
area capital facilities plan, the county must consult with the
applicable facility or service provider.
(4) If a designated or expanded urban growth area, or a new or
modified fully contained community will increase traffic on a
transportation facility that is owned by a public entity other than the
county preparing the urban growth area capital facilities plan, the
county must consult with the applicable public entity. The public
entities are encouraged to analyze the impacts of the proposal and
suggest measures that would mitigate any adverse impacts on the
facility or bring the facility into compliance with its level of
service standards. The consultation should occur as early in the
planning process as possible.

--- END ---