BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.350 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
A county required or choosing to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 may
establish a process as part of its urban growth areas, that are
designated under RCW 36.70A.110, for reviewing proposals to authorize
new fully contained communities located outside of the initially
designated urban growth areas.
(1) A new fully contained community may be approved in a county
planning under this chapter if criteria, including but not limited to
the following, are met:
(a) New infrastructure is provided for and impact fees are
established consistent with the requirements of RCW 82.02.050;
(b) Transit-oriented site planning and traffic demand management
programs are implemented and given priority over plans to accommodate
single occupant vehicles;
(c) Buffers are provided between the new fully contained
communities and adjacent urban development;
(d) The new fully contained community will not encourage further
urban development of intervening rural areas or natural resource lands
designated under RCW 36.70A.170 that are located between the fully
contained community and urban growth areas or other urban development.
In determining whether the new fully contained community will encourage
further urban development under this subsection (1)(d), the county must
consider:
(i) The size of the rural area;
(ii) The potential for impacts on rural areas and resource lands;
(iii) The potential long-term impacts on rural areas and resource
lands resulting from providing urban governmental services to and
within the fully contained community;
(iv) Whether regional transportation corridors in relation to the
fully contained community will encourage commuting rather than
providing employment and services within the fully contained community;
and
(v) The proximity and relationship of the new fully contained
community to other urban growth areas;
(e) A mix of uses, including an employment center and a commercial
center, is provided to offer jobs, housing, and services to the
residents of the new community, and to achieve a balance between jobs
and housing. If approved, the fully contained community must include
a plan to assure that employment opportunities and services are made
available concurrently with the construction of new housing;
(((e))) (f) Affordable housing is provided within the new community
for a broad range of income levels. The new community must make its
regional fair share of housing available to low and moderate income
households and comply with affordability targets adopted in the
county's comprehensive plan;
(((f))) (g) Environmental protection has been addressed and
provided for, including full compliance with the requirements of this
chapter pertaining to critical areas;
(((g))) (h) Development regulations are established to ensure urban
growth will not occur in adjacent and nearby nonurban areas. These
regulations must also require the developer of the new fully contained
community to purchase development rights from adjacent and nearby
nonurban areas to assure that these areas are protected in perpetuity
from urban development;
(((h))) (i) Provision is made to ((mitigate)) assure that no
impacts result from the approval of the fully contained community on
designated agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource
lands;
(((i))) (j) The plan for the new fully contained community is
consistent with the development regulations established for the
protection of critical areas by the county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170.
(2) Criteria developed by a county to comply with requirements of
subsection (1) of this section must be reviewed and approved by the
department.
(3) New fully contained communities may be approved outside
established urban growth areas only if a county reserves a portion of
the twenty-year population projection and offsets the urban growth area
accordingly for allocation to new fully contained communities that meet
the requirements of this chapter. Any county electing to establish a
new community reserve shall do so no more often than once every five
years as a part of the designation or review of urban growth areas
required by this chapter. The new community reserve shall be allocated
on a project-by-project basis, only after specific project approval
procedures have been adopted pursuant to this chapter as a development
regulation. When a new community reserve is established, urban growth
areas designated pursuant to this chapter shall accommodate the
unreserved portion of the twenty-year population projection.
(4) Final approval of an application for a new fully contained
community shall be considered an adopted amendment to the comprehensive
plan prepared pursuant to RCW 36.70A.070 designating the new fully
contained community as an urban growth area.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.360 and 1998 c 112 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 may permit master planned resorts which may constitute urban
growth outside of urban growth areas as limited by this section. A
master planned resort means a self-contained and fully integrated
planned unit development, in a setting of significant natural
amenities, with primary focus on destination resort facilities
consisting of short-term visitor accommodations associated with a range
of developed on-site indoor or outdoor recreational facilities.
(2) Capital facilities, utilities, and services, including those
related to sewer, water, storm water, security, fire suppression, and
emergency medical, provided on-site shall be limited to meeting the
needs of the master planned resort. Such facilities, utilities, and
services may be provided to a master planned resort by outside service
providers, including municipalities and special purpose districts,
provided that all costs associated with service extensions and capacity
increases directly attributable to the master planned resort are fully
borne by the resort. A master planned resort and service providers may
enter into agreements for shared capital facilities and utilities,
provided that such facilities and utilities serve only the master
planned resort or urban growth areas. Any extensions of sewer or water
services from an urban growth area to the resort must be completed in
a manner that assures that these services are not made available for
the development of intervening rural areas or natural resource lands
designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
Nothing in this subsection may be construed as: Establishing an
order of priority for processing applications for water right permits,
for granting such permits, or for issuing certificates of water right;
altering or authorizing in any manner the alteration of the place of
use for a water right; or affecting or impairing in any manner
whatsoever an existing water right.
All waters or the use of waters shall be regulated and controlled
as provided in chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW and not otherwise.
(3) A master planned resort may ((include other)) allow up to ten
percent of the residential uses within its boundaries to be used for
long-term or full-time occupancy, but only if the residential uses are
integrated into and support the on-site recreational nature of the
resort.
(4) A master planned resort may be authorized by a county only if:
(a) The comprehensive plan specifically ((identifies)) adopts and
implements policies to guide the development of master planned resorts;
(b) The comprehensive plan and development regulations include
restrictions that: (i) Preclude new urban ((or)) and suburban land
uses in the vicinity of the master planned resort, except in areas
((otherwise)) previously designated for urban growth under RCW
36.70A.110; and (ii) establish a transferable development rights
program to assure that nearby rural areas are protected in perpetuity
from urban development;
(c) The county includes a finding as a part of the approval process
that the land is better suited, and has more long-term importance, for
the master planned resort than for the commercial harvesting of timber
or agricultural production, if located on land that otherwise would be
designated as forest land or agricultural land under RCW 36.70A.170;
(d) The county incorporates measures into its comprehensive plan
and development regulations to ensure that the master planned resort
does not interfere with the continued use of nearby forest lands or
agricultural lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170;
(e) The county ensures that the resort plan is consistent with the
development regulations established for critical areas; and
(((e))) (f) On-site and off-site infrastructure and service impacts
are fully considered and mitigated.
(5) Counties may not authorize master planned resorts within the
following areas:
(a) Within twenty-four air miles of an urban growth boundary with
an existing population of one hundred thousand or more unless
residential uses are limited to those necessary for the staff and
management of the resort;
(b) On a site with fifty or more contiguous acres of unique or
prime farmland identified and mapped by the United States natural
resources conservation service or its predecessor agency;
(c) In the Columbia river gorge national scenic area as defined by
the Columbia river gorge national scenic act, P.L. 99-663; or
(d) In forested areas with high potential for catastrophic
wildfires, as determined by the department of natural resources.
(6) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "A setting of significant natural amenities" means features
formed through nature's actions that attract the public for
recreational activities including, but not limited to, ocean beaches,
natural lakes, rivers, mountains, deserts, and wetlands; and
(b) "Self contained" means recreational development that can supply
the daily needs of those who visit the development for recreation,
food, accommodations, and entertainment.

--- END ---