BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.28.085 and 1995 c 373 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Every person who applies a tattoo to any minor under the age
of eighteen is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(b) Every person who engages in body piercing a nipple or the
genitalia of any minor under the age of eighteen is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(2) It is not a defense to a violation of this section that the
person applying the tattoo did not know the minor's age unless the
person applying the tattoo establishes by a preponderance of the
evidence that he or she made a reasonable, bona fide attempt to
ascertain the true age of the minor by requiring production of a
driver's license or other picture identification card or paper and did
not rely solely on the oral allegations or apparent age of the minor.
(3) For the purposes of this section((,)):
(a) "Tattoo" includes any permanent marking or coloring of the skin
with any pigment, ink, or dye, or any procedure that leaves a visible
scar on the skin.
(b) "Body piercing" means the process of penetrating the skin or
mucous membrane for the purpose of insertion of an object, including
jewelry, for cosmetic purposes. "Body piercing" also includes any scar
tissue resulting from or relating to the piercing. "Body piercing"
does not include the use of stud and clasp piercing systems to pierce
the earlobe in accordance with the manufacturer's directions and
applicable United States food and drug administration requirements.
"Body piercing" does not include any health-related procedures
performed by licensed health practitioners under their scope of
practice.
(4) Medical procedures performed by a licensed physician are
exempted from this section.

--- END ---