BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means a health sciences and services authority
created pursuant to this chapter.
(2) "Board" means the governing board of trustees of an authority.
(3) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(5) "Health sciences and services" means biosciences that advance
new therapies and procedures to combat disease and promote public
health.
(6) "Local government" means a city, town, or county.
(7) "Sponsoring local government" means a city, town, or county
that creates a health sciences and services authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 PURPOSE. The health sciences and services
program is created to promote bioscience-based economic development and
advance new therapies and procedures to combat disease and promote
public health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 CREATION. A local government must establish
by ordinance or resolution an authority. At a minimum, the ordinance
must:
(1) Specify the powers to be exercised by the authority;
(2) Reserve the local government's right to dissolve the authority
after its contractual responsibilities have expired;
(3) Establish an administrative board, including: (a) The number
of board members; (b) the times and terms of appointment for each board
position; (c) the amount of compensation, if any, to be paid to board
members; (d) the procedures for removing board members and filing
vacancies; and (e) the qualifications for the appointment of
individuals to the board;
(4) Establish the authority's boundaries, which must be contiguous
tracts of land;
(5) Ensure that private and public funds provided to the authority
will be segregated;
(6) Establish guidelines under which the authority may invest its
funds;
(7) Provide the requirements for auditing the records of the
authority; and
(8) Require the local government's legal counsel to also provide
legal services to the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 APPLICATIONS. (1) The department may
approve applications submitted by local governments for an area's
designation as a health sciences and services authority under this
chapter. The director shall determine the division to review
applications submitted by local governments under this chapter. The
application for designation shall be in the form and manner and contain
such information as the department may prescribe, provided the
application shall:
(a) Contain sufficient information to enable the director to
determine the viability of the proposal;
(b) Demonstrate that an ordinance or resolution has been passed by
the legislative authority of a local government that delineates the
boundaries of an area that may be designated an authority;
(c) Be submitted on behalf of the local government, or, if that
office does not exist, by the legislative body of the local government;
(d) Demonstrate that the public funds directed to programs or
facilities in the authority will leverage private sector resources and
contributions to activities to be performed;
(e) Provide a plan or plans for the development of the authority as
an entity to advance as a cluster for health sciences education, health
sciences research, biotechnology development, biotechnology product
commercialization, and/or health care services; and
(f) Demonstrate that the state has previously provided funds to
health sciences and services programs or facilities in the applicant
city, town, or county.
(2) The director shall determine the division to develop criteria
to evaluate the application. The criteria shall include:
(a) The presence of infrastructure capable of spurring development
of the area as a center of health sciences and services;
(b) The presence of higher education facilities where undergraduate
or graduate coursework or research is conducted; and
(c) The presence of facilities in which health services are
provided.
(3) There shall be no more than one authority statewide.
(4) The director may reject or approve an application. When
denying an application, the director must specify the application's
deficiencies. The decision regarding such designation as it relates to
a specific local government is final; however, a rejected application
may be resubmitted.
(5) Applications are due December 31, 2007, and must be processed
within sixty days of submission.
(6) The director may, at his or her discretion, amend the
boundaries of an authority upon the request of the local government.
(7) The department may adopt any rules necessary to implement this
act within one hundred twenty days of the effective date of this
section.
(8) The department must develop evaluation and performance measures
in order to evaluate the effectiveness of the programs in the
authorities that are funded with public resources. A report to the
legislature shall be due on a biennial basis beginning December 1,
2009. In addition, the department shall develop evaluation criteria
that enables the local governments to measure the effectiveness of the
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 BOARD. (1) An authority shall be overseen
by a board with not more than fourteen members. Board members shall be
appointed by the sponsoring local government and must reside within the
jurisdiction of the local government that created the authority. The
authority board shall select the chair.
(2) A simple majority of the board members shall constitute a
quorum.
(3) The board shall annually elect a secretary and any other
officers it deems necessary.
(4) The local government shall designate an individual with
financial experience to serve as treasurer. The individual may be a
city or county treasurer, city or county auditor, or a private party.
If the treasurer is a private party, the local government shall require
a bond in an amount and under such terms and conditions as the local
government deems necessary to protect the authority. The treasurer
shall have the power to create and maintain funds, issue warrants, and
invest funds in its possession.
(5) The board may adopt bylaws or rules for their own governance.
(6) Meetings of the board shall be held in accordance with the open
public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, and at the call of the chair or
when a majority of the board so requests. Meetings of the board may be
held at any location and board members may participate in a meeting of
the board by means of a conference telephone or similar communication
equipment under RCW 23B.08.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 POWERS AND DUTIES. (1) The authority has
all the general powers necessary to carry out its purposes and duties
and to exercise its specific powers, including the authority may:
(a) Sue and be sued in its own name;
(b) Make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments,
with any public or private entity or person, in accordance with this
chapter;
(c) Employ, contract with, or engage independent counsel, financial
advisors, auditors, other technical or professional assistants, and
such other personnel as are necessary or desirable to implement this
chapter;
(d) Establish such special funds, and control deposits to and
disbursements from them, as it finds convenient for the implementation
of this chapter;
(e) Enter into contracts with public and private entities for
research to be conducted in this state;
(f) Delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the
purposes of this chapter;
(g) Exercise any other power reasonably required to implement the
purposes of this chapter; and
(h) Hire staff and pay administrative costs; however, such expenses
shall be paid from moneys provided by the sponsoring local government
and moneys received from gifts, grants, and bequests and the interest
earned on the authority's accounts and investments.
(2) In addition to other powers and duties prescribed in this
chapter, the authority is empowered to:
(a) Use the authority's public moneys, leveraging those moneys with
amounts received from other public and private sources in accordance
with contribution agreements, promote bioscience-based economic
development, and advance new therapies and procedures to combat disease
and promote public health;
(b) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, and bequests, and enter into
contribution agreements with private entities and public entities to
receive moneys in consideration of the authority's promise to leverage
those moneys with the revenue generated by the tax authorized under
section 11 of this act and contributions from other public entities and
private entities, in order to use those moneys to promote bioscience-based economic development and advance new therapies and procedures to
combat disease and promote public health;
(c) Hold funds received by the authority in trust for their use
pursuant to this chapter to promote bioscience-based economic
development and advance new therapies and procedures to combat disease
and promote public health;
(d) Manage its funds, obligations, and investments as necessary and
consistent with its purpose, including the segregation of revenues into
separate funds and accounts;
(e) Make grants to entities pursuant to contract to promote
bioscience-based economic development and advance new therapies and
procedures to combat disease and promote public health. Grant
agreements shall specify the deliverables to be provided by the
recipient pursuant to the grant. Grants to private entities may only
be provided under a contractual agreement that ensures the state will
receive appropriate consideration, such as an assurance of job creation
or retention, or the delivery of services that provide for the public
health, safety, and welfare. The authority shall solicit requests for
funding and evaluate the requests by reference to factors such as: (i)
The quality of the proposed research; (ii) its potential to improve
health outcomes, with particular attention to the likelihood that it
will also lower health care costs, substitute for a more costly
diagnostic or treatment modality, or offer a breakthrough treatment for
a particular disease or condition; (iii) its potential to leverage
additional funding; (iv) its potential to provide health care benefits;
(v) its potential to stimulate employment; and (vi) evidence of public
and private collaboration;
(f) Create one or more advisory boards composed of scientists,
industrialists, and others familiar with health sciences and services;
and
(g) Adopt policies and procedures to facilitate the orderly process
of grant application, review, and reward.
(3) The records of the authority shall be subject to audit by the
office of the state auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 GENERAL INDEBTEDNESS--GENERAL OBLIGATION
BONDS. (1) A local government that creates a health sciences and
services authority may incur general indebtedness, and issue general
obligation bonds, to finance the grants and other programs and retire
the indebtedness in whole or in part from the funds distributed
pursuant to section 11 of this act and subject to the following
requirements:
(a) The ordinance adopted by the local government creating the
authority and authorizing the use of the excise tax in section 11 of
this act indicates an intent to incur this indebtedness and the maximum
amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated; and
(b) The local government includes this statement of the intent in
all notices.
(2) The general indebtedness incurred under this section may be
payable from other tax revenues, the full faith and credit of the
sponsoring local government, and nontax income, revenues, fees, and
rents from the public improvements, as well as contributions, grants,
and nontax money available to the local government for payment of costs
of the grants and other programs or associated debt service on the
general indebtedness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 LIMITATION ON BONDS ISSUED. The bonds
issued by a local government under section 7 of this act shall not
constitute an obligation of the state of Washington, either general or
special.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 LIABILITY. (1) Members of the board, as
well as other persons acting on behalf of the authority, while acting
within the scope of their employment or agency, shall not be subject to
personal liability resulting from their official duties conferred on
them under this chapter.
(2) The state, the local government that created the authority, and
the authority shall not be liable for any loss, damage, harm, or other
consequences resulting directly or indirectly from grants provided by
the authority or from programs, services, research, or other activities
funded with such grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 DISSOLUTION. The board may petition the
sponsoring local government to be dissolved upon a showing that it has
no reason to exist and that any assets it retains must be returned to
the state treasurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning October 1, 2007, the department shall distribute, on
a quarterly basis, to a local government with a health sciences and
services authority an amount equal to 0.0075 percent of the proceeds
generated by the taxes authorized under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
within that local government's jurisdiction during the previous
quarter. The amounts received under this section may only be used in
accordance with section 6 of this act or to finance and retire the
indebtedness incurred pursuant to section 7 of this act, in whole or in
part.
(2) This section expires January 1, 2013.

Sec. 12 RCW 42.56.270 and 2006 c 369 s 2, 2006 c 341 s 6, 2006 c
338 s 5, 2006 c 302 s 12, 2006 c 209 s 7, 2006 c 183 s 37, and 2006 c
171 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 15.110, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Financial or proprietary information supplied to the liquor
control board including the amount of beer or wine sold by a domestic
winery, brewery, microbrewery, or certificate of approval holder under
RCW 66.24.206(1) or 66.24.270(2)(a) and including the amount of beer or
wine purchased by a retail licensee in connection with a retail
licensee's obligation under RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, for receipt of
shipments of beer or wine.
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
community, trade, and economic development:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development pursuant to RCW 43.330.050(8) and 43.330.080(4); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the office of the governor in connection with the
siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that
person's business and until a siting decision is made, identifying
information of any person supplying information under this subsection
and the locations being considered for siting, relocation, or expansion
of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of community, trade, and
economic development based on information as described in (a)(i) of
this subsection, any work product is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of community, trade, and economic development from a
person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or
relocation of that person's business, information described in (a)(ii)
of this subsection will be available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085; ((and))
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit((.));
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 are subject to RCW
42.56.610 and 90.64.190; and
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
sections 1 through 6 of this act, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information.

Sec. 13 RCW 42.56.270 and 2006 c 369 s 2, 2006 c 341 s 6, 2006 c
338 s 5, 2006 c 209 s 7, 2006 c 183 s 37, and 2006 c 171 s 8 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 15.110, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
community, trade, and economic development:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development pursuant to RCW 43.330.050(8) and 43.330.080(4); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the office of the governor in connection with the
siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that
person's business and until a siting decision is made, identifying
information of any person supplying information under this subsection
and the locations being considered for siting, relocation, or expansion
of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of community, trade, and
economic development based on information as described in (a)(i) of
this subsection, any work product is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of community, trade, and economic development from a
person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or
relocation of that person's business, information described in (a)(ii)
of this subsection will be available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information; (15) Financial and commercial
information provided as evidence to the department of licensing as
required by RCW 19.112.110 or 19.112.120, except information disclosed
in aggregate form that does not permit the identification of
information related to individual fuel licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085; ((and))
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit((.));
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190; and
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
sections 1 through 6 of this act, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are
not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 10 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 EXPIRATION DATE. Section 12 of this act
expires June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 13 of this act
takes effect June 30, 2008.

--- END ---