BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.36001 and 2001 c 236 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Until July 30, 2007,)) The state consents to the jurisdiction of
the federal courts in actions brought by a tribe pursuant to the Indian
gaming regulatory act of 1988 or seeking enforcement of a state/tribal
compact adopted under the Indian gaming regulatory act, conditioned
upon the tribe entering into such a compact and providing similar
consent. This limited waiver of sovereign immunity shall not extend to
actions other than those expressly set forth herein ((and properly
filed on or before July 29, 2007.
This section expires July 30, 2007)).

--- END ---