BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that pursuing energy
efficiency, conservation, and renewable energy efforts should be a
priority for the state and its local communities. The legislature
recognizes that opportunities exist for funding these efforts. In
addition, there are models from other jurisdictions for increasing
energy efficiency, conservation, and renewable energy. It is the
intent of the legislature that the Washington State University energy
program study these issues and create a Washington state energy
efficiency and renewable energy road map.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington State University energy program, in consultation
with the department of ecology and the community, trade, and economic
development energy policy division, must conduct a study to create an
energy efficiency and renewable energy road map for the state. The
study must:
(a) Evaluate the state's current efforts with respect to energy
efficiency, conservation, and renewable energy;
(b) Evaluate the state's role in regional efforts to improve energy
efficiency, conservation, and renewable energy;
(c) Evaluate the effectiveness of other jurisdictions with
established programs for funding energy efficiency, conservation, and
renewable energy;
(d) Evaluate methods for funding energy efficiency, conservation,
and renewable energy;
(e) Evaluate funding sources for municipalities to promote energy
efficiency, conservation, and renewable energy projects;
(f) Identify areas where the state needs to increase energy
efficiency, conservation, and renewable energy;
(g) Identify areas where the state could establish, expand, or fund
efforts related to energy efficiency, conservation, and renewable
energy;
(h) Identify methods and create recommended strategies to fund
energy efficiency, conservation, and renewable energy in areas where
increased efforts are needed; and
(i) Create the Washington state energy efficiency and renewable
energy road map containing recommended steps to be taken by the state,
local governments, the Washington State University energy program, and
other interested parties to establish, fund, and expand energy
efficiency, conservation, and renewable energy in the state.
(2) In conducting the study to create the Washington state energy
efficiency and renewable energy road map, the Washington State
University energy program shall consult with the following:
(a) Representatives from all state agencies that deal with energy
issues;
(b) Representatives from public utility districts;
(c) Representatives from electric utilities regulated by the
utilities and transportation commission;
(d) A representative from a private industry engaged in business
related to energy efficiency and conservation;
(e) A representative from an environmental organization;
(f) A representative of energy users including commercial,
industrial, and residential users;
(g) A representative of a regional agency that monitors air
quality;
(h) A representative from an organization that represents
municipalities;
(i) A representative from an organization that deals with carbon
offsets; and
(j) A representative from a regional organization involved in
energy planning and distribution.
(3) The Washington State University energy program must report its
results and provide the Washington state energy efficiency and
renewable energy road map to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 31, 2008.
(4) This section expires January 31, 2009.

--- END ---