BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds Bastyr University, a
nonprofit, private university, is located adjacent to Saint Edward
state park. The legislature also recognizes the fact that Bastyr
University has recently adopted a twenty-five-year campus master plan
that outlines significant growth for the university over the next few
decades. Growth of both the university's enrollment and physical size
will have an impact on the neighboring Saint Edward state park. The
legislature finds that the state parks and recreation commission should
work with Bastyr University and complete necessary planning to address
the potential future impact on Saint Edward state park that may arise
from the planned expansion of Bastyr University.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The state parks and recreation
commission shall initiate and complete an in-depth review and full
planning process to address the immediate and long-term potential
future impacts to Saint Edward state park arising from the planned
expansion of Bastyr University. The planning process must, at a
minimum, consider the impacts on:
(a) Traffic in and around the park, including all access roads;
(b) Emergency vehicle access;
(c) Parking in the park;
(d) The adequacy of the park's utilities;
(e) The impacts of increased use of the facilities, including the
swimming pool, the gymnasium, the sports field, the great lawn, and
hiking and biking trails; and
(f) The impacts of increased use on the flora and fauna of the
park.
(2) The review conducted under this section must also consider the
utility of and barriers to a cost-sharing agreement between the state
parks and recreation commission and Bastyr University to financially
aid the park in the execution of the plan developed under this section.
(3) The documents required by this section must be completed and
reported to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1,
2008. Prior to the final adoption of the required documents, the state
parks and recreation commission shall conduct at least one public
hearing on the draft documents in a community near Saint Edward state
park.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 31, 2008.

--- END ---