BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Through modernization programs reflecting the specific needs
and capabilities of the individual firms, Washington manufacturers can
compete successfully in the market of the future and provide living
wage jobs. Most small and midsize manufacturers will face financing,
marketing, production, or other challenges during their early
formation. Often, they do not have the resources that will allow them
to easily access the technical assistance and skills training needed to
make them globally competitive;
(b) Foreign markets are now providing small manufacturers with
opportunities for direct sale of their products and for opportunities
to become a supplier in a large manufacturer's supply chain. To enter
these markets, advanced manufacturers must demonstrate high standards
of product and process quality and be certified by organizations such
as the international standards organization 9000 and the AS9100
aerospace standard. In the United States, Washington is twentieth in
the total number of manufacturers, but twenty-fifth in the number of
international standards organization certified firms, and thirty-first
out of all states in the percentage of companies that are certified by
the international standards organization;
(c) Public and private partnerships directed at business education
may result in benefits to manufacturing and improvements to the
environment. Through a recent federally funded pilot project between
the department of ecology and Washington manufacturing services,
several small manufacturing firms found significant benefits through a
"lean and clean" manufacturing education program. The project
demonstrated that the partnerships assist manufacturers in reducing
their operating costs, increase their environmental compliance, and
expand the opportunity for the manufacturers to grow jobs within the
state; and
(d) Washington state manufacturers will be successful only if they
are able to attract employees with the right mix of skills in certain
job functions to meet the demands of modern manufacturing. The "dream
it do it" campaign, which is being coordinated in Washington state by
Washington manufacturing services, is providing information on a wide
range of ways in which students can learn about high paying careers in
manufacturing and how they might qualify for those jobs. An early
understanding of career opportunities and of those skills necessary to
enter such professions will improve the qualifications of our workforce
and ensure economic expansion within our manufacturing community.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that Washington state
increase its support for the manufacturing extension program, to expand
the delivery of modernization services to small Washington
manufacturers, and to leverage federal and private resources devoted to
such efforts.

Sec. 2 RCW 24.50.010 and 2006 c 34 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Washington manufacturing services is organized as a private,
nonprofit corporation in accordance with chapter 24.03 RCW and this
section. The mission of the center is to operate a modernization
extension system, coordinate a network of public and private
modernization resources, and stimulate the competitiveness of small and
midsize manufacturers in Washington.
(2) Washington manufacturing services shall be governed by a board
of directors. A majority of the board of directors shall be
representatives of small and medium-sized manufacturing firms and
industry associations, networks, or consortia. The board shall also
include at least one member representing labor unions or labor councils
and, as ex officio members, the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development, the executive director of
the state board for community and technical colleges, and the director
of the work force training and education coordinating board, or their
respective designees.
(3) Washington manufacturing services may:
(a) Charge fees for services, make and execute contracts with any
individual, corporation, association, public agency, or any other
entity, and employ all other legal instruments necessary or convenient
for the performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers and
functions under this chapter; and
(b) Receive funds from federal, state, or local governments,
private businesses, foundations, or any other source for purposes
consistent with this chapter.
(4) Washington manufacturing services shall:
(a) Develop policies, plans, and programs to assist in the
modernization of businesses in targeted sectors of Washington's economy
and coordinate the delivery of modernization services;
(b) Create programs which:
(i) Provide modernization services to manufacturing firms with
fifty or fewer employees;
(ii) Assist small manufacturers to become certified in
internationally accepted quality assurance programs; or
(iii) Develop partnerships for the delivery of services which will
assist manufacturers in reducing costs, and increases their
environmental compliance;
(c) Provide information about the advantages of modernization and
the modernization services available in the state to federal, state,
and local economic development officials, state colleges and
universities, and private providers;
(((c))) (d) Collaborate with the Washington quality initiative in
the development of manufacturing quality standards and quality
certification programs;
(((d))) (e) Serve as an information clearinghouse and provide
access for users to the federal manufacturing extension partnership
national research and information system; and
(((e))) (f) Provide, either directly or through contracts,
assistance to industry associations, networks, or consortia, that would
be of value to their member firms in:
(i) Adopting advanced business management practices such as
strategic planning and total quality management;
(ii) Developing mechanisms for interfirm collaboration and
cooperation;
(iii) Appraising, purchasing, installing, and effectively using
equipment, technologies, and processes that improve the quality of
goods and services and the productivity of the firm;
(iv) Improving human resource systems and work force training in a
manner that moves firms toward flexible, high-performance work
organizations;
(v) Developing new products;
(vi) Conducting market research, analysis, and development of new
sales channels and export markets;
(vii) Improving processes to enhance environmental, health, and
safety compliance; and
(viii) Improving credit, capital management, and business finance
skills.

--- END ---