BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with estimates for calendar year 2005, the insurance
commissioner must annually calculate cost-shifting estimates that
estimate the percentage of total health benefit plan premiums charged
by health carriers in this state that reflects the statewide cost of
uncompensated health care. These annual estimates must be posted on
the web site of the office of the insurance commissioner by October 1st
of the year immediately following the completed calendar year that
immediately followed the year for which the estimate was made.
(2)(a) Beginning with health benefit plan premiums billed on and
after January 1, 2008, a health carrier must, at least annually,
provide the following information with its premium billing:
(i) The most current cost-shifting estimate determined by the
insurance commissioner under subsection (1) of this section at the time
of the billing; and
(ii) The amount, as a percentage of the health carrier's average
premium per member per month, of the health carrier's surplus that
exceeds the level defined in RCW 48.43.300(9)(a) as reported to the
insurance commissioner in the carrier's most recent annual report under
RCW 48.43.305 at the time of billing.
(b) The information required to be provided with health benefit
plan premium billings under (a) of this subsection must be conspicuous
and be provided in bold-face type no smaller than the largest type used
to display billing information.
(3) The insurance commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this section.

--- END ---