BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The joint transportation committee shall
conduct an audit and review of the department of transportation's
project cost estimating processes for projects funded by the 2003
nickel account and the 2005 transportation partnership account. The
review may include the use of an expert review panel to determine if
best practices are being used to estimate project costs. The review
must include an analysis of the accuracy of previous cost estimates
compared to actual costs for completed projects, and current project
cost estimates compared to original estimates for projects that are not
yet completed. The joint transportation committee shall report its
findings and recommendations to the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees by December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of one hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2009, from the motor vehicle fund to the
joint transportation committee for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---