BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.43.120 and 2001 c 96 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who possesses:
(a) More than fifteen, but less than thirty, grams of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers, or a combination of any of those substances, is guilty of
a gross misdemeanor.
(b) Thirty grams or more of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, or a
combination of any of those substances, is guilty of a class C felony.
(2) This section does not apply to any of the following:
(a) A pharmacist or other authorized person who sells or furnishes
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers upon the prescription of a practitioner,
as defined in RCW 69.41.010;
(b) A practitioner who administers or furnishes ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers to his or her patients;
(c) A pharmacy, manufacturer, or wholesaler licensed by, or
shopkeeper or itinerant vendor registered with, the department of
health under chapter 18.64 RCW;
(d) A person in the course of his or her business of selling,
transporting, or storing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, for a
person described in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection; or
(e) A person in possession of more than fifteen grams of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers in their home or residence under circumstances consistent
with typical medicinal or household use as indicated by, but not
limited to, storage location and possession of products in a variety of
strengths, brands, types, purposes, and expiration dates.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.43.105 and 2005 c 388 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "traditional Chinese herbal
practitioner" means a person who is certified as a diplomate in Chinese
herbology from the national certification commission for acupuncture
and oriental medicine or who has received a certificate in Chinese
herbology from a school accredited by the accreditation council on
acupuncture and oriental medicine.
(2) A pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or
an employee thereof, a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a
traditional Chinese herbal practitioner may not knowingly sell,
transfer, or otherwise furnish to any person a product at retail that
he or she knows to contain any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, without first obtaining photo identification of the
person that shows the date of birth of the person.
(3) A person buying or receiving a product at retail containing any
detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, from
a pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor registered
with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or an employee
thereof, a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a traditional
Chinese herbal practitioner must first produce photo identification of
the person that shows the date of birth of the person.
(4) Any product containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, shall be kept in a central location that is not
accessible by customers without assistance of an employee of the
merchant.
(5) No pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or
an employee thereof, a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a
traditional Chinese herbal practitioner may sell any product containing
any detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, to
a person that is not at least eighteen years old.
(6) The board of pharmacy, by rule, may exempt products containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers, in combination with another active
ingredient from the requirements of this section if they are found not
to be used in the illegal manufacture of methamphetamine or other
controlled dangerous substances. A manufacturer of a drug product may
apply for removal of the product from the requirements of this section
if the product is determined by the board to have been formulated in
such a way as to effectively prevent the conversion of the active
ingredient into methamphetamine. The burden of proof for exemption is
upon the person requesting the exemption. The petitioner shall provide
the board with evidence that the product has been formulated in such a
way as to serve as an effective general deterrent to the conversion of
pseudoephedrine into methamphetamine. The evidence must include the
furnishing of a valid scientific study, conducted by an independent,
professional laboratory and evincing professional quality chemical
analysis. Factors to be considered in whether a product should be
excluded from this section include but are not limited to:
(a) Ease with which the product can be converted to
methamphetamine;
(b) Ease with which ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine is extracted from the substance and whether it
forms an emulsion, salt, or other form;
(c) Whether the product contains a "molecular lock" that renders it
incapable of being converted into methamphetamine;
(d) Presence of other ingredients that render the product less
likely to be used in the manufacture of methamphetamine; and
(e) Any pertinent data that can be used to determine the risk of
the substance being used in the illegal manufacture of methamphetamine
or any other controlled substance.
(7) Nothing in this section applies:
(a) To any product containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers that
is not the only active ingredient and that is in liquid, liquid
capsule, or gel capsule form;
(b) To the sale of a product that may only be sold upon the
presentation of a prescription;
(c) To the sale of a product by a traditional Chinese herbal
practitioner to a patient; or
(d) When the details of the transaction are recorded in a pharmacy
profile individually identified with the recipient and maintained by a
licensed pharmacy.
(8)(a) No pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, a
practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a traditional Chinese
herbal practitioner may retaliate against any employee that has made a
good faith attempt to comply with the requirements of this section by
requesting that a customer present photo identification, making a
reasonable effort to determine the customer's age.
(b) No pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, a
practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a traditional Chinese
herbal practitioner is subject to prosecution under subsection (9) of
this section if they made a good faith attempt to comply with the
requirements of this section by requesting that a customer present
photo identification, making a reasonable effort to determine the
customer's age.
(9) A violation of subsections (1) through (8) of this section is
a gross misdemeanor.
(10) It is a class C felony offense to display or cause or permit
to be displayed any fictitious or fraudulently altered driver's license
or identicard as required under subsection (3) of this section as a
means to purchase or receive a product at retail containing any
detectable quantity of pseudoephedrine or its salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers.

--- END ---