BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.938 and 1995 c 369 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Wherever the term state fire marshal appears in the Revised
Code of Washington or the Washington Administrative Code it shall mean
the director of fire protection.
(2) The chief of the Washington state patrol shall appoint an
officer who shall be known as the director of fire protection. The
board, after consulting with the chief of the Washington state patrol,
shall prescribe qualifications for the position of director of fire
protection. The board shall submit to the chief of the Washington
state patrol a list containing the names of three persons whom the
board believes meet its qualifications. If requested by the chief of
the Washington state patrol, the board shall submit one additional list
of three persons whom the board believes meet its qualifications. The
appointment shall be from one of the lists of persons submitted by the
board.
(3) The director of fire protection may designate one or more
deputies and may delegate to those deputies his or her duties and
authorities as deemed appropriate.
(4) The director of fire protection, in accordance with the
policies, objectives, and priorities of the fire protection policy
board, shall prepare a biennial budget pertaining to fire protection
services. Such biennial budget shall be submitted as part of the
Washington state patrol's budget request.
(5) The director of fire protection, shall implement and
administer, within constraints established by budgeted resources, the
policies, objectives, and priorities of the board and all duties of the
chief of the Washington state patrol that are to be carried out through
the director of fire protection. Such administration shall include
negotiation of agreements with the state board for community and
technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, and the
state colleges and universities as provided in RCW ((43.63A.320))
43.43.934. Programs covered by such agreements shall include, but not
be limited to, planning curricula, developing and delivering
instructional programs and materials, and using existing instructional
personnel and facilities. Where appropriate, such contracts shall also
include planning and conducting instructional programs at the state
fire service training center.
(6) The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director
of fire protection, shall seek the advice of the board in carrying out
his or her duties under law.
(7) By December 31, 2007, the director of fire protection must
adopt by rule:
(a) A fire safety standard for upholstered furniture that is
substantially the same as the provisions of the 2002 draft revised
technical bulletin, CAL 117+, for "Requirements, Test Procedure and
Apparatus for Testing the Flame and Smolder Resistance of Upholstered
Furniture," published by the state of California, department of
consumer affairs, bureau of home furnishings and thermal insulation;
(b) A fire safety standard for electronic equipment within the
field of audio/video information technology and communication
technology that is substantially the same as the provisions of the
international electrotechnical commission's document entitled "IEC
62368-f3 Ed 1.0: Audio/Video, Information and Communication Technology
Equipment - Safety Requirements" (circulation date December 15, 2006),
which incorporates external ignition protection as specified in the
technical specification (IEC TS62441), published December 2006.

--- END ---