BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.30 RCW
to read as follows:
A person or entity engaged in the business of insurance in this
state may not unfairly discriminate against providers licensed under
chapter 18.53 RCW.

--- END ---