BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.210 and 1998 c 171 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that counties are regional
governments within their boundaries, and cities are primary providers
of urban governmental services within urban growth areas. For the
purposes of this section, a "countywide planning policy" is a written
policy statement or statements used solely for establishing a
countywide framework from which county and city comprehensive plans are
developed and adopted pursuant to this chapter. This framework shall
ensure that city and county comprehensive plans are consistent as
required in RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be construed
to alter the land-use powers of cities.
(2) The legislative authority of a county that plans under RCW
36.70A.040 shall adopt a countywide planning policy in cooperation with
the cities located in whole or in part within the county as follows:
(a) No later than sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991, the
legislative authority of each county that as of June 1, 1991, was
required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting
with representatives of each city located within the county for the
purpose of establishing a collaborative process that will provide a
framework for the adoption of a countywide planning policy. In other
counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this
meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the
county adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management.
(b) The process and framework for adoption of a countywide planning
policy specified in (a) of this subsection shall determine the manner
in which the county and the cities agree to all procedures and
provisions including but not limited to desired planning policies,
deadlines, ratification of final agreements and demonstration thereof,
and financing, if any, of all activities associated therewith.
(c) If a county fails for any reason to convene a meeting with
representatives of cities as required in (a) of this subsection, the
governor may immediately impose any appropriate sanction or sanctions
on the county from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340.
(d) If there is no agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that
was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991,
or if there is no agreement within one hundred twenty days of the date
the county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management in any other county that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, the governor shall first inquire
of the jurisdictions as to the reason or reasons for failure to reach
an agreement. If the governor deems it appropriate, the governor may
immediately request the assistance of the department of community,
trade, and economic development to mediate any disputes that preclude
agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving all disputes that
will lead to agreement, the governor may impose appropriate sanctions
from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or
cities for failure to reach an agreement as provided in this section.
The governor shall specify the reason or reasons for the imposition of
any sanction.
(e) No later than July 1, 1992, the legislative authority of each
county that was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of
June 1, 1991, or no later than fourteen months after the date the
county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management the county legislative authority of any
other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
shall adopt a countywide planning policy according to the process
provided under this section and that is consistent with the agreement
pursuant to (b) of this subsection, and after holding a public hearing
or hearings on the proposed countywide planning policy.
(3) A countywide planning policy shall at a minimum, address the
following:
(a) Policies to implement RCW 36.70A.110;
(b) Policies for promotion of contiguous and orderly development
and provision of urban services to such development;
(c) Policies for siting public capital facilities of a countywide
or statewide nature, including transportation facilities of statewide
significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140;
(d) Policies for countywide transportation facilities and
strategies;
(e) Policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as
housing for all economic segments of the population and parameters for
its distribution;
(f) Policies for joint county and city planning within urban growth
areas;
(g) Policies for countywide economic development and employment;
((and))
(h) Policies for providing a supply of housing sufficient to
accommodate employment growth and demand for all types of residential
living, including if applicable, part-time, retirement, and second
homes; and
(i) An analysis of the fiscal impact.
(4) Federal agencies and Indian tribes may participate in and
cooperate with the countywide planning policy adoption process.
Adopted countywide planning policies shall be adhered to by state
agencies.
(5) Failure to adopt a countywide planning policy that meets the
requirements of this section may result in the imposition of a sanction
or sanctions on a county or city within the county, as specified in RCW
36.70A.340. In imposing a sanction or sanctions, the governor shall
specify the reasons for failure to adopt a countywide planning policy
in order that any imposed sanction or sanctions are fairly and
equitably related to the failure to adopt a countywide planning policy.
(6) Cities and the governor may appeal an adopted countywide
planning policy to the growth management hearings board within sixty
days of the adoption of the countywide planning policy.
(7) Multicounty planning policies shall be adopted by two or more
counties, each with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or
more, with contiguous urban areas and may be adopted by other counties,
according to the process established under this section or other
processes agreed to among the counties and cities within the affected
counties throughout the multicounty region.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.62.035 and 1997 c 429 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall determine the
population of each county of the state annually as of April 1st of each
year and on or before July 1st of each year shall file a certificate
with the secretary of state showing its determination of the population
for each county. The office of financial management also shall
determine the percentage increase in population for each county over
the preceding ten-year period, as of April 1st, and shall file a
certificate with the secretary of state by July 1st showing its
determination. At least once every five years or upon the availability
of decennial census data, whichever is ((later)) sooner, the office of
financial management shall prepare twenty-year growth management
planning population projections required by RCW 36.70A.110 for each
county that adopts a comprehensive plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and shall
review these projections with such counties and the cities in those
counties before final adoption. The projections shall be based on a
determination of the anticipated economic and job growth for these
counties and shall consider relevant data concerning the critical
components of the local economy and relevant market factors at the
national, state, and local levels. The projections shall account for
anticipated migrations within the state by retirees and telecommuters.
In recognition of the typical length of planning cycles, and of the
planning cycles for local governments, the office will publish annual
comparisons of estimated job change with estimated housing unit change
by county to ensure economic and job growth together with population
growth are accommodated by the jurisdictions.
(2) Population projections for each county shall consider:
(a) Projected growth statewide and the share of state growth
historically accommodated by the county;
(b) Projected natural population changes caused by births and
deaths within the county;
(c) A determination of the anticipated economic and job growth
within the county, using relevant data concerning the critical
components of the local economy and relevant market factors at the
national, state, and local levels;
(d) Projected natural population increase, economic growth, and job
growth in adjacent counties that may result in spillover housing
demand;
(e) Projected net migration into the county, including an
assessment of the degree to which population growth will be affected by
the county's popularity as a location for telecommuting, vacation
homes, and retirement living; and
(f) Other factors determined to be relevant and consistent with
accepted demographic techniques.
(3) The county and its cities, and other interested parties, may
provide to the office such information as they deem relevant to the
office's projection, and the office shall consider and comment on such
information before adoption. Each projection shall be expressed as a
reasonable range developed within the standard state high and low
projection. The middle range shall represent the office's estimate of
the most likely population projection for the county. If any city or
county believes that a projection will not accurately reflect actual
population growth in a county, it may petition the office to revise the
projection accordingly. ((The office shall complete the first set of
ranges for every county by December 31, 1995.))
(4) A comprehensive plan adopted or amended before December 31,
1995, shall not be considered to be in noncompliance with the twenty-year growth management planning population projection if the projection
used in the comprehensive plan is in compliance with the range later
adopted under this section.

--- END ---