BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature supports the use of stem
cell research including projects funded through the life sciences
discovery fund to treat and prevent serious and debilitating diseases
and conditions, including Parkinson's disease, diabetes, strokes, and
birth defects. The legislature recognizes careful national
deliberations in law, ethics, and sciences through the national
academies of science and the legislature intends to promote biomedical
research for the benefit of all patients, including stem cell research
in Washington state consistent with national recommendations and
processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as specified in subsection (2) of this section, human
stem cells from any source may be donated for research purposes if the
donor has provided written consent to use the human stem cells for such
purposes and the donor has not received valuable consideration for the
donation.
(2)(a) Individuals may donate human embryonic stem cells for
research purposes if the human embryonic stem cells are obtained from
blastocysts that are generated by in vitro fertilization procedures,
the donation is made pursuant to the valid informed consent of both the
donors of the sperm and egg that created the blastocyst, and the donor
has not received valuable consideration for the donation.
(b) Informed consent to donate human embryonic stem cells for
research is valid only if both the sperm and egg donors acknowledge in
writing that they have been informed of the opportunity for disposing
of blastocysts through: Donating the blastocyst for research purposes;
donating the blastocyst to another person; thawing the blastocyst
without further action; or disposing of the blastocyst in another
method.
(c) In the event that a sperm or egg donor has died or has provided
a written relinquishment of his or her right to select the disposition
of the blastocyst to the other donor, the other donor may select the
disposition of the blastocyst.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Blastocyst" means a preimplantation embryo consisting of
approximately one hundred fifty cells that are organized into an inner
and outer cell layer surrounding a fluid-filled cavity. The cells of
the inner layer, from which embryonic stem cells are derived, consists
of undifferentiated cells that have the potential to become any type of
cell in the human body.
(b) "Valuable consideration" has the same meaning as in RCW
68.50.610.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.350 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No money from the life sciences discovery fund may be used to
support research involving human stem cells, including human embryonic
stem cells, unless the human stem cells were donated in compliance with
section 2 of this act.
(2) No public funds may be distributed for the following purposes:
(a) No money from the life sciences discovery fund may be used to
injure an embryo that has been implanted in a uterus.
(b) No money from the life sciences discovery fund may be used to
clone an individual by means of asexual reproduction of a human being
by transplanting a blastocyst that has been created by somatic cell
nuclear transfer into a uterus or substitute for a uterus with the
purpose of creating a human being.

--- END ---