BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.3691 and 2000 c 237 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Beginning January 1, 2002, each candidate or political
committee that expended twenty-five thousand dollars or more in the
preceding year or expects to expend twenty-five thousand dollars or
more in the current year shall file all contribution reports and
expenditure reports required by this chapter by the electronic
alternative provided by the commission under RCW 42.17.369. The
commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis for candidates
whose authorized committees lack the technological ability to file
reports using the electronic alternative provided by the commission.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2004,)) Each candidate or political
committee that expended ten thousand dollars or more in the preceding
year or expects to expend ten thousand dollars or more in the current
year shall file all contribution reports and expenditure reports
required by this chapter by the electronic alternative provided by the
commission under RCW 42.17.369. The commission may make exceptions on
a case-by-case basis for candidates whose authorized committees lack
the technological ability to file reports using the electronic
alternative provided by the commission.
(2) By June 30, 2008, each lobbyist and lobbyist employer required
to report under RCW 42.17.150, 42.17.170, 42.17.175, or 42.17.180 shall
file by the electronic alternative provided by the commission under RCW
42.17.369.
(3) Failure by a candidate ((or)), political committee, lobbyist,
or lobbyist employer to comply with this section is a violation of this
chapter.

--- END ---