BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.05.020 and 1998 c 269 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Community facility" means a group care facility operated for
the care of juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185.
A county detention facility that houses juveniles committed to the
department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant to a contract with the
department is not a community facility.
(2) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(3) "Equitable distribution" or "distribute equitably" means siting
or locating community facilities in a manner that reasonably reflects
the proportion of juveniles sentenced to the department from each
county or rural multicounty geographic area designated by the
department, and, to the extent practicable, the proportion of such
juveniles residing in particular jurisdictions or communities within
such counties or geographic areas. Equitable distribution is a policy
goal, not a basis for any legal challenge to the siting, construction,
occupancy, or operation of any facility anywhere in the state.
(4) "Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has
been sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the
department under RCW 13.40.185.
(((4))) (5) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a
community facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall prepare a projected list of counties and
rural multicounty geographic areas in which community facilities need
to be sited during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, and every
biennium thereafter starting with the biennium beginning July 1, 2008,
and transmit the list to the office of financial management and the
counties on the list. The list may be updated as needed. In preparing
the list, the department shall make substantial efforts to provide for
the equitable distribution of community facilities among counties. The
department shall give great weight to the following factors in
determining equitable distribution:
(a) The locations of existing community facilities owned or
operated by, or operated under contract with, the department in each
county;
(b) The number and proportion of juvenile offenders committed to
the department residing in the county or rural multicounty geographic
area; and
(c) The number of juvenile registered sex offenders classified as
level II or III and juvenile sex offenders registered as homeless per
thousand persons residing in the county.
(2) The department shall submit, along with the list required under
subsection (1) of this section, the operational requirements for the
facilities on the list to the office of financial management and the
counties on the list.
(3) A county, and any county designated by the department within a
rural multicounty geographic area, that is included on the list
required under subsection (1) of this section planning under RCW
36.70A.040 shall, in cooperation with its cities, allow the siting of
each projected community facility on the list within the county using
its process for siting essential public facilities under RCW 36.70A.200
and section 6 of this act. The process shall allow the siting of a
facility within twelve months of receiving notice that the county has
been included on the list.
(4) A county, and any county designated by the department within a
rural multicounty geographic area, that is included on the list
required under subsection (1) of this section not planning under RCW
36.70A.040 shall, in cooperation with its cities, allow the siting of
each projected community facility on the list within the county using
the procedures established in section 7 of this act. The process shall
allow the siting of a facility within twelve months of receiving notice
that the county or city has been included on the list.
(5) The department shall, by rule, adopt facility criteria and
shall consult with local governments in such rule making.

Sec. 3 RCW 72.65.010 and 1992 c 7 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
(1) "Department" ((shall)) means the department of corrections.
(2) "Equitable distribution" or "distribute equitably" means siting
or locating work release facilities in a manner that reasonably
reflects the proportion of offenders sentenced to the custody or
supervision of the department by the courts of each county or rural
multicounty geographic area designated by the department, and, to the
extent practicable, the proportion of such offenders residing in
particular jurisdictions or communities within such counties or rural
multicounty geographic areas. Equitable distribution is a policy goal,
not a basis for any legal challenge to the siting, construction,
occupancy, or operation of any facility anywhere in the state.
(3) "Prisoner" means a person either male or female, convicted of
a felony and sentenced by the superior court to a term of confinement
and treatment in a state correctional institution under the
jurisdiction of the department.
(4) "Secretary" ((shall)) means the secretary of corrections.
(((3))) (5) "State correctional institutions" shall mean and
include all state adult correctional facilities established pursuant to
law under the jurisdiction of the department for the treatment of
convicted felons sentenced to a term of confinement.
(((4) "Prisoner" shall mean a person either male or female,
convicted of a felony and sentenced by the superior court to a term of
confinement and treatment in a state correctional institution under the
jurisdiction of the department.
(5))) (6) "Superintendent" ((shall)) means the superintendent of a
state correctional institution, camp or other facility now or hereafter
established under the jurisdiction of the department pursuant to law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 72.65 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall prepare a projected list of counties and
rural multicounty geographic areas in which work release facilities
need to be sited during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, and
every biennium thereafter starting with the biennium beginning July 1,
2008, and transmit the list to the office of financial management and
the counties on the list. The list may be updated as needed. In
preparing the list, the department shall make substantial efforts to
provide for the equitable distribution of work release facilities among
counties. The department shall give great weight to the following
factors in determining equitable distribution:
(a) The locations of existing residential facilities owned or
operated by, or operated under contract with, the department in each
county;
(b) The number and proportion of adult offenders sentenced to the
custody or supervision of the department by the courts of the county or
rural multicounty geographic area; and
(c) The number of adult registered sex offenders classified as
level II or III and adult sex offenders registered as homeless per
thousand persons residing in the county.
(2) The department shall submit, along with the list required under
subsection (1) of this section, the operational requirements for the
facilities on the list to the office of financial management and the
counties on the list.
(3) A county, and any county designated by the department within a
rural multicounty geographic area, that is included on the list
required under subsection (1) of this section planning under RCW
36.70A.040 shall, in cooperation with its cities, allow the siting of
each projected work release facility on the list within the county
using its process for siting essential public facilities under RCW
36.70A.200 and section 6 of this act.
(4) A county, and any county designated by the department within a
rural multicounty geographic area, that is included on the list
required under subsection (1) of this section not planning under RCW
36.70A.040 shall, in cooperation with its cities, allow the siting of
each projected work release facility on the list within the county
using the procedures established in section 7 of this act.
(5) The department shall, by rule, adopt facility criteria and
shall consult with local governments in such rule making.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.70A.200 and 2002 c 68 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The comprehensive plan of each county and city that is planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall include a process for identifying and siting
essential public facilities. Essential public facilities include those
facilities that are typically difficult to site, such as airports,
state education facilities and state or regional transportation
facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, state and local correctional
facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and in-patient facilities
including substance abuse facilities, mental health facilities, group
homes, and secure community transition facilities as defined in RCW
71.09.020.
(2) Each county and city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process, or amend its
existing process, for identifying and siting essential public
facilities and adopt or amend its development regulations as necessary
to provide for the siting of secure community transition facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(3) Any city or county not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process for siting secure
community transition facilities and adopt or amend its development
regulations as necessary to provide for the siting of such facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(4) Within twelve months of receiving notice that the county has
been included on the list of projected potential sites for a work
release facility or community facility for juvenile offenders, each
county, in cooperation with the cities located in whole or in part
within the county, and each city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall,
when it next amends its comprehensive plan, but in no case later than
the deadline specified in RCW 36.70A.130, establish a process, or amend
its existing process, for identifying and siting essential public
facilities, and adopt or amend its development regulations as necessary
to provide for the siting of community facilities as defined in RCW
72.05.020 and work release and other facilities operated by or under
contract with the department of corrections. When siting a community
facility under chapter 72.05 RCW or a work release facility under
chapter 72.65 RCW, a county or city shall follow, in addition to
requirements of the process for siting essential public facilities
established under this section, the requirements established in section
6 of this act.
(5) The office of financial management shall maintain and by the
first of each year, provide to counties and cities needing to site
them, a list of those essential state public facilities that are
required or likely to be built within the next six years. The office
of financial management may at any time add facilities to the list.
(((5))) (6) No local comprehensive plan or development regulation
may preclude the siting of essential public facilities.
(((6))) (7) No person may bring a cause of action for civil damages
based on the good faith actions of any county or city to provide for
the siting of secure community transition facilities in accordance with
this section and with the requirements of chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess. For purposes of this subsection, "person" includes, but is
not limited to, any individual, agency as defined in RCW 42.17.020,
corporation, partnership, association, and limited liability entity.
(((7))) (8) Counties or cities siting facilities pursuant to
subsection (2) or (3) of this section shall comply with RCW 71.09.341.
(((8))) (9) The failure of a county or city to act by the deadlines
established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section is not:
(a) A condition that would disqualify the county or city for
grants, loans, or pledges under RCW 43.155.070 or 70.146.070;
(b) A consideration for grants or loans provided under RCW
43.17.250(2); or
(c) A basis for any petition under RCW 36.70A.280 or for any
private cause of action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When providing for the siting of an essential public facility
that is a community facility under chapter 72.05 RCW, a county or city
planning under this chapter shall:
(a) Involve the department of social and health services in the
siting process;
(b) Make a substantial effort to provide for the equitable
distribution of community facilities by giving great weight to the
factors in section 2(1) (a) through (c) of this act; and
(c) Ensure that any location identified is consistent with the
operational requirements established by the department of social and
health services under section 2(2) of this act.
(2) When providing for the siting of an essential public facility
that is a work release facility under chapter 72.65 RCW, a county or
city planning under this chapter shall:
(a) Involve the department of corrections in the siting process;
(b) Make a substantial effort to provide for the equitable
distribution of work release facilities by giving great weight to the
factors in section 4(1) (a) through (c) of this act; and
(c) Ensure that any location identified is consistent with the
operational requirements established by the department of corrections
under section 4(2) of this act.
(3)(a) As part of the permitting process for a community facility
under chapter 72.05 RCW, a county or city may not impose upon the
department of social and health services any requirements beyond the
operational requirements established under section 2(2) of this act and
the facility criteria established under section 2(5) of this act.
(b) As part of the permitting process for a work release facility
under chapter 72.65 RCW, a county or city may not impose upon the
department of corrections any requirements beyond the operational
requirements established under section 4(2) of this act and the
facility criteria established under section 4(5) of this act.
(4) If the department of social and health services adheres to all
responsibilities in section 2 of this act and RCW 72.05.400, and the
department of corrections adheres to all responsibilities in RCW
72.65.010 and section 4 of this act, any conditional use permit,
special use permit, or any other development application process
necessary to site a community facility or work release facility may not
exceed one hundred twenty days after submittal of a full and complete
application, and must include an appeal process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When providing for the siting of a community facility under
chapter 72.05 RCW, a county or city planning under this chapter shall:
(a) Involve the department of social and health services in the
siting process;
(b) Make a substantial effort to provide for the equitable
distribution of community facilities by giving great weight to the
factors in section 2(1) (a) through (c) of this act; and
(c) Ensure that any location identified is consistent with the
operational requirements established by the department of social and
health services under section 2(2) of this act.
(2) When providing for the siting of a work release facility under
chapter 72.65 RCW, a county and city planning under this chapter shall:
(a) Involve the department of corrections in the siting process;
(b) Make a substantial effort to provide for the equitable
distribution of work release facilities by giving great weight to the
factors in section 4(1) (a) through (c) of this act; and
(c) Ensure that any location identified is consistent with the
operational requirements established by the department of corrections
under section 4(2) of this act.
(3)(a) As part of the permitting process for a community facility
under chapter 72.05 RCW, a county or city may not impose upon the
department of social and health services any requirements beyond the
operational requirements established under section 2(2) of this act and
the facility criteria established under section 2(5) of this act.
(b) As part of the permitting process for a work release facility
under chapter 72.65 RCW, a county or city may not impose upon the
department of corrections any requirements beyond the operational
requirements established under section 4(2) of this act and the
facility criteria established under section 4(5) of this act.
(4) If the department of social and health services adheres to all
responsibilities in section 2 of this act and RCW 72.05.400, and the
department of corrections adheres to all responsibilities in RCW
72.65.010 and section 4 of this act, any conditional use permit,
special use permit, or any other development application process
necessary to site a community facility or work release facility may not
exceed one hundred twenty days after submittal of a full and complete
application, and must include an appeal process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) After twelve months have passed since the city or county
receives notice that the county has been included on the list of
projected potential sites for a work release facility or community
facility for juvenile offenders, and the county and cities within have
failed to establish a process for siting a work release facility or
community facility for juvenile offenders, notwithstanding RCW
36.70A.103 or any other law, this section preempts and supersedes local
plans, development regulations, permitting requirements, inspection
requirements, and all other laws as necessary to enable the department
of corrections to site, construct, renovate, occupy, and operate a work
release facility or to enable the department of social and health
services to operate a community facility for juvenile offenders within
the county.
(2) The department of corrections or department of social and
health services determinations under subsection (1) of this section are
final and are not subject to appeal under chapter 34.05 RCW or this
chapter.
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits the department of corrections
or department of social and health services from:
(a) Siting a work release or community facility for juvenile
offenders in a city or county that has complied with the requirements
of RCW 36.70A.200 with respect to these facilities, including a city
that is located within a county that has been preempted. If the
department sites a work release facility or community facility for
juvenile offenders in such a city or county, the department shall use
the process established by the city or county for siting such
facilities; or
(b) Consulting with a city or county that has been preempted under
this section regarding the siting of a secure community transition
facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---