BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.475 and 2005 c 438 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the classes of employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7),
the provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.452 and 41.56.470,
41.56.480, and 41.56.490 also apply to Washington state patrol officers
appointed under RCW 43.43.020 as provided in this section, subject to
the following:
(1) The mediator or arbitration panel may consider only matters
that are subject to bargaining under RCW 41.56.473.
(2)(a) The decision of an arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the funds
necessary to implement provisions pertaining to wages and wage-related
matters of an arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, is not
binding on the state or the Washington state patrol.
(b) The decision of an arbitration panel is binding on the governor
and the Washington state patrol.
(3) In making its determination, the arbitration panel shall be
mindful of the legislative purpose enumerated in RCW 41.56.430 and, as
additional standards or guidelines to aid it in reaching a decision,
shall take into consideration the following factors:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) Stipulations of the parties;
(c) Comparison of the hours and conditions of employment of
personnel involved in the proceedings with the hours and conditions of
employment of like personnel of like employers of similar size on the
west coast of the United States;
(d) Changes in any of the foregoing circumstances during the
pendency of the proceedings; and
(e) Such other factors, not confined to the foregoing, which are
normally or traditionally taken into consideration in the determination
of matters that are subject to bargaining under RCW 41.56.473.

--- END ---