BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.14.010 and 2002 c 146 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "City" means either (a) a city or town with a population of at
least ((thirty)) five thousand or (b) the largest city or town, if
there is no city or town with a population of at least ((thirty)) five
thousand, located in a county planning under the growth management act.
(2) "Governing authority" means the local legislative authority of
a city having jurisdiction over the property for which an exemption may
be applied for under this chapter.
(3) "Growth management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.
(4) "Multiple-unit housing" means a building having four or more
dwelling units not designed or used as transient accommodations and not
including hotels and motels. Multifamily units may result from new
construction or rehabilitated or conversion of vacant, underutilized,
or substandard buildings to multifamily housing.
(5) "Owner" means the property owner of record.
(6) "Permanent residential occupancy" means multiunit housing that
provides either rental or owner occupancy on a nontransient basis.
This includes owner-occupied or rental accommodation that is leased for
a period of at least one month. This excludes hotels and motels that
predominately offer rental accommodation on a daily or weekly basis.
(7) "Rehabilitation improvements" means modifications to existing
structures, that are vacant for twelve months or longer, that are made
to achieve a condition of substantial compliance with existing building
codes or modification to existing occupied structures which increase
the number of multifamily housing units.
(8) "Residential targeted area" means an area within an urban
center that has been designated by the governing authority as a
residential targeted area in accordance with this chapter.
(9) "Substantial compliance" means compliance with local building
or housing code requirements that are typically required for
rehabilitation as opposed to new construction.
(10) "Urban center" means a compact identifiable district where
urban residents may obtain a variety of products and services. An
urban center must contain:
(a) Several existing or previous, or both, business establishments
that may include but are not limited to shops, offices, banks,
restaurants, governmental agencies;
(b) Adequate public facilities including streets, sidewalks,
lighting, transit, domestic water, and sanitary sewer systems; and
(c) A mixture of uses and activities that may include housing,
recreation, and cultural activities in association with either
commercial or office, or both, use.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.14.020 and 2002 c 146 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The value of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements qualifying under this chapter is exempt
from ad valorem property taxation, for ten successive years beginning
January 1 of the year immediately following the calendar year of
issuance of the certificate of tax exemption eligibility. However, the
exemption does not include the value of land or nonhousing-related
improvements not qualifying under this chapter. When a local
((government adopts)) government's guidelines adopted pursuant to RCW
84.14.030(2) ((and the qualifying dwelling units are each on separate
parcels for the purpose of property taxation)) include conditions that
must be satisfied with respect to individual dwelling units, rather
than with respect to the multiple-unit housing as a whole or some
minimum portion thereof, the exemption ((may, at the local government's
discretion, be)) is limited to the value of the qualifying improvements
allocable to those dwelling units that ((meet the)) satisfy those local
guidelines.
(2) In the case of rehabilitation of existing buildings, the
exemption does not include the value of improvements constructed prior
to the submission of the application required under this chapter. The
incentive provided by this chapter is in addition to any other
incentives, tax credits, grants, or other incentives provided by law.
(3) This chapter does not apply to increases in assessed valuation
made by the assessor on nonqualifying portions of building and value of
land nor to increases made by lawful order of a county board of
equalization, the department of revenue, or a county, to a class of
property throughout the county or specific area of the county to
achieve the uniformity of assessment or appraisal required by law.
(4) At the conclusion of the ten-year exemption period, the new or
rehabilitated housing cost shall be considered as new construction for
the purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.14.030 and 2005 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
An owner of property making application under this chapter must
meet the following requirements:
(1) The new or rehabilitated multiple-unit housing must be located
in a residential targeted area as designated by the city;
(2) The multiple-unit housing must meet the guidelines as adopted
by the governing authority that may include height, density, public
benefit features, number and size of proposed development, parking,
low-income or moderate-income occupancy requirements, and other adopted
requirements indicated necessary by the city. The required amenities
should be relative to the size of the project and tax benefit to be
obtained;
(3) The new, converted, or rehabilitated multiple-unit housing must
provide for a minimum of fifty percent of the space for permanent
residential occupancy. In the case of existing occupied multifamily
development, the multifamily housing must also provide for a minimum of
four additional multifamily units. Existing multifamily vacant housing
that has been vacant for twelve months or more does not have to provide
additional multifamily units;
(4) New construction multifamily housing and rehabilitation
improvements must be completed within three years from the date of
approval of the application;
(5) Property proposed to be rehabilitated must fail to comply with
one or more standards of the applicable state or local building or
housing codes on or after July 23, 1995. If the property proposed to
be rehabilitated is not vacant, an applicant shall provide each
existing tenant housing of comparable size, quality, and price and a
reasonable opportunity to relocate; and
(6) The applicant must enter into a contract with the city approved
by the governing body, or an administrative official or commission
authorized by the governing authority, under which the applicant has
agreed to the implementation of the development on terms and conditions
satisfactory to the governing authority.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.14.090 and 1995 c 375 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon completion of rehabilitation or new construction for which
an application for limited exemption under this chapter has been
approved and after issuance of the certificate of occupancy, the owner
shall file with the city the following:
(a) A statement of the amount of rehabilitation or construction
expenditures made with respect to each housing unit and the composite
expenditures made in the rehabilitation or construction of the entire
property;
(b) A description of the work that has been completed and a
statement that the rehabilitation improvements or new construction on
the owner's property qualify the property for limited exemption under
this chapter; and
(c) A statement that the work has been completed within three years
of the issuance of the conditional certificate of tax exemption.
(2) Within thirty days after receipt of the statements required
under subsection (1) of this section, the authorized representative of
the city shall determine whether the work completed is consistent with
the application and the contract approved by the ((governing
authority)) city and is qualified for limited exemption under this
chapter. The city shall also determine which specific improvements
completed meet the requirements and required findings.
(3) If the rehabilitation, conversion, or construction is completed
within three years of the date the application for limited exemption is
filed under this chapter, or within an authorized extension of this
time limit, and the authorized representative of the city determines
that improvements were constructed consistent with the application and
other applicable requirements and the owner's property is qualified for
limited exemption under this chapter, the city shall file the
certificate of tax exemption with the county assessor within ten days
of the expiration of the thirty-day period provided under subsection
(2) of this section.
(4) The authorized representative of the city shall notify the
applicant that a certificate of tax exemption is not going to be filed
if the representative determines that:
(a) The rehabilitation or new construction was not completed within
three years of the application date, or within any authorized extension
of the time limit;
(b) The improvements were not constructed consistent with the
application or other applicable requirements; or
(c) The owner's property is otherwise not qualified for limited
exemption under this chapter.
(5) If the authorized representative of the city finds that
construction or rehabilitation of multiple-unit housing was not
completed within the required time period due to circumstances beyond
the control of the owner and that the owner has been acting and could
reasonably be expected to act in good faith and with due diligence, the
governing authority or the city official authorized by the governing
authority may extend the deadline for completion of construction or
rehabilitation for a period not to exceed twenty-four consecutive
months.
(6) The governing authority may provide by ordinance for an appeal
of a decision by the deciding officer or authority that an owner is not
entitled to a certificate of tax exemption to the governing authority,
a hearing examiner, or other city officer authorized by the governing
authority to hear the appeal in accordance with such reasonable
procedures and time periods as provided by ordinance of the governing
authority. The owner may appeal a decision by the deciding officer or
authority that is not subject to local appeal or a decision by the
local appeal authority that the owner is not entitled to a certificate
of tax exemption in superior court under RCW 34.05.510 through
34.05.598, if the appeal is filed within thirty days of notification by
the city to the owner of the decision being challenged.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.14.110 and 2002 c 146 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If improvements have been exempted under this chapter, the
improvements continue to be exempted and not be converted to another
use for at least ten years from date of issuance of the certificate of
tax exemption. If the owner intends to convert the multifamily
development to another use, the owner shall notify the assessor within
sixty days of the change in use. If, after a certificate of tax
exemption has been filed with the county assessor the city or assessor
or agent discovers that a portion of the property is changed or will be
changed to a use that is other than residential or that housing or
amenities no longer meet the requirements as previously approved or
agreed upon by contract between the ((governing authority)) city and
the owner and that the multifamily housing, or a portion of the
housing, no longer qualifies for the exemption, the tax exemption must
be canceled and the following must occur:
(a) Additional real property tax must be imposed upon the value of
the nonqualifying improvements in the amount that would normally be
imposed, plus a penalty must be imposed amounting to twenty percent.
This additional tax is calculated based upon the difference between the
property tax paid and the property tax that would have been paid if it
had included the value of the nonqualifying improvements dated back to
the date that the improvements were converted to a nonmultifamily use;
(b) The tax must include interest upon the amounts of the
additional tax at the same statutory rate charged on delinquent
property taxes from the dates on which the additional tax could have
been paid without penalty if the improvements had been assessed at a
value without regard to this chapter; and
(c) The additional tax owed together with interest and penalty must
become a lien on the land and attach at the time the property or
portion of the property is removed from multifamily use or the
amenities no longer meet applicable requirements, and has priority to
and must be fully paid and satisfied before a recognizance, mortgage,
judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with which the land
may become charged or liable. The lien may be foreclosed upon
expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner
provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property
taxes. An additional tax unpaid on its due date is delinquent. From
the date of delinquency until paid, interest must be charged at the
same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(2) Upon a determination that a tax exemption is to be canceled for
a reason stated in this section, the governing authority shall notify
the record owner of the property as shown by the tax rolls by mail,
return receipt requested, of the determination to cancel the exemption.
The owner may appeal the determination to the governing authority
within thirty days by filing a notice of appeal with the clerk of the
governing authority, which notice must specify the factual and legal
basis on which the determination of cancellation is alleged to be
erroneous. The governing authority or a hearing examiner or other
official authorized by the governing authority may hear the appeal. At
the hearing, all affected parties may be heard and all competent
evidence received. After the hearing, the deciding body or officer
shall either affirm, modify, or repeal the decision of cancellation of
exemption based on the evidence received. An aggrieved party may
appeal the decision of the deciding body or officer to the superior
court under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.
(3) Upon determination by the governing authority or authorized
representative to terminate an exemption, the county officials having
possession of the assessment and tax rolls shall correct the rolls in
the manner provided for omitted property under RCW 84.40.080. The
county assessor shall make such a valuation of the property and
improvements as is necessary to permit the correction of the rolls.
The value of the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements added to the rolls shall be considered as
new construction for the purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW. The owner may
appeal the valuation to the county board of equalization under chapter
84.48 RCW and according to the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. If there
has been a failure to comply with this chapter, the property must be
listed as an omitted assessment for assessment years beginning January
1 of the calendar year in which the noncompliance first occurred, but
the listing as an omitted assessment may not be for a period more than
three calendar years preceding the year in which the failure to comply
was discovered.

--- END ---