BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In the state of Washington, school funding
for construction bonds, as well as maintenance and operation levies is
derived solely from property taxes at the local level. Tax benefits
given to businesses as location incentives often include property tax
reductions or forgiveness, which has the effect of burdening other
taxpayers in the district with higher rates and taxes. The legislature
recognizes that it is the paramount duty of the state to adequately
educate our children and finds that this responsibility should be
shared as broadly as possible among its taxpayers.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.36.005 and 1961 c 15 s 84.36.005 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) All property now existing, or that is hereafter created or
brought into this state, shall be subject to assessment and taxation
for state, county, and other taxing district purposes, upon equalized
valuations thereof, fixed with reference thereto on the first day of
January at twelve o'clock meridian in each year, excepting such as is
exempted from taxation by law as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any tax
exemption of property enacted on or after the effective date of this
act does not apply to property that, for the purposes of school
districts, is subject to assessment and taxation under the authority of
chapter 84.52 RCW.
(b)(i) The provisions in (a) of this subsection do not apply to:
(A) Property exempted under RCW 84.36.010; and (B) property owned by a
nonprofit organization qualified for exemption under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code as amended on January 1, 2007.
(ii) A school district board of directors may, by resolution in
which a majority of board members vote in the affirmative, exempt
property from tax if the property would otherwise be exempt from tax
but for the provisions contained in (a) of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---