BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall evaluate its activities and their effect
on the climate in terms of the total amount of greenhouse gases
produced.
(2) The department shall report to the legislature every two years,
beginning in 2008. The report must include, but is not limited to:
(a) The total amount of greenhouse gases produced, measured in
units of carbon dioxide;
(b) How the department is incorporating the effects of climate
changes into its programs and activities;
(c) The interest groups involved with aiding the department in
climate change issues; and
(d) The adaptations, activities, and technology used to reduce the
effects on climate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79.10 RCW
under the subchapter heading "General Provisions" to read as follows:
(1) The department shall evaluate its activities and their effect
on the climate in terms of the total amount of greenhouse gases
produced.
(2) The department shall report to the legislature every two years,
beginning in 2008. The report must include, but is not limited to:
(a) The total amount of greenhouse gases produced, measured in
units of carbon dioxide;
(b) How the department is incorporating the effects of climate
changes into its programs and activities;
(c) The interest groups involved with aiding the department in
climate change issues; and
(d) The adaptations, activities, and technology used to reduce the
effects on climate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall evaluate its activities and their effect
on the climate in terms of the total amount of greenhouse gases
produced.
(2) The department shall report to the legislature every two years,
beginning in 2008. The report must include, but is not limited to:
(a) The total amount of greenhouse gases produced, measured in
units of carbon dioxide;
(b) How the department is incorporating the effects of climate
changes into its programs and activities;
(c) The interest groups involved with aiding the department in
climate change issues; and
(d) The adaptations, activities, and technology used to reduce the
effects on climate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 15.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall evaluate its activities and their effect
on the climate in terms of the total amount of greenhouse gases
produced.
(2) The department shall report to the legislature every two years,
beginning in 2008. The report must include, but is not limited to:
(a) The total amount of greenhouse gases produced, measured in
units of carbon dioxide;
(b) How the department is incorporating the effects of climate
changes into its programs and activities;
(c) The interest groups involved with aiding the department in
climate change issues; and
(d) The adaptations, activities, and technology used to reduce the
effects on climate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall evaluate its activities and their effect
on the climate in terms of the total amount of greenhouse gases
produced.
(2) The department shall report to the legislature every two years,
beginning in 2008. The report must include, but is not limited to:
(a) The total amount of greenhouse gases produced, measured in
units of carbon dioxide;
(b) How the department is incorporating the effects of climate
changes into its programs and activities;
(c) The interest groups involved with aiding the department in
climate change issues; and
(d) The adaptations, activities, and technology used to reduce the
effects on climate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall evaluate its activities and their effect
on the climate in terms of the total amount of greenhouse gases
produced.
(2) The department shall report to the legislature every two years,
beginning in 2008. The report must include, but is not limited to:
(a) The total amount of greenhouse gases produced, measured in
units of carbon dioxide;
(b) How the department is incorporating the effects of climate
changes into its programs and activities;
(c) The interest groups involved with aiding the department in
climate change issues; and
(d) The adaptations, activities, and technology used to reduce the
effects on climate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department's emergency management division shall evaluate
its activities and their effect on the climate in terms of the total
amount of greenhouse gases produced.
(2) The department's emergency management division shall report to
the legislature every two years, beginning in 2008. The report must
include, but is not limited to:
(a) The total amount of greenhouse gases produced, measured in
units of carbon dioxide;
(b) How the department's emergency management division is
incorporating the effects of climate changes into its programs and
activities;
(c) The interest groups involved with aiding the department's
emergency management division in climate change issues; and
(d) The adaptations, activities, and technology used to reduce the
effects on climate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall evaluate its activities and their effect
on the climate in terms of the total amount of greenhouse gases
produced.
(2) The department shall report to the legislature every two years,
beginning in 2008. The report must include, but is not limited to:
(a) The total amount of greenhouse gases produced, measured in
units of carbon dioxide;
(b) How the department is incorporating the effects of climate
changes into its programs and activities;
(c) The interest groups involved with aiding the department in
climate change issues; and
(d) The adaptations, activities, and technology used to reduce the
effects on climate.

--- END ---