BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington has developed an impressive oral
history program of recording and documenting the recollections of
public officials and citizens who have contributed to the rich
political history surrounding the legislature. Schools, museums,
historians, state agencies, and interested citizens have benefited from
the availability of these educational materials. The purpose of this
act is to enhance this resource by reinforcing the decision-making role
of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not prohibit the secretary of the senate, the
chief clerk of the house of representatives, or their designee from
soliciting and accepting contributions to the legislative oral history
account created in section 8 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.07.220 and 1991 c 237 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of ((state)) the senate and the chief clerk of
the house of representatives, at the direction of the legislative oral
history ((advisory)) committee, shall administer and conduct a program
to record and document oral histories of current and former members and
staff of the Washington state legislature, ((current and former state
government officials and personnel,)) and other citizens who have
participated in the political history of the Washington state
legislature. The secretary of ((state shall)) the senate and the chief
clerk of the house of representatives may contract with independent
oral historians ((and through)) or the history departments of the state
universities to interview and record oral histories. The ((tapes and
tape transcripts)) manuscripts and publications shall be ((indexed
and)) made available for research and reference through the state
archives. The ((transcripts)) manuscripts, together with current and
historical photographs, may be published for distribution to libraries
and ((for sale to)) the general public, and posted on the legislative
oral history web site.
(2) The oral history of a person who occupied positions, or was
staff to a person who occupied positions, in more than one branch of
government, shall be conducted by the entity authorized to conduct oral
histories of persons in the position last held by the person who is the
subject of the oral history. However, the person being interviewed may
select the entity he or she wishes to prepare his or her oral history.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.07.230 and 1991 c 237 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((An)) (1) A legislative oral history ((advisory)) committee is
created, which shall consist of the following individuals:
(((1))) (a) Four members of the house of representatives, two from
each of the two largest caucuses of the house, appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives;
(((2))) (b) Four members of the senate, two from each of the two
largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the
senate;
(((3))) (c) The chief clerk of the house of representatives;
(((4))) (d) The secretary of the senate; and
(((5))) (e) The secretary of state or the secretary of state's
designee.
(2) Ex officio members may be appointed by a majority vote of the
committee's members. The chair of the committee shall be elected by a
majority vote of the committee members.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.07.240 and 1991 c 237 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislative oral history ((advisory)) committee shall have the
following responsibilities:
(1) To select appropriate oral history interview candidates and
subjects;
(2) To select transcripts or portions of transcripts, and related
historical material, for publication;
(3) To advise the secretary of ((state)) the senate and the chief
clerk of the house of representatives on the format and length of
individual interview series and on appropriate issues and subjects for
related series of interviews;
(4) To advise the secretary of ((state)) the senate and the chief
clerk of the house of representatives on the appropriate subjects,
format, and length of interviews and on the process for conducting oral
history interviews ((with subjects currently serving in the Washington
state legislature));
(5) To advise the secretary of ((state)) the senate and the chief
clerk of the house of representatives on joint programs and activities
with state universities, colleges, museums, and other groups conducting
oral histories; and
(6) To advise the secretary of ((state)) the senate and the chief
clerk of the house of representatives on other aspects of the
administration of the oral history program and on the conduct of
individual interview projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives may fund oral history activities through donations as
provided in section 7 of this act and through funds in the legislative
gift center account created in RCW 44.73.020. The activities may
include, but not be limited to, conducting interviews, preparing and
indexing transcripts, publishing manuscripts and photographs, and
presenting displays and programs. Donations that do not meet the
criteria of the legislative oral history program may not be accepted.
The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives shall adopt joint rules necessary to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives may solicit and accept gifts, grants, conveyances,
bequests, and devises of real or personal property, or both, in trust
or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, invest, or expend these
donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income from the
donations except as limited by the donor's terms.
(2) Moneys received under this section may be used only for
conducting oral histories.
(3) Moneys received under this section must be deposited in the
legislative oral history account established in section 8 of this act.
(4) The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives shall adopt joint rules to govern and protect the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislative oral history account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. All moneys received under section 7 of this act
and from the legislative gift center account created in RCW 44.73.020
must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be
made only for the purposes of the legislative oral history program
under RCW 43.07.220 (as recodified by this act). Only the secretary of
the senate or the chief clerk of the house of representatives or their
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation
is not required for expenditures, but the account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the
secretary of state pertaining to the legislative oral history program
are transferred to the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of
the house of representatives. All references to the secretary of state
or the office of the secretary of state in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary of the senate and
the chief clerk of the house of representatives when referring to the
functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the secretary of state
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
delivered to the custody of the secretary of the senate and the chief
clerk of the house of representatives. All funds, credits, or other
assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be assigned to the secretary of the senate and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives.
(b) Any appropriations made to the secretary of state for carrying
out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on the
effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employee positions of the secretary of state assigned to
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the secretary of the senate and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives. All employees classified
under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to
the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as
formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be
appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing
state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the secretary of
state pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be continued and acted upon by the secretary of the senate and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives. All existing contracts
and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by
the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the secretary of state shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.
(8) The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives will determine location and staff reporting for the
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 43.07 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall administer and conduct a program
to record and document oral histories of current and former members and
staff of the Washington state executive and judicial branches, the
state's congressional delegation, and other citizens who have
participated in the political history of Washington state. The program
shall be called the Washington state legacy project. The secretary of
state may contract with independent oral historians or history
departments of the state universities to interview and record oral
histories. The manuscripts and publications shall be made available
for research and reference through the state archives. The
transcripts, together with current and historical photographs, may be
published for distribution to libraries and the general public, and be
posted on the secretary of state's web site.
(2) The Washington state legacy project may act as a principal
repository for oral histories related to community, family, and other
various projects.
(3) The oral history of a person who occupied positions, or was
staff to a person who occupied positions, in more than one branch of
government shall be conducted by the entity authorized to conduct oral
histories of persons in the position last held by the person who is the
subject of the oral history. However, the person being interviewed may
select the entity he or she wishes to prepare his or her oral history.
(4) The secretary of state may create a Washington state legacy
project advisory council to provide advice and guidance on matters
pertaining to operating the legacy project. The secretary of state may
not compensate members of the legacy project advisory council but may
provide reimbursement to members for expenses that are incurred in the
conduct of their official duties.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.07.365 and 2002 c 358 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state may fund ((oral history)) Washington state
legacy project activities through donations as provided in RCW
43.07.037. The activities may include, but not be limited to,
conducting interviews, preparing and indexing transcripts, publishing
transcripts and photographs, and presenting displays and programs.
Donations that do not meet the criteria of the ((oral history program))
Washington state legacy project may not be accepted. The secretary of
state shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.07.370 and 2007 c 523 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of state may solicit and accept gifts, grants,
conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal property, or
both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, invest, or
expend these donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income from
the donations except as limited by the donor's terms.
(2) Moneys received under this section may be used only for the
following purposes:
(a) Conducting ((oral histories)) the Washington state legacy
project;
(b) Archival activities;
(c) Washington state library activities; and
(d) Development, construction, and operation of the Washington
state heritage center.
(3)(a) Moneys received under subsection (2)(a) through (c) of this
section must be deposited in the ((oral history)) Washington state
legacy project, state library, and archives account established in RCW
43.07.380.
(b) Moneys received under subsection (2)(d) of this section must be
deposited in the Washington state heritage center account created in
RCW 43.07.129.
(4) The secretary of state shall adopt rules to govern and protect
the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.07.380 and 2003 c 164 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((oral history)) Washington state legacy project, state
library, and archives account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All moneys received under RCW 43.07.370 must be deposited
in the account. Expenditures from the account may be made only for the
purposes of the ((oral history program under RCW 43.07.220)) Washington
state legacy project under section 10 of this act, archives program
under RCW 40.14.020, and the state library program under chapter 27.04
RCW. Only the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures, but the account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 14 RCW 42.52.802 and 2003 c 164 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter does not prohibit the secretary of state or a designee
from soliciting and accepting contributions to the ((oral history))
Washington state legacy project, state library, and archives account
created in RCW 43.07.380.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The following are each recodified as
sections in chapter 44.04 RCW:
RCW 43.07.220
RCW 43.07.230
RCW 43.07.240

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---