BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.710 and 2005 c 246 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall have custody of the original voter
registration records for each county. The original voter registration
form must be filed without regard to precinct and is considered
confidential and unavailable for public inspection and copying. An
automated file of all registered voters must be maintained pursuant to
RCW 29A.08.125. An auditor may maintain the automated file in lieu of
filing or maintaining the original voter registration forms if the
automated file includes all of the information from the original voter
registration forms including, but not limited to, a retrievable
facsimile of each voter's signature.
(2) The following information contained in voter registration
records or files regarding a voter or a group of voters is available
for public inspection and copying, except as provided in RCW 40.24.060:
The voter's name, address, political jurisdiction, gender, ((date of
birth,)) voting record, date of registration, and registration number.
No other information from voter registration records or files is
available for public inspection or copying.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2005 c 246 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a
security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger
envelope in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on
how to mark the ballot and how to return it to the county auditor. The
instructions that accompany an absentee ballot for a partisan primary
must include instructions for voting the applicable ballot style, as
provided in chapter 29A.36 RCW. The absentee voter's name and address
must be printed on the larger return envelope, which must also contain
a declaration by the absentee voter reciting his or her qualifications
and stating that he or she has not voted in any other jurisdiction at
this election, together with a summary of the penalties for any
violation of any of the provisions of this chapter. The declaration
must clearly inform the voter that it is illegal to vote if he or she
is not a United States citizen; it is illegal to vote if he or she has
been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her voting rights
restored; and, except as otherwise provided by law, it is illegal to
cast a ballot or sign an absentee envelope on behalf of another voter.
The return envelope must provide space for the voter to indicate the
date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter to sign the oath.
It must also contain a space so that the voter may include a telephone
number. A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter
must be printed on the return envelope immediately adjacent to the
space for the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the
return envelope must affirm and attest to the statements regarding the
qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the ballot. The
return envelope must also have a secrecy flap that the voter may seal
that will cover the voter's signature and optional telephone number.
The signature and phone number provided on the return envelope by the
voter is not available for copying but is available for public
inspection in the county auditor's office. For out-of-state voters,
overseas voters, and service voters, the signed declaration on the
return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a voter registration for
the election or primary for which the ballot has been issued. The
voter must be instructed to either return the ballot to the county
auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first class postage,
if applicable, and mail the ballot to the appropriate county auditor no
later than the day of the election or primary for which the ballot was
issued.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.

--- END ---