BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 17.10.010 and 1997 c 353 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Noxious weed" means a plant that when established is highly
destructive, competitive, or difficult to control by cultural or
chemical practices.
(2) "State noxious weed list" means a list of noxious weeds adopted
by the state noxious weed control board. The list is divided into
three classes:
(a) Class A consists of those noxious weeds not native to the state
that are of limited distribution or are unrecorded in the state and
that pose a serious threat to the state;
(b) Class B consists of those noxious weeds not native to the state
that are of limited distribution or are unrecorded in a region of the
state and that pose a serious threat to that region;
(c) Class C consists of any other noxious weeds.
(3) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, firm,
the state or any department, agency, or subdivision thereof, or any
other entity.
(4) "Owner" means the person in actual control of property, or his
or her agent, whether the control is based on legal or equitable title
or on any other interest entitling the holder to possession and, for
purposes of liability, pursuant to RCW 17.10.170 or 17.10.210, means
the possessor of legal or equitable title or the possessor of an
easement: PROVIDED, That when the possessor of an easement has the
right to control or limit the growth of vegetation within the
boundaries of an easement, only the possessor of the easement is
deemed, for the purpose of this chapter, an "owner" of the property
within the boundaries of the easement.
(5) As pertains to the duty of an owner, the words "control",
"contain", "eradicate", and the term "prevent the spread of noxious
weeds" means conforming to the standards of noxious weed control or
prevention in this chapter or as adopted by rule in chapter 16-750 WAC
by the state noxious weed control board and ((an activated)) a county
noxious weed control board.
(6) "Agent" means any occupant or any other person acting for the
owner and working or in charge of the land.
(7) "Agricultural purposes" are those that are intended to provide
for the growth and harvest of food and fiber.
(8) "Director" means the director of the department of agriculture
or the director's appointed representative.
(9) "Weed district" means a weed district as defined in chapters
17.04 and 17.06 RCW.
(10) "Aquatic noxious weed" means an aquatic plant species that is
listed on the state weed list under RCW 17.10.080.
(11) "Screenings" means a mixture of mill or elevator run mixture
or a combination of varying amounts of materials obtained in the
process of cleaning either grain or seeds, or both, such as light or
broken grain or seed, weed seeds, hulls, chaff, joints, straw, elevator
dust, floor sweepings, sand, and dirt.

Sec. 2 RCW 17.10.020 and 1997 c 353 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In each county of the state there is created a noxious weed
control board, bearing the name of the county within which it is
located. The jurisdictional boundaries of each board are the
boundaries of the county within which it is located.
(2) ((Each noxious weed control board is inactive until activated
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 17.10.040)) Beginning January 1,
2009, and thereafter, each county must have a noxious weed control
board in place, appointed in the manner provided in RCW 17.10.050.

Sec. 3 RCW 17.10.030 and 1997 c 353 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created a state noxious weed control board comprised of
nine voting members and three nonvoting members. Four of the voting
members shall be ((elected by the members of the various activated
county noxious weed control boards, and shall be residents of a county
in which a county noxious weed control board has been activated and a
member of said board, and those qualifications shall continue through
their term of office)) members of county noxious weed control boards
and that qualification must continue through their terms of office.
They shall be elected by the members of various county noxious weed
control boards under rules adopted by the state noxious weed control
board as provided in this section. Two of these members shall be
elected from the west side of the state, the crest of the Cascades
being the dividing line, and two from the east side of the state. The
director of agriculture is a voting member of the board. One voting
member shall be elected by the directors of the various active weed
districts formed under chapter 17.04 or 17.06 RCW. The Washington
state association of counties appoints one voting member who shall be
a member of a county legislative authority. The director shall appoint
two voting members to represent the public interest, one from the west
side and one from the east side of the state. The director shall also
appoint three nonvoting members representing scientific disciplines
relating to weed control. The term of office for all members of the
board is three years from the date of election or appointment.
The board, by rule, shall establish a position number for each
elected position of the board and shall designate which county noxious
weed control board members are eligible to vote for each elected
position. The elected members serve staggered terms. Elections for
the elected members of the board shall be held thirty days prior to the
expiration date of their respective terms. Nominations and elections
shall be by mail and conducted by the board.
The board shall conduct its first meeting within thirty days after
all its members have been elected. The board shall elect from its
members a chair and other officers as may be necessary. A majority of
the voting members of the board constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business and is necessary for any action taken by the
board. The members of the board serve without salary, but shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their
duties under this chapter in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

Sec. 4 RCW 17.10.050 and 1997 c 353 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each ((activated)) county noxious weed control board consists
of five voting members appointed by the county legislative authority.
In appointing the voting members, the county legislative authority
shall divide the county into five geographical areas that best
represent the county's interests, and appoint a voting member from each
geographical area. At least four of the voting members shall be
engaged in the primary production of agricultural products. There is
one nonvoting member on the board who is the chair of the county
extension office or an extension agent appointed by the chair of the
county extension office. Each voting member of the board serves a term
of four years, except that the county legislative authority shall, when
a board is first ((activated)) appointed under this chapter, designate
two voting members to serve terms of two years. The board members
shall not receive a salary but shall be compensated for actual and
necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official
duties.
(2)(a) The voting members of the board serve until their
replacements are appointed. New members of the board shall be
appointed at least thirty days prior to the expiration of any board
member's term of office.
(b) Notice of expiration of a term of office shall be published at
least twice in a weekly or daily newspaper of general circulation in
the ((section [geographical area])) geographical area with last
publication occurring at least ten days prior to the nomination. All
persons interested in appointment to the board and residing in the
geographical area with a pending nomination shall make a written
application that includes the signatures of at least ten registered
voters residing in the geographical area supporting the nomination to
the county noxious weed control board. After nominations close, the
county noxious weed control board shall, after a hearing, send the
applications to the county legislative authority recommending the names
of the most qualified candidates, and post the names of those nominees
in the county courthouse and publish in at least one newspaper of
general circulation in the county. The county legislative authority,
within ten days of receiving the list of nominees, shall appoint one of
those nominees to the county noxious weed control board to represent
that geographical area during that term of office.
(3) Within thirty days after all the members have been appointed,
the board shall conduct its first meeting. A majority of the voting
members of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business and is necessary for any action taken by the board. The board
shall elect from its members a chair and other officers as may be
necessary.
(4) In case of a vacancy occurring in any voting position on a
county noxious weed control board, the county legislative authority of
the county in which the board is located shall appoint a qualified
person to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.

Sec. 5 RCW 17.10.060 and 1997 c 353 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each ((activated)) county noxious weed control board shall
employ or otherwise provide a weed coordinator whose duties are fixed
by the board but which shall include inspecting land to determine the
presence of noxious weeds, offering technical assistance and education,
and developing a program to achieve compliance with the weed law. The
weed coordinator may be employed full time, part time, or seasonally by
the county noxious weed control board. County weed board employment
practices shall comply with county personnel policies. Within sixty
days from initial employment the weed coordinator shall obtain a pest
control consultant license, a pesticide operator license, and the
necessary endorsements on the licenses as required by law. Each board
may purchase, rent, or lease equipment, facilities, or products and may
hire additional persons as it deems necessary for the administration of
the county's noxious weed control program.
(2) Each ((activated)) county noxious weed control board has the
power to adopt rules and regulations, subject to notice and hearing as
provided in chapters 42.30 and 42.32 RCW, as are necessary for an
effective county weed control or eradication program.
(3) Each ((activated)) county noxious weed control board shall meet
with a quorum at least quarterly.

Sec. 6 RCW 17.10.074 and 1997 c 353 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the powers conferred on the director under other
provisions of this chapter, the director, with the advice of the state
noxious weed control board, has power to:
(a) Require the county legislative authority or the noxious weed
control board of any county or any weed district to report to ((it))
the director concerning the presence, absence, or estimated amount of
noxious weeds and measures, if any, taken or planned for the control
thereof;
(b) Employ staff as may be necessary in the administration of this
chapter;
(c) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules, pursuant to the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as may be necessary to carry out this
chapter;
(d) Do such things as may be necessary and incidental to the
administration of its functions pursuant to this chapter including but
not limited to surveying for and detecting noxious weed infestations;
(e) Upon receipt of a complaint signed by a majority of the members
of an adjacent county noxious weed control board or weed district, or
by one hundred registered voters that are land owners within the
county, require the county legislative authority or noxious weed
control board of the county or weed district that is the subject of the
complaint to respond to the complaint within forty-five days with a
plan for the control of the noxious weeds cited in the complaint;
(f) If the complaint in (e) of this subsection involves a class A
or class B noxious weed, order the county legislative authority,
noxious weed control board, or weed district to take immediate action
to eradicate or control the noxious weed infestation. If the county or
the weed district does not take action to control the noxious weed
infestation in accordance with the order, the director may control it
or cause it to be controlled. The county or weed district is liable
for payment of the expense of the control work including necessary
costs and expenses for attorneys' fees incurred by the director in
securing payment from the county or weed district. The director may
bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to collect
the expenses of the control work, costs, and attorneys' fees;
(g) Until January 1, 2009, in counties without ((an activated)) a
noxious weed control board, enter upon any property as provided for in
RCW 17.10.160, issue or cause to be issued notices and citations and
take the necessary action to control noxious weeds as provided in RCW
17.10.170, hold hearings on any charge or cost of control action taken
as provided for in RCW 17.10.180, issue a notice of civil infraction as
provided for in RCW 17.10.230 and 17.10.310 through (([and])) and
17.10.350, and place a lien on any property pursuant to RCW 17.10.280,
17.10.290, and 17.10.300 with the same authorities and responsibilities
imposed by these sections on county noxious weed control boards;
(h) Adopt a list of noxious weed seeds and toxic weeds which shall
be controlled in designated articles, products, or feed stuffs as
provided for in RCW 17.10.235.
(2) The moneys appropriated for noxious weed control to the
department shall be used for administration of the state noxious weed
control board, the administration of the director's powers under this
chapter, the purchase of materials for controlling, containing, or
eradicating noxious weeds, the purchase or collection of biological
control agents for controlling noxious weeds, and the contracting for
services to carry out the purposes of this chapter. ((In a county with
an activated noxious weed control board,)) The director shall make
every effort to contract with ((that)) county noxious weed control
boards for the needed services.
(3) If the director determines the need to reallocate funds
previously designated for county use, the director shall convene a
meeting of the state noxious weed control board to seek its advice
concerning any reallocation.

Sec. 7 RCW 17.10.080 and 1997 c 353 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state noxious weed control board shall each year or more
often, following a hearing, adopt a state noxious weed list.
(2) Any person may request during a comment period established by
the state weed board the inclusion, deletion, or designation change of
any plant to the state noxious weed list.
(3) The state noxious weed control board shall send a copy of the
list to each ((activated)) county noxious weed control board((,)) and
to each weed district((, and to the county legislative authority of
each county with an inactive noxious weed control board)).
(4) The record of rule making must include the written findings of
the board for the inclusion of each plant on the list. The findings
shall be made available upon request to any interested person.

Sec. 8 RCW 17.10.190 and 1997 c 353 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each ((activated)) county noxious weed control board must publish
annually, and at other times as may be appropriate, in at least one
newspaper of general circulation within its area, a general notice.
The notice shall direct attention to the need for noxious weed control
and give other information concerning noxious weed control requirements
as may be appropriate, or indicate where such information may be
secured. In addition to the general notice required, the county
noxious weed control board may use any appropriate media for the
dissemination of information to the public as may be calculated to
bring the need for noxious weed control to the attention of owners.
The board may consult with individual owners concerning their problems
of noxious weed control and may provide them with information and
advice, including giving specific instructions and methods when and how
certain named weeds are to be controlled. The methods may include some
combination of physical, mechanical, cultural, chemical, and/or
biological methods, including livestock. Publication of a notice as
required by this section is not a condition precedent to the
enforcement of this chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 17.10.205 and 1997 c 353 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
Open areas subject to the spread of noxious weeds, including but
not limited to subdivisions, school grounds, playgrounds, parks, and
rights of way shall be subject to regulation by ((activated)) county
noxious weed control boards in the same manner and to the same extent
as is provided for all terrestrial and aquatic lands of the state.

Sec. 10 RCW 17.10.240 and 1997 c 353 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The activated)) Each county noxious weed control board ((of
each county)) shall annually submit a budget to the county legislative
authority for the operating cost of the county's weed program for the
ensuing fiscal year((: PROVIDED, That if the board finds the budget
approved by the legislative authority is insufficient for an effective
county noxious weed control program it shall petition the county
legislative authority to hold a hearing as provided in RCW 17.10.890)).
Control of weeds is a benefit to the lands within any such section.
Funding for the budget is derived from any or all of the following:
(a) The county legislative authority may, in lieu of a tax, levy an
assessment against the land for this purpose. Prior to the levying of
an assessment the county noxious weed control board shall hold a public
hearing at which it will gather information to serve as a basis for
classification and then classify the lands into suitable
classifications, including but not limited to dry lands, range lands,
irrigated lands, nonuse lands, forest lands, or federal lands. The
board shall develop and forward to the county legislative authority, as
a proposed level of assessment for each class, an amount as seems just.
The assessment rate shall be either uniform per acre in its respective
class or a flat rate per parcel rate plus a uniform rate per acre:
PROVIDED, That if no benefits are found to accrue to a class of land,
a zero assessment may be levied. The county legislative authority,
upon receipt of the proposed levels of assessment from the board, after
a hearing, shall accept or modify by resolution, or refer back to the
board for its reconsideration all or any portion of the proposed levels
of assessment. The amount of the assessment constitutes a lien against
the property. The county legislative authority may by resolution or
ordinance require that notice of the lien be sent to each owner of
property for which the assessment has not been paid by the date it was
due and that each lien created be collected by the treasurer in the
same manner as delinquent real property tax, if within thirty days from
the date the owner is sent notice of the lien, including the amount
thereof, the lien remains unpaid and an appeal has not been made
pursuant to RCW 17.10.180. Liens treated as delinquent taxes bear
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum and the interest
accrues as of the date notice of the lien is sent to the owner:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That any collections for the lien shall not be
considered as tax; or
(b) The county legislative authority may appropriate money from the
county general fund necessary for the administration of the county
noxious weed control program. In addition the county legislative
authority may make emergency appropriations as it deems necessary for
the implementation of this chapter.
(2) Forest lands used solely for the planting, growing, or
harvesting of trees and which are typified, except during a single
period of five years following clear-cut logging, by canopies so dense
as to prohibit growth of an understory may be subject to an annual
noxious weed assessment levied by a county legislative authority that
does not exceed one-tenth of the weighted average per acre noxious weed
assessment levied on all other lands in unincorporated areas within the
county that are subject to the weed assessment. This assessment shall
be computed in accordance with the formula in subsection (3) of this
section.
(3) The calculation of the "weighted average per acre noxious weed
assessment" is a ratio expressed as follows:
(a) The numerator is the total amount of funds estimated to be
collected from the per acre assessment on all lands except (i) forest
lands as identified in subsection (2) of this section, (ii) lands
exempt from the noxious weed assessment, and (iii) lands located in an
incorporated area.
(b) The denominator is the total acreage from which funds in (a) of
this subsection are collected. For lands of less than one acre in
size, the denominator calculation may be based on the following
assumptions: (i) Unimproved lands are calculated as being one-half
acre in size on the average, and (ii) improved lands are calculated as
being one-third acre in size on the average. The county legislative
authority may choose to calculate the denominator for lands of less
than one acre in size using other assumptions about average parcel size
based on local information.
(4) For those counties that levy a per parcel assessment to help
fund noxious weed control programs, the per parcel assessment on forest
lands as defined in subsection (2) of this section shall not exceed
one-tenth of the per parcel assessment on nonforest lands.

Sec. 11 RCW 17.10.250 and 1997 c 353 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislative authority of any county ((with an activated noxious
weed control board)) or the board of any weed district may apply to the
director for noxious weed control funds when informed by the director
that funds are available. Any applicant must employ adequate
administrative personnel to supervise an effective weed control program
as determined by the director with advice from the state noxious weed
control board. The director with advice from the state noxious weed
control board shall adopt rules on the distribution and use of noxious
weed control account funds.

Sec. 12 RCW 17.10.280 and 1987 c 438 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every ((activated)) county noxious weed control board performing
labor, furnishing material, or renting, leasing or otherwise supplying
equipment, to be used in the control of noxious weeds, or in causing
control of noxious weeds, upon any property pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 17.10 RCW has a lien upon such property for the labor
performed, material furnished, or equipment supplied whether performed,
furnished, or supplied with the consent of the owner, or his agent, of
such property, or without the consent of said owner or agent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 17.10.040 (Activation of inactive county noxious weed
control board) and 1997 c 353 s 5, 1987 c 438 s 3, 1975 1st ex.s. c 13
s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 4; and
(2) RCW 17.10.890 (Deactivation of county noxious weed control
board -- Hearing) and 1997 c 353 s 32 & 1987 c 438 s 37.

--- END ---