BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.08.178 and 1988 c 161 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((For the purposes of this title, the monthly wages the worker
was receiving from all employment at the time of injury shall be the
basis upon which compensation is computed unless otherwise provided
specifically in the statute concerned. In cases where the worker's
wages are not fixed by the month, they shall be determined by
multiplying the daily wage the worker was receiving at the time of the
injury:
(a) By five, if the worker was normally employed one day a week;
(b) By nine, if the worker was normally employed two days a week;
(c) By thirteen, if the worker was normally employed three days a
week;
(d) By eighteen, if the worker was normally employed four days a
week;
(e) By twenty-two, if the worker was normally employed five days a
week;
(f) By twenty-six, if the worker was normally employed six days a
week;
(g) By thirty, if the worker was normally employed seven days a
week.
The term "wages" shall include the reasonable value of board,
housing, fuel, or other consideration of like nature received from the
employer as part of the contract of hire, but shall not include
overtime pay except in cases under subsection (2) of this section.
However, tips shall also be considered wages only to the extent such
tips are reported to the employer for federal income tax purposes. The
daily wage shall be the hourly wage multiplied by the number of hours
the worker is normally employed. The number of hours the worker is
normally employed shall be determined by the department in a fair and
reasonable manner, which may include averaging the number of hours
worked per day.
(2) In cases where (a) the worker's employment is exclusively
seasonal in nature or (b) the worker's current employment or his or her
relation to his or her employment is essentially part-time or
intermittent, the monthly wage shall be determined by dividing by
twelve the total wages earned, including overtime, from all employment
in any twelve successive calendar months preceding the injury which
fairly represent the claimant's employment pattern.
(3) If, within the twelve months immediately preceding the injury,
the worker has received from the employer at the time of injury a bonus
as part of the contract of hire, the average monthly value of such
bonus shall be included in determining the worker's monthly wages.
(4) In cases where a wage has not been fixed or cannot be
reasonably and fairly determined, the monthly wage shall be computed on
the basis of the usual wage paid other employees engaged in like or
similar occupations where the wages are fixed)) "Wages" means the gross
remuneration paid in cash by the employer to the worker for services
performed with respect to a pay period, before any deductions. "Paid
in cash" means payment in cash, by check, by electronic transfer, or by
other means made directly to the worker.
(a) Tips shall be considered wages only to the extent that such
tips are reported to the employer for federal income tax purposes.
(b) Wages include the actual value of board, housing, and fuel
received from the employer as part of the contract of hire. This
subsection (1)(b) does not apply during any period in which the
employer continues to provide, through a past or current payment,
board, housing, and/or fuel, that were provided to the employee at the
time of the injury or manifestation of occupational disease.
(c) Wages also include the cash value of mental and physical health
insurance received from the employer as part of the contract of hire.
This subsection (1)(c) does not apply during any period in which the
employer continues to provide, through a past or current payment,
mental and physical health insurance that was provided to the employee
at the time of the injury or manifestation of occupational disease.
(d) Wages do not include fringe benefits. Fringe benefits are any
consideration given to a worker in addition to wages, including, but
not limited to: Retirement and financial benefit plans of whatever
nature; life, disability, and wage-replacement insurance of whatever
nature; unused, accrued leave of whatever nature; memberships of
whatever nature; employee discounts or use or consumption of employer
services, materials, equipment, and facilities of whatever nature;
training and education of whatever nature; and other employee or
beneficiary benefit plan for the employee's or beneficiaries' benefit
resulting from the employment relationship.
(2)(a) During the initial payment period, the worker's monthly wage
shall be the total monthly wages earned from all employment, including
cash bonuses and overtime pay, in the thirty days immediately preceding
the pay period in which the date of injury or manifestation of
occupational disease occurred. "Initial payment period" means the
period starting on the date the claim for injury or manifestation of
occupational disease was filed and ending on the last day of the
twelfth consecutive calendar week following the date the claim was
filed.
(b) The worker's monthly wage during the initial payment period
shall be established using itemized pay statements in the pay periods
covering the thirty days preceding the pay period of the date of injury
or manifestation of occupational disease. If itemized pay statements
are not available from the employer or worker covering the entire
thirty-day period, the department shall calculate the monthly wage
using any available pay statements for the thirty-day period. If no
pay statements for the thirty-day period can be produced by either the
employer or the worker, the monthly wage shall be established based on
the contract of hire as determined in a statement from the employer and
worker.
(c) After the initial payment period, the worker's monthly wage
shall be determined by dividing by twelve the total wages earned from
all employment, including cash bonuses and overtime pay, in the twelve
consecutive calendar months immediately preceding the month in which
the injury or manifestation of occupational disease occurred.
(d) In cases where the worker is self-employed or the worker's
monthly wage cannot be reasonably determined under (b) of this
subsection due to the worker sustaining an injury or occupational
disease less than thirty days after beginning an employment
relationship that both the worker and the employer intend to be
continuous and lasting without limit into the foreseeable future, and
which provides wages, on an annualized basis, of greater than one
hundred fifty percent of wages earned by the worker in the twelve
months before beginning such employment, the monthly wage shall be
computed on the basis of the usual wage paid other employees of the
employer at the time of injury or manifestation of occupational disease
who perform like job duties with like work patterns or, if none exist,
other employees in the worker's labor market who perform like job
duties with like work patterns.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) During the initial payment period, the worker's employer shall,
to the extent possible, continue to provide the following if they were
provided by the worker's employer as part of the contract of hire and
were received by the worker at the time of the injury: (a) Board,
housing, and fuel; and (b) mental and physical health insurance.
(2) If the employer cannot continue to provide one or more of the
benefits described in subsection (1) of this section during the initial
payment period, the employer shall notify the department and the
department will adjust the worker's monthly wage calculation using the
cash value of the benefit the employer is unable to provide.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.32.050 and 1995 c 199 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where death results from the injury the expenses of burial not
to exceed two hundred percent of the average monthly wage in the state
as defined in RCW 51.08.018 shall be paid.
(2)(a)(i) For claims with date of injury or manifestation of
occupational disease before July 1, 2007, where death results from the
injury, a surviving spouse of a deceased worker eligible for benefits
under this title shall receive monthly for life or until remarriage
payments according to the following schedule:
(((i))) (A) If there are no children of the deceased worker, sixty
percent of the wages of the deceased worker but not less than one
hundred eighty-five dollars;
(((ii))) (B) If there is one child of the deceased worker and in
the legal custody of such spouse, sixty-two percent of the wages of the
deceased worker but not less than two hundred twenty-two dollars;
(((iii))) (C) If there are two children of the deceased worker and
in the legal custody of such spouse, sixty-four percent of the wages of
the deceased worker but not less than two hundred fifty-three dollars;
(((iv))) (D) If there are three children of the deceased worker and
in the legal custody of such spouse, sixty-six percent of the wages of
the deceased worker but not less than two hundred seventy-six dollars;
(((v))) (E) If there are four children of the deceased worker and
in the legal custody of such spouse, sixty-eight percent of the wages
of the deceased worker but not less than two hundred ninety-nine
dollars; or
(((vi))) (F) If there are five or more children of the deceased
worker and in the legal custody of such spouse, seventy percent of the
wages of the deceased worker but not less than three hundred twenty-two
dollars.
(ii) For claims with date of injury or manifestation of
occupational disease on or after July 1, 2007, where death results from
the injury, a surviving spouse of a deceased worker eligible for
benefits under this title shall receive monthly for life or until
remarriage payments of sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the wages of
the deceased worker, but not less than two hundred seventy-six dollars.
(b) Where the surviving spouse does not have legal custody of any
child or children of the deceased worker or where after the death of
the worker legal custody of such child or children passes from such
surviving spouse to another, any payment on account of such child or
children not in the legal custody of the surviving spouse shall be made
to the person or persons having legal custody of such child or
children. The amount of such payments shall be five percent of the
monthly benefits payable as a result of the worker's death for each
such child but such payments shall not exceed twenty-five percent.
Such payments on account of such child or children shall be subtracted
from the amount to which such surviving spouse would have been entitled
had such surviving spouse had legal custody of all of the children and
the surviving spouse shall receive the remainder after such payments on
account of such child or children have been subtracted. Such payments
on account of a child or children not in the legal custody of such
surviving spouse shall be apportioned equally among such children.
(c) Payments to the surviving spouse of the deceased worker shall
cease at the end of the month in which remarriage occurs: PROVIDED,
That a monthly payment shall be made to the child or children of the
deceased worker from the month following such remarriage in a sum equal
to five percent of the wages of the deceased worker for one child and
a sum equal to five percent for each additional child up to a maximum
of five such children. Payments to such child or children shall be
apportioned equally among such children. Such sum shall be in place of
any payments theretofore made for the benefit of or on account of any
such child or children. If the surviving spouse does not have legal
custody of any child or children of the deceased worker, or if after
the death of the worker, legal custody of such child or children passes
from such surviving spouse to another, any payment on account of such
child or children not in the legal custody of the surviving spouse
shall be made to the person or persons having legal custody of such
child or children.
(d) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in subsection
(2) of this section exceed the applicable percentage of the average
monthly wage in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(e) In addition to the monthly payments provided for in subsection
(2)(a) through (c) of this section, a surviving spouse or child or
children of such worker if there is no surviving spouse, or dependent
parent or parents, if there is no surviving spouse or child or children
of any such deceased worker shall be forthwith paid a sum equal to one
hundred percent of the average monthly wage in the state as defined in
RCW 51.08.018, any such children, or parents to share and share alike
in said sum.
(f) Upon remarriage of a surviving spouse the monthly payments for
the child or children shall continue as provided in this section, but
the monthly payments to such surviving spouse shall cease at the end of
the month during which remarriage occurs. However, after September 8,
1975, an otherwise eligible surviving spouse of a worker who died at
any time prior to or after September 8, 1975, shall have an option of:
(i) Receiving, once and for all, a lump sum of twenty-four times
the monthly compensation rate in effect on the date of remarriage
allocable to the spouse for himself or herself pursuant to subsection
(2)(a)(i)(A) of this section and subject to any modifications specified
under subsection (2)(d) of this section and RCW 51.32.075(3) or fifty
percent of the then remaining annuity value of his or her pension,
whichever is the lesser: PROVIDED, That if the injury occurred prior
to July 28, 1991, the remarriage benefit lump sum available shall be as
provided in the remarriage benefit schedules then in effect; or
(ii) If a surviving spouse does not choose the option specified in
subsection (2)(f)(i) of this section to accept the lump sum payment,
the remarriage of the surviving spouse of a worker shall not bar him or
her from claiming the lump sum payment authorized in subsection
(2)(f)(i) of this section during the life of the remarriage, or shall
not prevent subsequent monthly payments to him or to her if the
remarriage has been terminated by death or has been dissolved or
annulled by valid court decree provided he or she has not previously
accepted the lump sum payment.
(g) If the surviving spouse during the remarriage should die
without having previously received the lump sum payment provided in
subsection (2)(f)(i) of this section, his or her estate shall be
entitled to receive the sum specified under subsection (2)(f)(i) of
this section or fifty percent of the then remaining annuity value of
his or her pension whichever is the lesser.
(h) The effective date of resumption of payments under subsection
(2)(f)(ii) of this section to a surviving spouse based upon termination
of a remarriage by death, annulment, or dissolution shall be the date
of the death or the date the judicial decree of annulment or
dissolution becomes final and when application for the payments has
been received.
(i) If it should be necessary to increase the reserves in the
reserve fund or to create a new pension reserve fund as a result of the
amendments in chapter 45, Laws of 1975-'76 2nd ex. sess., the amount of
such increase in pension reserve in any such case shall be transferred
to the reserve fund from the supplemental pension fund.
(3) If there is a child or children and no surviving spouse of the
deceased worker or the surviving spouse is not eligible for benefits
under this title, a sum equal to thirty-five percent of the wages of
the deceased worker shall be paid monthly for one child and a sum
equivalent to fifteen percent of such wage shall be paid monthly for
each additional child, the total of such sum to be divided among such
children, share and share alike: PROVIDED, That benefits under this
subsection or subsection (4) of this section shall not exceed the
lesser of sixty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker at the
time of his or her death or the applicable percentage of the average
monthly wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018, as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(4) In the event a surviving spouse receiving monthly payments
dies, the child or children of the deceased worker shall receive the
same payment as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) If the worker leaves no surviving spouse or child, but leaves
a dependent or dependents, a monthly payment shall be made to each
dependent equal to fifty percent of the average monthly support
actually received by such dependent from the worker during the twelve
months next preceding the occurrence of the injury, but the total
payment to all dependents in any case shall not exceed the lesser of
sixty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker at the time of
his or her death or the applicable percentage of the average monthly
wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

If any dependent is under the age of eighteen years at the time of the
occurrence of the injury, the payment to such dependent shall cease
when such dependent reaches the age of eighteen years except such
payments shall continue until the dependent reaches age twenty-three
while permanently enrolled at a full time course in an accredited
school. The payment to any dependent shall cease if and when, under
the same circumstances, the necessity creating the dependency would
have ceased if the injury had not happened.
(6) For claims filed prior to July 1, 1986, if the injured worker
dies during the period of permanent total disability, whatever the
cause of death, leaving a surviving spouse, or child, or children, the
surviving spouse or child or children shall receive benefits as if
death resulted from the injury as provided in subsections (2) through
(4) of this section. Upon remarriage or death of such surviving
spouse, the payments to such child or children shall be made as
provided in subsection (2) of this section when the surviving spouse of
a deceased worker remarries.
(7) For claims filed on or after July 1, 1986, every worker who
becomes eligible for permanent total disability benefits shall elect an
option as provided in RCW 51.32.067.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.32.060 and 1993 c 521 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, when the
supervisor of industrial insurance ((shall)) determines that permanent
total disability results from the injury, the worker shall receive
monthly during the period of such disability:
(a) If married at the time of injury, sixty-five percent of his or
her wages but not less than two hundred fifteen dollars per month.
(b) If married with one child at the time of injury, sixty-seven
percent of his or her wages but not less than two hundred fifty-two
dollars per month.
(c) If married with two children at the time of injury, sixty-nine
percent of his or her wages but not less than two hundred eighty-three
dollars.
(d) If married with three children at the time of injury,
seventy-one percent of his or her wages but not less than three hundred
six dollars per month.
(e) If married with four children at the time of injury,
seventy-three percent of his or her wages but not less than three
hundred twenty-nine dollars per month.
(f) If married with five or more children at the time of injury,
seventy-five percent of his or her wages but not less than three
hundred fifty-two dollars per month.
(g) If unmarried at the time of the injury, sixty percent of his or
her wages but not less than one hundred eighty-five dollars per month.
(h) If unmarried with one child at the time of injury, sixty-two
percent of his or her wages but not less than two hundred twenty-two
dollars per month.
(i) If unmarried with two children at the time of injury,
sixty-four percent of his or her wages but not less than two hundred
fifty-three dollars per month.
(j) If unmarried with three children at the time of injury,
sixty-six percent of his or her wages but not less than two hundred
seventy-six dollars per month.
(k) If unmarried with four children at the time of injury,
sixty-eight percent of his or her wages but not less than two hundred
ninety-nine dollars per month.
(l) If unmarried with five or more children at the time of injury,
seventy percent of his or her wages but not less than three hundred
twenty-two dollars per month.
(2) For any claim with date of injury or manifestation of
occupational disease on or after July 1, 2007, when the supervisor of
industrial insurance determines that permanent total disability results
from the injury, the worker shall receive monthly during the period of
such disability sixty-six and two-thirds percent of his or her wages as
determined under RCW 51.08.178, but not less than two hundred
seventy-six dollars per month.
(3) For any period of time where both husband and wife are entitled
to compensation as temporarily or totally disabled workers, only that
spouse having the higher wages of the two shall be entitled to claim
their child or children for compensation purposes under subsection (1)
of this section.
(((3))) (4) In case of permanent total disability, if the character
of the injury is such as to render the worker so physically helpless as
to require the hiring of the services of an attendant, the department
shall make monthly payments to such attendant for such services as long
as such requirement continues, but such payments shall not obtain or be
operative while the worker is receiving care under or pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 51.36 RCW and RCW 51.04.105.
(((4))) (5) Should any further accident result in the permanent
total disability of an injured worker, he or she shall receive the
pension to which he or she would be entitled, notwithstanding the
payment of a lump sum for his or her prior injury.
(((5))) (6) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in this
section exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in
the state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

The limitations under this subsection shall not apply to the
payments provided for in subsection (((3))) (4) of this section.
(((6))) (7) In the case of new or reopened claims, if the
supervisor of industrial insurance determines that, at the time of
filing or reopening, the worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer
attached to the work force, benefits shall not be paid under this
section.
(((7))) (8) The benefits provided by this section are subject to
modification under RCW 51.32.067.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.32.090 and 1993 c 521 s 3, 1993 c 299 s 1, and 1993
c 271 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When the total disability is only temporary, the schedule of
payments contained in RCW 51.32.060 (1) and (((2))) (3) shall apply, so
long as the total disability continues.
(2) Any compensation payable under this section for children not in
the custody of the injured worker as of the date of injury shall be
payable only to such person as actually is providing the support for
such child or children pursuant to the order of a court of record
providing for support of such child or children.
(3)(a) As soon as recovery is so complete that the present earning
power of the worker, at any kind of work, is restored to that existing
at the time of the occurrence of the injury, the payments shall cease.
If and so long as the present earning power is only partially restored,
the payments shall:
(i) For claims for injuries that occurred before May 7, 1993,
continue in the proportion which the new earning power shall bear to
the old; or
(ii) For claims for injuries occurring on or after May 7, 1993,
equal eighty percent of the actual difference between the worker's
present wages and earning power at the time of injury, but: (A) The
total of these payments and the worker's present wages may not exceed
one hundred fifty percent of the average monthly wage in the state as
computed under RCW 51.08.018; (B) the payments may not exceed one
hundred percent of the entitlement as computed under subsection (1) of
this section; and (C) the payments may not be less than the worker
would have received if (a)(i) of this subsection had been applicable to
the worker's claim.
(b) No compensation shall be payable under this subsection (3)
unless the loss of earning power shall exceed five percent.
(4)(a) Whenever the employer of injury requests that a worker who
is entitled to temporary total disability under this chapter be
certified by a physician as able to perform available work other than
his or her usual work, the employer shall furnish to the physician,
with a copy to the worker, a statement describing the work available
with the employer of injury in terms that will enable the physician to
relate the physical activities of the job to the worker's disability.
The physician shall then determine whether the worker is physically
able to perform the work described. The worker's temporary total
disability payments shall continue until the worker is released by his
or her physician for the work, and begins the work with the employer of
injury. If the work thereafter comes to an end before the worker's
recovery is sufficient in the judgment of his or her physician to
permit him or her to return to his or her usual job, or to perform
other available work offered by the employer of injury, the worker's
temporary total disability payments shall be resumed. Should the
available work described, once undertaken by the worker, impede his or
her recovery to the extent that in the judgment of his or her physician
he or she should not continue to work, the worker's temporary total
disability payments shall be resumed when the worker ceases such work.
(b) Once the worker returns to work under the terms of this
subsection (4), he or she shall not be assigned by the employer to work
other than the available work described without the worker's written
consent, or without prior review and approval by the worker's
physician.
(c) If the worker returns to work under this subsection (4), any
employee health and welfare benefits that the worker was receiving at
the time of injury shall continue or be resumed at the level provided
at the time of injury. Such benefits shall not be continued or resumed
if to do so is inconsistent with the terms of the benefit program, or
with the terms of the collective bargaining agreement currently in
force.
(d) In the event of any dispute as to the worker's ability to
perform the available work offered by the employer, the department
shall make the final determination.
(5) No worker shall receive compensation for or during the day on
which injury was received or the three days following the same, unless
his or her disability shall continue for a period of fourteen
consecutive calendar days from date of injury: PROVIDED, That attempts
to return to work in the first fourteen days following the injury shall
not serve to break the continuity of the period of disability if the
disability continues fourteen days after the injury occurs.
(6) Should a worker suffer a temporary total disability and should
his or her employer at the time of the injury continue to pay him or
her the wages which he or she was earning at the time of such injury,
such injured worker shall not receive any payment provided in
subsection (1) of this section during the period his or her employer
shall so pay such wages.
(7) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in this section
exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(8) If the supervisor of industrial insurance determines that the
worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached to the work
force, benefits shall not be paid under this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 51.32.240 and 2004 c 243 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever any payment of benefits under this title is made
because of clerical error, mistake of identity, innocent
misrepresentation by or on behalf of the recipient thereof mistakenly
acted upon, or any other circumstance of a similar nature, all not
induced by willful misrepresentation, the recipient thereof shall repay
it and recoupment may be made from any future payments due to the
recipient on any claim with the state fund or self-insurer, as the case
may be. The department or self-insurer, as the case may be, must make
claim for such repayment or recoupment within one year of the making of
any such payment or it will be deemed any claim therefor has been
waived.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this
section, the department may only assess an overpayment of benefits
because of adjudicator error when the order upon which the overpayment
is based is not yet final as provided in RCW 51.52.050 and 51.52.060.
"Adjudicator error" includes the failure to consider information in the
claim file, failure to secure adequate information, or an error in
judgment.
(c) The director, pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with the
procedures provided in the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW, may exercise his discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the
amount of any such timely claim where the recovery would be against
equity and good conscience.
(2) Whenever the department or self-insurer fails to pay benefits
because of clerical error, mistake of identity, or innocent
misrepresentation, all not induced by recipient willful
misrepresentation, the recipient may request an adjustment of benefits
to be paid from the state fund or by the self-insurer, as the case may
be, subject to the following:
(a) The recipient must request an adjustment in benefits within one
year from the date of the incorrect payment or it will be deemed any
claim therefore has been waived.
(b) The recipient may not seek an adjustment of benefits because of
adjudicator error. Adjustments due to adjudicator error are addressed
by the filing of a written request for reconsideration with the
department of labor and industries or an appeal with the board of
industrial insurance appeals within sixty days from the date the order
is communicated as provided in RCW 51.52.050. "Adjudicator error"
includes the failure to consider information in the claim file, failure
to secure adequate information, or an error in judgment.
(3) Whenever the department issues an order rejecting a claim for
benefits paid pursuant to RCW 51.32.190 or 51.32.210, after payment for
temporary disability benefits has been paid by a self-insurer pursuant
to RCW 51.32.190(3) or by the department pursuant to RCW 51.32.210, the
recipient thereof shall repay such benefits and recoupment may be made
from any future payments due to the recipient on any claim with the
state fund or self-insurer, as the case may be. The director, under
rules adopted in accordance with the procedures provided in the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, may exercise
discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the amount of any such
payments where the recovery would be against equity and good
conscience.
(4) Whenever any payment of benefits under this title has been made
pursuant to an adjudication by the department or by order of the board
or any court and timely appeal therefrom has been made where the final
decision is that any such payment was made pursuant to an erroneous
adjudication, the recipient thereof shall repay it and recoupment may
be made from any future payments due to the recipient on any claim with
the state fund or self-insurer, as the case may be. The director,
pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with the procedures provided in
the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, may exercise his
discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the amount of any such
payments where the recovery would be against equity and good
conscience.
(5)(a) Whenever any payment of benefits under this title has been
induced by willful misrepresentation the recipient thereof shall repay
any such payment together with a penalty of fifty percent of the total
of any such payments and the amount of such total sum may be recouped
from any future payments due to the recipient on any claim with the
state fund or self-insurer against whom the willful misrepresentation
was committed, as the case may be, and the amount of such penalty shall
be placed in the supplemental pension fund. Such repayment or
recoupment must be demanded or ordered within three years of the
discovery of the willful misrepresentation.
(b) For purposes of this subsection (5), it is willful
misrepresentation for a person to obtain payments or other benefits
under this title in an amount greater than that to which the person
otherwise would be entitled. Willful misrepresentation includes:
(i) Willful false statement; or
(ii) Willful misrepresentation, omission, or concealment of any
material fact.
(c) For purposes of this subsection (5), "willful" means a
conscious or deliberate false statement, misrepresentation, omission,
or concealment of a material fact with the specific intent of
obtaining, continuing, or increasing benefits under this title.
(d) For purposes of this subsection (5), failure to disclose a
work-type activity must be willful in order for a misrepresentation to
have occurred.
(e) For purposes of this subsection (5), a material fact is one
which would result in additional, increased, or continued benefits,
including but not limited to facts about physical restrictions, or
work-type activities which either result in wages or income or would be
reasonably expected to do so. Wages or income include the receipt of
any goods or services. For a work-type activity to be reasonably
expected to result in wages or income, a pattern of repeated activity
must exist. ((For those activities that would reasonably be expected
to result in wages or produce income, but for which actual wage or
income information cannot be reasonably determined, the department
shall impute wages pursuant to RCW 51.08.178(4).))
(6) The worker, beneficiary, or other person affected thereby shall
have the right to contest an order assessing an overpayment pursuant to
this section in the same manner and to the same extent as provided
under RCW 51.52.050 and 51.52.060. In the event such an order becomes
final under chapter 51.52 RCW and notwithstanding the provisions of
subsections (1) through (5) of this section, the director, director's
designee, or self-insurer may file with the clerk in any county within
the state a warrant in the amount of the sum representing the unpaid
overpayment and/or penalty plus interest accruing from the date the
order became final. The clerk of the county in which the warrant is
filed shall immediately designate a superior court cause number for
such warrant and the clerk shall cause to be entered in the judgment
docket under the superior court cause number assigned to the warrant,
the name of the worker, beneficiary, or other person mentioned in the
warrant, the amount of the unpaid overpayment and/or penalty plus
interest accrued, and the date the warrant was filed. The amount of
the warrant as docketed shall become a lien upon the title to and
interest in all real and personal property of the worker, beneficiary,
or other person against whom the warrant is issued, the same as a
judgment in a civil case docketed in the office of such clerk. The
sheriff shall then proceed in the same manner and with like effect as
prescribed by law with respect to execution or other process issued
against rights or property upon judgment in the superior court. Such
warrant so docketed shall be sufficient to support the issuance of
writs of garnishment in favor of the department or self-insurer in the
manner provided by law in the case of judgment, wholly or partially
unsatisfied. The clerk of the court shall be entitled to a filing fee
under RCW 36.18.012(10), which shall be added to the amount of the
warrant. A copy of such warrant shall be mailed to the worker,
beneficiary, or other person within three days of filing with the
clerk.
The director, director's designee, or self-insurer may issue to any
person, firm, corporation, municipal corporation, political subdivision
of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state, a notice to
withhold and deliver property of any kind if there is reason to believe
that there is in the possession of such person, firm, corporation,
municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public
corporation, or agency of the state, property that is due, owing, or
belonging to any worker, beneficiary, or other person upon whom a
warrant has been served for payments due the department or self-insurer. The notice and order to withhold and deliver shall be served
by certified mail accompanied by an affidavit of service by mailing or
served by the sheriff of the county, or by the sheriff's deputy, or by
any authorized representative of the director, director's designee, or
self-insurer. Any person, firm, corporation, municipal corporation,
political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or agency of
the state upon whom service has been made shall answer the notice
within twenty days exclusive of the day of service, under oath and in
writing, and shall make true answers to the matters inquired or in the
notice and order to withhold and deliver. In the event there is in the
possession of the party named and served with such notice and order,
any property that may be subject to the claim of the department or
self-insurer, such property shall be delivered forthwith to the
director, the director's authorized representative, or self-insurer
upon demand. If the party served and named in the notice and order
fails to answer the notice and order within the time prescribed in this
section, the court may, after the time to answer such order has
expired, render judgment by default against the party named in the
notice for the full amount, plus costs, claimed by the director,
director's designee, or self-insurer in the notice. In the event that
a notice to withhold and deliver is served upon an employer and the
property found to be subject thereto is wages, the employer may assert
in the answer all exemptions provided for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which
the wage earner may be entitled.
This subsection shall only apply to orders assessing an overpayment
which are issued on or after July 28, 1991: PROVIDED, That this
subsection shall apply retroactively to all orders assessing an
overpayment resulting from fraud, civil or criminal.
(7) Orders assessing an overpayment which are issued on or after
July 28, 1991, shall include a conspicuous notice of the collection
methods available to the department or self-insurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may adopt rules necessary to implement RCW
51.08.178.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---