BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.88.010 and 2003 c 53 s 92 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of indecent exposure if he or she
intentionally makes any open and obscene exposure of his or her person
or the person of another knowing that such conduct is likely to cause
reasonable affront or alarm. The act of breastfeeding or expressing
breast milk is not indecent exposure.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection,
indecent exposure is a misdemeanor.
(b) Except as provided in (c)(i) of this subsection, indecent
exposure is a gross misdemeanor on the first offense if the person
exposes himself or herself to a person under the age of fourteen years.
(c) Indecent exposure is a class C felony if:
(i) On the first offense, the person exposes himself or herself to
a person under the age of fourteen years and there was a finding of
sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(ii) The person has previously been convicted under this section or
of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

--- END ---