BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.367 and 2004 c 208 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the major industrial development allowed under
RCW 36.70A.365, a county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that meets the
criteria in subsection (((10))) (5) or (((11))) (6) of this section may
establish, in consultation with cities consistent with provisions of
RCW 36.70A.210, a process for designating a bank of no more than two
master planned locations for major industrial activity outside urban
growth areas.
(2) ((A master planned location for major industrial developments
outside an urban growth area may be included in the urban industrial
land bank for the county if criteria including, but not limited to, the
following are met through the completion of a comprehensive planning
process that ensures that:
(a) Development regulations are adopted to ensure that urban growth
will not occur in adjacent nonurban areas;
(b) The master plan for the major industrial developments is
consistent with the county's development regulations adopted for
protection of critical areas;
(c) An inventory of developable land has been conducted as provided
in RCW 36.70A.365;
(d) Provisions are established for determining the availability of
alternate sites within urban growth areas and the long-term annexation
feasibility of land sites outside of urban growth areas; and
(e) Development regulations are adopted to require the industrial
land bank site to be used primarily for locating industrial and
manufacturing businesses and specify that the gross floor area of all
commercial and service buildings or facilities locating within the
industrial land bank shall not exceed ten percent of the total gross
floor area of buildings or facilities in the industrial land bank. The
commercial and service businesses operated within the ten percent gross
floor area limit shall be necessary to the primary industrial or
manufacturing businesses within the industrial land bank. The intent
of this provision for commercial or service use is to meet the needs of
employees, clients, customers, vendors, and others having business at
the industrial site and as an adjunct to the industry to attract and
retain a quality work force and to further other public objectives,
such as trip reduction. Such uses would not be promoted to attract
additional clientele from the surrounding area. The commercial and
service businesses should be established concurrently with or
subsequent to the industrial or manufacturing businesses.
(3) The process for reviewing and approving proposals to authorize
siting of specific major industrial developments within an approved
industrial land bank must ensure through adopted development
regulations that:
(a) New infrastructure is provided for and/or applicable impact
fees are paid;
(b) Transit-oriented site planning and traffic demand management
programs are implemented;
(c) Buffers are provided between the major industrial development
and adjacent nonurban areas;
(d) Environmental protection including air and water quality has
been addressed and provided for;
(e) Provision is made to mitigate adverse impacts on designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands; and
(f) An interlocal agreement related to infrastructure cost sharing
and revenue sharing between the county and interested cities is
established.
(4) In selecting master planned locations for inclusion in the
urban industrial land bank, priority shall be given to locations that
are adjacent to, or in close proximity to, an urban growth area.
(5) Final approval of inclusion of a master planned location in an
urban industrial land bank under subsection (2) of this section shall
be considered an adopted amendment to the comprehensive plan adopted
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.070, except that RCW 36.70A.130(2) does not
apply so that inclusion or exclusion of master planned locations may be
considered at any time. Approval of specific development proposals
under subsection (3) of this section requires no further comprehensive
plan amendment.
(6) Once a master planned location has been included in an urban
industrial land bank, manufacturing and industrial businesses that
qualify as major industrial development under RCW 36.70A.365 may be
located there.
(7) Nothing in this section alters the requirements for a county to
comply with chapter 43.21C RCW.
(8)(a) The authority of a county meeting the criteria of subsection
(10) of this section to engage in the process of including or excluding
master planned locations from an urban industrial land bank terminates
on December 31, 2007. However, any location included in an urban
industrial land bank on or before December 31, 2007, shall be available
for major industrial development as long as the criteria of subsection
(2) of this section are met. A county that has established or proposes
to establish an industrial land bank pursuant to this section shall
review the need for an industrial land bank within the county,
including a review of the availability of land for industrial and
manufacturing uses within the urban growth area, during the review and
evaluation of comprehensive plans and development regulations required
by RCW 36.70A.130.
(b) The authority of a county meeting the criteria of subsection
(11) of this section to engage in the process of including or excluding
master planned locations from the urban industrial land bank terminates
on December 31, 2002. However, any location included in the urban
industrial land bank on December 31, 2002, shall be available for major
industrial development as long as the criteria of subsection (2) of
this section are met.
(9))) A master planned location for major industrial developments
may be approved through a two-step process: Designation of an
industrial land bank in the comprehensive plan; and subsequent approval
of specific major industrial developments through a local master plan
process described under subsection (3) of this section.
(a) The comprehensive plan must identify locations suited to major
industrial development due to proximity to transportation or resource
assets. The plan must identify the maximum size of the industrial land
bank and any limitations on major industrial developments based on
local limiting factors, but does not need to specify a particular
parcel or parcels of property or identify any specific use or user
except as limited by this section. In selecting locations for the
industrial land bank, priority must be given to locations that are
adjacent to, or in close proximity to, an urban growth area.
(b) The environmental review for amendment of the comprehensive
plan must be at the programmatic level and, in addition to a threshold
determination, must include:
(i) An inventory of developable land as provided in RCW 36.70A.365;
and
(ii) An analysis of the availability of alternative sites within
urban growth areas and the long-term annexation feasibility of sites
outside of urban growth areas.
(c) Final approval of an industrial land bank under this section
must be by amendment to the comprehensive plan adopted under RCW
36.70A.070, and the amendment is exempt from the limitation of RCW
36.70A.130(2) and may be considered at any time. Approval of a
specific major industrial development within the industrial land bank
requires no further amendment of the comprehensive plan.
(3) In concert with the designation of an industrial land bank, a
county shall also adopt development regulations for review and approval
of specific major industrial developments through a master plan
process. The master plan process must ensure, at a minimum, that:
(a) Urban growth will not occur in adjacent nonurban areas;
(b) Development is consistent with the county's development
regulations adopted for protection of critical areas;
(c) A major industrial development is used primarily by industrial
and manufacturing businesses, and that the gross floor area of all
commercial and service buildings or facilities locating within the
major industrial development does not exceed ten percent of the total
gross floor area of buildings or facilities in the development. The
intent of this provision for commercial or service use is to meet the
needs of employees, clients, customers, vendors, and others having
business at the industrial site, to attract and retain a quality
workforce, and to further other public objectives, such as trip
reduction. These uses may not be promoted to attract additional
clientele from the surrounding area. Commercial and service businesses
must be established concurrently with or subsequent to the industrial
or manufacturing businesses;
(d) New infrastructure is provided for and/or applicable impact
fees are paid to assure that adequate facilities are provided
concurrently with the development. Infrastructure may be achieved in
phases as development proceeds;
(e) Buffers are provided between the major industrial development
and adjacent rural areas;
(f) Provision is made to mitigate adverse impacts on designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands; and
(g) An open record public hearing is held before either the
planning commission or hearing examiner with notice published at least
thirty days before the hearing date and mailed to all property owners
within one mile of the site.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Major industrial development" means a master planned location
suitable for manufacturing or industrial businesses that: (i) Requires
a parcel of land so large that no suitable parcels are available within
an urban growth area; (ii) is a natural resource-based industry
requiring a location near agricultural land, forest land, or mineral
resource land upon which it is dependent; or (iii) requires a location
with characteristics such as proximity to transportation facilities or
related industries such that there is no suitable location in an urban
growth area. The major industrial development may not be for the
purpose of retail commercial development or multitenant office parks.
(b) "Industrial land bank" means up to two master planned
locations, each consisting of a parcel or parcels of contiguous land,
sufficiently large so as not to be readily available within the urban
growth area of a city, or otherwise meeting the criteria contained in
(a) of this subsection, suitable for manufacturing, industrial, or
commercial businesses and designated by the county through the
comprehensive planning process specifically for major industrial use.
(((10))) (5) This section ((and the termination date specified in
subsection (8)(a) of this section apply)) applies to a county that at
the time the process is established under subsection (1) of this
section:
(a) Has a population greater than two hundred fifty thousand and is
part of a metropolitan area that includes a city in another state with
a population greater than two hundred fifty thousand;
(b) Has a population greater than one hundred forty thousand and is
adjacent to another country;
(c) Has ((a population greater than forty thousand but less than
seventy-five thousand and has)) an average level of unemployment for
the preceding three years that exceeds the average state unemployment
for those years by twenty percent; and
(i) Is bordered by the Pacific Ocean;
(ii) Is located in the Interstate 5 or Interstate 90 corridor; or
(iii) Is bordered by Hood Canal;
(d) Is east of the Cascade divide; and
(i) Borders another state to the south; or
(ii) Is located wholly south of Interstate 90 and borders the
Columbia river to the east; or
(e) Has an average population density of less than one hundred
persons per square mile as determined by the office of financial
management, and is bordered by the Pacific Ocean and by Hood Canal.
(((11))) (6) This section ((and the termination date specified in
subsection (8)(b) of this section apply)) applies to a county that at
the time the process is established under subsection (1) of this
section:
(a) Has a population greater than forty thousand but fewer than
eighty thousand;
(b) Has an average level of unemployment for the preceding three
years that exceeds the average state unemployment for those years by
twenty percent; and
(c) Is located in the Interstate 5 or Interstate 90 corridor.
(((12))) (7) Any location included in an industrial land bank
pursuant to section 2, chapter 289, Laws of 1998, section 1, chapter
402, Laws of 1997, and section 2, chapter 167, Laws of 1996 shall
remain available for major industrial development according to this
section as long as the ((criteria)) process of subsection (2) of this
section continues to be satisfied.

--- END ---