BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) There is created within the Washington state patrol a
registry of persons convicted after the effective date of this act of
a violation of RCW 69.50.401(2)(b), 69.50.440, or 69.50.406.
(b) This registry shall be maintained by the Washington state
patrol and made available for public inquiry on the internet.
(c) The registry shall consist of the person's name, date of birth,
offense or offenses making the person eligible for inclusion on the
registry, the conviction date and county of those offenses, and other
identifying data as the Washington state patrol determines is necessary
to properly identify the person, but shall not include the person's
social security number.
(2) On and after the effective date of this act, the court clerks
shall forward a copy of the judgment and date of birth of all persons
who are convicted of a violation of the offenses described in
subsection (1)(a) of this section to the Washington state patrol. The
information shall be forwarded to the Washington state patrol within
forty-five days of the date of judgment.
(3) Upon a petition by a person listed in the registry, the
Washington state patrol shall remove from the registry the name and
other identifying information of the person if more than seven years
have passed since the date of the most recent qualifying conviction
under subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(4) Any person required to register under this section shall follow
all of the requirements applicable to kidnapping offenders under RCW
9A.44.130.

--- END ---