BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.182.170 and 2005 c 342 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((victim of identity theft who has submitted a valid police
report to a consumer reporting agency)) consumer, who is a resident of
this state, may elect to place a security freeze on his or her credit
report by making a request in writing by certified mail to a consumer
reporting agency. "Security freeze" means a ((notice placed in a
consumer's credit report, at the request of the consumer and subject to
certain exceptions, that prohibits the consumer reporting agency from
releasing the consumer's credit report or any information from it
without the express authorization of the consumer)) prohibition,
consistent with this section, on a consumer reporting agency's
furnishing of a consumer's credit report to a third party intending to
use the credit report to determine the consumer's eligibility for
credit. If a security freeze is in place, information from a
consumer's credit report may not be released to a third party without
prior express authorization from the consumer. This subsection does
not prevent a consumer reporting agency from advising a third party
that a security freeze is in effect with respect to the consumer's
credit report.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 19.182.180 through
19.182.210((, a)):
(a) "Victim of identity theft" means((:
(a) A victim of identity theft as defined in RCW 9.35.020; or
(b) A person who has been notified by an agency, person, or
business that owns or licenses computerized data of a breach in a
computerized data system which has resulted in the acquisition of that
person's unencrypted personal information by an unauthorized person or
entity)) a person who has a police report evidencing their claim to be
a victim of a violation of RCW 9.35.020 and which report will be
produced to a credit reporting agency, upon such credit reporting
agency's request.
(b) "Credit report" means a consumer report, as defined in 15
U.S.C. Sec. 1681a, that is used or collected to serve as a factor in
establishing a consumer's eligibility for credit for personal, family,
or household purposes.
(c) "Normal business hours" means Sunday through Saturday, between
the hours of 6:00 a.m. and 9:30 p.m. Pacific Standard Time.
(3) A consumer reporting agency shall place a security freeze on a
consumer's credit report no later than five business days after
receiving a written request from the consumer.
(4) The consumer reporting agency shall send a written confirmation
of the security freeze to the consumer within ten business days and
shall provide the consumer with a unique personal identification number
or password to be used by the consumer when providing authorization for
the release of his or her credit report for a specific party or period
of time.
(5) If the consumer wishes to allow his or her credit report to be
accessed for a specific ((party or)) period of time while a freeze is
in place, he or she shall contact the consumer reporting agency,
request that the freeze be temporarily lifted, and provide the
following:
(a) Proper identification, which means that information generally
deemed sufficient to identify a person. Only if the consumer is unable
to sufficiently identify himself or herself, may a consumer reporting
agency require additional information concerning the consumer's
employment and personal or family history in order to verify his or her
identity;
(b) The unique personal identification number or password provided
by the credit reporting agency under subsection (4) of this section;
((and))
(c) The proper information regarding the third party who is to
receive the credit report or the time period for which the report is
available to users of the credit report; and
(d) Payment of the fee required by the consumer reporting agency
under subsection (13) of this section.
(6) A consumer reporting agency that receives a request from a
consumer to temporarily lift a freeze on a credit report under
subsection (5) of this section((,)) shall comply with the request ((no
later than)) within:
(a) Three business days ((after)) of receiving the request by mail;
or
(b) Fifteen minutes of receiving the request from the consumer
through the electronic contact method chosen by the consumer reporting
agency in accordance with subsection (8) of this section, if the
request:
(i) Is received during normal business hours; and
(ii) Includes the consumer's proper identification and correct
personal identification number or password.
(7) A consumer reporting agency is not required to remove a
security freeze within the time provided in subsection (6)(b) of this
section if:
(a) The consumer fails to meet the requirements of subsection (5)
of this section; or
(b) The consumer reporting agency's ability to remove the security
freeze within fifteen minutes is prevented by:
(i) An act of God, including fire, earthquakes, hurricanes, storms,
or similar natural disasters or phenomena;
(ii) Unauthorized or illegal acts by a third party, including
terrorism, sabotage, riot, vandalism, labor strikes, or disputes
disrupting operations, or similar occurrences;
(iii) An interruption in operations, including electrical failure,
unanticipated delay in equipment or replacement part delivery, computer
hardware or software failures inhibiting response time, or similar
disruptions;
(iv) Governmental action, including emergency orders or
regulations, judicial or law enforcement action, or similar directives;
(v) Regularly scheduled maintenance of, or updates to, the consumer
reporting agency's systems outside of normal business hours;
(vi) Commercially reasonable maintenance of, or repair to, the
consumer reporting agency's systems that is unexpected or unscheduled;
or
(vii) Receipt of a removal request outside of normal business
hours.
(8) A consumer reporting agency may develop procedures involving
the use of telephone, fax, the internet, or other electronic media to
receive and process a request from a consumer to temporarily lift a
freeze on a credit report under subsection (5) of this section in an
expedited manner.
(((8))) (9) A consumer reporting agency shall remove or temporarily
lift a freeze placed on a consumer's credit report only in the
following cases:
(a) Upon consumer request, under subsection (5) or (((11))) (12) of
this section; or
(b) When the consumer's credit report was frozen due to a material
misrepresentation of fact by the consumer. When a consumer reporting
agency intends to remove a freeze upon a consumer's credit report under
this subsection, the consumer reporting agency shall notify the
consumer in writing prior to removing the freeze on the consumer's
credit report.
(((9))) (10) When a third party requests access to a consumer
credit report on which a security freeze is in effect, and this request
is in connection with an application for credit or any other use, and
the consumer does not allow his or her credit report to be accessed for
that ((specific party or)) period of time, the third party may treat
the application as incomplete.
(((10))) (11) When a consumer requests a security freeze, the
consumer reporting agency shall disclose the process of placing and
temporarily lifting a freeze, and the process for allowing access to
information from the consumer's credit report for a specific party or
period of time while the freeze is in place.
(((11))) (12) A security freeze remains in place until the consumer
requests that the security freeze be removed. A consumer reporting
agency shall remove a security freeze within three business days of
receiving a request for removal from the consumer, who provides both of
the following:
(a) Proper identification, as defined in subsection (5)(a) of this
section; and
(b) The unique personal identification number or password provided
by the consumer reporting agency under subsection (4) of this section.
(((12))) (13)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a
consumer credit reporting agency may charge a fee of no more than five
dollars to a consumer for each freeze, removal of the freeze, or
temporary lift of the freeze for a period of time. If consumer
agencies implement a single point of service for a freeze, the removal
of a freeze, or the lift of a freeze, then only one fee may be charged
for each action.
(b) A consumer credit reporting agency may not charge a fee to a
victim of identity theft.
(c) A consumer credit reporting agency may not charge a consumer
who has legally changed his or her name after the initial placement of
a freeze a fee in addition to the initial fee charged to the consumer
under (a) of this subsection for placement of a freeze, if the consumer
would like the initial freeze to remain in place after his or her name
change.
(14) This section does not apply to the use of a consumer credit
report by any of the following:
(a) A person or entity, or a subsidiary, affiliate, or agent of
that person or entity, or an assignee of a financial obligation owing
by the consumer to that person or entity, or a prospective assignee of
a financial obligation owing by the consumer to that person or entity
in conjunction with the proposed purchase of the financial obligation,
with which the consumer has or had prior to assignment an account or
contract, including a demand deposit account, or to whom the consumer
issued a negotiable instrument, for the purposes of reviewing the
account or collecting the financial obligation owing for the account,
contract, or negotiable instrument. For purposes of this subsection,
"reviewing the account" includes activities related to account
maintenance, monitoring, credit line increases, and account upgrades
and enhancements;
(b) ((A subsidiary, affiliate, agent, assignee, or prospective
assignee of a person to whom access has been granted under subsection
(5) of this section for purposes of facilitating the extension of
credit or other permissible use;
(c))) Any federal, state, or local entity, including a law
enforcement agency, court, or their agents or assigns;
(((d) A private collection agency)) (c) Any person acting under a
court order, warrant, or subpoena;
(((e))) (d) A child support agency acting under Title IV-D of the
social security act (42 U.S.C. et seq.);
(((f))) (e) The department of social and health services acting to
fulfill any of its statutory responsibilities;
(((g))) (f) The internal revenue service acting to investigate or
collect delinquent taxes or unpaid court orders or to fulfill any of
its other statutory responsibilities;
(((h))) (g) The use of credit information for the purposes of
prescreening as provided for by the federal fair credit reporting act;
(((i))) (h) Any person or entity administering a credit file
monitoring subscription service to which the consumer has subscribed;
((and
(j))) (i) Any person or entity for the purpose of providing a
consumer with a copy of his or her credit report upon the consumer's
request; and
(j) A mortgage broker or loan originator required to be licensed
under chapter 19.146 RCW and any person exempted from licensing under
chapter 19.146 RCW by RCW 19.146.020.
(15) Liability may not result to the consumer credit reporting
agency if through inadvertence or mistake the consumer credit reporting
agency releases credit report information to a person or entity
purporting to be a mortgage broker or loan originator under subsection
(14) of this section that is, in fact, not a mortgage broker or loan
originator.
(16) The consumer's request for a security freeze does not prohibit
the consumer reporting agency from disclosing the consumer's credit
report for other than credit-related purposes consistent with the
definition of credit report, as found in this section.
(17) A violation of subsection (6) of this section does not provide
a cause of action under RCW 19.86.090. A violation of subsection (6)
of this section is subject to all other remedies and penalties
available under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect September 1, 2008.

--- END ---