BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2004 c 264 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department of fish and wildlife, in cooperation and
collaboration with the county legislative authorities of Ferry,
Stevens, Pend Oreille, Chelan, and Okanogan counties, shall recommend
rules to establish a three-year pilot program within select game
management units of these counties, to pursue or kill cougars with the
aid of dogs. A pursuit season and a kill season with the aid of dogs
must be established through the fish and wildlife commission's rule-making process, utilizing local dangerous wildlife task teams comprised
of the two collaborating authorities. The two collaborating
authorities shall also develop a more effective and accurate dangerous
wildlife reporting system to ensure a timely response. The pilot
program's primary goals are to provide for public safety, to protect
property, and to assess cougar populations.
(2) Any rules adopted by the fish and wildlife commission to
establish a pilot project allowing for the pursuit or hunting of
cougars with the aid of dogs under this section only must ensure that
all pursuits or hunts are:
(a) Designed to protect public safety or property;
(b) Reflective of the most current cougar population data;
(c) Designed to generate data that is necessary for the department
to satisfy the reporting requirements of section 3 of this act; and
(d) Consistent with any applicable recommendations emerging from
research on cougar population dynamics in a multiprey environment
conducted by Washington State University's department of natural
resource sciences that was funded in whole or in part by the department
of fish and wildlife.
(3) The department of fish and wildlife may authorize one
additional season in which cougars may be pursued or killed with dogs,
subject to the other conditions of the pilot project. This additional
season is authorized to avoid a lag in cougar management and
conditioning between the end of the third pilot cougar season and the
time needed for the 2008 legislature to consider the report provided
under section 3, chapter 264, Laws of 2004, and is not intended to be
considered as part of the study period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A county legislative authority may request
inclusion in the fourth and final year of the cougar control pilot
project authorized by chapter 264, Laws of 2004 after taking the
following actions:
(1) Adopting a resolution that requests inclusion in the pilot
project;
(2) Documenting the need to participate in the pilot project by
identifying the number of cougar/human encounters and livestock and pet
depredations;
(3) Developing and agreeing to the implementation of an education
program designed to disseminate to landowners and other citizens
information about predator exclusion techniques and devices and other
nonlethal methods of cougar management; and
(4) Demonstrating that existing cougar depredation permits, public
safety cougar hunts, or other existing wildlife management tools have
not been sufficient to deal with cougar incidents in the county.

--- END ---