BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale to
a farmer of farm machinery and equipment.
(2) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. An exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Farmer" and "agricultural products" have the meanings provided
in RCW 82.04.213.
(b) "Farm machinery and equipment" means machinery and equipment
designed for the purpose of growing, raising, or producing agricultural
products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use by a farmer of farm machinery and equipment.
(2) The definitions and recordkeeping requirements in section 1 of
this act, other than the exemption certificate requirement, apply to
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2007.

--- END ---