BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any criminal proceeding, any photograph or visual or printed
matter of a minor collected as evidence in a prosecution for RCW
9.68A.040 through 9.68A.070 shall remain in the care, custody, and
control of the law enforcement agency or the court.
(2) Notwithstanding any other statute or court rule, a court shall
deny, in any criminal proceeding, any request by the defendant to copy,
photograph, duplicate, or otherwise reproduce any photograph or visual
or printed matter of a minor collected as evidence in a prosecution for
RCW 9.68A.040 through 9.68A.070, so long as the law enforcement agency
or the court makes the evidence reasonably available to the defendant.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the evidence shall be deemed
to be reasonably available to the defendant if the law enforcement
agency or the court provides ample opportunity at the law enforcement
agency's facility or at the court for inspection, viewing, and
examination of the evidence by the defendant, his or her attorney, and
any individual the defendant may seek to qualify to furnish expert
testimony at trial.

--- END ---