BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.105D.010 and 2002 c 288 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each person has a fundamental and inalienable right to a
healthful environment, and each person has a responsibility to preserve
and enhance that right. The beneficial stewardship of the land, air,
and waters of the state is a solemn obligation of the present
generation for the benefit of future generations.
(2) A healthful environment is now threatened by the irresponsible
use and disposal of hazardous substances. There are hundreds of
hazardous waste sites in this state, and more will be created if
current waste practices continue. Hazardous waste sites threaten the
state's water resources, including those used for public drinking
water. Many of our municipal landfills are current or potential
hazardous waste sites and present serious threats to human health and
environment. The costs of eliminating these threats in many cases are
beyond the financial means of our local governments and ratepayers.
The main purpose of chapter 2, Laws of 1989 is to raise sufficient
funds to clean up all hazardous waste sites and to prevent the creation
of future hazards due to improper disposal of toxic wastes into the
state's land and waters.
(3) Many farmers and small business owners who have followed the
law with respect to their uses of pesticides and other chemicals
nonetheless may face devastating economic consequences because their
uses have contaminated the environment or the water supplies of their
neighbors. With a source of funds, the state may assist these farmers
and business owners, as well as those persons who sustain damages, such
as the loss of their drinking water supplies, as a result of the
contamination.
(4) It is in the public's interest to efficiently use our finite
land base, to integrate our land use planning policies with our clean-up policies, and to clean up and reuse contaminated industrial
properties in order to minimize industrial development pressures on
undeveloped land and to make clean land available for future social
use.
(5) Because it is often difficult or impossible to allocate
responsibility among persons liable for hazardous waste sites and
because it is essential that sites be cleaned up well and
expeditiously, each responsible person should be liable jointly and
severally.
(6) Because releases of hazardous substances can adversely affect
the health and welfare of the public, the environment, and property
values, it is in the public interest that affected communities be
notified of where releases of hazardous substances have occurred and
what is being done to clean them up.
(7) To achieve and protect the state's long-term ecological health,
the department shall prioritize sufficient funding to clean up
hazardous waste sites and prevent the creation of future hazards due to
improper disposal of toxic wastes on land or in water. The department
shall accelerate clean-up efforts throughout Washington, and create
financing tools to clean up large-scale hazardous waste sites requiring
multiyear commitments. To effectively monitor toxic accounts
expenditures, the department shall develop a comprehensive ten-year
financing report that identifies long-term remedial action project
costs, tracks expenses, and projects future needs.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.105D.030 and 2002 c 288 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may exercise the following powers in addition to
any other powers granted by law:
(a) Investigate, provide for investigating, or require potentially
liable persons to investigate any releases or threatened releases of
hazardous substances, including but not limited to inspecting,
sampling, or testing to determine the nature or extent of any release
or threatened release. If there is a reasonable basis to believe that
a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance may exist, the
department's authorized employees, agents, or contractors may enter
upon any property and conduct investigations. The department shall
give reasonable notice before entering property unless an emergency
prevents such notice. The department may by subpoena require the
attendance or testimony of witnesses and the production of documents or
other information that the department deems necessary;
(b) Conduct, provide for conducting, or require potentially liable
persons to conduct remedial actions (including investigations under (a)
of this subsection) to remedy releases or threatened releases of
hazardous substances. In carrying out such powers, the department's
authorized employees, agents, or contractors may enter upon property.
The department shall give reasonable notice before entering property
unless an emergency prevents such notice. In conducting, providing
for, or requiring remedial action, the department shall give preference
to permanent solutions to the maximum extent practicable and shall
provide for or require adequate monitoring to ensure the effectiveness
of the remedial action;
(c) Indemnify contractors retained by the department for carrying
out investigations and remedial actions, but not for any contractor's
reckless or wilful misconduct;
(d) Carry out all state programs authorized under the federal
cleanup law and the federal resource, conservation, and recovery act,
42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq., as amended;
(e) Classify substances as hazardous substances for purposes of RCW
70.105D.020(7) and classify substances and products as hazardous
substances for purposes of RCW 82.21.020(1);
(f) Issue orders or enter into consent decrees or agreed orders
that include, or issue written opinions under (i) of this subsection
that may be conditioned upon, deed restrictions where necessary to
protect human health and the environment from a release or threatened
release of a hazardous substance from a facility. Prior to
establishing a deed restriction under this subsection, the department
shall notify and seek comment from a city or county department with
land use planning authority for real property subject to a deed
restriction;
(g) Enforce the application of permanent and effective
institutional controls that are necessary for a remedial action to be
protective of human health and the environment and the notification
requirements established in RCW 70.105D.110, and impose penalties for
violations of that section consistent with RCW 70.105D.050;
(h) Require holders to conduct remedial actions necessary to abate
an imminent or substantial endangerment pursuant to RCW
70.105D.020(12)(b)(ii)(C);
(i) Provide informal advice and assistance to persons regarding the
administrative and technical requirements of this chapter. This may
include site-specific advice to persons who are conducting or otherwise
interested in independent remedial actions. Any such advice or
assistance shall be advisory only, and shall not be binding on the
department. As a part of providing this advice and assistance for
independent remedial actions, the department may prepare written
opinions regarding whether the independent remedial actions or
proposals for those actions meet the substantive requirements of this
chapter or whether the department believes further remedial action is
necessary at the facility. The department may collect, from persons
requesting advice and assistance, the costs incurred by the department
in providing such advice and assistance; however, the department shall,
where appropriate, waive collection of costs in order to provide an
appropriate level of technical assistance in support of public
participation. The state, the department, and officers and employees
of the state are immune from all liability, and no cause of action of
any nature may arise from any act or omission in providing, or failing
to provide, informal advice and assistance; and
(j) Take any other actions necessary to carry out the provisions of
this chapter, including the power to adopt rules under chapter 34.05
RCW.
(2) The department shall immediately implement all provisions of
this chapter to the maximum extent practicable, including investigative
and remedial actions where appropriate. The department shall adopt,
and thereafter enforce, rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to:
(a) Provide for public participation, including at least (i) public
notice of the development of investigative plans or remedial plans for
releases or threatened releases and (ii) concurrent public notice of
all compliance orders, agreed orders, enforcement orders, or notices of
violation;
(b) Establish a hazard ranking system for hazardous waste sites;
(c) Provide for requiring the reporting by an owner or operator of
releases of hazardous substances to the environment that may be a
threat to human health or the environment within ninety days of
discovery, including such exemptions from reporting as the department
deems appropriate, however this requirement shall not modify any
existing requirements provided for under other laws;
(d) Establish reasonable deadlines not to exceed ninety days for
initiating an investigation of a hazardous waste site after the
department receives notice or otherwise receives information that the
site may pose a threat to human health or the environment and other
reasonable deadlines for remedying releases or threatened releases at
the site;
(e) Publish and periodically update minimum cleanup standards for
remedial actions at least as stringent as the cleanup standards under
section 121 of the federal cleanup law, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9621, and at
least as stringent as all applicable state and federal laws, including
health-based standards under state and federal law; and
(f) Apply industrial clean-up standards at industrial properties.
Rules adopted under this subsection shall ensure that industrial
properties cleaned up to industrial standards cannot be converted to
nonindustrial uses without approval from the department. The
department may require that a property cleaned up to industrial
standards is cleaned up to a more stringent applicable standard as a
condition of conversion to a nonindustrial use. Industrial clean-up
standards may not be applied to industrial properties where hazardous
substances remaining at the property after remedial action pose a
threat to human health or the environment in adjacent nonindustrial
areas.
(3) Before ((November 1st)) December 20th of each even-numbered
year, the department shall ((develop, with public notice and hearing,
and submit to)):
(a) Develop a comprehensive ten-year financing report in
coordination with all local governments with clean-up responsibilities
that identifies the projected biennial toxic site remedial action needs
that are eligible for funding from the local toxics control account;
(b) Work with liable local governments to develop working capital
reserves to be incorporated in the ten-year financing report;
(c) Identify the projected remedial action needs for orphaned,
abandoned, and other clean-up sites that are eligible for funding from
the state toxics control account;
(d) Project the remedial action need, cost, revenue, and any
recommended working capital reserve estimate to the next biennium's
long-term remedial action needs from both the local toxics control
account and the state toxics control account, and submit this
information to the ((ways and means and)) appropriate standing fiscal
and environmental committees of the senate and house of representatives
((a ranked list of projects and expenditures recommended for
appropriation from both the state and local toxics control accounts.
The department shall also)). This submittal must also include a ranked
list of such remedial action projects for both accounts; and
(e) Provide the legislature and the public each year with an
accounting of the department's activities supported by appropriations
from the state and local toxics control accounts, including a list of
known hazardous waste sites and their hazard rankings, actions taken
and planned at each site, how the department is meeting its ((top two))
waste management priorities under RCW 70.105.150, and all funds
expended under this chapter.
(4) The department shall establish a scientific advisory board to
render advice to the department with respect to the hazard ranking
system, cleanup standards, remedial actions, deadlines for remedial
actions, monitoring, the classification of substances as hazardous
substances for purposes of RCW 70.105D.020(7) and the classification of
substances or products as hazardous substances for purposes of RCW
82.21.020(1). The board shall consist of five independent members to
serve staggered three-year terms. No members may be employees of the
department. Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The department shall establish a program to identify potential
hazardous waste sites and to encourage persons to provide information
about hazardous waste sites.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2005 c 488 s 926 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; and
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the top two hazardous waste
management priorities of RCW 70.105.150.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority: (i) Remedial
actions; (ii) hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105
RCW; (iii) solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW; (iv) funds for a program to assist in the
assessment and cleanup of sites of methamphetamine production, but not
to be used for the initial containment of such sites, consistent with
the responsibilities and intent of RCW 69.50.511; and (v) cleanup and
disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or derelict vessels
that pose a threat to human health or the environment. For purposes of
this subsection (3)(a)(v), "abandoned or derelict vessels" means
vessels that have little or no value and either have no identified
owner or have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean
up and dispose of the vessel. Funds for plans and programs shall be
allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements
established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW. During
the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be used
for the following activities: Conducting a study of whether dioxins
occur in fertilizers, soil amendments, and soils; reviewing
applications for registration of fertilizers; and conducting a study of
plant uptake of metals. During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to the
state toxics control account such amounts as specified in the omnibus
capital budget bill. During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, moneys in
the account may also be used for grants to local governments to
retrofit public sector diesel equipment and for storm water planning
and implementation activities.
(b) Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to
implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal
safe drinking water act for public water systems. The department of
health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed under RCW
70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(c) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department shall
partner with local communities and liable parties for cleanups. The
department is authorized to use the following additional strategies in
order to ensure a healthful environment for future generations:
(i) The director may alter grant-matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational, or habitat restoration opportunities that would
not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of vacant, orphaned, or abandoned property under RCW
70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;
(ii) The use of outside contracts to conduct necessary studies;
(iii) The purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance, when
necessary to expedite multiparty clean-up efforts.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local
toxics control accounts shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. However, during the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, funding may not be granted to entities engaged in
lobbying activities, and applicants may not be awarded grants if their
cumulative grant awards under this section exceed two hundred thousand
dollars. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be
renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium
shall revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state toxics control account to the water quality
account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

--- END ---