BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.100 and 2005 c 346 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department
the power to provide for a comprehensive inmate work program and to
remove statutory and other restrictions which have limited work
programs in the past. It is also the intent of the legislature to
ensure that the correctional industries board of directors, in
developing and selecting correctional industries work programs, does
not encourage the development of, or provide for selection of or
contracting for, or the significant expansion of, any new or existing
class I correctional industries work programs that unfairly compete
with Washington businesses. The legislature intends that the
requirements relating to fair competition in the correctional
industries work programs be liberally construed by the correctional
industries board of directors to protect Washington businesses, and
Washington jobs, from unfair competition.
(2) For purposes of establishing such a comprehensive program, the
legislature recommends that the department consider adopting any or
all, or any variation of, the following classes of work programs:
(((1))) (a) CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES.
(((a))) (i) The employer model industries in this class shall be
operated and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit
organization pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the
department. The organization shall produce goods or services for sale
to both the public and private sector.
(((b))) (ii) The customer model industries in this class shall be
operated and managed by the department to provide Washington state
manufacturers or businesses with products or services currently
produced or provided by out-of-state or foreign suppliers.
(((c))) (iii) The correctional industries board of directors shall
review these proposed industries, including any potential new class I
industries work program or the significant expansion of an existing
class I industries work program, before the department contracts to
provide such products or services. The review shall include the
analysis required under RCW 72.09.115 to determine if the proposed
correctional industries work program will compete with any Washington
business. An agreement for a new class I correctional industries work
program, or an agreement for a significant expansion of an existing
class I correctional industries work program, that unfairly competes
with any Washington business is prohibited.
(((d))) (iv) The department of corrections shall supply appropriate
security and custody services without charge to the participating
firms.
(((e))) (v) Inmates who work in free venture industries shall do so
at their own choice. They shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry
is located, as determined by the director of correctional industries.
If the director cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then
the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.
(((f))) (vi) An inmate who is employed in the class I program of
correctional industries shall not be eligible for unemployment
compensation benefits pursuant to any of the provisions of Title 50 RCW
until released on parole or discharged.
(((2))) (b) CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES.
(((a))) (i) Industries in this class shall be state-owned and
operated enterprises designed primarily to reduce the costs for goods
and services for tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit
organizations.
(((b)(i))) (ii)(A) The industries selected for development within
this class shall, as much as possible, match the available pool of
inmate work skills and aptitudes with the work opportunities in the
free community. The industries shall be closely patterned after
private sector industries but with the objective of reducing public
support costs rather than making a profit.
(((ii))) (B) The products and services of this industry, including
purchased products and services necessary for a complete product line,
may be sold to the following:
(((A))) (I) Public agencies;
(((B))) (II) Nonprofit organizations;
(((C))) (III) Private contractors when the goods purchased will be
ultimately used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization;
(((D))) (IV) An employee and immediate family members of an
employee of the department of corrections; and
(((E))) (V) A person under the supervision of the department of
corrections and his or her immediate family members.
(((iii))) (C) The correctional industries board of directors shall
authorize the type and quantity of items that may be purchased and sold
under (b)(ii)(((D))) (B)(IV) and (((E))) (V) of this subsection.
(((iv))) (D) It is prohibited to purchase any item purchased under
(b)(ii)(((D))) (B)(IV) and (((E))) (V) of this subsection for the
purpose of resale.
(((v))) (E) Clothing manufactured by an industry in this class may
be donated to nonprofit organizations that provide clothing free of
charge to low-income persons.
(((c)(i))) (iii)(A) Class II correctional industries products and
services shall be reviewed by the correctional industries board of
directors before offering such products and services for sale to
private contractors.
(((ii))) (B) The board of directors shall conduct a yearly
marketing review of the products and services offered under this
subsection. Such review shall include an analysis of the potential
impact of the proposed products and services on the Washington state
business community. To avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to
the state, when there is no public sector market for such goods,
byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural, and animal husbandry
enterprises may be sold to private persons, at private sale. Surplus
byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural and animal husbandry
enterprises that cannot be sold to public agencies or to private
persons may be donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of
surplus products shall be carried out in accordance with rules
prescribed by the secretary.
(((d))) (iv) Security and custody services shall be provided
without charge by the department of corrections.
(((e))) (v) Inmates working in this class of industries shall do so
at their own choice and shall be paid for their work on a gratuity
scale which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature
in the locality in which the industry is located and which is approved
by the director of correctional industries.
(((f))) (vi) Subject to approval of the correctional industries
board, provisions of RCW 41.06.142 shall not apply to contracts with
Washington state businesses entered into by the department of
corrections through class II industries.
(((3))) (c) CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES.
(((a))) (i) Industries in this class shall be operated by the
department of corrections. They shall be designed and managed to
accomplish the following objectives:
(((i))) (A) Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and
experience so that the inmate will be able to qualify for better work
both within correctional industries and the free community. It is not
intended that an inmate's work within this class of industries should
be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.
(((ii))) (B) Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or
work training per week.
(((iii))) (C) Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public
support costs.
(((b))) (ii) Class III correctional industries shall be reviewed by
the correctional industries board of directors to set policy for work
crews. The department shall present to the board of directors
quarterly detail statements showing where work crews worked, what
correctional industry class, and the hours worked. The board of
directors may review any class III program at its discretion.
(((c))) (iii) Supervising, management, and custody staff shall be
employees of the department.
(((d))) (iv) All able and eligible inmates who are assigned work
and who are not working in other classes of industries shall work in
this class.
(((e))) (v) Except for inmates who work in work training programs,
inmates in this class shall be paid for their work in accordance with
an inmate gratuity scale. The scale shall be adopted by the secretary
of corrections.
(((4))) (d) CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES.
(((a))) (i) Industries in this class shall be operated by the
department of corrections. They shall be designed and managed to
provide services in the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost.
The services shall be provided to public agencies, to persons who are
poor or infirm, or to nonprofit organizations.
(((b))) (ii) Class IV correctional industries shall be reviewed by
the correctional industries board of directors to set policy for work
crews. The department shall present to the board of directors
quarterly detail statements showing where work crews worked, what
correctional industry class, and the hours worked. The board of
directors may review any class IV program at its discretion. Class IV
correctional industries operated in work camps established pursuant to
RCW 72.64.050 are exempt from the requirements of this subsection
(((4)(b))) (2)(d)(ii).
(((c))) (iii) Inmates in this program shall reside in facilities
owned by, contracted for, or licensed by the department of corrections.
A unit of local government shall provide work supervision services
without charge to the state and shall pay the inmate's wage.
(((d))) (iv) The department of corrections shall reimburse
participating units of local government for liability and workers
compensation insurance costs.
(((e))) (v) Inmates who work in this class of industries shall do
so at their own choice and shall receive a gratuity which shall not
exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in
which the industry is located.
(((5))) (e) CLASS V: COMMUNITY RESTITUTION PROGRAMS.
(((a))) (i) Programs in this class shall be subject to supervision
by the department of corrections. The purpose of this class of
industries is to enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to
work off all or part of a community restitution order as ordered by the
sentencing court.
(((b))) (ii) Employment shall be in a community restitution program
operated by the state, local units of government, or a nonprofit
agency.
(((c))) (iii) To the extent that funds are specifically made
available for such purposes, the department of corrections shall
reimburse nonprofit agencies for workers compensation insurance costs.
(3) This chapter does not permit a unit of local government to
execute or renew a contract to purchase class III and IV department of
corrections services if:
(a) The services have been customarily and historically provided by
any public employees before the effective date of this section;
(b) The purchase of such services will have the effect of
terminating classified public employees or positions existing at the
time the contract was executed or renewed; and
(c) A bargaining unit is represented and there has not been
agreement by that bargaining unit representative that such bargaining
unit work can be performed by prison labor.
(4) This section applies to all class III and IV department of
corrections contracts entered into with a unit of local government on
or after the effective date of this section.

--- END ---