BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.35.001 and 1999 c 368 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that financial information is personal
and sensitive information that if unlawfully obtained by others may do
significant harm to a person's privacy, financial security, and other
interests. The legislature finds that unscrupulous persons find ever
more clever ways, including identity theft, to improperly obtain and
use financial information. The legislature intends to penalize
unscrupulous people for improperly obtaining financial information.
(2) The legislature finds that the storage of large amounts of
unencrypted financial information or means of identification on
portable electronic data storage devices and the transportation of such
devices away from the workplace contribute to identity crimes. The
legislature intends to reduce the incidence of identity crimes by
imposing civil liability in certain cases where wrongful access to
financial information or means of identification from a portable
electronic data storage device that has been removed from the workplace
leads to an identity crime.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.35 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person violates this section if:
(a) The person possesses the financial information or the means of
identification of one hundred or more persons for any lawful purpose
connected to a business or nonprofit organization;
(b) The person, or his or her employee, removes from the premises
of the business or organization a portable electronic data storage
device containing the financial information or means of identification
of one hundred or more persons;
(c) The financial information or means of identification on the
portable electronic data storage device is wrongfully accessed and
utilized to commit a violation of RCW 9.35.010 or 9.35.020; and
(d) The financial information or means of identification on the
portable electronic data storage device was not protected by encryption
software at the time it was wrongfully accessed.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person" means any natural person, association, partnership,
corporation, or organization.
(b) "Portable electronic data storage device" means any portable
electronic device capable of storing information, including, but not
limited to, a laptop computer, personal data assistant, portable hard
drive, or flash memory device.
(3) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

--- END ---