BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a minor under the age of eighteen or a
student of a public or private elementary or secondary school to carry
onto, or to possess on, public or private elementary or secondary
school premises, school provided transportation, or areas of facilities
while being used exclusively by public or private schools any
electronic weapon as defined in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) A person who violates this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "electronic weapon" means an
electronic device that emits an electrical charge and that is designed
and primarily employed to incapacitate a person or animal either
through contact with electrodes on the device itself, remotely through
wired probes that are attached to the device, or through a spark,
plasma, ionization, or other conductive means emitting from the device.

--- END ---