BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the other provisions of this section, any clause in
a construction contract that purports to waive, release, or extinguish
the claim rights of a contractor, subcontractor, or supplier to damages
or an equitable adjustment based on failure to submit claim notice or
claim-related documentation in a specified time frame or form is
enforceable if the clause includes the following provisions:
(a) Initial notice of an event giving rise to a claim is required
to be submitted:
(i) Within seven calendar days following the occurrence of the
event;
(ii) In writing; and
(iii) To the party, as specified in the contract, to whom the claim
is being made.
(b) Documentation of the claim, as specified in (c) of this
subsection, is required to be provided:
(i) Within thirty calendar days following the occurrence of the
event giving rise to the claim;
(ii) In writing; and
(iii) To the party, as specified in the contract, to whom the claim
is being made.
(c) Documentation of the claim is required to be submitted by the
claiming party that provides the following information, in sufficient
detail and in a format to allow the party to whom the claim is being
made to understand the claim and respond:
(i) A detailed factual description of the claim and the bases for
the claim, providing all necessary dates, locations, and items of work
affected by the claim;
(ii) A description of the specific provisions of the contract that
support the claim;
(iii) Identification and copies of any documents that support the
claim and a description of any oral communications that support the
claim;
(iv) An estimated dollar cost, if any, of the claim and how that
estimate was determined; and
(v) An analysis of the progress schedule showing the schedule
change or disruption if the party submitting the claim is asserting a
schedule change or disruption.
(d) If the claim is continuing, the party to whom the claim is
being made may request the information identified in (c) of this
subsection be supplemented.
(2) If a contractor, subcontractor, or supplier fails to meet the
notice and documentation requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, the contractor shall nonetheless be deemed to have complied
with those requirements if:
(a) The required initial notice and documentation are given and
provided within fifteen days and forty-five days, respectively,
following the occurrence of the event giving rise to the claim; and
(b) The party pursuing the claim proves by a preponderance of the
evidence that the party receiving the notice or documentation was not
prejudiced by the later receipt of the notice or documentation.
(3) Any clause in a construction contract that purports to waive,
release, or extinguish the claim rights of a contractor, subcontractor,
or supplier to damages or an equitable adjustment based on failure to
submit claim notice or claim-related documentation pursuant to
provisions that obligate the party pursuing the claim to provide more
information than described in subsection (1) of this section, or
provide such information earlier than the time specified in subsection
(1) of this section, is enforceable against a contractor,
subcontractor, or supplier only if the party to whom the claim is being
made is prejudiced as a result of the failure. The party failing to
provide such timely notice or documentation has the burden to prove, by
a preponderance of the evidence, that the party failing to receive such
timely notice or documentation was not prejudiced by such failure. For
the purpose of this subsection, "prejudiced" means being deprived of
the opportunity to mitigate cost, time, or both cost and time impacts
caused by the event or combination of events giving rise to the claim.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) through (3)
of this section, all claims for damages or an equitable adjustment must
be submitted within thirty calendar days of a project's substantial
completion, as defined in the construction contract.
(5) Subsections (3) and (4) of this section do not apply to any
contractual requirement that a formal claim be submitted within a
certain time frame or contain specified documentation following the
completion or termination of a contract as a condition precedent to
seeking mediation, arbitration, or judicial relief.
(6) For purposes of this section, "construction contract" has the
same meaning as the term is defined in RCW 4.24.370.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.24.370 and 1979 ex.s. c 264 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Construction contract" for purposes of RCW 4.24.360 and section 1
of this act means any contract or agreement for the construction,
alteration, repair, addition to, subtraction from, improvement to, or
maintenance of, any building, highway, road, railroad, excavation, or
other structure, project, development, or improvement attached to real
estate, including moving and demolition in connection therewith.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.24.380 and 1979 ex.s. c 264 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of RCW 4.24.360 shall apply to contracts or
agreements entered into after September 1, 1979.
(2) This act applies to contracts or agreements entered into on or
after January 1, 2008.

--- END ---