BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The parks lifeguard account is created in the state treasury. The
state treasurer shall deposit proceeds received under RCW 82.08.020
from the furnishing of lodging, or the granting of any similar license
to use real property, if the real property is under the care, charge,
control, or supervision of the Washington state parks and recreation
commission. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only by the
commission to maintain lifeguards at state parks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2007.

--- END ---