BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that sellers provide
a valuable service to the state of Washington and its local governments
by collecting and remitting sales and use taxes and that in performing
these services sellers incur significant costs as outlined in the
recently completed joint cost of collection study, which shows the
incremental costs incurred by sellers due to the state's imposition of
the duty to collect sales and use tax. The failure to reimburse
sellers for this service amounts to a hidden tax in the form of a
government mandated cost of doing business on sellers that is not
similarly born by nonretail businesses. The legislature declares its
intent to correct the inequity caused by the mandate on sellers to
collect sales and use taxes by providing for reimbursement to sellers
who collect, timely report, and remit those taxes. The money to pay
this allowance shall come entirely from state funds. Further, the
legislature finds that there is a significant connection between the
training provided by sellers to people entering the job market and the
training provided by a vocational-technical or junior college education
so that part of the funds provided for in this act should be dedicated
to providing student access to those educational institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A seller, who collects and remits state and local sales and use
taxes, is entitled to reimbursement of the expenses the seller incurred
in collecting and remitting these taxes in the form of a credit, as
provided in this section.
(2) The credit is equal to ninety percent of the amount calculated
in subsection (4) of this section. The credit is taken on the combined
excise tax return for the same reporting period in which the taxable
sales occur.
(3) An amount equal to ten percent of the amount calculated in
subsection (4) of this section shall be transferred by the state
treasurer, as directed by the department, to the workforce training and
education coordinating board. The board shall use the money for the
Washington award for vocational excellence program under chapter 28C.04
RCW.
(4) For the purposes of determining the tax credit under subsection
(2) of this section and the contribution to the Washington award for
vocational excellence program under subsection (3) of this section, the
amount of the credit shall be calculated as follows: One and one-half
percent is multiplied by the state sales tax under RCW 82.08.020(1) and
general local sales taxes, due on a return for a reporting period in
which a taxpayer claims a credit under this section.
(5) The credit provided for in this section is taken only from the
state's portion of the taxes due on the return and does not reduce the
amount due to any city, county, or other municipality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect October 1, 2007.

--- END ---