BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) For the purpose of providing funds to
finance state park capital facility projects, and all costs incidental
thereto, the state finance committee is authorized to issue general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of one hundred
twenty-five million dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to
finance these projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds
authorized in this section may be sold at such price as the state
finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized in this section
may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the
net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.
(2) For the purpose of providing funds to finance municipal park
capital facility projects, and all costs incidental thereto, the state
finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of
the state of Washington in the sum of one hundred twenty-five million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance these
projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this
section may be sold at such price as the state finance committee shall
determine. No bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale
without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale
of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The proceeds from the sale of the bonds
authorized in section 1(1) of this act shall be deposited in the state
parks capital facilities account created in section 7 of this act, and
the proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in section 1(2) of
this act shall be deposited into the municipal parks capital facilities
account created in section 8 of this act. These proceeds shall be used
exclusively for the purposes specified in section 7 or 8 of this act
and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the bonds, and shall be administered by the office of financial
management subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account shall be used for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 1 (1) and (2) of this
act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in section 1 (1) and (2) of this
act.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued for the purposes of section 1 (1) and
(2) of this act, the state treasurer shall withdraw from any general
state revenues received in the state treasury and deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account an amount equal to the
amount certified by the state finance committee to be due on the
payment date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Bonds issued under sections 1 through 3
of this act shall state that they are a general obligation of the state
of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to
the payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and
shall contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and
interest as the same shall become due.
(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The legislature may provide additional means
for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on
the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act, and section 3 of this
act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for the payment.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.42.060 and 2003 c 147 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
No bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness for borrowed
money shall be issued by the state which will cause the aggregate debt
contracted by the state to exceed that amount for which payments of
principal and interest in any fiscal year would require the state to
expend more than seven percent of the arithmetic mean of its general
state revenues, as defined in RCW 39.42.070, for the three immediately
preceding fiscal years as certified by the treasurer in accordance with
RCW 39.42.070. It shall be the duty of the state finance committee to
compute annually the amount required to pay principal of and interest
on outstanding debt. In making such computation, the state finance
committee shall include all borrowed money represented by bonds, notes,
or other evidences of indebtedness which are secured by the full faith
and credit of the state or are required to be paid, directly or
indirectly, from general state revenues and which are incurred by the
state, any department, authority, public corporation or quasi public
corporation of the state, any state university or college, or any other
public agency created by the state but not by counties, cities, towns,
school districts, or other municipal corporations, and shall include
debt incurred pursuant to section 3 of Article VIII of the Washington
state Constitution, but shall exclude the following:
(1) Obligations for the payment of current expenses of state
government;
(2) Indebtedness incurred pursuant to RCW 39.42.080 or 39.42.090;
(3) Principal of and interest on bond anticipation notes;
(4) Any indebtedness which has been refunded;
(5) Financing contracts entered into under chapter 39.94 RCW;
(6) Indebtedness authorized or incurred before July 1, 1993,
pursuant to statute which requires that the state treasury be
reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and the interest on such
indebtedness, from money other than general state revenues or from the
special excise tax imposed pursuant to chapter 67.40 RCW;
(7) Indebtedness authorized and incurred after July 1, 1993,
pursuant to statute that requires that the state treasury be
reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and the interest on such
indebtedness, from (a) moneys outside the state treasury, except higher
education operating fees, (b) higher education building fees, (c)
indirect costs recovered from federal grants and contracts, and (d)
fees and charges associated with hospitals operated or managed by
institutions of higher education;
(8) Any agreement, promissory note, or other instrument entered
into by the state finance committee under RCW 39.42.030 in connection
with its acquisition of bond insurance, letters of credit, or other
credit support instruments for the purpose of guaranteeing the payment
or enhancing the marketability, or both, of any state bonds, notes, or
other evidence of indebtedness;
(9) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes identified in RCW
43.99N.020;
(10) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of the school district
bond guaranty established by chapter 39.98 RCW;
(11) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of replacing the
waterproof membrane over the east plaza garage and revising related
landscaping construction pursuant to RCW 43.99Q.070;
(12) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of the state
legislative building rehabilitation, to the extent that principal and
interest payments of such indebtedness are paid from the capitol
building construction account pursuant to RCW 43.99Q.140(2)(b); ((and))
(13) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of financing projects
under RCW 47.10.867; and
(14) Indebtedness incurred under sections 1 through 3 of this act.
To the extent necessary because of the constitutional or statutory
debt limitation, priorities with respect to the issuance or
guaranteeing of bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness by the
state shall be determined by the state finance committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The state parks capital facilities account
is created in the state treasury. All receipts from bonds issued under
section 1(1) of this act must be deposited into the account, less
expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation by the legislature.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the development,
construction, or improvement of state park capital facilities.
Expenditures must include capital projects related to Saint Edward
state park.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The municipal parks capital facilities
account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from bonds
issued under section 1(2) of this act must be deposited into the
account, less expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for: (a) Competitive
grants to municipal corporations as provided in subsection (2) of this
section; and (b) distributions to counties with small populations as
provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(2)(a) The interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall
conduct a competitive grant process to award funds to municipal
corporations for the development, construction, or renovation of
municipal park capital facilities. Competitive grant applications may
only be submitted to the interagency committee for outdoor recreation
by cities, towns, counties, or other municipal corporations that
operate parks. The interagency committee for outdoor recreation must
rank applications according to the following criteria: (i) Recent park
funding levels for the municipal corporation; (ii) the current state
and condition of the parks within the municipal corporation relative to
jurisdictions of similar type and population size; (iii) the amount of
geographic area set aside for parks relative to jurisdictions of
similar type and population size; and (iv) other criteria the committee
deems appropriate.
(b) By December 3, 2008, and by the first business day of each year
thereafter, the interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall
provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that
recommends no more than thirty million dollars of grants to municipal
corporations. The legislature shall, by appropriation, approve any or
all of the eligible grants during the immediately following legislative
session. After each legislative session, the director of the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall notify the state
finance committee of projects approved through legislative enactment.
(3) The legislature shall, by appropriation, approve any amount to
be distributed to counties with small populations under this subsection
(3). After each legislative session, the office of financial
management shall notify the state finance committee of amounts
authorized under this subsection (3). Upon the sale of bonds for the
purposes of this subsection (3), the state treasurer shall distribute
the proceeds to counties ratably based on population. A county must
promptly distribute any amounts received under this subsection (3) to
any cities or towns within the county ratably based on population.
Only counties with total populations of less than two hundred thousand
are eligible to receive funding under this subsection (3). Any
municipality that receives a distribution under this subsection (3)
must use the money for the development, construction, or renovation of
municipal park capital facilities. Population size must be determined
in accordance with the most recent population estimates by the office
of financial management for allocation of state revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The secretary of state shall submit this act
to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the
next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 5, 7, and 8 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 79A RCW.

--- END ---