BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the Washington assessment of student
learning for elementary, middle, and high school years is an important
tool for students, parents, teachers, schools, and the state. This
assessment is so important that the legislature encourages all students
in the state to participate in the assessment, which is voluntary for
students attending private schools. The assessment lets students and
their parents know the student's progress in learning the skills and
knowledge the state deems necessary to become a responsible citizen and
successfully live, learn, and work in the twenty-first century.
(2)(a) Individual students attending private schools under chapter
28A.195 RCW may take the Washington assessment of student learning
through the local school district at district expense as part of the
district's ancillary services.
(b) If a private school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW wishes
to administer the Washington assessment of student learning, the
assessment contractor may provide the assessment at the private school
and may agree to have the private school administer the assessment.
The superintendent of public instruction shall pay the assessment
contractor the cost of the test itself, including processing the test
to determine the results, for each student taking the assessment under
this subsection (2)(b), only if the private school offers the
assessment to all enrolled students at the grade level of the test, and
the private school makes the aggregate test results public and
available to the superintendent of public instruction. The
superintendent shall pay for assessments under this subsection (2)(b)
only for reading, writing, and mathematics assessments administered to
students in grades four and seven and science assessments administered
to students in grades five and eight. However, nothing in this section
requires a private school student to take the assessment. The
superintendent shall not pay for any costs the private school may incur
in administering the assessment at the private school, such as staff or
school administrative costs.

--- END ---