BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The registration of a person who registered to vote before July 1,
2007, is moved to inactive status on July 1, 2009. That person must
reregister in order to vote anything other than a provisional ballot at
an election held after that date. The registration of a person who
first registers to vote or reregisters after June 30, 2007, continues
to be valid after July 1, 2009, unless canceled or inactivated as
otherwise provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
In order to vote at any election or primary, whether at a polling
place or by absentee or mail ballot, a person must have registered to
vote at least thirty days before the election or primary, regardless of
the person's status as an absentee, mail ballot, out-of-state,
overseas, or service voter.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.04.008 and 2005 c 243 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this title:
(1) "Ballot" means, as the context implies, either:
(a) The issues and offices to be voted upon in a jurisdiction or
portion of a jurisdiction at a particular primary, general election, or
special election;
(b) A facsimile of the contents of a particular ballot whether
printed on a paper ballot or ballot card or as part of a voting machine
or voting device;
(c) A physical or electronic record of the choices of an individual
voter in a particular primary, general election, or special election;
or
(d) The physical document on which the voter's choices are to be
recorded;
(2) "Paper ballot" means a piece of paper on which the ballot for
a particular election or primary has been printed, on which a voter may
record his or her choices for any candidate or for or against any
measure, and that is to be tabulated manually;
(3) "Ballot card" means any type of card or piece of paper of any
size on which a voter may record his or her choices for any candidate
and for or against any measure and that is to be tabulated on a vote
tallying system;
(4) "Sample ballot" means a printed facsimile of all the issues and
offices on the ballot in a jurisdiction and is intended to give voters
notice of the issues, offices, and candidates that are to be voted on
at a particular primary, general election, or special election;
(5) "Provisional ballot" means a ballot issued at the polling place
on election day by the precinct election board to a voter who would
otherwise be denied an opportunity to vote a regular ballot, for any
reason authorized by the Help America Vote Act, including but not
limited to the following:
(a) The voter's name does not appear in the poll book for the
precinct at which the voter appears and who therefore cannot be
verified as a registered voter;
(b) There is an indication in the poll book that ((the voter has
requested)) an absentee ballot((, but the voter wishes to vote at the
polling place)) has been issued;
(c) There is a question on the part of the voter concerning the
issues or candidates on which the voter is qualified to vote;
(d) Any other reason allowed by law;
(6) "Party ballot" means a primary election ballot specific to a
particular major political party that lists all partisan offices to be
voted on at that primary, and the candidates for those offices who
affiliate with that same major political party;
(7) "Nonpartisan ballot" means a primary election ballot that lists
all nonpartisan races and ballot measures to be voted on at that
primary.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.04.103 and 2003 c 111 s 118 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Out-of-state voter" means any ((elector)) registered voter of the
state of Washington outside the state but not outside the territorial
limits of the United States or the District of Columbia.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.04.109 and 2003 c 111 s 119 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Overseas voter" means any ((elector)) registered voter of the
state of Washington outside the territorial limits of the United States
or the District of Columbia.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.04.163 and 2003 c 111 s 127 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Service voter" means any ((elector)) registered voter of the state
of Washington who is a member of the armed forces under 42 U.S.C. Sec.
1973 ff-6 while in active service, is a student or member of the
faculty at a United States military academy, is a member of the
merchant marine of the United States, is a program participant as
defined in RCW 40.24.020, or is a member of a religious group or
welfare agency officially attached to and serving with the armed forces
of the United States.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.08.010 and 2006 c 320 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter: "Information required for voter
registration" or "required information" means the minimum information
provided on a voter registration application that is required by the
county auditor in order to place a voter registration applicant on the
voter registration rolls. This information includes:
(1) Name;
(2) Residential address;
(3) Date of birth;
(4) Washington state driver's license number or Washington state
identification card number, or the last four digits of the applicant's
Social Security number if the applicant does not have a Washington
state driver's license or Washington state identification card;
(5) A signature attesting to the truth of the information provided
on the application; and
(6) A check or indication in the box confirming the individual is
a United States citizen.
The residential address provided must identify the actual physical
residence of the voter in Washington, as defined in RCW 29A.04.151,
with detail sufficient to allow the voter to be assigned to the proper
precinct and to locate the voter to confirm his or her residence for
purposes of verifying qualification to vote under Article VI, section
1 of the state Constitution. A residential address may be either a
traditional address or a nontraditional address. A traditional address
consists of a street number and name, optional apartment number or unit
number, and city or town, as assigned by a local government, which
serves to identify the parcel or building of residence and the unit if
a multiunit residence. A nontraditional address consists of a
narrative description of the location of the voter's residence, and may
be used when a traditional address has not been assigned to the voter's
residence. Each person may only have one primary residence for voting
purposes. If the postal service does not deliver mail to the voter's
residential address, or the voter prefers to receive mail at a
different address, the voter may separately provide the mailing address
at which they receive mail. Any mailing address provided shall be used
only for mail delivery purposes and not for precinct assignment or
confirmation of residence for voter qualification purposes. A primary
residence may not include a private or public post office box or any
other place where a person could not live. Persons who are without a
primary residence or whose identity is legally protected may list the
county courthouse as their primary residence.
If the individual does not have a driver's license, state
identification card, or Social Security number, the registrant must be
issued a unique voter registration number in order to be placed on the
voter registration rolls. All other information supplied is ancillary
and not to be used as grounds for not registering an applicant to vote.
Modification of the language of the official Washington state voter
registration form by the voter will not be accepted and will cause the
rejection of the registrant's application.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.08.110 and 2005 c 246 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An application is considered complete only if it contains proof
that the applicant is a United States citizen, the applicant's name,
complete valid residence address, date of birth, and signature
attesting to the truth of the information provided((, a mark in the
check-off box confirming United States citizenship, and an indication
that the provided driver's license number, state identification card
number, or Social Security number has been confirmed by the secretary
of state)). Proof of citizenship is not required if an applicant is
transferring his or her voter registration within a county or between
counties in this state. If the application is complete, the auditor
shall confirm the validity of the citizenship information provided and
upon confirmation that such information is valid, the applicant is
considered to be registered to vote as of the date of mailing. If it
is not complete, the auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice
of the deficiency to the applicant. This verification notice shall
require the applicant to provide the missing information. If the
verification notice is not returned by the applicant within forty-five
days or is returned as undeliverable, the name of the applicant shall
not be placed on the official list of registered voters. If the
applicant provides the required verified information, the auditor shall
confirm the validity of the citizenship information provided, and upon
confirmation that such information is valid, the applicant shall be
registered to vote as of the original date of mailing or date of
delivery, whichever is applicable.
(2) ((If the information required in subsection (1) of this section
is complete, the applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of
the original date of mailing or date of delivery, whichever is
applicable.)) The auditor shall record the appropriate precinct
identification, taxing district identification, and date of
registration on the voter's record in the state voter registration
list. Within forty-five days after the receipt of an application but
no later than seven days before the next primary, special election, or
general election, the auditor shall send to the applicant, by first
class mail, an acknowledgement notice identifying the registrant's
precinct and containing such other information as may be required by
the secretary of state. The postal service shall be instructed not to
forward a voter registration card to any other address and to return to
the auditor any card which is not deliverable.
(3) If an acknowledgement notice card is properly mailed as
required by this section to the address listed by the voter as being
the voter's mailing address and the notice is subsequently returned to
the auditor by the postal service as being undeliverable to the voter
at that address, the auditor shall promptly send the voter a
confirmation notice. The auditor shall place the voter's registration
on inactive status pending a response from the voter to the
confirmation notice.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.08.140 and 2006 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The registration files of all precincts shall be closed against
transfers for thirty days immediately preceding every primary, special
election, and general election to be held in such precincts.
The county auditor shall give notice of the closing of the precinct
files for transfer ((and notice of the special registration and voting
procedure provided by RCW 29A.08.145)) by one publication in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county at least five days
before the closing of the precinct files.
No person may vote at any primary, special election, or general
election in a precinct polling place unless he or she has registered to
vote at least thirty days before that primary or election and appears
on the official statewide voter registration list. ((If a person,
otherwise qualified to vote in the state, county, and precinct in which
he or she applies for registration, does not register at least thirty
days before any primary, special election, or general election, he or
she may register and vote by absentee ballot for that primary or
election under RCW 29A.08.145.))

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.08.210 and 2005 c 246 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application
providing the following information concerning his or her
qualifications as a voter in this state:
(1) Proof that the applicant is a United States citizen;
(2) The address of the last former registration of the applicant as
a voter in the state;
(((2))) (3) The applicant's full name;
(((3))) (4) The applicant's date of birth;
(((4))) (5) The address of the applicant's residence for voting
purposes;
(((5))) (6) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is
not the same as the address in subsection (((4))) (5) of this section;
(((6))) (7) The sex of the applicant;
(((7))) (8) The applicant's Washington state driver's license
number or Washington state identification card number, or the last four
digits of the applicant's Social Security number if he or she does not
have a Washington state driver's license or Washington state
identification card;
(((8))) (9) A check box for the applicant to indicate that he or
she does not have a Washington state driver's license, Washington state
identification card, or Social Security number;
(((9))) (10) A check box allowing the applicant to indicate that he
or she is a member of the armed forces, national guard, or reserves, or
that he or she is an overseas voter;
(((10))) (11) A check box allowing the applicant to confirm that he
or she is at least eighteen years of age;
(((11))) (12) Clear and conspicuous language, designed to draw the
applicant's attention, stating that the applicant must be a United
States citizen in order to register to vote;
(((12) A check box and declaration confirming that the applicant is
a citizen of the United States;))
(13) The following warning:
"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter
registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your
qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class
C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, a
fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both."
(14) The following affirmation by the applicant:
"By signing this document, I hereby assert, under penalty of
perjury, that I am legally eligible to vote. If I am found to have
voted illegally, I may be prosecuted and/or fined for this illegal act.
In addition, I hereby acknowledge that my name and last known address
will be forwarded to the appropriate state and/or federal authorities
if I am found to have voted illegally."
(15) The oath required by RCW 29A.08.230 and a space for the
applicant's signature; and
(16) Any other information that the secretary of state determines
is necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and prevent
duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.
This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to
be prescribed by the secretary of state.
If the applicant fails to provide the information required for
voter registration, the auditor shall send the applicant a verification
notice. The applicant may not be registered until the required
information is provided. If a verification notice is returned as
undeliverable or the applicant fails to respond to the notice within
forty-five days, the applicant shall not be registered to vote.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.08.220 and 2004 c 267 s 115 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall specify by rule the format of all
voter registration applications. These applications shall be
compatible with existing voter registration records. An applicant for
voter registration shall be required to complete only one application
and to provide the required information other than his or her signature
no more than one time. If an applicant transfers his or her voter
registration within a county or between counties of this state, he or
she is not required to provide proof of citizenship. These
applications shall also contain information for the voter to transfer
his or her registration.
Any application format specified by the secretary for use in
registering to vote in state and local elections shall satisfy the
requirements of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-31) and the Help America Vote Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252) for
registering to vote in federal elections.
(2) All registration applications required under RCW 29A.08.210 and
29A.08.340 shall be produced and furnished by the secretary of state to
the county auditors and the department of licensing.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.08.520 and 2005 c 246 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon receiving official notice of a person's conviction of a
felony in either state or federal court, if the convicted person is a
registered voter in the county, the county auditor shall cancel the
defendant's voter registration. Additionally, the secretary of state
in conjunction with the department of corrections, the Washington state
patrol, the office of the administrator for the courts, and other
appropriate state agencies shall arrange for a ((quarterly)) monthly
comparison of ((a list)) any lists of known felons maintained by the
department of corrections and the Washington state patrol with the
statewide voter registration list. If a person is found on a felon
list and the statewide voter registration list, the secretary of state
or county auditor shall confirm the match through a date of birth
comparison and, if the person has not had his or her right to vote
restored, immediately suspend the voter registration from the official
state voter registration list. The canceling authority shall send to
the person at his or her last known voter registration address a notice
of the proposed cancellation and an explanation of the requirements for
restoring the right to vote once all terms of sentencing have been
completed. If the person does not respond within thirty days, the
registration must be canceled.
(2) Felons who have been granted a certificate of discharge by a
court shall provide a certified copy of the certificate of discharge to
the department of corrections and the Washington state patrol within
thirty days from the day the court grants the certificate, and shall
provide a certified copy of their certificate of discharge to the
elections officer at the time they register to vote.
(3) The right to vote may be restored by, for each felony
conviction, one of the following:
(a) A certificate of discharge issued by the sentencing court, as
provided in RCW 9.94A.637;
(b) A court order restoring the right, as provided in RCW 9.92.066;
(c) A final order of discharge issued by the indeterminate sentence
review board, as provided in RCW 9.96.050; or
(d) A certificate of restoration issued by the governor, as
provided in RCW 9.96.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08
RCW to read as follows:
A person may prove that he or she is a United States citizen with
an original or certified copy of any one of the following:
(1) A United States passport;
(2) A certified birth certificate issued by the city, county, or
state. A certified birth certificate has a registrar's raised,
embossed, impressed, or multicolored seal, registrar's signature, and
the date the certificate was filed with the registrar's office, which
must be within one year of birth;
(3) A consular report of birth abroad or certification of birth;
(4) A naturalization certificate; or
(5) A certificate of citizenship.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to any legal obligations of local election officers,
the secretary of state in conjunction with the department of health
shall arrange for a monthly comparison of any lists of known deaths
maintained by the department of health with the statewide voter
registration list. If a person is found on the department of health
death list and the statewide voter registration list, the secretary of
state or county auditor shall immediately cancel the voter registration
from the official state voter registration list. The canceling
authority shall send notice of the cancellation to the presumed
deceased person at his or her last known voter registration address.
The notice will set forth a method of appealing the action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to any legal obligations of local election officers,
the secretary of state in conjunction with the department of health,
the department of social and health services, and the administrator for
the courts shall arrange for a monthly comparison of any lists of
persons known to have been declared mentally incompetent and unable to
vote or known to have been placed under the care of a full guardianship
due to their mental capacity and who have not otherwise been declared
able to vote. If a person is found on the department of health, the
department of social and health services, or the administrator for the
courts lists and the statewide voter registration list, the secretary
of state or county auditor shall immediately cancel the voter
registration from the official state voter registration list. The
canceling authority shall send notice of the cancellation to the person
at the address for which registration has been canceled. The notice
will set forth a method of appealing the action.
The administrator for the courts shall collect and maintain a list
of all judicial determinations of full guardianship under RCW 11.88.010
and other cases where the court has ordered someone unable to vote.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to any legal obligations of local election officers,
the secretary of state in conjunction with local election officers
shall make at a minimum a monthly comparison of names on the statewide
voter registration list, and if a person is found registered more than
once on the statewide voter registration list, the secretary of state
or county auditor shall immediately cancel all voter registrations for
that voter in excess of one from the official state voter registration
list. The canceling authority shall send notice of the cancellation to
the person at the address for which registration has been canceled.
The notice will set forth a method of appealing the action.

Sec. 17 RCW 29A.08.625 and 2003 c 111 s 240 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A voter whose registration or reregistration occurred after
June 30, 2007, and who has been made inactive under this chapter and
who offers to vote at an ensuing election before two federal elections
have been held must be allowed to vote a ((regular)) provisional ballot
and the voter's registration restored to active status.
(2) A voter whose registration has been made inactive because it
occurred on or before June 30, 2007, or which has been properly
canceled under this chapter shall vote a provisional ballot. The voter
shall mark the provisional ballot in secrecy, the ballot placed in a
security envelope, the security envelope placed in a provisional ballot
envelope, and the reasons for the use of the provisional ballot noted.
(3) Upon receipt of such a voted provisional ballot the auditor
shall investigate the circumstances surrounding the original
cancellation. If he or she determines that the cancellation was in
error, the voter's registration must be immediately reinstated, and the
voter's provisional ballot must be counted. If the original
cancellation was not in error, the voter must be afforded the
opportunity to reregister at his or her correct address, and the
voter's provisional ballot must not be counted. If the voter was given
a provisional ballot only because he or she had not registered or
reregistered after June 30, 2007, the ballot must be counted. The
voter will continue to vote provisional ballots until such time as he
or she chooses to register.
(4) The names and addresses of provisional voters is not a matter
of public record, and no one other than an election officer may contact
an individual provisional voter. The election officer shall contact
the voter via first class mail within forty-eight hours of discovery
and shall inform the voter of relevant deadlines.

Sec. 18 RCW 29A.08.820 and 2006 c 320 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Challenges initiated by a registered voter against a voter who
registered to vote less than sixty days before the election, or who
changed residence less than sixty days before the election without
transferring his or her registration, must be filed not later than ten
days before any primary or election, general or special, or within ten
days of the voter being added to the voter registration data base,
whichever is later, at the office of the appropriate county auditor.
Challenges initiated by a registered voter against any other voter must
be filed not later than forty-five days before the election.
Challenges initiated by the office of the county prosecuting attorney
must be filed in the same manner as challenges initiated by a
registered voter.
(2)(a) If the challenge is filed within forty-five days before an
election at which the challenged voter is eligible to vote, a notation
of the challenge must be made immediately in the poll book or voter
registration system, and the county canvassing board presides over the
hearing.
(b) If the challenge is filed before the challenged voter's ballot
is received, the ballot must be treated as a ((challenged)) provisional
ballot. A ((challenged)) provisional ballot received at a polling
place must be placed in a sealed envelope separate from other voted
ballots.
(c) If the challenge is filed after the challenged voter's ballot
is received, the challenge cannot affect the current election.
(3) If the challenge is filed at least forty-five days before an
election at which the challenged voter is eligible to vote, the county
auditor presides over the hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) Provisional or questionable ballots
must not be tallied until the validity of the ballot or the voter has
been confirmed and, if so, the ballots will be processed in similar
manner to absentee ballots. A provisional ballot is issued to a person
seeking to vote in a polling place under the following circumstances:
(a) The name of the voter does not appear in the poll book and:
(i) The voter's registration was canceled but the voter questions
the validity of the cancellation;
(ii) The status of the voter's registration cannot be determined at
that time; or
(iii) The voter is registered and assigned to another polling place
or jurisdiction;
(b) The voter's name is in the poll book but there is an indication
that the voter was issued an absentee ballot, and the voter wishes to
vote at the polls; or
(c) Other circumstances as determined by the precinct election
official.
(2) The precinct election official shall issue a provisional ballot
outer envelope and a security envelope to the voter eligible for a
provisional ballot. The voter shall vote the ballot in secrecy and,
when done, place the ballot in the security envelope, then place the
security envelope with the ballot in it in the provisional ballot outer
envelope and return it to the precinct election official. The precinct
election official shall ensure that the required information is
completed on the outside of the outer envelope and have the voter sign
it in the appropriate space, and place it in a secure container
designated for provisional ballots only.
(3) When the provisional ballot, including provisional ballots from
other counties or states, are received in the elections center, the
circumstances surrounding the provisional ballot must be investigated
before certification of the primary or election. A provisional ballot
cannot be tallied if the registered voter did not sign either the poll
book or the provisional ballot envelope.
(4) When it is determined that the ballot is to be counted, the
ballot must be processed in a manner similar to an absentee ballot
except the provisional ballot outer envelopes must be retained
separately from the absentee ballot return envelopes. The manual
inspection of the ballots as required in WAC 434-261-070 or its
successor must also be carried out.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 At a minimum, the following information
will be required to be printed on the outer provisional ballot
envelope:
(1) An oath for the voter to sign, as required by the Help America
Vote Act, which must be included in substantially the following form:

"I declare that the facts on this voter registration form are true.
I am a citizen of the United States, I am not presently denied my civil
rights as a result of being convicted of a felony, I will have lived in
Washington at this address for thirty days before the next election at
which I vote, and I will be at least eighteen years old when I vote.";

(2) Name and signature of voter (must be the same as on the oath);
(3) Voter's registered address both present and former, if
applicable;
(4) Voter's date of birth;
(5) Reason for the provisional ballot;
(6) Precinct and polling place at which voter has voted;
(7) Sufficient space to list disposition of the ballot after review
by the county auditor.
No provisional ballot may be rejected for lack of the information
described in this section as long as the voter provides a valid
signature and sufficient information to determine eligibility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 (1) Upon receipt of the provisional ballot,
including provisional ballots from other counties or states, the
auditor must investigate the circumstances surrounding the provisional
ballot before certification of the primary or election. A provisional
ballot cannot be counted if the registered voter did not sign either
the poll book or the provisional ballot envelope.
(a) If there is no record of the voter ever having been registered,
the voter must be offered the opportunity to register and the
provisional ballot for the current election will not be counted.
(b) If the voter was previously registered and later canceled and
the auditor determines that the cancellation was in error, the voter's
registration will be immediately restored and the provisional ballot
counted.
(c) If the auditor determines that the cancellation was not in
error, the voter must be given the opportunity to reregister at the
voter's correct address, and the provisional ballot for the current
election will not be counted.
(2) If the voter is a registered voter but has voted a ballot other
than the one that the voter would have received at his or her
designated polling place, the auditor must ensure that only those votes
for the positions or measures for which the voter was eligible to vote
are counted, which may require coordination with other county auditors.
(3) If the voter is a registered voter in another county or state,
the auditor shall forward the ballot and a corresponding voter guide,
or other means by which the ballot can be interpreted including
rotation if applicable, within five business days after election day to
the supervisor of elections for the county for which the voter is
resident. If the provisional ballot envelope is not signed by the
voter, a copy of the poll book page must be included. If the county is
not known, it shall be forwarded to the secretary of state, or
counterpart, for the state in which the voter is resident.
(4) If the auditor finds that an absentee voter who voted a
provisional ballot at the polls has also voted an absentee ballot in
that primary or election, the provisional ballot will not be counted.
(5) The auditor shall prepare a tally displaying the number of
provisional ballots received, the number found valid and counted, the
number rejected and not counted, and the reason for not counting the
ballots, as part of the canvassing process and presented to the
canvassing board before the certification of the primary or election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 When the disposition of the provisional
ballot determines that the provisional ballot is to be counted, the
provisional ballot shall be processed in a manner similar to an
absentee ballot as provided in chapters 29A.40 and 29A.60 RCW except
the outer provisional ballot envelopes must be retained separately from
the absentee ballot return envelopes. The manual inspection of the
ballots as required in WAC 434-261-070 or its successor must also be
carried out.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The secretary of state shall establish a
free access system (such as a toll-free telephone number or an internet
web site) that any individual who casts a provisional ballot may access
to discover whether the vote of that individual was counted, and, if
the vote was not counted, the reason why the vote was not counted. The
secretary of state shall establish and maintain reasonable procedures
necessary to protect the security, confidentiality, and integrity of
personal information collected, stored, or otherwise used by the free
access system established under this section. Access to information
about an individual provisional ballot must be restricted to the
individual who cast the ballot.

Sec. 24 RCW 29A.40.050 and 2003 c 111 s 1005 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, county auditors shall provide
special ((absentee)) provisional ballots to be used for state primary
or state general elections. An auditor shall provide a special
((absentee)) provisional ballot only to a registered voter who
completes an application stating that she or he will be unable to vote
and return ((a regular)) an absentee ballot by normal mail delivery
within the period provided for ((regular)) absentee ballots.
The application for a special ((absentee)) provisional ballot may
not be filed earlier than ninety days before the applicable state
primary or general election. The special ((absentee)) provisional
ballot will list the offices and measures, if known, scheduled to
appear on the state primary or general election ballot. The voter may
use the special ((absentee)) provisional ballot to write in the name of
any eligible candidate for each office and vote on any measure.
(2) With any special ((absentee)) provisional ballot issued under
this section, the county auditor shall include a listing of any
candidates who have filed before the time of the application for
offices that will appear on the ballot at that primary or election and
a list of any issues that have been referred to the ballot before the
time of the application.
(3) Write-in votes on special ((absentee)) provisional ballots must
be counted in the same manner provided by law for the counting of other
write-in votes. The county auditor shall process and canvass the
special ((absentee)) provisional ballots provided under this section in
the same manner as ((other)) absentee ballots under ((this)) chapters
29A.40 and ((chapter)) 29A.60 RCW.
(4) A voter who requests a special ((absentee)) provisional ballot
under this section may also request an absentee ballot under RCW
29A.40.020(4). If the ((regular)) absentee ballot is properly voted
and returned, the special ((absentee)) provisional ballot is void, and
the county auditor shall reject it in whole when special ((absentee))
provisional ballots are canvassed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 In addition to the material required by RCW
29A.40.091, each county auditor shall include with any special
provisional ballot mailed the following information:
(1) Instructions for voting the ballot;
(2) Instructions for correcting a spoiled ballot;
(3) The fact that political party designation should be included
with all write-ins for partisan office;
(4) A listing of all offices and measures that will appear upon the
ballot, together with a listing of all persons who have filed for
office or who have indicated their intention to file for office;
(5) A copy of any applicable voters' guide available at that time;
(6) The fact that the voter may vote for as many or as few offices
or measures as he or she desires;
(7) The fact that the voter is entitled to request, and
subsequently vote a regular absentee ballot, and that if the regular
absentee is received during the time period provided by law for the
canvassing of absentee ballots it will be tabulated and the special
provisional ballot will be voided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 No special provisional ballot may be
provided earlier than ninety days before a primary or election. An
application received by a county auditor more than ninety days before
a primary or general election may be either returned to the applicant
with the explanation that the request is premature or may be held by
the auditor until the appropriate time and then processed.

Sec. 27 RCW 29A.40.020 and 2003 c 111 s 1002 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, a registered voter or out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter desiring to cast an
absentee ballot at a single election or primary must request the
absentee ballot from his or her county auditor no earlier than ninety
days nor later than the day before the election or primary at which the
person seeks to vote. Except as otherwise provided by law, the request
may be made orally in person, by telephone, electronically, or in
writing. An application or request for an absentee ballot made under
the authority of a federal statute or regulation will be considered and
given the same effect as a request for an absentee ballot under this
chapter.
(2) A voter requesting an absentee ballot for a primary may also
request an absentee ballot for the following general election. A
request by an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter for
an absentee ballot for a primary election will be considered as a
request for an absentee ballot for the following general election.
(3) In requesting an absentee ballot, the voter shall state the
address to which the absentee ballot should be sent. A request for an
absentee ballot from an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service
voter must include the address of the last residence in the state of
Washington ((and either a written application or the oath on the return
envelope must include a declaration of the other qualifications of the
applicant as an elector of this state)). A request for an absentee
ballot from any other voter must state the address at which that voter
is currently registered to vote in the state of Washington or the
county auditor shall verify that information from the voter
registration records of the county.
(4) A request for an absentee ballot from a registered voter who is
within this state must be made directly to the auditor of the county in
which the voter is registered. An absentee ballot request from a
registered voter who is temporarily outside this state or from an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter may be made either to
the appropriate county auditor or to the secretary of state, who shall
promptly forward the request to the appropriate county auditor.
(5) No person, organization, or association may distribute absentee
ballot applications within this state that contain a return address
other than that of the appropriate county auditor.

Sec. 28 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2005 c 246 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a
security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger
envelope in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on
how to mark the ballot and how to return it to the county auditor. The
instructions that accompany an absentee ballot for a partisan primary
must include instructions for voting the applicable ballot style, as
provided in chapter 29A.36 RCW. The absentee voter's name and address
must be printed on the larger return envelope, which must also contain
a declaration by the absentee voter reciting his or her qualifications
and stating that he or she has not voted in any other jurisdiction at
this election, together with a summary of the penalties for any
violation of any of the provisions of this chapter. The declaration
must clearly inform the voter that it is illegal to vote if he or she
is not a United States citizen; it is illegal to vote if he or she has
been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her voting rights
restored; and, except as otherwise provided by law, it is illegal to
cast a ballot or sign an absentee envelope on behalf of another voter.
The return envelope must provide space for the voter to indicate the
date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter to sign the oath.
It must also contain a space so that the voter may include a telephone
number. A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter
must be printed on the return envelope immediately adjacent to the
space for the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the
return envelope must affirm and attest to the statements regarding the
qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the ballot. The
return envelope must also have a secrecy flap that the voter may seal
that will cover the voter's signature and optional telephone number.
((For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, the
signed declaration on the return envelope constitutes the equivalent of
a voter registration for the election or primary for which the ballot
has been issued.)) The voter must be instructed to ((either)) return
the ballot to the county auditor by whom it was issued ((or attach
sufficient first class postage, if applicable, and mail the ballot to
the appropriate county auditor no later than)) by 8:00 p.m. on the day
of the election or primary for which the ballot was issued. Military
ballots must have been signed by 8:00 p.m. on the day of the election
or primary for which the ballot was issued and received by the
appropriate county auditor by 5:00 p.m. on the day of the final county
certification of the election or primary.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.

Sec. 29 RCW 29A.40.140 and 2006 c 320 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The qualifications of any absentee voter may be challenged before
the voted ballot is received. The board has the authority to determine
the legality of any absentee ballot challenged under this section.
Challenged ballots must be handled in accordance with ((chapter 29A.08
RCW)) sections 19 through 26 of this act.

Sec. 30 RCW 29A.44.201 and 2004 c 271 s 136 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A voter desiring to vote shall give his or her name and photo
identification to the precinct election officer who has the precinct
list of registered voters. This officer shall announce the name to the
precinct election officer who has the copy of the inspector's poll book
for that precinct. The election officers together shall compare the
photograph on the identification with the appearance of the voter
before them and compare the signature on the identification with the
signature the voter has written in the poll book. If they agree that
there are obvious discrepancies between the photograph on the
identification and the appearance of the voter before them or between
the signature on the identification and the signature the voter has
written in the poll book, they shall treat the ballot as a provisional
ballot, note the discrepancies in a written record, and transmit this
record to the county auditor along with the voted ballot.
(2) The only acceptable forms of identification are either a
Washington state driver's license or identicard or a United States
passport. The identification must contain a photograph of the voter
and the voter's signature.
(3) If the right of this voter to participate in the primary or
election is not challenged, the voter must be issued a ballot or
permitted to enter a voting booth or to operate a voting device. For
a partisan primary in a jurisdiction using the physically separate
ballot format, the voter must be issued a nonpartisan ballot and each
party ballot. The number of the ballot or the voter must be recorded
by the precinct election officers. If the right of the voter to
participate is challenged, RCW 29A.08.810 and 29A.08.820 apply to that
voter.

Sec. 31 RCW 29A.44.330 and 2003 c 111 s 1131 are each amended to
read as follows:
The programmed memory pack for each poll-site ballot counting
device must be sealed into the device during final preparation and
logic and accuracy testing. Except in the case of a device breakdown,
the memory pack must remain sealed in the device until after the polls
have closed and all reports and telephonic or electronic transfer of
results are completed. After all reporting is complete the precinct
election officers responsible for transferring the sealed voted ballots
under RCW 29A.60.110 shall ensure that the memory pack is returned to
the elections department. If the entire poll-site ballot counting
device is returned, the memory pack must remain sealed in the device.
If the poll-site ballot counting device is to remain at the polling
place, the precinct election officer shall break the seal on the device
and remove the memory pack and seal and return it along with the
irregularly voted ballots and ((special)) provisional ballots to the
elections department on election day.

Sec. 32 RCW 29A.44.340 and 2003 c 111 s 1132 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each poll-site ballot counting device must be programmed to return
all blank ballots and overvoted ballots to the voter for private
reexamination. The election officer shall take whatever steps are
necessary to ensure that the secrecy of the ballot is maintained. The
precinct election officer shall provide information and instruction on
how to properly mark the ballot. The voter may remark the original
ballot, may request a new ballot under RCW 29A.44.040, or may choose to
complete a ((special)) provisional ballot envelope and return the
ballot as a ((special)) provisional ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 A new section is added to chapter 29A.84
RCW to read as follows:
The secretary of state and the appropriate county auditor shall
refer all cases of violations of the following statutes that they
discover or suspect to have occurred to the local prosecuting attorney:
RCW 29A.84.130, 29A.84.140, 29A.84.650, 29A.84.655, 29A.84.660,
29A.84.670, and 29A.84.680. The prosecutor to whom the violations were
referred shall submit to the secretary of state a list of all such
referrals, the basis of the referrals, and the final disposition of the
referrals.

Sec. 34 RCW 29A.84.110 and 2003 c 111 s 2105 are each amended to
read as follows:
If any county auditor or registration assistant:
(1) Willfully neglects or refuses to perform any duty required by
law in connection with the registration of voters; or
(2) Willfully neglects or refuses to perform such duty in the
manner required by voter registration law; or
(3) Enters or causes or permits to be entered on the voter
registration records the name of any person in any other manner or at
any other time than as prescribed by voter registration law or enters
or causes or permits to be entered on such records the name of any
person not entitled to be thereon; or
(4) Destroys, mutilates, conceals, changes, or alters any
registration record in connection therewith except as authorized by
voter registration law,
he or she is guilty of a ((gross misdemeanor punishable to the same
extent as a gross misdemeanor that is)) class C felony punishable under
RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 35 RCW 29A.84.670 and 2003 c 111 s 2134 and 2003 c 53 s 181
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a voter to:
(a) Receive a ballot from any person other than the election
officer having charge of the ballots;
(b) Vote or offer to vote any ballot except one received from the
election officer having charge of the ballots;
(c) Fail to return to the election officers any ballot received
from an election officer.
(2) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor, punishable
((by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars, plus costs of
prosecution)) under RCW 9A.20.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
A person applying for issuance or renewal of an identicard or a
Washington state driver's license must provide proof of United States
citizenship. If the person does not supply proof meeting the
requirements of RCW 46.20.035, the department may not issue the person
a regular identicard or driver's license. If the person satisfies all
other requirements and fees prescribed by law, the department shall
issue the person a provisional identicard or driver's license.

Sec. 37 RCW 46.20.035 and 2004 c 249 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may not issue an identicard or a Washington
state driver's license ((that is valid for identification purposes))
unless the applicant meets the identification requirements of
((subsection (1), (2), or (3) of)) this section.
(((1))) (2) A driver's license or identicard applicant must provide
the department with an original or certified copy of at least one of
the following pieces of valid identifying documentation that ((contains
the signature and a photograph of the applicant)) proves the applicant
is a United States citizen:
(a) ((A valid or recently expired driver's license or instruction
permit that includes the date of birth of the applicant;
(b) A Washington state identicard or an identification card issued
by another state;
(c) An identification card issued by the United States, a state, or
an agency of either the United States or a state, of a kind commonly
used to identify the members or employees of the government agency;
(d) A military identification card;
(e) A United States passport; or
(f) An Immigration and Naturalization Service form.
(2))) A United States passport;
(b) A certified birth certificate issued by the city, county, or
state. A certified birth certificate has a registrar's raised,
embossed, impressed, or multicolored seal, registrar's signature, and
the date the certificate was filed with the registrar's office, which
must be within one year of birth;
(c) A consular report of birth abroad or certification of birth;
(d) A naturalization certificate; or
(e) A certificate of citizenship.
(3) Any person who applies for an identicard or a Washington state
driver's license under this chapter and any person who is the parent of
a minor who applies for an identicard or a Washington state driver's
license under this chapter shall first provide the department with
proof of the person's status as a citizen of the United States and, in
addition, shall provide the department with the person's residential
address and phone number. The department shall confirm the validity of
the person's citizenship status.
(4) Each identicard or Washington state driver's license issued by
the department to an applicant who is not a citizen must be clearly
identified as a provisional identicard or license.
(5) An applicant who is a minor may establish identity by providing
an affidavit of the applicant's parent or guardian. The parent or
guardian must accompany the minor and display or provide:
(a) At least one piece of documentation in subsection (((1))) (2)
of this section establishing the identity of the parent or guardian;
and
(b) Additional documentation establishing the relationship between
the parent or guardian and the applicant.
(((3) A person unable to provide identifying documentation as
specified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section may request that the
department review other available documentation in order to ascertain
identity. The department may waive the requirement if it finds that
other documentation clearly establishes the identity of the applicant.
(4))) (6) An identicard or a driver's license that includes a
photograph that has been renewed by mail or by electronic commerce is
valid for identification purposes if the applicant met the
identification requirements of ((subsection (1), (2), or (3) of)) this
section at the time of previous issuance.
(((5))) (7) The form of an applicant's name, as established under
this section, is the person's name of record for the purposes of this
chapter.
(((6) If the applicant is unable to prove his or her identity under
this section, the department shall plainly label the license "not valid
for identification purposes."))
(8) Proof of citizenship is not required if an applicant displays
a valid or recently expired identicard or Washington state driver's
license that was issued by the department after the effective date of
this section.

Sec. 38 RCW 46.20.091 and 2000 c 115 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application. In order to apply for a driver's license or
instruction permit the applicant must provide his or her:
(a) Name of record, as established by documentation required under
RCW 46.20.035;
(b) Date of birth, as established by satisfactory evidence of age;
(c) Sex;
(d) Washington residence address;
(e) Description;
(f) Driving licensing history, including:
(i) Whether the applicant has ever been licensed as a driver or
chauffeur and, if so, (A) when and by what state or country; (B)
whether the license has ever been suspended or revoked; and (C) the
date of and reason for the suspension or revocation; or
(ii) Whether the applicant's application to another state or
country for a driver's license has ever been refused and, if so, the
date of and reason for the refusal; ((and))
(g) Proof of United States citizenship; and
(h) Any additional information required by the department.
(2) Sworn statement. An application for an instruction permit or
for an original driver's license must be made upon a form provided by
the department. The form must include a section for the applicant to
indicate whether he or she has received driver training and, if so,
where. The identifying documentation verifying the name of record must
be accompanied by the applicant's written statement that it is valid.
The information provided on the form must be sworn to and signed by the
applicant before a person authorized to administer oaths. An applicant
who makes a false statement on an application for a driver's license or
instruction permit is guilty of false swearing, a gross misdemeanor,
under RCW 9A.72.040.
(3) Driving records from other jurisdictions. If a person
previously licensed in another jurisdiction applies for a Washington
driver's license, the department shall request a copy of the
applicant's driver's record from the other jurisdiction. The driving
record from the other jurisdiction becomes a part of the driver's
record in this state.
(4) Driving records to other jurisdictions. If another
jurisdiction requests a copy of a person's Washington driver's record,
the department shall provide a copy of the record. The department
shall forward the record without charge if the other jurisdiction
extends the same privilege to the state of Washington. Otherwise the
department shall charge a reasonable fee for transmittal of the record.

Sec. 39 RCW 46.20.105 and 2000 c 115 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may provide a method to distinguish the driver's
license of a person who is under the age of twenty-one from the
driver's license of a person who is twenty-one years of age or older.
(2) An instruction permit must be identified as an "instruction
permit" and issued in a distinctive form as determined by the
department.
(3) An intermediate license must be identified as an "intermediate
license" and issued in a distinctive form as determined by the
department.
(4) A provisional license must be identified as a "provisional
license" and issued in a distinctive color as determined by the
department.

Sec. 40 RCW 46.20.117 and 2005 c 314 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing
a picture, if the applicant:
(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;
(b) Proves his or her identity as required by RCW 46.20.035; and
(c) Pays the required fee. The fee is twenty dollars unless an
applicant is a recipient of continuing public assistance grants under
Title 74 RCW, who is referred in writing by the secretary of social and
health services. For those persons the fee must be the actual cost of
production of the identicard.
(2) Design and term. The identicard must:
(a) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the
official driver's license; ((and))
(b) Expire on the fifth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate
after issuance; and
(c) If a provisional identicard, be clearly identified as a
"provisional identicard" and issued in a distinctive color as
determined by the department.
(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be
submitted by means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her identicard by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of an identicard
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.
An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce
unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of
the identicard holder.
(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the
holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to use the
card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.

Sec. 41 RCW 46.20.155 and 2005 c 246 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before issuing an original license or identicard or renewing a
license or identicard under this chapter, the licensing agent shall
determine if the applicant wants to register to vote or transfer his or
her voter registration by asking the following question:

"Do you want to register to vote or transfer your voter
registration?"

(2) If the applicant chooses to register or transfer a
registration, the agent shall ((ask)) make the following statement and
ask the applicant the following questions:

(((1))) (a) "Are you a United States citizen?"
(((2))) (b) "Are you or will you be eighteen years of age on or
before the next election?"

(3) If the applicant answers in the affirmative to both questions,
the agent shall then provide the applicant with a voter registration
form and instructions and shall record that the applicant has requested
to register to vote or transfer a voter registration. If the applicant
answers in the negative to either question, the agent shall not provide
the applicant with a voter registration form.
(((2))) (4) The department shall establish a procedure that
substantially meets the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this
section when permitting an applicant to renew a license or identicard
by mail or by electronic commerce.

Sec. 42 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2006 c 277 s 6, 2006 c 228 s 9, 2006 c
191 s 2, 2006 c 139 s 2, 2006 c 128 s 3, and 2006 c 73 s 12 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Abandonment of Dependent Person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless manner
(RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged
in sexually explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a
Signal Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.675)

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct (RCW 9.68A.070)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of Dependent Person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Driving While Under the Influence
(RCW 46.61.502(6))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW
9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (RCW
46.61.504(6))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a
Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW
9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event
(RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(3))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or
Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace
Officer With a Projectile Stun
Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except
subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily
Harm By Use of a Signal
Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW
9A.56.350(2))

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW
9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

(([Retail])) Retail Theft with
Extenuating Circumstances 1
(RCW 9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW
9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Voter Registration Violation by
Election Official (RCW
29A.84.110)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender
(second or subsequent offense)
(RCW 9A.44.130(10)(a))

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW
9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Repeat Voting (RCW 29A.84.650)

(([Retail])) Retail Theft with
Extenuating Circumstances 2
(RCW 9A.56.360(3))

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW
9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism (RCW 9A.44.115)

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Unqualified Voter Registration (RCW
29A.84.140)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43 RCW 29A.08.145 (Late registration -- Special
procedure) and 2006 c 97 s 2, 2006 c 246 s 10, 2004 c 267 s 113, 2003
c 111 s 213, & 1993 c 383 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 44 (1) Sections 19 through 23, 25, and 26 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 29A RCW, to be captioned
"Provisional ballots."
(2) RCW 29A.40.050, as amended by section 24 of this act, is
recodified as a section in the new chapter created in subsection (1) of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 45 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 46 (1) Sections 1 and 17 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.
(2) The remainder of this act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---