BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is unlawful for a person to
intentionally kill or harm a horse or cattle belonging to another
person, without consent of the owner. A violation of this section
constitutes a class B felony.
(2) This section does not apply to individuals meeting the
definition of slaughterer or packer, as those terms are defined in RCW
16.50.110, when conducting activities consistent with those
definitions.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.24.320 and 2005 c 419 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who suffers damage to livestock as a result of actions
described in RCW 16.52.205 or any owner of livestock who suffers damage
as a result of a willful, unauthorized act described in RCW 9A.56.080
((or)), 9A.56.083, or section 1 of this act may bring an action against
the person or persons committing the act in a court of competent
jurisdiction for exemplary damages up to three times the actual damages
sustained, plus attorney's fees. As used in this section, "livestock"
means the animals specified in RCW 9A.56.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 16 RCW.

--- END ---