BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The study of the state's history and
government is vital to providing a well-rounded education to students.
It is important for students to have a firm understanding of where we
have come from as a state and the institutions that guide and serve
citizens of the state. It is equally important to provide students
with context for the information that enables them to apply it to the
present and future, with an understanding of Washington's place in our
country and the broader global community.
The legislature finds that the current high school graduation
requirements for coursework in Washington state history and government
have become outdated and lack relevancy. It is therefore the intent of
the legislature to modernize high school graduation requirements for
coursework in Washington state history and government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with students entering the ninth grade in the 2008-09
school year, the high school graduation requirements established by the
state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.230.090 shall include a
course that covers Washington state and the global economy. The
content of the course shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Washington state history and culture;
(b) The Constitution of the state of Washington and Washington
state politics;
(c) Washington state geography; and
(d) Commerce in Washington state and its place in a global economy.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a curriculum that is consistent with the requirements of this
section and that meets the requirements for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction's classroom-based assessments.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make the
curriculum available for voluntary use by school districts beginning
with the 2008-09 school year.

--- END ---