BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
consolidate the areas in the legal system that involve children and
families to better serve the legal and social needs of the families.
The goal is to enable families to address issues that may arise in the
future with minimal legal intervention. Family court has long been
recognized as a potential means of serving the legal and social needs
of families. It is the intent of the legislature to support the use
and success of family court through means such as judicial training,
longer judicial rotations, and provision of needed services to the
families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 2.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A state of Washington family court is established in each
county or judicial district of the state as a division of the superior
court system for the state, unless otherwise provided for by law.
(2) Family court judges are superior court judges.
(3) All family court judicial officers must obtain training as
required in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 2.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The supreme court is requested to provide by rule for the
following:
(1) The administration of the family court;
(2) The term of rotation and required training for judicial
officers who will serve as family court judges. The term of rotation
for a family court judicial officer shall not be less than three years.
It is recommended that the training include, but not be limited to, the
following areas:
(a) All orders prohibiting or restricting contact between parties;
(b) Dissolution of marriage;
(c) Custody of children;
(d) Child support;
(e) Spousal support;
(f) Modification of support;
(g) Psychological and counseling aspects of dissolution of
marriage;
(h) Adoption;
(i) Paternity litigation;
(j) Proceedings to free a minor from the custody and control of a
parent or parents, including dependency and termination of parental
rights;
(k) Domestic violence;
(l) Guardianships;
(m) Child abuse and neglect;
(n) Childhood development;
(o) Cultural awareness;
(p) Mental illness;
(q) Substance abuse;
(r) Contempt proceedings, enforcement, mediation, and/or
negotiation involving any of the areas listed in this subsection; and
(3) The minimum hours of continuing education relating to family
court or family law issues required of judicial officers in family
court.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.12.010 and 1999 c 397 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless otherwise provided by law, each superior court shall have a
division referred to as the family court to exercise the jurisdiction
conferred by this chapter ((and while sitting in the exercise of such
jurisdiction shall be known and referred to as the "family court.")).
A family court proceeding under this chapter is((: (1))) any
proceeding under this title or any proceeding in which the family court
is requested to adjudicate or enforce the rights of the parties or
their children regarding ((the determination or modification of
parenting plans, child custody, visitation, or support, or the
distribution of property or obligations, or (2) concurrent with the
juvenile court, any proceeding under Title 13 or chapter 28A.225 RCW))
proceedings in RCW 26.12.190.

Sec. 5 RCW 26.12.190 and 1991 c 367 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The family court shall have jurisdiction ((and full power in
all pending cases to make, alter, modify, and enforce all temporary and
permanent orders regarding the following: Parenting plans, child
support, custody of children, visitation, possession of property,
maintenance, contempt, custodial interference, and orders for
attorneys' fees, suit money or costs as may appear just and equitable.
Court commissioners or judges)) to hear and dispose of the following
proceedings:
(a) Dissolution of marriage;
(b) Child custody;
(c) Visitation;
(d) Maintenance and support;
(e) Equitable distribution of property in dissolution cases;
(f) Adoption;
(g) Termination of parental rights;
(h) Domestic violence and abuse proceedings under chapter 26.50
RCW;
(i) Proceedings under the uniform act on paternity and the uniform
interstate family support act;
(j) Dependency, neglect, and abuse proceedings;
(k) Emancipation of minors;
(l) Truancy, at-risk youth, and child in need of services
proceedings; and
(m) Juvenile offenders proceedings.
(2) Judicial officers shall not have authority to require the
parties to mediate disputes concerning child support.
(((2))) (3) Family court investigation, evaluation, mediation,
treatment, and reconciliation services, and any other services may be
used to assist the court to develop an order as the court deems
necessary to preserve the marriage, implement an amicable settlement,
and resolve the issues in controversy.

Sec. 6 RCW 26.12.230 and 1986 c 95 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any county may contract under chapter 39.34 RCW with any other
county or counties to provide joint family court and family court
services. Any county contracting with any other county to provide
family court under this section is not required to establish a separate
family court within its county as otherwise required in section 2 of
this act.
(2) Any agreement between two or more counties for the operation of
a joint family court service may provide that the treasurer of one
participating county shall be the custodian of moneys made available
for the purposes of the joint services, and that the treasurer may make
payments from the moneys upon proper authorization.
(3) Any agreement between two or more counties for the operation of
a joint family court service may also provide:
(a) For the joint provision or operation of services and facilities
or for the provision or operation of services and facilities by one
participating county under contract for the other participating
counties;
(b) For appointments of members of the staff of the family court
including the supervising counselor;
(c) That, for specified purposes, the members of the staff of the
family court including the supervising counselor, but excluding the
((judges)) judicial officers of the family court and other court
personnel, shall be considered to be employees of one participating
county;
(d) For other matters as are necessary to carry out the purposes of
this chapter.
(4) The provisions of this chapter relating to family court
services provided by a single county are equally applicable to counties
which contract, under this section, to provide joint family court
services.

Sec. 7 RCW 13.04.021 and 1999 c 397 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) The juvenile court shall be a division of the superior court.
In judicial districts having more than one judge of the superior court,
the judges of such court shall annually assign one or more of their
number to the juvenile court division. In any judicial district having
a court commissioner, the court commissioner shall have the power,
authority, and jurisdiction, concurrent with a juvenile court judge, to
hear all cases under this chapter and to enter judgment and make orders
with the same power, force, and effect as any judge of the juvenile
court, subject to motion or demand by any party within ten days from
the entry of the order or judgment by the court commissioner as
provided in RCW 2.24.050. In any judicial district having a family law
commissioner appointed pursuant to chapter 26.12 RCW, the family law
commissioner shall have the power, authority, and jurisdiction,
concurrent with a juvenile court judge, to hear cases under Title 13
RCW and chapter 28A.225 RCW as provided in RCW 26.12.010, and to enter
judgment and make orders with the same power, force, and effect as any
judge of the juvenile court, subject to motion or demand by any party
within ten days from the entry of the order or judgment by the court
commissioner as provided in RCW 2.24.050.
(2))) Cases in the ((juvenile)) family court shall be tried without
a jury.

Sec. 8 RCW 13.04.030 and 2005 c 290 s 1 and 2005 c 238 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this section, the ((juvenile)) family
courts in this state shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over
all proceedings:
(a) Under the interstate compact on placement of children as
provided in chapter 26.34 RCW;
(b) Relating to children alleged or found to be dependent as
provided in chapter 26.44 RCW and in RCW 13.34.030 through
((13.34.170)) 13.34.161;
(c) Relating to the termination of a parent and child relationship
as provided in RCW 13.34.180 through 13.34.210;
(d) To approve or disapprove out-of-home placement as provided in
RCW 13.32A.170;
(e) Relating to juveniles alleged or found to have committed
offenses, traffic or civil infractions, or violations as provided in
RCW 13.40.020 through 13.40.230, unless:
(i) The ((juvenile)) family court transfers jurisdiction of a
particular juvenile to adult criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110;
(ii) The statute of limitations applicable to adult prosecution for
the offense, traffic or civil infraction, or violation has expired;
(iii) The alleged offense or infraction is a traffic, fish,
boating, or game offense, or traffic or civil infraction committed by
a juvenile sixteen years of age or older and would, if committed by an
adult, be tried or heard in a court of limited jurisdiction, in which
instance the appropriate court of limited jurisdiction shall have
jurisdiction over the alleged offense or infraction, and no guardian ad
litem is required in any such proceeding due to the juvenile's age:
PROVIDED, That if such an alleged offense or infraction and an alleged
offense or infraction subject to ((juvenile)) family court jurisdiction
arise out of the same event or incident, the ((juvenile)) family court
may have jurisdiction of both matters: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
jurisdiction under this subsection does not constitute "transfer" or a
"decline" for purposes of RCW 13.40.110(1) or (e)(i) of this
subsection: PROVIDED FURTHER, That courts of limited jurisdiction
which confine juveniles for an alleged offense or infraction may place
juveniles in juvenile detention facilities under an agreement with the
officials responsible for the administration of the juvenile detention
facility in RCW 13.04.035 and 13.20.060;
(iv) The alleged offense is a traffic or civil infraction, a
violation of compulsory school attendance provisions under chapter
28A.225 RCW, or a misdemeanor, and a court of limited jurisdiction has
assumed concurrent jurisdiction over those offenses as provided in RCW
13.04.0301; or
(v) The juvenile is sixteen or seventeen years old on the date the
alleged offense is committed and the alleged offense is:
(A) A serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(B) A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 and the juvenile
has a criminal history consisting of: (I) One or more prior serious
violent offenses; (II) two or more prior violent offenses; or (III)
three or more of any combination of the following offenses: Any class
A felony, any class B felony, vehicular assault, or manslaughter in the
second degree, all of which must have been committed after the
juvenile's thirteenth birthday and prosecuted separately;
(C) Robbery in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, or drive-by shooting, committed on or after July 1, 1997;
(D) Burglary in the first degree committed on or after July 1,
1997, and the juvenile has a criminal history consisting of one or more
prior felony or misdemeanor offenses; or
(E) Any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 committed on or
after July 1, 1997, and the juvenile is alleged to have been armed with
a firearm.
(I) In such a case the adult criminal court shall have exclusive
original jurisdiction, except as provided in (e)(v)(E)(II) of this
subsection.
(II) The ((juvenile)) family court shall have exclusive
jurisdiction over the disposition of any remaining charges in any case
in which the juvenile is found not guilty in the adult criminal court
of the charge or charges for which he or she was transferred, or is
convicted in the adult criminal court of a lesser included offense that
is not also an offense listed in (e)(v) of this subsection. The
((juvenile)) family court shall enter an order extending ((juvenile))
family court jurisdiction if the juvenile has turned eighteen years of
age during the adult criminal court proceedings pursuant to RCW
13.40.300. However, once the case is returned to ((juvenile)) family
court, the court may hold a decline hearing pursuant to RCW 13.40.110
to determine whether to retain the case in ((juvenile)) family court
for the purpose of disposition or return the case to adult criminal
court for sentencing.
If the juvenile challenges the state's determination of the
juvenile's criminal history under (e)(v) of this subsection, the state
may establish the offender's criminal history by a preponderance of the
evidence. If the criminal history consists of adjudications entered
upon a plea of guilty, the state shall not bear a burden of
establishing the knowing and voluntariness of the plea;
(f) Under the interstate compact on juveniles as provided in
chapter 13.24 RCW;
(g) Relating to termination of a diversion agreement under RCW
13.40.080, including a proceeding in which the divertee has attained
eighteen years of age;
(h) Relating to court validation of a voluntary consent to an out-of-home placement under chapter 13.34 RCW, by the parent or Indian
custodian of an Indian child, except if the parent or Indian custodian
and child are residents of or domiciled within the boundaries of a
federally recognized Indian reservation over which the tribe exercises
exclusive jurisdiction;
(i) Relating to petitions to compel disclosure of information filed
by the department of social and health services pursuant to RCW
74.13.042; and
(j) Relating to judicial determinations and permanency planning
hearings involving ((developmentally disabled)) children with
developmental disabilities who have been placed in out-of-home care
pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement between the child's parent,
guardian, or legal custodian and the department of social and health
services.
(2) ((The family court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction
with the juvenile court over all proceedings under this section if the
superior court judges of a county authorize concurrent jurisdiction as
provided in RCW 26.12.010.
(3) The juvenile court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction
with the family court over child custody proceedings under chapter
26.10 RCW as provided for in RCW 13.34.155.
(4))) A juvenile subject to adult superior court jurisdiction under
subsection (1)(e)(i) through (v) of this section, who is detained
pending trial, may be detained in a detention facility as defined in
RCW 13.40.020 pending sentencing or a dismissal.

Sec. 9 RCW 13.40.010 and 2004 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter shall be known and cited as the Juvenile Justice
Act of 1977.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that ((a)) family court be
the system ((capable of)) having primary responsibility for, being
accountable for, and responding to the needs of youthful offenders and
their victims, as defined by this chapter((, be established)). It is
the further intent of the legislature that youth, in turn, be held
accountable for their offenses and that communities, families, and the
((juvenile)) family courts carry out their functions consistent with
this intent. To effectuate these policies, the legislature declares
the following to be equally important purposes of this chapter:
(a) Protect the citizenry from criminal behavior;
(b) Provide for determining whether accused juveniles have
committed offenses as defined by this chapter;
(c) Make the juvenile offender accountable for his or her criminal
behavior;
(d) Provide for punishment commensurate with the age, crime, and
criminal history of the juvenile offender;
(e) Provide due process for juveniles alleged to have committed an
offense;
(f) Provide necessary treatment, supervision, and custody for
juvenile offenders;
(g) Provide for the handling of juvenile offenders by communities
whenever consistent with public safety;
(h) Provide for restitution to victims of crime;
(i) Develop effective standards and goals for the operation,
funding, and evaluation of all components of the juvenile justice
system and related services at the state and local levels;
(j) Provide for a clear policy to determine what types of offenders
shall receive punishment, treatment, or both, and to determine the
jurisdictional limitations of the courts, institutions, and community
services;
(k) Provide opportunities for victim participation in juvenile
justice process, including court hearings on juvenile offender matters,
and ensure that Article I, section 35 of the Washington state
Constitution, the victim bill of rights, is fully observed; and
(l) Encourage the parents, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile
to actively participate in the juvenile justice process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 In calendar year 2007, for use beginning in
fiscal year 2008, the Washington state institute for public policy
shall conduct a study on court-ordered services for families in the
state. The institute shall review services ordered by the court in
dependency, termination of parental rights, juvenile offender, and
juvenile status offense proceedings. The institute shall then compare
those services ordered by the court to the availability of the services
within the state, the ability of families to access the services due to
resources, transportation, or other issues, and the gaps in services
that exist between what is ordered by the court and what is available
to the families. The institute shall provide a report on its findings
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The code reviser shall prepare a bill for
introduction in the 2008 legislative session that incorporates any
section enacted or affected by the 2007 legislative session that does
not take cognizance of the reorganization adopted by this act, and that
corrects any cross-references changed by this act. The bill shall also
change references to "juvenile court" in the Revised Code of Washington
to "family court" as necessary and appropriate to give full effect to
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 2 and 4 through 9 of this act take
effect July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 26.12.020 (Designation of judge -- Number of sessions) and
1949 c 50 s 2;
(2) RCW 26.12.060 (Court commissioners -- Duties) and 1999 c 397 s 7,
1993 c 289 s 3, 1991 c 367 s 12, 1988 c 232 s 4, & 1949 c 50 s 6;
(3) RCW 26.12.800 (Family court pilot program -- Legislative
recognition) and 1999 c 397 s 1;
(4) RCW 26.12.802 (Family court pilot program -- Created) and 2005 c
282 s 31 & 1999 c 397 s 2; and
(5) RCW 26.12.804 (Family court pilot program -- Rules) and 2005 c
282 s 32 & 1999 c 397 s 3.

--- END ---