BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, counties and cities shall include the best available science
in developing policies and development regulations to protect the
functions and values of critical areas. In addition, counties and
cities shall give special consideration to conservation or protection
measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous fisheries.
(2) The requirement to include best available science under
subsection (1) of this section is satisfied if buffers in a critical
area ordinance are within the range of buffers previously adopted and
established by any local government based on best available science for
the same category or type of critical area.
(3) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.

--- END ---