BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 60.28.051 and 1992 c 223 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon completion of a contract, the state, county, or other
municipal officer charged with the duty of disbursing or authorizing
disbursement or payment of such contracts shall forthwith notify the
department of revenue of the completion of contracts over ((twenty))
thirty-five thousand dollars. Such officer shall not make any payment
from the retained percentage fund or release any retained percentage
escrow account to any person, until he or she has received from the
department of revenue a certificate that all taxes, increases, and
penalties due from the contractor, and all taxes due and to become due
with respect to such contract have been paid in full or that they are,
in the department's opinion, readily collectible without recourse to
the state's lien on the retained percentage.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.08.010 and 1989 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any board, council, commission, trustees, or body acting
for the state or any county or municipality or any public body shall
contract with any person or corporation to do any work for the state,
county, or municipality, or other public body, city, town, or district,
such board, council, commission, trustees, or body shall require the
person or persons with whom such contract is made to make, execute, and
deliver to such board, council, commission, trustees, or body a good
and sufficient bond, with a surety company as surety, conditioned that
such person or persons shall faithfully perform all the provisions of
such contract and pay all laborers, mechanics, and subcontractors and
materialmen, and all persons who supply such person or persons, or
subcontractors, with provisions and supplies for the carrying on of
such work, which bond in cases of cities and towns shall be filed with
the clerk or comptroller thereof, and any person or persons performing
such services or furnishing material to any subcontractor shall have
the same right under the provisions of such bond as if such work,
services, or material was furnished to the original contractor:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the provisions of RCW 39.08.010 through
39.08.030 shall not apply to any money loaned or advanced to any such
contractor, subcontractor or other person in the performance of any
such work: PROVIDED FURTHER, That on contracts of ((twenty-five))
thirty-five thousand dollars or less, at the option of the contractor
the respective public entity may, in lieu of the bond, retain fifty
percent of the contract amount for a period of thirty days after date
of final acceptance, or until receipt of all necessary releases from
the department of revenue and the department of labor and industries
and settlement of any liens filed under chapter 60.28 RCW, whichever is
later: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for contracts of one hundred thousand
dollars or less, the public entity may accept a full payment and
performance bond from an individual surety or sureties: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the surety must agree to be bound by the laws of the
state of Washington and subjected to the jurisdiction of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.12.040 and 1991 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before
payment is made by or on behalf of the state, or any county,
municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, of any sum
or sums due on account of a public works contract, it shall be the duty
of the officer or person charged with the custody and disbursement of
public funds to require the contractor and each and every subcontractor
from the contractor or a subcontractor to submit to such officer a
"Statement of Intent to Pay Prevailing Wages". For a contract in
excess of ten thousand dollars, the statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages shall include:
(a) The contractor's registration certificate number; and
(b) The prevailing rate of wage for each classification of workers
entitled to prevailing wages under RCW 39.12.020 and the estimated
number of workers in each classification.
Each statement of intent to pay prevailing wages must be approved
by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries before it is submitted to said officer. Unless otherwise
authorized by the department of labor and industries, each voucher
claim submitted by a contractor for payment on a project estimate shall
state that the prevailing wages have been paid in accordance with the
prefiled statement or statements of intent to pay prevailing wages on
file with the public agency. Following the final acceptance of a
public works project, it shall be the duty of the officer charged with
the disbursement of public funds, to require the contractor and each
and every subcontractor from the contractor or a subcontractor to
submit to such officer an "Affidavit of Wages Paid" before the funds
retained according to the provisions of RCW 60.28.010 are released to
the contractor. Each affidavit of wages paid must be certified by the
industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries
before it is submitted to said officer.
(2) As an alternate to the procedures provided for in subsection
(1) of this section, for public works projects of two thousand five
hundred dollars or less and for projects where the limited public works
process under RCW 39.04.155(3) is followed:
(a) An awarding agency may authorize the contractor or
subcontractor to submit the statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
directly to the officer or person charged with the custody or
disbursement of public funds in the awarding agency without approval by
the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries.
The awarding agency shall retain such statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages for a period of not less than three years.
(b) Upon final acceptance of the public works project, the awarding
agency shall require the contractor or subcontractor to submit an
affidavit of wages paid. Upon receipt of the affidavit of wages paid,
the awarding agency may pay the contractor or subcontractor in full,
including funds that would otherwise be retained according to the
provisions of RCW 60.28.010. Within thirty days of receipt of the
affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency shall submit the affidavit
of wages paid to the industrial statistician of the department of labor
and industries for approval.
(c) A statement of intent to pay prevailing wages and an affidavit
of wages paid shall be on forms approved by the department of labor and
industries.
(d) In the event of a wage claim and a finding for the claimant by
the department of labor and industries where the awarding agency has
used the alternative process provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, the awarding agency shall pay the wages due directly to the
claimant. If the contractor or subcontractor did not pay the wages
stated in the affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency may take
action at law to seek reimbursement from the contractor or
subcontractor of wages paid to the claimant, and may prohibit the
contractor or subcontractor from bidding on any public works contract
of the awarding agency for up to one year.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to allow an
awarding agency to subdivide any public works project of more than two
thousand five hundred dollars for the purpose of circumventing the
procedures required by RCW 39.12.040(1).

--- END ---