BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.310 and 1991 c 220 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the tenant defaults in the payment of rent and reasonably
indicates by words or actions the intention not to resume tenancy, the
tenant shall be liable for the following for such abandonment:
PROVIDED, That upon learning of such abandonment of the premises the
landlord shall make a reasonable effort to mitigate the damages
resulting from such abandonment:
(1) When the tenancy is month-to-month, the tenant shall be liable
for the rent for the thirty days following either the date the landlord
learns of the abandonment, or the date the next regular rental payment
would have become due, whichever first occurs.
(2) When the tenancy is for a term greater than month-to-month, the
tenant shall be liable for the lesser of the following:
(a) The entire rent due for the remainder of the term; or
(b) All rent accrued during the period reasonably necessary to
rerent the premises at a fair rental, plus the difference between such
fair rental and the rent agreed to in the prior agreement, plus actual
costs incurred by the landlord in rerenting the premises together with
statutory court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
In the event of such abandonment of tenancy and an accompanying
default in the payment of rent by the tenant, the landlord may
immediately enter and take possession of any property of the tenant
found on the premises and may store the same in any reasonably secure
place. A landlord shall make reasonable efforts to provide the tenant
with a notice containing the name and address of the landlord and the
place where the property is stored and informing the tenant that a sale
or disposition of the property shall take place pursuant to this
section, and the date of the sale or disposal, and further informing
the tenant of the right under RCW 59.18.230 to have the property
returned prior to its sale or disposal. The landlord's efforts at
notice under this subsection shall be satisfied by the mailing by first
class mail, postage prepaid, of such notice to the tenant's last known
address and to any other address provided in writing by the tenant or
actually known to the landlord where the tenant might receive the
notice. The landlord shall return the property to the tenant after the
tenant has paid the actual or reasonable drayage and storage costs
whichever is less if the tenant makes a written request for the return
of the property before the landlord has sold or disposed of the
property. After forty-five days from the date the notice of such sale
or disposal is mailed or personally delivered to the tenant, the
landlord may sell or dispose of such property, including personal
papers, family pictures, and keepsakes. The landlord may apply any
income derived therefrom against moneys due the landlord, including
actual or reasonable costs whichever is less of drayage and storage of
the property. If the property has a cumulative value of one hundred
fifty dollars or less, the landlord may sell or dispose of the property
in the manner provided in this section, except for personal papers,
family pictures, and keepsakes, after seven days from the date the
notice of sale or disposal is mailed or personally delivered to the
tenant: PROVIDED, That the landlord shall make reasonable efforts, as
defined in this section, to notify the tenant. Any excess income
derived from the sale of such property under this section shall be held
by the landlord for the benefit of the tenant for a period of one year
from the date of sale, and if no claim is made or action commenced by
the tenant for the recovery thereof prior to the expiration of that
period of time, the balance shall be the property of the landlord,
including any interest paid on the income.

--- END ---