BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that after passage of
a constitutional amendment (House Joint Resolution No. 4215 or Senate
Joint Resolution No. 8220), the state investment board will be
permitted in accordance with RCW 43.33A.140 to invest a portion of the
higher education permanent funds in equities. The legislature further
recognizes that by investing in equities, the value of the higher
education permanent funds may fluctuate over time due to market changes
even if no disposition of the fund principal is made. The removal of
the word "irreducible" in this act, describing the higher education
permanent funds, is needed to clarify that the mere reduction in market
value of a permanent fund due to such fluctuations would not violate
the mandate of the statute. It is the intent of the legislature to
clarify state law to permit equity investment of higher education
permanent funds even if there is a decline in the value of a permanent
fund due to market changes. It is not the intent of the legislature to
change the requirement that unless otherwise allowed by law the
principal amounts in the higher education permanent funds are to be
held in perpetuity for the benefit of the designated institutions and
future generations, and that only the earnings from a higher education
permanent fund may be appropriated to support the benefited
institution.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.42.070 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 9 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) On or after the effective date of this act, the treasurer shall
compute general state revenues for the three fiscal years immediately
preceding such date and shall determine the arithmetic mean thereof.
As soon as is practicable after the close of each fiscal year
thereafter, he or she shall do likewise. In determining the amount of
general state revenues, the treasurer shall include all state money
received in the treasury from each and every source whatsoever except:
(a) Fees and revenues derived from the ownership or operation of any
undertaking, facility or project; (b) moneys received as gifts, grants,
donations, aid or assistance or otherwise from the United States or any
department, bureau or corporation thereof, or any person, firm or
corporation, public or private, when the terms and conditions of such
gift, grant, donation, aid or assistance require the application and
disbursement of such moneys otherwise than for the general purposes of
the state of Washington; (c) moneys to be paid into and received from
retirement system funds, and performance bonds and deposits; (d) moneys
to be paid into and received from trust funds including but not limited
to moneys received from taxes levied for specific purposes and the
several permanent ((and irreducible)) funds of the state and the moneys
derived therefrom but excluding bond redemption funds; (e) proceeds
received from the sale of bonds or other evidences of indebtedness.
Upon computing general state revenues, the treasurer shall make and
file in the office of the secretary of state, a certificate containing
the results of such computations. Copies of said certificate shall be
sent to each elected official of the state and each member of the
legislature. The treasurer shall, at the same time, advise each
elected official and each member of the legislature of the current
available debt capacity of the state, and may make estimated
projections for one or more years concerning debt capacity.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, general state revenues shall also
include revenues that are deposited in the general fund under RCW
82.45.180(2), lottery revenues as provided in RCW 67.70.240(3),
revenues paid into the general fund under RCW 84.52.067, and revenues
deposited into the student achievement fund and distributed to school
districts as provided in RCW 84.52.068.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.42.090 and 1985 c 57 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state finance committee may issue certificates of indebtedness
in such sum or sums that may be necessary to meet temporary
deficiencies of the treasury. Such certificates may be issued only to
provide for the appropriations already made by the legislature and such
certificates must be retired and the debt discharged other than by
refunding within twelve months after the date of issuance.
For the purposes of this section, the state treasury shall include
all statutorily established funds and accounts except for any of the
permanent ((irreducible)) funds of the state treasury.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.33A.150 and 1989 c 179 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state investment board shall prepare written reports at
least quarterly summarizing the investment activities of the state
investment board, which reports shall be sent to the governor, the
senate ways and means committee, the house appropriations committee,
the department of retirement systems, and other agencies having a
direct financial interest in the investment of funds by the board, and
to other persons on written request. The state investment board shall
provide information to the department of retirement systems necessary
for the preparation of monthly reports.
(2) At least annually, the board shall report on the board's
investment activities for the department of labor and industries'
accident, medical aid, and reserve funds to the senate financial
institutions and insurance committee, the senate economic development
and labor committee, and the house commerce and labor committee, or
appropriate successor committees.
(3) At least annually, the board shall report on the board's
investment activities for the higher education permanent funds to the
house capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.79.010 and 1965 c 8 s 43.79.010 are each amended to
read as follows:
All moneys paid into the state treasury, except moneys received
from taxes levied for specific purposes, and the several permanent
((and irreducible)) funds of the state and the moneys derived
therefrom, shall be paid into the general fund of the state.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.79.060 and 1965 c 8 s 43.79.060 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be in the state treasury a permanent ((and
irreducible)) fund known as the "state university permanent fund," into
which shall be paid all moneys derived from the sale of lands granted,
held, or devoted to state university purposes.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.79.110 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 96 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be in the state treasury a permanent ((and
irreducible)) fund known as the "scientific permanent fund," into which
shall be paid all moneys derived from the sale of lands set apart by
the enabling act or otherwise for a scientific school. The income
derived from investments pursuant to RCW 43.84.080 and 43.33A.140 shall
be credited to the Washington State University building account less
the applicable allocations to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 or to the state investment board expense
account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.79.130 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 94 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be in the state treasury a permanent ((and
irreducible)) fund known as the "agricultural permanent fund," into
which shall be paid all moneys derived from the sale of lands set apart
by the enabling act or otherwise for an agricultural college. The
income derived from investments pursuant to RCW 43.84.080 and
43.33A.140 shall be credited to the Washington State University
building account less the applicable allocations to the state
treasurer's service ((account [fund])) fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190
or to the state investment board expense account pursuant to RCW
43.33A.160.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.79.160 and 1965 c 8 s 43.79.160 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be in the state treasury a permanent ((and
irreducible)) fund known as the "normal school permanent fund," into
which shall be paid all moneys derived from the sale of lands set apart
by the enabling act or otherwise for state normal schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect if the proposed
amendment to Article XVI of the state Constitution regarding investment
of certain state moneys is validly submitted to and is approved and
ratified by the voters at the next general election. If the proposed
amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void in its
entirety.

--- END ---