BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47.100 and 2004 c 192 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A managed health care system participating in the plan shall do
so by contract with the administrator and shall provide, directly or by
contract with other health care providers, covered basic health care
services to each enrollee covered by its contract with the
administrator as long as payments from the administrator on behalf of
the enrollee are current. A participating managed health care system
may offer, without additional cost, health care benefits or services
not included in the schedule of covered services under the plan. A
participating managed health care system shall not give preference in
enrollment to enrollees who accept such additional health care benefits
or services. Managed health care systems participating in the plan
shall not discriminate against any potential or current enrollee based
upon health status, sex, race, ethnicity, or religion. The
administrator may receive and act upon complaints from enrollees
regarding failure to provide covered services or efforts to obtain
payment, other than authorized copayments, for covered services
directly from enrollees, but nothing in this chapter empowers the
administrator to impose any sanctions under Title 18 RCW or any other
professional or facility licensing statute.
(2) The plan shall allow, at least annually, an opportunity for
enrollees to transfer their enrollments among participating managed
health care systems serving their respective areas. The administrator
shall establish a period of at least twenty days in a given year when
this opportunity is afforded enrollees, and in those areas served by
more than one participating managed health care system the
administrator shall endeavor to establish a uniform period for such
opportunity. The plan shall allow enrollees to transfer their
enrollment to another participating managed health care system at any
time upon a showing of good cause for the transfer.
(3) Prior to negotiating with any managed health care system, the
administrator shall determine, on an actuarially sound basis, the
reasonable cost of providing the schedule of basic health care
services, expressed in terms of upper and lower limits, and recognizing
variations in the cost of providing the services through the various
systems and in different areas of the state.
(4) In negotiating with managed health care systems for
participation in the plan, the administrator shall adopt a uniform
procedure that includes at least the following:
(a) The administrator shall issue a request for proposals,
including standards regarding the quality of services to be provided;
financial integrity of the responding systems; and responsiveness to
the unmet health care needs of the local communities or populations
that may be served;
(b) The administrator shall then review responsive proposals and
may negotiate with respondents to the extent necessary to refine any
proposals;
(c) The administrator may then select one or more systems to
provide the covered services within a local area; and
(d) The administrator may adopt a policy that gives preference to
respondents, such as nonprofit community health clinics, that have a
history of providing quality health care services to low-income
persons.
(5) The administrator may contract with a managed health care
system to provide covered basic health care services to subsidized
enrollees, nonsubsidized enrollees, health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees, or any combination thereof.
(6) For services rendered to basic health plan enrollees, the
administrator shall issue contracts that require managed health care
systems to reimburse health care providers in an amount equal to eighty
percent of the payment rates for the same medical services provided to
state employees through self-insured programs implemented by the
authority under RCW 41.05.140. For services rendered to subsidized
enrollees who are children or women receiving maternity services
through the basic health plan, the administrator shall issue contracts
that require managed health care systems to reimburse health care
providers in an amount equal to the payment rates paid for the same
medical services provided to state employees through self-insured
programs implemented by the authority under RCW 41.05.140.
(7) The administrator may establish procedures and policies to
further negotiate and contract with managed health care systems
following completion of the request for proposal process in subsection
(4) of this section, upon a determination by the administrator that it
is necessary to provide access, as defined in the request for proposal
documents, to covered basic health care services for enrollees.
(((7))) (8)(a) The administrator shall implement a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees, as provided under RCW 41.05.140, if one of the following
conditions is met:
(i) The authority determines that no managed health care system
other than the authority is willing and able to provide access, as
defined in the request for proposal documents, to covered basic health
care services for all subsidized enrollees in an area; or
(ii) The authority determines that no other managed health care
system is willing to provide access, as defined in the request for
proposal documents, for one hundred thirty-three percent of the
statewide benchmark price or less, and the authority is able to offer
such coverage at a price that is less than the lowest price at which
any other managed health care system is willing to provide such access
in an area.
(b) The authority shall initiate steps to provide the coverage
described in (a) of this subsection within ninety days of making its
determination that the conditions for providing a self-funded or self-insured method of providing insurance have been met.
(c) The administrator may not implement a self-funded or self-insured method of providing insurance in an area unless the
administrator has received a certification from a member of the
American academy of actuaries that the funding available in the basic
health plan self-insurance reserve account is sufficient for the self-funded or self-insured risk assumed, or expected to be assumed, by the
administrator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish physician-related payment rates
for services provided by health care providers for services to clients,
age nineteen and older who are eligible for medical programs in this
chapter, to be an amount equal to eighty percent of the payment rates
for the same services provided to state employees through self-insured
programs implemented by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.140,
except that maternity services shall be an amount equal to one hundred
percent of the payment rate for maternity services under RCW 41.05.140.
(2) The department shall establish physician-related payment rates
for services provided by health care providers for services to clients,
under age nineteen who are eligible for medical programs in this
chapter, to be an amount equal to one hundred percent of the payment
rates for the same services provided to state employees through self-insured programs implemented by the health care authority under RCW
41.05.140.
(3) The department shall issue contracts authorized under RCW
74.09.522 that require managed care systems' contractors to pay health
care providers for services rendered to department clients enrolled in
the contracted managed care system at no less than the physician-related payment rates set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.

--- END ---