BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
imposed by RCW 82.04.290(2) amounts received by physicians or clinics
for chemotherapy and anticancer drugs for infusion or injection by
licensed physicians for human use pursuant to a prescription, but only
if the amounts are separately stated on invoices or other billing
statements and do not exceed the then current federal rate. The
federal rate means the rate at or below which the federal government or
its agents reimburse providers for prescription drugs administered to
cancer patients as provided for in the medicare, part B, drugs average
sales price information resource as published by the United States
department of health and human services, or any successor index
thereto.

--- END ---