BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that incidents of
aircraft coming in contact with wildlife is the second leading cause of
death in the aviation industry. Interactions between aircraft and
wildlife can occur both with birds in the air and with large mammals on
the runways. The legislature further finds that most airport operators
employ or consult with trained wildlife management professionals to aid
in minimizing the safety risks posed by wildlife. Therefore, the
legislature concludes, given the risk to public safety created when
aircraft and wildlife come into contact and the level of professional
wildlife management utilized by airport operators, that airport
operators should have the management tools necessary for protecting
public safety readily available.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.240 and 1989 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may authorize the removal or killing of wildlife:
(a) That is destroying or injuring property((, or));
(b) That is posing a threat to human health or safety at public
airports, as the term "airport" is defined in RCW 47.68.020; or
(c) When it is necessary for wildlife management or research.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
director shall authorize operators of public airports, as the term
"airport" is defined in RCW 47.68.020, to remove or kill wildlife that
is posing a threat to human health or safety either on the grounds of
a public airport or in the immediate vicinity of the airport. Wildlife
removed or killed in the immediate vicinity of an airport must be
posing a threat to aircraft taking off or landing at the airport before
it can be removed or killed.
(b) The operator of a public airport, when acting under the
authority granted by the director under this section, may take or kill
wildlife in any manner without the permits or licenses required by the
department under RCW 77.32.010 or chapter 77.32 RCW.
(c) The authority granted by the director to an airport operator
under this section extends to employees of the federal government
invited by the airport operator to control wildlife or otherwise engage
in wildlife management at the airport or in the immediate vicinity of
the airport.
(d) Nothing in this section authorizes airport operators or federal
employees invited to manage wildlife at airports to take or kill
species listed as threatened or endangered by the commission under RCW
77.12.020.
(e) No part of wildlife taken or killed at public airports under
the authority granted by the director under this section may be sold,
traded, bartered, or exchanged in any manner and must be disposed of in
a timely manner by the operator of the airport.
(f) The director may require airport operators to request the
authority to remove or kill wildlife under this section before removal
actions are allowed and may require airport operators to submit to the
department a summary of the individual animals taken or killed under
this section.
(3) Except for wildlife taken or killed by an airport operator
under this section, the director or other employees of the department
shall dispose of wildlife taken or possessed by ((them)) the department
under this title in the manner determined by the director to be in the
best interest of the state. Proceeds from any sales shall be deposited
in the state treasury to be credited to the state wildlife ((fund))
account created in RCW 77.12.170.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.32.010 and 2006 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this ((chapter)) title, a
recreational license issued by the director is required to hunt for or
take wild animals or wild birds, fish for, take, or harvest fish,
shellfish, and seaweed. A recreational fishing or shellfish license is
not required for carp, smelt, and crawfish, and a hunting license is
not required for bullfrogs.
(2) A permit issued by the department is required to park a motor
vehicle upon improved department access facilities.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.15.194 and 2003 c 53 s 374 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful to use or authorize the use of any steel-jawed
leghold trap, neck snare, or other body-gripping trap to capture any
mammal for recreation or commerce in fur.
(2) It is unlawful to knowingly buy, sell, barter, or otherwise
exchange, or offer to buy, sell, barter, or otherwise exchange the raw
fur of a mammal or a mammal that has been trapped in this state with a
steel-jawed leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap, whether or
not pursuant to permit.
(3) Except for the operators of public airports when acting under
the authority to protect public health or safety provided in RCW
77.12.240, it is unlawful to use or authorize the use of any steel-jawed leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap to capture any
animal, except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the use of a Conibear trap in
water, a padded leghold trap, or a nonstrangling type foot snare with
a special permit granted by the director under (a) through (d) of this
subsection. Issuance of the special permits shall be governed by rules
adopted by the department and in accordance with the requirements of
this section. Every person granted a special permit to use a trap or
device listed in this subsection shall check the trap or device at
least every twenty-four hours.
(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the director, in consultation
with the department of social and health services or the United States
department of health and human services from granting a permit to use
traps listed in this subsection for the purpose of protecting people
from threats to their health and safety.
(b) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to use traps listed in this subsection to a person who
applies for such a permit in writing, and who establishes that there
exists on a property an animal problem that has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by the use of nonlethal control tools, including but
not limited to guard animals, electric fencing, or box and cage traps,
or if such nonlethal means cannot be reasonably applied. Upon making
a finding in writing that the animal problem has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by nonlethal control tools or if the tools cannot be
reasonably applied, the director may authorize the use, setting,
placing, or maintenance of the traps for a period not to exceed thirty
days.
(c) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to department employees or agents to use traps listed in
this subsection where the use of the traps is the only practical means
of protecting threatened or endangered species as designated under RCW
77.08.010.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from issuing a
permit to use traps listed in this subsection, excluding Conibear
traps, for the conduct of legitimate wildlife research.
(5) Nothing in this section prohibits the United States fish and
wildlife service, its employees or agents, from using a trap listed in
subsection (4) of this section where the fish and wildlife service
determines, in consultation with the director, that the use of such
traps is necessary to protect species listed as threatened or
endangered under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec.
1531 et seq.).
(6) A person violating this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Nothing in this act creates a cause of
action or civil liability against the state or an airport operator for
failing to protect the public health or safety at or in the vicinity of
airports.

--- END ---