BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.006 and 1992 c 222 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The term "registration year" for the purposes of chapters
46.16, 82.44, and 82.50 RCW means the effective period of a vehicle
license issued by the department. Such year commences at 12:01 a.m. on
the date of the calendar year designated by the department and ends at
12:01 a.m. on the same date of the next succeeding calendar year.
(a) If a vehicle license previously issued in this state has
expired and is renewed with a different registered owner, a new
registration year is deemed to commence upon the date the expired
license is renewed in order that the renewed license be useable for a
full twelve-month period.
(b) A new registration year is deemed to commence upon the date the
expired license is renewed in order that the renewed license be useable
for a full twelve months when the registered owner:
(i) Is a member of the United States armed forces;
(ii) Was stationed outside of Washington under military orders
during the prior vehicle registration year; and
(iii) Provides the department a copy of the military orders.
(2) Each registration year may be divided into twelve registration
months. Each registration month commences on the day numerically
corresponding to the day of the calendar month on which the
registration year begins, and terminates on the numerically
corresponding day of the next succeeding calendar month.
(3) Where the term "last day of the month" is used in chapters
46.16, 82.44, and 82.50 RCW in lieu of a specified day of any calendar
month it means the last day of such calendar month or months
irrespective of the numerical designation of that day.
(4) If the final day of a registration year or month falls on a
Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, such period extends through the end
of the next business day.

--- END ---