BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.149.040 and 2004 c 203 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall:
(1) Design a program, consistent with section 2 of this act, for
providing pollution liability insurance for heating oil tanks that
provides up to sixty thousand dollars per occurrence coverage and
aggregate limits, and protects the state of Washington from unwanted or
unanticipated liability for accidental release claims;
(2) Administer, implement, and enforce the provisions of this
chapter. To assist in administration of the program, the director is
authorized to appoint up to two employees who are exempt from the civil
service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, and who shall serve at the pleasure of
the director;
(3) Administer the heating oil pollution liability trust account,
as established under RCW 70.149.070;
(4) Employ and discharge, at his or her discretion, agents,
attorneys, consultants, companies, organizations, and employees as
deemed necessary, and to prescribe their duties and powers, and fix
their compensation;
(5) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the provisions of this chapter;
(6) Design and from time to time revise a reinsurance contract
providing coverage to an insurer or insurers meeting the requirements
of this chapter. The director is authorized to provide reinsurance
through the pollution liability insurance program trust account;
(7) Solicit bids from insurers and select an insurer to provide
pollution liability insurance for third-party bodily injury and
property damage, and corrective action to owners and operators of
heating oil tanks;
(8) Register, and design a means of accounting for, operating
heating oil tanks;
(9) Implement a program to provide advice and technical assistance
to owners and operators of active and abandoned heating oil tanks if
contamination from an active or abandoned heating oil tank is
suspected. Advice and assistance regarding administrative and
technical requirements may include observation of testing or site
assessment and review of the results of reports. If the director finds
that contamination is not present or that the contamination is
apparently minor and not a threat to human health or the environment,
the director may provide written opinions and conclusions on the
results of the investigation to owners and operators of active and
abandoned heating oil tanks. The agency is authorized to collect, from
persons requesting advice and assistance, the costs incurred by the
agency in providing such advice and assistance. The costs may include
travel costs and expenses associated with review of reports and
preparation of written opinions and conclusions. Funds from cost
reimbursement must be deposited in the heating oil pollution liability
trust account. The state of Washington, the pollution liability
insurance agency, and its officers and employees are immune from all
liability, and no cause of action arises from any act or omission in
providing, or failing to provide, such advice, opinion, conclusion, or
assistance;
(10) Establish a public information program to provide information
regarding liability, technical, and environmental requirements
associated with active and abandoned heating oil tanks;
(11) Monitor agency expenditures and seek to minimize costs and
maximize benefits to ensure responsible financial stewardship;
(12) Create an advisory committee of stakeholders to advise the
director on all aspects of program operations and fees authorized by
this chapter, including pollution prevention programs. The advisory
committee must have one member each from the Pacific Northwest oil heat
council, the Washington oil marketers association, the western states
petroleum association, and the department of ecology and three members
from among the owners of home heating oil tanks registered with the
pollution liability insurance agency who are generally representative
of the geographical distribution and types of registered owners. The
committee should meet at least quarterly, or more frequently at the
discretion of the director; and
(13) Study if appropriate user fees to supplement program funding
are necessary and develop recommendations for legislation to authorize
such fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.149 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The pollution liability insurance agency shall identify design
criteria for heating oil tanks that provide superior protection against
future leaks as compared to standard steel tank designs. Any tank
designs identified under this section must either be constructed with
fiberglass or offer at least an equivalent level of protection against
leaks as a standard fiberglass design.
(2) The pollution liability insurance agency shall reimburse any
owner or operator, who is participating in the program created in this
chapter and who has experienced an occurrence or remedial action, for
the difference in price between a standard steel heating tank and a new
heating oil tank that satisfies the design standards identified under
subsection (1) of this section, if the owner or operator chooses or is
required to replace his or her tank at the time of the occurrence or
remedial action.
(3) Any new heating oil tank reimbursement provided under this
section must be funded within the amount of per occurrence coverage
provided to the owner or operator under RCW 70.149.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies prospectively and only to
individuals who file a claim with the pollution liability insurance
agency on or after the effective date of this section.

--- END ---