BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.121.020 and 1996 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established in the executive office of the governor a
Washington council for the prevention of child abuse and neglect
subject to the jurisdiction of the governor.
(2) The council shall be composed of the chairperson and
((thirteen)) fourteen other members as follows:
(a) The chairperson and six other members shall be appointed by the
governor and shall be selected for their interest and expertise in the
prevention of child abuse. A minimum of four designees by the governor
shall not be affiliated with governmental agencies. The appointments
shall be made on a geographic basis to assure statewide representation.
Members appointed by the governor shall serve for three-year terms.
Vacancies shall be filled for any unexpired term by appointment in the
same manner as the original appointments were made.
(b) The secretary of social and health services or the secretary's
designee, the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee, the director of the department of early
learning or the director's designee, and the secretary of the
department of health or the secretary's designee shall serve as voting
members of the council.
(c) In addition to the members of the council, four members of the
legislature shall serve as nonvoting, ex officio members of the
council, one from each political caucus of the house of representatives
to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one
from each political caucus of the senate to be appointed by the
president of the senate.

--- END ---