BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of labor and industries
shall conduct a study of the incidence of total permanent disability
pensions in the state's workers' compensation system. The department
shall contract with an independent researcher approved by the labor and
business members of the workers' compensation advisory committee. The
independent researcher must have demonstrated expertise in workers'
compensation systems. The department shall consult with the workers'
compensation advisory committee in determining the criteria to use in
selecting a researcher and in selecting the researcher with which to
contract.
(2) In conducting the study under subsection (1) of this section,
the researcher selected shall consider the following:
(a) Causes of the recent increase in total permanent disability
cases, including changes in injured worker demographics, policy, and
other areas that may be identified;
(b) Future anticipated total permanent disability trends;
(c) A comparison of Washington's permanent disability claims
experience and injured workers with other states and jurisdictions;
(d) The impact of the standard for finding workers employable on
the incidence of permanent total disability pensions; and
(e) The impact of vocational rehabilitation under RCW 51.32.095,
and any improvements to vocational rehabilitation, on the incidence of
permanent total disability pensions.
(3) The department shall report to the workers' compensation
advisory committee on the results of the study on or before July 1,
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---