BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.101.080 and 2005 c 157 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The moneys under RCW 10.101.050 shall be distributed to each city
determined to be eligible under this section by the office of public
defense. Ten percent of the funding appropriated shall be designated
as "city moneys" and distributed as follows:
(1) The office of public defense shall administer a grant program
to select the cities eligible to receive city moneys. Incorporated
cities may apply for grants. Applying cities must conform to the
requirements of RCW 10.101.050 and 10.101.060.
(2) City moneys shall be ((divided among a maximum of five applying
cities and shall be)) distributed in a timely manner to accomplish the
goals of the grants.
(3) Criteria for award of grants shall be established by the office
of public defense after soliciting input from the association of
Washington cities. Award of the grants shall be determined by the
office of public defense.

--- END ---