BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.130 and 1998 c 276 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each tenant shall pay the rental amount at such times and in such
amounts as provided for in the rental agreement or as otherwise
provided by law and comply with all obligations imposed upon tenants by
applicable provisions of all municipal, county, and state codes,
statutes, ordinances, and regulations, and in addition shall:
(1) Keep that part of the premises which he or she occupies and
uses as clean and sanitary as the conditions of the premises permit;
(2) Properly dispose from his or her dwelling unit all rubbish,
garbage, and other organic or flammable waste, in a clean and sanitary
manner at reasonable and regular intervals, and assume all costs of
extermination and fumigation for infestation caused by the tenant;
(3) Properly use and operate all electrical, gas, heating, plumbing
and other fixtures and appliances supplied by the landlord;
(4) Not intentionally or negligently destroy, deface, damage,
impair, or remove any part of the structure or dwelling, with the
appurtenances thereto, including the facilities, equipment, furniture,
furnishings, and appliances, or permit any member of his or her family,
invitee, licensee, or any person acting under his or her control to do
so. Violations may be prosecuted under chapter 9A.48 RCW if the
destruction is intentional and malicious;
(5) Not permit a nuisance or common waste;
(6) Not engage in drug-related activity at the rental premises, or
allow a subtenant, sublessee, resident, or anyone else to engage in
drug-related activity at the rental premises with the knowledge or
consent of the tenant. "Drug-related activity" means that activity
which constitutes a violation of chapter 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW;
(7) Maintain the smoke detection device in accordance with the
manufacturer's recommendations, including the replacement of batteries
where required for the proper operation of the smoke detection device,
as required in RCW ((48.48.140(3))) 43.44.110;
(8) Not engage in any activity at the rental premises that is:
(a) Imminently hazardous to the physical safety of other persons on
the premises; and
(b)(i) Entails physical assaults upon another person which result
in an arrest; or
(ii) Entails the unlawful use of a firearm or other deadly weapon
as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 which results in an arrest, including
threatening another tenant or the landlord with a firearm or other
deadly weapon under RCW 59.18.352. Nothing in this subsection (8)
shall authorize the termination of tenancy and eviction of the victim
of a physical assault or the victim of the use or threatened use of a
firearm or other deadly weapon;
(9) Not engage in any gang-related activity at the premises, as
defined in RCW 59.18.030, or allow another to engage in such activity
at the premises, that renders people in at least two or more dwelling
units or residences insecure in life or the use of property or that
injures or endangers the safety or health of people in at least two or
more dwelling units or residences. In determining whether a tenant is
engaged in gang-related activity, a court should consider the totality
of the circumstances, including factors such as whether there have been
a significant number of complaints to the landlord about the tenant's
activities at the property, damages done by the tenant to the property,
including the property of other tenants or neighbors, harassment or
threats made by the tenant to other tenants or neighbors that have been
reported to law enforcement agencies, any police incident reports
involving the tenant, and the tenant's criminal history; ((and))
(10) Upon termination and vacation, restore the premises to their
initial condition except for reasonable wear and tear or conditions
caused by failure of the landlord to comply with his or her obligations
under this chapter: PROVIDED, That the tenant shall not be charged for
normal cleaning if he or she has paid a nonrefundable cleaning fee; and
(11) Not knowingly provide false, inaccurate, or misleading
information during application process for tenancy.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.12.030 and 1998 c 276 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
A tenant of real property for a term less than life is guilty of
unlawful detainer either:
(1) When he or she holds over or continues in possession, in person
or by subtenant, of the property or any part thereof after the
expiration of the term for which it is let to him or her. When real
property is leased for a specified term or period by express or implied
contract, whether written or oral, the tenancy shall be terminated
without notice at the expiration of the specified term or period;
(2) When he or she, having leased property for an indefinite time
with monthly or other periodic rent reserved, continues in possession
thereof, in person or by subtenant, after the end of any such month or
period, when the landlord, more than twenty days prior to the end of
such month or period, has served notice (in manner in RCW 59.12.040
provided) requiring him or her to quit the premises at the expiration
of such month or period;
(3) When he or she continues in possession in person or by
subtenant after a default in the payment of rent, and after notice in
writing requiring in the alternative the payment of the rent or the
surrender of the detained premises, served (in manner in RCW 59.12.040
provided) in behalf of the person entitled to the rent upon the person
owing it, has remained uncomplied with for the period of three days
after service thereof. The notice may be served at any time after the
rent becomes due;
(4) When he or she continues in possession in person or by
subtenant after a neglect or failure to keep or perform any other
condition or covenant of the lease or agreement under which the
property is held, including any covenant not to assign or sublet, than
one for the payment of rent, and after notice in writing requiring in
the alternative the performance of such condition or covenant or the
surrender of the property, served (in manner in RCW 59.12.040 provided)
upon him or her, and if there is a subtenant in actual possession of
the premises, also upon such subtenant, shall remain uncomplied with
for ten days after service thereof. Within ten days after the service
of such notice the tenant, or any subtenant in actual occupation of the
premises, or any mortgagee of the term, or other person interested in
its continuance, may perform such condition or covenant and thereby
save the lease from such forfeiture;
(5) When he or she commits or permits waste upon the demised
premises, or when he or she sets up or carries on thereon any unlawful
business, or when he or she erects, suffers, permits, or maintains on
or about the premises any nuisance, and remains in possession after the
service (in manner in RCW 59.12.040 provided) upon him or her of three
days' notice to quit;
(6) A person who, without the permission of the owner and without
having color of title thereto, enters upon land of another and who
fails or refuses to remove therefrom after three days' notice, in
writing and served upon him or her in the manner provided in RCW
59.12.040. Such person may also be subject to the criminal provisions
of chapter 9A.52 RCW; ((or))
(7) When he or she commits or permits any gang-related activity at
the premises as prohibited by RCW 59.18.130; or
(8) When the tenant continues in possession in person or by
subtenant after the landlord or owner discovered that the tenant
knowingly provided false, inaccurate, or misleading information in the
application for tenancy that induced the landlord or owner to approve
the tenancy and, within forty-five days of the discovery or before the
end of one year from the time the landlord or owner approved the
tenancy, whichever is sooner, the landlord or owner served the tenant
in the manner provided in RCW 59.12.040 with a ten-day written notice
to quit the premises.

--- END ---