BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.210.080 and 2005 c 404 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The attendance of every child at every public and private
school in the state and licensed day care center shall be conditioned
upon the presentation before or on each child's first day of attendance
at a particular school or center, of proof of either (a) full
immunization, (b) the initiation of and compliance with a schedule of
immunization, as required by rules of the state board of health, or (c)
a certificate of exemption as provided for in RCW 28A.210.090. The
attendance at the school or the day care center during any subsequent
school year of a child who has initiated a schedule of immunization
shall be conditioned upon the presentation of proof of compliance with
the schedule on the child's first day of attendance during the
subsequent school year. Once proof of full immunization or proof of
completion of an approved schedule has been presented, no further proof
shall be required as a condition to attendance at the particular school
or center.
(2)(a) Beginning with sixth grade entry, every public and private
school in the state shall provide parents and guardians with the
following information at the beginning of every school year:
(i) Information about meningococcal disease and its vaccine ((at
the beginning of every school year)); and
(ii) Information about human papillomavirus disease and its
vaccine.
(b) The information about ((meningococcal)) each disease listed in
(a) of this subsection shall include:
(i) Its causes and symptoms, how ((meningococcal)) the disease is
spread, and the places where parents and guardians may obtain
additional information and vaccinations for their children; and
(ii) Current recommendations from the United States centers for
disease control and prevention regarding the receipt of vaccines for
((meningococcal)) the disease and where the vaccination can be
received.
(((b))) (c) This subsection (2) shall not be construed to require
the department of health or the school to provide meningococcal or
human papillomavirus vaccination to students.
(((c))) (d) The department of health shall prepare the
informational materials and shall consult with the office of
superintendent of public instruction.
(((d))) (e) This subsection (2) does not create a private right of
action.

--- END ---