BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2007, the department shall convene an offender
reentry work group. The work group shall:
(a) Develop recommendations for the department regarding the
requirements for the selection of the pilot program sites under section
2 of this act;
(b) Establish the requirements, participation, duties, and
activities for the implementation of the pilot programs under section
2 of this act;
(c) Develop service models and best practices for the provision of
offender treatment, victim services, and family support services
through the pilot program to juvenile sex offenders, their victims, and
families in situations in which the offender is a member of the same
family as the victim;
(d) Establish protocols or guidelines for the implementation of the
service model, as well as outcome measures to evaluate the
effectiveness of the service model; and
(e) In 2010, review the report of the Washington state institute
for public policy required under section 3 of this act and make
recommendations to the department for any changes to the guidelines and
service model to reflect lessons learned from the pilot sites by
November 30, 2010.
(2) The work group shall, at a minimum, include representatives
from the following:
(a) The Washington coalition of sexual assault programs;
(b) The office of crime victims advocacy;
(c) The Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;
(d) An individual or an organization providing legal counsel to
juvenile sex offenders;
(e) Team child;
(f) The department of social and health services;
(g) The Washington association for the treatment of sexual abusers;
(h) The juvenile court administrators;
(i) Community sexual assault programs;
(j) The Washington association of school principals;
(k) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;
(l) The Washington association of child advocacy centers;
(m) The office of the superintendent of public instruction; and
(n) At least two representatives from agencies providing services
to underserved communities and individuals.
(3) The work group shall submit all information required under this
section, except subsection (1)(e) of this section, to the department by
June 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall conduct a
pilot program to develop best practices for the successful
reintegration of juvenile sex offenders into the family and community,
particularly when the victim and the offender are members of the same
family.
(2)(a) Pilot sites shall be selected by September 1, 2008, and
shall be established in three locations, with at least one location in
eastern Washington. The pilot program sites shall be selected through
a request for proposal process.
(b) The department shall develop criteria for selection of the
program sites based upon the recommendations of the work group created
under section 1 of this act.
(3) The pilot programs shall implement the service model,
protocols, and guidelines developed by the work group under section 1
of this act by September 1, 2008, or if the service model, protocols,
or guidelines are not developed by September 1, 2008, implementation
shall occur upon their development.
(4)(a) The department shall select three sites to act as comparison
sites for the purposes of the evaluation conducted by the Washington
state institute for public policy under section 3 of this act. The
comparison sites shall be similar to the sites chosen to be program
sites.
(b) The pilot programs shall participate in the evaluation of the
service model, protocols, and guidelines conducted by the Washington
state institute for public policy under section 3 of this act.
(5) The department shall report to the legislature by December 1,
2010, on the results of the pilot program based on the findings of the
Washington state institute for public policy evaluation of the pilot
sites and the recommendations of the work group created under section
1 of this act. The department shall include recommendations for
expansion of the program statewide if appropriate based upon the
evaluation and recommendations of the work group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In 2007, the Washington state institute for public policy shall
conduct research to identify best practices in offender treatment,
victim services, and family support in situations in which a juvenile
sex offender is a member of the same family as the victim. The
institute shall report its findings to the department no later than
November 30, 2007. The department shall submit the information
provided by the institute to the work group created in section 1 of
this act upon receipt of the information.
(2) In 2007, the Washington state institute for public policy shall
conduct an assessment of existing community responses throughout the
state to juvenile sex offenders, their victims, and families. The
assessment shall include an analysis of the structure of current
systems for adjudication, disposition, placement, and supervision of
juvenile sex offenders. The institute shall report its findings to the
department of social and health services no later than April 30, 2008.
The department shall submit the information provided by the institute
to the work group created in section 1 of this act upon receipt of the
information.
(3) In 2008, the Washington state institute for public policy shall
evaluate the three pilot programs and the three comparison sites
selected under section 2 of this act to determine the effectiveness of
the existing services to juvenile sex offenders, their victims, and
families, and the delivery system for such service. The evaluation
shall include an analysis of the current systems in each pilot program
for adjudication, disposition, placement, and supervision of juvenile
sex offenders. Additionally, the evaluation shall include interviews
with parties involved in the system including offenders, victims,
families, court personnel, and other relevant participants. The
institute shall report its findings to the department no later than
November 30, 2008. The department shall submit the information
provided by the institute to the work group created in section 1 of
this act upon receipt of the information.
(4) In 2010, the Washington state institute for public policy shall
evaluate the pilot programs selected under section 2 of this act to
determine the effectiveness and outcomes for the service models,
protocols, and guidelines implemented by the pilot programs. The
institute shall report its findings to the department and appropriate
committees of the legislature no later than October 31, 2010.

--- END ---