BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 6.13.030 and 1999 c 403 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A homestead may consist of lands, as described in RCW 6.13.010,
regardless of area, but the homestead exemption amount shall not exceed
the lesser of (1) the total net value of the lands, mobile home,
improvements, and other personal property, as described in RCW
6.13.010, or (2) the sum of ((forty)) one hundred thousand dollars in
the case of lands, mobile home, and improvements, or the sum of fifteen
thousand dollars in the case of other personal property described in
RCW 6.13.010, except where the homestead is subject to execution,
attachment, or seizure by or under any legal process whatever to
satisfy a judgment in favor of any state for failure to pay that
state's income tax on benefits received while a resident of the state
of Washington from a pension or other retirement plan, in which event
there shall be no dollar limit on the value of the exemption.

--- END ---