BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that children are more
vulnerable than adults to the hazardous effects of pesticide exposure.
The intent of this act is to protect children and staff by making it
easier for school districts to adopt child-friendly pest management
strategies. This may be accomplished in part through development and
use of an integrated pest management program that emphasizes use of
nonchemical pest control measures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By January 1, 2009, the Washington state
school directors' association, in consultation with the department of
health and the department of agriculture, shall develop a model
integrated pest management policy that emphasizes the use of
nonchemical pest control measures. The model integrated pest
management policy must be disseminated to all school districts. The
model integrated pest management policy shall, at a minimum,
incorporate the "IPM Standards for Schools: Tactics and Resources for
Reducing Pest and Pesticide Risks in Schools and Other Sensitive
Environments" as published by the IPM institute of North America, inc.
as of the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By September 1, 2009, each school district
shall have adopted an integrated pest management policy and begin
implementation of an integrated pest management program that is based
on the model integrated pest management policy developed under section
2 of this act. Each school district may phase in implementation of its
integrated pest management program. However, each school district
shall obtain the IPM STAR certification pursuant to the "IPM Standards
for Schools: Tactics and Resources for Reducing Pest and Pesticide
Risks in Schools and Other Sensitive Environments" by September 1,
2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Any appropriation for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund for the purposes of
providing technical assistance to each school district regarding
implementation of each school district's integrated pest management
program shall go to the Washington State University urban integrated
pest management program.
(2) If Washington State University is provided funding under
subsection (1) of this section, Washington State University must
prepare an annual report to the legislature for each year during which
Washington State University has received funding regarding the
technical assistance it has provided to school districts. The report
must include, but is not limited to, information on:
(a) The districts that have received technical assistance;
(b) The nature and extent of the assistance;
(c) Each district's progress on obtaining IPM STAR certification;
and
(d) The amount and nature of costs incurred by Washington State
University in providing technical assistance to school districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 28A.345 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---