BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Research demonstrates the critical role that registered nurses
play in improving patient safety and quality of care;
(b) Greater numbers of registered nurses available to care for
hospitalized patients are key to reducing errors, complications, and
adverse patient care events;
(c) Higher nurse staffing levels result in improved staff safety
and satisfaction and reduced incidences of workplace injuries;
(d) Health care professional, technical, and support staff comprise
vital components of the patient care team, bringing their particular
skills and services to ensuring quality patient care; and
(e) Addressing nurse staffing issues to meet patient care needs is
an urgent public policy priority.
(2) Therefore, in order to protect patients and to support greater
retention of registered nurses, to promote evidence-based nurse
staffing, and to increase transparency of health care data and decision
making, the legislature intends to establish a program for the
development of evidence-based hospital staffing plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Central nursing resource center" means the center established
in RCW 18.79.202.
(b) "Hospital" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.41.020,
except that "hospital" also includes the state hospitals as defined in
RCW 72.23.010 and the psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter
71.12 RCW.
(c) "Intensity" means the level of patient needs in terms of
nursing care as determined by a registered nurse providing direct
patient care, taking into account at least the following factors:
(i) Severity and urgency of the patient's condition;
(ii) Complexity of either planning or providing, or both, the care
required by the patient;
(iii) Scheduled or anticipated procedures or events, including
those that necessitate increased frequency of assessment or
intervention;
(iv) Age and cognitive and functional ability of the patient,
including ability to perform self-care activities;
(v) Availability of patient social supports including
institutional, family, or community support;
(vi) Level of patient adherence or ability to comply with patient
care;
(vii) Patient and family educational needs, including assessment of
learning capabilities of patient and family;
(viii) Intactness of family unit, the availability of family to
provide either emotional support or functional support, or both, and
the ability of the family to participate in patient decision-making
processes;
(ix) Communications skills of the patient; and
(x) Other needs identified by the patient and by the registered
nurse.
(d) "Nursing personnel" means registered nurses, licensed practical
nurses, and unlicensed assistive nursing personnel providing direct
patient care.
(e) "Patient assignment standards" means the maximum number of
patients that a hospital may assign to a registered nurse at any one
time.
(f) "Patient care unit" means any unit or area of the hospital that
provides patient care.
(g) "Skill mix" means the numbers and relative percentages of
registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, and unlicensed assistive
personnel among the total number of nursing personnel.
(h) "Staffing committee" means the committee established by a
hospital under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) HOSPITAL STAFFING COMMITTEES. (a) By January 1, 2008, each
hospital shall establish a staffing committee. At least one-half of
the staffing committee members must be registered nurses currently
providing direct patient care, unless another ratio of registered nurse
members is required to be consistent with an applicable provision of a
collective bargaining agreement between the hospital and its nursing
staff. If registered nurses are represented by a collective bargaining
representative, the committee's direct patient care registered nurse
members must be selected by that collective bargaining representative.
(b) Participation in the staffing committee by a hospital employee
shall be considered a part of the employee's regularly scheduled
workweek.
(3) PATIENT ASSIGNMENT STANDARDS RECOMMENDATION. (a) By June 1,
2008, the central nursing resource center must forward recommendations
to the department as required in this subsection. The recommendations
must be evidence-based and must be developed by a task force convened
by the central nursing resource center. Among its members, the task
force must include representatives of organizations that represent
hospitals, including rural hospitals. The recommendations must
address:
(i) Patient assignment standards in hospitals; and
(ii) The development and implementation of hospital staffing plans,
as the secretary may request.
(b) In developing its recommendations, the task force must
consider:
(i) Current research findings regarding patient safety, outcomes of
care, nurse staffing, and related areas;
(ii) Reports and recommendations issued by authoritative national
and state bodies and agencies, including but not limited to the
institute of medicine, the joint commission, the national quality
forum, and the agency for healthcare research and quality;
(iii) Guidelines adopted or published by national nursing
professional associations, specialty nursing organizations, and other
health professional organizations;
(iv) Relevant information regarding legislation or rules on nurse
staffing considered or adopted in other states;
(v) Different levels of intensity, complexity, or need presented by
patients in different types of patient care units; and
(vi) Availability of health care professional, technical, and
support staff whose skills and services are essential to delivering
quality patient care.
(c) The department must post the recommendations forwarded by the
central nursing resource center on its web site and allow at least a
thirty-day public comment period. By July 15, 2008, the department
must publish final recommendations, to be posted on the department's
web site and provided to the hospitals.
(d) On a biennial basis, a task force convened by the central
nursing resource center pursuant to (a) of this subsection must review
the considerations listed in (b) of this subsection and determine
whether the final recommendations published under this subsection
should be updated. New recommendations, if any, developed by the task
force and forwarded to the department by the central nursing resource
center must be posted for public comment as provided in (c) of this
subsection, and the department must publish final recommendations
within forty-five days of posting the central nursing resource center's
recommendations.
(4) HOSPITAL STAFFING PLANS. (a)(i) By January 1, 2009, each
hospital's staffing committee must develop, and the hospital implement,
a staffing plan that sets the minimum number and skill mix of nursing
personnel required on each shift in each patient care unit.
(ii) In establishing staffing levels for the staffing plan, the
staffing committee must consider the patient assignment standards
recommended in the final recommendations published under subsection (3)
of this section. If the staffing plan adopts staffing levels that
provide lower staffing than the final recommendations published under
subsection (3) of this section, the staffing plan must include an
explanation of the reasons for the deviation.
(iii) Staffing plans must be based on at least the following
additional criteria for each patient care unit:
(A) Census, including total numbers of patients on each shift at
any one time and activity such as patient discharges, admissions, and
transfers;
(B) Level of intensity of all patients and nature of the care to be
delivered on each shift;
(C) Skill mix;
(D) Level of experience and specialty certification or training of
nursing personnel providing care;
(E) The need for specialized or intensive equipment;
(F) The architecture and geography of the patient care unit,
including but not limited to placement of patient rooms, treatment
areas, nursing station, medication preparation areas, and equipment;
and
(G) Staffing guidelines adopted or published by national nursing
professional associations, specialty nursing organizations, and other
health professional organizations.
(iv) Staffing plans must at a minimum:
(A) Include appropriate limits on the use of agency and traveling
nurses;
(B) Be consistent with the scopes of practice for registered nurses
and licensed practical nurses and the scope of legally permissible
duties of unlicensed assistive personnel;
(C) Include adequate staffing to allow for staff time off,
illnesses, meal and break time, and educational, health, and other
leaves;
(D) Include a process for review by the staffing committee that
ensures compliance with the staffing plan, provides for the committee's
review of incidents and staff concerns, and tracks staffing patterns,
the number of patients and the patients' conditions, and the intensity
of the patients' nursing care needs. These reviews must be performed
at least semiannually; and
(E) Be updated at least annually.
(v) The staffing plan must not diminish other standards contained
in law, rules, or the terms of an applicable collective bargaining
agreement, if any, between the hospital and its nursing staff, and must
be consistent with any such agreement.
(b) In implementing the staffing plan, each hospital shall:
(i) Assign nursing personnel to each patient care unit in
accordance with its staffing plan. Shift-to-shift adjustments in
staffing levels required by the plan may be made only if based upon
assessment by a registered nurse providing direct patient care on the
patient care unit, utilizing procedures specified by the staffing
committee;
(ii) Make readily available the staffing plan and staffing levels
to patients and visitors upon request; and
(iii) Make accessible to staff a process for reporting inadequate
staffing or staffing at variance with the staffing plan. Any reports
made under this subsection must be provided to the staffing committee
and the hospital and be retained by the hospital for department review
under subsection (5) of this section.
(5) HOSPITAL STAFFING PLAN REVIEW AND PUBLICATION. (a) Each
hospital shall submit its staffing plan and any reports made under
subsection (4)(b)(iii) for review by the department at least every
eighteen months, which review may be in conjunction with any on-site
licensing survey or inspection conducted by the department. The
hospital may also submit any additional information related to
staffing, including explanations of any staffing at variance with the
adopted staffing plan and actions taken to resolve staffing issues.
(b) In collaboration with Washington state quality forum
established in section 5, chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2098), Laws of
2007, the department must develop standards for comparing hospital
staffing plans, and each hospital's adherence to its staffing plan in
practice, with the final recommendations published under subsection (3)
of this section. The department must rate the staffing plans according
to the standards and provide the ratings to the Washington state
quality forum to be disseminated, at a minimum, on its web site as part
of its research regarding health care quality, evidence-based medicine,
and patient safety. If the Washington state quality forum is not
established, the department shall perform the duties required under
this section and post the staffing plan information on its web site.
(6) HOSPITAL STAFFING REPORTS. (a) Semiannually, hospitals shall
collect and submit to the department information regarding nurse
staffing. In addition to the skill mix of registered nurses, licensed
practical nurses, unlicensed assistive nursing personnel, nurses
supplied by temporary staffing agencies including traveling nurses, and
nursing care hours per patient per day, such information must also
include:
(i) Death among surgical inpatients with treatable serious
complications (failure to rescue);
(ii) Prevalence of urinary tract infections;
(iii) Hospital-acquired pneumonia;
(iv) Incidence of patient falls; and
(v) Other measures to be established by the department.
(b) The information submitted under this subsection must be posted
along with the ratings of staffing plans as provided in subsection
(5)(b) of this section.
(7) RETALIATION PROHIBITED. A hospital may not retaliate against
or engage in any form of intimidation of:
(a) An employee for performing any duties or responsibilities in
connection with participation on the staffing committee; or
(b) An employee, patient, or other individual who notifies the
staffing committee, the hospital administration, or the department that
any schedule or nursing personnel assignment fails to comply with the
staffing plan, or that the hospital has failed to develop or implement
a staffing plan.
(8) COMPLAINTS. (a) The department must investigate complaints
from hospital staff that a hospital has failed to comply with a
staffing plan, has failed to develop or implement a staffing plan, or
has violated subsection (7) of this section. If there is reasonable
cause to believe that a violation has been or is occurring, the
department must immediately endeavor to eliminate the violation by
conference with the interested parties. If a resolution is not
reached, the department must make a finding to that effect. Such
findings must be posted along with the ratings of staffing plans as
provided in subsection (5)(b) of this section.
(b) The department shall maintain a toll-free telephone number for
patients to use to report the violations listed in (a) of this
subsection. The department is not required to investigate such patient
reports, but must disclose the report to the hospital and the
hospital's staffing committee. In disclosing the report, the
department shall not reveal identifying information about the patient.
(c) Information about complaints or reports under this subsection
that does not warrant an investigation may not be disclosed except that
the department must notify the hospital and the complainant when a
complaint did not warrant an investigation.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.56.020 and 2006 c 8 s 106 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to establish an adverse health events
and incident reporting system that is designed to facilitate quality
improvement in the health care system, improve patient safety and
decrease medical errors in a nonpunitive manner. The reporting system
shall not be designed to punish errors by health care practitioners or
health care facility employees.
(2) Each medical facility shall notify the department of health
regarding the occurrence of any adverse event and file a subsequent
report as provided in this section. Notification must be submitted to
the department within forty-eight hours of confirmation by the medical
facility that an adverse event has occurred. A subsequent report must
be submitted to the department within forty-five days after
confirmation by the medical facility that an adverse event has
occurred. The notification and report shall be submitted to the
department using the internet-based system established under RCW
70.56.040(2).
(3) The notification and report shall be filed in a format
specified by the department after consultation with medical facilities
and the independent entity. The format shall identify the facility,
but shall not include any identifying information for any of the health
care professionals, facility employees, or patients involved. This
provision does not modify the duty of a hospital to make a report to
the department of health or a disciplinary authority if a licensed
practitioner has committed unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW
18.130.180. As soon as possible, but no later than July 1, 2008,
hospitals shall revise their incident reporting procedures to include
an evaluation of staffing as part of the incident review process.
Hospitals shall also modify their incident form to include an area for
the documentation of staffing considerations.
(4)(a) As part of the report filed under this section, the medical
facility must:
(i) Include the following information:
(A) The number of patients, registered nurses, licensed practical
nurses, and unlicensed assistive personnel present in the relevant
patient care unit at the time that the reported adverse event occurred;
(B) The number of nursing personnel present at the time of the
adverse event who have been supplied by temporary staffing agencies,
including traveling nurses;
(C) The number of nursing personnel, if any, on the patient care
unit working beyond their regularly scheduled number of hours or shifts
at the time of the event and the number of consecutive hours worked by
each such nursing personnel at the time of the adverse event; and
(ii) Conduct a root cause analysis of the event, describe the
corrective action plan that will be implemented consistent with the
findings of the analysis, or provide an explanation of any reasons for
not taking corrective action. Hospitals shall consider staffing as a
possible factor contributing to reportable incidents. Staffing
considerations may include such factors as fatigue, training,
communication, and adequacy.
(b) The department shall adopt rules, in consultation with medical
facilities and the independent entity, related to the form and content
of the root cause analysis and corrective action plan. In developing
the rules, consideration shall be given to existing standards for root
cause analysis or corrective action plans adopted by the joint
commission on accreditation of health facilities and other national or
governmental entities.
(c) For purposes of this subsection (4), "nursing personnel" and
"patient care unit" have the same meaning as defined in section 2 of
this act.
(5) If, in the course of investigating a complaint received from an
employee of a medical facility, the department determines that the
facility has not reported an adverse event or undertaken efforts to
investigate the occurrence of an adverse event, the department shall
direct the facility to report or to undertake an investigation of the
event.
(6) The protections of RCW 43.70.075 apply to reports of adverse
events that are submitted in good faith by employees of medical
facilities.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.79.202 and 2005 c 268 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the licensing fee for registered nurses and
licensed practical nurses licensed under this chapter, the department
shall impose an additional surcharge of five dollars per year on all
initial licenses and renewal licenses for registered nurses and
licensed practical nurses issued under this chapter. Advanced
registered nurse practitioners are only required to pay the surcharge
on their registered nurse licenses.
(2) The department, in consultation with the commission and the
workforce training and education coordinating board, shall use the
proceeds from the surcharge imposed under subsection (1) of this
section to provide grants to a central nursing resource center. The
grants may be awarded only to a not-for-profit central nursing resource
center that is comprised of and led by nurses. The central nursing
resource center will demonstrate coordination with relevant nursing
constituents including professional nursing organizations, groups
representing nursing educators, staff nurses, nurse managers or
executives, and labor organizations representing nurses. The central
nursing resource center shall have as its mission to contribute to the
health and wellness of Washington state residents by ensuring that
there is an adequate nursing workforce to meet the current and future
health care needs of the citizens of the state of Washington. The
grants may be used to fund the following activities of the central
nursing resource center:
(a) Maintain information on the current and projected supply and
demand of nurses through the collection and analysis of data regarding
the nursing workforce, including but not limited to education level,
race and ethnicity, employment settings, nursing positions, reasons for
leaving the nursing profession, and those leaving Washington state to
practice elsewhere. This data collection and analysis must complement
other state activities to produce data on the nursing workforce and the
central nursing resource center shall work collaboratively with other
entities in the data collection to ensure coordination and avoid
duplication of efforts;
(b) Monitor and validate trends in the applicant pool for programs
in nursing. The central nursing resource center must work with nursing
leaders to identify approaches to address issues arising related to the
trends identified, and collect information on other states' approaches
to addressing these issues;
(c) Facilitate partnerships between the nursing community and other
health care providers, licensing authority, business and industry,
consumers, legislators, and educators to achieve policy consensus,
promote diversity within the profession, and enhance nursing career
mobility and nursing leadership development;
(d) Evaluate the effectiveness of nursing education and
articulation among programs to increase access to nursing education and
enhance career mobility, especially for populations that are
underrepresented in the nursing profession;
(e) Provide consultation, technical assistance, data, and
information related to Washington state and national nursing resources;
(f) Promote strategies to enhance patient safety and quality
patient care, including encouraging a safe and healthy workplace
environment for nurses and making recommendations pursuant to section
2 of this act; and
(g) Educate the public including students in K-12 about
opportunities and careers in nursing.
(3) The nursing resource center account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from the surcharge in subsection
(1) of this section must be deposited in the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for grants to an organization to
conduct the specific activities listed in subsection (2) of this
section and to compensate the department for the reasonable costs
associated with the collection and distribution of the surcharge and
the administration of the grant provided for in subsection (2) of this
section. No money from this account may be used by the recipient
towards administrative costs of the central nursing resource center not
associated with the specific activities listed in subsection (2) of
this section. No money from this account may be used by the recipient
toward lobbying. Only the secretary or the secretary's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures. Grants will be awarded on an annual
basis and funds will be distributed quarterly. The first distribution
after awarding the first grant shall be made no later than six months
after July 24, 2005. The central nursing resource center shall report
to the department on meeting the grant objectives annually.
(4) The central nursing resource center shall submit a report of
all progress, collaboration with other organizations and government
entities, and activities conducted by the center to the relevant
committees of the legislature by November 30, 2011. The department
shall conduct a review of the program to collect funds to support the
activities of a nursing resource center and make recommendations on the
effectiveness of the program and whether it should continue. The
review shall be paid for with funds from the nursing resource center
account. The review must be completed by June 30, 2012.
(5) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement
chapter 268, Laws of 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 71.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Establishments licensed under this chapter shall establish a
staffing committee and implement a staffing plan as required under
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 72.23 RCW
to read as follows:
State hospitals shall establish a staffing committee and implement
a staffing plan as required under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 4 of this act expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington state patient safety act.

--- END ---