BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.104 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature finds that discussion of public policies,
enforcement activities, and educational programs related to pesticides
should be based on sound science and must include data on the types and
concentrations of pesticides in the air. The legislature also finds
that workers, business owners, and other people have the right to know
about pesticides in the air with which they and their children may come
in contact.
(b) It is the intent of the legislature to help ensure the health
and welfare of our citizens and the continued prosperity of our
agricultural sector through a limited monitoring program that
identifies whether exposure to off-site migration of pesticides
constitutes a health or safety concern to nearby populations. It is
not the intent of this monitoring program to infringe on or affect the
ability of agricultural interests to use pesticides in a lawful manner.
(2) The legislature therefore directs that a pilot air monitoring
project be initiated that supports the collection of data for use in
evaluating the human health implications, or lack thereof, to workers
and the public from pesticides moving off-target via the air.
(3) The department shall, in cooperation with state agencies,
Washington State University, and the University of Washington design
and implement a scientific-based pilot project to monitor and collect
data on the concentrations of pesticides in the air in agricultural
areas of the state, including conventional and organic cropping systems
and various application methods as appropriate, resulting from
pesticides moving off-target via the air. The department shall:
(a) Design the air monitoring project;
(b) Implement sample collection and analysis;
(c) Analyze the resulting data with respect to risks to human
health;
(d) Make monitoring results accessible to the public;
(e) Report the results of the monitoring to policymakers and the
public in conjunction with the annual pesticide incident reporting and
tracking (PIRT) report and through other forums. The department shall
convene an advisory committee composed of representatives of interested
parties such as growers, workers, teachers, environmental
organizations, the Washington state department of agriculture, the
department of ecology, and the department of labor and industries;
(f) Assess the data using available reference concentrations and
reference doses from the peer-reviewed literature and/or state or
federal governmental agencies; and
(g) Analyze data in reference to: Inhalation, absorption, and
various exposure risks over time, including cumulative risks.
(4) The department shall consult with and is authorized to
negotiate interagency agreements as appropriate with the department of
ecology, the department of agriculture, the University of Washington,
and Washington State University to assist in carrying out the project.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Department" means the department of health.
(b) "Pesticide drift" means off-target migration of pesticides,
during or after applications.
(c) "Reference concentrations" and "reference doses" means a
numerical estimate of exposure to the human population, including
sensitive subgroups such as children, that is not likely to cause
harmful effects. Reference concentrations and reference doses are
generally used for health effects that are thought to have a threshold
or low dose limit for producing effects.
(6) The department shall submit a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by April 1, 2009, including a summary of
the air monitoring project findings and recommendations for public
policies and program activities to protect human health from off-target
movement of pesticides via the air.

--- END ---