BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there may be
unanticipated cost increases to major state-funded transportation
construction and repair projects due to inflation. In order to provide
funding to offset these unanticipated cost increases for these
projects, it is important to provide a mechanism to share the cost of
these shortfalls with affected local governments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The transportation project contingency account is created in
the state treasury. All receipts from taxes imposed under RCW
82.14.030 on materials, labor, equipment, contracts, and components
used for constructing any specific transportation project, authorized
by the legislature and with a budget exceeding one billion dollars,
either new construction or repair, must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for unanticipated
increases in project costs.
(2) The department of revenue shall provide the state treasurer
with the information regarding the amount of local sales and use taxes
for deposit to the account on a quarterly basis. The department of
revenue shall report on the account balance to the transportation
committees of the legislature by March 1st every year.
(3) The legislature shall identify and designate those projects
that meet the criteria in the state transportation budget process.
Projects in need of additional funding due to unanticipated cost
increases shall be identified by the department of transportation and
reported to the transportation committees. The legislature may
appropriate funds from the account to identified projects.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.030 and 1989 c 384 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governing body of any county or city while not required by
legislative mandate to do so, may, by resolution or ordinance for the
purposes authorized by this chapter, fix and impose a sales and use tax
in accordance with the terms of this chapter. Such tax shall be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county or city as the case may be: PROVIDED, That except as
provided in RCW 82.14.230, this sales and use tax shall not apply to
natural or manufactured gas. The rate of such tax imposed by a county
shall be five-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the case
of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use
tax). The rate of such tax imposed by a city shall not exceed five-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax)
or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax): PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That in the event a county shall impose a sales and use tax
under this subsection, the rate of such tax imposed under this
subsection by any city therein shall not exceed four hundred and
twenty-five one-thousandths of one percent.
(2) Subject to the enactment into law of the 1982 amendment to RCW
82.02.020 by section 5, chapter 49, Laws of 1982 1st ex. sess., in
addition to the tax authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the
governing body of any county or city may by resolution or ordinance
impose an additional sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of
this chapter. Such additional tax shall be collected upon the same
taxable events upon which the tax imposed under subsection (1) of this
section is levied. The rate of such additional tax imposed by a county
shall be up to five-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the
case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use
tax). The rate of such additional tax imposed by a city shall be up to
five-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales
tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax): PROVIDED
HOWEVER, That in the event a county shall impose a sales and use tax
under this subsection at a rate equal to or greater than the rate
imposed under this subsection by a city within the county, the county
shall receive fifteen percent of the city tax: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
in the event that the county shall impose a sales and use tax under
this subsection at a rate which is less than the rate imposed under
this subsection by a city within the county, the county shall receive
that amount of revenues from the city tax equal to fifteen percent of
the rate of tax imposed by the county under this subsection. The
authority to impose a tax under this subsection is intended in part to
compensate local government for any losses from the phase-out of the
property tax on business inventories.
(3) All receipts from taxes imposed under this section on
materials, labor, equipment, contracts, and components used for
constructing any specific transportation project, authorized by the
legislature and with a budget exceeding one billion dollars, either new
construction or repair, shall be deposited into the transportation
project contingency account under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.84.092 and 2006 c 337 s 11, 2006 c 311 s 23, 2006
c 171 s 10, 2006 c 56 s 10, and 2006 c 6 s 8 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the Columbia river basin water supply development
account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization
account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense
account, the developmental disabilities community trust account, the
drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance
administrative account, the drinking water assistance repayment
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account,
the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account,
the election account, the emergency reserve fund, the energy freedom
account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the
federal forest revolving account, the freight mobility investment
account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll
lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public works
assistance account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the regional mobility grant
program account, the resource management cost account, the rural
Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement
and sidewalk account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation project
contingency account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
transportation partnership account, the tuition recovery trust fund,
the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---