BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.084 and 2003 c 86 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A licensee and borrower may agree to a payment plan for a small
loan at any time.
(2) After four successive loans and prior to default upon the last
loan, each borrower may convert their small loan to a payment plan.
((Each agreement for a loan payment plan must be in writing and
acknowledged by both the borrower and the licensee.)) The licensee may
charge the borrower((, at the time both parties enter into the payment
plan,)) a one-time fee for the payment plan in an amount up to the fee
or interest on the outstanding principal of the loan as allowed under
RCW 31.45.073(3). The one-time fee for the payment plan may not be
assessed at the time the parties enter into the agreement; it must be
paid in equal installments over the term of the payment plan. The
licensee may not assess any other fee, interest charge, or other charge
on the borrower as a result of converting the small loan into a payment
plan. ((This))
(3) Once every twelve months, a borrower may convert the unpaid
principal and fee authorized by RCW 31.45.073 into a no additional cost
payment plan. Except as authorized by subsection (10) of this section,
the licensee may not assess any additional charge to convert a loan
into a no additional cost payment plan under this subsection. A
licensee is only obligated to extend to each borrower one no additional
cost payment plan during any twelve-month period of time. A new
twelve-month period begins on the date that any prior no additional
cost payment plan is paid in full.
(4) To convert a small loan into a payment plan under subsection
(2) or (3) of this section, a borrower must return to the licensee's
point of sale location and request a payment plan no later than the
close of business on the business day prior to the due date of the
loan.
(5) Each agreement for a payment plan under this section must be in
writing and acknowledged by both the borrower and the licensee. Any
agreement entered into after default on a small loan is not a payment
plan under this section.
(6) A payment plan must provide for the payment of the total of
payments due on the small loan over a period not less than sixty days
in ((three)) four or more payments, unless the borrower and licensee
agree to a shorter payment period. The borrower may pay the total of
payments at any time. The licensee may not charge any penalty, fee, or
charge to the borrower for prepayment of the loan payment plan by the
borrower.
(7) Each licensee shall conspicuously disclose to each borrower in
the small loan agreement or small loan note that the borrower has
access to ((such a)) payment plans ((after four successive loans))
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section. The disclosure must be:
(a) In twelve-point type;
(b) Surrounded by a border with no other loan term in that border;
and
(c) Located on the same page as information required to be
disclosed by the federal truth in lending act.
(8) A licensee's violation of such a payment plan constitutes a
violation of this chapter.
(((2))) (9) The licensee may take postdated checks at the
initiation of ((the)) a payment plan for the payments agreed to under
((the)) a plan. If any check accepted by the licensee as payment under
the payment plan is dishonored, the licensee may not charge the
borrower any fee for the dishonored check.
(((3))) (10) If the borrower defaults on the payment plan, the
licensee may initiate action to collect the total of payments under RCW
31.45.082. The licensee may charge the borrower a one-time payment
plan default fee of twenty-five dollars.
(((4))) (11) If the licensee enters into a payment plan with the
borrower through an accredited third party, with certified credit
counselors, that is representing the borrower, the licensee's failure
to comply with the terms of that payment plan constitutes a violation
of this chapter.
(12) For the purposes of this section, "licensee's point of sale"
means:
(a) The licensee's store where the borrower obtained the loan;
(b) Any other store operated by the licensee in Washington; or
(c) The method the borrower used to obtain the loan, including but
not limited to an internet web site, telephone number, or other remote
means or method of communication.

--- END ---