BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.44.270 and 1998 c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to sell, give, or otherwise
supply liquor to any person under the age of twenty-one years or permit
any person under that age to consume liquor on his or her premises or
on any premises under his or her control. For the purposes of this
subsection, "premises" includes real property, houses, buildings, and
other structures, and motor vehicles and watercraft. A violation of
this subsection is a gross misdemeanor punishable as provided for in
chapter 9A.20 RCW. The court shall notify the department of licensing
within twenty-four hours after entry of a judgment for a violation of
this subsection.
(2)(a) It is unlawful for any person under the age of twenty-one
years to possess, consume, or otherwise acquire any liquor. A
violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor punishable as
provided for in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(b) It is unlawful for a person under the age of twenty-one years
to be in a public place, or to be in a motor vehicle in a public place,
while exhibiting the effects of having consumed liquor. For purposes
of this subsection, exhibiting the effects of having consumed liquor
means that a person has the odor of liquor on his or her breath and
either: (i) Is in possession of or close proximity to a container that
has or recently had liquor in it; or (ii) by speech, manner,
appearance, behavior, lack of coordination, or otherwise, exhibits that
he or she is under the influence of liquor. This subsection (2)(b)
does not apply if the person is in the presence of a parent or guardian
or has consumed or is consuming liquor under circumstances described in
subsection (((4) or)) (5) or (6) of this section.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2)(a) of this section do not apply to
liquor given or permitted to be given to a person under the age of
twenty-one years by a parent or guardian and consumed in the presence
of the parent or guardian. This subsection shall not authorize
consumption or possession of liquor by a person under the age of
twenty-one years on any premises licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to liquor given
to a minor by any person licensed to sell or dispense liquor provided
the licensee is acting within the scope of its license.
(5) This section does not apply to liquor given for medicinal
purposes to a person under the age of twenty-one years by a parent,
guardian, physician, or dentist.
(((5))) (6) This section does not apply to liquor given to a person
under the age of twenty-one years when such liquor is being used in
connection with religious services and the amount consumed is the
minimal amount necessary for the religious service.
(((6))) (7) Conviction or forfeiture of bail for a violation of
this section by a person under the age of twenty-one years at the time
of such conviction or forfeiture shall not be a disqualification of
that person to acquire a license to sell or dispense any liquor after
that person has attained the age of twenty-one years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon receipt of a notice of a conviction from a court pursuant to
RCW 66.44.270(1), the department shall suspend the driver's license or
driving privileges of a person as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of a first notice, suspension for thirty days;
(2) Upon receipt of a second or subsequent notice, suspension for
one hundred eighty days.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.342 and 2004 c 95 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to drive a motor vehicle in this
state while that person is in a suspended or revoked status or when his
or her privilege to drive is suspended or revoked in this or any other
state. Any person who has a valid Washington driver's license is not
guilty of a violation of this section.
(a) A person found to be an habitual offender under chapter 46.65
RCW, who violates this section while an order of revocation issued
under chapter 46.65 RCW prohibiting such operation is in effect, is
guilty of driving while license suspended or revoked in the first
degree, a gross misdemeanor. Upon the first such conviction, the
person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ten days.
Upon the second conviction, the person shall be punished by
imprisonment for not less than ninety days. Upon the third or
subsequent conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for
not less than one hundred eighty days. If the person is also convicted
of the offense defined in RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, when both
convictions arise from the same event, the minimum sentence of
confinement shall be not less than ninety days. The minimum sentence
of confinement required shall not be suspended or deferred. A
conviction under this subsection does not prevent a person from
petitioning for reinstatement as provided by RCW 46.65.080.
(b) A person who violates this section while an order of suspension
or revocation prohibiting such operation is in effect and while the
person is not eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or
driving privilege, other than for a suspension for the reasons
described in (c) of this subsection, is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the second degree, a gross misdemeanor. This
subsection applies when a person's driver's license or driving
privilege has been suspended or revoked by reason of:
(i) A conviction of a felony in the commission of which a motor
vehicle was used;
(ii) A previous conviction under this section;
(iii) A notice received by the department from a court or diversion
unit as provided by RCW 46.20.265, relating to a minor who has
committed, or who has entered a diversion unit concerning an offense
relating to alcohol, legend drugs, controlled substances, or imitation
controlled substances;
(iv) A conviction of RCW 46.20.410, relating to the violation of
restrictions of an occupational or a temporary restricted driver's
license;
(v) A conviction of RCW 46.20.345, relating to the operation of a
motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;
(vi) A conviction of RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of
injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(vii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.024, relating to attempting to
elude pursuing police vehicles;
(viii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.500, relating to reckless driving;
(ix) A conviction of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to a
person under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(x) A conviction of RCW 46.61.520, relating to vehicular homicide;
(xi) A conviction of RCW 46.61.522, relating to vehicular assault;
(xii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.527(4), relating to reckless
endangerment of roadway workers;
(xiii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.530, relating to racing of
vehicles on highways;
(xiv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.685, relating to leaving children
in an unattended vehicle with motor running;
(xv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.740, relating to theft of motor
vehicle fuel;
(xvi) A conviction of RCW 46.64.048, relating to attempting,
aiding, abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(xvii) A conviction of RCW 66.44.270, relating to furnishing liquor
to minors;
(xviii) An administrative action taken by the department under
chapter 46.20 RCW; or
(((xviii))) (xix) A conviction of a local law, ordinance,
regulation, or resolution of a political subdivision of this state, the
federal government, or any other state, of an offense substantially
similar to a violation included in this subsection.
(c) A person who violates this section when his or her driver's
license or driving privilege is, at the time of the violation,
suspended or revoked solely because (i) the person must furnish proof
of satisfactory progress in a required alcoholism or drug treatment
program, (ii) the person must furnish proof of financial responsibility
for the future as provided by chapter 46.29 RCW, (iii) the person has
failed to comply with the provisions of chapter 46.29 RCW relating to
uninsured accidents, (iv) the person has failed to respond to a notice
of traffic infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing,
violated a written promise to appear in court, or has failed to comply
with the terms of a notice of traffic infraction or citation, as
provided in RCW 46.20.289, (v) the person has committed an offense in
another state that, if committed in this state, would not be grounds
for the suspension or revocation of the person's driver's license, (vi)
the person has been suspended or revoked by reason of one or more of
the items listed in (b) of this subsection, but was eligible to
reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege at the time
of the violation, or (vii) the person has received traffic citations or
notices of traffic infraction that have resulted in a suspension under
RCW 46.20.267 relating to intermediate drivers' licenses, or any
combination of (i) through (vii), is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the third degree, a misdemeanor.
(2) Upon receiving a record of conviction of any person or upon
receiving an order by any juvenile court or any duly authorized court
officer of the conviction of any juvenile under this section, the
department shall:
(a) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
first degree, as provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, extend
the period of administrative revocation imposed under chapter 46.65 RCW
for an additional period of one year from and after the date the person
would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license or have
his or her driving privilege restored; or
(b) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
second degree, as provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, not
issue a new license or restore the driving privilege for an additional
period of one year from and after the date the person would otherwise
have been entitled to apply for a new license or have his or her
driving privilege restored; or
(c) Not extend the period of suspension or revocation if the
conviction was under subsection (1)(c) of this section. If the
conviction was under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section and the
court recommends against the extension and the convicted person has
obtained a valid driver's license, the period of suspension or
revocation shall not be extended.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.391 and 2004 c 95 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any person licensed under this chapter who is convicted of
an offense relating to motor vehicles for which suspension or
revocation of the driver's license is mandatory, other than vehicular
homicide or vehicular assault, or who has had his or her license
suspended, revoked, or denied under RCW 46.20.3101, or who has his or
her license suspended under section 2 of this act, may submit to the
department an application for a temporary restricted driver's license.
The department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining
that the petitioner is eligible to receive the license, may issue a
temporary restricted driver's license and may set definite restrictions
as provided in RCW 46.20.394. No person may petition for, and the
department shall not issue, a temporary restricted driver's license
that is effective during the first thirty days of any suspension or
revocation imposed for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or,
for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under RCW 46.20.3101,
during the required minimum portion of the periods of suspension,
revocation, or denial established under (c) of this subsection.
(b) An applicant under this subsection whose driver's license is
suspended or revoked for an alcohol-related offense, other than a
suspension under section 2 of this act, shall provide proof to the
satisfaction of the department that a functioning ignition interlock
device has been installed on a vehicle owned or operated by the person.
(i) The department shall require the person to maintain such a
device on a vehicle owned or operated by the person and shall restrict
the person to operating only vehicles equipped with such a device, for
the remainder of the period of suspension, revocation, or denial.
(ii) Subject to any periodic renewal requirements established by
the department pursuant to this section and subject to any applicable
compliance requirements under this chapter or other law, a temporary
restricted driver's license granted after a suspension or revocation
under RCW 46.61.5055 or 46.20.3101 extends through the remaining
portion of any concurrent or consecutive suspension or revocation that
may be imposed as the result of administrative action and criminal
conviction arising out of the same incident.
(iii) The time period during which the person is licensed under
this section shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the
period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is required
under RCW 46.20.720 (1) and (2) (a), (b), and (c).
(c) The department shall provide by rule the minimum portions of
the periods of suspension, revocation, or denial set forth in RCW
46.20.3101 after which a person may apply for a temporary restricted
driver's license under this section. In establishing the minimum
portions of the periods of suspension, revocation, or denial, the
department shall consider the requirements of federal law regarding
state eligibility for grants or other funding, and shall establish such
periods so as to ensure that the state will maintain its eligibility,
or establish eligibility, to obtain incentive grants or any other
federal funding.
(2)(a) A person licensed under this chapter whose driver's license
is suspended administratively due to failure to appear or pay a traffic
ticket under RCW 46.20.289; a violation of the financial responsibility
laws under chapter 46.29 RCW; or for multiple violations within a
specified period of time under RCW 46.20.291, may apply to the
department for an occupational driver's license.
(b) If the suspension is for failure to respond, pay, or comply
with a notice of traffic infraction or conviction, the applicant must
enter into a payment plan with the court.
(c) An occupational driver's license issued to an applicant
described in (a) of this subsection shall be valid for the period of
the suspension or revocation.
(3) An applicant for an occupational or temporary restricted
driver's license who qualifies under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section is eligible to receive such license only if:
(a) Within seven years immediately preceding the date of the
offense that gave rise to the present conviction or incident, the
applicant has not committed vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520 or
vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522; and
(b) The applicant demonstrates that it is necessary for him or her
to operate a motor vehicle because he or she:
(i) Is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential
that he or she operate a motor vehicle;
(ii) Is undergoing continuing health care or providing continuing
care to another who is dependent upon the applicant;
(iii) Is enrolled in an educational institution and pursuing a
course of study leading to a diploma, degree, or other certification of
successful educational completion;
(iv) Is undergoing substance abuse treatment or is participating in
meetings of a twelve-step group such as Alcoholics Anonymous that
requires the petitioner to drive to or from the treatment or meetings;
(v) Is fulfilling court-ordered community service responsibilities;
(vi) Is in a program that assists persons who are enrolled in a
WorkFirst program pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to become gainfully
employed and the program requires a driver's license;
(vii) Is in an apprenticeship, on-the-job training, or welfare-to-work program; or
(viii) Presents evidence that he or she has applied for a position
in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program for which a
driver's license is required to begin the program, provided that a
license granted under this provision shall be in effect for no longer
than fourteen days; and
(c) The applicant files satisfactory proof of financial
responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW; and
(d) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an occupational
driver's license granted under this subsection is no longer enrolled in
an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program, the director shall
give written notice by first class mail to the driver that the
occupational driver's license shall be canceled. The effective date of
cancellation shall be fifteen days from the date of mailing the notice.
If at any time before the cancellation goes into effect the driver
submits evidence of continued enrollment in the program, the
cancellation shall be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective,
the driver may obtain, at no additional charge, a new occupational
driver's license upon submittal of evidence of enrollment in another
program that meets the criteria set forth in this subsection; and
(e) The department shall not issue an occupational driver's license
under (b)(iv) of this subsection if the applicant is able to receive
transit services sufficient to allow for the applicant's participation
in the programs referenced under (b)(iv) of this subsection.
(4) A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for an occupational or temporary restricted driver's
license may request a hearing as provided by rule of the department.
(5) The director shall cancel an occupational or temporary
restricted driver's license upon receipt of notice that the holder
thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of
its restrictions, or of a separate offense that under chapter 46.20 RCW
would warrant suspension or revocation of a regular driver's license.
The cancellation is effective as of the date of the conviction, and
continues with the same force and effect as any suspension or
revocation under this title.

--- END ---