BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.04.320 and 2003 c 353 s 1 and 2003 c 141 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
"Motor vehicle" means every vehicle that is self-propelled and
every vehicle that is propelled by electric power obtained from
overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails. "Motor vehicle"
includes a neighborhood electric vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.357.
"Motor vehicle" includes a medium-speed electric vehicle as defined in
section 2 of this act. An electric personal assistive mobility device
is not considered a motor vehicle. A power wheelchair is not
considered a motor vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Medium-speed electric vehicle" means a self-propelled,
electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle, equipped with a roll
cage or crush-proof body design, whose speed attainable in one mile is
more than thirty miles per hour but not more than thirty-five miles per
hour and otherwise meets or exceeds the federal regulations set forth
in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.500.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person
may operate a medium-speed electric vehicle upon a highway of this
state having a speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less if:
(a) The person does not operate a medium-speed electric vehicle
upon state highways that are listed in chapter 47.17 RCW;
(b) The person does not operate a medium-speed electric vehicle
upon a highway of this state without first having obtained and having
in full force and effect a current and proper vehicle license and
display vehicle license number plates in compliance with chapter 46.16
RCW;
(c) The person does not operate a medium-speed electric vehicle
upon a highway of this state without first obtaining a valid driver's
license issued to Washington residents in compliance with chapter 46.20
RCW;
(d) The person does not operate a medium-speed electric vehicle
subject to registration under chapter 46.16 RCW on a highway of this
state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle liability
policy in compliance with chapter 46.30 RCW; and
(e) The person operating a medium-speed electric vehicle does not
cross a roadway with a speed limit in excess of thirty-five miles per
hour, unless the crossing begins and ends on a roadway with a speed
limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less and occurs at an
intersection of approximately ninety degrees, except that the operator
of a medium-speed electric vehicle must not cross an uncontrolled
intersection of streets and highways that are part of the state highway
system subject to Title 47 RCW unless that intersection has been
authorized by local authorities under subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Any person who violates this section commits a traffic
infraction.
(3) This section does not prevent local authorities, with respect
to streets and highways under their jurisdiction and within the
reasonable exercise of their police power, from regulating the
operation of medium-speed electric vehicles on streets and highways
under their jurisdiction by resolution or ordinance of the governing
body, if the regulation is consistent with this title, except that:
(a) Local authorities may not authorize the operation of medium-speed electric vehicles on streets and highways that are part of the
state highway system subject to Title 47 RCW;
(b) Local authorities may not prohibit the operation of medium-speed electric vehicles upon highways of this state having a speed
limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less; and
(c) Local authorities may not establish requirements for the
registration and licensing of medium-speed electric vehicles.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.61.687 and 2005 c 415 s 1 and 2005 c 132 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever a child who is less than sixteen years of age is being
transported in a motor vehicle that is in operation and that is
required by RCW 46.37.510 to be equipped with a safety belt system in
a passenger seating position, or is being transported in a neighborhood
electric vehicle or medium-speed electric vehicle that is in operation,
the driver of the vehicle shall keep the child properly restrained as
follows:
(a) A child must be restrained in a child restraint system, if the
passenger seating position equipped with a safety belt system allows
sufficient space for installation, until the child is eight years old,
unless the child is four feet nine inches or taller. The child
restraint system must comply with standards of the United States
department of transportation and must be secured in the vehicle in
accordance with instructions of the vehicle manufacturer and the child
restraint system manufacturer.
(b) A child who is eight years of age or older or four feet nine
inches or taller shall be properly restrained with the motor vehicle's
safety belt properly adjusted and fastened around the child's body or
an appropriately fitting child restraint system.
(c) The driver of a vehicle transporting a child who is under
thirteen years old shall transport the child in the back seat positions
in the vehicle where it is practical to do so.
(2) Enforcement of subsection (1) of this section is subject to a
visual inspection by law enforcement to determine if the child
restraint system in use is appropriate for the child's individual
height, weight, and age. The visual inspection for usage of a child
restraint system must ensure that the child restraint system is being
used in accordance with the instruction of the vehicle and the child
restraint system manufacturers. The driver of a vehicle transporting
a child who is under thirteen years old shall transport the child in
the back seat positions in the vehicle where it is practical to do so.
(3) A person violating subsection (1) of this section may be issued
a notice of traffic infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW. If the person
to whom the notice was issued presents proof of acquisition of an
approved child passenger restraint system or a child booster seat, as
appropriate, within seven days to the jurisdiction issuing the notice
and the person has not previously had a violation of this section
dismissed, the jurisdiction shall dismiss the notice of traffic
infraction.
(4) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall
not constitute negligence by a parent or legal guardian. Failure to
use a child restraint system shall not be admissible as evidence of
negligence in any civil action.
(5) This section does not apply to: (a) For hire vehicles, (b)
vehicles designed to transport sixteen or less passengers, including
the driver, operated by auto transportation companies, as defined in
RCW 81.68.010, (c) vehicles providing customer shuttle service between
parking, convention, and hotel facilities, and airport terminals, and
(d) school buses.
(6) As used in this section, "child restraint system" means a child
passenger restraint system that meets the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety
Standards set forth in 49 C.F.R. 571.213.
(7) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section do not apply
in any seating position where there is only a lap belt available and
the child weighs more than forty pounds.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person who
has a current national certification as a child passenger safety
technician and who in good faith provides inspection, adjustment, or
educational services regarding child passenger restraint systems is not
liable for civil damages resulting from any act or omission in
providing the services, other than acts or omissions constituting gross
negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
(b) The immunity provided in this subsection does not apply to a
certified child passenger safety technician who is employed by a
retailer of child passenger restraint systems and who, during his or
her hours of employment and while being compensated, provides
inspection, adjustment, or educational services regarding child
passenger restraint systems.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.61.688 and 2003 c 353 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, the term "motor vehicle"
includes:
(a) "Buses," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except
trailers, designed to carry more than ten passengers;
(b) "Multipurpose passenger vehicles," meaning motor vehicles with
motive power, except trailers, designed to carry ten persons or less
that are constructed either on a truck chassis or with special features
for occasional off-road operation;
(c) "Neighborhood electric vehicle," meaning a self-propelled,
electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle whose speed attainable
in one mile is more than twenty miles per hour and not more than
twenty-five miles per hour and conforms to federal regulations under
((Title)) 49 C.F.R. ((Part)) Sec. 571.500;
(d) "Medium-speed electric vehicle" meaning a self-propelled,
electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle, equipped with a roll
cage or crush-proof body design, whose speed attainable in one mile is
more than thirty miles per hour but not more than thirty-five miles per
hour and otherwise meets or exceeds the federal regulations set forth
in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.500;
(e) "Passenger cars," meaning motor vehicles with motive power,
except multipurpose passenger vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers,
designed for carrying ten passengers or less; and
(((e))) (f) "Trucks," meaning motor vehicles with motive power,
except trailers, designed primarily for the transportation of property.
(2) This section only applies to motor vehicles that meet the
manual seat belt safety standards as set forth in federal motor vehicle
safety standard 208 and to neighborhood electric vehicles and medium-speed electric vehicles. This section does not apply to a vehicle
occupant for whom no safety belt is available when all designated
seating positions as required by federal motor vehicle safety standard
208 are occupied.
(3) Every person sixteen years of age or older operating or riding
in a motor vehicle shall wear the safety belt assembly in a properly
adjusted and securely fastened manner.
(4) No person may operate a motor vehicle unless all child
passengers under the age of sixteen years are either: (a) Wearing a
safety belt assembly or (b) are securely fastened into an approved
child restraint device.
(5) A person violating this section shall be issued a notice of
traffic infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW. A finding that a person
has committed a traffic infraction under this section shall be
contained in the driver's abstract but shall not be available to
insurance companies or employers.
(6) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section does
not constitute negligence, nor may failure to wear a safety belt
assembly be admissible as evidence of negligence in any civil action.
(7) This section does not apply to an operator or passenger who
possesses written verification from a licensed physician that the
operator or passenger is unable to wear a safety belt for physical or
medical reasons.
(8) The state patrol may adopt rules exempting operators or
occupants of farm vehicles, construction equipment, and vehicles that
are required to make frequent stops from the requirement of wearing
safety belts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect August 1, 2007.

--- END ---