BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.118.020 and 1994 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter((, the terms defined in this section shall have the meanings
indicated)) unless the context clearly ((indicates)) requires
otherwise.
(1) "Nonwater-carried sewage disposal devices" means any device
that stores and treats nonwater-carried human urine and feces.
(2) "Alternative methods of effluent disposal" means systems
approved by the department of health, including at least, mound
systems, alternating drain fields, anaerobic filters,
evapotranspiration systems, and aerobic systems.
(3) "Failure" means: (a) Effluent has been discharged on the
surface of the ground prior to approved treatment; or (b) effluent has
percolated to the surface of the ground; or (c) effluent has
contaminated or threatens to contaminate a ground water supply.
(4) "Additive" means any commercial product intended to affect the
performance or aesthetics of an on-site sewage disposal system.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.
(6) "On-site sewage disposal system" means any system of piping,
treatment devices, or other facilities that convey, store, treat, or
dispose of sewage on the property where it originates or on nearby
property under the control of the user where the system is not
connected to a public sewer system. For purposes of this chapter, an
on-site sewage disposal system does not include indoor plumbing and
associated fixtures.
(7) "Chemical additive" means those additives containing acids,
bases, or other chemicals deemed unsafe by the department for use in an
on-site sewage disposal system.
(8) "Additive manufacturer" means any person who manufactures,
formulates, blends, packages, or repackages an additive product for
sale, use, or distribution within the state.
(9) "Repair" means relocation, replacement, reconstruction, or
biological remediation of a failed on-site sewage disposal system.
(10) "Biological remediation" means a process that uses
microorganisms to return a contaminated environment, including a drain
field or soil dispersal component, to a state of nonfailure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Manufacturers of biological remediation technologies for use in
on-site sewage disposal systems, including for use in the repair or
recovery of failed drain fields of on-site sewage disposal systems, are
exempted from registering their proprietary treatment products with the
department, only if the following conditions are met:
(a) Product performance is verified through product testing using
international association of plumbing and mechanical officials interim
guide criteria standard 180-2003, which relates to aerobic bacterial
generators for insert into septic tanks, grease interceptors, and
grease traps;
(b) Product performance is verified through product testing
conducted by a testing facility conforming with the American national
standards institute approved international association of plumbing and
mechanical officials requirements;
(c) The product continues its certification under the international
association of plumbing and mechanical officials interim guide criteria
standard 180-2003; and
(d) The biological component of the product must meet the
conditions of RCW 70.118.060 relating to additive regulation.
(2) American national standards institute approved international
association of plumbing and mechanical officials interim guide criteria
standard 180-2003 only applies to biological remediation technologies
used in on-site sewage disposal systems or in the repair or recovery of
failed drain fields or soil dispersal components of on-site sewage
disposal systems.

--- END ---