BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The business school association for small business growth is
created at the University of Washington with the mission to provide
students with real world business experience while also providing
technical and consulting services to the state's small business
community. The business school association for small business growth
shall connect students, faculty, and staff from Washington's higher
education institutions with small businesses and the nonprofit
community to expand students' knowledge and skills, help small
businesses grow, create and retain jobs, open educational opportunities
for underrepresented minority students, and stimulate innovative
economic development research.
(2) The association shall be coordinated by the University of
Washington's business and economic development center. As convener and
coordinator of the association, the staff of the University of
Washington's business and economic development center shall:
(a) Provide technical assistance during the application process;
(b) Convene an application review committee to accept new schools
into the association;
(c) Attend at least one advisory meeting for each center annually;
(d) Support the business assistance centers' directors in their
work through on-site technical assistance;
(e) Organize and convene three all-day meetings annually for the
directors and faculty leaders;
(f) Conduct an evaluation of each center's work annually with the
goal of improving each center's work; and
(g) Provide an annual report to the legislature on the results of
the association's work.
(3) In order to be eligible for the association, a school must
submit a three-year work plan that includes:
(a) Guidelines for the local advisory board, including names of
likely participants;
(b) The resume of the small business assistance center director;
(c) The resume of the faculty member who will teach the
multicultural business development course;
(d) A draft curriculum for a small business consulting course that
will be offered each year through which students will provide
consulting services to small businesses; and
(e) Descriptions of the small business seminars or workshops that
will be offered.
(4) Applications will be accepted once per year. Although the
process is competitive, the association should be representative of all
areas of the state and serve as many communities as possible. The
University of Washington business and economic development center staff
may provide technical assistance to applicants if necessary.
(5) Membership to the association shall be granted in three-year
terms. Current and previous members may apply for continuing
membership.
(6) Association members must:
(a) Develop a local advisory board of small business owners,
faculty or administrators from the business school or program, and
corporate leaders, of which at least fifty percent are women or persons
of color, to guide the institution's work with small businesses;
(b) Support the success of a small business assistance center
within the business school or program;
(c) Offer at least two project-based multicultural business
development classes in which students serve as consultants with at
least ten small businesses in their region;
(d) Develop and offer seminars and workshops for small business
owners to improve their understanding of financial management,
marketing, business growth strategies, or other relevant topics;
(e) Participate in three full-day meetings per year convened by the
University of Washington business school's business and economic
development center that focus on curriculum development, small business
research, and other relevant topics;
(f) Secure at least ten percent of the small business assistance
center's budget from local funding sources; and
(g) Provide an annual written report to the association's
coordinator describing the center's work and its results, including the
number of new jobs created and the amount of new revenues generated.
(7)(a) While coordinated by the University of Washington's business
and economic development center, funding, subject to state
appropriation, will be available through this association for use by
each of the state's four-year colleges and universities with a business
school to participate in the association's work. Additional funding
will also be available to community and technical colleges who become
members of the association to fund, in part, their work as part of the
association.
(b) Subject to state funding, each member of the association shall
receive a grant as base funding for their small business assistance
work which may be used for: Salaries and benefits for faculty teaching
the small business assistance courses; salaries and benefits for the
faculty or staff who identify businesses needing student team
assistance; direct expenses for small business seminars; travel, hotel,
and per diem for attending the three yearly association meetings; and
hosting expenses for the local advisory board meetings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the
general fund to the University of Washington for the purposes of this
act, including section 1(7) of this act.
(2) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the
University of Washington for the purposes of this act, including
section 1(7) of this act.

--- END ---