BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.18.080 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 72 are each
amended to read as follows:
Any ((fireman)) firefighter who has completed his or her
probationary period and has been permanently appointed, and sustains a
disability not in the performance of his or her duty which renders him
or her unable to continue his or her service, may request to be retired
by filing a written request with his or her retirement board within
sixty days from the date of his or her disability. The board may, upon
such request being filed, consult such medical advice as it deems fit
and proper. If the board finds the ((fireman)) firefighter capable of
performing his or her duties, it may refuse to recommend retirement and
order the ((fireman)) firefighter back to duty. If no request for
retirement has been received after the expiration of sixty days from
the date of his or her disability, the board may recommend retirement
of the ((fireman)) firefighter. The board shall give the ((fireman))
firefighter a thirty day written notice of its recommendation, and he
or she shall be retired upon expiration of ((said)) the notice. Upon
retirement he or she shall receive a pension equal to fifty percent of
his or her basic salary. For a period of ninety days following such
disability the ((fireman)) firefighter shall receive an allowance from
the fund equal to his or her basic salary. He or she shall during
((said)) the ninety days be provided with such medical, hospital, and
nursing care as the board deems proper. No funds shall be expended for
such disability if the board determines that the ((fireman))
firefighter was gainfully employed or engaged for compensation in other
than fire department duty when the disability occurred, or if such
disability was the result of dissipation or abuse. Whenever any
((fireman)) firefighter shall die as a result of a disability sustained
not in the line of duty, his widow or her widower shall receive a
monthly pension equal to one-third of his or her basic salary ((until
remarried)); if such widow or widower has dependent upon her or him for
support a child or children of such deceased ((fireman)) firefighter,
he or she shall receive an additional pension as follows: One child,
one-eighth of the deceased's basic salary; two children, one-seventh;
three or more children, one-sixth. If there be no widow or widower,
monthly payments equal to one-third of the deceased ((fireman's))
firefighter's basic salary shall be made to his or her child or
children. The widow or widower may elect at any time in writing to
receive a cash settlement, and if the board after hearing finds it
financially beneficial to the pension fund, he or she may receive the
sum of five thousand dollars cash in lieu of all future monthly pension
payments, and other benefits, including benefits to any child and/or
children.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.18.100 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 178 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
In the event a ((fireman)) firefighter is killed in the performance
of duty, or in the event a ((fireman)) firefighter retired on account
of service connected disability shall die from any cause, his widow or
her widower shall receive a monthly pension under one of the following
applicable provisions: (1) If a ((fireman)) firefighter is killed in
the line of duty his widow or her widower shall receive a monthly
pension equal to fifty percent of his or her basic salary at the time
of his or her death; (2) if a ((fireman)) firefighter who has retired
on account of a service connected disability dies, his widow or her
widower shall receive a monthly pension equal to the amount of the
monthly pension such retired ((fireman)) firefighter was receiving at
the time of his or her death. If she or he at any time so elects in
writing and the board after hearing finds it to be financially
beneficial to the pension fund, he or she may receive in lieu of all
future monthly pension and other benefits, including benefits to child
or children, the sum of five thousand dollars in cash. If there be no
widow or widower at the time of such ((fireman's)) firefighter's death
or upon the widow's or widower's death the monthly pension benefits
((hereinabove)) provided for under this section shall be paid to and
divided among his or her child or children share and share alike, until
they reach the age of eighteen or are married, whichever occurs first.
((The widow's or widower's monthly pension benefit, including increased
benefits to his or her children shall cease if and when he or she
remarries: PROVIDED, That)) No pension payable under the provisions of
this section shall be less than that specified under RCW 41.18.200.

--- END ---