BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09A.005 and 1993 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) Simplification in the administration of payment of health
benefits is important for the state, providers, and ((private)) health
insurers;
(2) The state, providers, and ((private)) health insurers should
take advantage of all opportunities to streamline operations through
automation and the use of common computer standards; ((and))
(3) It is in the best interests of the state, providers, and
((private)) health insurers to identify all third parties that are
obligated to cover the cost of health care coverage of joint
beneficiaries; and
(4) Health insurers, as a condition of doing business in
Washington, must increase their effort to share information with the
department and accept the department's timely claims consistent with 42
U.S.C. 1396a(a)(25).
Therefore, the legislature declares that to improve the
coordination of benefits between the department of social and health
services and ((private)) health insurers to ensure that medical
insurance benefits are properly utilized, a transfer of ((uniform
information from the department of social and health services to
Washington state private insurers should be instituted)) information
between the department and health insurers should be instituted, and
the process for submitting requests for information and claims should
be simplified.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.09A.010 and 1993 c 10 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(2) "Health insurance coverage" includes any ((coverage)) policy,
contract, or agreement under which ((medical)) health care items or
services are provided, arranged, reimbursed, or paid for by ((an
employer or a union whether that coverage is provided through a self-insurance program, under the employee retirement income security act of
1974, a commercial insurer pursuant to chapters 48.20 and 48.21 RCW, a
health care service contractor pursuant to chapter 48.44 RCW, or a
health maintenance organization pursuant to chapter 48.46 RCW, and
medical assistance under chapter 74.09 RCW, and the state through this
chapter)) a health insurer.
(((2))) (3) "Health insurer" means any party that is, by statute,
policy, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a
claim for a health care item or service, including, but not limited to,
a commercial insurance company providing disability insurance under
chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service contractor providing
health care coverage under chapter 48.44 RCW, a health maintenance
organization providing comprehensive health care services under chapter
48.46 RCW, ((and shall also include any)) an employer or union ((that
is providing health insurance coverage on a)) self-insured ((basis))
plan, any private insurer, a group health plan, a service benefit plan,
a managed care organization, a pharmacy benefit manager, and a third
party administrator.
(((3) "Medical assistance administration" means the division within
the department of social and health services authorized under chapter
74.09 RCW.))
(4) "Computerized" means on-line or batch processing with
standardized format via magnetic tape output.
(5) (("Insurance coverage" means subscriber and beneficiary
eligibility and benefit coverage data.
(6))) "Joint beneficiary" is ((a resident of Washington state)) an
individual who has ((private)) health insurance coverage and is a
recipient of public assistance benefits under chapter 74.09 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.09A.020 and 2005 c 274 s 350 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((medical assistance administration)) department shall
provide routine and periodic computerized information to ((private))
health insurers regarding client eligibility and coverage information.
((Private)) Health insurers shall use this information to identify
joint beneficiaries. Identification of joint beneficiaries shall be
transmitted to the ((medical assistance administration)) department.
The ((medical assistance administration)) department shall use this
information to improve accuracy and currency of health insurance
coverage and promote improved coordination of benefits.
(2) To the maximum extent possible, necessary data elements and a
compatible data base shall be developed by affected health insurers and
the ((medical assistance administration)) department. The ((medical
assistance administration)) department shall establish a representative
group of health insurers and state agency representatives to develop
necessary technical and file specifications to promote a standardized
data base. The data base shall include elements essential to the
((medical assistance administration)) department and its population's
health insurance coverage information.
(3) If the state and ((private)) health insurers enter into other
agreements regarding the use of common computer standards, the data
base identified in this section shall be replaced by the new common
computer standards.
(4) The information provided will be of sufficient detail to
promote reliable and accurate benefit coordination and identification
of individuals who are also eligible for ((medical assistance
administration)) department programs.
(5) The frequency of updates will be mutually agreed to by each
health insurer and the ((medical assistance administration)) department
based on frequency of change and operational limitations. In no event
shall the computerized data be provided less than semiannually.
(6) The health insurers and the ((medical assistance
administration)) department shall safeguard and properly use the
information to protect records as provided by law, including but not
limited to chapters 42.48, 74.09, 74.04, 70.02, and 42.56 RCW, and 42
U.S.C. Sec. 1396a and 42 C.F.R. Sec. 43 et seq. The purpose of this
exchange of information is to improve coordination and administration
of benefits and ensure that medical insurance benefits are properly
utilized.
(7) The ((medical assistance administration)) department shall
target implementation of this ((chapter)) section to those ((private))
health insurers with the highest probability of joint beneficiaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.09A RCW
to read as follows:
Health insurers, as a condition of doing business in Washington,
must:
(1) Provide, with respect to individuals who are eligible for, or
are provided, medical assistance under chapter 74.09 RCW, upon the
request of the department, information to determine during what period
the individual or their spouses or their dependants may be, or may have
been, covered by a health insurer and the nature of coverage that is or
was provided by the health insurer, including the name, address, and
identifying number of the plan, in a manner prescribed by the
department;
(2) Accept the department's right to recovery and the assignment to
the department of any right of an individual or other entity to payment
from the party for an item or service for which payment has been made
under chapter 74.09 RCW;
(3) Respond to any inquiry by the department regarding a claim for
payment for any health care item or service that is submitted not later
than three years after the date of the provision of such health care
item or service;
(4) Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the department solely on
the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or format of
the claim form, or a failure to present proper documentation at the
point-of-sale that is the basis of the claim, if:
(a) The claim is submitted by the department within the three-year
period beginning on the date the item or service was furnished; and
(b) Any action by the department to enforce its rights with respect
to such claim is commenced within six years of the department's
submission of such claim; and
(5) Agree that the prevailing party in any legal action to enforce
this section receives reasonable attorneys' fees as well as related
collection fees and costs incurred in the enforcement of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---