BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.020 and 2006 c 258 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Accrual method of accounting" means a method of accounting in
which revenues are reported in the period when they are earned,
regardless of when they are collected, and expenses are reported in the
period in which they are incurred, regardless of when they are paid.
(2) "Appraisal" means the process of estimating the fair market
value or reconstructing the historical cost of an asset acquired in a
past period as performed by a professionally designated real estate
appraiser with no pecuniary interest in the property to be appraised.
It includes a systematic, analytic determination and the recording and
analyzing of property facts, rights, investments, and values based on
a personal inspection and inventory of the property.
(3) "Arm's-length transaction" means a transaction resulting from
good-faith bargaining between a buyer and seller who are not related
organizations and have adverse positions in the market place. Sales or
exchanges of nursing home facilities among two or more parties in which
all parties subsequently continue to own one or more of the facilities
involved in the transactions shall not be considered as arm's-length
transactions for purposes of this chapter. Sale of a nursing home
facility which is subsequently leased back to the seller within five
years of the date of sale shall not be considered as an arm's-length
transaction for purposes of this chapter.
(4) "Assets" means economic resources of the contractor, recognized
and measured in conformity with generally accepted accounting
principles.
(5) "Audit" or "department audit" means an examination of the
records of a nursing facility participating in the medicaid payment
system, including but not limited to: The contractor's financial and
statistical records, cost reports and all supporting documentation and
schedules, receivables, and resident trust funds, to be performed as
deemed necessary by the department and according to department rule.
(6) "Bad debts" means amounts considered to be uncollectible from
accounts and notes receivable.
(7) "Beneficial owner" means:
(a) Any person who, directly or indirectly, through any contract,
arrangement, understanding, relationship, or otherwise has or shares:
(i) Voting power which includes the power to vote, or to direct the
voting of such ownership interest; and/or
(ii) Investment power which includes the power to dispose, or to
direct the disposition of such ownership interest;
(b) Any person who, directly or indirectly, creates or uses a
trust, proxy, power of attorney, pooling arrangement, or any other
contract, arrangement, or device with the purpose or effect of
divesting himself or herself of beneficial ownership of an ownership
interest or preventing the vesting of such beneficial ownership as part
of a plan or scheme to evade the reporting requirements of this
chapter;
(c) Any person who, subject to (b) of this subsection, has the
right to acquire beneficial ownership of such ownership interest within
sixty days, including but not limited to any right to acquire:
(i) Through the exercise of any option, warrant, or right;
(ii) Through the conversion of an ownership interest;
(iii) Pursuant to the power to revoke a trust, discretionary
account, or similar arrangement; or
(iv) Pursuant to the automatic termination of a trust,
discretionary account, or similar arrangement;
except that, any person who acquires an ownership interest or power
specified in (c)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection with the purpose
or effect of changing or influencing the control of the contractor, or
in connection with or as a participant in any transaction having such
purpose or effect, immediately upon such acquisition shall be deemed to
be the beneficial owner of the ownership interest which may be acquired
through the exercise or conversion of such ownership interest or power;
(d) Any person who in the ordinary course of business is a pledgee
of ownership interest under a written pledge agreement shall not be
deemed to be the beneficial owner of such pledged ownership interest
until the pledgee has taken all formal steps necessary which are
required to declare a default and determines that the power to vote or
to direct the vote or to dispose or to direct the disposition of such
pledged ownership interest will be exercised; except that:
(i) The pledgee agreement is bona fide and was not entered into
with the purpose nor with the effect of changing or influencing the
control of the contractor, nor in connection with any transaction
having such purpose or effect, including persons meeting the conditions
set forth in (b) of this subsection; and
(ii) The pledgee agreement, prior to default, does not grant to the
pledgee:
(A) The power to vote or to direct the vote of the pledged
ownership interest; or
(B) The power to dispose or direct the disposition of the pledged
ownership interest, other than the grant of such power(s) pursuant to
a pledge agreement under which credit is extended and in which the
pledgee is a broker or dealer.
(8) "Capital" means depreciation, financing allowance, and taxes.
(9) "Capitalization" means the recording of an expenditure as an
asset.
(((9))) (10) "Case mix" means a measure of the intensity of care
and services needed by the residents of a nursing facility or a group
of residents in the facility.
(((10))) (11) "Case mix index" means a number representing the
average case mix of a nursing facility.
(((11))) (12) "Case mix weight" means a numeric score that
identifies the relative resources used by a particular group of a
nursing facility's residents.
(((12))) (13) "Certificate of capital authorization" means a
certification from the department for an allocation from the biennial
capital financing authorization for all new or replacement building
construction, or for major renovation projects, receiving a certificate
of need or a certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW
after July 1, 2001.
(((13))) (14) "Contractor" means a person or entity licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW to operate a medicare and medicaid certified nursing
facility, responsible for operational decisions, and contracting with
the department to provide services to medicaid recipients residing in
the facility.
(((14))) (15) "Default case" means no initial assessment has been
completed for a resident and transmitted to the department by the
cut-off date, or an assessment is otherwise past due for the resident,
under state and federal requirements.
(((15))) (16) "Department" means the department of social and
health services (DSHS) and its employees.
(((16))) (17) "Depreciation" means the systematic distribution of
the cost or other basis of tangible assets, less salvage, over the
estimated useful life of the assets.
(((17) "Direct care" means nursing care and related care provided
to nursing facility residents. Therapy care shall not be considered
part of direct care.))
(18) "Direct care one" means nursing care, including nurse aide
care, provided to nursing facility residents.
(19) "Direct care supplies" means medical, pharmaceutical, and
other supplies required for the direct care of a nursing facility's
residents.
(((19))) (20) "Direct care two" means food, food preparation,
dietary, housekeeping, laundry services, therapy, direct care supplies,
and nursing-related services not included in direct care one. Nursing-related services include, but are not limited to, nursing direction and
supervision, medical direction, medical records, pharmacy services,
activities, and social services.
(21) "Entity" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
limited liability company, or any other association of individuals
capable of entering enforceable contracts.
(((20))) (22) "Equity" means the net book value of all tangible and
intangible assets less the recorded value of all liabilities, as
recognized and measured in conformity with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(((21) "Essential community provider" means a facility which is the
only nursing facility within a commuting distance radius of at least
forty minutes duration, traveling by automobile.
(22))) (23) "Facility" or "nursing facility" means a nursing home
licensed in accordance with chapter 18.51 RCW, excepting nursing homes
certified as institutions for mental diseases, or that portion of a
multiservice facility licensed as a nursing home, or that portion of a
hospital licensed in accordance with chapter 70.41 RCW which operates
as a nursing home.
(((23))) (24) "Fair market value" means the replacement cost of an
asset less observed physical depreciation on the date for which the
market value is being determined.
(((24))) (25) "Financial statements" means statements prepared and
presented in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles
including, but not limited to, balance sheet, statement of operations,
statement of changes in financial position, and related notes.
(((25))) (26) "Generally accepted accounting principles" means
accounting principles approved by the financial accounting standards
board (FASB).
(((26))) (27) "Goodwill" means the excess of the price paid for a
nursing facility business over the fair market value of all net
identifiable tangible and intangible assets acquired, as measured in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
(((27))) (28) "Grouper" means a computer software product that
groups individual nursing facility residents into case mix
classification groups based on specific resident assessment data and
computer logic.
(((28))) (29) "High labor-cost county" means an urban county in
which the median allowable facility cost per case mix unit is more than
ten percent higher than the median allowable facility cost per case mix
unit among all other urban counties, excluding that county.
(((29))) (30) "Historical cost" means the actual cost incurred in
acquiring and preparing an asset for use, including feasibility
studies, architect's fees, and engineering studies.
(((30))) (31) "Home and central office costs" means costs that are
incurred in the support and operation of a home and central office.
Home and central office costs include centralized services that are
performed in support of a nursing facility. The department may exclude
from this definition costs that are nonduplicative, documented,
ordinary, necessary, and related to the provision of care services to
authorized patients.
(((31))) (32) "Imprest fund" means a fund which is regularly
replenished in exactly the amount expended from it.
(((32))) (33) "Joint facility costs" means any costs which
represent resources which benefit more than one facility, or one
facility and any other entity.
(((33))) (34) "Lease agreement" means a contract between two
parties for the possession and use of real or personal property or
assets for a specified period of time in exchange for specified
periodic payments. Elimination (due to any cause other than death or
divorce) or addition of any party to the contract, expiration, or
modification of any lease term in effect on January 1, 1980, or
termination of the lease by either party by any means shall constitute
a termination of the lease agreement. An extension or renewal of a
lease agreement, whether or not pursuant to a renewal provision in the
lease agreement, shall be considered a new lease agreement. A strictly
formal change in the lease agreement which modifies the method,
frequency, or manner in which the lease payments are made, but does not
increase the total lease payment obligation of the lessee, shall not be
considered modification of a lease term.
(((34))) (35) "Medicaid census" means the facility's total medicaid
days in a period divided by the facility's total resident days for the
same period, including medicaid managed care.
(36) "Medical care program" or "medicaid program" means medical
assistance, including nursing care, provided under RCW 74.09.500 or
authorized state medical care services.
(((35))) (37) "Medical care recipient," "medicaid recipient," or
"recipient" means an individual determined eligible by the department
for the services provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.
(((36))) (38) "Minimum data set" means the overall data component
of the resident assessment instrument, indicating the strengths, needs,
and preferences of an individual nursing facility resident.
(((37))) (39) "Net book value" means the historical cost of an
asset less accumulated depreciation.
(((38))) (40) "Net invested funds" means the net book value of
tangible fixed assets employed by a contractor to provide services
under the medical care program, including land, buildings, and
equipment as recognized and measured in conformity with generally
accepted accounting principles.
(((39))) (41) "Nonurban county" means a county which is not located
in a metropolitan statistical area as determined and defined by the
United States office of management and budget or other appropriate
agency or office of the federal government.
(((40))) (42) "Operating lease" means a lease under which rental or
lease expenses are included in current expenses in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles.
(((41))) (43) "Owner" means a sole proprietor, general or limited
partners, members of a limited liability company, and beneficial
interest holders of five percent or more of a corporation's outstanding
stock.
(((42))) (44) "Ownership interest" means all interests beneficially
owned by a person, calculated in the aggregate, regardless of the form
which such beneficial ownership takes.
(((43))) (45) "Patient day" or "resident day" means a calendar day
of care provided to a nursing facility resident, regardless of payment
source, which will include the day of admission and exclude the day of
discharge; except that, when admission and discharge occur on the same
day, one day of care shall be deemed to exist. A "medicaid day" or
"recipient day" means a calendar day of care provided to a medicaid
recipient determined eligible by the department for services provided
under chapter 74.09 RCW, subject to the same conditions regarding
admission and discharge applicable to a patient day or resident day of
care.
(((44))) (46) "Professionally designated real estate appraiser"
means an individual who is regularly engaged in the business of
providing real estate valuation services for a fee, and who is deemed
qualified by a nationally recognized real estate appraisal educational
organization on the basis of extensive practical appraisal experience,
including the writing of real estate valuation reports as well as the
passing of written examinations on valuation practice and theory, and
who by virtue of membership in such organization is required to
subscribe and adhere to certain standards of professional practice as
such organization prescribes.
(((45))) (47) "Qualified therapist" means:
(a) A mental health professional as defined by chapter 71.05 RCW;
(b) A mental retardation professional who is a therapist approved
by the department who has had specialized training or one year's
experience in treating or working with the mentally retarded or
developmentally disabled;
(c) A speech pathologist who is eligible for a certificate of
clinical competence in speech pathology or who has the equivalent
education and clinical experience;
(d) A physical therapist as defined by chapter 18.74 RCW;
(e) An occupational therapist who is a graduate of a program in
occupational therapy, or who has the equivalent of such education or
training; and
(f) A respiratory care practitioner certified under chapter 18.89
RCW.
(((46))) (48) "Rate" or "rate allocation" means the medicaid per-patient-day payment amount for medicaid patients calculated in
accordance with the allocation methodology set forth in part E of this
chapter.
(((47))) (49) "Real property," whether leased or owned by the
contractor, means the building, allowable land, land improvements, and
building improvements associated with a nursing facility.
(((48))) (50) "Rebased rate" or "cost-rebased rate" means a
facility-specific component rate assigned to a nursing facility for a
particular rate period established on desk-reviewed, adjusted costs
reported for that facility covering at least six months of a prior
calendar year designated as a year to be used for cost-rebasing payment
rate allocations under the provisions of this chapter.
(((49))) (51) "Records" means those data supporting all financial
statements and cost reports including, but not limited to, all general
and subsidiary ledgers, books of original entry, and transaction
documentation, however such data are maintained.
(((50))) (52) "Related organization" means an entity which is under
common ownership and/or control with, or has control of, or is
controlled by, the contractor.
(a) "Common ownership" exists when an entity is the beneficial
owner of five percent or more ownership interest in the contractor and
any other entity.
(b) "Control" exists where an entity has the power, directly or
indirectly, significantly to influence or direct the actions or
policies of an organization or institution, whether or not it is
legally enforceable and however it is exercisable or exercised.
(((51) "Related care" means only those services that are directly
related to providing direct care to nursing facility residents. These
services include, but are not limited to, nursing direction and
supervision, medical direction, medical records, pharmacy services,
activities, and social services.
(52))) (53) "Resident assessment instrument," including federally
approved modifications for use in this state, means a federally
mandated, comprehensive nursing facility resident care planning and
assessment tool, consisting of the minimum data set and resident
assessment protocols.
(((53))) (54) "Resident assessment protocols" means those
components of the resident assessment instrument that use the minimum
data set to trigger or flag a resident's potential problems and risk
areas.
(((54))) (55) "Resource utilization groups" means a case mix
classification system that identifies relative resources needed to care
for an individual nursing facility resident.
(((55))) (56) "Restricted fund" means those funds the principal
and/or income of which is limited by agreement with or direction of the
donor to a specific purpose.
(((56))) (57) "Seattle consumer price index" and "projected Seattle
consumer price index" means the most recently available actual or
projected percent change in the consumer price index for the
Seattle-Tacoma-Bremerton, Washington consolidated metropolitan
statistical area, as published by the Washington state economic and
revenue forecast council established under RCW 82.33.020.
(58) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services.
(((57) "Support services" means food, food preparation, dietary,
housekeeping, and laundry services provided to nursing facility
residents.
(58))) (59) "Therapy care" means those services required by a
nursing facility resident's comprehensive assessment and plan of care,
that are provided by qualified therapists, or support personnel under
their supervision, including related costs as designated by the
department.
(((59))) (60) "Title XIX" or "medicaid" means the 1965 amendments
to the social security act, P.L. 89-07, as amended and the medicaid
program administered by the department.
(((60))) (61) "Urban county" means a county which is located in a
metropolitan statistical area as determined and defined by the United
States office of management and budget or other appropriate agency or
office of the federal government.
(((61) "Vital local provider" means a facility reporting a home
office that meets the following qualifications:
(a) The home office address is located in Washington state; and
(b) The sum of medicaid days for all Washington facilities
reporting the home office as their home office was greater than two
hundred fifteen thousand in 2003.))

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.165 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Contractors shall be required to submit with each annual
nursing facility cost report a proposed settlement report showing
underspending or overspending in each component rate during the cost
report year on a per-resident day basis. The department shall accept
or reject the proposed settlement report, explain any adjustments, and
issue a revised settlement report if needed.
(2) Contractors shall not be required to refund payments made in
the operations, variable return, property, and financing allowance
component rates in excess of the adjusted costs of providing services
corresponding to these components.
(3) The facility will return to the department any overpayment
amounts in each of the direct care, therapy care, and support services
rate components that the department identifies following the audit and
settlement procedures as described in this chapter, provided that the
contractor may retain any overpayment that does not exceed 1.0% of the
facility's direct care, therapy care, and support services component
rate. However, no overpayments may be retained in a cost center to
which savings have been shifted to cover a deficit, as provided in
subsection (4) of this section. Facilities that are not in substantial
compliance for more than ninety days, and facilities that provide
substandard quality of care at any time, during the period for which
settlement is being calculated, will not be allowed to retain any
amount of overpayment in the facility's direct care, therapy care, and
support services component rate. The terms "not in substantial
compliance" and "substandard quality of care" shall be defined by
federal survey regulations.
(4) Determination of unused rate funds, including the amounts of
direct care, therapy care, and support services to be recovered, shall
be done separately for each component rate, and, except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, neither costs nor rate payments shall be
shifted from one component rate or corresponding service area to
another in determining the degree of underspending or recovery, if any.
In computing a preliminary or final settlement, savings in the support
services cost center shall be shifted to cover a deficit in the direct
care or therapy cost centers up to the amount of any savings, but no
more than twenty percent of the support services component rate may be
shifted. In computing a preliminary or final settlement, savings in
direct care and therapy care may be shifted to cover a deficit in these
two cost centers up to the amount of savings in each, regardless of the
percentage of either component rate shifted. Contractor-retained
overpayments up to one percent of direct care, therapy care, and
support services rate components, as authorized in subsection (3) of
this section, shall be calculated and applied after all shifting is
completed.
(5) Total and component payment rates assigned to a nursing
facility, as calculated and revised, if needed, under the provisions of
this chapter and those rules as the department may adopt, shall
represent the maximum payment for nursing facility services rendered to
medicaid recipients for the period the rates are in effect. No
increase in payment to a contractor shall result from spending above
the total payment rate or in any rate component.
(6) RCW 74.46.150 through 74.46.180, and rules adopted by the
department prior to July 1, 1998, shall continue to govern the medicaid
settlement process for periods prior to October 1, 1998, as if these
statutes and rules remained in full force and effect.
(7) For calendar year ((1998)) 2007, the department shall calculate
split settlements covering January 1, ((1998)) 2007, through
((September)) June 30, ((1998)) 2007, and ((October)) July 1, ((1998))
2007, through December 31, ((1998)) 2007. ((For the period beginning
October 1, 1998, rules specified in this chapter shall apply.)) The
department shall use the provisions of this section for the January 1,
2007, through June 30, 2007, settlement. The provisions of this
section shall not apply to rate settings or costs occurring July 1,
2007, or later. The department shall, by rule, determine the division
of calendar year ((1998)) 2007 adjusted costs for settlement purposes.
(8) This section expires December 31, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Contractors shall be required to submit with each annual
nursing facility cost report a proposed settlement report showing
underspending or overspending in each component rate during the cost
report year on a per resident day basis. The department shall accept
or reject the proposed settlement report, explain any adjustments, and
issue a revised settlement report if needed.
(2) Contractors shall not be required to refund payments made in
the operations, capital, and disproportionate medicaid component rates
in excess of the adjusted costs of providing services corresponding to
these components.
(3) The facility shall return to the department any overpayment
amounts in each of the direct care one and direct care two component
rates that the department identifies following the audit and settlement
procedures as described in this chapter, provided that the contractor
may retain any overpayment that does not exceed one percent of the
facility's direct care one and direct care two component rates.
Facilities that are not in substantial compliance for more than ninety
days, and facilities that provide substandard quality of care at any
time, during the period for which settlement is being calculated, will
not be allowed to retain any amount of overpayment in the facility's
direct care one and direct care two component rates. The terms "not in
substantial compliance" and "substandard quality of care" shall be
defined by federal survey regulations.
(4) Determination of unused rate funds, including the amounts of
direct care one and direct care two to be recovered, shall be done
separately for each component rate and neither costs nor rate payments
shall be shifted from one component rate or corresponding service area
to another in determining the degree of underspending or recovery, if
any.
(5) Total and component payment rates assigned to a nursing
facility, as calculated and revised, if needed, under the provisions of
this chapter and those rules as the department may adopt, shall
represent the maximum payment for nursing facility services rendered to
medicaid recipients for the period the rates are in effect. No
increase in payment to a contractor shall result from spending above
the total payment rate or in any component rate.
(6) RCW 74.46.165 and rules adopted by the department prior to July
1, 2007, shall continue to govern the medicaid settlement process for
periods prior to July 1, 2007, as if these statutes and rules remained
in full force and effect.
(7) For calendar year 2007, the department shall calculate split
settlements covering January 1, 2007, through June 30, 2007, and July
1, 2007, through December 31, 2007, under the provisions of this
section and RCW 74.46.165. The department shall, by rule, determine
the division of calendar year 2007 adjusted costs for settlement
purposes.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.46.431 and 2006 c 258 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations shall be facility-specific and shall have seven components:
Direct care, therapy care, support services, operations, property,
financing allowance, and variable return. The department shall
establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing
facility in this state.
(2) Component rate allocations in therapy care, support services,
variable return, operations, property, and financing allowance for
essential community providers as defined in this chapter shall be based
upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed
beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use. For all
facilities other than essential community providers, effective July 1,
2001, component rate allocations in direct care, therapy care, support
services, variable return, operations, property, and financing
allowance shall continue to be based upon a minimum facility occupancy
of eighty-five percent of licensed beds. For all facilities other than
essential community providers, effective July 1, 2002, the component
rate allocations in operations, property, and financing allowance shall
be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of ninety percent of
licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use. For
all facilities, effective July 1, 2006, the component rate allocation
in direct care shall be based upon actual facility occupancy.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, direct care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2006, direct care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report
data from 2003 will be used for July 1, 2006, and later direct care
component rate allocations.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1996 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(c) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1999 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(d) Direct care component rate allocations based on 2003 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 2006, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2005, therapy care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report
data from 1999 will continue to be used for July 1, 2005, and later
therapy care component rate allocations.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October
1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July
1, 2001, through June 30, 2005, support services component rate
allocations. Adjusted cost report data from 1999 will continue to be
used for July 1, 2005, and later support services component rate
allocations.
(b) Support services component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, operations component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2006, operations component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data
from 2003 will be used for July 1, 2006, and later operations component
rate allocations.
(b) Operations component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act. A different economic
trends and conditions adjustment factor or factors may be defined in
the biennial appropriations act for facilities whose operations
component rate is set equal to their adjusted June 30, 2006, rate, as
provided in RCW 74.46.521(4).
(8) For July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, a facility's
property and return on investment component rates shall be the
facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on investment component
rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999,
a facility's property and return on investment component rates shall be
rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.
(9) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(10) Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum
wage of the greater of the state minimum wage or the federal minimum
wage.
(11) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: The need to prorate inflation for
partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing
facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded
new bed capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of
ownership of the nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or
converting beds back into service, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(12) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(13) Effective July 1, 2001, medicaid rates shall continue to be
revised downward in all components, in accordance with department
rules, for facilities converting banked beds to active service under
chapter 70.38 RCW, by using the facility's increased licensed bed
capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting. However,
for facilities other than essential community providers which bank beds
under chapter 70.38 RCW, after May 25, 2001, medicaid rates shall be
revised upward, in accordance with department rules, in direct care,
therapy care, support services, and variable return components only, by
using the facility's decreased licensed bed capacity to recalculate
minimum occupancy for rate setting, but no upward revision shall be
made to operations, property, or financing allowance component rates.
The direct care component rate allocation shall be adjusted, without
using the minimum occupancy assumption, for facilities that convert
banked beds to active service, under chapter 70.38 RCW, beginning on
July 1, 2006.
(14) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of
need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have
a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and
(b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to
be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate
allocation.
(15) This section expires July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 2007, nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations shall be facility-specific and shall have five components:
(a) Direct care one, (b) direct care two, (c) operations, (d) capital,
and (e) disproportionate medicaid. The department shall establish and
adjust each of these components, as provided in this section and
elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing facility in this
state.
(2) Direct care one, direct care two, and operations component rate
allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Effective July 1, 2007, direct care one,
direct care two, and operations component rate allocations shall be
established using 2005 cost report data. The direct care one, direct
care two, and operations component rate allocations shall be rebased
biennially, so that effective July 1st of each odd year following 2007,
the direct care one, direct care two, and operations component rate
allocations shall be established using cost report data from the
preceding odd calendar year. For example, 2007 costs shall be used for
direct care one, direct care two, and operations component rate
allocations beginning July 1, 2009, and so forth.
(3) Direct care one, direct care two, and operations component rate
allocations shall be adjusted for economic trends and conditions by
five and one-quarter percent for the July 1, 2007, rate setting, and by
an additional three percent for the July 1, 2008, rate setting. Direct
care one, direct care two, and operations component rate allocations
shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and conditions by the
following factors in future years:
(a) For the July 1, 2009, rate setting, and for each rate setting
July 1st of subsequent odd-numbered years, the factor shall be set at:
(i) The sum of the projected Seattle consumer price index from the
midpoint of the cost year to the midpoint of the rate year. For
example, the factor used for the July 1, 2009, rate setting would be
the sum of half of the 2007 Seattle consumer price index, plus the
projected 2008 Seattle consumer price index, plus the projected 2009
Seattle consumer price index; and so forth.
(ii) If the sum calculated in (a)(i) of this subsection is greater
than six percent, the factor shall be six percent.
(iii) If the sum calculated in (a)(i) of this subsection is less
than five percent, the factor shall be five percent.
(b) For the July 1, 2010, rate setting, and for each rate setting
July 1st of subsequent even-numbered years, the factor shall be set at
the amount calculated in (a) of this subsection added to:
(i) The projected Seattle consumer price index from the calendar
year corresponding to the beginning of the rate year. For example, the
calendar year 2010 projected Seattle consumer price index for the July
1, 2010, rate setting; and so forth.
(ii) If the factor calculated in (b)(i) of this subsection is
greater than three percent, the factor shall be three percent.
(iii) If the factor calculated in (b)(ii) of this subsection is
less than two percent, the factor shall be two percent.
(4) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(5) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(6) Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum
wage of the greater of the state minimum wage or the federal minimum
wage.
(7) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to the need to prorate inflation for
partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing
facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded
new bed capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of
ownership of the nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or
converting beds back into service, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(8) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(9) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of
need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have
a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and
(b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to
be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate
allocation.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.46.433 and 2006 c 258 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish for each medicaid nursing
facility a variable return component rate allocation. In determining
the variable return allowance:
(a) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, the variable
return array and percentage shall be assigned whenever rebasing of
noncapital rate allocations is scheduled under RCW 74.46.431 (4), (5),
(6), and (7).
(b) To calculate the array of facilities for the July 1, 2001, rate
setting, the department, without using peer groups, shall first rank
all facilities in numerical order from highest to lowest according to
each facility's examined and documented, but unlidded, combined direct
care, therapy care, support services, and operations per resident day
cost from the 1999 cost report period. However, before being combined
with other per resident day costs and ranked, a facility's direct care
cost per resident day shall be adjusted to reflect its facility average
case mix index, to be averaged from the four calendar quarters of 1999,
weighted by the facility's resident days from each quarter, under RCW
74.46.501(7)(b)(ii). The array shall then be divided into four
quartiles, each containing, as nearly as possible, an equal number of
facilities, and four percent shall be assigned to facilities in the
lowest quartile, three percent to facilities in the next lowest
quartile, two percent to facilities in the next highest quartile, and
one percent to facilities in the highest quartile.
(c) The department shall, subject to (d) of this subsection,
compute the variable return allowance by multiplying a facility's
assigned percentage by the sum of the facility's direct care, therapy
care, support services, and operations component rates determined in
accordance with this chapter and rules adopted by the department.
(d) Effective July 1, 2001, if a facility's examined and documented
direct care cost per resident day for the preceding report year is
lower than its average direct care component rate weighted by medicaid
resident days for the same year, the facility's direct care cost shall
be substituted for its July 1, 2001, direct care component rate, and
its variable return component rate shall be determined or adjusted each
July 1st by multiplying the facility's assigned percentage by the sum
of the facility's July 1, 2001, therapy care, support services, and
operations component rates, and its direct care cost per resident day
for the preceding year.
(e) Effective July 1, 2006, the variable return component rate
allocation for each facility shall be the facility's June 30, 2006,
variable return component rate allocation.
(2) The variable return rate allocation calculated in accordance
with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply
with RCW 74.46.421.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 2007, the department shall establish for each
medicaid nursing facility a disproportionate medicaid component rate
allocation.
(2) The disproportionate medicaid array and percentage shall be
assigned whenever rebasing of the direct care one, direct care two, and
operations component rates is scheduled to occur.
(3) The disproportionate medicaid component rate allocation shall
be determined as follows:
(a) To calculate the array of facilities, the department, without
using peer groups, shall first rank all facilities in numerical order
from highest to lowest according to each facility's medicaid census
from the rebase year. The array shall then be divided into four
quartiles, each containing, as nearly as possible, an equal number of
facilities, and four percent shall be assigned to facilities in the
highest quartile, three percent to facilities in the next highest
quartile, two percent to facilities in the next lowest quartile, and
one percent to facilities in the lowest quartile.
(b) The department shall compute the disproportionate medicaid
component rate by multiplying a facility's assigned percentage
calculated in this subsection (3)(b) by the sum of the facility's
direct care one, direct care two, and operations component rates
determined in accordance with this chapter and rules adopted by the
department.
(4) The disproportionate medicaid rate allocation calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.46.435 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 2001, the property component rate allocation
for each facility shall be determined by dividing the sum of the
reported allowable prior period actual depreciation, subject to RCW
74.46.310 through 74.46.380, adjusted for any capitalized additions or
replacements approved by the department, and the retained savings from
such cost center, by the greater of a facility's total resident days
for the facility in the prior period or resident days as calculated on
eighty-five percent facility occupancy. Effective July 1, 2002, the
property component rate allocation for all facilities, except essential
community providers, shall be set by using the greater of a facility's
total resident days from the most recent cost report period or resident
days calculated at ninety percent facility occupancy. If a capitalized
addition or retirement of an asset will result in a different licensed
bed capacity during the ensuing period, the prior period total resident
days used in computing the property component rate shall be adjusted to
anticipated resident day level.
(2) A nursing facility's property component rate allocation shall
be rebased annually, effective July 1st, in accordance with this
section and this chapter.
(3) When a certificate of need for a new facility is requested, the
department, in reaching its decision, shall take into consideration
per-bed land and building construction costs for the facility which
shall not exceed a maximum to be established by the secretary.
(4) Effective July 1, 2001, for the purpose of calculating a
nursing facility's property component rate, if a contractor has elected
to bank licensed beds prior to April 1, 2001, or elects to convert
banked beds to active service at any time, under chapter 70.38 RCW, the
department shall use the facility's new licensed bed capacity to
recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting and revise the property
component rate, as needed, effective as of the date the beds are banked
or converted to active service. However, in no case shall the
department use less than eighty-five percent occupancy of the
facility's licensed bed capacity after banking or conversion.
Effective July 1, 2002, in no case, other than essential community
providers, shall the department use less than ninety percent occupancy
of the facility's licensed bed capacity after conversion.
(5) The property component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2007.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.46.437 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 1999, the department shall establish for each
medicaid nursing facility a financing allowance component rate
allocation. The financing allowance component rate shall be rebased
annually, effective July 1st, in accordance with the provisions of this
section and this chapter.
(2) Effective July 1, 2001, the financing allowance shall be
determined by multiplying the net invested funds of each facility by
.10, and dividing by the greater of a nursing facility's total resident
days from the most recent cost report period or resident days
calculated on eighty-five percent facility occupancy. Effective July
1, 2002, the financing allowance component rate allocation for all
facilities, other than essential community providers, shall be set by
using the greater of a facility's total resident days from the most
recent cost report period or resident days calculated at ninety percent
facility occupancy. However, assets acquired on or after May 17, 1999,
shall be grouped in a separate financing allowance calculation that
shall be multiplied by .085. The financing allowance factor of .085
shall not be applied to the net invested funds pertaining to new
construction or major renovations receiving certificate of need
approval or an exemption from certificate of need requirements under
chapter 70.38 RCW, or to working drawings that have been submitted to
the department of health for construction review approval, prior to May
17, 1999. If a capitalized addition, renovation, replacement, or
retirement of an asset will result in a different licensed bed capacity
during the ensuing period, the prior period total resident days used in
computing the financing allowance shall be adjusted to the greater of
the anticipated resident day level or eighty-five percent of the new
licensed bed capacity. Effective July 1, 2002, for all facilities,
other than essential community providers, the total resident days used
to compute the financing allowance after a capitalized addition,
renovation, replacement, or retirement of an asset shall be set by
using the greater of a facility's total resident days from the most
recent cost report period or resident days calculated at ninety percent
facility occupancy.
(3) In computing the portion of net invested funds representing the
net book value of tangible fixed assets, the same assets, depreciation
bases, lives, and methods referred to in RCW 74.46.330, 74.46.350,
74.46.360, 74.46.370, and 74.46.380, including owned and leased assets,
shall be utilized, except that the capitalized cost of land upon which
the facility is located and such other contiguous land which is
reasonable and necessary for use in the regular course of providing
resident care shall also be included. Subject to provisions and
limitations contained in this chapter, for land purchased by owners or
lessors before July 18, 1984, capitalized cost of land shall be the
buyer's capitalized cost. For all partial or whole rate periods after
July 17, 1984, if the land is purchased after July 17, 1984,
capitalized cost shall be that of the owner of record on July 17, 1984,
or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is lower. In the case of leased
facilities where the net invested funds are unknown or the contractor
is unable to provide necessary information to determine net invested
funds, the secretary shall have the authority to determine an amount
for net invested funds based on an appraisal conducted according to RCW
74.46.360(1).
(4) Effective July 1, 2001, for the purpose of calculating a
nursing facility's financing allowance component rate, if a contractor
has elected to bank licensed beds prior to May 25, 2001, or elects to
convert banked beds to active service at any time, under chapter 70.38
RCW, the department shall use the facility's new licensed bed capacity
to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting and revise the
financing allowance component rate, as needed, effective as of the date
the beds are banked or converted to active service. However, in no
case shall the department use less than eighty-five percent occupancy
of the facility's licensed bed capacity after banking or conversion.
Effective July 1, 2002, in no case, other than for essential community
providers, shall the department use less than ninety percent occupancy
of the facility's licensed bed capacity after conversion.
(5) The financing allowance rate allocation calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 2007, the department shall establish for each
medicaid nursing facility a capital component rate allocation. The
capital component rate shall be rebased annually, effective July 1st,
in accordance with the provisions of this section and this chapter.
(2) The capital component rate allocation for each facility shall
be determined by:
(a) Summing the following:
(i) The sum of the reported allowable prior period actual
depreciation, subject to RCW 74.46.310 through 74.46.380, adjusted for
any capitalized additions or replacements approved by the department,
and the retained savings from such cost center;
(ii) For net invested funds acquired prior to May 17, 1999, and for
net invested funds pertaining to new construction or major renovations
receiving certificate of need approval or an exemption from certificate
of need requirements under chapter 70.38 RCW, and for working drawings
that have been submitted to the department of health for construction
review approval, prior to May 17, 1999, the facility's net invested
funds multiplied by .10;
(iii) For net invested funds acquired on or after May 17, 1999 and
not otherwise included in (a)(ii) of this subsection, the facility's
net invested funds multiplied by .085;
(iv) The sum of reported real estate, personal property, and
business and occupation taxes. Any taxes paid as a quality maintenance
fee under RCW 82.71.020 shall not be included in this sum;
(b) Dividing the sum calculated in (a) of this subsection by the
facility's actual resident days. If a capitalized addition or
retirement of an asset will result in a different licensed bed capacity
during the ensuing period, the prior period total resident days used in
computing the property component rate shall be adjusted to anticipated
resident day level.
(3) In computing the portion of net invested funds representing the
net book value of tangible fixed assets, the same assets, depreciation
bases, lives, and methods referred to in RCW 74.46.330, 74.46.350,
74.46.360, 74.46.370, and 74.46.380, including owned and leased assets,
shall be utilized, except that the capitalized cost of land upon which
the facility is located and such other contiguous land which is
reasonable and necessary for use in the regular course of providing
resident care shall also be included. Subject to provisions and
limitations contained in this chapter, for land purchased by owners or
lessors before July 18, 1984, capitalized cost of land shall be the
buyer's capitalized cost. For all partial or whole rate periods after
July 17, 1984, if the land is purchased after July 17, 1984,
capitalized cost shall be that of the owner of record on July 17, 1984,
or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is lower. In the case of leased
facilities where the net invested funds are unknown or the contractor
is unable to provide necessary information to determine net invested
funds, the secretary shall have the authority to determine an amount
for net invested funds based on an appraisal conducted according to RCW
74.46.360(1).
(4) When a certificate of need for a new facility is requested, the
department, in reaching its decision, shall take into consideration per
bed land and building construction costs for the facility which shall
not exceed a maximum to be established by the secretary.
(5) The capital component rate allocations calculated in accordance
with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply
with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 11 RCW 74.46.439 and 1999 c 353 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In the case of a facility that was leased by the contractor as
of January 1, 1980, in an arm's-length agreement, which continues to be
leased under the same lease agreement, and for which the annualized
lease payment, plus any interest and depreciation expenses associated
with contractor-owned assets, for the period covered by the prospective
rates, divided by the contractor's total resident days, minus the
property component rate allocation, is more than the sum of the
financing allowance and the variable return rate determined according
to this chapter, the following shall apply:
(a) The financing allowance shall be recomputed substituting the
fair market value of the assets as of January 1, 1982, as determined by
the department of general administration through an appraisal
procedure, less accumulated depreciation on the lessor's assets since
January 1, 1982, for the net book value of the assets in determining
net invested funds for the facility. A determination by the department
of general administration of fair market value shall be final unless
the procedure used to make such a determination is shown to be
arbitrary and capricious.
(b) The sum of the financing allowance computed under (a) of this
subsection and the variable return rate shall be compared to the
annualized lease payment, plus any interest and depreciation associated
with contractor-owned assets, for the period covered by the prospective
rates, divided by the contractor's total resident days, minus the
property component rate. The lesser of the two amounts shall be called
the alternate return on investment rate.
(c) The sum of the financing allowance and variable return rate
determined according to this chapter or the alternate return on
investment rate, whichever is greater, shall be added to the
prospective rates of the contractor.
(2) In the case of a facility that was leased by the contractor as
of January 1, 1980, in an arm's-length agreement, if the lease is
renewed or extended under a provision of the lease, the treatment
provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be applied, except
that in the case of renewals or extensions made subsequent to April 1,
1985, reimbursement for the annualized lease payment shall be no
greater than the reimbursement for the annualized lease payment for the
last year prior to the renewal or extension of the lease.
(3) The alternate return on investment component rate allocations
calculated in accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the
extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2007.

Sec. 12 RCW 74.46.496 and 2006 c 258 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each case mix classification group shall be assigned a case mix
weight. The case mix weight for each resident of a nursing facility
for each calendar quarter shall be based on data from resident
assessment instruments completed for the resident and weighted by the
number of days the resident was in each case mix classification group.
Days shall be counted as provided in this section.
(2) The case mix weights shall be based on the average minutes per
registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, and certified nurse aide,
for each case mix group, and using the health care financing
administration of the United States department of health and human
services 1995 nursing facility staff time measurement study stemming
from its multistate nursing home case mix and quality demonstration
project. Those minutes shall be weighted by statewide ratios of
registered nurse to certified nurse aide, and licensed practical nurse
to certified nurse aide, wages, including salaries and benefits, which
shall be based on 1995 cost report data for this state.
(3) The case mix weights shall be determined as follows:
(a) Set the certified nurse aide wage weight at 1.000 and calculate
wage weights for registered nurse and licensed practical nurse average
wages by dividing the certified nurse aide average wage into the
registered nurse average wage and licensed practical nurse average
wage;
(b) Calculate the total weighted minutes for each case mix group in
the resource utilization group III classification system by multiplying
the wage weight for each worker classification by the average number of
minutes that classification of worker spends caring for a resident in
that resource utilization group III classification group, and summing
the products;
(c) Assign a case mix weight of 1.000 to the resource utilization
group III classification group with the lowest total weighted minutes
and calculate case mix weights by dividing the lowest group's total
weighted minutes into each group's total weighted minutes and rounding
weight calculations to the third decimal place.
(4) The case mix weights in this state may be revised if the health
care financing administration updates its nursing facility staff time
measurement studies. The case mix weights shall be revised, but only
when direct care one component rates are cost-rebased as provided in
subsection (5) of this section, to be effective on the July 1st
effective date of each cost-rebased direct care one component rate.
However, the department may revise case mix weights more frequently if,
and only if, significant variances in wage ratios occur among direct
care one staff in the different caregiver classifications identified in
this section.
(5) Case mix weights shall be revised when direct care one
component rates are cost-rebased as provided in ((RCW 74.46.431(4)))
section 5(2) of this act.

Sec. 13 RCW 74.46.501 and 2006 c 258 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) From individual case mix weights for the applicable quarter,
the department shall determine two average case mix indexes for each
medicaid nursing facility, one for all residents in the facility, known
as the facility average case mix index, and one for medicaid residents,
known as the medicaid average case mix index.
(2)(a) In calculating a facility's two average case mix indexes for
each quarter, the department shall include all residents or medicaid
residents, as applicable, who were physically in the facility during
the quarter in question based on the resident assessment instrument
completed by the facility and the requirements and limitations for the
instrument's completion and transmission (January 1st through March
31st, April 1st through June 30th, July 1st through September 30th, or
October 1st through December 31st).
(b) The facility average case mix index shall exclude all default
cases as defined in this chapter. However, the medicaid average case
mix index shall include all default cases.
(3) Both the facility average and the medicaid average case mix
indexes shall be determined by multiplying the case mix weight of each
resident, or each medicaid resident, as applicable, by the number of
days, as defined in this section and as applicable, the resident was at
each particular case mix classification or group, and then averaging.
(4)(a) In determining the number of days a resident is classified
into a particular case mix group, the department shall determine a
start date for calculating case mix grouping periods as follows:
(i) If a resident's initial assessment for a first stay or a return
stay in the nursing facility is timely completed and transmitted to the
department by the cutoff date under state and federal requirements and
as described in subsection (5) of this section, the start date shall be
the later of either the first day of the quarter or the resident's
facility admission or readmission date;
(ii) If a resident's significant change, quarterly, or annual
assessment is timely completed and transmitted to the department by the
cutoff date under state and federal requirements and as described in
subsection (5) of this section, the start date shall be the date the
assessment is completed;
(iii) If a resident's significant change, quarterly, or annual
assessment is not timely completed and transmitted to the department by
the cutoff date under state and federal requirements and as described
in subsection (5) of this section, the start date shall be the due date
for the assessment.
(b) If state or federal rules require more frequent assessment, the
same principles for determining the start date of a resident's
classification in a particular case mix group set forth in subsection
(4)(a) of this section shall apply.
(c) In calculating the number of days a resident is classified into
a particular case mix group, the department shall determine an end date
for calculating case mix grouping periods as follows:
(i) If a resident is discharged before the end of the applicable
quarter, the end date shall be the day before discharge;
(ii) If a resident is not discharged before the end of the
applicable quarter, the end date shall be the last day of the quarter;
(iii) If a new assessment is due for a resident or a new assessment
is completed and transmitted to the department, the end date of the
previous assessment shall be the earlier of either the day before the
assessment is due or the day before the assessment is completed by the
nursing facility.
(5) The cutoff date for the department to use resident assessment
data, for the purposes of calculating both the facility average and the
medicaid average case mix indexes, and for establishing and updating a
facility's direct care one component rate, shall be one month and one
day after the end of the quarter for which the resident assessment data
applies.
(6) A threshold of ninety percent, as described and calculated in
this subsection, shall be used to determine the case mix index each
quarter. The threshold shall also be used to determine which
facilities' costs per case mix unit are included in determining the
ceiling, floor, and price. ((For direct care component rate
allocations established on and after July 1, 2006,)) The threshold of
ninety percent shall be used to determine the case mix index each
quarter and to determine which facilities' costs per case mix unit are
included in determining the ceiling and price. If the facility does
not meet the ninety percent threshold, the department may use an
alternate case mix index to determine the facility average and medicaid
average case mix indexes for the quarter. The threshold is a count of
unique minimum data set assessments, and it shall include resident
assessment instrument tracking forms for residents discharged prior to
completing an initial assessment. The threshold is calculated by
dividing a facility's count of residents being assessed by the average
census for the facility. A daily census shall be reported by each
nursing facility as it transmits assessment data to the department.
The department shall compute a quarterly average census based on the
daily census. If no census has been reported by a facility during a
specified quarter, then the department shall use the facility's
licensed beds as the denominator in computing the threshold.
(7)(a) Although the facility average and the medicaid average case
mix indexes shall both be calculated quarterly, the facility average
case mix index will be used throughout the applicable cost-rebasing
period in combination with cost report data as specified by ((RCW
74.46.431)) section 5 of this act and RCW 74.46.506, to establish a
facility's allowable cost per case mix unit. A facility's medicaid
average case mix index shall be used to update a nursing facility's
direct care one component rate quarterly.
(b) The facility average case mix index used to establish each
nursing facility's direct care one component rate shall be based on an
average of calendar quarters of the facility's average case mix
indexes.
(((i) For October 1, 1998, direct care component rates, the
department shall use an average of facility average case mix indexes
from the four calendar quarters of 1997.
(ii) For July 1, 2001, direct care component rates, the department
shall use an average of facility average case mix indexes from the four
calendar quarters of 1999.
(iii))) Beginning on July 1, 2006, when establishing the direct
care one component rates, the department shall use an average of
facility case mix indexes from the four calendar quarters occurring
during the cost report period used to rebase the direct care component
rate allocations as specified in ((RCW 74.46.431)) section 5 of this
act.
(c) The medicaid average case mix index used to update or
recalibrate a nursing facility's direct care one component rate
quarterly shall be from the calendar quarter commencing six months
prior to the effective date of the quarterly rate. For example,
((October)) July 1, ((1998)) 2007, through ((December 31, 1998))
September 30, 2007, direct care component rates shall utilize case mix
averages from the ((April)) January 1, ((1998)) 2007, through ((June))
March 30, ((1998)) 2007, calendar quarter, and so forth.

Sec. 14 RCW 74.46.506 and 2006 c 258 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The direct care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of nursing care for one resident of a nursing facility for
one day, including direct care supplies. Therapy services and
supplies, which correspond to the therapy care component rate, shall be
excluded. The direct care component rate includes elements of case mix
determined consistent with the principles of this section and other
applicable provisions of this chapter.
(2) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine and
update quarterly for each nursing facility serving medicaid residents
a facility-specific per-resident day direct care component rate
allocation, to be effective on the first day of each calendar quarter.
In determining direct care component rates the department shall
utilize, as specified in this section, minimum data set resident
assessment data for each resident of the facility, as transmitted to,
and if necessary corrected by, the department in the resident
assessment instrument format approved by federal authorities for use in
this state.
(3) The department may question the accuracy of assessment data for
any resident and utilize corrected or substitute information, however
derived, in determining direct care component rates. The department is
authorized to impose civil fines and to take adverse rate actions
against a contractor, as specified by the department in rule, in order
to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data transmission
requirements and to ensure accuracy.
(4) Cost report data used in setting direct care component rate
allocations shall be 1996, 1999, and 2003 for rate periods as specified
in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a).
(5) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall rebase each
nursing facility's direct care component rate allocation as described
in RCW 74.46.431, adjust its direct care component rate allocation for
economic trends and conditions as described in RCW 74.46.431, and
update its medicaid average case mix index, consistent with the
following:
(a) Reduce total direct care costs reported by each nursing
facility for the applicable cost report period specified in RCW
74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments, and to eliminate
reported resident therapy costs and adjustments, in order to derive the
facility's total allowable direct care cost;
(b) Divide each facility's total allowable direct care cost by its
adjusted resident days for the same report period, increased if
necessary to a minimum occupancy of eighty-five percent; that is, the
greater of actual or imputed occupancy at eighty-five percent of
licensed beds, to derive the facility's allowable direct care cost per
resident day. However, effective July 1, 2006, each facility's
allowable direct care costs shall be divided by its adjusted resident
days without application of a minimum occupancy assumption;
(c) Adjust the facility's per resident day direct care cost by the
applicable factor specified in RCW 74.46.431(4) (b), (c), and (d) to
derive its adjusted allowable direct care cost per resident day;
(d) Divide each facility's adjusted allowable direct care cost per
resident day by the facility average case mix index for the applicable
quarters specified by RCW 74.46.501(7)(b) to derive the facility's
allowable direct care one cost per case mix unit;
(e) Effective for July 1, 2001, rate setting, divide nursing
facilities into at least two and, if applicable, three peer groups:
Those located in nonurban counties; those located in high labor-cost
counties, if any; and those located in other urban counties;
(f) Array separately the allowable direct care cost per case mix
unit for all facilities in nonurban counties; for all facilities in
high labor-cost counties, if applicable; and for all facilities in
other urban counties, and determine the median allowable direct care
one cost per case mix unit for each peer group;
(g) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from October 1,
1998, through June 30, 2000, determine each facility's quarterly direct
care component rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per
case mix unit equal to eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group
median, and shall have a direct care one component rate allocation
equal to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by
that facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable
quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group median, and
shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is
between eighty-five and one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group
median established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct
care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost
per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case
mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(h) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from July 1,
2000, through June 30, 2006, determine each facility's quarterly direct
care component rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than ninety percent of the facility's peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to ninety percent of the facility's peer group median, and shall
have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's
assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid
average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred ten percent of the peer group median established under
(f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit equal
to one hundred ten percent of the peer group median, and shall have a
direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's assigned
cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average
case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is
between ninety and one hundred ten percent of the peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct care
component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost per
case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(i)(i) Between October 1, 1998, and June 30, 2000, the department
shall compare each facility's direct care component rate allocation
calculated under (g) of this subsection with the facility's nursing
services component rate in effect on September 30, 1998, less therapy
costs, plus any exceptional care offsets as reported on the cost
report, adjusted for economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW
74.46.431. A facility shall receive the higher of the two rates.
(ii) Between July 1, 2000, and June 30, 2002, the department shall
compare each facility's direct care component rate allocation
calculated under (h) of this subsection with the facility's direct care
component rate in effect on June 30, 2000. A facility shall receive
the higher of the two rates. Between July 1, 2001, and June 30, 2002,
if during any quarter a facility whose rate paid under (h) of this
subsection is greater than either the direct care rate in effect on
June 30, 2000, or than that facility's allowable direct care cost per
case mix unit calculated in (d) of this subsection multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c), the facility shall be paid in that
and each subsequent quarter pursuant to (h) of this subsection and
shall not be entitled to the greater of the two rates.
(iii) Between July 1, 2002, and June 30, 2006, all direct care
component rate allocations shall be as determined under (h) of this
subsection.
(iv) Effective July 1, 2006, for all providers, except vital local
providers as defined in this chapter, all direct care component rate
allocations shall be as determined under (j) of this subsection.
(v) Effective July 1, 2006, for vital local providers, as defined
in this chapter, direct care component rate allocations shall be
determined as follows:
(A) The department shall calculate:
(I) The sum of each facility's July 1, 2006, direct care component
rate allocation calculated under (j) of this subsection and July 1,
2006, operations component rate calculated under RCW 74.46.521; and
(II) The sum of each facility's June 30, 2006, direct care and
operations component rates.
(B) If the sum calculated under (i)(v)(A)(I) of this subsection is
less than the sum calculated under (i)(v)(A)(II) of this subsection,
the facility shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal
to the facility's June 30, 2006, direct care component rate allocation.
(C) If the sum calculated under (i)(v)(A)(I) of this subsection is
greater than or equal to the sum calculated under (i)(v)(A)(II) of this
subsection, the facility's direct care component rate shall be
calculated under (j) of this subsection;
(j) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from July 1,
2006, forward, and for all future rate setting, determine each
facility's quarterly direct care component rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred twelve percent of the peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to one hundred twelve percent of the peer group median, and shall
have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's
assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid
average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than or equal to one hundred twelve percent of the peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct care
component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost per
case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c).
(6) The direct care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) Costs related to payments resulting from increases in direct
care component rates, granted under authority of RCW 74.46.508(1) for
a facility's exceptional care residents, shall be offset against the
facility's examined, allowable direct care costs, for each report year
or partial period such increases are paid. Such reductions in
allowable direct care costs shall be for rate setting, settlement, and
other purposes deemed appropriate by the department.
(8) This section expires July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 2007, the department shall establish for each
medicaid nursing facility a direct care one component rate allocation.
The direct care one component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of nursing care for one resident of a nursing facility for
one day, and includes only costs associated with hours of care provided
by nurses and nurse aides. The direct care one component rate includes
elements of case mix determined consistent with the principles of this
section and other applicable provisions of this chapter.
(2) The department shall determine and update quarterly for each
nursing facility serving medicaid residents a facility-specific per
resident day direct care one component rate allocation, to be effective
on the first day of each calendar quarter. In determining direct care
one component rates the department shall utilize, as specified in this
section, minimum data set resident assessment data for each resident of
the facility, as transmitted to, and if necessary corrected by, the
department in the resident assessment instrument format approved by
federal authorities for use in this state.
(3) The department may question the accuracy of assessment data for
any resident and utilize corrected or substitute information, however
derived, in determining direct care one component rates. The
department is authorized to impose civil fines and to take adverse rate
actions against a contractor, as specified by the department in rule,
in order to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data
transmission requirements and to ensure accuracy.
(4) Cost report data used in setting direct care one component rate
allocations shall be as specified in section 5(2) of this act.
(5) The department shall rebase each nursing facility's direct care
one component rate allocation biennially as specified in section 5(2)
of this act, adjust its direct care one component rate allocation for
economic trends and conditions as described in section 5(3) of this
act, and update its medicaid average case mix index, consistent with
the following:
(a) Reduce total direct care one costs reported by each nursing
facility for the applicable cost report period specified in section
5(2) of this act to reflect any department adjustments, in order to
derive the facility's total allowable direct care one cost;
(b) Divide each facility's total allowable direct care one cost by
its adjusted resident days for the same report period;
(c) Adjust the facility's per resident day direct care one cost by
the economic trends and conditions factor established under section
5(2) of this act to derive its adjusted allowable direct care cost per
resident day;
(d) Divide each facility's adjusted allowable direct care one cost
per resident day by the facility average case mix index for the
applicable quarters specified by RCW 74.46.501(7)(b) to derive the
facility's allowable direct care cost per case mix unit;
(e) Divide nursing facilities into at least two and, if applicable,
three peer groups: (i) Those located in nonurban counties; (ii) those
located in high labor-cost counties, if any; and (iii) those located in
other urban counties;
(f) Array separately the allowable direct care one cost per case
mix unit for all facilities in nonurban counties; for all facilities in
high labor-cost counties, if applicable; and for all facilities in
other urban counties, and determine the median allowable direct care
cost per case mix unit for each peer group;
(g) Determine each facility's quarterly direct care one component
rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred twelve percent of the peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to one hundred twelve percent of the peer group median, and shall
have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's
assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid
average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than or equal to one hundred twelve percent of the peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct care one
component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost per
case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c).
(6) The direct care one component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) Costs related to payments resulting from increases in direct
care one component rates, granted under authority of RCW 74.46.508(1)
for a facility's exceptional care residents or section 16 of this act,
shall be offset against the facility's examined, allowable direct care
one costs, for each report year or partial period such increases are
paid. Such reductions in allowable direct care one costs shall be for
rate setting, settlement, and other purposes deemed appropriate by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall grant an add-on to the direct care one
component rate allocation for nursing facilities meeting the following
criteria:
(a) For the July 1, 2007, rate setting, the nursing facility's
direct care one cost per case mix unit, as established in section 15 of
this act, is less than one hundred twelve percent of the median cost
per case mix unit for that facility's direct care one peer group; and
(b) The nursing facility's medicaid census was sixty percent or
greater in calendar year 2005.
(2) The amount of the add-on shall be calculated in the following
manner:
(a) Determine the difference between the facility's direct care one
cost per case mix unit and the cost per case mix unit set at one
hundred twelve percent of the median for that facility's direct care
one peer group, as of the July 1, 2007, rate setting; and
(b) Multiply the difference determined in (a) of this subsection by
the facility's medicaid case mix score as of July 1, 2007; and
(c) Multiply the product determined in (b) of this subsection by
fifty percent; and
(d) Multiply the product determined in (c) of this subsection by
the facility's medicaid census for the calendar year 2005.
(3) The amount of the add-on granted in this section shall be added
to the facility's direct care one rate, and the direct care one rate
including the add-on shall be subject to the settlement process
established in section 3 of this act.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2011.

Sec. 17 RCW 74.46.508 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 6 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to increase the direct care one
and direct care two component rate allocations calculated under ((RCW
74.46.506(5))) this chapter for residents who have unmet exceptional
care needs as determined by the department in rule. The department
may, by rule, establish criteria, patient categories, and methods of
exceptional care payment.
(2) The department may by July 1, 2003, adopt rules and implement
a system of exceptional care payments for therapy care.
(a) Payments may be made on behalf of facility residents who are
under age sixty-five, not eligible for medicare, and can achieve
significant progress in their functional status if provided with
intensive therapy care services.
(b) Payments may be made only after approval of a rehabilitation
plan of care for each resident on whose behalf a payment is made under
this subsection, and each resident's progress must be periodically
monitored.

Sec. 18 RCW 74.46.511 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The therapy care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of medicaid one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified
therapist as defined in this chapter, including therapy supplies and
therapy consultation, for one day for one medicaid resident of a
nursing facility. The therapy care component rate allocation for
October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, shall be based on adjusted
therapy costs and days from calendar year 1996. The therapy component
rate allocation for July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2004, shall be based
on adjusted therapy costs and days from calendar year 1999. The
therapy care component rate shall be adjusted for economic trends and
conditions as specified in RCW 74.46.431(5)(b), and shall be determined
in accordance with this section.
(2) In rebasing, as provided in RCW 74.46.431(5)(a), the department
shall take from the cost reports of facilities the following reported
information:
(a) Direct one-on-one therapy charges for all residents by payer
including charges for supplies;
(b) The total units or modules of therapy care for all residents by
type of therapy provided, for example, speech or physical. A unit or
module of therapy care is considered to be fifteen minutes of one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified therapist or support personnel; and
(c) Therapy consulting expenses for all residents.
(3) The department shall determine for all residents the total cost
per unit of therapy for each type of therapy by dividing the total
adjusted one-on-one therapy expense for each type by the total units
provided for that therapy type.
(4) The department shall divide medicaid nursing facilities in this
state into two peer groups:
(a) Those facilities located within urban counties; and
(b) Those located within nonurban counties.
The department shall array the facilities in each peer group from
highest to lowest based on their total cost per unit of therapy for
each therapy type. The department shall determine the median total
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type and add ten percent of
median total cost per unit of therapy. The cost per unit of therapy
for each therapy type at a nursing facility shall be the lesser of its
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type or the median total cost
per unit plus ten percent for each therapy type for its peer group.
(5) The department shall calculate each nursing facility's therapy
care component rate allocation as follows:
(a) To determine the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy
type, the allowable cost per unit of therapy for each type of therapy
shall be multiplied by the total therapy units for each type of
therapy;
(b) The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense shall be
calculated taking the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy
type times the medicaid percent of total therapy charges for each
therapy type;
(c) The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense for each
therapy type shall be divided by total adjusted medicaid days to arrive
at the medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each
therapy type;
(d) The medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each
therapy type shall be multiplied by total adjusted patient days for all
residents to calculate the total allowable one-on-one therapy expense.
The lesser of the total allowable therapy consultant expense for the
therapy type or a reasonable percentage of allowable therapy consultant
expense for each therapy type, as established in rule by the
department, shall be added to the total allowable one-on-one therapy
expense to determine the allowable therapy cost for each therapy type;
(e) The allowable therapy cost for each therapy type shall be added
together, the sum of which shall be the total allowable therapy expense
for the nursing facility;
(f) The total allowable therapy expense will be divided by the
greater of adjusted total patient days from the cost report on which
the therapy expenses were reported, or patient days at eighty-five
percent occupancy of licensed beds. The outcome shall be the nursing
facility's therapy care component rate allocation.
(6) The therapy care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) The therapy care component rate shall be suspended for medicaid
residents in qualified nursing facilities designated by the department
who are receiving therapy paid by the department outside the facility
daily rate under RCW 74.46.508(2).
(8) This section expires July 1, 2007.

Sec. 19 RCW 74.46.515 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The support services component rate allocation corresponds to
the provision of food, food preparation, dietary, housekeeping, and
laundry services for one resident for one day.
(2) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine each
medicaid nursing facility's support services component rate allocation
using cost report data specified by RCW 74.46.431(6).
(3) To determine each facility's support services component rate
allocation, the department shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted support services costs per adjusted
resident day for each facility from facilities' cost reports from the
applicable report year, for facilities located within urban counties,
and for those located within nonurban counties and determine the median
adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's support services component rate at the
lower of the facility's per resident day adjusted support services
costs from the applicable cost report period or the adjusted median per
resident day support services cost for that facility's peer group,
either urban counties or nonurban counties, plus ten percent; and
(c) Adjust each facility's support services component rate for
economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(6).
(4) The support services component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 2007, the department shall establish for each
medicaid nursing facility a direct care two component rate allocation.
The direct care two component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of food, food preparation, dietary, housekeeping, laundry
services, therapy, and nursing-related services not included in direct
care one for one resident for one day. For the direct care two
component rate allocation, therapy corresponds to the provision of
medicaid one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified therapist as
defined in this chapter, including therapy supplies and therapy
consultation.
(2) The department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's
direct care two component rate allocation using cost report data as
specified in section 5 of this act.
(3) To determine each facility's direct care two component rate
allocation, the department shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted direct care two costs per adjusted
resident day for each facility from facilities' cost reports from the
applicable report year, for facilities located within urban counties,
for those located within nonurban counties, and for those located in
high labor-cost counties, if any, and determine the median adjusted
cost per adjusted resident day for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's direct care two component rate at the lower
of the facility's per resident day adjusted direct care two costs from
the applicable cost report period or the adjusted median per resident
day direct care two cost for that facility's peer group, either urban
counties or nonurban counties, plus twelve percent; and
(c) Adjust each facility's direct care two component rate for
economic trends and conditions as provided in section 5 of this act.
(4) The direct care two component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall grant an add-on to the direct care two
component rate allocation for nursing facilities meeting the following
criteria:
(a) For the July 1, 2007, rate setting, the nursing facility's
direct care two costs per resident day, as established in this chapter,
are less than one hundred twelve percent of the median costs per
resident day for that facility's direct care two peer group; and
(b) The nursing facility's medicaid census was sixty percent or
greater in calendar year 2005.
(2) The amount of the add-on shall be calculated in the following
manner:
(a) Determine the difference between the facility's July 1, 2007,
direct care two costs per resident day and the costs per resident day
set at one hundred twelve percent of the median for that facility's
direct care two peer group, as of the July 1, 2007, rate setting; and
(b) Multiply the product determined in (a) of this subsection by
fifty percent; and
(c) Multiply the product determined in (b) of this subsection by
the facility's medicaid census for the calendar year 2005.
(3) The amount of the add-on granted in this section shall be added
to the facility's direct care two rate, and the direct care two rate
including the add-on shall be subject to the settlement process
established in section 3 of this act.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2011.

Sec. 22 RCW 74.46.521 and 2006 c 258 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The operations component rate allocation corresponds to the
general operation of a nursing facility for one resident for one day,
including but not limited to management, administration, utilities,
office supplies, accounting and bookkeeping, minor building
maintenance, minor equipment repairs and replacements, and other
supplies and services, exclusive of direct care, therapy care, support
services, property, financing allowance, and variable return.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, beginning
October 1, 1998, the department shall determine each medicaid nursing
facility's operations component rate allocation using cost report data
specified by RCW 74.46.431(7)(a). Effective July 1, 2002, operations
component rates for all facilities except essential community providers
shall be based upon a minimum occupancy of ninety percent of licensed
beds, and no operations component rate shall be revised in response to
beds banked on or after May 25, 2001, under chapter 70.38 RCW.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, to
determine each facility's operations component rate the department
shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted general operations costs per
adjusted resident day, as determined by dividing each facility's total
allowable operations cost by its adjusted resident days for the same
report period, increased if necessary to a minimum occupancy of ninety
percent; that is, the greater of actual or imputed occupancy at ninety
percent of licensed beds, for each facility from facilities' cost
reports from the applicable report year, for facilities located within
urban counties and for those located within nonurban counties and
determine the median adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's operations component rate at the lower of:
(i) The facility's per resident day adjusted operations costs from
the applicable cost report period adjusted if necessary to a minimum
occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds before July 1, 2002,
and ninety percent effective July 1, 2002; or
(ii) The adjusted median per resident day general operations cost
for that facility's peer group, urban counties or nonurban counties;
and
(c) Adjust each facility's operations component rate for economic
trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).
(4)(a) Effective July 1, 2006, for any facility whose direct care
component rate allocation is set equal to its June 30, 2006, direct
care component rate allocation, as provided in RCW 74.46.506(5)(i), the
facility's operations component rate allocation shall also be set equal
to the facility's June 30, 2006, operations component rate allocation.
(b) The operations component rate allocation for facilities whose
operations component rate is set equal to their June 30, 2006,
operations component rate, shall be adjusted for economic trends and
conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).
(5) The operations component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 2007, the department shall establish for each
medicaid nursing facility an operations component rate allocation. The
operations component rate allocation corresponds to the general
operation of a nursing facility for one resident for one day, including
but not limited to management, administration, utilities, office
supplies, accounting and bookkeeping, minor building maintenance, minor
equipment repairs and replacements, and other supplies and services,
exclusive of direct care one, direct care two, and capital. The
operations component rate allocation does not include the costs of the
quality maintenance fee established under RCW 82.71.020, nor shall such
costs be included in any of the component rate allocations under this
chapter.
(2) The department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's
operations component rate allocation using cost report data specified
in section 5 of this act.
(3) To determine each facility's operations component rate the
department shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted general operations costs per
adjusted resident day, for each facility from facilities' cost reports
from the applicable report year, for facilities located within urban
counties and for those located within nonurban counties, and for those
located in high labor-cost counties, if any, and determine the median
adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's operations component rate at the lower of
the facility's per resident day adjusted operations costs from the
applicable cost report period or the adjusted median per resident day
support services cost for that facility's peer group, either urban or
nonurban counties, or high labor-cost counties, plus seven percent; and
(c) Adjust each facility's operations component rate for economic
trends and conditions as provided in section 5 of this act.
(4) The operations component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Except for section 2 of this act, this act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2007.

--- END ---