BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The preservation of life is a fundamental purpose of
government;
(b) Public and private ambulances are among the first responders to
a disaster by providing transportation services for trauma victims and
the infirm; and
(c) Improving public and private ambulance service will improve the
surge capacity of the state to respond in the event of a major
disaster.
(2) The legislature intends to further the fundamental governmental
purpose of preserving life by providing grants to both public and
private ambulance services to improve their ability to respond to the
critical needs of Washington citizens in the event of a disaster.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.73 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is established in the department of community, trade, and
economic development an emergency transportation grant program to
enhance the ability of public and private ambulance services to respond
to the critical needs of Washington citizens in the event of a
disaster.
(2) Activities and equipment funded through this program must
achieve measurable goals in one or more of the following areas:
(a) The preparedness of ambulance services to meet the needs of
state and local emergency management officials in the event of a
disaster;
(b) The capacity of ambulance services to quickly increase their
service levels to meet the increased demand caused by a disaster; or
(c) The ability of ambulance services to redistribute ambulances
from areas unaffected by a disaster to areas affected by the disaster.
(3) At a minimum, grant applications must address:
(a) A description of the geographic area covered by the ambulance
service;
(b) A description of the current level of ambulance services in the
area and their ability to meet the needs of the area in the event of a
disaster; and
(c) An explanation of the measurable goals to be achieved by the
grant funds and a description of the necessary performance measures
needed to effectively monitor whether the goals are being achieved in
an effective and efficient manner.
(4) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated by the
legislature for this purpose from the emergency transportation grant
account and other sources, the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall make awards under the grant program.
(a) Awards shall be made competitively based on the purposes and
criteria in this section.
(b) Activities or equipment funded under this section may be
considered for funding in future years, but shall be considered under
the same terms and criteria as new applications for activities or
equipment. Funding of an activity or equipment under this section
shall not constitute an obligation by the state of Washington to
provide ongoing funding.
(c) The department of community, trade, and economic development
may receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private
sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for
the use and benefit of the purposes of the grant program established in
this section and expend the same or any income from these sources
according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.
(5) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall submit an annual report to the governor and the legislature
describing projects funded by the grant program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.73 RCW
to read as follows:
The emergency transportation grant account is created in the state
treasury. Receipts from the tax on the sale, handling, or distribution
of tobacco products under RCW 82.26.020(3)(a) must be deposited into
the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may only be used for the
emergency transportation grant program created in section 2 of this
act.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.26.020 and 2005 c 180 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected a tax upon the
sale, handling, or distribution of all tobacco products in this state
at the following rate:
(a) Seventy-five percent of the taxable sales price of cigars, not
to exceed fifty cents per cigar; or
(b) Seventy-five percent of the taxable sales price of all tobacco
products that are not cigars.
(2) Taxes under this section shall be imposed at the time the
distributor (a) brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from
without the state tobacco products for sale, (b) makes, manufactures,
fabricates, or stores tobacco products in this state for sale in this
state, (c) ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this
state, to be sold by those retailers, or (d) handles for sale any
tobacco products that are within this state but upon which tax has not
been imposed.
(3) The moneys collected under this section shall be deposited as
follows:
(a) ((Thirty-seven)) Sixteen percent in the emergency
transportation grant account created under section 3 of this act;
(b) Twenty-one percent in the general fund;
(((b))) (c) Fifty percent in the health services account created
under RCW 43.72.900; and
(((c))) (d) Thirteen percent in the water quality account under RCW
70.146.030 for the period beginning July 1, 2005, through June 30,
2021, and in the general fund for the period beginning July 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 43.135.035(4) does not apply to RCW 82.26.020(3)(a).

--- END ---