BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares:
(1) By reason of their employment, firefighters are required to
work in the midst of, and are subject to, smoke, fumes, infectious
diseases, and toxic and hazardous substances;
(2) Firefighters enter uncontrolled environments to save lives,
provide emergency medical services, and reduce property damage and are
frequently not aware of the potential toxic and carcinogenic
substances, and infectious diseases that they may be exposed to;
(3) Harmful effects caused by firefighters' exposure to hazardous
substances, whether cancer, infectious disease, heart or respiratory
disease, may develop very slowly, manifesting themselves years after
exposure;
(4) Firefighters frequently and at unpredictable intervals perform
job duties under strenuous physical conditions unique to their
employment when engaged in firefighting activities; and
(5) Cardiovascular disease is exacerbated by firefighting duties
and firefighting increases the incidence of cardiovascular disease and
heart injuries in firefighters.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.32.185 and 2002 c 337 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the case of fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030(4)
(a), (b), and (c) who are covered under Title 51 RCW and fire fighters,
including supervisors, employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis
as a fire fighter of a private sector employer's fire department that
includes over fifty such fire fighters, there shall exist a prima facie
presumption that: (a) Respiratory disease; (b) ((heart problems that
are experienced within seventy-two hours of exposure to smoke, fumes,
or toxic substances)) any heart problems, experienced within seventy-two hours of exposure to smoke, fumes, or toxic substances, or
experienced within twenty-four hours of strenuous physical exertion due
to firefighting activities; (c) cancer; and (d) infectious diseases are
occupational diseases under RCW 51.08.140. This presumption of
occupational disease may be rebutted by a preponderance of the
evidence. Such evidence may include, but is not limited to, use of
tobacco products, physical fitness and weight, lifestyle, hereditary
factors, and exposure from other employment or nonemployment
activities.
(2) The presumptions established in subsection (1) of this section
shall be extended to an applicable member following termination of
service for a period of three calendar months for each year of
requisite service, but may not extend more than sixty months following
the last date of employment.
(3) The presumption established in subsection (1)(c) of this
section shall only apply to any active or former fire fighter who has
cancer that develops or manifests itself after the fire fighter has
served at least ten years and who was given a qualifying medical
examination upon becoming a fire fighter that showed no evidence of
cancer. The presumption within subsection (1)(c) of this section shall
only apply to prostate cancer diagnosed prior to the age of fifty,
primary brain cancer, malignant melanoma, leukemia, non-Hodgkin's
lymphoma, bladder cancer, ureter cancer, colorectal cancer, multiple
myeloma, testicular cancer, and kidney cancer.
(4) The presumption established in subsection (1)(d) of this
section shall be extended to any fire fighter who has contracted any of
the following infectious diseases: Human immunodeficiency
virus/acquired immunodeficiency syndrome, all strains of hepatitis,
meningococcal meningitis, or mycobacterium tuberculosis.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2003, this section does not apply to a fire
fighter who develops a heart or lung condition and who is a regular
user of tobacco products or who has a history of tobacco use. The
department, using existing medical research, shall define in rule the
extent of tobacco use that shall exclude a fire fighter from the
provisions of this section.
(6) For purposes of this section, "firefighting activities" means
fire suppression, fire prevention, emergency medical services, rescue
operations, hazardous materials response, aircraft rescue, and training
and other assigned duties related to emergency response.
(7)(a) When a determination involving the presumption established
in this section is appealed to the board of industrial insurance
appeals and the final decision allows the claim for benefits, the board
of industrial insurance appeals shall order that all reasonable costs
of the appeal, including attorney fees and witness fees, be paid to the
firefighter or his or her beneficiary by the opposing party.
(b) When a determination involving the presumption established in
this section is appealed to any court and the final decision allows the
claim for benefits, the court shall order that all reasonable costs of
the appeal, including attorney fees and witness fees, be paid to the
firefighter or his or her beneficiary by the opposing party.
(c) When reasonable costs of the appeal must be paid by the
department under this section in a state fund case, the costs shall be
paid from the accident fund and charged to the costs of the claim.
(8)(a) If an employer requests reconsideration of a department
order allowing benefits under this section and the firefighter's
medical provider has made a determination that the firefighter is
terminally ill, temporary total disability compensation or medical aid
benefits granted to the firefighter by the order under reconsideration
must continue while the reconsideration is pending, subject to the
requirements of RCW 51.32.240(4).
(b) If an employer appeals to the board of industrial insurance
appeals a department order allowing benefits under this section and the
firefighter's medical provider has made a determination that the
firefighter is terminally ill, temporary total disability compensation
or medical aid benefits granted to the firefighter by the order under
appeal must continue while the appeal is pending, subject to the
requirements of RCW 51.32.240(4).

Sec. 3 RCW 51.52.120 and 2003 c 53 s 285 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for an attorney engaged in the
representation of any worker or beneficiary to charge for services in
the department any fee in excess of a reasonable fee, of not more than
thirty percent of the increase in the award secured by the attorney's
services. Such reasonable fee shall be fixed by the director or the
director's designee for services performed by an attorney for such
worker or beneficiary, if written application therefor is made by the
attorney, worker, or beneficiary within one year from the date the
final decision and order of the department is communicated to the party
making the application.
(2) If, on appeal to the board, the order, decision, or award of
the department is reversed or modified and additional relief is granted
to a worker or beneficiary, or in cases where a party other than the
worker or beneficiary is the appealing party and the worker's or
beneficiary's right to relief is sustained by the board, the board
shall fix a reasonable fee for the services of his or her attorney in
proceedings before the board if written application therefor is made by
the attorney, worker, or beneficiary within one year from the date the
final decision and order of the board is communicated to the party
making the application. In fixing the amount of such attorney's fee,
the board shall take into consideration the fee allowed, if any, by the
director, for services before the department, and the board may review
the fee fixed by the director. Any attorney's fee set by the
department or the board may be reviewed by the superior court upon
application of such attorney, worker, or beneficiary. The department
or self-insured employer, as the case may be, shall be served a copy of
the application and shall be entitled to appear and take part in the
proceedings. Where the board, pursuant to this section, fixes the
attorney's fee, it shall be unlawful for an attorney to charge or
receive any fee for services before the board in excess of that fee
fixed by the board.
(3) In an appeal to the board involving the presumption established
under RCW 51.32.185, the attorney's fee shall be payable as set forth
under RCW 51.32.185.
(4) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.52.130 and 1993 c 122 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If, on appeal to the superior or appellate court from the
decision and order of the board, said decision and order is reversed or
modified and additional relief is granted to a worker or beneficiary,
or in cases where a party other than the worker or beneficiary is the
appealing party and the worker's or beneficiary's right to relief is
sustained, a reasonable fee for the services of the worker's or
beneficiary's attorney shall be fixed by the court. In fixing the fee
the court shall take into consideration the fee or fees, if any, fixed
by the director and the board for such attorney's services before the
department and the board. If the court finds that the fee fixed by the
director or by the board is inadequate for services performed before
the department or board, or if the director or the board has fixed no
fee for such services, then the court shall fix a fee for the
attorney's services before the department, or the board, as the case
may be, in addition to the fee fixed for the services in the court. If
in a worker or beneficiary appeal the decision and order of the board
is reversed or modified and if the accident fund or medical aid fund is
affected by the litigation, or if in an appeal by the department or
employer the worker or beneficiary's right to relief is sustained, or
in an appeal by a worker involving a state fund employer with twenty-five employees or less, in which the department does not appear and
defend, and the board order in favor of the employer is sustained, the
attorney's fee fixed by the court, for services before the court only,
and the fees of medical and other witnesses and the costs shall be
payable out of the administrative fund of the department. In the case
of self-insured employers, the attorney fees fixed by the court, for
services before the court only, and the fees of medical and other
witnesses and the costs shall be payable directly by the self-insured
employer.
(2) In an appeal to the superior or appellate court involving the
presumption established under RCW 51.32.185, the attorney's fee shall
be payable as set forth under RCW 51.32.185.

--- END ---