BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.73.180 and 1987 c 214 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
Other vehicles not herein defined by this chapter shall not be used
for transportation of patients who must be carried on a stretcher or
who may require medical attention en route, except that such
transportation may be used when:
(1) A disaster creates a situation that cannot be served by
licensed ambulances; or
(2) The use of a stretcher is necessary because an individual's
personal mobility aid cannot be adequately secured in the nonambulance
vehicle and the individual has written authorization from his or her
physician that it is safe to transfer the individual from a personal
mobility aid to a stretcher.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of health shall prepare
guidelines for the public and vehicle operators relating to:
(1) Appropriate situations in which vehicles other than ambulances
may be used to transport individuals who rely upon personal mobility
aids in the normal course of their lives; and
(2) Methods for properly securing personal mobility aids on
vehicles other than ambulances and determining if they are adequately
secured.

--- END ---