BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.520 and 2003 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as specified in subsection (((3))) (2) or (4) of this
section, upon receipt of proper proofs of death of any member before
retirement or before the first installment of his or her retirement
allowance shall become due his or her accumulated contributions, less
any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW
41.50.670, and/or other benefits payable upon his or her death shall be
paid to his or her estate or to such persons, trust, or organization as
he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and
filed with the department. If a member fails to file a new beneficiary
designation subsequent to marriage, divorce, or reestablishment of
membership following termination by withdrawal, lapsation, or
retirement, payment of his or her accumulated contributions, less any
amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
and/or other benefits upon death before retirement shall be made to the
surviving spouse, if any; otherwise, to his or her estate. If a member
had established ten or more years of Washington membership service
credit or was eligible for retirement, the beneficiary or the surviving
spouse if otherwise eligible may elect, in lieu of a cash refund of the
member's accumulated contributions, the following survivor benefit plan
actuarially reduced, except under subsection (((4))) (5) of this
section, by the amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing to
an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670:
(a) A widow or widower, without a child or children under eighteen
years of age, may elect a monthly payment of fifty dollars to become
effective at age fifty, provided the member had fifteen or more years
of Washington membership service credit. A benefit paid under this
subsection (1)(a) shall terminate at the marriage of the beneficiary.
(b) The beneficiary, if a surviving spouse or a dependent (as that
term is used in computing the dependent exemption for federal internal
revenue purposes) may elect to receive a joint and one hundred percent
retirement allowance under RCW 41.32.530.
(i) In the case of a dependent child the allowance shall continue
until attainment of majority or so long as the department judges that
the circumstances which created his or her dependent status continue to
exist. In any case, if at the time dependent status ceases, an amount
equal to the amount of accumulated contributions of the deceased member
has not been paid to the beneficiary, the remainder shall then be paid
in a lump sum to the beneficiary.
(ii) If at the time of death, the member was not then qualified for
a service retirement allowance, the benefit shall be based upon the
actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to pay the accrued regular
retirement allowance commencing when the deceased member would have
first qualified for a service retirement allowance.
(2) If a member had thirty years of service credit at the time of
death, but had not retired, his or her accumulated contributions plus
interest and the employer's accumulated contributions plus interest,
less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW
41.50.670, and any other benefits payable upon his or her death shall
be paid to his or her estate or to such persons, trust, or organization
as he or she has nominated by written designation duly executed and
filed with the department. Interest on accumulated contributions shall
be determined by the director.
(3) If no qualified beneficiary survives a member, at his or her
death his or her accumulated contributions, less any amount identified
as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions
pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to
his or her estate, or his or her dependents may qualify for survivor
benefits under benefit plan (1)(b) in lieu of a cash refund of the
members accumulated contributions in the following order: Widow or
widower, guardian of a dependent child or children under age eighteen,
or dependent parent or parents.
(((3))) (4) If a member dies within sixty days following
application for disability retirement under RCW 41.32.550, the
beneficiary named in the application may elect to receive the benefit
provided by:
(a) This section; or
(b) RCW 41.32.550, according to the option chosen under RCW
41.32.530 in the disability application.
(((4))) (5) The retirement allowance of a member who is killed in
the course of employment, as determined by the director of the
department of labor and industries, is not subject to an actuarial
reduction. The member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW
41.32.480.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.40.270 and 2003 c 155 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as specified in subsection (((4))) (2) or (5) of this
section, should a member die before the date of retirement the amount
of the accumulated contributions standing to the member's credit in the
employees' savings fund, less any amount identified as owing to an
obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, at the time of death:
(a) Shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department; or
(b) If there be no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, or if a member fails to file a new
beneficiary designation subsequent to marriage, remarriage, dissolution
of marriage, divorce, or reestablishment of membership following
termination by withdrawal or retirement, such accumulated
contributions, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon
withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed
under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the surviving spouse as if in
fact such spouse had been nominated by written designation as
aforesaid, or if there be no such surviving spouse, then to the
member's legal representatives.
(2) If a member had thirty years of service credit at the time of
death, but had not retired, his or her accumulated contributions plus
interest and the employer's accumulated contributions plus interest,
less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW
41.50.670, and any other benefits payable upon his or her death shall
be paid to his or her estate or to such persons, trust, or organization
as he or she has nominated by written designation duly executed and
filed with the department. Interest on accumulated contributions shall
be determined by the director.
(3) Upon the death in service, or while on authorized leave of
absence for a period not to exceed one hundred and twenty days from the
date of payroll separation, of any member who is qualified but has not
applied for a service retirement allowance or has completed ten years
of service at the time of death, the designated beneficiary, or the
surviving spouse as provided in subsection (1) of this section, may
elect to waive the payment provided by subsection (1) of this section.
Upon such an election, a joint and one hundred percent survivor option
under RCW 41.40.188, calculated under the retirement allowance
described in RCW 41.40.185 or 41.40.190, whichever is greater,
actuarially reduced, except under subsection (((5))) (6) of this
section, by the amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing to
an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 shall automatically be given
effect as if selected for the benefit of the designated beneficiary.
If the member is not then qualified for a service retirement allowance,
such benefit shall be based upon the actuarial equivalent of the sum
necessary to pay the accrued regular retirement allowance commencing
when the deceased member would have first qualified for a service
retirement allowance.
(((3))) (4) Subsection (1) of this section, unless elected, shall
not apply to any member who has applied for service retirement in RCW
41.40.180, ((as now or hereafter amended,)) and thereafter dies between
the date of separation from service and the member's effective
retirement date, where the member has selected a survivorship option
under RCW 41.40.188. In those cases the beneficiary named in the
member's final application for service retirement may elect to receive
either a cash refund, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee
upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order
filed under RCW 41.50.670, or monthly payments according to the option
selected by the member.
(((4))) (5) If a member dies within sixty days following
application for disability retirement under RCW 41.40.230, the
beneficiary named in the application may elect to receive the benefit
provided by:
(a) This section; or
(b) RCW 41.40.235, according to the option chosen under RCW
41.40.188 in the disability application.
(((5))) (6) The retirement allowance of a member who is killed in
the course of employment, as determined by the director of the
department of labor and industries, is not subject to an actuarial
reduction. The member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW
41.40.185.

--- END ---