BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In the event of a disaster, any collective bargaining agreement
entered into on or after the effective date of this act shall be
suspended to the extent necessary to:
(a) Safely restore public utilities as quickly as possible; and
(b) Provide emergency services to persons affected by the disaster.
(2) For purposes of this section, "disaster" means any natural or
man-made condition that results in a declaration of emergency by a
county, the governor, or the president of the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In the event of a disaster, all rules shall be suspended to the
extent necessary to:
(a) Safely restore public utilities as quickly as possible; and
(b) Provide emergency services to persons affected by the disaster.
(2) For purposes of this section, "disaster" means any natural or
man-made condition that results in a declaration of emergency by a
county, the governor, or the president of the United States.

--- END ---