BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds public safety
would be enhanced by a common information sharing system for reporting
that would:
(a) Provide a visual, computer-based common operating picture for
all decision makers in the event of an emergency;
(b) Reduce the need for radio frequency bandwidth for voice
communications;
(c) Allow emergency responders and incident management teams to
take action based on an understanding of the emergency situation; and
(d) Allow for redundant pathway capabilities, which would increase
the robustness of the state's communications system.
(2) The state interoperability executive committee shall establish
a pilot project to design and test a web-based reporting system. This
program shall be developed in conjunction with the proposed
interoperability project for region 1 to prepare security for the 2010
Olympic Games. The pilot project must, at a minimum, have the
following capabilities:
(a) Compatibility with existing, legacy emergency radio systems;
(b) Open architecture design;
(c) Automated reporting and tracking in a geographic information
system environment; and
(d) Redundant communication pathways, including web-based satellite
links.
(3) By December 1, 2008, the state interoperability executive
committee shall submit a report to the legislature and the governor,
indicating performance measures and effectiveness of the pilot project
and recommendations for its possible expanded utilization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---