BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Disaster" means any natural or man-made condition that results
in a declaration of emergency by a county, the governor, or the
president of the United States.
(2) "Grocery store" means any business with twenty or more
employees whose primary business consists of retail sales of grocery
items to the general public.
(3) "Motor fuel retailer" means any business with eight or more
fueling stations that engages in retail sales of motor fuel to the
general public.
(4) "Water distribution business" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.16.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By July 1, 2009, every grocery store
located within the state shall be capable of operating all
refrigeration, life safety systems, and payment assistance equipment,
using a backup power source for a period of at least seventy-two hours.
Installation of the backup power source shall be performed by a
licensed electrical contractor.
(2) The grocery store shall:
(a) Test the backup power source at least every six months for
safety and operational capacity;
(b) Perform necessary maintenance on the power source; and
(c) Maintain written records of the installation, testing, and
maintenance of the power source.
(3) In the event of a disaster that causes disruption to the
grocery store's power supply, the grocery store shall continue its
retail operations using the backup power supply for at least seventy-two hours, unless conditions caused by the disaster make such
operations impracticable or unsafe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By July 1, 2009, every motor fuel
retailer located within the state shall be capable of operating all
fuel dispensing equipment, life safety systems, and payment acceptance
equipment using a backup power source for a period of at least seventy-two hours. Installation of the backup power source shall be performed
by a licensed electrical contractor.
(2) The motor fuel retailer shall:
(a) Test the backup power source at least every six months for
safety and operational capacity;
(b) Perform necessary maintenance on the power source; and
(c) Maintain written records of the installation, testing, and
maintenance of the power source.
(3) In the event of a disaster that causes disruption to the motor
fuel retailer's power supply, the motor fuel retailer shall continue to
dispense fuel to its retail customers using the backup power supply for
at least seventy-two hours, unless conditions caused by the disaster
make such operations impracticable or unsafe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) By July 1, 2009, every water
distribution business doing business within the state shall be capable
of operating all water distribution systems using a backup power source
for a period of at least seventy-two hours. Installation of the backup
power source shall be performed by a licensed electrical contractor.
(2) The water distribution business shall:
(a) Test the backup power source at least every six months for
safety and operational capacity;
(b) Perform necessary maintenance on the power source; and
(c) Maintain written records of the installation, testing, and
maintenance of the power source.
(3) In the event of a disaster that causes disruption to the water
distribution business' power supply, the water distribution business
shall continue to supply water to its customers using the backup power
supply for at least seventy-two hours, unless conditions caused by the
disaster make such operations impracticable or unsafe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The attorney general or county prosecuting
attorney may file an action in superior court to require a grocery
store, motor fuel retailer, or water distribution business to comply
with any of the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A grocery store, motor fuel retailer, or water distribution
business that complies with sections 2 through 4 of this act is not
liable for civil damages arising from the failure of the store,
retailer, or business to operate during a disaster because:
(a) The backup power source during a disaster has failed; or
(b) Conditions caused by the disaster make operations impracticable
or unsafe.
(2) For purposes of this section, "disaster," "grocery store,"
"motor fuel retailer," and "water distribution business" have the same
meanings as defined in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for all costs associated with complying with sections 2 through
4 of this act.
(2) A person taking the credit under this section is subject to all
the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A credit earned during one
calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred
in subsequent calendar years. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for all costs associated with complying with section 4 of this
act.
(2) A person taking the credit under this section is subject to all
the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A credit earned during one
calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred
in subsequent calendar years. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---