BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.16.100 and 2003 c 400 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon completion of an application approved by the department
and payment of the proper fee, the director shall issue the appropriate
license to any person who:
(a) Is at least seventeen years of age or older;
(b)(i) Has completed and graduated from a school licensed under
this chapter in a curriculum approved by the director of sixteen
hundred hours of training in cosmetology, one thousand hours of
training in barbering, six hundred hours of training in manicuring, six
hundred hours of training in esthetics, and/or five hundred hours of
training as an instructor-trainee, or has met the requirements in RCW
18.16.020 or 18.16.130; or
(ii) Has successfully completed a state-approved apprenticeship
training program; and
(c) Has received a passing grade on the appropriate licensing
examination approved or administered by the director.
(2) Any license issued to a person by the department under this
section must contain a permanent photograph of the licensee affixed to
the license by the department.
(3) A person currently licensed under this chapter may qualify for
examination and licensure, after the required examination is passed, in
another category if he or she has completed the crossover training
course.
(((3))) (4) Upon completion of an application approved by the
department, certification of insurance, and payment of the proper fee,
the director shall issue a location license to the applicant.
(((4))) (5) The director may consult with the state board of health
and the department of labor and industries in establishing training,
apprenticeship, and examination requirements.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.16.175 and 2002 c 111 s 11 and 2002 c 86 s 216 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A salon/shop or mobile unit shall meet the following minimum
requirements:
(a) Maintain an outside entrance separate from any rooms used for
sleeping or residential purposes;
(b) Provide and maintain for the use of its customers adequate
toilet facilities located within or adjacent to the salon/shop or
mobile unit;
(c) Any room used wholly or in part as a salon/shop or mobile unit
shall not be used for residential purposes, except that toilet
facilities may be used jointly for residential and business purposes;
(d) Meet the zoning requirements of the county, city, or town, as
appropriate;
(e) Provide for safe storage and labeling of chemicals used in the
practices under this chapter;
(f) Meet all applicable local and state fire codes; and
(g) Certify that the salon/shop or mobile unit is covered by a
public liability insurance policy in an amount not less than one
hundred thousand dollars for combined bodily injury and property damage
liability.
(2) By January 1, 2008, the department must adopt by rule safety
and sanitation procedures and requirements for all salons/shops,
personal services, or mobile units, including specific procedures and
requirements for all salons/shops, personal services, or mobile units
that provide manicure and pedicure services.
(3) The director may by rule determine other requirements that are
necessary for safety and sanitation of salons/shops, personal services,
or mobile units. The director may consult with the state board of
health and the department of labor and industries in establishing
minimum salon/shop, personal services, and mobile unit safety
requirements.
(((3))) (4) Personal services license holders shall certify
coverage of a public liability insurance policy in an amount not less
than one hundred thousand dollars for combined bodily injury and
property damage liability.
(((4) Upon receipt of a written complaint that a salon/shop or
mobile unit has violated any provisions of this chapter, chapter 18.235
RCW, or the rules adopted under either chapter, or at least once every
two years for an existing salon/shop or mobile unit, the director or
the director's designee shall inspect each salon/shop or mobile unit.
If the director determines that any salon/shop or mobile unit is not in
compliance with this chapter, the director shall send written notice to
the salon/shop or mobile unit. A salon/shop or mobile unit which fails
to correct the conditions to the satisfaction of the director within a
reasonable time shall, upon due notice, be subject to the penalties
imposed by the director under RCW 18.235.110. The director may enter
any salon/shop or mobile unit during business hours for the purpose of
inspection. The director may contract with health authorities of local
governments to conduct the inspections under this subsection.))
(5) A salon/shop, personal services, or mobile unit shall obtain a
certificate of registration from the department of revenue.
(6) This section does not prohibit the use of motor homes as mobile
units if the motor home meets the health and safety standards of this
section.
(7) Salon/shop or mobile unit licenses issued by the department
must be posted in the salon/shop or mobile unit's reception area.
(8) Cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, and manicuring licenses
issued by the department must be posted at the licensed person's work
station.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.16.180 and 1991 c 324 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall prepare and provide to all licensed
salons/shops a notice to consumers. At a minimum, the notice shall
state that cosmetology, barber, esthetics, and manicure salons/shops
are required to be licensed, that salons/shops are required to maintain
minimum safety and sanitation standards, that customer complaints
regarding salons/shops may be reported to the department, and a
telephone number and address where complaints may be made.
(2) The director shall prepare and provide to all licensed
salons/shops conducting manicuring or pedicuring a notice to consumers
about the use of artificial nails. At a minimum, the notice shall
state risks associated with artificial nails. "Artificial nails"
includes but is not limited to silk, linen, fiberglass, acrylic, gel,
powder, tip extensions, and sculpting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director may enter any salon/shop or mobile unit during
business hours for the purpose of inspection. The director may
contract with health authorities of local governments to conduct the
inspections under this subsection. Inspections of each licensed
salon/shop or mobile unit shall occur at least once every two years.
(2) Upon receipt of a written complaint that a salon/shop or mobile
unit has violated any provisions of this chapter, chapter 18.235 RCW,
or the rules adopted under either chapter, the director or the
director's designee shall inspect each salon/shop or mobile unit.
(3) In addition to inspections conducted under subsections (1) and
(2) of this section, the director shall conduct additional inspections
based on a schedule of risk-based inspections using the following
criteria:
(a) The type and nature of the salon/shop or mobile unit;
(b) The history of prior safety or sanitation violations at the
salon/shop or mobile unit;
(c) The inspection history of the salon/shop or mobile unit;
(d) The history of complaints involving the salon/shop or mobile
unit; and
(e) Any other factor determined by the director by rule.
(4) The salon/shop or mobile unit shall pay a fee for each
inspection performed under subsection (3) of this section. The
director shall set the amount of the fee by rule.
(5) If the director determines that any salon/shop or mobile unit
is not in compliance with this chapter, the director may assess
applicable penalties under this chapter and under chapter 18.235 RCW.
The director shall provide written notice to the salon/shop or mobile
unit describing the nature of the violation, the penalty to be
assessed, and whether the salon/shop or mobile unit has an opportunity
to correct the violation. A salon/shop or mobile unit which fails to
correct a violation to the satisfaction of the director within thirty
days shall, upon due notice, be subject to the penalties imposed by the
director under RCW 18.235.110. Correction of a violation only applies
to a salon/shop or mobile unit's first violation in any three-year
period of any single provision of this chapter, chapter 18.235 RCW, or
the rules adopted under either chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall establish by rule a schedule of penalties for
violations of this chapter. The schedule must include specific
penalties for hiring or employing a person to perform or engage in a
practice prohibited under RCW 18.16.060 without that person first
obtaining, and maintaining in good standing, the license required by
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 18.16.210 (Violations -- Penalties) and
2002 c 111 s 13 & 1984 c 208 s 14 are each repealed.

--- END ---