BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.27.010 and 2001 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Contractor" ((means)) includes any person, firm, ((or))
corporation, or other entity who or which, in the pursuit of an
independent business undertakes to, or offers to undertake, or submits
a bid to, construct, alter, repair, add to, subtract from, improve,
develop, move, wreck, or demolish((, for another,)) any building,
highway, road, railroad, excavation or other structure, project,
development, or improvement attached to real estate or to do any part
thereof including the installation of carpeting or other floor
covering, the erection of scaffolding or other structures or works in
connection therewith ((or who installs or repairs)), the installation
or repair of roofing or siding, performing tree removal services, or
cabinet or similar installation; or, who, to do similar work upon his
or her own property, employs members of more than one trade upon a
single job or project or under a single building permit except as
otherwise provided ((herein)) in this chapter. "Contractor" also
includes a consultant acting as a general contractor. "Contractor"
also includes any person, firm, corporation, or other entity covered by
this subsection, whether or not registered as required under this
chapter or who are otherwise required to be registered or licensed by
law, who offer to sell their property without occupying or using the
structures, projects, developments, or improvements for more than one
year from the date the structure, project, development, or improvement
was substantially completed or abandoned.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries or designated representative employed by the department.
(4) "Filing" means delivery of a document that is required to be
filed with an agency to a place designated by the agency.
(5) "General contractor" means a contractor whose business
operations require the use of more than ((two unrelated)) one building
((trades or crafts whose work the contractor shall superintend or do in
whole or in part. "General contractor" shall not include an individual
who does all work personally without employees or other "specialty
contractors" as defined in this section. The terms "general
contractor" and "builder" are synonymous)) trade or craft upon a single
job or project or under a single building permit. A general contractor
also includes one who superintends, or consults on, in whole or in
part, work falling within the definition of a contractor.
(((5))) (6) "Notice of infraction" means a form used by the
department to notify contractors that an infraction under this chapter
has been filed against them.
(7) "Partnership" means a business formed under Title 25 RCW.
(((6))) (8) "Registration cancellation" means a written notice from
the department that a contractor's action is in violation of this
chapter and that the contractor's registration has been revoked.
(((7))) (9) "Registration suspension" means either an automatic
suspension as provided in this chapter, or a written notice from the
department that a contractor's action is a violation of this chapter
and that the contractor's registration has been suspended for a
specified time, or until the contractor shows evidence of compliance
with this chapter.
(((8))) (10) "Residential homeowner" means an individual person or
persons owning or leasing real property:
(a) Upon which one single-family residence is to be built and in
which the owner or lessee intends to reside upon completion of any
construction; or
(b) Upon which there is a single-family residence to which
improvements are to be made and in which the owner or lessee intends to
reside upon completion of any construction.
(((9))) (11) "Service," except as otherwise provided in RCW
18.27.225 and 18.27.370, means posting in the United States mail,
properly addressed, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, or
personal service. Service by mail is complete upon deposit in the
United States mail to the last known address provided to the
department.
(12) "Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose operations do
not fall within the definition of "general contractor". A specialty
contractor may only subcontract work that is incidental to the
specialty contractor's work.
(((10))) (13) "Substantial completion" means the same as
"substantial completion of construction" in RCW 4.16.310.
(14) "Unregistered contractor" means a person, firm, corporation,
or other entity doing work as a contractor without being registered in
compliance with this chapter. "Unregistered contractor" includes
contractors whose registration is expired, revoked, or suspended.
"Unregistered contractor" does not include a contractor who has
maintained a valid bond and the insurance or assigned account required
by RCW 18.27.050, and whose registration has lapsed for thirty or fewer
days.
(((11))) (15) "Unsatisfied final judgment" means a judgment or
final tax warrant that has not been satisfied either through payment,
court approved settlement, discharge in bankruptcy, or assignment under
RCW 19.72.070.
(((12))) (16) "Verification" means the receipt and duplication by
the city, town, or county of a contractor registration card that is
current on its face, checking the department's contractor registration
data base, or calling the department to confirm that the contractor is
registered.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.27.020 and 1997 c 314 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every contractor shall register with the department.
(2) It is a gross misdemeanor for any contractor to:
(a) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor without being registered as required by this chapter;
(b) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor when the contractor's registration is suspended or
revoked;
(c) Use a false or expired registration number in purchasing or
offering to purchase an advertisement for which a contractor
registration number is required; ((or))
(d) Transfer a valid registration to an unregistered contractor or
allow an unregistered contractor to work under a registration issued to
another contractor; or
(e) Subcontract to or use an unregistered contractor.
(3) It is not unlawful for a ((general)) registered contractor to
employ an unregistered contractor who was registered at the time he or
she entered into a contract with the ((general)) registered contractor,
unless the ((general)) registered contractor or his or her
representative has been notified in writing by the department of labor
and industries that the contractor has become unregistered.
(4) All gross misdemeanor actions under this chapter shall be
prosecuted in the county where the infraction occurs.
(5) A person is guilty of a separate gross misdemeanor for each day
worked if, after the person receives a citation from the department,
the person works while unregistered, or while his or her registration
is suspended or revoked, or works under a registration issued to
another contractor. A person is guilty of a separate gross misdemeanor
for each worksite on which he or she violates subsection (2) of this
section. Nothing in this subsection applies to a registered
contractor.
(6) The director by rule shall establish a two-year audit and
monitoring program for a contractor not registered under this chapter
who becomes registered after receiving an infraction or conviction
under this chapter as an unregistered contractor. The director shall
notify the departments of revenue and employment security of the
infractions or convictions and shall cooperate with these departments
to determine whether any taxes or registration, license, or other fees
or penalties are owed the state.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.27.030 and 2001 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for registration as a contractor shall submit an
application under oath upon a form to be prescribed by the director and
which shall include the following information pertaining to the
applicant:
(a) Employer social security number.
(b) Unified business identifier number, if required by the
department of revenue.
(c) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's
employees working in Washington, as follows:
(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by
the department;
(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department;
or
(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law.
(d) Employment security department number.
(e) State excise tax registration number.
(f) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (c) of this subsection if
the applicant will not employ employees in Washington, and by (d) and
(e) of this subsection.
(g) Type of contracting activity, whether a general or a specialty
contractor and if the latter, the type of specialty.
(h) The name and address of each partner if the applicant is a firm
or partnership, or the name and address of the owner if the applicant
is an individual proprietorship, or the name and address of the
corporate officers and statutory agent, if any, if the applicant is a
corporation or the name and address of all members of other business
entities. The information contained in such application is a matter of
public record and open to public inspection.
(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(c) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(3)(a) The department shall deny an application for registration
if: (i) The applicant has been previously performing work subject to
this chapter as a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, or other
entity and the department has notice that the applicant has an
unsatisfied final judgment against him or her in an action based on
work performed subject to this chapter or the applicant owes the
department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this chapter
as a result of a final judgment; (ii) the applicant was ((a)) an owner,
principal, or officer of a partnership, corporation, or other entity
that either has an unsatisfied final judgment against it in an action
that was incurred for work performed subject to this chapter or owes
the department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this
chapter as a result of a final judgment; or (iii) the applicant does
not have a valid unified business identifier number, if required by the
department of revenue.
(b) The department shall suspend an active registration if (i) the
department has determined that the registrant has an unsatisfied final
judgment against it for work within the scope of this chapter; (ii) the
department has ((notice)) determined that the registrant is a sole
proprietor or ((a)) an owner, principal, or officer of a registered
contractor that has an unsatisfied final judgment against it for work
within the scope of this chapter; or (((ii))) (iii) the ((applicant))
registrant does not maintain a valid unified business identifier
number, if required by the department of revenue.
(c) The department may suspend an active registration if the
department has determined that an owner, principal, partner, or officer
of the registrant was an owner, principal, or officer of a previous
partnership, corporation, or other entity that has an unsatisfied final
judgment against it.
(4) The department shall not deny an application or suspend a
registration because of an unsatisfied final judgment if the
applicant's or registrant's unsatisfied final judgment was determined
by the director to be the result of the fraud or negligence of another
party.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.27.040 and 2001 c 159 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each applicant shall file with the department a surety bond
issued by a surety insurer who meets the requirements of chapter 48.28
RCW in the sum of twelve thousand dollars if the applicant is a general
contractor and six thousand dollars if the applicant is a specialty
contractor. If no valid bond is already on file with the department at
the time the application is filed, a bond must accompany the
registration application. The bond shall have the state of Washington
named as obligee with good and sufficient surety in a form to be
approved by the department. The bond shall be continuous and may be
canceled by the surety upon the surety giving written notice to the
director. A cancellation or revocation of the bond or withdrawal of
the surety from the bond automatically suspends the registration issued
to the ((registrant)) contractor until a new bond or reinstatement
notice has been filed and approved as provided in this section. The
bond shall be conditioned that the applicant will pay all persons
performing labor, including employee benefits, for the contractor, will
pay all taxes and contributions due to the state of Washington, and
will pay all persons furnishing ((labor or)) material or renting or
supplying equipment to the contractor and will pay all amounts that may
be adjudged against the contractor by reason of breach of contract
including ((negligent or)) improper work in the conduct of the
contracting business. A change in the name of a business or a change
in the type of business entity shall not impair a bond for the purposes
of this section so long as one of the original applicants for such bond
maintains partial ownership in the business covered by the bond.
(2) At the time of initial registration or renewal, the contractor
shall provide a bond or other security deposit as required by this
chapter and comply with all of the other provisions of this chapter
before the department shall issue or renew the contractor's certificate
of registration. Any contractor registered as of July 1, 2001, who
maintains that registration in accordance with this chapter is in
compliance with this chapter until the next renewal of the contractor's
certificate of registration.
(3) Any person, firm, or corporation having a claim against the
contractor for any of the items referred to in this section may bring
suit ((upon)) against the contractor and the bond or deposit in the
superior court of the county in which the work was done or of any
county in which jurisdiction of the contractor may be had. The surety
issuing the bond shall be named as a party to any suit upon the bond.
Action upon the bond or deposit brought by a residential homeowner for
breach of contract by a party to the construction contract shall be
commenced by filing the summons and complaint with the clerk of the
appropriate superior court within two years from the date the claimed
contract work was substantially completed or abandoned, whichever
occurred first. Action upon the bond or deposit brought by any other
authorized party shall be commenced by filing the summons and complaint
with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within one year from
the date the claimed labor was performed and benefits accrued, taxes
and contributions owing the state of Washington became due, materials
and equipment were furnished, or the claimed contract work was
substantially completed or abandoned, whichever occurred first.
Service of process in an action filed under this chapter against the
contractor((,)) and the contractor's bond((,)) or the deposit shall be
exclusively by service upon the department. Three copies of the
summons and complaint and a fee adopted by rule of not less than
((twenty)) fifty dollars to cover the costs shall be served by
registered or certified mail, or other delivery service requiring
notice of receipt, upon the department at the time suit is started and
the department shall maintain a record, available for public
inspection, of all suits so commenced. Service is not complete until
the department receives the fee and three copies of the summons and
complaint. The service shall constitute service and confer personal
jurisdiction on the ((registrant)) contractor and the surety for suit
((upon the)) on claimant's claim against the contractor and the bond or
deposit and the department shall transmit the summons and complaint or
a copy thereof to the ((registrant)) contractor at the address listed
in the ((registrant's)) contractor's application and to the surety
within two days after it shall have been received.
(4) The surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate
amount in excess of the amount named in the bond nor for any monetary
penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter for an infraction. The
liability of the surety shall not cumulate where the bond has been
renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued or otherwise extended. The
surety upon the bond may, upon notice to the department and the
parties, tender to the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the
action an amount equal to the claims thereunder or the amount of the
bond less the amount of judgments, if any, previously satisfied
therefrom and to the extent of such tender the surety upon the bond
shall be exonerated but if the actions commenced and pending and
provided to the department as required in subsection (3) of this
section, at any one time exceed the amount of the bond then unimpaired,
claims shall be satisfied from the bond in the following order:
(a) Employee labor and claims of laborers, including employee
benefits;
(b) Claims for breach of contract by a party to the construction
contract;
(c) Registered or licensed subcontractors, material, and equipment;
(d) Taxes and contributions due the state of Washington;
(e) Any court costs, interest, and ((attorney's [attorneys']))
attorneys' fees plaintiff may be entitled to recover. The surety is
not liable for any amount in excess of the penal limit of its bond.
A payment made by the surety in good faith exonerates the bond to
the extent of any payment made by the surety.
(5) The total amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a
general contractor by this section to claimants other than residential
homeowners must not exceed one-half of the bond amount. The total
amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a specialty contractor
by this section to claimants other than residential homeowners must not
exceed one-half of the bond amount or four thousand dollars, whichever
is greater.
(6) The prevailing party in an action filed under this section
against the contractor and contractor's bond or deposit, for breach of
contract by a party to ((a)) the construction contract involving a
residential homeowner, is entitled to costs, interest, and reasonable
attorneys' fees. The surety upon the bond or deposit is not liable in
an aggregate amount in excess of the amount named in the bond or
deposit nor for any monetary penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter
for an infraction.
(7) If a final judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon
the bond or deposit so furnished that there is not in effect a bond or
deposit in the full amount prescribed in this section, the registration
of the contractor is automatically suspended until the bond or deposit
liability in the required amount unimpaired by unsatisfied judgment
claims is furnished.
(8) In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the
contractor may file with the department ((a deposit consisting of cash
or other security acceptable to)) an assigned savings account, upon
forms provided by the department.
(9) Any person having filed and served a summons and complaint as
required by this section having an unsatisfied final judgment against
the registrant for any items referred to in this section may execute
upon the security held by the department by serving a certified copy of
the unsatisfied final judgment by registered or certified mail upon the
department within one year of the date of entry of such judgment. Upon
the receipt of service of such certified copy the department shall pay
or order paid from the deposit, through the registry of the superior
court which rendered judgment, towards the amount of the unsatisfied
judgment. The priority of payment by the department shall be the order
of receipt by the department, but the department shall have no
liability for payment in excess of the amount of the deposit.
(10) Within ten days after resolution of the case, a certified copy
of the final judgment and order, or any settlement documents where a
case is not disposed of by a court trial, a certified copy of the
dispositive settlement documents must be provided to the department by
the prevailing party. Failure to provide a copy of the final judgment
and order or the dispositive settlement documents to the department
within ten days of entry of such an order constitutes a violation of
this chapter and a penalty adopted by rule of not less than two hundred
fifty dollars may be assessed against the prevailing party.
(11) The director may require an applicant applying to renew or
reinstate a registration or applying for a new registration to file a
bond of up to three times the normally required amount, if the director
determines that an applicant, or a previous registration of a corporate
officer, owner, or partner of a current applicant, has had in the past
five years a total of ((six)) three final judgments in actions under
this chapter involving a residential single-family dwelling on two or
more different structures.
(((11))) (12) The director may adopt rules necessary for the proper
administration of the security.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.27.080 and 1988 c 285 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a
contractor may bring or maintain any action in any court of this state
for the collection of compensation for the performance of any work or
for breach of any contract for which registration is required under
this chapter without alleging and proving that he was a duly registered
contractor and held a current and valid certificate of registration at
the time he contracted for the performance of such work or entered into
such contract. For the purposes of this section, the court shall not
find a contractor in substantial compliance with the registration
requirements of this chapter unless: (1) The department has on file
the information required by RCW 18.27.030; (2) the contractor has at
all times had in force a current bond or other security as required by
RCW 18.27.040; and (3) the contractor has at all times had in force
current insurance as required by RCW 18.27.050. In determining under
this section whether a contractor is in substantial compliance with the
registration requirements of this chapter, the court shall take into
consideration the length of time during which the contractor did not
hold a valid certificate of registration.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.27.090 and 2003 c 399 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
The registration provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(1) An authorized representative of the United States government,
the state of Washington, or any incorporated city, town, county,
township, irrigation district, reclamation district, or other municipal
or political corporation or subdivision of this state;
(2) Officers of a court when they are acting within the scope of
their office;
(3) Public utilities operating under the regulations of the
utilities and transportation commission in construction, maintenance,
or development work incidental to their own business;
(4) Any construction, repair, or operation incidental to the
discovering or producing of petroleum or gas, or the drilling, testing,
abandoning, or other operation of any petroleum or gas well or any
surface or underground mine or mineral deposit when performed by an
owner or lessee;
(5) The sale ((or installation)) of any finished products,
materials, or articles of merchandise that are not ((actually))
fabricated into and do not become a ((permanent fixed)) part of a
structure under the common law of fixtures;
(6) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair of
personal property performed by the registered or legal owner, or by a
mobile/manufactured home retail dealer or manufacturer licensed under
chapter 46.70 RCW who shall warranty service and repairs under chapter
46.70 RCW;
(7) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair carried on
within the limits and boundaries of any site or reservation under the
legal jurisdiction of the federal government;
(8) Any person who only furnished materials, supplies, or equipment
without fabricating them into, or consuming them in the performance of,
the work of the contractor;
(9) Any work or operation on one undertaking or project by one or
more contracts, the aggregate contract price of which for labor and
materials and all other items is less than five hundred dollars, such
work or operations being considered as of a casual, minor, or
inconsequential nature. The exemption prescribed in this subsection
does not apply in any instance wherein the work or construction is only
a part of a larger or major operation, whether undertaken by the same
or a different contractor, or in which a division of the operation is
made into contracts of amounts less than five hundred dollars for the
purpose of evasion of this chapter or otherwise. The exemption
prescribed in this subsection does not apply to a person who advertises
or puts out any sign or card or other device which might indicate to
the public that he or she is a contractor, or that he or she is
qualified to engage in the business of contractor;
(10) Any construction or operation incidental to the construction
and repair of irrigation and drainage ditches of regularly constituted
irrigation districts or reclamation districts; or to farming, dairying,
agriculture, viticulture, horticulture, or stock or poultry raising; or
to clearing or other work upon land in rural districts for fire
prevention purposes; except when any of the above work is performed by
a registered contractor;
(11) An owner who contracts for a project with a registered
contractor, except that this exemption shall not deprive the owner of
the protections of this chapter against registered and unregistered
contractors. The exemption prescribed in this subsection does not
apply to a person who performs the activities of a contractor for the
purpose of leasing or selling improved property he or she has owned for
less than twelve months;
(12) Any person working on his or her own property, whether
occupied by him or her or not, and any person working on his or her
personal residence, whether owned by him or her or not but this
exemption shall not apply to any person ((otherwise covered by this
chapter who constructs an improvement)) who performs the activities of
a contractor on his or her own property ((with the intention and)) for
the purpose of selling, demolishing, or leasing the ((improved))
property;
(13) ((Owners of commercial properties who use their own employees
to do)) An owner who performs maintenance, repair, and alteration work
in or upon ((their)) his or her own properties, or who uses his or her
own employees to do such work;
(14) A licensed architect or civil or professional engineer acting
solely in his or her professional capacity, an electrician ((licensed))
certified under the laws of the state of Washington, or a plumber
((licensed)) certified under the laws of the state of Washington or
licensed by a political subdivision of the state of Washington while
operating within the boundaries of such political subdivision. The
exemption provided in this subsection is applicable only when the
((licensee)) person certified is operating within the scope of his or
her ((license)) certification;
(15) Any person who engages in the activities herein regulated as
an employee of a registered contractor with wages as his or her sole
compensation or as an employee with wages as his or her sole
compensation;
(16) Contractors on highway projects who have been prequalified as
required by RCW 47.28.070, with the department of transportation to
perform highway construction, reconstruction, or maintenance work;
(17) A mobile/manufactured home dealer or manufacturer who
subcontracts the installation, set-up, or repair work to actively
registered contractors. This exemption only applies to the
installation, set-up, or repair of the mobile/manufactured homes that
were manufactured or sold by the mobile/manufactured home dealer or
manufacturer;
(18) An entity who holds a valid electrical contractor's license
under chapter 19.28 RCW that employs a certified journeyman
electrician, a certified residential specialty electrician, or an
electrical trainee meeting the requirements of chapter 19.28 RCW to
perform plumbing work that is incidentally, directly, and immediately
appropriate to the like-in-kind replacement of a household appliance or
other small household utilization equipment that requires limited
electric power and limited waste and/or water connections. An
electrical trainee must be supervised by a certified electrician while
performing plumbing work.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.27.104 and 1997 c 314 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If, upon investigation, the director or the director's designee
has probable cause to believe that a person holding a registration, an
applicant for registration, or a person acting in the capacity of a
contractor who is not otherwise exempted from this chapter, has
violated RCW 18.27.100 by unlawfully advertising for work covered by
this chapter, the department may issue a citation containing an order
of correction. Such order shall require the violator to cease the
unlawful advertising.
(2) If the person to whom a citation is issued under subsection (1)
of this section notifies the department in writing that he or she
contests the citation, the department shall afford an opportunity for
an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW ((within thirty days
after receiving the notification)).

Sec. 8 RCW 18.27.114 and 2001 c 159 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any contractor agreeing to perform any contracting project:
(a) For the repair, alteration, or construction of four or fewer
residential units or accessory structures on such residential property
when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars or more; or
(b) for the repair, alteration, or construction of a commercial
building when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars or
more but less than sixty thousand dollars, must provide the customer
with the following disclosure statement in substantially the following
form using lower case and upper case twelve-point and bold type where
appropriate, prior to starting work on the project:

"NOTICE TO CUSTOMER

This contractor is registered with the state of Washington,
registration no. . . ., and has posted with the state a bond or
deposit of . . . . . for the purpose of satisfying claims
against the contractor for breach of contract including
negligent or improper work in the conduct of the contractor's
business. The expiration date of this contractor's
registration is . . . . ..

THIS BOND OR DEPOSIT MIGHT NOT BE SUFFICIENT TO COVER A CLAIM
THAT MIGHT ARISE FROM THE WORK DONE UNDER YOUR CONTRACT.

This bond or deposit is not for your exclusive use because it
covers all work performed by this contractor. The bond or
deposit is intended to pay valid claims up to . . . . . that
you and other customers, suppliers, subcontractors, or taxing
authorities may have.

FOR GREATER PROTECTION YOU MAY WITHHOLD A PERCENTAGE OF YOUR
CONTRACT.

You may withhold a contractually defined percentage of your
construction contract as retainage for a stated period of time
to provide protection to you and help insure that your project
will be completed as required by your contract.

YOUR PROPERTY MAY BE LIENED.

If a supplier of materials used in your construction project or
an employee or subcontractor of your contractor or
subcontractors is not paid, your property may be liened to
force payment and you could pay twice for the same work.

FOR ADDITIONAL PROTECTION, YOU MAY REQUEST THE CONTRACTOR TO
PROVIDE YOU WITH ORIGINAL "LIEN RELEASE" DOCUMENTS FROM EACH
SUPPLIER OR SUBCONTRACTOR ON YOUR PROJECT.

The contractor is required to provide you with further
information about lien release documents if you request it.
General information is also available from the state Department
of Labor and Industries.

I have received a copy of this disclosure statement.

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

(Signature of customer)
"

(2) The contractor must retain a signed copy of the disclosure
statement in his or her files for a minimum of three years, and produce
a signed or electronic signature copy of the disclosure statement to
the department upon request.
(3) A contractor subject to this section shall notify any consumer
to whom notice is required under subsection (1) of this section if the
contractor's registration has expired or is revoked or suspended by the
department prior to completion or other termination of the contract
with the consumer.
(((3))) (4) No contractor subject to this section may bring or
maintain any lien claim under chapter 60.04 RCW based on any contract
to which this section applies without alleging and proving that the
contractor has provided the customer with a copy of the disclosure
statement as required in subsection (1) of this section.
(((4))) (5) This section does not apply to contracts authorized
under chapter 39.04 RCW or to contractors contracting with other
contractors.
(((5))) (6) Failure to comply with this section shall constitute an
infraction under the provisions of this chapter.
(((6))) (7) The department shall produce model disclosure
statements, and public service announcements detailing the information
needed to assist contractors and contractors' customers to comply under
this section. As necessary, the department shall periodically update
these education materials.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.27.200 and 2002 c 82 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a violation of this chapter and an infraction for any
contractor to:
(a) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor without being registered as required by this chapter;
(b) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor when the contractor's registration is suspended or
revoked;
(c) Transfer a valid registration to an unregistered contractor or
allow an unregistered contractor to work under a registration issued to
another contractor; ((or))
(d) If the contractor is a contractor as defined in RCW 18.106.010,
violate RCW 18.106.320; or
(e) Subcontract to, or use, an unregistered contractor.
(2) Each day that a contractor works without being registered as
required by this chapter, works while the contractor's registration is
suspended or revoked, or works under a registration issued to another
contractor is a separate infraction. Each worksite at which a
contractor works without being registered as required by this chapter,
works while the contractor's registration is suspended or revoked, or
works under a registration issued to another contractor is a separate
infraction.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.27.210 and 1993 c 454 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall appoint compliance inspectors to investigate
alleged or apparent violations of this chapter.
(a) The director, or authorized compliance inspector, upon
presentation of appropriate credentials, may inspect and investigate
job sites at which a contractor had bid or presently is working to
determine whether the contractor is registered in accordance with this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter or whether there is a
violation of ((RCW 18.27.200)) this chapter.
(b) Upon request of the compliance inspector of the department, a
contractor or an employee of the contractor shall provide information
identifying the contractor.
(c) The director or the director's authorized representative may
apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant
authorizing access to any job site at which a contractor is presently
working. The court may, upon such an application, issue a search
warrant for the purpose requested. The costs for obtaining the search
warrant must be added to the penalty for a violation of this chapter if
such a violation becomes final.
(2) If the employee of an unregistered contractor is cited by a
compliance inspector, that employee is cited as the agent of the
employer-contractor, and issuance of the infraction to the employee is
notice to the employer-contractor that the contractor is in violation
of this chapter. An employee who is cited by a compliance inspector
shall not be liable for any of the alleged violations contained in the
citation unless the employee is also the contractor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
If he or she has reason to believe there has been a violation of
this chapter, the director and the director's authorized
representatives may issue subpoenas to enforce the production and
examination of any of the following, whether written or electronic: A
listing of the contractors working on the property; contracts between
the contractor and any suppliers or subcontractors; and any other
information necessary to enforce this chapter. The subpoena may be
issued only if a contractor fails to provide the above information when
requested by the department. The superior court has the power to
enforce such a subpoena by proper proceedings. This section applies to
registered and unregistered contractors.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.27.230 and 1997 c 314 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may issue a notice of infraction if the department
reasonably believes that the contractor has committed an infraction
under this chapter. A notice of infraction issued under this section
shall be personally served on the contractor named in the notice by the
department's compliance inspectors or service can be made by certified
mail directed to the contractor named in the notice of infraction at
the contractor's last known address of record. If the contractor named
in the notice of infraction is a firm or corporation, the notice may be
personally served on any employee of the firm or corporation. If a
notice of infraction is personally served upon an employee of a firm or
corporation, the department shall ((within four days of service)) send
a copy of the notice by ((certified)) mail, return receipt requested,
to the contractor if the department is able to obtain the contractor's
address.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.27.240 and 2006 c 270 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The form of the notice of infraction issued under this chapter
shall include the following:
(1) A statement that the notice represents a determination that the
infraction has been committed by the contractor named in the notice and
that the determination shall be final unless contested as provided in
this chapter;
(2) A statement that the infraction is a noncriminal offense for
which imprisonment shall not be imposed as a sanction;
(3) A statement of the ((specific)) violation which necessitated
issuance of the infraction;
(4) A statement of penalty involved if the infraction is
established;
(5) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for
responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options;
(6) A statement that at any hearing to contest the notice of
infraction the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of
the evidence, that the infraction was committed; and that the
contractor may subpoena witnesses, including the compliance inspector
of the department who issued and served the notice of infraction;
(7) A statement that at any hearing to contest the notice of
infraction against an unregistered contractor, the unregistered
contractor has the burden of proving that the infraction did not occur;
(8) A statement that the contractor must respond to the notice of
infraction in one of the ways provided in this chapter; and
(((8))) (9) A statement that a contractor's failure to timely
select one of the options for responding to the notice of infraction
after receiving a statement of the options provided in this chapter for
responding to the notice of infraction and the procedures necessary to
exercise these options is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and may be
punished by a fine or imprisonment in jail.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.27.250 and 1986 c 197 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A violation designated as an infraction under this chapter shall be
heard and determined by an administrative law judge of the office of
administrative hearings. If a party desires to contest the notice of
infraction, the party shall file a notice of appeal with the
department((,)) specifying the grounds of the appeal within twenty days
((of issuance of the infraction)) of service of the infraction in a
manner provided by this chapter. The appeal must be accompanied by a
certified check for two hundred dollars, which shall be returned to the
assessed party if the decision of the department is not sustained
following the final decision in the appeal. If the final decision
sustains the decision of the department, the department must apply the
two hundred dollars to the payment of the expenses of the appeal,
including costs charged by the office of administrative hearings. The
administrative law judge shall conduct hearings in these cases at
locations in the county where the infraction occurred.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.27.270 and 2000 c 171 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A contractor who is issued a notice of infraction shall respond
within twenty days of the date of issuance of the notice of infraction.
(2) If the contractor named in the notice of infraction does not
elect to contest the notice of infraction, then the contractor shall
pay to the department, by check or money order, the amount of the
penalty prescribed for the infraction. When a response which does not
contest the notice of infraction is received by the department with the
appropriate penalty, the department shall make the appropriate entry in
its records.
(3) If the contractor named in the notice of infraction elects to
contest the notice of infraction, the contractor shall respond by
filing an ((answer of protest with the department specifying the
grounds of protest)) appeal to the department in the manner specified
in RCW 18.27.250.
(4) If any contractor issued a notice of infraction fails to
respond within the prescribed response period, the contractor shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor and prosecuted in the county where the
infraction occurred.
(5) After final determination by an administrative law judge that
an infraction has been committed, a contractor who fails to pay a
monetary penalty within thirty days, that is not waived pursuant to RCW
18.27.340(2), and who fails to file an appeal pursuant to RCW
18.27.310(4), shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be prosecuted in the
county where the infraction occurred.
(6) A contractor who fails to pay a monetary penalty within thirty
days after exhausting appellate remedies pursuant to RCW 18.27.310(4),
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be prosecuted in the county where
the infraction occurred.
(7) If a contractor who is issued a notice of infraction is a
contractor who has failed to register as a contractor under this
chapter, the contractor is subject to a monetary penalty per infraction
as provided in the schedule of penalties established by the department,
and each day the person works without becoming registered is a separate
infraction.

Sec. 16 RCW 18.27.290 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
It is a gross misdemeanor for a contractor who has been personally
served with a notice of infraction to willfully ((violate the written
promise)) fail to respond to a notice of infraction as provided in this
chapter, regardless of the ultimate disposition of the infraction.

Sec. 17 RCW 18.27.310 and 2001 c 159 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The administrative law judge shall conduct contractors' notice
of infraction cases pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The burden of proof is on the department to establish the
commission of the infraction by a preponderance of the evidence, unless
the infraction is issued against an unregistered contractor in which
case the burden of proof is on the contractor. The notice of
infraction shall be dismissed if the ((defendant)) appellant
establishes that, at the time the advertising occurred, offer or bid
was made, or work was performed, the ((defendant)) appellant was
registered by the department, without suspension, or was exempt from
registration.
(3) After consideration of the evidence and argument, the
administrative law judge shall determine whether the infraction was
committed. If it has not been established that the infraction was
committed, an order dismissing the notice shall be entered in the
record of the proceedings. If it has been established that the
infraction was committed, the administrative law judge shall issue
findings of fact and conclusions of law in its decision and order
determining whether the infraction was committed.
(4) An appeal from the administrative law judge's determination or
order shall be to the superior court. The decision of the superior
court is subject only to discretionary review pursuant to Rule 2.3 of
the Rules of Appellate Procedure.

--- END ---