BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds:
(1) Nearly three hundred thousand American children may have levels
of lead in their blood in excess of ten micrograms per deciliter.
Unless prevented or treated, elevated blood-lead levels in egregious
cases may result in impairment of the ability to think, concentrate,
and learn.
(2) A significant cause of lead poisoning in children is the
ingestion of lead particles from deteriorating lead-based paint in
older, poorly maintained residences.
(3) Childhood lead poisoning can be prevented if parents, property
owners, health professionals, and those who work with young children
are informed about the risks of childhood lead poisoning and how to
prevent it.
(4) Knowledge of lead-based-paint hazards and their control,
mitigation, abatement, and risk avoidance is not sufficiently
widespread.
(5) Most children who live in older homes and who otherwise may be
at risk for childhood lead poisoning are not tested for the presence of
elevated lead levels in their blood.
(6) Testing for elevated lead levels in the blood can lead to the
mitigation or prevention of the harmful effects of childhood lead
poisoning and may also prevent similar injuries to other children
living in the same household.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affected property" means a room or group of rooms within a
property constructed before January 1, 1960, or within a property
constructed between January 1, 1960, and January 1, 1978, where the
owner has actual knowledge of the presence of lead-based paint, that
form a single independent habitable dwelling unit for occupation by one
or more individuals and that have living facilities with permanent
provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation.
"Affected property" does not include:
(a) An area not used for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, or
sanitation, such as an unfinished basement;
(b) A unit within a hotel, motel, or similar seasonal or transient
facility, unless such unit is occupied by one or more persons at risk
for a period exceeding thirty days;
(c) An area that is secured and inaccessible to occupants; or
(d) A unit that is not offered for rent.
(2) "Dust-lead hazard" means surface dust in a residential dwelling
or a facility occupied by a person at risk which contains a
mass-per-area concentration of lead equal to or exceeding forty
micrograms per square foot on floors or two hundred fifty micrograms
per square foot on interior windowsills based on wipe samples.
(3) "Elevated blood-lead level" means a quantity of lead in whole
venous blood, expressed in micrograms per deciliter, which exceeds ten
micrograms per deciliter or such other level as specifically provided
in this chapter.
(4) "Lead-based paint" means paint or other surface coatings that
contain lead equal to or exceeding one milligram per square centimeter,
one-half percent by weight, or five thousand parts per million by
weight.
(5) "Lead-based paint hazard" means paint-lead hazards and
dust-lead hazards.
(6) "Owner" means a person, firm, corporation, nonprofit
organization, partnership, government, guardian, conservator, receiver,
trustee, executor, or other judicial officer, or other entity which,
alone or with others, owns, holds, or controls the freehold or
leasehold title or part of the title to property, with or without
actually possessing it. "Owner" includes a vendee who possesses the
title, but does not include a mortgagee or an owner of a reversionary
interest under a ground rent lease. "Owner" includes any authorized
agent of the owner, including a property manager or leasing agent.
(7) "Paint-lead hazard" means any one of the following:
(a) Any lead-based paint on a friction surface that is subject to
abrasion and where the dust-lead levels on the nearest horizontal
surface underneath the friction surface, such as the windowsill or
floor, are equal to or greater than the dust-lead hazard levels defined
in this section;
(b) Any damaged or otherwise deteriorated lead-based paint on an
impact surface that is caused by impact from a related building
material, such as a door knob that knocks into a wall or a door that
knocks against its door frame;
(c) Any chewable lead-based painted surface on which there is
evidence of teeth marks; or
(d) Any other deteriorated lead-based paint in or on the exterior
of any residential building or any facility occupied by a person at
risk.
(8) "Person at risk" means a child under the age of six years or a
pregnant woman who resides or regularly spends at least twenty-four
hours per week in an affected property.
(9) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.
(10) "Tenant" means the individual named as the lessee in a lease,
rental agreement, or occupancy agreement for a dwelling unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The secretary shall sponsor a series of
public service announcements on radio, television, the internet, and
print media about the nature of lead-based paint hazards, the
importance of standards for lead poisoning prevention in properties,
the certification and training program administered by the department
of community, trade, and economic development under chapter 70.103 RCW,
and the purposes and responsibilities set forth in this chapter. In
developing and coordinating this public information initiative, the
secretary shall seek the participation and involvement of private
industry organizations, including those involved in real estate,
insurance, mortgage banking, and pediatrics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 By January 1, 2008, the secretary shall
develop culturally and linguistically appropriate information pamphlets
regarding childhood lead poisoning, the importance of testing for
elevated blood-lead levels, prevention of childhood lead poisoning,
treatment of childhood lead poisoning, and, where appropriate, the
requirements of this chapter. These information pamphlets shall be
distributed to parents or other legal guardians of children six years
of age or younger on the following occasions:
(1) By a health care provider at the time of a child's birth and at
the time of any childhood immunization or vaccination unless it is
established that such information pamphlet has been provided previously
to the parent or legal guardian by the health care provider within the
prior twelve months; and
(2) By the owner or operator of any child care facility or
preschool or kindergarten class on or before October 15th of each
calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The secretary shall establish a program
for early identification of persons at risk of having elevated
blood-lead levels. The program shall systematically screen children
under six years of age in the target populations identified in
subsection (2) of this section for the presence of elevated blood-lead
levels. Children within the specified target populations shall be
screened with a blood-lead test at age twelve months and age twenty-four months, or between the ages of thirty-six months and seventy-two
months if they have not previously been screened. The secretary shall,
after consultation with recognized professional medical groups and such
other sources as the secretary deems appropriate, adopt rules
establishing:
(a) The means by which and the intervals at which such children
under six years of age shall be screened for lead poisoning and
elevated blood-lead levels; and
(b) Guidelines for the medical followup on children found to have
elevated blood-lead levels.
(2) In developing screening programs to identify persons at risk
with elevated blood-lead levels, priority shall be given to persons
within the following categories:
(a) All children enrolled in the medicaid program at ages twelve
months and twenty-four months, or between the ages of thirty-six months
and seventy-two months if they have not previously been screened;
(b) Children under the age of six years exhibiting delayed
cognitive development or other symptoms of childhood lead poisoning;
(c) Persons at risk residing in the same household, or recently
residing in the same household, as another person at risk with a
blood-lead level of ten micrograms per deciliter or greater;
(d) Persons at risk residing, or who have recently resided, in
buildings or geographical areas in which significant numbers of cases
of lead poisoning or elevated blood-lead levels have recently been
reported;
(e) Persons at risk residing, or who have recently resided, in an
affected property contained in a building that during the preceding
three years has been subject to enforcement for violations of lead
poisoning prevention statutes, ordinances, rules, or regulations as
specified by the secretary;
(f) Persons at risk residing, or who have recently resided, in a
room or group of rooms contained in a building whose owner also owns a
building containing affected properties which during the preceding
three years has been subject to an enforcement action for a violation
of lead poisoning prevention statutes, ordinances, rules, or
regulations; and
(g) Persons at risk residing in other buildings or geographical
areas in which the secretary reasonably determines there to be a
significant risk of affected individuals having a blood-lead level of
ten micrograms per deciliter or greater.
(3) The secretary shall maintain comprehensive records of all
screenings conducted pursuant to this section. Such records shall be
indexed geographically and by owner in order to determine the location
of areas of relatively high incidence of lead poisoning and other
elevated blood-lead levels.
(4) All cases or probable cases of lead poisoning found in the
course of screenings conducted pursuant to this section shall be
reported to the affected individual, to his or her parent or legal
guardian if he or she is a minor, and to the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---