BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services and the health
care authority shall enter into data-sharing agreements with the
appropriate agencies in the states of Oregon and Idaho to assure the
valid Washington state residence of applicants for health care services
in Washington. Such agreements shall include appropriate safeguards
related to the confidentiality of the shared information.
(2) The department of social and health services and the health
care authority must jointly report on the status of the data-sharing
agreements to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later
than November 30, 2007.

--- END ---