BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.41 RCW
to read as follows:
Health care information relative to prescription information
containing patient-identifiable and prescriber-identifiable data shall
not be licensed, transferred, used, or sold by any pharmacy benefits
manager, insurance company, electronic transmission intermediary,
retail, mail order, or internet pharmacy, or other similar entity, for
any commercial purpose, except for the limited purposes of pharmacy
reimbursement; formulary compliance; care management; utilization
review by a health care provider, the patient's insurance provider, or
the agent of either; health care research; or as otherwise provided by
law. Commercial purpose includes, but is not limited to, advertising,
marketing, promotion, or any activity that could be used to influence
sales or market share of a pharmaceutical product, influence or
evaluate the prescribing behavior of an individual health care
professional, or evaluate the effectiveness of a professional
pharmaceutical detailing sales force. Nothing in this section
prohibits the dispensing of prescription medications to a patient or to
the patient's authorized representative; the transmission of
prescription information between an authorized prescriber and a
licensed pharmacy; the transfer of prescription information between
licensed pharmacies; the transfer of prescription records that may
occur in the event a pharmacy ownership is changed or transferred; or
care management educational communications provided to a patient about
the patient's health condition, adherence to a prescribed course of
therapy, or other information about the drug being dispensed, treatment
options, or clinical trials. Nothing in this section prohibits the
collection, use, transfer, or sale of patient and prescriber de-identified data by zip code, geographic region, or medical specialty
for commercial purposes. In addition to other appropriate remedies
under this chapter, the legislature finds that the practices covered by
this section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

--- END ---