BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Cities are on the frontlines of the fight
against crime but with existing legal authority and financial resources
they have been unable to keep up with the increased costs of existing
police, prosecutors, courts, jails, indigent defense, and
communication, dispatch, or related technology. In addition, they have
been unable to enhance existing tools to effectively fight local crime.
The legislature recognizes the need to provide cities with increased
authority to pay for existing and enhanced criminal justice services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city legislative authority may authorize, fix, and impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter.
(2) The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event, under those chapters, within the
city. The rate must equal: (a) In the case of a sales tax, one-tenth
of one percent of the selling price; (b) in the case of a use tax, the
value of the article used.
(3) Moneys collected under this section must be used solely to
provide additional funds to pay (a) the increased costs of existing
criminal justice services, and (b) the costs of enhancements to
existing criminal justice services. Criminal justice services include,
but are not limited to: Police, prosecutors, courts, jails, indigent
defense, communication/dispatch and related technology, other
supporting personnel, equipment, facilities, programs, and operating
expenditures determined by the city to be part of its criminal justice
system and an important part of its crime prevention and crime fighting
activities. Moneys collected under this section may not be used to
replace or supplant expenditures for criminal justice services that are
funded from other sources but shall be used in addition to such
existing expenditures to pay the increased costs of existing criminal
justice services and the costs of enhanced and new criminal justice
services.

--- END ---