BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.24.470 and 1999 c 214 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((secretary)) regional support networks shall ((contract))
provide, to the extent that funds are appropriated for this purpose,
for case management services and such other services as the secretary
deems necessary to assist offenders identified under RCW 72.09.370.
((The contracts may be with regional support networks or any other
qualified and appropriate entities.))
(2) The case manager has the authority to assist these offenders in
obtaining the services, as set forth in the plan created under RCW
72.09.370(2), for up to five years. The services may include
coordination of mental health services, assistance with unfunded
medical expenses, obtaining chemical dependency treatment, housing,
employment services, educational or vocational training, independent
living skills, parenting education, anger management services, and such
other services as the case manager deems necessary.
(3) The legislature intends that funds appropriated for the
purposes of RCW 72.09.370, 71.05.145, and 71.05.212, and this section
and distributed to the regional support networks are to supplement and
not to supplant general funding. Funds appropriated to implement RCW
72.09.370, 71.05.145, and 71.05.212, and this section are not to be
considered available resources as defined in RCW 71.24.025 ((and are
not subject to the statutory distribution formula established pursuant
to RCW 71.24.035)).

--- END ---