BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that young people
should have the knowledge and skills necessary to build healthy
relationships, and to protect themselves from unintended pregnancy and
sexually transmitted diseases, including HIV infection. The primary
responsibility for sexual health education is with parents and
guardians. However, this responsibility also extends to schools,
religious organizations, and other community groups. It is in the
public's best interest to ensure that young people are equipped with
medically and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate information that
will help them avoid unintended pregnancies, remain free of sexually
transmitted diseases, and make informed, responsible decisions
throughout their lives.
(2) The legislature intends to support and advance the standards
established in the January 2005 guidelines for sexual health
information and disease prevention developed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the department of health.
These guidelines are a fundamental tool to help school districts,
teachers, guest speakers, health and counseling providers, community
groups, parents, and guardians choose, develop, and evaluate sexual
health curricula to better meet the health and safety needs of
adolescents and young adults in their communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2008, every public school that offers sexual
health education must assure that sexual health education is medically
and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, appropriate for students
regardless of gender, race, disability status, or sexual orientation,
and includes information about abstinence and other methods of
preventing unintended pregnancy and sexually transmitted diseases. All
sexual health information, instruction, and materials must be medically
and scientifically accurate. Abstinence may not be taught to the
exclusion of other materials and instruction on contraceptives and
disease prevention. Sexual health education must be consistent with
the January 2005 guidelines for sexual health information and disease
prevention developed by the department of health and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) As used in this act, "medically and scientifically accurate"
means information that is verified or supported by research in
compliance with scientific methods, is published in peer-review
journals, where appropriate, and is recognized as accurate and
objective by professional organizations and agencies with expertise in
the field of sexual health including but not limited to the American
college of obstetricians and gynecologists, the Washington state
department of health, and the federal centers for disease control and
prevention.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction and the department of
health shall make the January 2005 guidelines for sexual health
information and disease prevention available to school districts,
teachers, and guest speakers on their web sites. Within available
resources, the superintendent of public instruction and the department
of health shall make any related information, model policies,
curricula, or other resources available as well.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the department of health, shall develop a list of sexual health
education curricula that are consistent with the 2005 guidelines for
sexual health information and disease prevention. This list shall be
intended to serve as a resource for schools, teachers, or any other
organization or community group, and shall be updated no less
frequently than annually and made available on the web sites of the
office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department
of health.
(5) Public schools that offer sexual health education are
encouraged to review their sexual health curricula and choose a
curriculum from the list developed under subsection (4) of this
section. Any public school that offers sexual health education may
identify, choose, or develop any other curriculum, if the curriculum
chosen or developed complies with the requirements of this section.
(6) Any parent or legal guardian who wishes to have his or her
child excused from any planned instruction in sexual health education
may do so upon filing a written request with the school district board
of directors or its designee. In addition, any parent or legal
guardian may review the sexual health education curriculum offered in
his or her child's school by filing a written request with the school
district board of directors, the principal of the school his or her
child attends, or the principal's designee.
(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall,
through its Washington state school health profiles survey or other
existing reporting mechanism, ask public schools to identify any
curricula used to provide sexual health education, and shall report the
results of this inquiry to the legislature on a biennial basis,
beginning with the 2008-09 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
healthy youth act.

--- END ---