BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.135.010 and 1999 c 375 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Two Washington accounts for student child care in higher education
are established. The higher education coordinating board and the state
board for community and technical colleges shall administer the
programs. Through these programs the boards ((may)) shall award ((on
a competitive basis)) child care grants to state institutions of higher
education to ((encourage programs to address the need)) be used
exclusively for high quality, accessible, and affordable child care for
the children of students at higher education institutions. The child
care grant for each institution shall be equal to the amount
contributed by the ((university or college administration and)) student
government association, or its equivalent((, of each institution
receiving the award shall contribute financial support in an amount
equal to the child care grant received by the institution)). Grant
funds shall be expended only for the direct costs of providing child
care for the children of students.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.135.030 and 2005 c 490 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall administer the
program for four-year institutions of higher education. The state
board for community and technical colleges shall administer the program
for community and technical colleges. The higher education
coordinating board and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall have the following powers and duties in administering
each program:
(1) To adopt rules necessary to carry out the program;
(2) ((To establish one or more review committees to assist in the
evaluation of proposals for funding. The review committee shall
include but not be limited to individuals from the Washington
association for the education of young children and the child care
resource and referral network;
(3) To establish each biennium specific guidelines for submitting
grant proposals consistent with the overall goals of the program.
During the 1999-2001 biennium the guidelines shall be consistent with
the following desired outcomes of increasing access to child care for
students, addressing the demand for infant and toddler care, providing
affordable child care alternatives, creating more cooperative preschool
programs, creating models that can be replicated at other institutions,
creating a partnership between university or college administrations
and student government, or its equivalent and increasing efficiency and
innovation at campus child care centers;
(4) To establish guidelines for an allocation system based on
factors that include but are not limited to: The amount of money
available in the trust fund; characteristics of the institutions
including the size of the faculty and student body; and the number of
child care grants received;
(5))) To ((solicit grant proposals and)) provide information to the
institutions of higher education about the program; and
(((6))) (3) To establish reporting, evaluation, accountability,
monitoring, and dissemination requirements for the recipients of the
grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 28B.135.020 (Grants -- Eligibility -- Grant
period) and 1999 c 375 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---