BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.04.045 and 1996 c 32 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Attachment" means the affixation or installation of any wire,
cable, or other physical material capable of carrying electronic
impulses or light waves for the carrying of intelligence for
telecommunications or television, including((,)) but not limited to
cable, and any related device, apparatus, or auxiliary equipment within
a licensee's allocated space upon any pole owned or controlled in whole
or in part by one or more locally regulated utilities where the
installation has been made with the necessary consent.
(b) "Licensee" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
company, association, joint stock association, or cooperatively
organized association, which is authorized to construct attachments
upon, along, under, or across the public ways.
(c) "Locally regulated utility" means a public utility district not
subject to rate or service regulation by the utilities and
transportation commission.
(((c))) (d) "Nondiscriminatory" means that pole owners may not
arbitrarily differentiate among or between similar classes of
((persons)) licensees approved for attachments.
(2) ((All)) Disputes concerning the rates, terms, and conditions
made, demanded, or received by a locally regulated utility for
((attachments to)) allocated space on its poles for placement of
licensees' attachments may be brought before the American arbitration
association. All rates, terms, and conditions made, demanded, or
received by any locally regulated utility must be based on the
utility's cost for provision of the allocated space used by the
licensee. Rates must be just, fair, reasonable, nondiscriminatory, and
sufficient to cover the utility's actual capital and operating expenses
attributable to the portion of the pole used by the licensee. ((A
locally regulated utility shall levy attachment space rental rates that
are uniform for the same class of service within the locally regulated
utility service area.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed or is intended to
confer upon the utilities and transportation commission any authority
to exercise jurisdiction over locally regulated utilities.))

--- END ---