BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.73.065 and 2005 c 336 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, taxes,
fees, charges, and tolls may not be imposed by a district without
approval of a majority of the voters in the district voting on a
proposition at a general or special election. The proposition must
include a specific description of the transportation improvement or
improvements proposed by the district and the proposed taxes, fees,
charges, and the range of tolls imposed by the district to raise
revenue to fund the improvement or improvements.
(2) Voter approval under this section shall be accorded substantial
weight regarding the validity of a transportation improvement as
defined in RCW 36.73.015.
(3) A district may not increase any taxes, fees, charges, or range
of tolls imposed under this chapter once the taxes, fees, charges, or
tolls take effect, unless authorized by the district voters pursuant to
RCW 36.73.160.
(4)(a) A district that includes all the territory within the
boundaries of the jurisdiction, or jurisdictions, establishing the
district may impose by a majority vote of the governing board of the
district the following fees and charges:
(i) Up to twenty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in RCW
82.80.140; or
(ii) A fee or charge in accordance with RCW 36.73.120.
(b) The vehicle fee authorized in (a) of this subsection may only
be imposed for a passenger-only ferry transportation improvement if the
vehicle fee is first approved by a majority of the voters within the
jurisdiction of the district.
(c)(i) A district solely comprised of a city or cities shall not
impose the fees or charges identified in (a) of this subsection within
one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this act, unless
the county in which the city or cities reside, by resolution, declares
that it will not impose the fees or charges identified in (a) of this
subsection within the one hundred eighty-day period; or
(ii) A district solely comprised of a city or cities identified in
RCW 36.73.020(6)(b) shall not impose the fees or charges until after
May 22, 2008, unless the county in which the city or cities reside, by
resolution, declares that it will not impose the fees or charges
identified in (a) of this subsection through May 22, 2008.
(5) If the interlocal agreement in RCW 82.80.140(2)(a) cannot be
reached, a district that includes only the unincorporated territory of
a county may impose by a majority vote of the governing body of the
district up to twenty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in RCW
82.80.140.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.80.140 and 2005 c 336 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions of RCW 36.73.065, a transportation
benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and impose an annual
vehicle fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars per vehicle registered
in the district, for each vehicle subject to license tab fees under RCW
46.16.0621 and for each vehicle subject to gross weight fees under RCW
46.16.070 with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less.
(2)(a) A district that includes all the territory within the
boundaries of the jurisdiction, or jurisdictions, establishing the
district may impose by a majority vote of the governing board of the
district up to twenty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in
subsection (1) of this section. If the district is countywide, the
revenues of the fee shall be distributed to each city within the county
by interlocal agreement. The interlocal agreement is effective when
approved by the county and sixty percent of the cities representing
seventy-five percent of the population of the cities within the county
in which the countywide fee is collected.
(b) A district may not impose a fee under this subsection (2):
(i) For a passenger-only ferry transportation improvement unless
the vehicle fee is first approved by a majority of the voters within
the jurisdiction of the district; or
(ii) That, if combined with the fees previously imposed by another
district within its boundaries under RCW 36.73.065(4)(a)(i), exceeds
twenty dollars.
If a district imposes or increases a fee under this subsection (2)
that, if combined with the fees previously imposed by another district
within its boundaries, exceeds twenty dollars, the district shall
provide a credit for the previously imposed fees so that the combined
vehicle fee does not exceed twenty dollars.
(3) The department of licensing shall administer and collect the
fee. The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed one percent of the fees collected, for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The department
shall remit remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer.
The state treasurer shall distribute the proceeds to the district on a
monthly basis.
(((3))) (4) No fee under this section may be collected until six
months after approval ((by the district voters)) under RCW 36.73.065.
(((4))) (5) The vehicle fee under this section applies only when
renewing a vehicle registration, and is effective upon the registration
renewal date as provided by the department of licensing.
(((5))) (6) The following vehicles are exempt from the fee under
this section:
(a) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and
46.04.181;
(b) Off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020;
(c) Vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the
international registration plan; and
(d) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.73.050 and 2005 c 336 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authorities proposing to establish a district,
or to modify the boundaries of an existing district, or to dissolve an
existing district shall conduct a hearing at the time and place
specified in a notice published at least once, not less than ten days
before the hearing, in a newspaper of general circulation within the
proposed district. Subject to the provisions of RCW 36.73.170, the
legislative authorities shall make provision for a district to be
automatically dissolved when all indebtedness of the district has been
retired and anticipated responsibilities have been satisfied. This
notice shall be in addition to any other notice required by law to be
published. The notice shall, where applicable, specify the functions
or activities proposed to be provided or funded, or the additional
functions or activities proposed to be provided or funded, by the
district. Additional notice of the hearing may be given by mail, by
posting within the proposed district, or in any manner the legislative
authorities deem necessary to notify affected persons. All hearings
shall be public and the legislative authorities shall hear objections
from any person affected by the formation, modification of the
boundaries, or dissolution of the district.
(2)(a) Following the hearing held pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section, the legislative authorities may establish a district,
modify the boundaries or functions of an existing district, or dissolve
an existing district, if the legislative authorities find the action to
be in the public interest and adopt an ordinance providing for the
action.
(b) The ordinance establishing a district shall specify the
functions ((or activities)) and transportation improvements described
under RCW 36.73.015 to be exercised or funded and establish the
boundaries of the district. Subject to the provisions of RCW
36.73.160, functions or ((activities)) transportation improvements
proposed to be provided or funded by the district may not be expanded
beyond those specified in the notice of hearing, unless additional
notices are made, further hearings on the expansion are held, and
further determinations are made that it is in the public interest to so
expand the functions or ((activities)) transportation improvements
proposed to be provided or funded.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.73.120 and 2005 c 336 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions in RCW 36.73.065, a district may
impose a fee or charge on the construction or reconstruction of
((residential buildings,)) commercial buildings, industrial buildings,
or on any other commercial or industrial building or building space or
appurtenance, or on the development, subdivision, classification, or
reclassification of land for commercial purposes, only if done in
accordance with chapter 39.92 RCW.
(2) Any fee or charge imposed under this section shall be used
exclusively for transportation improvements constructed by a district.
The fees or charges imposed must be reasonably necessary as a result of
the impact of development, construction, or classification or
reclassification of land on identified transportation needs.
(3) If a county or city within the district area is levying a fee
or charge for a transportation improvement, the fee or charge shall be
credited against the amount of the fee or charge imposed by the
district.
(((4) Developments consisting of less than twenty residences are
exempt from the fee or charge under this section.))

--- END ---