BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.237 and 2005 c 314 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All vehicle license number plates issued after January 1, 1968,
or such earlier date as the director may prescribe with respect to
plates issued in any county, shall be treated with fully reflectorized
materials designed to increase the visibility and legibility of such
plates at night.
(2) In addition to all other fees prescribed by law, there shall be
paid and collected for each vehicle license number plate treated with
such materials, the sum of two dollars and for each set of two plates,
the sum of four dollars. However, one plate is available only to those
vehicles that by law require only one plate. Such fees shall be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Purple heart special license
plates authorized by RCW 46.16.305 are exempt from this fee.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.270 and 2005 c 314 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
The total replacement plate fee shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund.
Upon the loss, defacement, or destruction of one or both of the
vehicle license number plates issued for any vehicle where more than
one plate was originally issued or where one or both have become so
illegible or in such a condition as to be difficult to distinguish, or
upon the owner's option, the owner of the vehicle shall make
application for new vehicle license number plates upon a form furnished
by the director. The application shall be filed with the director or
the director's authorized agent, accompanied by the certificate of
license registration of the vehicle and a fee in the amount of ten
dollars per plate, whereupon the director, or the director's authorized
agent, shall issue new vehicle license number plates to the applicant.
It shall be accompanied by a fee of two dollars for a new motorcycle
license number plate. In the event the director has issued license
period tabs or a windshield emblem instead of vehicle license number
plates, and upon the loss, defacement, or destruction of the tabs or
windshield emblem, application shall be made on a form provided by the
director and in the same manner as above described, and shall be
accompanied by a fee of one dollar for each pair of tabs or for each
windshield emblem, whereupon the director shall issue to the applicant
a duplicate pair of tabs, year tabs, and when necessary month tabs or
a windshield emblem to replace those lost, defaced, or destroyed. For
vehicles owned, rented, or leased by the state of Washington or by any
county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision of
the state of Washington or United States government, or owned or leased
by the governing body of an Indian tribe as defined in RCW 46.16.020,
a fee shall be charged for replacement of a vehicle license number
plate only to the extent required by the provisions of RCW 46.16.020,
46.16.237, and 46.01.140. For vehicles owned, rented, or leased by
foreign countries or international bodies to which the United States
government is a signatory by treaty, the payment of any fee for the
replacement of a vehicle license number plate shall not be required.
The reissuance of purple heart special license plates authorized by RCW
46.16.305 are exempt from any fees required under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.305 and 1997 c 291 s 6 and 1997 c 241 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The department shall continue to issue the categories of special
plates issued by the department under the sections repealed under
section 12 (1) through (7), chapter 250, Laws of 1990. Special license
plates issued under those repealed sections before January 1, 1991, are
valid to the extent and under the conditions provided in those repealed
sections. The following conditions, limitations, or requirements apply
to certain special license plates issued after January 1, 1991:
(1) A horseless carriage plate and a plate or plates issued for
collectors' vehicles more than thirty years old, upon payment of the
initial fees required by law and the additional special license plate
fee established by the department, are valid for the life of the
vehicle for which application is approved by the department. When a
single plate is issued, it shall be displayed on the rear of the
vehicle.
(2) The department may issue special license plates denoting
amateur radio operator status only to persons having a valid official
radio operator license issued by the federal communications commission.
(3) The department shall issue one set of special license plates to
each resident of this state who has been awarded the Congressional
Medal of Honor for use on a passenger vehicle registered to that
person. The department shall issue the plate without the payment of
licensing fees and motor vehicle excise tax.
(4) The department may issue for use on only one motor vehicle
owned by the qualified applicant special license plates denoting that
the recipient of the plate is a survivor of the attack on Pearl Harbor
on December 7, 1941, to persons meeting all of the following criteria:
(a) Is a resident of this state;
(b) Was a member of the United States Armed Forces on December 7,
1941;
(c) Was on station on December 7, 1941, during the hours of 7:55
a.m. to 9:45 a.m. Hawaii time at Pearl Harbor, the island of Oahu, or
offshore at a distance not to exceed three miles;
(d) Received an honorable discharge from the United States Armed
Forces; and
(e) Is certified by a Washington state chapter of the Pearl Harbor
survivors association as satisfying the qualifications in (c) of this
subsection.
The department may issue such plates to the surviving spouse of any
deceased Pearl Harbor survivor who met the requirements of this
subsection. If the surviving spouse remarries, he or she shall return
the special plates to the department within fifteen days and apply for
regular plates. The surviving spouse must be a resident of this state.
The department shall issue these plates upon payment by the
applicant of all other license fees, but the department may not set or
charge an additional fee for these special license plates.
(5) The department may issue a purple heart special license plate
that may be used in lieu of regular or personalized license plates for
vehicles required to display one or two vehicle license plates,
excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW. The department
may issue the special license plate, denoting that the applicant of the
plate has been awarded the purple heart medal, if the applicant:
(a) Is a Washington resident;
(b) Was issued the purple heart medal by any branch of the United
States armed forces, including the merchant marines and the women's air
forces service pilots;
(c) Was wounded during one of this nation's wars or conflicts
identified in RCW 41.04.005; and
(d) Owns, co-owns, leases, or coleases the vehicle.
The department may issue such plates to the surviving spouse of any
deceased purple heart medal recipient who met the requirements of this
subsection. If the surviving spouse remarries, he or she shall return
the special plates to the department within fifteen days and apply for
regular plates. The surviving spouse must be a resident of this state.
The department shall issue these plates upon payment by the
applicant of all other license fees, but the department may not set or
charge plate fees or additional fees for these special license plates.
(6) The department shall replace, free of charge, special license
plates issued under subsections (3) and (4) of this section if they are
lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or destroyed. Such plates shall remain
with the persons upon transfer or other disposition of the vehicle for
which they were initially issued, and may be used on another vehicle
registered to the recipient in accordance with the provisions of RCW
46.16.316(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to vehicle registrations
that are due or become due on or after January 1, 2008.

--- END ---