BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On sections of roadways or sets of roadways that the traffic
safety commission has identified as part of its corridor traffic safety
program, the traffic safety commission may, if there is statistical
evidence that the sections of roadway or sets of roadways have a
greater than average number of crashes as compared to similarly
designed and located sections of roadways or sets of roadways,
designate by rule a safety corridor for the purposes of subsection (2)
of this section.
(2) A person found to have committed any infraction relating to
speed restrictions in a safety corridor designated by rule by the
traffic safety commission shall be assessed a monetary penalty equal to
twice the penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110. This penalty shall not
be waived, reduced, or suspended.
(3) The safety corridor trust account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. All receipts from additional monetary penalties
assessed under subsection (2) of this section must be deposited in the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
traffic safety commission's corridor traffic safety program. Only the
director of the traffic safety commission or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---