BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
FINANCIAL HEALTH AND MONITORING--BUDGET REVIEW AND APPROVAL
PROCESS. (1) The legislature finds that the existing school district
budget review system focuses on current school year budget
implementation and preparation of the ensuing school year budget and
does not provide a systematic look of longer-range budget issues,
including any indication of impending financial problems in school
districts. Parents, students, taxpayers, school employees, school
administrators, and state policymakers need a financial monitoring
system that considers long-term budgeting issues and commitments, and
provides early warning of school district financial health concerns.
Once financial concerns and issues are identified, districts should
receive early, practical assistance.
(2) The office of financial management shall develop and implement
a school district financial health and monitoring system, with input
and collaboration from the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(3) The office of financial management shall identify a limited set
of system measures that shall be established for a public financial
reporting system, including related data collection content and
processes. In identifying the measures, the office shall rely on
measures developed and recommended by the government finance officers
association pertaining to public schools and consider education finance
studies conducted by the joint legislative audit and review committee.
In addition, the office shall jointly develop a financial health
outlook rating system that places school districts in one of three
financial health categories based on their ratings on the financial
measures.
(4) The office of financial management shall present proposed
system measures and a financial health outlook rating system to the
governor and the legislature by November 1, 2007. The legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee shall make
recommendations to the legislature for modifications to the measures
and systems, if necessary. Unless the legislature takes action during
the 2008 legislative session to change the measures and the rating
system, the financial health and monitoring system shall be implemented
during the 2008-09 school year.
(5) The financial health outlook rating category of each school
district shall be published annually. In addition, updates shall be
published throughout the year if subsequent data to the school
district's financial reporting measures cause a change in the
district's financial health categorization.
(6) Regional financial specialists employed by educational service
districts shall provide progressive levels of technical assistance to
school districts in the lowest category on the financial health outlook
rating system.
(7) The office of financial management shall review the current
school district budget submittal and approval process and develop
recommendations for changes to the budget approval and financial
oversight system, with input and collaboration from the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. The recommendations shall
include a system of progressive state technical assistance and
oversight in school districts identified in the lowest category on the
financial health outlook rating system, which may be implemented only
with approval from the legislature through the omnibus appropriations
act or by statute.
(8) The office of financial management shall submit a report
summarizing the review and reporting recommendations in subsection (7)
of this section to the governor, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee, and the education and fiscal
committees of the legislature by November 15, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
EDUCATION DATA CENTER. (1) An education data center shall be
established in the office of financial management. The education data
center shall jointly, with the legislative education and accountability
program committee, conduct collaborative analyses of early learning, K-12, and higher education programs and education issues across the P-20
system, which includes the department of early learning, the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, the state board of education, the state board for
community and technical colleges, the workforce training and education
coordinating board, the higher education coordinating board, public and
private nonprofit four-year institutions of higher education, and the
employment security department. The education data center shall
conduct collaborative analyses under this section with the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee and provide data
electronically to the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, to the extent permitted by state and federal confidentiality
requirements. The education data center shall be considered an
authorized representative of the state educational agencies in this
section under applicable federal and state statutes for purposes of
receiving and processing student record data for research purposes.
(2) The education data center shall:
(a) Coordinate with other state education agencies to collect,
compile, and analyze education data, including data on student
demographics that is disaggregated by distinct ethnic categories within
racial subgroups, and complete P-20 research projects;
(b) Collaborate with the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee and the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature in identifying the data to be collected, compiled, and
analyzed to ensure that legislative interests are served;
(c) Track enrollment and outcomes through the public centralized
higher education enrollment system;
(d) Assist other state educational agencies' collaborative efforts
to develop a long-range enrollment plan for higher education including
estimates to meet demographic and workforce needs;
(e) Provide research that focuses on student transitions within and
among the early learning, K-12, and higher education sectors in the P-20 system; and
(f) Phase-in implementation of a comprehensive data system with
school-level financial, student, teacher, and community variables
consistent with recommendations of the joint legislative audit and
review committee.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop a
reporting format and instructions for school districts to collect and
submit data on student demographics that is disaggregated by distinct
ethnic categories within racial subgroups so that analyses may be
conducted on student achievement using the disaggregated data.
(4) The department of early learning, superintendent of public
instruction, professional educator standards board, state board of
education, state board for community and technical colleges, workforce
training and education coordinating board, higher education
coordinating board, public four-year institutions of higher education,
and employment security department shall work with the education data
center to develop data sharing and research agreements, consistent with
applicable security and confidentiality requirements, to facilitate the
work of the center. Private, nonprofit institutions of higher
education that provide programs of education beyond the high school
level leading at least to the baccalaureate degree and are accredited
by the Northwest association of schools and colleges or their peer
accreditation bodies may also develop data-sharing and research
agreements with the education data center, consistent with applicable
security and confidentiality requirements. The education data center
shall make data from collaborative analyses available to the education
agencies and institutions that contribute data to the education data
center to the extent allowed by federal and state security and
confidentiality requirements applicable to the data of each
contributing agency or institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
Each school district shall collect and electronically submit to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, in a format and
according to a schedule prescribed by the office, the following minimum
data elements no later than the beginning of the 2008-09 school year
and thereafter:
(1) For each class or course offered in each school:
(a) The certification number or other unique identifier associated
with the teacher's certificate for each teacher assigned to teach the
class or course, including reassignments that may occur during the
school year; and
(b) The statewide student identifier for each student enrolled in
or being provided services through the class or course; and
(2) For each high school-level mathematics class or course offered
in each secondary school, a course code based on the classification of
secondary school courses by the national center for education
statistics, which shall also be recorded on the transcript of each
secondary student enrolled in the class or course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop standards for school data systems that focus on validation and
verification of data entered into the systems to ensure accuracy and
compatibility of data. The standards shall address but are not limited
to the following topics:
(1) Date validation;
(2) Code validation, which includes gender, race or ethnicity, and
other code elements;
(3) Decimal and integer validation; and
(4) Required field validation as defined by state and federal
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall convene a work group composed of representatives of
school districts of varying sizes and geographic locations, educational
service districts, the Washington school information processing
cooperative, and at least one additional school information system
vendor. The work group shall develop an implementation plan for
consistent coding of secondary courses in subjects other than
mathematics that is based on the national classification system. The
work group shall present the plan to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by September 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

--- END ---