BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.210 and 1993 c 336 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The goal of the Basic Education Act for the schools of the state
of Washington set forth in this chapter shall be to provide students
with the opportunity to become responsible citizens, to contribute to
their own economic well-being and to that of their families and
communities, and to enjoy productive and satisfying lives. To these
ends, the goals of each school district, with the involvement of
parents and community members, shall be to provide opportunities for
all students to develop the knowledge and skills essential to:
(1) Read with comprehension, write with skill, and communicate
effectively and responsibly in a variety of ways and settings;
(2) Know and apply the core concepts and principles of mathematics;
social, physical, and life sciences; civics and history; geography;
arts; and health and fitness;
(3) Think analytically, logically, and creatively, and to integrate
experience and knowledge to form reasoned judgments and solve problems;
and
(4) Understand the importance of work and how performance, effort,
and decisions directly affect future career and educational
opportunities.)) The goal of the basic education act for the schools of
the state of Washington set forth in this chapter shall be to provide
students with the opportunity to become responsible and respectful
global citizens, to contribute to their economic well-being and that of
their families and communities, to explore and understand diverse
perspectives, to enjoy productive and satisfying lives, and to develop
a public school system that focuses on the educational achievement of
all students, which includes high expectations for and prepares
students to achieve personal and academic success. To these ends, the
goals of each school district, with the involvement of parents and
community members, shall be to provide opportunities for every student
to develop the knowledge and skills essential to:
(1) Read with comprehension, write effectively, and communicate
successfully in a variety of ways and settings and with a variety of
audiences;
(2) Know and apply the core concepts and principles of mathematics;
social, physical, and life sciences; world history, cultures, and
geography; civics and arts; and health and fitness;
(3) Think analytically, logically, and creatively, and to integrate
different experiences and knowledge to form reasoned judgments and
solve problems;
(4) Understand the importance of work and personal financial
literacy and how performance, effort, and decisions directly affect
future career and educational opportunities; and
(5) Understand and be fully prepared to exercise the
responsibilities of civic participation in a pluralistic society.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
ALL-DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS--FUNDING. (1) Beginning with the
2007-08 school year, funding for voluntary all-day kindergarten
programs shall be phased-in beginning with schools with the highest
poverty levels, defined as those schools with the highest percentages
of students qualifying for free and reduced-price lunch support in the
prior school year. Once a school receives funding for the all-day
kindergarten program, that school shall remain eligible for funding in
subsequent school years regardless of changes in the school's
percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price lunches as
long as other program requirements are fulfilled. Additionally,
schools receiving all-day kindergarten program support shall agree to
the following conditions:
(a) Provide at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;
(b) Provide a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of
experiences that assist students in:
(i) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading,
mathematics, and writing;
(ii) Developing a variety of communication skills;
(iii) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts,
health and physical education, and a world language other than English;
(iv) Acquiring large and small motor skills;
(v) Acquiring social and emotional skills including successful
participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a
group; and
(vi) Learning through hands-on experiences;
(c) Establish learning environments that are developmentally
appropriate and promote creativity;
(d) Demonstrate strong connections and communication with early
learning community providers; and
(e) Participate in kindergarten program readiness activities with
early learning providers and parents.
(2) School districts receiving funds for all-day kindergarten
programs under this section shall use a portion of the funds on a one-time basis to create a strategic plan for the program, including
developing the instructional program and curriculum, working with early
learning providers to identify students and communicate with parents,
and developing kindergarten program readiness activities and measures
with early learning providers and parents. Subject to available funds,
school districts not yet eligible for all-day kindergarten program
support under this section may access funds for strategic planning for
all-day kindergarten.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
ENGLISH AS A SECOND LANGUAGE PROJECTS. (1) The goals of the
English as a second language demonstration project are to develop
recommendations:
(a) Identifying foundational competencies for developing academic
English skills in English language learner students that all teachers
should acquire in initial teacher preparation programs;
(b) Identifying components of a professional development program
that builds classroom teacher competence for developing academic
English skills in English language learner students; and
(c) Identifying job-embedded practices that connect the English
language learner teacher and classroom teachers to coordinate
instruction to support the work of the student.
(2) The English as a second language demonstration project shall
use two field strategies in the development of recommendations.
(a) The first strategy is to conduct a field study of an ongoing
project in a number of schools and school districts in which Spanish is
the predominate language other than English.
(b) The second strategy is to conduct a project that provides
professional development and planning time resources to approximately
three large schools in which there are many first languages among the
students. The participants of this project shall partner with an
institution of higher education or a professional development provider
with expertise in support student acquisition of academic English. The
superintendent of public instruction shall select the participants in
the project under this subsection (2)(b).
(3)(a) The Washington state institute for public policy shall
conduct the field study work and collect additional information from
the project schools. In conducting its work, the institute shall
review current literature regarding best practices and consult with
state and national experts as appropriate.
(b) The institute for public policy shall report its findings to
the governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
and the education and fiscal committees of the legislature. An interim
report is due November 1, 2008. The final report is due December 1,
2009.
(4) This section expires September 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.215
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The Washington community learning center program is
established. The program shall be administered by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. The purposes of the program
include:
(a) Supporting the creation or expansion of community learning
centers that provide students with tutoring and educational enrichment
when school is not in session;
(b) Providing training and professional development for community
learning center program staff;
(c) Increasing public awareness of the availability and benefits of
after-school programs; and
(d) Supporting statewide after-school intermediary organizations in
their efforts to provide leadership, coordination, technical
assistance, advocacy, and programmatic support to after-school programs
throughout the state.
(2) To the extent that funding is available for this purpose, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction may provide
community learning center grants to any public or private organization
that meets the eligibility criteria of the federal twenty-first century
community learning centers program. Priority may be given to grant
requests submitted jointly by one or more schools or school districts
and one or more community-based organizations or other nonschool
partners. Priority shall be given to grant requests that:
(a) Focus on improving reading and mathematics proficiency for
students who attend schools that have been identified as being in need
of improvement under section 1116 of Title I of the federal no child
left behind act of 2001; and
(b) Include a public/private partnership agreement or proposal for
how to provide free transportation for those students in need that are
involved in the program.
(3) Community learning center grant funds may be used to carry out
a broad array of out-of-school activities that support and enhance
academic achievement. The activities may include but need not be
limited to:
(a) Remedial and academic enrichment;
(b) Mathematics, reading, and science education;
(c) Arts and music education;
(d) Entrepreneurial education;
(e) Community service;
(f) Tutoring and mentoring programs;
(g) Programs enhancing the language skills and academic achievement
of limited English proficient students;
(h) Recreational and athletic activities;
(i) Telecommunications and technology education;
(j) Programs that promote parental involvement and family literacy;
(k) Drug and violence prevention, counseling, and character
education programs; and
(l) Programs that assist students who have been truant, suspended,
or expelled, to improve their academic achievement.
(4) Each community learning center grant may be made for a maximum
of five years. Each grant recipient shall report annually to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction on what
transportation services are being used to assist students in accessing
the program and how those services are being funded. Based on this
information, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall compile a list of transportation service options being used and
make that list available to all after-school program providers that
were eligible for the community learning center program grants.
(5) To the extent that funding is available for this purpose, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction may provide grants
or other support for the training and professional development of
community learning center staff, the activities of intermediary after-school organizations, and efforts to increase public awareness of the
availability and benefits of after-school programs.
(6) Schools or school districts that receive a community learning
center grant under this section may seek approval from the office of
the superintendent of public instruction for flexibility to use a
portion of their state transportation funds for the costs of
transporting students to and from the community learning center
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 4 of this act takes effect August 1,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

--- END ---