BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.20.020 and 2007 c 156 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every ((such)) action under RCW 4.20.010 shall be for the
benefit of the ((wife, husband)) spouse, state registered domestic
partner, ((child)) or children, including stepchildren, of the person
whose death shall have been so caused. If there ((be)) is no ((wife,
husband)) spouse, state registered domestic partner, or ((such)) child
((or children, such)), the action may be maintained for the benefit of:
(a) The parents((,)) of a deceased adult child if the parents are
financially dependent upon the adult child for support or if the
parents have had significant involvement in the adult child's life; or
(b) an individual who is the sole beneficiary of the decedent's life
insurance and has had significant involvement in the decedent's life.
If there is no spouse, state registered domestic partner, child,
parent, or such life insurance beneficiary, the action may be
maintained for the benefit of sisters((,)) or brothers((,)) who ((may
be)) are financially dependent upon the deceased person for support((,
and who are resident within the United States at the time of his
death)).
In every such action the jury may ((give such)) award economic and
noneconomic damages as((,)) under all circumstances of the case((,))
may to them seem just.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Financially dependent for support" means substantial
dependence based on the receipt of services that have an economic or
monetary value, or substantial dependence based on actual monetary
payments or contributions; and
(b) "Significant involvement" means demonstrated support of an
emotional, psychological, or financial nature within the relationship,
at or reasonably near the time of death, or at or reasonably near the
time of the incident causing death.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.20.046 and 1993 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) All causes of action by a person or persons against another
person or persons shall survive to the personal representatives of the
former and against the personal representatives of the latter, whether
such actions arise on contract or otherwise, and whether or not such
actions would have survived at the common law or prior to the date of
enactment of this section((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)).
(2) In addition to recovering economic losses, the personal
representative ((shall only be)) is entitled to recover on behalf of
those beneficiaries identified under RCW 4.20.020 any noneconomic
damages for pain and suffering, anxiety, emotional distress, or
humiliation, personal to and suffered by ((a)) the deceased ((on behalf
of those beneficiaries enumerated in RCW 4.20.020, and such)) in such
amounts as determined by a jury to be just under all the circumstances
of the case. Damages under this section are recoverable regardless of
whether or not the death was occasioned by the injury that is the basis
for the action.
(3) The liability of property of a husband and wife held by them as
community property and subject to execution in satisfaction of a claim
enforceable against such property so held shall not be affected by the
death of either or both spouses; and a cause of action shall remain an
asset as though both claiming spouses continued to live despite the
death of either or both claiming spouses.
(((2))) (4) Where death or an injury to person or property,
resulting from a wrongful act, neglect or default, occurs
simultaneously with or after the death of a person who would have been
liable therefor if his death had not occurred simultaneously with such
death or injury or had not intervened between the wrongful act, neglect
or default and the resulting death or injury, an action to recover
damages for such death or injury may be maintained against the personal
representative of such person.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.20.060 and 2007 c 156 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No action for a personal injury to any person occasioning death
shall abate, nor shall such right of action ((determine)) terminate, by
reason of ((such)) the death((,)) if ((such)) the person has a
surviving ((spouse, state registered domestic partner, or child living,
including stepchildren, or leaving no surviving spouse, state
registered domestic partner, or such children, if there is dependent
upon the deceased for support and resident within the United States at
the time of decedent's death, parents, sisters, or brothers; but such
action may be prosecuted, or commenced and prosecuted, by the executor
or administrator)) beneficiary in whose favor the action may be brought
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) An action under this section shall be brought by the personal
representative of the deceased((,)) in favor of ((such)) the surviving
spouse or state registered domestic partner, ((or in favor of the
surviving spouse or state registered domestic partner)) and ((such))
children((, or if)). If there is no surviving spouse ((or)), state
registered domestic partner, ((in favor of such child)) or children,
((or if no surviving spouse, state registered domestic partner, or such
child or children, then)) the action shall be brought in favor of the
decedent's: (a) Parents((,)) if the parents are financially dependent
upon the decedent for support or if the parents have had significant
involvement in the decedent's life; or (b) sole beneficiary under a
life insurance policy, if the beneficiary is an individual who had a
significant involvement in the decedent's life. If there is no
surviving spouse, state registered domestic partner, child, parent, or
such life insurance beneficiary, the action shall be brought in favor
of the decedent's sisters((,)) or brothers who ((may be)) are
financially dependent upon ((such person)) the decedent for support((,
and resident in the United States at the time of decedent's death)).
(3) In addition to recovering economic losses, the persons
identified in subsection (2) of this section are entitled to recover
any noneconomic damages personal to and suffered by the decedent
including, but not limited to, damages for the decedent's pain and
suffering, anxiety, emotional distress, or humiliation, in such amounts
as determined by a jury to be just under all the circumstances of the
case.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Financially dependent for support" means substantial
dependence based on the receipt of services that have an economic or
monetary value, or substantial dependence based on actual monetary
payments or contributions; and
(b) "Significant involvement" means demonstrated support of an
emotional, psychological, or financial nature within the relationship,
at or reasonably near the time of death, or at or reasonably near the
time of the incident causing death.

Sec. 4 RCW 4.24.010 and 1998 c 237 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((mother or father, or both,)) parent who has regularly
contributed to the support of his or her minor child, ((and the mother
or father, or both, of a child on whom either, or both, are)) or a
parent who is financially dependent on a child for support or who has
had significant involvement in a child's life, may maintain or join
((as a party)) an action as plaintiff for the injury or death of the
child.
(2) Each parent, separately from the other parent, is entitled to
recover for his or her own loss regardless of marital status, even
though this section creates only one cause of action((, but if the
parents of the child are not married, are separated, or not married to
each other damages may be awarded to each plaintiff separately, as the
trier of fact finds just and equitable)).
(3) If one parent brings an action under this section and the other
parent is not named as a plaintiff, notice of the institution of the
suit, together with a copy of the complaint, shall be served upon the
other parent: PROVIDED, That notice shall be required only if
parentage has been duly established.
Such notice shall be in compliance with the statutory requirements
for a summons. Such notice shall state that the other parent must join
as a party to the suit within twenty days or the right to recover
damages under this section shall be barred. Failure of the other
parent to timely appear shall bar such parent's action to recover any
part of an award made to the party instituting the suit.
(4) In ((such)) an action under this section, in addition to
damages for medical, hospital, medication expenses, and loss of
services and support, damages may be recovered for the loss of love and
companionship of the child and for injury to or destruction of the
parent-child relationship in such amount as, under all the
circumstances of the case, may be just.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Financially dependent for support" means substantial
dependence based on the receipt of services that have an economic or
monetary value, or substantial dependence based on actual monetary
payments or contributions; and
(b) "Significant involvement" means demonstrated support of an
emotional, psychological, or financial nature within the relationship,
at or reasonably near the time of death, or at or reasonably near the
time of the incident causing death.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act applies to all causes of action
filed on or after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) On December 1, 2009, and every December
1st thereafter, the risk management division within the office of
financial management shall report to the house appropriations
committee, the house state government and tribal affairs committee, the
senate ways and means committee, and the senate government operations
and elections committee, or successor committees, on the incidents
covered by this act that involve state agencies.
(2) On December 1, 2009, and every December 1st thereafter, each
local government risk pool or local government risk management
division, or the equivalent in local governments, shall report to the
legislative body of the local government on the incidents covered by
this act that involve the local government.
(3) This section expires December 2, 2014.

--- END ---