BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that approximately
eight thousand five hundred offenders are returned to the community
from Washington prisons each year. Research from the Washington state
institute for public policy indicates that approximately fifty percent
of these offenders will commit another crime and return to prison or
jail within three years.
Washington's incarceration rate is expected to increase twenty-three percent by the year 2019 and current long-term forecasts predict
that Washington will need to build two new prisons by 2020 and possibly
a third prison by 2030.
The Washington institute for public policy research finds that if
Washington successfully implements a moderate to aggressive portfolio
of evidence-based options, a significant level of future prison
construction can be avoided, taxpayers can save about two billion
dollars, and crime rates can be reduced.
It is the intent of the legislature to support evidence-based
programing for offenders and focus on facilitating the successful
reentry of offenders into the community. The goals of the offender
reentry programs are to increase public safety, maximize rehabilitation
of offenders, and lower recidivism. It is further the intent of the
legislature that the individual reentry plan, in addition to
facilitating offender reentry, will serve as a tool in managing
offenders while they are incarcerated.
The legislature also recognizes that some offenders will choose not
to take advantage of programming offered and will continue to commit
crimes. The legislature intends to increase public safety by holding
these offenders accountable for their actions. In order to do so, it
is necessary to ensure the offenders are more closely supervised when
they are released into the community under the supervision of the
department. The legislature intends to increase the number of
community corrections officers, and reduce the caseloads of existing
officers, to enable the community corrections officers to be better
able to supervise the offenders in the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(2) "Community justice center" means a nonresidential facility
staffed primarily by the department in which recently released inmates
may access services necessary to improve their successful reentry into
the community and where former inmates may receive information
regarding services available within the community from the community
transition coordinator. The services may include, but are not limited
to, those listed in the individual reentry plan, mental health,
chemical dependency, anger management, parenting education, financial
literacy, housing assistance, and employment assistance.
(3) "Community transition coordinator" means a person designated by
the department to provide information to former inmates regarding
services available within the community to assist the former inmate in
successfully transitioning into the community.
(4) "Individual reentry plan" means the plan to prepare the inmate
for release into the community. It is developed collaboratively
between the department and the inmate. The plan is based on an
assessment of the inmate using a standardized and comprehensive tool.
The individual reentry plan describes actions that must occur to
prepare individual offenders for release from the custody of the
department and specifies the supervision and services they will
experience in the community. An individual reentry plan is updated
throughout the period of an offender's incarceration and supervision is
to be relevant to the offender's current needs and risks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall develop an
individual reentry plan as defined in subsection (6) of this section
for every offender who is committed to a correctional facility operated
by the department. The individual reentry plan may be one document, or
may be a series of individual plans that combine to meet the
requirements of this section.
(2) In developing individual reentry plans, the department shall
assess all offenders using standardized and comprehensive tools to
identify the criminogenic risks, programmatic needs, and educational
and vocational skill levels for each offender. The assessment tool
should take into account demographic biases, such as culture, age, and
gender, as well as the needs of the offender, including any learning
disabilities, substance abuse or mental health issues, and social or
behavior deficits.
(3)(a) The initial assessment shall be conducted as early as
sentencing, but no later than forty-five days after entry into the
correctional system and shall be periodically reviewed and updated as
appropriate.
(b) The offender's individual reentry plan shall be developed as
soon as possible after the initial assessment is conducted, but no
later than sixty days after the completion of the assessment.
(4) The individual reentry plan shall, at a minimum, include:
(a) A plan to maintain contact with the inmate's children and
family, if appropriate. The plan should determine whether parenting
classes, or other services, are appropriate to facilitate successful
reunification with the offender's children and family;
(b) An individualized portfolio for each offender that includes the
offender's education achievements, certifications, employment, work
experience, skills, and any training received prior to and during
incarceration; and
(c) A plan for the offender during the period of incarceration
through reentry into the community that addresses the needs of the
offender including education, employment, substance abuse treatment,
mental health treatment, family reunification, and other areas which
are needed to facilitate a successful reintegration into the community.
(5)(a) The individual reentry plan shall be updated as appropriate
during the period of incarceration to maintain relevancy to the
inmate's current risks and needs.
(b) The individual reentry plan shall be updated six months prior
to the inmate's release to reassess the inmate's specific needs upon
reentry. The individual reentry plan updated prior to release shall
address the following:
(i) The individual reentry plan should consider public safety
concerns and be consistent with the offender assigned risk management
level assigned by the department;
(ii) The plan for the offender to access housing immediately upon
release, including details of contact information for an individual to
assist with housing;
(iii) The plan for the offender to become connected with a
community justice center in the area in which the offender will be
residing once released from the correctional system.
(6) The individual reentry plan is a tool for use while the inmate
is incarcerated. The terms of the plan are not intended to be
conditions of release that are to be monitored by the community
corrections officers once the inmate is released and is in the
community. The plan for the inmate upon release and reentry into the
community is intended to assist the inmate in a successful transition
by creating a detailed plan to guide the inmate and connect the inmate
to resources available within the community.
(7) Nothing in this act creates a vested right in programming,
education, or other services.
(8) An individual reentry plan and offender assessment may not be
used as evidence of, and may not provide the basis for, liability
against the department, the state of Washington, or its employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department of corrections shall
continue to establish community justice centers within the state for
the purpose of providing assistance to inmates who are reentering the
community.
(a) A minimum of six community justice centers shall be operational
by December 1, 2009. The six community justice centers include those
in operation at the time of the effective date of this act. The
community justice centers shall be located in the six counties where
the largest offender population resides who were released from
department of corrections custody. At least two centers shall be
located in eastern Washington.
(b) By December 1, 2011, the department of corrections shall
establish a minimum of three additional community justice centers
within the state. Community justice centers must comply with all
applicable zoning laws and regulations.
(c) Before siting or opening the community justice centers, the
department of corrections shall notify the city, if applicable, and the
county within which the community justice center is proposed. Such
notice shall occur at least sixty days prior to selecting a specific
location to provide the services listed in this section. The
department of corrections shall give due consideration to all comments
received in response to the notice of site selection.
(d) Nothing in this section exempts the department of corrections
from complying with all applicable zoning requirements for these
facilities.
(2) In addition to any other programs or services offered, the
community justice centers shall designate a community transition
coordinator who shall act to facilitate connections between the former
inmate and the community. The community transition coordinator shall
provide information to former inmates regarding services available to
them in the community regardless of the length of time since the
offender's release from the correctional facility. The community
transition coordinator shall, at a minimum, be responsible for the
following:
(a) Gathering information regarding services currently existing
within the community that are available to offenders including, but not
limited to, programs offered through the department of social and
health services, the department of health, the department of licensing,
housing authorities, local, community, and technical colleges, and
nonprofit entities. The information shall relate to services including
but not limited to housing, employment, education, vocational training,
parent education, financial literacy treatment for substance abuse,
mental health, anger management, and any other service or program that
will assist the former inmate to successfully transition into the
community;
(b) Coordinate access to the existing services with the community
providers and provide offenders with information regarding how to
access the various type of services and resources that are identified
in (a) of this subsection;
(c) Refer offenders to division of alcohol and substance abuse
treatment certified chemical dependency providers and mental health
division approved mental health providers to receive an evaluation and
services, if appropriate;
(d) Information or referrals provided to an offender from a
community transition coordinator do not create an entitlement to
services. Services will be provided based on eligibility and
availability.
(3) The department of corrections may enter into contracts to
provide educational programming to offenders.

Sec. 5 RCW 72.09.460 and 2004 c 167 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature intends that all inmates be required to
participate in department-approved education programs, work programs,
or both, unless exempted under subsection (4) or (6) of this section.
Eligible inmates who refuse to participate in available education or
work programs available at no charge to the inmates shall lose
privileges according to the system established under RCW 72.09.130.
Eligible inmates who are required to contribute financially to an
education or work program and refuse to contribute shall be placed in
another work program. Refusal to contribute shall not result in a loss
of privileges. The legislature recognizes more inmates may agree to
participate in education and work programs than are available. The
department must make every effort to achieve maximum public benefit by
placing inmates in available and appropriate education and work
programs.
(2) The department shall provide access to a program of education
to all offenders who are under the age of eighteen and who have not met
high school graduation or general equivalency diploma requirements in
accordance with chapter 28A.193 RCW. The program of education
established by the department and education provider under RCW
28A.193.020 for offenders under the age of eighteen must provide each
offender a choice of curriculum that will assist the inmate in
achieving a high school diploma or general equivalency diploma. The
program of education may include but not be limited to basic education,
prevocational training, work ethic skills, conflict resolution
counseling, substance abuse intervention, and anger management
counseling. The curriculum may balance these and other rehabilitation,
work, and training components.
(3) The department shall, to the extent possible and considering
all available funds, prioritize its resources to meet the following
goals for inmates in the order listed:
(a) Achievement of basic academic skills through obtaining a high
school diploma or its equivalent and achievement of vocational skills
necessary for purposes of work programs and for an inmate to qualify
for work upon release;
(b) Additional work and education programs based on ((assessments
and placements under subsection (5) of this section)) the offender's
individual reentry plan under section 2 of this act, including
parenting education or other programs designed to facilitate
reunification with the inmate's children and family; and
(c) Other work and education programs as appropriate.
(4) The department shall establish, by rule, objective medical
standards to determine when an inmate is physically or mentally unable
to participate in available education or work programs. When the
department determines an inmate is permanently unable to participate in
any available education or work program due to a medical condition, the
inmate is exempt from the requirement under subsection (1) of this
section. When the department determines an inmate is temporarily
unable to participate in an education or work program due to a medical
condition, the inmate is exempt from the requirement of subsection (1)
of this section for the period of time he or she is temporarily
disabled. The department shall periodically review the medical
condition of all ((temporarily disabled)) inmates with temporary
disabilities to ensure the earliest possible entry or reentry by
inmates into available programming.
(5) ((The department shall establish, by rule, standards for
participation in department-approved education and work programs. The
standards shall address the following areas:
(a) Assessment. The department shall assess all inmates for their
basic academic skill levels using a professionally accepted method of
scoring reading, math, and language skills as grade level equivalents.
The department shall determine an inmate's education history, work
history, and vocational or work skills. The initial assessment shall
be conducted, whenever possible, within the first thirty days of an
inmate's entry into the correctional system, except that initial
assessments are not required for inmates who are sentenced to life
without the possibility of release, assigned to an intensive management
unit within the first thirty days after entry into the correctional
system, are returning to the correctional system within one year of a
prior release, or whose physical or mental condition renders them
unable to complete the assessment process. The department shall track
and record changes in the basic academic skill levels of all inmates
reflected in any testing or assessment performed as part of their
education programming;
(b) Placement. The department shall follow the policies set forth
in subsection (1) of this section in establishing criteria for placing
inmates in education and work programs. The department shall, to the
extent possible, place all inmates whose composite grade level score
for basic academic skills is below the eighth grade level in a combined
education and work program. The placement criteria shall include at
least the following factors:
(i) An inmate's release date and custody level.)) In addition to
the policies set forth in this section, the department shall consider
the following factors in establishing criteria for placing inmates in
education and work programs.
(a) An inmate shall not be precluded from participating in an
education or work program solely on the basis of his or her release
date((, except that inmates with a release date of more than one
hundred twenty months in the future shall not comprise more than ten
percent of inmates participating in a new class I correctional industry
not in existence on June 10, 2004));
(((ii))) (b) An inmate's education history and basic academic
skills;
(((iii))) (c) An inmate's work history and vocational or work
skills;
(((iv))) (d) An inmate's physical ability to participate in the
program;
(e) An inmate's economic circumstances, including but not limited
to an inmate's family support obligations; and
(((v))) (f) Where applicable, an inmate's prior performance in
department-approved education or work programs((;)).
(((c) Performance and goals.)) (i) The department shall establish,
and periodically review, inmate behavior standards and program goals
for all education and work programs. Inmates shall be notified of
applicable behavior standards and program goals prior to placement in
an education or work program and shall be removed from the education or
work program if they consistently fail to meet the standards or
goals((;)).
(((d) Financial responsibility. (i))) (ii) Except as provided in
(f)(iii) of this subsection, so long as the educational or vocational
program meets the offender's needs as identified in the offender's
individual reentry plan, the department shall pay for educational
programs, vocational training, and associate degree programs, including
but not limited to books, materials, supplies, and postage costs
related to correspondence courses, to the extent possible.
(iii) The department shall establish ((a formula by which inmates,
based on their ability to pay, shall)) policies requiring an offender
to pay all or a portion of the costs ((or)) and tuition ((of certain
programs. Inmates shall, based on the formula, pay a portion of the
costs or tuition of)) for participation in:
(A) ((Second and subsequent vocational programs associated with an
inmate's work programs; and
(B) An associate of arts or)) A baccalaureate degree program ((when
placement in a degree program is the result of a placement made under
this subsection));
(((ii) Inmates shall pay all costs and tuition for participation
in:
(A))) (B) Any postsecondary academic degree program ((which is
entered independently of a placement decision made under this
subsection)) if the program is not included in the offender's
individual reentry plan; and
(((B) Second and subsequent vocational programs not associated with
an inmate's work program.
Enrollment in any program specified in (d)(ii) of this subsection
shall only be allowed by correspondence or if there is an opening in an
education or work program at the institution where an inmate is
incarcerated and no other inmate who is placed in a program under this
subsection will be displaced; and
(e))) (C) Any educational program or vocational training if the
offender has previously abandoned course work related to education or
vocational training without a satisfactory explanation, and which is
not required under the offender's individual reentry plan.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, an inmate
sentenced to life without the possibility of release, or offenders who
are found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a
deportation detainer or order or becomes subject to a deportation
order:
(((i))) (a) Shall not be required to participate in education
programming; ((and
(ii))) (b) May receive not more than one postsecondary academic
degree in a program offered by the department or its contracted
providers((.
If an inmate sentenced to life without the possibility of release
requires)), unless the offender pays all costs and tuition associated
with the program; and
(c) May participate in prevocational or vocational training for a
work program((, he or she may participate in the training subject to
this section)).
(((6) The department shall coordinate education and work programs
among its institutions, to the greatest extent possible, to facilitate
continuity of programming among inmates transferred between
institutions.))
(7) Before transferring an inmate enrolled in a program, the
department shall consider the effect the transfer will have on the
inmate's ability to continue or complete a program. This subsection
shall not be used to delay or prohibit a transfer necessary for
legitimate safety or security concerns.
(((7) Before construction of a new correctional institution or
expansion of an existing correctional institution, the department shall
adopt a plan demonstrating how cable, closed-circuit, and satellite
television will be used for education and training purposes in the
institution. The plan shall specify how the use of television in the
education and training programs will improve inmates' preparedness for
available work programs and job opportunities for which inmates may
qualify upon release.
(8) The department shall adopt a plan to reduce the per-pupil cost
of instruction by, among other methods, increasing the use of volunteer
instructors and implementing technological efficiencies. The plan
shall be adopted by December 1996 and shall be transmitted to the
legislature upon adoption. The department shall, in adoption of the
plan, consider distance learning, satellite instruction, video tape
usage, computer-aided instruction, and flexible scheduling of offender
instruction.
(9) Following completion of the review required by section 27(3),
chapter 19, Laws of 1995 1st sp. sess. the department shall take all
necessary steps to assure the vocation and education programs are
relevant to work programs and skills necessary to enhance the
employability of inmates upon release.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department of corrections and the
state board for community and technical colleges shall investigate and
review methods to optimize educational and vocational programming
opportunities to meet the needs of each offender as identified in his
or her individual reentry plan both while an offender is incarcerated
and postrelease. Faculty in both incarceration and postincarceration
educational programs shall be included in the review process and should
be allowed job release time to participate in the review.
(2) In conducting its review, the department and state board shall
consider and make recommendations regarding:
(a) Technological advances which could serve to expand educational
programs and vocational training including, but not limited to,
distance learning, satellite instruction, videotape usage, computer
aided instruction, and flexible scheduling;
(b) Methods to ensure educational programs and vocational training
are relevant to work programs and skills necessary to enhance the
employability of offenders upon release;
(c) Long-term methods for maintaining channels of communication
between the department, state board administration, educators, and
students; and
(d) Methods for ensuring that security measures remain intact
regarding an offender's use of the internet.
(3) The department and state board shall report to the governor and
the legislature on the investigation and recommendations required in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section no later than November 15,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 On or before October 1, 2007, the department
of corrections and the department of licensing shall enter into an
agreement establishing expedited procedures to assist offenders in
obtaining a driver's license or identification card upon their release
from a department of corrections' institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A joint legislative task force on
reentry barriers for previously incarcerated individuals is established
for the purpose of providing oversight into the implementation of this
act and develop recommendations to assist the reentry of inmates into
the community. Membership of the task force shall be as provided in
this subsection.
(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate, with at least one member
being a member of the senate human services and corrections committee;
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives, with at least one member being a member of the house
public safety and emergency preparedness committee;
(c) The governor shall appoint the following members:
(i) The attorney general or the attorney general's designee;
(ii) The secretary of the department of corrections or the
secretary's designee;
(iii) The commissioner of the employment security department or the
commissioner's designee;
(iv) The director of the department of licensing or the director's
designee;
(d) In addition, the joint legislative task force, where feasible,
may consult with individuals representing the following:
(i) State agencies that issue occupational licenses;
(ii) Counties;
(iii) Cities;
(iv) Crime victims;
(v) Faculty members who educate incarcerated offenders;
(vi) Faculty members who educate released offenders;
(vii) Community corrections officers;
(viii) Labor organizations representing correctional officers who
work in adult correctional facilities;
(ix) Local law enforcement;
(x) County law enforcement;
(xi) Ex-offenders;
(xii) Faith-based organizations that provide outreach or services
to offenders;
(xiii) Washington businesses;
(xiv) Organizations providing legal representation to offenders;
and
(xv) Nonprofit organizations providing workforce training to
released offenders.
(2) The joint legislative task force shall be cochaired by a
legislative member from the senate and a legislative member from the
house of representatives, as chosen by the task force.
(3) The joint legislative task force shall review and make
recommendations to the legislature regarding:
(a) The use of the individual reentry plans by the department of
corrections;
(b) Access to educational opportunities for inmates in the custody
of the department of corrections and the effectiveness of the
department in directing inmates to appropriate educational programs;
(c) The use of educational programs in the individual reentry
plans;
(d) The creation and utilization of community justice centers as
resource centers for persons released from the custody of the
department of corrections;
(e) Changes to occupational licensing laws and policies to
encourage employment of individuals with criminal histories while
ensuring the safety of the public;
(f) Federal and state statutory barriers that prevent individuals
with criminal histories from obtaining employment in public or
government contracting jobs;
(g) Other barriers that may prevent individuals with criminal
histories from obtaining viable employment;
(h) Other barriers to successful reintegration into the community;
and
(i) Other issues related to the implementation of this act deemed
appropriate by the joint legislative task force.
(4) The joint legislative task force may, where feasible, consult
with individuals from the public and private sector in carrying out its
duties under this section.
(5) The joint legislative task force shall develop criteria to
recommend to the department of corrections for eligibility of inmates
into the program under section 10 of this act.
(6) The joint legislative task force shall develop criteria to
recommend to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for eligibility of inmates into the program under section
11 of this act.
(7)(a) The joint legislative task force shall use legislative
facilities, and staff support shall be provided by senate committee
services, the house of representatives office of program research, and
the Washington state institute for public policy. The department of
corrections, department of licensing, and employment security
department shall cooperate with the joint legislative task force, and
shall provide information as the task force reasonably requests.
(b) Nonlegislative members of the joint legislative task force
shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(c) Legislative members of the joint legislative task force shall
be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(d) The expenses of the joint legislative task force shall be paid
jointly by the senate and the house of representatives.
(8) The joint legislative task force shall present a report of its
findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature, including any proposed legislation, by
November 15, 2008.
(9) This section expires December 15, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 72.04A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall develop a plan to reduce the supervision
caseload of community corrections officers by December 1, 2012. The
department shall utilize the workload study conducted by the department
to develop the plan. Prior to 2012, the department shall hire
additional community corrections officers to the extent funding is
provided in the operating budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of corrections shall enter into agreements to
provide short-term housing assistance to offenders who are reentering
the community and are in need of temporary housing.
(2) The department may develop further criteria in rule to
determine who will qualify for housing assistance and shall utilize the
recommendations provided by the joint legislative task force under
section 8 of this act in the development of the criteria.
(3) Housing assistance shall not be provided in excess of one
hundred twenty days for each offender.
(4) The state, the department, and its employees are not liable for
civil damages arising from the conduct of an offender due to the
placement of an offender in short-term housing or the provision of
housing assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department of community, trade, and economic development
may enter into agreements to provide transitional housing assistance to
offenders who are reentering the community and are in need of
transitional housing, including offenders who have utilized the
temporary housing through the department of corrections under section
10 of this act.
(b) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall give preference for the housing contracts to those programs that
provide an educational component in their housing, particularly
education relating to developing independent living skills.
(2) The department may develop criteria in rule to determine who
will qualify for housing assistance and shall utilize the
recommendations provided by the joint legislative task force under
section 8 of this act in the development of the criteria.
(3) The state, the department, and its employees are not liable for
civil damages arising from the conduct of an offender due to the
placement of an offender in short-term housing or the provision of
housing assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The sum of two million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, and the sum of two million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, to the
department of social and health services for the purposes of providing
chemical dependency and mental health services to offenders who are
reentering the community after having been incarcerated in a department
of corrections facility and who are not otherwise eligible for chemical
dependency or mental health services under existing eligibility
criteria related to those services. Offenders may access the services
after having been referred by a community transition coordinator under
section 3 of this act to a division of alcohol and substance abuse
certified chemical dependency treatment provider or a regional support
network. The funds provided in this appropriation shall supplement,
and not supplant, existing local, state, or federal funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The sum of one million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, and the sum of one million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, to the
department of corrections for the purposes of hiring additional
community corrections officers to supervise offenders who are
reentering the community after having been incarcerated in a department
of corrections facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The sum of three million eight hundred
fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2008, and the sum of three million eight hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, to the
department of corrections for the purposes of section 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The sum of three million eight hundred
fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2008, and the sum of three million eight hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, to the
department of community, trade, and economic development for the
purposes of section 11 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 3 and 8 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 72 RCW.

--- END ---