BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the purpose of this section to address growing concerns
about the academic staffing crisis in higher education. Staffing
issues, including the economic exploitation of adjunct faculty along
with the shrinking ranks of full-time tenured faculty, limit the
ability of the state system of higher education to provide high quality
education, improve retention rates, conduct research, and provide
support for economic development.
(2)(a) It is the goal of this section to have at least seventy-five
percent of the full-time equivalent faculty positions be held by full-time tenured and tenure-track faculty in each department that has at
least eight full-time equivalent faculty appointments, as defined in
RCW 28B.50.851, on each campus of each institution of higher education.
(b) It is further the goal of this section to have salaries in
institutions of higher education that will attract and retain the best
faculty possible to educate the citizens of Washington state. To
achieve this goal, salaries for full-time faculty should be increased
above a regular cost-of-living increase until by 2013 salaries are in
the sixtieth percentile for faculty of comparable rank in global
challenge states. In addition, to achieve this goal, each institution
of higher education should determine a salary standard for adjunct
faculty members employed in each academic, technical, basic studies, or
other department that, subject to collective bargaining with the
exclusive representatives of faculty, constitutes a pro rata salary
compared to the salaries of full-time tenured faculty members of
comparable qualifications doing comparable work.
(3) In 2008, each institution of higher education shall determine
the number of full-time equivalent faculty appointments held by part-time, nontenured, tenure-track, and tenured faculty in each academic
department.
(4)(a) Each institution of higher education shall create a plan to
meet the goal in subsection (2)(a) of this section, subject to
collective bargaining with the exclusive representatives of the
faculty. In its plan, the institution shall state how it intends to
meet its goal not by eliminating positions for current employees but by
creating new full-time tenure-track appointments, by creating
opportunities for adjunct faculty to attain full-time positions, and by
converting work done by adjuncts to the greatest extent possible.
(b) Those departments with at least eight full-time equivalent
faculty appointments that do not meet the seventy-five percent goal in
subsection (2)(a) of this section shall, subject to the availability of
amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, beginning in September
2008, and in each succeeding year, plan to increase the share of
positions held by full-time tenured and tenure-track faculty so that by
2013 the legislature's goal of seventy-five percent is met.
(5) Each biennium, the governing boards of each institution of
higher education shall submit in their biennial budget request an
amount of funds sufficient to cover the projected costs of implementing
this section.
(6) Beginning in September 2008, subject to the availability of
amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, each institution of
higher education shall plan to increase faculty salaries by a
sufficient amount to raise the salaries to comparative global challenge
states' rates and to close the pro rata gap between adjunct faculty
salary and full-time faculty in each department, if a gap exists, so
that by September 2013, the legislature's goal is met.
(7)(a) Each institution of higher education shall establish a
process, subject to collective bargaining, under which adjunct faculty,
after successful completion of a probationary period, receive timely
notice of and priority consideration, consistent with other
institutional and state policies, for adjunct teaching assignments in
coming academic terms. The priority consideration shall include either
rights of first refusal for eligible classes or a continuing contract
with due process rights.
(b) Each institution of higher education shall create, subject to
collective bargaining, a process for ensuring that qualified internal
applicants receive priority consideration for attaining a tenure-track
position when one becomes available.
(c) The processes in this subsection shall be consistent with
institutional and state affirmative action and other personnel policies
and shall ensure that nontenure-track faculty: (i) Accumulate
seniority; (ii) are notified of job openings before the job is posted
outside of the institution of higher education; and (iii) have priority
consideration for appointments.
(8) Each institution of higher education shall establish a faculty
restoration and equity account.
(a) Subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose,
moneys in the account shall be used to advance one-fifth of the way
toward meeting the five-year goal of increasing the number of
undergraduate courses taught by tenure and tenure-track faculty members
to seventy-five percent in each department; and
(b) Subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose,
moneys in the account shall be used to advance one-fifth of the way
toward meeting the five-year goal of ensuring that full-time faculty
receive wages in the sixtieth percentile of global challenge states and
adjunct faculty receive fully comparable pay to full-time tenure and
tenure-track faculty.
(9) This section shall not be construed to either limit or reduce
salaries, benefits, or hiring rights in existence at an institution of
higher education on the effective date of this section or subsequently
established.
(10) As used in this section, "institution of higher education" has
the same meaning as in RCW 28B.10.016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the purpose of this section to address growing concerns
about the academic staffing crisis in higher education. Staffing
issues, including the economic exploitation of adjunct faculty along
with the shrinking ranks of full-time tenured faculty, limit the
ability of the state system of higher education to provide high quality
education, improve retention rates, conduct research, and provide
support for economic development.
(2)(a) It is the goal of this section to have at least seventy-five
percent of the full-time equivalent faculty positions be held by full-time tenured and tenure-track faculty in each department that has at
least eight full-time equivalent faculty positions with teaching
responsibilities, on each campus of each institution of higher
education.
(b) It is further the goal of this section to have salaries in
institutions of higher education that will attract and retain the best
faculty possible to educate the citizens of Washington state. To
achieve this goal, salaries for full-time faculty should be increased
above a regular cost-of-living increase until by 2013 salaries are in
the sixtieth percentile for faculty of comparable rank in global
challenge states. In addition, to achieve this goal, each institution
of higher education should determine a salary standard for adjunct
faculty members employed in each academic, technical, basic studies, or
other department that constitutes a pro rata salary compared to the
salaries of full-time tenured faculty members of comparable
qualifications doing comparable work. The salary standard shall be
subject to collective bargaining with the exclusive representatives of
the faculty, when such representation exists.
(3) In 2008, each institution of higher education shall determine
the number of full-time equivalent faculty positions held by part-time,
nontenured, tenure-track, and tenured faculty with teaching
responsibilities in each academic department.
(4)(a) Each institution of higher education shall create a plan to
meet the goal in subsection (2)(a) of this section, subject to
collective bargaining with the exclusive representatives of the
faculty, when such representation exists. In its plan, the institution
shall state how it intends to meet its goal not by eliminating
positions for current employees but by creating new full-time tenure-track positions, by creating opportunities for adjunct faculty to
attain full-time positions, and by converting work done by adjuncts to
the greatest extent possible.
(b) Those departments with at least eight full-time equivalent
faculty positions with teaching responsibilities that do not meet the
seventy-five percent goal in subsection (2)(a) of this section shall,
subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific
purpose, beginning in September 2008, and in each succeeding year, plan
to increase the share of positions held by full-time tenured and
tenure-track faculty so that by 2013 the legislature's goal of seventy-five percent is met.
(5) Each biennium, the governing boards of each institution of
higher education shall submit in their biennial budget request an
amount of funds sufficient to cover the projected costs of implementing
this section.
(6) Beginning in September 2008, subject to the availability of
amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, each institution of
higher education shall plan to increase faculty salaries by a
sufficient amount to raise the salaries to comparative global challenge
states' rates and to close the pro rata gap between adjunct faculty
salary and full-time faculty in each department, if a gap exists, so
that by September 2013, the legislature's goal is met.
(7)(a) Each institution of higher education shall establish a
process, subject to collective bargaining when exclusive representation
exists, under which adjunct faculty, after successful completion of a
probationary period, receive timely notice of and priority
consideration, consistent with other institutional and state policies,
for adjunct teaching assignments in coming academic terms. The
priority consideration shall include either rights of first refusal for
eligible classes or a continuing contract with due process rights.
(b) Each institution of higher education shall create, subject to
collective bargaining when exclusive representation exists, a process
for ensuring that qualified internal applicants receive priority
consideration for attaining a tenure-track position when one becomes
available.
(c) The processes in this subsection shall be consistent with
institutional and state affirmative action and other personnel policies
and shall ensure that nontenure-track faculty: (i) Accumulate
seniority; (ii) are notified of job openings before the job is posted
outside of the institution of higher education; and (iii) have priority
consideration for appointments.
(8) Each institution of higher education shall establish a faculty
restoration and equity account.
(a) Subject to the availability of amounts specifically
appropriated for this purpose, moneys in the account shall be used to
advance one-fifth of the way toward meeting the five-year goal of
increasing the number of undergraduate courses taught by tenure and
tenure-track faculty members to seventy-five percent in each
department; and
(b) Subject to the availability of amounts specifically
appropriated for this purpose, moneys in the account shall be used to
advance one-fifth of the way toward meeting the five-year goal of
ensuring that full-time faculty receive wages in the sixtieth
percentile of global challenge states and adjunct faculty receive fully
comparable pay to full-time tenure and tenure-track faculty.
(9) This section shall not be construed to either limit or reduce
salaries, benefits, or hiring rights in existence at an institution of
higher education on the effective date of this section or subsequently
established.
(10) As used in this section, "institution of higher education" has
the same meaning as in RCW 28B.10.016.

--- END ---