BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state laws
relating to certification of mechanics performing heating, ventilating,
air conditioning, refrigeration, and gas piping work may need to be
modified to address industry concerns. In addition, the legislature
finds that a trade coordination panel may need to be established to
recommend preferred alternatives for resolving conflicts involving the
scopes of work performed by the plumbing, electrical, and other trades
to their respective boards.

--- END ---