BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.24.010 and 2006 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Municipal corporation" or "municipality" includes any county,
city, town or combination thereof, fire protection district, local law
enforcement agency, or any emergency medical service district or other
special district, authorized by law to protect life or property within
its boundaries through a fire department, emergency workers, or reserve
officers.
(2) "Fire department" means any regularly organized fire department
or emergency medical service district consisting wholly of volunteer
firefighters, or any part-paid and part-volunteer fire department duly
organized and maintained by any municipality: PROVIDED, That any such
municipality wherein a part-paid fire department is maintained may by
appropriate legislation permit the full-paid members of its department
to come under the provisions of chapter 41.16 RCW.
(3) "Firefighter" includes any firefighter or emergency worker who
is a member of any fire department of any municipality but shall not
include firefighters who are eligible for participation in the
Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system or the Washington public employees' retirement system, with
respect to periods of service rendered in such capacity.
(4) "Emergency worker" means any emergency medical service
personnel, regulated by chapters 18.71 and 18.73 RCW, who is a member
of an emergency medical service district but shall not include
emergency medical service personnel who are eligible for participation
in the Washington public employees' retirement system, with respect to
periods of service rendered in such capacity.
(5) "Performance of duty" or "performance of service" shall be
construed to mean and include any work in and about company quarters,
any fire station, any law enforcement office or precinct, or any other
place under the direction or general orders of the chief or other
officer having authority to order such member to perform such work;
performing other officially assigned duties that are secondary to his
or her duties as a firefighter, emergency worker, or reserve officer
such as maintenance, public education, inspections, investigations,
court testimony, and fund-raising for the benefit of the department;
being on call or on standby under the orders of the chief or designated
officer of the department, except at the individual's home or place of
business; responding to, working at, or returning from an alarm of
fire, emergency call, or law enforcement duties; drill or training; or
any work performed of an emergency nature in accordance with the rules
and regulations of the fire department or local law enforcement agency.
(6) "State board" means the state board for volunteer firefighters
and reserve officers.
(7) "Board of trustees" or "local board" means: (a) For matters
affecting firefighters, a firefighter board of trustees created under
RCW 41.24.060; (b) for matters affecting an emergency worker, an
emergency medical service district board of trustees created under RCW
41.24.330; or (c) for matters affecting reserve officers, a reserve
officer board of trustees created under RCW 41.24.460.
(8) "Appropriate legislation" means an ordinance when an ordinance
is the means of legislating by any municipality, and resolution in all
other cases.
(9) "Reserve officer" means the same as defined by the Washington
state criminal justice training commission under chapter 43.101 RCW,
but shall not include enforcement officers who are eligible for
participation in the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system or the Washington public employees'
retirement system, with respect to periods of service rendered in such
capacity.
(10) "Participant" means: (a) For purposes of relief, any reserve
officer who is or may become eligible for relief under this chapter or
any firefighter or emergency worker; and (b) for purposes of retirement
pension, any firefighter, emergency worker, or reserve officer who is
or may become eligible to receive a benefit of any type under the
retirement provisions of this chapter, or whose beneficiary may be
eligible to receive any such benefit.
(11) "Relief" means all medical, death, and disability benefits
available under this chapter that are made necessary from death,
sickness, injury, or disability arising in the performance of duty,
including benefits provided under RCW 41.24.110, 41.24.150, 41.24.160,
41.24.175, 41.24.220, and 41.24.230, but does not include retirement
pensions provided under this chapter.
(12) "Retirement pension" means retirement payments for the
performance of service, as provided under RCW 41.24.170, 41.24.172,
41.24.175, 41.24.180, and 41.24.185.
(13) "Principal fund" means the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund created under RCW
41.24.030.
(14) "Administrative fund" means the volunteer firefighters' and
reserve officers' administrative fund created under RCW 41.24.030.
(15) "Secretary" means the secretary appointed by the board under
RCW 41.24.290.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) One of the primary purposes of this section is to enable
injured participants to return to their regular occupation, business,
or profession, or to engage in any occupation or perform any work for
compensation or profit. To this end, the state board shall utilize the
services of individuals and organizations, public or private, whose
experience, training, and interests in vocational rehabilitation and
retraining qualify them to lend expert assistance to the secretary or
the secretary's designee in such programs of vocational rehabilitation
as may be reasonable to make the participant return to his or her
regular occupation, business, or profession, or to engage in any
occupation or perform any work for compensation or profit consistent
with his or her physical and mental status. After evaluation and
recommendation by such individuals or organizations and prior to final
evaluation of the participant's permanent disability, if in the sole
opinion of the secretary or the secretary's designee, whether or not
medical treatment has been concluded, vocational rehabilitation is both
necessary and likely to enable the injured participant to return to his
or her regular occupation, business, or profession, or to engage in any
occupation or perform any work for compensation or profit, the
secretary or the secretary's designee may, in his or her sole
discretion, pay the cost as provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section.
(2) When, in the sole discretion of the secretary or the
secretary's designee, vocational rehabilitation is both necessary and
likely to make the participant return to his or her regular occupation,
business, or profession, or to engage in any occupation or perform any
work for compensation or profit, then the following order of priorities
shall be used:
(a) Return to the previous job with the same employer;
(b) Modification of the previous job with the same employer
including transitional return to work;
(c) A new job with the same employer in keeping with any
limitations or restrictions;
(d) Modification of a new job with the same employer including
transitional return to work;
(e) Modification of the previous job with a new employer;
(f) A new job with a new employer or self-employment based upon
transferable skills;
(g) Modification of a new job with a new employer;
(h) A new job with a new employer or self-employment involving
on-the-job training;
(i) Short-term retraining and job placement.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, costs for
vocational rehabilitation benefits allowed by the secretary or
secretary's designee under subsection (1) of this section may include
the cost of books, tuition, fees, supplies, equipment, transportation,
child or dependent care, and other necessary expenses in an amount not
to exceed four thousand dollars. This amount must be used within
fifty-two weeks of the determination that vocational rehabilitation is
permitted under this section.
(b) The expenses allowed under (a) of this subsection may include
training fees for on-the-job training and the cost of furnishing tools
and other equipment necessary for self-employment or reemployment.
However, compensation or payment of retraining with job placement
expenses under (a) of this subsection may not be authorized for a
period of more than fifty-two weeks, except that such period may, in
the sole discretion of the secretary or the secretary's designee, after
his or her review, be extended for an additional fifty-two weeks or
portion thereof by written order of the secretary. However, under no
circumstances shall the total amount of benefit paid under this section
exceed four thousand dollars.
(4) In addition to the vocational rehabilitation expenditures
provided for under subsection (3) of this section, an additional five
thousand dollars may, upon authorization of the secretary or the
secretary's designee, be expended for: (a) Accommodations for an
injured participant that are medically necessary for participation in
an approved retraining plan; and (b) accommodations necessary to
perform the essential functions of an occupation in which an injured
participant is seeking employment, consistent with the retraining plan
or the recommendations of a vocational evaluation. The injured
participant's attending physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner must verify the necessity of the modifications or
accommodations. The total expenditures authorized in this subsection
shall not exceed five thousand dollars.
(5) The secretary or the secretary's designee shall follow the
established criteria set forth by the department of labor and
industries to monitor the quality and effectiveness of rehabilitation
services provided by the individuals and organizations used under
subsection (1) of this section. The secretary or the secretary's
designee shall make referrals for vocational rehabilitation services
based on these performance criteria.
(6) The state board may engage, where feasible and cost-effective,
in a cooperative program with the state employment security department
to provide job placement services under this section.
(7) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the vocational
benefits provided for in this section are available to participants who
have claims currently pending as of the effective date of this section
or whose injury occurred on or after January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---