BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.15.050 and 2006 c 42 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All sales of valuable materials exceeding twenty-five thousand
dollars in appraised value must be at public auction or by sealed bid
to the highest bidder, provided that on public lands granted to the
state for educational purposes sealed bids may be accepted for sales of
timber or stone only.
(2)(a) A direct sale of valuable materials may be sold to the
applicant for cash at full appraised value without notice or
advertising.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the board
must, by resolution, establish the value amount of a direct sale not to
exceed twenty-five thousand dollars in appraised sale value, and
establish procedures to ensure that competitive market prices and
accountability are guaranteed.
(c) The department may offer fallen woody debris, boulders, and
other materials in a direct sale, without going to public auction, for
use in publicly funded aquatic habitat improvement projects. The
department must ensure that in all direct sales to organizations under
this subsection that it receives compensation at the appraised value,
if any, for the sold materials.

--- END ---