BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the education and
skills of Washington's workforce is a major determinant of the state's
economic growth, and that finding regional solutions to the state's
workforce needs are of paramount concern. The legislature further
recognizes that different areas of the state will need the flexibility
to fashion local solutions to their economic and workforce strengths
and challenges, and that regional workforce systems may evolve over
time.
The legislature finds that while the workforce system in Washington
is operated by numerous entities, each with a critical role, it should
function as one interconnected and coordinated system. Workforce
development planning, at the regional level, should be coordinated with
regional strategic plans. Further, regional and state plans should be
coordinated to achieve both statewide and local workforce development
goals. To facilitate this coordination and cooperation among state and
local regions, the legislature declares it to be in the state's
interest to establish a coordinated planning program for regional
workforce development systems throughout the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature authorizes a program under which local
workforce development councils shall serve as the lead regional
workforce development planning organizations within their regions. In
this capacity, each local council shall:
(a) Convene the following entities that are located or provide
services within its region:
(i) Community and technical colleges;
(ii) Economic development councils;
(iii) The employment security department;
(iv) Small business development centers;
(v) Skill centers;
(vi) Public four-year institutions of higher education;
(vii) Private two and four-year postsecondary institutions;
(viii) Apprenticeship programs;
(ix) Secondary career and technical education programs; and
(x) Other public, private, and nonprofit workforce-related
entities;
(b) Adopt and periodically update a consensus skills-based economic
growth plan for the region. This plan shall clearly articulate the
connection between the industry sectors the community is targeting for
growth and the skills training programs that the community is targeting
for expansion. The plan shall include, but is not limited to:
(i) Data on current and projected employment opportunities in the
local area;
(ii) Identification of workforce investment needs of existing
businesses and businesses considering location in the region;
(iii) Identification of educational, training, employment, and
support service needs of jobseekers and workers in the local area;
(iv) Analysis of the industry demand, potential labor force supply,
and educational, employment, and workforce support available to
businesses and jobseekers in the region;
(v) Development of industry cluster-based strategies to support the
regional economy, facilitate technology transfer and diffusion, and
increase value-added production;
(vi) Identification of the needs of those clusters, including
determining what sources of programs and initiatives are needed to
attract, grow, retain, and support those industries;
(vii) Recommendations for the most efficient use of existing
workforce infrastructure and funding to maximize service to individuals
and industry; and
(viii) Creation of a financial plan demonstrating how the regional
workforce plan can be implemented, including all resources that are
reasonably expected to be made available to carry out the plan, and
recommending any techniques to leverage and increase available
resources and services to individual and industry customers.
(2) This section does not relieve workforce development councils of
any planning requirements that exist under federal law, that are not
included in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Workforce development councils may submit an application to
participate in the skills-based economic growth program under this
section. The board shall review the applications to ensure they meet
the criteria for the program.
(2) A workforce development council participating in the program
under this section shall convene other local workforce development
agencies and develop a skills-based economic growth plan for their
region that is supported by the local workforce development agencies.
The plan must be adopted within their region by November 30, 2008, and
approved by the board by February 15, 2009.
(3) A workforce development council participating in the program
under this section shall establish procedures to track and annually
report: The amount of new state and nonstate funding brought into the
community as a result of the skills-based economic growth planning
process; training capacity expansion achieved in programs targeted by
the plan; impact on local economic growth; and the impact on career
opportunities for local residents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the
board shall create the local skills-based economic growth planning
program. The board shall determine the criteria for the distribution
of funds for the program.
(2) The board may, in implementing this section, accept, use, and
dispose of contributions of money, services, and property. All moneys
received by the board for the purposes of this section must be
deposited in a depository approved by the state treasurer. Only the
board or a duly authorized representative thereof may authorize
expenditures from this account. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control, the account is subject in all respects
to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit
expenditure of moneys in the account.

Sec. 5 RCW 28C.18.010 and 1996 c 99 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this title.
(1) "Board" means the workforce training and education coordinating
board.
(2) "Director" means the director of the workforce training and
education coordinating board.
(3) "Training system" means programs and courses of secondary
vocational education, technical college programs and courses, community
college vocational programs and courses, private career school and
college programs and courses, employer-sponsored training, adult basic
education programs and courses, programs and courses funded by the job
training partnership act, programs and courses funded by the federal
vocational act, programs and courses funded under the federal adult
education act, publicly funded programs and courses for adult literacy
education, and apprenticeships, and programs and courses offered by
private and public nonprofit organizations that are representative of
communities or significant segments of communities and provide job
training or adult literacy services.
(4) "Workforce skills" means skills developed through applied
learning that strengthen and reinforce an individual's academic
knowledge, critical thinking, problem solving, and work ethic and,
thereby, develop the employability, occupational skills, and management
of home and work responsibilities necessary for economic independence.
(5) "Vocational education" means organized educational programs
offering a sequence of courses which are directly related to the
preparation or retraining of individuals in paid or unpaid employment
in current or emerging occupations requiring other than a baccalaureate
or advanced degree. Such programs shall include competency-based
applied learning which contributes to an individual's academic
knowledge, higher-order reasoning, and problem-solving skills, work
attitudes, general employability skills, and the occupational-specific
skills necessary for economic independence as a productive and
contributing member of society. Such term also includes applied
technology education.
(6) "Adult basic education" means instruction designed to achieve
mastery of skills in reading, writing, oral communication, and
computation at a level sufficient to allow the individual to function
effectively as a parent, worker, and citizen in the United States,
commensurate with that individual's actual ability level, and includes
English as a second language and preparation and testing service for
the general education development exam.
(7) "Workforce development council" means workforce investment
board as established in Public Law 105-220 Sec. 117.

--- END ---