BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that access to
higher education is of critical importance to the current and future
prosperity of the citizens of the state of Washington. However, the
legislature further finds that the following three factors are creating
barriers to access for students:
(a) Tuition increases have varied dramatically over the last
decade, making the cost of postsecondary attendance unpredictable for
students and families.
(b) There are at least thirty separate state and federal programs
providing direct financial aid or tax benefits to individuals seeking
postsecondary education, in addition to institutional aid, private
scholarships, and other programs. The system is complicated and
difficult to understand, with the unfortunate effect of discouraging
some low-income students from even applying to college. Additionally,
some students are not able to access enough financial assistance to
make postsecondary education affordable.
(c) Students frequently must repeat college-level coursework when
transferring from one institution of higher education to another,
increasing their financial and time costs.
(2) Through implementing of a complementary and coordinated set of
policies around tuition, financial aid, and student transitions, the
legislature intends to make access to higher education a top priority.

FINANCIAL AIDPART 1
STATEWIDE TUITION POLICY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15
RCW to read as follows:
TUITION--FUNDING LEVELS--LIMITATIONS. (1) Beginning with the
2007-08 academic year and ending with the 2016-17 academic year,
tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate students may
increase no greater than seven percent over the previous academic year
in any institution of higher education. Annual reductions or increases
in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students shall be
as provided in the omnibus appropriations act, within the seven percent
increase limit established in this section. To the extent that state
appropriations combined with tuition and fee revenues are insufficient
to achieve the total per-student funding goals established in
subsection (3) of this section, the legislature may revisit state
appropriations, authorized enrollment levels, and changes in tuition
fees for any given fiscal year.
(2) If in any year, the level of instructional state support per
full-time equivalent student at a public four-year institution does not
equal or exceed the amount of the previous year's instructional state
support adjusted for inflation using the implicit price deflator, the
tuition cap may be increased. In this circumstance, the governing
board of each impacted institution may elect to increase tuition and
fee revenues above the seven percent cap to a level sufficient to cover
the amount not received through the state appropriation. Upon meeting
the goal established in subsection (3) of this section, this authority
is suspended.
(3) The state shall adopt as its goal total per-student funding
levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and fees, of at least
the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding at similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states. The
office of financial management shall develop a funding trajectory for
each four-year institution of higher education and for the community
and technical college system as a whole that when combined with tuition
and fees revenue allows the state to achieve its funding goal for each
four-year institution and the community and technical college system as
a whole no later than fiscal year 2017. The state shall not reduce
enrollment levels below fiscal year 2007 budgeted levels in order to
improve or alter the per-student funding amount at any four-year
institution of higher education or the community and technical college
system as a whole. The state recognizes that each four-year
institution of higher education and the community and technical college
system as a whole have different funding requirements to achieve
desired performance levels, and that increases to the total per-student
funding amount may need to exceed the minimum funding goal.
(4) By September 1st of each year beginning in 2008, the office of
financial management shall report to the governor, the higher education
coordinating board, and appropriate committees of the legislature with
updated estimates of the total per-student funding level that
represents the sixtieth percentile of funding for comparable
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states, and
the progress toward that goal that was made for each of the public
institutions of higher education.
(5) As used in this section, "global challenge states" are the top
performing states on the new economy index published by the progressive
policy institute as of the effective date of this section. The new
economy index ranks states on indicators of their potential to compete
in the new economy. At least once every five years, the office of
financial management shall determine if changes to the list of global
challenge states are appropriate. The office of financial management
shall report its findings to the governor and the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15
RCW to read as follows:
BILLING DISCLOSURES TO STUDENTS. In addition to the requirement in
RCW 28B.76.300(4), institutions of higher education shall disclose to
their undergraduate resident students on the tuition billing statement,
in dollar figures for a full-time equivalent student: (1) The full
cost of instruction, (2) the amount collected from student tuition and
fees, and (3) the difference between the amounts for the full cost of
instruction and the student tuition and fees, noting that the
difference between the cost and tuition was paid by state tax funds and
other moneys.

PART 2
FINANCIAL AID ACCESS AND TRANSPARENCY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) The higher education coordinating
board shall conduct a review of:
(a) The current types and amounts of need-based financial aid
available to students in Washington from state, federal, and
institutional sources, with information on the eligible population for
each source; and
(b) The level of understanding of available financial aid and
requirements for accessing the aid, among high school students, high
school parents, and college students.
(2) Based on the results of the review, the higher education
coordinating board shall develop and propose a plan to:
(a) Simplify the delivery of financial aid;
(b) Provide easy access to high quality financial aid information;
and
(c) Address gaps in the financial aid system.
(3) The board shall submit its plan to the fiscal and higher
education committees of the legislature by December 20, 2007, and shall
coordinate its research and development with the state board for
community and technical colleges and the superintendent of public
instruction.
(4) The board may, in carrying out this study, accept, use, and
dispose of contributions of money, services, and property. All moneys
received by the board for the study must be deposited in a depository
approved by the state treasurer. Disbursements of such funds shall be
on authorization of the institute or a duly authorized representative
thereof. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue
control, such funds are subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required to permit expenditure of such funds.
(5) This section expires December 31, 2007.

PART 3
STUDENT TRANSITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature desires to make transitions among high school,
two-year, and four-year institutions of higher education through a
standard practice, whether through course design, common course
numbering, or transfer agreements. The legislature recognizes that
significant progress has been accomplished in this area through a joint
access oversight group. However, challenges that still exist lead to
unnecessary time and money costs for students. The higher education
coordinating board, in collaboration with the state board for community
and technical colleges and the council of presidents, shall convene a
work group that includes representatives of the public baccalaureate
institutions and the community and technical colleges. The work group
may include representatives from independent four-year institutions as
appropriate. The work group shall be responsible for identifying and
examining:
(a) The criteria and circumstances under which courses that
transfer within an associate degree program do and do not transfer
separately from a degree;
(b) A comprehensive list of additional major-related program
agreements that are needed to best prepare transfer students for
specific baccalaureate majors;
(c) The current availability of baccalaureate degree programs into
which associate of applied science technical degrees transfer, and a
list of those to be considered in the future; and
(d) The transferability of advanced placement courses, and other
college-level and dual credit coursework taken during high school.
(2) Based upon the information identified by the work group in
subsection (1) of this section, the work group shall provide the higher
education coordinating board with a recommended work plan and timetable
to improve transfer, that includes: (a) Options for course and degree
transfer, (b) an expansion of baccalaureate degree options for
graduates of associate of applied science technical degree programs,
and (c) recommended strategies to improve student understanding of
courses that are appropriate for transfer into various types of
baccalaureate degrees. The higher education coordinating board, in
collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges
and the council of presidents, shall review and modify the work group's
recommendations as necessary.
(3) The higher education coordinating board shall report to the
higher education committees of the house of representatives and the
senate on the work plan, its implementation, and any resulting policy
changes on an annual basis, beginning January 10, 2008.

PART 4
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Part headings and captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

--- END ---