BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS
Sec. 101 RCW 28B.76.050 and 2004 c 275 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The members of the board, except ((the chair serving on June 13,
2002, and)) the student member, shall serve for terms of four years,
the terms expiring on June 30th of the fourth year of the term ((except
that in the case of initial members, two shall be appointed to two-year
terms, three shall be appointed to three-year terms, and three shall be
appointed to four-year terms)). The student member shall hold his or
her office for a term of one year ((from)) beginning on the first day
of July. ((The chair serving on June 13, 2002, shall serve at the
pleasure of the governor.))

Sec. 102 RCW 28B.76.090 and 2004 c 275 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The board shall employ a director and may delegate agency
management to the director.)) Effective July 1, 2007, an executive
director shall be appointed by the governor from a list of three names
submitted by the board to the governor. If requested by the governor,
the board shall submit additional names for the governor's
consideration until an appointment is made. The executive director
shall serve at the pleasure of the board, shall be the executive
officer of the board, and shall, under the board's supervision,
administer the provisions of this chapter. The executive director
shall, with the approval of the board: (1) Employ necessary deputy and
assistant directors and other exempt staff under chapter 41.06 RCW who
shall serve at his or her pleasure on such terms and conditions as he
or she determines and (2) subject to the provisions of chapter 41.06
RCW, appoint and employ such other employees as may be required for the
proper discharge of the functions of the board. The executive director
shall exercise such additional powers, other than rule making, as may
be delegated by the board by resolution. In fulfilling the duties
under this chapter, the board shall make extensive use of those state
agencies with responsibility for implementing and supporting
postsecondary education plans and policies including but not limited to
appropriate legislative groups, the postsecondary education
institutions, the office of financial management, the workforce
training and education coordinating board, ((and)) the state board for
community and technical colleges, and the office of the superintendent
of public instruction. Outside consulting and service agencies may
also be employed. The board may compensate these groups and
consultants in appropriate ways.

Sec. 103 RCW 28B.76.100 and 2004 c 275 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish an advisory council consisting of:
A representative of the superintendent of public instruction; a
representative of the state board of education appointed by the state
board of education; a representative of the two-year system of the
state board for community and technical colleges appointed by the state
board for community and technical colleges; a representative of the
workforce training and education coordinating board appointed by the
workforce training and education coordinating board; one representative
of the research universities appointed by the president of the
University of Washington and the president of Washington State
University; a representative of the regional universities and The
Evergreen State College appointed through a process developed by the
council of presidents; a representative of the faculty for the four-year institutions appointed by the council of faculty representatives;
a representative of the proprietary schools appointed by the federation
of private career schools and colleges; a representative of the
independent colleges appointed by the independent colleges of
Washington; and a faculty member in the community and technical college
system appointed by the state board for community and technical
colleges in consultation with the faculty unions.
(2) The members of the advisory council shall each serve a two-year
term ((except for the superintendent of public instruction, whose term
is concurrent with his or her term of office)).
(3) The board shall meet with the advisory council at least
quarterly and shall seek advice from the council regarding the board's
discharge of its statutory responsibilities.

PART 2
POLICY AND PLANNING
Sec. 201 RCW 28B.76.200 and 2004 c 275 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall develop a statewide strategic master plan for
higher education that proposes a vision and identifies measurable goals
and priorities for the system of higher education in Washington state
for a ten-year time period. The board shall update the statewide
strategic master plan every four years. The plan shall address the
goals of: (a) Expanding access; (b) using methods of educational
delivery that are efficient, cost-effective, and productive to deliver
modern educational programs; and (c) using performance measures to
gauge the effectiveness of the state's progress towards meeting its
higher education goals. The plan shall encompass all sectors of higher
education, including the two-year system, workforce training, the four-year institutions, and financial aid. The board shall also specify
strategies for ((maintaining and)) expanding access, affordability,
quality, efficiency, and accountability among the various institutions
of higher education.
(2) In developing the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education, the board shall collaborate with the four-year institutions
of higher education including the council of presidents, the community
and technical college system, and, when appropriate, the workforce
training and education coordinating board, the superintendent of public
instruction, ((and)) the independent higher education institutions, the
business sector, and labor. The board shall identify and utilize
models of regional planning and decision making before initiating a
statewide planning process. The board shall also seek input from
students, faculty organizations, community and business leaders in the
state, members of the legislature, and the governor.
(3) As a foundation for the statewide strategic master plan for
higher education, the board shall review role and mission statements
for each of the four-year institutions of higher education and the
community and technical college system. The purpose of the review is
to ensure institutional roles and missions are aligned with the overall
state vision and priorities for higher education.
(4) In assessing needs of the state's higher education system, the
board ((may)) should encourage partnerships, embrace innovation, and
consider ((and)), analyze, and make recommendations concerning the
following information:
(a) Demographic, social, economic, and technological trends and
their impact on service delivery for a twenty-year horizon;
(b) The changing ethnic composition of the population and the
special needs arising from those trends;
(c) Business and industrial needs for a skilled workforce;
(d) College attendance, retention, transfer, graduation, and
dropout rates;
(e) Needs and demands for basic and continuing education and
opportunities for lifelong learning by individuals of all age groups;
((and))
(f) Needs and demands for nontraditional populations including, but
not limited to, adult learners; and
(g) Needs and demands for access to higher education by placebound
students and individuals in heavily populated areas underserved by
public institutions.
(5) The statewide strategic master plan for higher education shall
include, but not be limited to, the following access and educational
delivery items:
(a) Recommendations based on enrollment forecasts and analysis of
data about demand for higher education, and policies and actions to
meet ((those needs)) the goal of expanding access;
(b) State ((or)) and regional priorities for new or expanded degree
programs or off-campus programs, including what models of service
delivery may be most cost-effective;
(c) Recommended policies or actions to improve the efficiency of
student transfer and graduation or completion;
(d) State ((or)) and regional priorities for addressing needs in
high-demand fields where enrollment access is limited and employers are
experiencing difficulty finding enough qualified graduates to fill job
openings;
(e) Recommended tuition and fees policies and levels; and
(f) Priorities and recommendations including increased transparency
on financial aid.
(6) The board shall present the vision, goals, priorities, and
strategies in the statewide strategic master plan for higher education
in a way that provides guidance for institutions, the governor, and the
legislature to make further decisions regarding institution-level
plans, policies, legislation, and operating and capital funding for
higher education. In the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education, the board shall recommend specific actions to be taken and
identify measurable performance indicators and benchmarks for gauging
progress toward achieving the goals and priorities.
(7) Every four years by December 15th, beginning December 15,
((2003)) 2007, the board shall submit an ((interim)) update of the ten-year statewide strategic master plan for higher education to the
governor and the legislature. The ((interim)) updated plan shall
reflect the expectations and policy directions of the legislative
higher education and fiscal committees, and shall provide a timely and
relevant framework for the development of future budgets and policy
proposals. The legislature shall, by concurrent resolution, approve or
recommend changes to the ((interim)) updated plan, following public
hearings. The board shall submit the final plan, incorporating
legislative changes, to the governor and the legislature by June of the
year in which the legislature approves the concurrent resolution. The
plan shall then become state higher education policy unless legislation
is enacted to alter the policies set forth in the plan. The board
shall report annually to the governor and the legislature on the
progress being made by the institutions of higher education and the
state to implement the strategic master plan.
(8) Each four-year institution shall develop an institution-level
ten-year strategic plan that implements the vision, goals, priorities,
and strategies within the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education based on the institution's role and mission. Institutional
strategic plans shall ((also)) encourage partnerships, embrace
innovation, and contain measurable performance indicators and
benchmarks for gauging progress toward achieving the goals and
priorities with attention given to the goals and strategies of
increased access and program delivery methods. The board shall review
the institution-level plans to ensure the plans are aligned with and
implement the statewide strategic master plan for higher education and
shall periodically monitor institutions' progress toward achieving the
goals and priorities within their plans.
(9) The board shall also review the comprehensive master plan
prepared by the state board for community and technical colleges for
the community and technical college system under RCW 28B.50.090 to
ensure the plan is aligned with and implements the statewide strategic
master plan for higher education.

Sec. 202 RCW 28B.76.210 and 2004 c 275 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall collaborate with the four-year institutions
including the council of presidents, the community and technical
college system, and when appropriate the workforce training and
education coordinating board, the superintendent of public instruction,
and the independent higher educational institutions to identify budget
priorities and levels of funding for higher education, including the
two and four-year institutions of higher education and state financial
aid programs. It is the intent of the legislature that recommendations
from the board reflect not merely the sum of budget requests from
multiple institutions, but prioritized funding needs for the overall
system of higher education.
(2) By December of each odd-numbered year, the board shall
distribute guidelines which outline the board's fiscal priorities to
the institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges. The institutions and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall submit an outline of their proposed budgets((,
identifying major components, to the board no later than August 1st of
each even-numbered year)) to the board no later than July 1st of each
even-numbered year. Pursuant to guidelines developed by the board,
operating budget outlines submitted by the institutions and the state
board for community and technical colleges after January 1, 2007, shall
include all policy changes and enhancements that will be requested by
the institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges in their respective biennial budget requests. Operating
budget outlines shall include a description of each policy enhancement,
the dollar amount requested, and the fund source being requested.
Capital budget outlines shall include the prioritized ranking of the
capital projects being requested by two-year and four-year
institutions, respectively. A description of each capital project, and
the amount and fund source being requested, shall be included for each
capital project appearing in the prioritized ranking. The office of
financial management shall reference these reporting requirements in
its budget instructions.
(3) The board shall review and evaluate the operating and capital
budget requests from four-year institutions and the community and
technical college system based on how the requests align with the
board's budget priorities, the missions of the institutions, and the
statewide strategic master plan for higher education under RCW
28B.76.200.
(4) The board shall submit recommendations on the proposed budgets
and on the board's budget priorities to the office of financial
management before ((November)) October 1st of each even-numbered year,
and to the legislature by January 1st of each odd-numbered year.
(5) Institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall submit any supplemental budget requests and revisions to
the board at the same time they are submitted to the office of
financial management. The board shall submit recommendations on the
proposed supplemental budget requests to the office of financial
management by November 1st and to the legislature by January 1st.

PART 3
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 Section 102 of this act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---