BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 83.100 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of determining the Washington taxable estate,
a deduction is allowed from the federal taxable estate for the value of
qualified family-owned business interests of the decedent. This
deduction applies only if the qualified family-owned business interest
is acquired by any qualified heir from, or passed to any qualified heir
from, the decedent, within the meaning of RCW 83.100.046(2) and the
decedent was at the time of his or her death a citizen or resident of
the United States. Only property in the federal taxable estate and not
deductible under RCW 83.100.046 may be deducted under this subsection.
For the purposes of determining the deduction amount, the value of
property is its value as used to determine the value of the gross
estate. For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Qualified family-owned business interest" has the same meaning
as in 26 U.S.C. section 2057(e) of the federal internal revenue code as
it exists on January 1, 2007.
(ii) "Qualified heir" has the same meaning as in 26 U.S.C. section
2057(i) of the federal internal revenue code as it exists on January 1,
2007.

--- END ---