BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the six colleges
that developed proposals for the applied baccalaureate degree pilot
programs exhibited exemplary work preparing proposals. The proposals
were consistent with the legislature's vision for expanding bachelor's
degree access and with the principals and criteria developed by the
college board. The legislature recognizes that the authorization for
the pilots was limited in number and therefore not all the proposals
were able to be approved. The legislature values the work that has
been done and intends to provide authority for additional pilots so as
not to lose the good work that has been done.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.810 and 2005 c 258 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By April 2006, the college board shall select four community or
technical colleges to develop and offer programs of study leading to an
applied baccalaureate degree. At least one of the four pilot programs
chosen must lead to a baccalaureate of applied science degree which
builds on an associate of applied science degree. The college board
shall convene a task force that includes representatives of both the
community and technical colleges to develop objective selection
criteria.
(2) By February 2008, the college board shall select up to two
colleges to develop and offer programs of study leading to an applied
baccalaureate degree. At least one of the colleges selected must be a
technical college. The college board shall use the objective selection
criteria developed under subsections (1) and (3) of this section to
make the selection.
(3) Colleges may submit an application to become a pilot college
under this section. The college board shall review the applications
and select the pilot colleges using objective criteria, including:
(a) The college demonstrates the capacity to make a long-term
commitment of resources to build and sustain a high quality program;
(b) The college has or can readily engage faculty appropriately
qualified to develop and deliver a high quality curriculum at the
baccalaureate level;
(c) The college can demonstrate demand for the proposed program
from a sufficient number of students within its service area to make
the program cost-effective and feasible to operate;
(d) The college can demonstrate that employers demand the level of
technical training proposed within the program, making it cost-effective for students to seek the degree; and
(e) The proposed program fills a gap in options available for
students because it is not offered by a public four-year institution of
higher education in the college's geographic area.
(((3))) (4) A college selected as a pilot college under this
section may develop the curriculum for and design and deliver courses
leading to an applied baccalaureate degree. However, degree programs
developed under this section are subject to approval by the college
board under RCW 28B.50.090 and by the higher education coordinating
board under RCW 28B.76.230 before a pilot college may enroll students
in upper division courses. A pilot college approved under subsection
(1) of this section may not enroll students in upper division courses
before the fall academic quarter of 2006. A pilot college approved
under subsection (2) of this section may not enroll students in upper
division courses before the fall academic quarter of 2009.

--- END ---