BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.117 and 2005 c 314 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing
a picture, if the applicant:
(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;
(b) Proves his or her identity as required by RCW 46.20.035; and
(c) Pays the required fee. The fee is twenty dollars unless an
applicant is a recipient of continuing public assistance grants under
Title 74 RCW, who is referred in writing by the secretary of social and
health services. For those persons the fee must be the actual cost of
production of the identicard.
(2) Design and term. The identicard must:
(a) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the
official driver's license; and
(b) Expire on the fifth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate
after issuance.
(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be
submitted by means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; ((or))
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her identicard by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of an identicard
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act; or
(c) Mail or electronic commerce, if the applicant renewed his or
her identicard by means of personal appearance before the department
when he or she was at least seventy years of age.
An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce
unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of
the identicard holder.
(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the
holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to use the
card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---