BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND PURPOSE. The
legislature finds that the growing, production, or formation of seed
from plants of the genus Brassica for the purpose of producing seed,
oil, biofuel or associated byproducts, commercial vegetables, forage,
or cover crops is in the interest of the public welfare. The
legislature finds that species, hybrids, varieties, and variations of
plants of the genus Brassica have potential to form genetic crosses,
particularly when they are grown in geographic proximity, and will, if
not properly regulated, result in significant loss of quality, purity,
and value in the seed produced.
The legislature finds that production of biofuel using Brassica
seed crops, generally known as canola or rapeseed, can help citizens
and businesses conserve energy and reduce the use of petroleum-based
fuels, improve air and water quality, and create new industries and
jobs for Washington citizens. The legislature also finds that
Washington state offers conditions uniquely suited to the production of
high quality, high value Brassica vegetable seed, and that the
vegetable seed industry is a significant contributor to the diversity
and economic viability of the agricultural community.
The purpose of this act is to provide for the orderly production of
potentially incompatible varieties of Brassica seed crops.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Brassica" means any plants in the genus Brassica.
(2) "Brassica seed crop" means any commercial production of any
species, hybrid, or variety of the genus Brassica that results in
pollen or seed formation. Brassica seed crop includes, but is not
limited to, Brassica seeds grown for planting, and species generally
known as rapeseed or canola, including Brassica napus, Brassica rapa,
and Brassica juncea, grown for oil or biofuel and associated
byproducts. For purposes of this chapter, forage and cover crops from
the genus Brassica are considered Brassica seed crops. Plants from the
genus Brassica grown as vegetables for human or animal consumption such
as cabbage, broccoli, rutabaga, and kohlrabi are not Brassica seed
crops as long as they are not allowed to produce pollen or seed.
(3) "Department" means the state department of agriculture.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department or the
director's authorized representative.
(5) "Grower" means a person who grows a Brassica seed crop within
a Brassica seed production district or, for purposes of section 3 of
this act, within a proposed Brassica seed production district.
(6) "Processor" means a person who commercially uses, sells, or
processes a Brassica seed crop grown within a Brassica seed production
district or, for purposes of section 3 of this act, within a proposed
Brassica seed production district.
(7) "Volunteer and weed Brassica plants" means plants of the genus
Brassica that arise from accidental or unintentional scattering or
occurrence of seed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 BRASSICA SEED PRODUCTION DISTRICTS--GROWER'S
PETITION--RULES. Any grower or processor of a Brassica seed crop may
submit a petition to the director requesting establishment of a
Brassica seed production district. The petition must include proposed
geographic boundaries of the district and the proposed types of
regulations for designated Brassica seed crop species within the
district. The petition must contain the signatures of at least ten
growers or processors of affected Brassica seed crops grown within the
boundaries of the proposed Brassica seed production district. If there
are fewer than ten growers or processors of affected Brassica seed
crops grown within the boundaries of the proposed district, then the
applicant may submit a list of names and contact information for all
Brassica seed crop growers and processors within the proposed district
and a petition signed by at least fifty percent of these persons. In
response to the petition, the director may adopt rules to establish
Brassica seed production districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 BRASSICA PRODUCTION AGREEMENTS. (1) Any
person who wishes to conduct an activity otherwise prohibited within a
Brassica seed production district must first enter into a Brassica
production agreement with the director. Each Brassica production
agreement shall be developed by the applicant and the director in
consultation with an advisory committee comprised of at least three
individuals appointed by the director, none of whom shall have a
financial interest in the request for agreement or its outcome and at
least one of whom shall be a grower in or processor of Brassica seed
crops grown within the Brassica seed production district. The director
shall not enter into any Brassica production agreement unless the
director, in the exercise of his or her discretion, is satisfied that
the agreement contains terms and conditions that are necessary and
sufficient to mitigate reasonably possible risks to the economic
well-being of growers within the Brassica seed production district from
the proposed activity.
(2) The applicant or any grower or processor of a Brassica seed
crop grown within the Brassica seed production district that would be
affected by the Brassica production agreement may appeal, under RCW
34.05.570(4), the director's decision whether or not to enter into a
Brassica production agreement. Any such appeal must be filed in the
superior court of Thurston county or the county in which the activity
to be allowed under the Brassica production agreement would occur.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RULES. The director may adopt rules
necessary to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter
concerning, but not limited to:
(1) Brassica seed production districts;
(2) Notification of a designated central clearinghouse for growers
to report their intention to plant a Brassica seed crop within a
Brassica seed production district;
(3) Isolation distances between Brassica seed crops within a
Brassica seed production district;
(4) Exclusion of designated Brassica seed crops within a Brassica
seed production district, except under terms of a Brassica production
agreement;
(5) Control of volunteer and weed Brassica plants within a Brassica
seed production district; and
(6) Brassica production agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 VIOLATION OR THREATENED VIOLATION OF
CHAPTER--ACTION TO ENJOIN. The director or any grower or processor of
a Brassica seed crop grown within a Brassica seed production district
may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of
any provision of this chapter or its rules, or any Brassica production
agreement entered into by an applicant and the director, in the
superior court of Thurston county or the county in which the violation
or threatened violation occurs or is about to occur.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 APPLICATION OF CHAPTER 34.05 RCW. Chapter
34.05 RCW governs the rights, remedies, and procedures respecting the
administration of this chapter, including rule making.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 15.65.055 (Regulatory authority on the production of
rapeseed by variety and location) and 1986 c 203 s 21; and
(2) RCW 15.66.025 (Regulatory authority on the production of
rapeseed by variety and location) and 1986 c 203 s 22.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---