BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the wild
horse coordinated resource management plan in Kittitas county was
developed in 2006 by a group of diverse local citizens interested in
coordinating the management of resources for the Skookumchuck and
Whiskey Dick wildlife areas, which encompasses approximately sixty-two
thousand acres in eastern Kittitas county. The diverse planning
process brought together ranchers, local landowners, a large energy
company, the department of natural resources, the department of fish
and wildlife, several environmental groups, and the federal government
to collaboratively plan to improve the management in the wild horse
coordinated resource management plan area.
(2) The legislature further finds that coordinated management is of
the utmost importance due to the fragmented ownership pattern and
varied management regimes of the past. Coordinated management of the
area will allow for the enhancement of wildlife habitat, the
rehabilitation of natural springs, the development of water resources,
and an improvement in domestic livestock opportunities due to a better
distribution of forage plants growing in the area.
(3) The legislature further finds that planned livestock grazing in
the wild horse coordinated resource management plan area will benefit
fish habitat, upland birds, song birds, reptiles, and wild mammals,
while preventing the invasion of noxious plants.
(4) The legislature further finds that the investment in
implementing the wild horse coordinated resource management plan will
benefit the twelve thousand head Colockum elk herd located in the area
and reduce the depredation of local crops and forages caused by elk in
the area due to a current lack of high quality forage available on
public lands.
(5) The legislature further finds that implementation of the wild
horse coordinated resource management plan will also have benefits to
public recreation, such as sustained hunting, maintenance of shrub-steppe wildlife habitat, reduction in fire incidences, and the addition
of public recreation dollars to the local economy.
(6) The legislature further finds that the collaborative process
giving rise to the wild horse coordinated resource management plan
will, if implemented, result in improved resource conditions, assist
local citizens in meeting their objectives, and minimize conflict among
land users, landowners, governmental agencies, and interest groups.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of fish and wildlife and the
department of natural resources shall utilize the funding made
available specifically for this act to assist with the implementation
of the wild horse coordinated resource management plan. Implementation
includes taking those on-the-ground actions that are required of the
two agencies under the wild horse coordinated resource management plan,
and providing grant funding to other state and nonstate agencies as
required for the full implementation of the wild horse coordinated
resource management plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sum of two hundred forty-five
thousand two hundred sixty-four dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008,
from the general fund to the department of fish and wildlife for the
purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of two hundred forty-five thousand two hundred sixty-four dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the
department of fish and wildlife for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---