BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the DNA
testing act of 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) One hundred twenty-three people in the United States have been
exonerated from death row based on postconviction DNA testing;
(b) On May 27, 2005, Texas passed a law stating that all felons
must submit a DNA sample;
(c) Gary Ridgway, the Green River Killer, was identified as being
guilty based on DNA evidence;
(d) In Maryland on January 1, 2004, a student senate passed a bill
mandating postconviction DNA tests prior to the implementation of the
death penalty; and
(e) A similar proposal was submitted to the Washington state
legislature in 2006 as House Bill No. 3230.
(2) The purposes of this act are:
(a) To prevent the incarceration or wrongful execution of innocent
persons; and
(b) To alleviate the financial burden placed on taxpayers during
the appeals process of a death sentence for individuals who may be
exonerated later.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 10.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the state
of Washington may not impose the death penalty upon any person
convicted of aggravated first degree murder unless DNA evidence is
introduced and assists in the person's conviction.
(2) The death penalty may be implemented without DNA evidence if:
(a) The defendant has confessed to committing aggravated first
degree murder; or
(b) There is technological evidence that shows that the defendant
committed aggravated first degree murder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 10.95 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply to sections 1 through 3 of
this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Accused" means a person against whom a criminal action is
brought.
(2) "Aggravated first degree murder" has the same meaning as in RCW
10.95.020.
(3) "Confession" means a written or oral acknowledgment of guilt by
a person accused of an offense.
(4) "Crime" means a serious violation of public law.
(5) "Exonerated" means the freeing or clearing from accusation or
guilt.
(6) "Implement" means to enforce or fulfill a duty.
(7) "Postconviction DNA testing" means DNA testing that convicted
persons may request after their conviction.
(8) "Show" means to make manifest or apparent or to demonstrate,
display evidence, or reveal.
(9) "Technological evidence" means advanced or sophisticated
devices that furnish proof, including video cameras.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) This act applies to all state law, and
the implementation of that law, whether statutory or otherwise, and
whether adopted before, on, or after the effective date of this act.
(2) Statutory law adopted on or after the effective date of this
act is subject to the requirements of this act unless the law
explicitly excludes such application by reference to this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Nothing in this act shall be construed to
affect, interpret, or in any way change the Constitution of the United
States or the Constitution of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---