BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
imposed by RCW 82.04.290(2) amounts received by physicians or clinics
for drugs for infusion or injection by licensed physicians for human
use pursuant to a prescription, but only if the amounts: (1) Are
separately stated on invoices or other billing statements; (2) do not
exceed the then current federal rate; and (3) are covered or required
under a health care service program subsidized by the federal or state
government. The federal rate means the rate at or below which the
federal government or its agents reimburse providers for prescription
drugs administered to patients as provided for in the medicare, part B,
drugs average sales price information resource as published by the
United States department of health and human services, or any successor
index thereto.

--- END ---