BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state has
taken significant strides towards implementing an environmentally and
economically sound energy policy through increasing reliance on energy
efficiency, conservation, and renewable energy resources in order to
promote a sustainable energy future that ensures an adequate and
reliable energy supply at reasonable and stable prices. To the extent
energy efficiency and renewable resources are unable to satisfy
increasing energy and capacity needs, the state must rely on clean and
efficient fossil fuel fired generation. The legislature encourages the
development of cost-effective, highly efficient, and environmentally
sound supply resources to provide reliability. The legislature finds
that federal regulation of emissions of greenhouse gases is likely to
occur in the near future. It is vital to ensure all electricity
load-serving entities internalize the significant and underrecognized
cost of greenhouse gas emissions and to reduce Washington's exposure to
costs associated with future federal regulation of these emissions.
The establishment of a policy to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases,
including an emissions performance standard for all procurement of
electricity by load-serving entities, is a logical and necessary step.
A greenhouse gases emission performance standard for new long-term
financial commitments to electrical generating resources will reduce
potential financial risk to Washington consumers for future pollution
control costs. The legislature intends to establish a greenhouse gases
emission performance standard for utility procurement of baseload
generation that is set no lower than levels achieved by a new combined-cycle natural gas turbine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Baseload generation" means electricity generation from a power
plant that is designed and intended to provide electricity at an
annualized plant capacity factor of at least sixty percent.
(2) "Combined-cycle natural gas," with respect to a power plant,
means the power plant employs a combination of one or more gas turbines
and steam turbines in which electricity is produced in the steam
turbine from otherwise lost waste heat exiting from one or more of the
gas turbines.
(3) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(4) "Consumer-owned utility" means a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, or a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, that is engaged in the
business of distributing electricity to more than one retail electric
customer in the state.
(5) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(6) "Greenhouse gases" include all of the following gases: Carbon
dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons,
and sulfur hexafluoride.
(7) "Investor-owned utility" means a company owned by investors
that meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in
distributing electricity to more than one retail electric customer in
the state.
(8) "Load-serving entity" means every consumer-owned and
investor-owned utility serving end-use customers in the state.
(9) "Long-term financial commitment" means either a new ownership
investment in baseload generation or a new or renewed contract with a
term of five or more years, which includes procurement of baseload
generation.
(10) "Output-based methodology" means a greenhouse gases emission
performance standard that is expressed in pounds of greenhouse gases
emitted per megawatt hour and factoring in the useful thermal energy
employed for purposes other than the generation of electricity.
(11) "Plant capacity factor" means the ratio of the electricity
produced during a given time period, measured in kilowatt hours, to the
electricity the unit could have produced if it had been operated at its
rated capacity during that period, expressed in kilowatt hours.
(12) "Power plant" means a facility for the generation of
electricity, and includes one or more generating units at the same
location.
(13) "Zero- or low-carbon generating resource" means an electrical
generating resource that will generate electricity while producing
emissions of greenhouse gases at a rate substantially below the
greenhouse gases emission performance standard, as determined by the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) No load-serving entity may enter into a
long-term financial commitment unless any baseload generation supplied
under the long-term financial commitment complies with the greenhouse
gases emission performance standard established by the commission,
under section 5 of this act, for an investor-owned utility, or by the
department, under section 6 of this act, for a consumer-owned utility.
(2)(a) The commission shall adopt rules to enforce the requirements
of this section for investor-owned utilities. The commission shall
adopt procedures, for all investor-owned utilities, to verify the
emissions of greenhouse gases from any baseload generation supplied
under a contract subject to the greenhouse gases emission performance
standard to ensure compliance with the standard.
(b) In determining whether a long-term financial commitment is for
baseload generation, the commission shall consider the design of the
power plant and the intended use of the power plant, as determined by
the commission based upon the electricity purchase contract, any
certification received from the department, any other permit or
certificate necessary for the operation of the power plant, and any
other matter the commission determines is relevant under the
circumstances.
(3) A long-term financial commitment entered into through a
contract approved by the commission, for electricity generated by a
zero- or low-carbon generating resource that is contracted for, on
behalf of consumers of this state on a cost-of-service basis, shall be
recoverable in rates. The commission may, after a hearing, approve an
increase from one-half to one percent in the return on investment by
the third party entering into the contract with an investor-owned
utility with respect to investment in zero- or low-carbon generation
resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department shall adopt rules for the
enforcement of this chapter with respect to a consumer-owned utility.
(2) The department may, in order to ensure compliance with the
greenhouse gases emission performance standard by consumer-owned
utilities, apply the procedures adopted by the commission to verify the
emissions of greenhouse gases from baseload generation.
(3) In determining whether a long-term financial commitment is for
baseload generation, the department shall consider the design of the
power plant and the intended use of the power plant, as determined by
the department based upon the electricity purchase contract, any
certification received from the department, any other permit for the
operation of the power plant, any procurement approval decision for the
load-serving entity, and any other matter the department determines is
relevant under the circumstances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) On or before February 1, 2008, the
commission, through a rule-making proceeding, and in consultation with
the department and the department of ecology, shall establish a
greenhouse gases emission performance standard for all baseload
generation of load-serving entities, at a rate of emissions of
greenhouse gases that is no higher than the rate of emissions of
greenhouse gases for combined-cycle natural gas baseload generation.
Enforcement of the greenhouse gases emission performance standard must
begin immediately upon the establishment of the standard. All
combined-cycle natural gas power plants that are in operation, or have
final permit decision to operate as of June 30, 2008, are deemed to be
in compliance with the greenhouse gases emission performance standard.
(2) In determining the rate of emissions of greenhouse gases for
baseload generation, the commission shall include the net emissions
resulting from the production of electricity by the baseload
generation.
(3) The commission shall establish an output-based methodology to
ensure that the calculation of emissions of greenhouse gases for
cogeneration recognizes the total usable energy output of the process,
and includes all greenhouse gases emitted by the facility in the
production of both electrical and thermal energy.
(4) In calculating the emissions of greenhouse gases by facilities
generating electricity from biomass, biogas, or landfill gas energy,
the commission shall consider net emissions from the process of
growing, processing, and generating the electricity from the fuel
source.
(5) Carbon dioxide that is injected in geological formations, so as
to prevent releases into the atmosphere, in compliance with applicable
laws, rules, and regulations may not be counted as emissions of the
power plant in determining compliance with the greenhouse gases
emission performance standard.
(6) In adopting and implementing the greenhouse gases emission
performance standard, the commission, in consultation with the
department shall consider the effects of the standard on system
reliability and overall costs to electricity customers.
(7) In developing and implementing the greenhouse gases emission
performance standard, the commission shall address long-term purchases
of electricity from unspecified sources in a manner consistent with
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) On or before June 30, 2008, the
department, at a duly noticed public hearing and in consultation with
the commission and the department of ecology, shall establish a
greenhouse gases emission performance standard for all baseload
generation of consumer-owned utilities at a rate of emissions of
greenhouse gases that is no higher than the rate of emissions of
greenhouse gases for combined-cycle natural gas baseload generation.
The greenhouse gases emission performance standard established by the
department for consumer-owned utilities must be consistent with the
standard adopted by the commission for investor-owned utilities.
Enforcement of the greenhouse gases emission performance standard must
begin immediately upon the establishment of the standard. All
combined-cycle natural gas power plants that are in operation, or that
have a final permit decision to operate as of June 30, 2008, are deemed
to be in compliance with the greenhouse gases emission performance
standard.
(2) In determining the rate of emissions of greenhouse gases for
baseload generation, the department shall include the net emissions
resulting from the production of electricity by the baseload
generation.
(3) The department shall establish an output-based methodology to
ensure that the calculation of emissions of greenhouse gases for
cogeneration recognizes the total usable energy output of the process,
and includes all greenhouse gas emitted by the facility in the
production of both electrical and thermal energy.
(4) In calculating the emissions of greenhouse gases by facilities
generating electricity from biomass, biogas, or landfill gas energy,
the department shall consider net emissions from the process of
growing, processing, and generating the electricity from the fuel
source.
(5) Carbon dioxide that is captured from the emissions of a power
plant and that is permanently disposed of in geological formations in
compliance with applicable laws, rules, and regulations, shall not be
counted as emissions from the power plant.
(6) In developing and implementing the greenhouse gases emission
performance standard, the department shall address long-term purchases
of electricity from unspecified sources in a manner consistent with
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department, in a duly noticed public
hearing and in consultation with the commission and the department of
ecology, shall reevaluate and continue, modify, or replace the
greenhouse gases emission performance standard when an enforceable
greenhouse gases emission limit is established and in operation, that
is applicable to consumer-owned utilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The commission, through a rule-making
proceeding and in consultation with the department and the department
of ecology, shall reevaluate and continue, modify, or replace the
greenhouse gases emission performance standard when an enforceable
greenhouse gases emission limit is established and in operation, that
is applicable to load-serving entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

--- END ---