BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.02.230 and 1990 c 250 s 90 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may exempt from compliance with the vessel
dealer requirements of this chapter, any person who is engaged in the
business of selling in this state at wholesale or retail, human-powered
watercraft which is: (a) Under sixteen feet in length; (b) unable to
be powered by propulsion machinery or wind propulsion as designed by
the manufacturer; and (c) not designed for use on commonly-used
navigable waters.
(2) Any person engaged in the business of selling at wholesale or
retail, exempt and nonexempt watercraft under this section shall only
be required to comply with the provisions of this chapter in regard to
the sale of nonexempt watercraft.
(3) An auction company licensed under chapter 18.11 RCW and
licensed as a motor vehicle dealer under chapter 46.70 RCW may sell at
auction all vessels that a vessel dealer is authorized to sell, so long
as the sale of vessels is incidental to the auction company's primary
source of business and the length of any vessel being sold is no
greater than twenty-five feet.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.70.011 and 2006 c 364 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Vehicle" means and includes every device capable of being
moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or
property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway,
excepting devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively
upon stationary rails or tracks.
(2) "Motor vehicle" means every vehicle which is self-propelled and
every vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from
overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails, and which is
required to be registered and titled under Title 46 RCW, Motor
Vehicles.
(3) "Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor home,
truck camper, or camping trailer that is primarily designed and used as
temporary living quarters, is either self-propelled or mounted on or
drawn by another vehicle, is transient, is not occupied as a primary
residence, and is not immobilized or permanently affixed to a mobile
home lot.
(4) "Vehicle dealer" means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, not excluded by subsection (5) of this section,
engaged in the business of buying, selling, listing, exchanging,
offering, brokering, leasing with an option to purchase, auctioning,
soliciting, or advertising the sale of new or used vehicles, or
arranging or offering or attempting to solicit or negotiate on behalf
of others, a sale, purchase, or exchange of an interest in new or used
motor vehicles, irrespective of whether the motor vehicles are owned by
that person. Vehicle dealers shall be classified as follows:
(a) A "motor vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals in new
or used motor vehicles, or both;
(b) A "mobile home and travel trailer dealer" is a vehicle dealer
that deals in mobile homes, park trailers, or travel trailers, or more
than one type of these vehicles;
(c) A "miscellaneous vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals
in motorcycles or vehicles other than motor vehicles or mobile homes
and travel trailers or any combination of such vehicles;
(d) A "recreational vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals
in travel trailers, motor homes, truck campers, or camping trailers
that are primarily designed and used as temporary living quarters, are
either self-propelled or mounted on or drawn by another vehicle, are
transient, are not occupied as a primary residence, and are not
immobilized or permanently affixed to a mobile home lot.
(5) The term "vehicle dealer" does not include, nor do the
licensing requirements of RCW 46.70.021 apply to, the following
persons, firms, associations, or corporations:
(a) Receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians, or
other persons appointed by, or acting under a judgment or order of, any
court; or
(b) Public officers while performing their official duties; or
(c) Employees of vehicle dealers who are engaged in the specific
performance of their duties as such employees; or
(d) Any person engaged in an isolated sale of a vehicle in which
that person is the registered or legal owner, or both, thereof; or
(e) Any person, firm, association, corporation, or trust, engaged
in the selling of equipment other than vehicles, subject to
registration, used for agricultural or industrial purposes; or
(f) A real estate broker licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW, or an
affiliated licensee, who, on behalf of another negotiates the purchase,
sale, lease, or exchange of a manufactured or mobile home in
conjunction with the purchase, sale, exchange, rental, or lease of the
land upon which the manufactured or mobile home is, or will be,
located; or
(g) Owners who are also operators of the special highway
construction equipment or of the highway construction equipment for
which a vehicle license and display vehicle license number plate is
required as defined in RCW 46.16.010; or
(h) Any bank, trust company, savings bank, mutual savings bank,
savings and loan association, credit union, and any parent, subsidiary,
or affiliate thereof, authorized to do business in this state under
state or federal law with respect to the sale or other disposition of
a motor vehicle owned and used in their business; or with respect to
the acquisition and sale or other disposition of a motor vehicle in
which the entity has acquired an interest as a lessor, lessee, or
secured party; or
(i) Any person who is regularly engaged in the business of
acquiring leases or installment contracts by assignment, with respect
to the acquisition and sale or other disposition of a motor vehicle in
which the person has acquired an interest as a result of the business.
(6) "Vehicle salesperson" means any person who for any form of
compensation sells, auctions, leases with an option to purchase, or
offers to sell or to so lease vehicles on behalf of a vehicle dealer.
(7) "Department" means the department of licensing, which shall
administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.
(8) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(9) "Manufacturer" means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who manufactures or
assembles new and unused vehicles or remanufactures vehicles in whole
or in part and further includes the terms:
(a) "Distributor," which means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who in whole or in part
offers for sale, sells, or distributes any new and unused vehicle to
vehicle dealers or who maintains factory representatives.
(b) "Factory branch," which means a branch office maintained by a
manufacturer for the purpose of selling or offering for sale, vehicles
to a distributor, wholesaler, or vehicle dealer, or for directing or
supervising in whole or in part factory or distributor representatives,
and further includes any sales promotion organization, whether a
person, firm, or corporation, which is engaged in promoting the sale of
new and unused vehicles in this state of a particular brand or make to
vehicle dealers.
(c) "Factory representative," which means a representative employed
by a manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch for the purpose of
making or promoting for the sale of their vehicles or for supervising
or contracting with their dealers or prospective dealers.
(10) "Established place of business" means a location meeting the
requirements of RCW 46.70.023(1) at which a vehicle dealer conducts
business in this state.
(11) "Principal place of business" means that dealer firm's
business location in the state, which place the dealer designates as
their principal place of business.
(12) "Subagency" means any place of business of a vehicle dealer
within the state, which place is physically and geographically
separated from the principal place of business of the firm or any place
of business of a vehicle dealer within the state, at which place the
firm does business using a name other than the principal name of the
firm, or both.
(13) "Temporary subagency" means a location other than the
principal place of business or subagency within the state where a
licensed vehicle dealer may secure a license to conduct the business
and is licensed for a period of time not to exceed ten days for a
specific purpose such as auto shows, shopping center promotions, tent
sales, exhibitions, or similar merchandising ventures. No more than
six temporary subagency licenses may be issued to a licensee in any
twelve-month period.
(14) "Wholesale vehicle dealer" means a vehicle dealer who buys and
sells other than at retail.
(15) "Retail vehicle dealer" means a vehicle dealer who may buy and
sell at both wholesale and retail.
(16) "Listing dealer" means a used mobile home dealer who makes
contracts with sellers who will compensate the dealer for obtaining a
willing purchaser for the seller's mobile home.
(17) "Auction" means a transaction conducted by means of exchanges
between an auctioneer and the members of the audience, constituting a
series of oral invitations for offers for the purchase of vehicles made
by the auctioneer, offers to purchase by members of the audience, and
the acceptance of the highest or most favorable offer to purchase.
(18) "Auction company" means a sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, or other legal or commercial entity licensed under chapter
18.11 RCW that only sells or offers to sell vehicles or vessels at
auction or only arranges or sponsors auctions.
(19) "Buyer's agent" means any person, firm, partnership,
association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership,
or corporation retained or employed by a consumer to arrange for or to
negotiate, or both, the purchase or lease of a new motor vehicle on
behalf of the consumer, and who is paid a fee or receives other
compensation from the consumer for its services.
(20) "New motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle that is self-propelled and is required to be registered and titled under Title 46
RCW, has not been previously titled to a retail purchaser or lessee,
and is not a "used vehicle" as defined under RCW 46.04.660.

--- END ---