BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax rate on E85 motor fuel shall be seventy-one percent of the
state's motor vehicle fuel tax rate that is in effect at the time of
sale. As used in this section, "E85 motor fuel" means an alternative
fuel that is a blend of denatured ethanol and hydrocarbon that
typically contains eighty-five percent by volume, and complies with
ASTM specification D5798-99.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---