BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington is
committed to economic development and supporting the tourism industry,
and that economic development is achieved by promoting the state and
the goods produced around the state. The legislature further finds
that tourism is encouraged providing a memorable experience and an
opportunity for visitors to take something back home with them to
remind them of this experience. There are many visitors every day to
the legislative building, including tourists, school children, and
people from around the state visiting the state capitol. These
visitors offer an opportunity for the state to showcase its products
and history. Therefore, the legislature finds that a gift center in
the legislative building would be an appropriate response to this
opportunity, and further, that such a gift center could provide a
source of revenue to help fund the oral history program and to pay for
the restoration and repurchase of historical capitol furnishings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) There is created in the legislature a
legislative gift center for the retail sale of products bearing the
state seal, Washington state souvenirs, other Washington products, and
other products as approved. Wholesale purchase of products for sale at
the legislative gift center is not subject to competitive bidding.
(2) Governance for the legislative gift center shall be under the
chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the
senate. They may designate a legislative staff member as the lead
staff person to oversee management and operation of the gift shop.
(3) The chief clerk of the house of representatives and secretary
of the senate shall consult with the department of general
administration in planning, siting, and maintaining legislative
building space for the gift center.
(4) Products bearing the "Seal of the State of Washington" as
described in Article XVIII, section 1 of the Washington state
Constitution and RCW 1.20.080, must be purchased from the secretary of
state pursuant to an agreement between the chief clerk of the house of
representatives, the secretary of the senate, and the secretary of
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The legislative gift center account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received by
the gift center from the sale of Washington state souvenirs, other
Washington products, and other products as approved shall be deposited
in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
operations and maintenance of the gift center, including the purchase
of inventory, and for other purposes as provided in this section. Only
the director of the office of legislative facilities or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) Net profits, after expenses, from the sale of Washington state
souvenirs, other Washington products, and products approved by the
legislative gift center, shall be deposited as provided in this
subsection:
(a) Twenty-five percent in the legislative oral history account in
chapter 44.04 RCW (created in Substitute House Bill No. 1741);
(b) Twenty-five percent in the oral history, state library, and
archives account created in RCW 43.07.380; and
(c) Fifty percent in the capitol furnishings preservation committee
account created in RCW 27.48.040.
(3) Net profits, after expenses, from the sale of items bearing the
state seal by the legislative gift center shall be deposited in the
capitol furnishings preservation committee account created in RCW
27.48.040. A full accounting thereof shall be provided to the
secretary of state.
(4) The legislative gift center may designate special sales, the
proceeds of which shall go to an account specified at the time of
designation.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.04.100 and 1988 c 120 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
All fees, penalties, and damages received under this chapter shall
be paid to the secretary of state and with the exception of the filing
fee authorized in RCW 43.04.040(2) shall be deposited by the secretary
into the capitol ((building construction account in the state treasury,
for use in the historical restoration and completion of the legislative
building)) furnishings preservation committee account created in RCW
27.48.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

--- END ---