BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4336 and 2005 c 150 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
those amounts received for:
(a) Slaughtering cattle, but only if the taxpayer sells the
resulting slaughtered cattle at wholesale and not at retail;
(b) Breaking or processing perishable beef products, but only if
the perishable beef products are derived from cattle slaughtered by the
taxpayer and sold at wholesale only and not at retail;
(c) Wholesale sales of perishable beef products derived from cattle
slaughtered by the taxpayer;
(d) Processing nonperishable beef products, but only if the
products are derived from cattle slaughtered by the taxpayer and sold
at wholesale only and not at retail; and
(e) Wholesale sales of nonperishable beef products derived from
cattle slaughtered by the taxpayer.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "beef products" means the
carcass, parts of carcass, meat, and meat by-products, derived
exclusively from cattle and containing no other ingredients.
(3) The deduction allowed under this section is allowed only for
tax liability incurred after March 31, 2004, and until the first day of
the month following the date on which the bans on the importation of
beef and beef products from the United States of America by Japan,
Mexico, and the Republic of South Korea have all been lifted.
(4) The department must provide notice, on the department's web
site, of the date on which this deduction is no longer available. The
notice required by this section does not affect the availability of the
deduction under this section.
(5) This section expires December 31, ((2007)) 2012.

--- END ---