BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.525
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2007, the construction specifications for each
newly constructed or substantially renovated public school in
Washington shall include, but is not limited to: Built-in capacity to
provide shelter, food, water, sewage, fire protection information,
evacuation plans, and utility information to people in the event of an
emergency. The facilities shall be made available to members of the
public during states of emergency and a system must be in place to
alert members of the public that such facilities are available to the
general public during such states of emergency.

--- END ---