BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Subject to the availability of funds
appropriated for this specific purpose, the department of early
learning shall implement an early learning and child care grant program
specifically for programs operated and managed by institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016. The department shall
select recipients for grant moneys which shall be used solely to
maintain staff and services at the selected early learning and child
care centers.
(2) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---