BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
MATHEMATICS AND SCIENCE STANDARDS AND CURRICULUM. (1) The
activities in this section revise and strengthen the state learning
standards that implement the goals of RCW 28A.150.210, known as the
essential academic learning requirements, and improve alignment of
school district curriculum to the standards.
(2) The state board of education shall be assisted in its work
under subsections (3) and (5) of this section by: (a) An expert
national consultant in each of mathematics and science retained by the
state board; and (b) the mathematics and science advisory panels
created under section 2 of this act, as appropriate, which shall
provide review and formal comment on proposed recommendations to the
superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education
on new revised standards and curricula.
(3) By September 30, 2007, the state board of education shall
recommend to the superintendent of public instruction revised essential
academic learning requirements and grade level expectations in
mathematics. The recommendations shall be based on:
(a) Considerations of clarity, rigor, content, depth, coherence
from grade to grade, specificity, accessibility, and measurability;
(b) Study of:
(i) Standards used in countries whose students demonstrate high
performance on the trends in international mathematics and science
study and the programme for international student assessment;
(ii) College readiness standards;
(iii) The national council of teachers of mathematics focal points
and the national assessment of educational progress content frameworks;
and
(iv) Standards used by three to five other states, including
California, and the nation of Singapore; and
(c) Consideration of information presented during public comment
periods.
(4) By January 31, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction
shall revise the essential academic learning requirements and the grade
level expectations for mathematics and present the revised standards to
the state board of education and the education committees of the senate
and the house of representatives as required by RCW 28A.655.070(4).
The superintendent shall adopt the revised essential academic learning
requirements and grade level expectations unless otherwise directed by
the legislature during the 2008 legislative session.
(5) By June 30, 2008, the state board of education shall recommend
to the superintendent of public instruction revised essential academic
learning requirements and grade level expectations in science. The
recommendations shall be based on:
(a) Considerations of clarity, rigor, content, depth, coherence
from grade to grade, specificity, accessibility, and measurability;
(b) Study of standards used by three to five other states and in
countries whose students demonstrate high performance on the trends in
international mathematics and science study and the programme for
international student assessment; and
(c) Consideration of information presented during public comment
periods.
(6) By December 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction
shall revise the essential academic learning requirements and the grade
level expectations for science and present the revised standards to the
state board of education and the education committees of the senate and
the house of representatives as required by RCW 28A.655.070(4). The
superintendent shall adopt the revised essential academic learning
requirements and grade level expectations unless otherwise directed by
the legislature during the 2009 legislative session.
(7)(a) By May 15, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction
shall present to the state board of education recommendations for no
more than three basic mathematics curricula each for elementary,
middle, and high school grade spans.
(b) By June 30, 2008, the state board of education shall provide
official comment and recommendations to the superintendent of public
instruction regarding the recommended mathematics curricula. The
superintendent of public instruction shall make any changes based on
the comment and recommendations from the state board of education and
adopt the recommended curricula.
(c) By May 15, 2009, the superintendent of public instruction shall
present to the state board of education recommendations for no more
than three basic science curricula each for elementary, middle, and
high school grade spans.
(d) By June 30, 2009, the state board of education shall provide
official comment and recommendations to the superintendent of public
instruction regarding the recommended science curricula. The
superintendent of public instruction shall make any changes based on
the comment and recommendations from the state board of education and
adopt the recommended curricula.
(e) In selecting the recommended curricula under this subsection
(7), the superintendent of public instruction shall provide information
to the mathematics and science advisory panels created under section 2
of this act, as appropriate, and seek the advice of the appropriate
panel regarding the curricula that shall be included in the
recommendations.
(f) The recommended curricula under this subsection (7) shall align
with the revised essential academic learning requirements and grade
level expectations. In addition to the recommended basic curricula,
appropriate diagnostic and supplemental materials shall be identified
as necessary to support each curricula.
(g) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose and availability
of the curricula, at least one of the curricula in each grade span and
in each of mathematics and science shall be available to schools and
parents online at no cost to the school or parent.
(8) By December 1, 2007, the state board of education shall revise
the high school graduation requirements under RCW 28A.230.090 to
include a minimum of three credits of mathematics, one of which may be
a career and technical course equivalent in mathematics, and prescribe
the mathematics content in the three required credits.
(9) Nothing in this section requires a school district to use one
of the recommended curricula under subsection (7) of this section.
However, the statewide accountability plan adopted by the state board
of education under RCW 28A.305.130 shall recommend conditions under
which school districts should be required to use one of the recommended
curricula. The plan shall also describe the conditions for exception
to the curriculum requirement, such as the use of integrated academic
and career and technical education curriculum. Required use of the
recommended curricula as an intervention strategy must be authorized by
the legislature as required by RCW 28A.305.130(4)(e) before
implementation.
(10) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose and conditions
established under this subsection, school districts that adopt one or
more of the recommended curricula after the curricula have been adopted
shall be reimbursed by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction for the cost of purchasing the curricula. The
superintendent of public instruction shall establish conditions for
school districts to be eligible for curriculum reimbursement funds,
including a district implementation plan, a teacher professional
development plan, and other evidence that the district is able to
maximize the instructional benefit of the recommended curricula.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
ADVISORY PANELS. (1) The state board of education shall appoint a
mathematics advisory panel and a science advisory panel to advise the
board regarding essential academic learning requirements, grade level
expectations, and recommended curricula in mathematics and science and
to monitor implementation of these activities. In conducting their
work, the panels shall provide objective reviews of materials and
information provided by any expert national consultants retained by the
board and shall provide a public and transparent forum for
consideration of mathematics and science learning standards and
curricula.
(2) Each panel shall include no more than sixteen members with
representation from individuals from academia in mathematics and
science-related fields, individuals from business and industry in
mathematics and science-related fields, mathematics and science
educators, parents, and other individuals who could contribute to the
work of the panel based on their experiences.
(3) Each member of each panel shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.220 and reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. School districts shall be reimbursed
for the cost of substitutes for the mathematics and science educators
on the panels as required under RCW 28A.300.035. Members of the panels
who are employed by a public institution of higher education shall be
provided sufficient time away from their regular duties, without loss
of benefits or privileges, to fulfill the responsibilities of being a
panel member.
(4) Panel members shall not have conflicts of interest with regard
to association with any publisher, distributor, or provider of
curriculum, assessment, or test materials and services purchased by or
contracted through the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, educational service districts, or school districts.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
AFTER-SCHOOL MATHEMATICS SUPPORT PROGRAM. (1) The after-school
mathematics support program is created to study the effects of
intentional, skilled mathematics support included as part of an
existing after-school activity program.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide grants to selected community-based, nonprofit organizations
that provide after-school programs and include support for students to
learn mathematics.
(3) Grant applicants must demonstrate the capacity to provide
assistance in mathematics learning in the following ways:
(a) Identifying the mathematics content and instructional skill of
the staff or volunteers assisting students;
(b) Identifying proposed learning strategies to be used, which
could include computer-based instructional and skill practice programs
and tutoring by adults or other students;
(c) Articulating the plan for connection with school mathematics
teachers to coordinate student assistance; and
(d) Articulating the plan for assessing student and program
success.
(4) Priority will be given to applicants that propose programs to
serve middle school and junior high school students.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
evaluate program outcomes and report to the governor and the education
committees of the legislature on the outcomes of the grants and make
recommendations related to program continuation, program modification,
and issues related to program sustainability and possible program
expansion. An interim report is due November 1, 2008. The final
report is due December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
MATHEMATICS AND SCIENCE INSTRUCTIONAL COACH PROGRAM. (1) A
mathematics and science instructional coach program is authorized,
which shall consist of a coach development institute, coaching
seminars, coaching activities in schools, and program evaluation.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a mathematics and science instructional coach program that
includes an initial coach development experience for new coaches
provided through an institute setting, coaching support seminars, and
additional coach development services. The office shall draw upon the
experiences of coaches in federally supported elementary literacy
programs and other successful programs, research and policy briefs on
adult professional development, and research that specifically
addresses the instructional environments of middle, junior high, and
high schools as well as the unique aspects of the fields of mathematics
and science.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
design the application process and select the program participants.
(4) Schools and school districts participating in the program shall
carefully select the individuals to perform the role of mathematics or
science instructional coach. Characteristics to be considered for a
successful coach include:
(a) Expertise in content area;
(b) Expertise in various instructional methodologies and
personalizing learning;
(c) Personal skills that include skilled listening, questioning,
trust-building, and problem-solving;
(d) Understanding and appreciation for the differences in adult
learners and student learners; and
(e) Capacity for strategic planning and quality program
implementation.
(5) The role of the mathematics or science instructional coach is
focused on supporting teachers as they apply knowledge, develop skills,
polish techniques, and deepen their understanding of content and
instructional practices. This work takes a number of forms including:
Individualized professional development, department-wide and school-wide professional development, guidance in student data interpretation,
and using assessment to guide instruction. Each coach shall be
assigned to two schools as part of the program.
(6) Program participants have the following responsibilities:
(a) Mathematics and science coaches shall participate in the coach
development institute as well as in coaching support seminars that take
place throughout the school year, practice coaching activities as
guided by those articulated in the role of the coach in subsection (5)
of this section, collect data, and participate in program evaluation
activities as requested by the institute pursuant to subsection (7) of
this section.
(b) School and district administrators in districts in which the
mathematics and science coaches are practicing shall participate in
program evaluation activities.
(7)(a) The Washington state institute for public policy shall
conduct an evaluation of the mathematics and science instructional
coach program in this section. Data shall be collected through various
instruments including surveys, program and activity reports, student
performance measures, observations, interviews, and other processes.
Findings shall include an evaluation of the coach development
institute, coaching support seminars, and other coach support
activities; recommendations with regard to the characteristics required
of the coaches; identification of changes in teacher instruction
related to coaching activities; and identification of the satisfaction
level with coaching activities as experienced by classroom teachers and
administrators.
(b) The institute for public policy shall report its findings to
the governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
and the education and fiscal committees of the legislature. An interim
report is due November 1, 2008. The final report is due December 1,
2009.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.660.005 and 2001 c 158 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds and declares:
(((1))) (a) Teacher qualifications and effectiveness are the most
important influences on student learning in schools((.));
(((2))) (b) Preparation of individuals to become well-qualified,
effective teachers must be high quality((.));
(((3))) (c) Teachers who complete high-quality alternative route
programs with intensive field-based experience, adequate coursework,
and strong mentorship do as well or better than teachers who complete
traditional preparation programs((.));
(((4))) (d) High-quality alternative route programs can provide
more flexibility and expedience for individuals to transition from
their current career to teaching((.));
(((5))) (e) High-quality alternative route programs can help school
districts fill subject matter shortage areas and areas with shortages
due to geographic location((.));
(((6))) (f) Regardless of route, all candidates for residency
teacher certification must meet the high standards required by the
state; and
(g) Teachers need an adequate background in subject matter content
if they are to teach it well, and should hold full, appropriate
credentials in those subject areas.
(2) The legislature recognizes widespread concerns about the
potential for teacher shortages and finds that classified instructional
staff in public schools, current certificated staff, and unemployed
certificate holders represent a great untapped resource for recruiting
((the)) more teachers ((of the future)) in critical shortage areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.660
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program
is created. Participation is limited to paraeducators without a
college degree who have at least three years of classroom experience.
It is anticipated that candidates enrolled in this program will
complete their associate of arts degree in a direct transfer agreement
mathematics education program at a community and technical college in
two years or less and become eligible for a mathematics endorsement and
special education endorsement or a mathematics endorsement and an
English as a second language endorsement via route one in the
alternative routes to teacher certification program provided in this
chapter.
(2) Entry requirements for candidates include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
three years of successful student interaction and leadership as a
classified instructional employee; and
(b) Acceptance into a direct transfer agreement mathematics
education program at a community and technical college.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.660
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The retooling to teach mathematics and science conditional
scholarship program is created. Participation is limited to current K-12 teachers and individuals having an elementary education certificate
but who are not employed in positions requiring an elementary education
certificate. It is anticipated that candidates enrolled in this
program will complete the requirements for a mathematics or science
endorsement, or both, in two years or less.
(2) Entry requirements for candidates include:
(a) Current K-12 teachers shall pursue a middle level mathematics
or science, or secondary mathematics or science endorsement.
(b) Individuals having an elementary education certificate but who
are not employed in positions requiring an elementary education
certificate shall pursue an endorsement in middle level mathematics or
science only.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.660.050 and 2004 c 23 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((alternative route)) conditional scholarship programs ((is))
in this chapter are created under the following guidelines:
(1) The programs shall be administered by the higher education
coordinating board. In administering the programs, the higher
education coordinating board has the following powers and duties:
(a) To adopt necessary rules and develop guidelines to administer
the programs;
(b) To collect and manage repayments from participants who do not
meet their service obligations; and
(c) To accept grants and donations from public and private sources
for the programs.
(2) Requirements for participation in the ((alternative route))
conditional scholarship programs are as provided in this subsection
(2).
(a) The alternative route conditional scholarship program is
limited to interns of the partnership grant programs under RCW
28A.660.040. In order to receive conditional scholarship awards,
recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative
certification routes through the partnership grant program;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of
the alternative route certification program and receipt of a residency
teaching certificate; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed eight thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees,
and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation
for the alternative route certification program in which the recipient
is enrolled. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate
of resident undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state
universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(b) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program
is limited to qualified paraeducators as provided by section 6 of this
act. In order to receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients
shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment in a direct transfer
agreement mathematics education program at a community and technical
college for no more than two years and attain an associate of arts
degree;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of an
associate of arts degree. This progress requirement is a condition for
eligibility into a route one program of the alternative routes to
teacher certification program for a mathematics endorsement and special
education endorsement or a mathematics endorsement and an English as a
second language endorsement; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed four thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees, and
educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation for
the alternative route certification program in which the recipient is
enrolled. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate of
tuition and fee increases at the state community and technical
colleges.
(c) The retooling to teach mathematics and science conditional
scholarship program is limited to current K-12 teachers and individuals
having an elementary education certificate but who are not employed in
positions requiring an elementary education certificate as provided by
section 7 of this act. In order to receive conditional scholarship
awards:
(i) Individuals currently employed as teachers shall pursue a
middle level mathematics or science, or secondary mathematics or
science endorsement; or
(ii) Individuals who are certificated with an elementary education
endorsement, but not employed in positions requiring an elementary
education certificate, shall pursue an endorsement in middle level
mathematics or science, or both; and
(iii) Individuals shall use one of the pathways to endorsement
processes to receive a mathematics or science endorsement, or both,
which shall include passing a mathematics or science endorsement test,
or both tests, plus observation and completing applicable coursework to
attain the proper endorsement; and
(iv) Individuals shall receive no more than the annual amount of
the scholarship, not to exceed three thousand dollars, for the cost of
tuition, test fees, and educational expenses, including books,
supplies, and transportation for the endorsement pathway being pursued.
(3) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
select ((interns)) individuals to receive conditional scholarships.
(((3) In order to receive conditional scholarship awards,
recipients shall be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative
certification routes through the partnership grant program, as provided
in RCW 28A.660.040. Recipients must continue to make satisfactory
progress towards completion of the alternative route certification
program and receipt of a residency teaching certificate.))
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, a conditional scholarship is
a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part in exchange for service as
a certificated teacher employed in a Washington state K-12 public
school. The state shall forgive one year of loan obligation for every
two years a recipient teaches in a public school. Recipients ((that))
who fail to continue a course of study leading to residency teacher
certification or cease to teach in a public school in the state of
Washington in their endorsement area are required to repay the
remaining loan principal with interest.
(5) Recipients who fail to fulfill the required teaching obligation
are required to repay the remaining loan principal with interest and
any other applicable fees. The higher education coordinating board
shall adopt rules to define the terms for repayment, including
applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.
(6) ((To the extent funds are appropriated for this specific
purpose, the annual amount of the scholarship is the annual cost of
tuition; fees; and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and
transportation for the alternative route certification program in which
the recipient is enrolled, not to exceed eight thousand dollars. The
board may adjust the annual award by the average rate of resident
undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state universities as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(7))) The higher education coordinating board may deposit all
appropriations, collections, and any other funds received for the
program in this chapter in the ((student loan)) future teachers
conditional scholarship account authorized in RCW ((28B.102.060))
28B.102.080.

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.102.080 and 2004 c 58 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The future teachers conditional scholarship account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures of funds from the account. The account is
not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW except for
moneys used for program administration.
(2) The board shall deposit in the account all moneys received for
the future teachers conditional scholarship and loan repayment program
and for conditional loan programs under chapter 28A.660 RCW. The
account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds appropriated by
the legislature for the future teachers conditional scholarship and
loan repayment program, private contributions to the program, ((and))
receipts from participant repayments from the future teachers
conditional scholarship and loan repayment program, and conditional
loan programs established under chapter 28A.660 RCW. Beginning July 1,
2004, the board shall also deposit into the account: (a) All funds
from the institution of higher education loan account that are
traceable to any conditional scholarship program for teachers or
prospective teachers established by the legislature before June 10,
2004; and (b) all amounts repaid by individuals under any such program.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for
conditional loans and loan repayments to participants in the future
teachers conditional scholarship and loan repayment program established
by this chapter, conditional scholarships for participants in programs
established in chapter 28A.660 RCW, and costs associated with program
administration by the board.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2008, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the council of presidents, the higher education
coordinating board, and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, under the leadership of the transition math project and in
collaboration with representatives of public two and four-year
institutions of higher education, shall jointly revise the Washington
mathematics placement test to serve as a common college readiness test
for all two and four-year institutions of higher education.
(2) The revised mathematics college readiness test shall be
implemented by all public two and four-year institutions of higher
education by September 1, 2009. All public two and four-year
institutions of higher education must use a common performance standard
on the mathematics placement test for purposes of determining college
readiness in mathematics. The performance standard must be publicized
to all high schools in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funding appropriated for this purpose and beginning
in the fall of 2009, school districts shall provide all high school
students enrolled in the district the option of taking the mathematics
college readiness test developed under section 10 of this act once at
no cost to the students. Districts shall encourage, but not require,
students to take the test in their junior or senior year of high
school.
(2) Subject to funding appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall reimburse each district
for the costs incurred by the district in providing students the
opportunity to take the mathematics placement test.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Beginning September 1, 2007, through
December 1, 2008, the state board of education shall provide a status
report at the beginning of each calendar quarter on the activities and
progress in completing the requirements under section 1 of this act.
The report shall be provided to the governor and the members of the
education committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---