BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
SCHOOL DISTRICT LEADERSHIP ACADEMY. (1) Research supports the
value of quality school and school district leadership. Effective
leadership is critical to improving student learning and transforming
underperforming schools and school districts into world-class learning
centers.
(2) A public-private partnership is established to develop, pilot,
and implement the Washington state leadership academy to focus on the
development and enhancement of personal leadership characteristics and
the teaching of effective practices and skills demonstrated by school
and district administrators who are successful managers and
instructional leaders. It is the goal of the academy to provide state-of-the-art programs and services across the state.
(3) Academy partners include the state superintendent and principal
professional associations, private nonprofit foundations, institutions
of higher education with approved educator preparation programs, the
professional educator standards board, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, educational service districts, the state school
business officers' association, and other entities identified by the
partners. The partners shall designate an independent organization to
act as the fiscal agent for the academy and shall establish a board of
directors to oversee and direct the academy's finances, services, and
programs. The academy shall be supported by a national research
institution with demonstrated expertise in educational leadership.
(4) Initial development of academy course content and activities
shall be supported by private funds. Initial tasks of the academy are
to:
(a) Finalize a comprehensive design of the academy and the
development of the curriculum frameworks for a comprehensive leadership
development program that includes coursework, practicum, mentoring, and
evaluation components;
(b) Develop curriculum for individual leadership topics;
(c) Pilot the curriculum and all program components; and
(d) Modify the comprehensive design, curriculum coursework,
practicum, and mentoring programs based on the research results gained
from pilot activities.
(5) The board of directors shall report semiannually to the
superintendent of public instruction on the financial contributions
provided by foundations and other organizations to support the work of
the academy. The board of directors shall report by December 31st each
year to the superintendent of public instruction on the programs and
services provided, numbers of participants in the various academy
activities, evaluation activities regarding program and participant
outcomes, and plans for the academy's future development.
(6) The board of directors shall identify possible areas to better
coordinate with and make recommendations for changes in superintendent
and principal preparation programs, the administrator licensure system,
and continuing education requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR STANDARDS BOARD
DUTIES. (1) The purpose of the duties in this section for the
professional educator standards board is to take the next steps in
developing quality teaching knowledge and skill in the state's teaching
ranks. The duties build upon the current teacher development
foundation that requires demonstrated teaching competency, requires
evidence of positive impact on student learning, and focuses on
furthering state kindergarten through twelfth grade learning goals
through instructional skill alignment.
(2) The professional educator standards board shall:
(a) By December 2007:
(i) Adopt new knowledge and skill standards that prepare all
individuals seeking residency teacher certification to integrate
mathematics across all content areas; and
(ii) Adopt new certification requirements for individuals seeking
residency teacher certification as elementary education or middle level
and secondary mathematics teachers to assure adequate content and
instructional strategy preparation to teach to the kindergarten through
twelfth grades state mathematics and science standards;
(b) By June 2009:
(i) Set performance standards and develop, pilot, and implement a
uniform and externally administered professional-level certification
assessment based on demonstrated teaching skill. In the development of
this assessment, consideration shall be given to changes in
professional certification program components such as the culminating
seminar;
(ii) Summarize its work in the development of the assessment in
(b)(i) of this subsection in the annual reports required by RCW
28A.410.240; and
(iii) Review and revise the standards for higher education teacher
preparation programs to incorporate updated practices to enhance
teacher success in a knowledge and skill-based performance system that
emphasizes strong content, applied learning, and personal, meaningful
connections with students; and
(c) By December 2009, review and revise as needed teacher
preparation standards and requirements to focus on diversity in
cultural knowledge and respect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 3 through 7 of this act represent
core components of a comprehensive initiative to improve mathematics,
science, and targeted secondary reading education and achievement
through educator professional development and support. The initiative
focuses on:
(1) A regional delivery system to provide professional development
and support to schools and school districts through the educational
service districts;
(2) A tiered support system that provides resources, services,
assistance, and intervention for schools and districts, depending on
their levels of need;
(3) Leveraging existing public and private resources and district-initiated activities; and
(4) Accountability through outcome-oriented performance agreements,
contracts, reporting, and data collection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The mathematics, science, and targeted
secondary reading improvement initiative shall provide the capacity and
resources for the superintendent of public instruction, educational
service districts, school districts, and schools to conduct a broad
range of activities, depending on the level of need and priority of the
school or district. The focus of the initiative is on building and
enhancing the quality of mathematics and science instruction.
(2) Activities supported by the initiative include, but are not
limited to:
(a) Targeted professional development in content knowledge,
content-specific pedagogy, differentiated instruction, effective
teaching strategies, learning modules, and mathematics and science
standards and curriculum;
(b) Use and analysis of diagnostic assessments and other data on
student achievement to improve instruction;
(c) Curriculum alignment and development or purchase of
supplemental materials;
(d) Integration of technology; and
(e) Mentors and instructional coaches.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In support of the mathematics, science, and
targeted secondary reading improvement initiative, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall:
(1) Create a partnership with the educational service districts to
develop and deliver professional development learning opportunities for
educators that fulfill the goals and address the specific targeted
activities described in this section. The partnership shall:
(a) Support school districts by providing professional development
leadership, courses, and consultation services to school districts in
their implementation of the professional development activities
described in sections 3 through 7 of this act; and
(b) Support one another in the delivery of state-level and
regional-level professional development activities such as state
conferences and regional accountability institutes;
(2) Enter into a performance agreement with each educational
service district to clearly articulate partner responsibilities and
assure fidelity for the delivery of professional development
initiatives including job-embedded practices. Components of such
performance agreements shall include:
(a) Participation in the development of various professional
development workshops, programs, and activities;
(b) Characteristics and qualifications of professional development
staff supported by the program;
(c) Methods to ensure consistent delivery of professional
development services; and
(d) Reporting responsibilities related to services provided,
program participation, outcomes, and recommendations for service
improvement;
(3) In collaboration with the educational service districts,
develop a methodology for distributing funds appropriated for
activities under the tiered support system in section 6 of this act
among the educational service districts and among the three tiers of
support. The methodology shall take into account the anticipated
demand and need for services by school districts in each tier and the
size of those school districts. The methodology shall also reflect a
higher priority and greater need for support and resources for schools
and districts in tier three;
(4) Develop guidelines for educational service districts in
administering grants, developing district improvement agreements, and
implementing intensive intervention and support services. The
guidelines shall not require all educational service districts to
follow the same procedures in all circumstances, but shall ensure
general equity for school districts across the state in how the
districts may access resources under the initiative and the activities
and services that are provided by the educational service districts;
(5) Identify the schools and school districts eligible for tier
three intensive intervention and support, based on low student
performance in mathematics and science. The superintendent shall
consider whether the school has the capacity to feasibly integrate
additional resources with any existing state or federal improvement
funds. To the maximum extent possible, the identification of and the
intensive intervention services provided to tier three schools and
districts shall align with the accountability plan developed by the
state board of education; and
(6) In collaboration with the educational service districts,
develop guidelines and a common reporting format for collecting data
and information about the activities and outcomes under the initiative
and designate one or more common diagnostic assessments for districts
to use in reporting and monitoring student achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Resources for the mathematics, science, and
targeted secondary reading improvement initiative shall be provided
through the office of the superintendent of public instruction and
educational service districts to schools and school districts based on
a tiered support system. The legislature's intent is that resources
from the mathematics, science, and targeted secondary reading
improvement initiative are provided over a four-year period.
(1) Tier one: Initiative grants. School districts may apply on a
competitive basis to their educational service district for grants to
support activities to improve mathematics, science, and secondary
reading instruction. A district may contract with the educational
service district for services, use the grant for district-initiated
activities, or both. Tier one districts must demonstrate how district
resources and resources from public-private partnerships shall be used
to leverage the grant funds. Tier one grant recipients must identify
measurable outcomes from the activities supported by the grant and
report results in a prescribed format, including student achievement
data from designated diagnostic assessments.
(2) Tier two: Improvement agreements. School districts may work
with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and
educational service districts to plan, develop, and implement a
mathematics, science, and targeted secondary reading improvement
initiative tailored to the needs of the district. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the educational service district,
and the school district shall develop a joint agreement that identifies
the services and support to be provided by the educational service
district, the activities to be conducted by the district using
improvement agreement funds, and the expected measurable outcomes from
the activities. Recipients of funds under a tier two improvement
agreement must report results of the activities supported by the
agreement in a prescribed format, including student achievement data
from designated diagnostic assessments.
(3) Tier three: Intensive intervention and support. School
districts and schools with low student performance in mathematics,
science, and/or secondary reading as identified by the superintendent
of public instruction under section 5 of this act are eligible for
intensive intervention and support coordinated by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and/or the educational service
district. School districts or individual schools may receive tier
three support. Recipients of funds under tier three support must:
(a) Participate in an audit of the mathematics, science, and
secondary reading instructional delivery system, including policies and
practices, curriculum alignment, teacher pedagogy and content
knowledge, and assessment of overall climate and practice compared to
best practices;
(b) Develop, with assistance from the educational service district,
a school or district intervention plan that focuses on areas of highest
need and provides intensive professional development in those areas;
(c) Participate in professional development using the services of
a technical assistance team that includes a trained and experienced
facilitator and mathematics, science, or reading instructional coaches
to provide job-embedded professional development; and
(d) Identify measurable outcomes from the activities supported by
the grant and report results in a prescribed format, including student
achievement data from designated diagnostic assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Educational service districts shall
coordinate with the superintendent of public instruction to develop and
maintain the capacity to provide administrative, professional
development, technical assistance, and intervention services under the
mathematics, science, and targeted secondary reading improvement
initiative to support school districts as required under section 6 of
this act, including:
(a) Administering, reviewing, and monitoring grants for tier one
grant recipients and providing contracted services;
(b) Developing, administering, and monitoring tier two improvement
agreements and providing support and services under the terms of the
agreements; and
(c) Coordinating and providing the intensive intervention and
support for tier three schools and districts, including the
instructional audit, intervention plan, and intervention team.
(2) Educational service districts shall also:
(a) Develop public-private partnerships and seek external grants
and funds to leverage the state resources provided to support the
mathematics and science improvement initiative;
(b) Collect, compile, and disseminate data and information about
the activities and outcomes under the initiative, including student
achievement data from designated diagnostic assessments; and
(c) Develop appropriate reporting and monitoring procedures to
ensure accountability for the use of funds distributed to school
districts through the tiered support system and for the achievement of
desired outcomes.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.310.350 and 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
The basic core services and cost upon which educational service
districts are budgeted shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(1) Educational service district administration and facilities such
as office space, maintenance and utilities;
(2) Cooperative administrative services such as assistance in
carrying out procedures to abolish sex and race bias in school
programs, fiscal services, grants management services, special
education services and transportation services;
(3) Personnel services such as certification/registration services;
(4) Learning resource services such as audio visual aids;
(5) Cooperative curriculum services such as health promotion and
health education services, in-service training, workshops and
assessment; ((and))
(6) Professional development services identified by statute or the
omnibus appropriations act; and
(7) Special needs of local education agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 28A.300.350 (Excellence in mathematics
training program) and 1999 c 347 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 3 through 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 28A.415 RCW under the subchapter heading "mathematics,
science, and targeted secondary reading improvement initiative."

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.415.200 and 1989 c 146 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that it is important to have a teaching force
that reflects the rich diversity of the students served in the public
schools. A diverse and culturally competent teaching force provides a
unique social, emotional, and academic learning environment for a
diverse student body. The legislature further finds that certain
groups, as characterized by ethnic background, are traditionally
underrepresented in the teaching profession in the state of Washington
and that the ethnic diversity of the student population in the state of
Washington is increasing. ((The legislature intends to increase the
number of people from underrepresented groups entering our teaching
force.)) The legislature further finds that Washington lacks a
systemic and strategic recruitment approach to increasing diversity
among educators. Additional steps must be taken to increase the number
of diverse high school students who seek to enter the teaching
profession, especially in teacher shortage areas and among
multilingual, multicultural students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The recruiting diverse Washington teachers program is
established to recruit and provide training and support for diverse
high school students to enter the teaching profession, especially in
teacher shortage areas and among multilingual, multicultural students.
The program shall be administered by the professional educator
standards board.
(2) The program shall consist of the following components:
(a) Targeted recruitment of diverse students, especially
multilingual, multicultural students in grades nine through twelve
through outreach and communication strategies. The focus of
recruitment efforts shall be on encouraging students to consider and
explore becoming future teachers in mathematics, science, bilingual
education, special education, and English as a second language;
(b) A curriculum that provides future teachers with opportunities
to observe classroom instruction at all grade levels; includes
preteaching internships at all grade levels with a focus on shortage
areas; and covers such topics as lesson planning, learning styles,
student learning data and information, the achievement gap, cultural
competency, and education policy;
(c) Academic and community support services for students to help
them overcome possible barriers to becoming future teachers, such as
supplemental tutoring; advising on college readiness, applications, and
financial aid processes; and mentoring; and
(d) Future teacher camps held on college campuses where students
can attend workshops and interact with college faculty and current
teachers.
(3) As part of its administration of the program, the professional
educator standards board shall:
(a) Develop the curriculum and program guidelines in consultation
with an advisory group of teachers, representatives of teacher
preparation programs, teacher candidates, students, and representatives
of diverse communities;
(b) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, allocate grant
funds through a competitive process to partnerships of high schools,
teacher preparation programs, and community-based organizations to
design and deliver programs that include the components under
subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) Conduct an evaluation of the effectiveness of current
strategies and programs for recruiting diverse teachers, especially
multilingual, multicultural teachers, in Washington and in other
states. The board shall use the findings from the evaluation to revise
the recruiting diverse Washington teachers program as necessary and
make other recommendations to teacher preparation programs or the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RCW 28A.415.205 (Minority teacher
recruitment program) and 2005 c 497 s 211, 1991 c 238 s 75, & 1989 c
146 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

--- END ---