BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.14.005 and 1995 c 375 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds:
(1) That in many of Washington's urban centers there is
insufficient availability of desirable and convenient residential
units, including affordable housing units, to meet the needs of a
growing number of the public who would live in these urban centers if
these desirable, convenient, attractive, affordable, and livable places
to live were available;
(2) That the development of additional and desirable residential
units, including affordable housing units, in these urban centers that
will attract and maintain a significant increase in the number of
permanent residents in these areas will help to alleviate the
detrimental conditions and social liability that tend to exist in the
absence of a viable mixed income residential population and will help
to achieve the planning goals mandated by the growth management act
under RCW 36.70A.020; and
(3) That planning solutions to solve the problems of urban sprawl
often lack incentive and implementation techniques needed to encourage
residential redevelopment in those urban centers lacking a sufficient
variety of residential opportunities, and it is in the public interest
and will benefit, provide, and promote the public health, safety, and
welfare to stimulate new or enhanced residential opportunities,
including affordable housing opportunities, within urban centers
through a tax incentive as provided by this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.14.007 and 1995 c 375 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the purpose of this chapter to encourage increased
residential opportunities, including affordable housing opportunities,
in cities that are required to plan or choose to plan under the growth
management act within urban centers where the ((legislative body))
governing authority of the affected city has found there is
insufficient housing opportunities, including affordable housing
opportunities. It is further the purpose of this chapter to stimulate
the construction of new multifamily housing and the rehabilitation of
existing vacant and underutilized buildings for multifamily housing in
urban centers having insufficient housing opportunities that will
increase and improve residential opportunities, including affordable
housing opportunities, within these urban centers. To achieve these
purposes, this chapter provides for special valuations in residentially
deficient urban centers for eligible improvements associated with
multiunit housing ((in residentially deficient urban centers)), which
includes affordable housing.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.14.010 and 2002 c 146 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "City" means either (a) a city or town with a population of at
least ((thirty)) fifteen thousand or (b) the largest city or town, if
there is no city or town with a population of at least ((thirty))
fifteen thousand, located in a county planning under the growth
management act.
(2) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that is rented
by a person or household whose monthly housing costs, including
utilities other than telephone, do not exceed thirty percent of the
household's monthly income. For the purposes of housing intended for
owner occupancy, "affordable housing" means residential housing that is
within the means of low or moderate-income households.
(3) "Household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons
living together.
(4) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below
eighty percent of the median family income adjusted for family size,
for the county where the project is located, as reported by the United
States department of housing and urban development. For cities located
in high-cost areas, "low-income household" means a household that has
an income at or below one hundred percent of the median family income
adjusted for family size, for the county where the project is located.
(5) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is more than
eighty percent but is at or below one hundred fifteen percent of the
median family income adjusted for family size, for the county where the
project is located, as reported by the United States department of
housing and urban development. For cities located in high-cost areas,
"moderate-income household" means a household that has an income that
is more than one hundred percent, but at or below one hundred fifty
percent, of the median family income adjusted for family size, for the
county where the project is located.
(6) "High cost area" means a county where the third quarter median
house price for the previous year as reported by the Washington center
for real estate research at Washington State University is equal to or
greater than one hundred thirty percent of the statewide median house
price published during the same time period.
(7) "Governing authority" means the local legislative authority of
a city having jurisdiction over the property for which an exemption may
be applied for under this chapter.
(((3))) (8) "Growth management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.
(((4))) (9) "Multiple-unit housing" means a building having four or
more dwelling units not designed or used as transient accommodations
and not including hotels and motels. Multifamily units may result from
new construction or rehabilitated or conversion of vacant,
underutilized, or substandard buildings to multifamily housing.
(((5))) (10) "Owner" means the property owner of record.
(((6))) (11) "Permanent residential occupancy" means multiunit
housing that provides either rental or owner occupancy on a
nontransient basis. This includes owner-occupied or rental
accommodation that is leased for a period of at least one month. This
excludes hotels and motels that predominately offer rental
accommodation on a daily or weekly basis.
(((7))) (12) "Rehabilitation improvements" means modifications to
existing structures, that are vacant for twelve months or longer, that
are made to achieve a condition of substantial compliance with existing
building codes or modification to existing occupied structures which
increase the number of multifamily housing units.
(((8))) (13) "Residential targeted area" means an area within an
urban center that has been designated by the governing authority as a
residential targeted area in accordance with this chapter.
(((9))) (14) "Substantial compliance" means compliance with local
building or housing code requirements that are typically required for
rehabilitation as opposed to new construction.
(((10))) (15) "Urban center" means a compact identifiable district
where urban residents may obtain a variety of products and services.
An urban center must contain:
(a) Several existing or previous, or both, business establishments
that may include but are not limited to shops, offices, banks,
restaurants, governmental agencies;
(b) Adequate public facilities including streets, sidewalks,
lighting, transit, domestic water, and sanitary sewer systems; and
(c) A mixture of uses and activities that may include housing,
recreation, and cultural activities in association with either
commercial or office, or both, use.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.14.020 and 2002 c 146 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The value of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements qualifying under this chapter is exempt
from ad valorem property taxation, for ten successive years beginning
January 1 of the year immediately following the calendar year of
issuance of the certificate of tax exemption eligibility. However, the
exemption does not include the value of land or nonhousing-related
improvements not qualifying under this chapter. When a local
((government adopts)) government's guidelines adopted pursuant to RCW
84.14.030(2) ((and the qualifying dwelling units are each on separate
parcels for the purpose of property taxation)) include conditions that
must be satisfied with respect to individual dwelling units, rather
than with respect to the multiple-unit housing as a whole or some
minimum portion thereof, the exemption ((may, at the local government's
discretion, be)) is limited to the value of the qualifying improvements
allocable to those dwelling units that meet the local guidelines.
(2) In the case of rehabilitation of existing buildings, the
exemption does not include the value of improvements constructed prior
to the submission of the application required under this chapter. The
incentive provided by this chapter is in addition to any other
incentives, tax credits, grants, or other incentives provided by law.
(3) This chapter does not apply to increases in assessed valuation
made by the assessor on nonqualifying portions of building and value of
land nor to increases made by lawful order of a county board of
equalization, the department of revenue, or a county, to a class of
property throughout the county or specific area of the county to
achieve the uniformity of assessment or appraisal required by law.
(4) At the conclusion of the ten-year exemption period, the new or
rehabilitated housing cost shall be considered as new construction for
the purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.14.030 and 2005 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
An owner of property making application under this chapter must
meet the following requirements:
(1) The new or rehabilitated multiple-unit housing must be located
in a residential targeted area as designated by the city;
(2) The multiple-unit housing must meet ((the)) guidelines as
adopted by the governing authority that must include, for each city,
affordable housing requirements established by the governing authority
as required by RCW 84.14.040. Other guidelines may include height,
density, public benefit features, number and size of proposed
development, parking, ((low-income or moderate-income occupancy
requirements,)) and other adopted requirements indicated necessary by
the city. The required amenities should be relative to the size of the
project and tax benefit to be obtained;
(3) The new, converted, or rehabilitated multiple-unit housing must
provide for a minimum of fifty percent of the space for permanent
residential occupancy. In the case of existing occupied multifamily
development, the multifamily housing must also provide for a minimum of
four additional multifamily units. Existing multifamily vacant housing
that has been vacant for twelve months or more does not have to provide
additional multifamily units;
(4) New construction multifamily housing and rehabilitation
improvements must be completed within three years from the date of
approval of the application;
(5) Property proposed to be rehabilitated must fail to comply with
one or more standards of the applicable state or local building or
housing codes on or after July 23, 1995. If the property proposed to
be rehabilitated is not vacant, an applicant shall provide each
existing tenant housing of comparable size, quality, and price and a
reasonable opportunity to relocate; and
(6) The applicant must enter into a contract with the city approved
by the governing ((body)) authority, or an administrative official or
commission authorized by the governing authority, under which the
applicant has agreed to the implementation of the development on terms
and conditions satisfactory to the governing authority.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.14.040 and 1995 c 375 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following criteria must be met before an area may be
designated as a residential targeted area:
(a) The area must be within an urban center, as determined by the
governing authority;
(b) The area must lack, as determined by the governing authority,
sufficient available, desirable, and convenient residential housing,
including affordable housing, to meet the needs of the public who would
be likely to live in the urban center, if the affordable, desirable,
attractive, and livable places to live were available; and
(c) The providing of additional housing opportunity, including
affordable housing, in the area, as determined by the governing
authority, will assist in achieving one or more of the stated purposes
of this chapter.
(2) For the purpose of designating a residential targeted area or
areas, the governing authority may adopt a resolution of intention to
so designate an area as generally described in the resolution. The
resolution must state the time and place of a hearing to be held by the
governing authority to consider the designation of the area and may
include such other information pertaining to the designation of the
area as the governing authority determines to be appropriate to apprise
the public of the action intended.
(3) The governing authority shall give notice of a hearing held
under this chapter by publication of the notice once each week for two
consecutive weeks, not less than seven days, nor more than thirty days
before the date of the hearing in a paper having a general circulation
in the city where the proposed residential targeted area is located.
The notice must state the time, date, place, and purpose of the hearing
and generally identify the area proposed to be designated as a
residential targeted area.
(4) Following the hearing, or a continuance of the hearing, the
governing authority may designate all or a portion of the area
described in the resolution of intent as a residential targeted area if
it finds, in its sole discretion, that the criteria in subsections (1)
through (3) of this section have been met.
(5) After designation of a residential targeted area, the governing
authority ((shall)) must adopt and implement standards and guidelines
to be utilized in considering applications and making the
determinations required under RCW 84.14.060. The standards and
guidelines must establish basic requirements for both new construction
and rehabilitation ((including)), which must include:
(a) Application process and procedures((. These guidelines may));
and
(b) By December 1, 2007, affordable housing requirements to ensure
that each project receiving a tax exemption provides for mixed income
housing either within the project itself or within the jurisdiction
that is affordable to both low and moderate-income households, except
in the case of projects intended exclusively for owner occupancy, in
which case the affordable housing requirement need only require that
the project provide for mixed-income housing affordable to moderate-income households. In the development of affordable housing
requirements, a city governing authority shall consider a variety of
methods to achieve the affordable housing requirements of this section
including, but not limited to, the possible method of mandating that a
specific percentage of units be made available for specific income
level populations, either within the property itself or located
elsewhere within the jurisdiction. A city governing authority shall
also consider potential components of its affordable housing
requirements including, but not limited to:
(i) Establishing standards related to the comparative quality,
size, location, and other characteristics of any affordable housing
units relative to units not designated as affordable; and
(ii) Whether an equivalent financial contribution directed towards
the production of affordable housing units within the jurisdiction can
be made by a property owner in lieu of the physical creation of
affordable housing units and, if so, how the amount of that equivalent
financial contribution shall be calculated.
(6) The governing authority may adopt and implement additional
standards and guidelines to be utilized in considering applications and
making the determinations required under RCW 84.14.060, which may
include the following:
(a) Additional or more stringent affordable housing requirements
than are required under state law;
(b) Requirements that address demolition of existing structures and
site utilization; and
(((b))) (c) Building requirements that may include elements
addressing parking, height, density, environmental impact, and
compatibility with the existing surrounding property and such other
amenities as will attract and keep permanent residents and that will
properly enhance the livability of the residential targeted area in
which they are to be located.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.14.050 and 1999 c 132 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
An owner of property seeking tax incentives under this chapter must
complete the following procedures:
(1) In the case of rehabilitation or where demolition or new
construction is required, the owner shall secure from the governing
authority or duly authorized ((agent)) representative, before
commencement of rehabilitation improvements or new construction,
verification of property noncompliance with applicable building and
housing codes;
(2) In the case of new and rehabilitated multifamily housing, the
owner shall apply to the city on forms adopted by the governing
authority. The application must contain the following:
(a) Information setting forth the grounds supporting the requested
exemption including information indicated on the application form or in
the guidelines;
(b) A description of the project and site plan, including the floor
plan of units and other information requested;
(c) A statement that the applicant is aware of the potential tax
liability involved when the property ceases to be eligible for the
incentive provided under this chapter;
(3) The applicant must verify the application by oath or
affirmation; and
(4) The application must be accompanied by the application fee, if
any, required under RCW 84.14.080. The governing authority may permit
the applicant to revise an application before final action by the
governing authority.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.14.060 and 1995 c 375 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The duly authorized administrative official or committee of the
city may approve the application if it finds that:
(1) A minimum of four new units are being constructed or in the
case of occupied rehabilitation or conversion a minimum of four
additional multifamily units are being developed;
(2) The proposed multiunit housing project meets the housing
affordability requirements as established by the governing authority as
required in RCW 84.14.040.
(3) The proposed project is or will be, at the time of completion,
in conformance with all local plans and regulations that apply at the
time the application is approved;
(((3))) (4) The owner has complied with all standards and
guidelines adopted by the city under this chapter; and
(((4))) (5) The site is located in a residential targeted area of
an urban center that has been designated by the governing authority in
accordance with procedures and guidelines indicated in RCW 84.14.040.

Sec. 9 RCW 84.14.090 and 1995 c 375 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon completion of rehabilitation or new construction for which
an application for a limited tax exemption under this chapter has been
approved and after issuance of the certificate of occupancy, the owner
shall file with the city the following:
(a) A statement of the amount of rehabilitation or construction
expenditures made with respect to each housing unit and the composite
expenditures made in the rehabilitation or construction of the entire
property;
(b) A description of the work that has been completed and a
statement that the rehabilitation improvements or new construction on
the owner's property qualify the property for limited exemption under
this chapter; ((and))
(c) A statement that the project meets the housing affordability
requirements established by the governing authority as required in RCW
84.14.040; and
(d) A statement that the work has been completed within three years
of the issuance of the conditional certificate of tax exemption.
(2) Within thirty days after receipt of the statements required
under subsection (1) of this section, the authorized representative of
the city shall determine whether the work completed, and the
affordability of the units, is consistent with the application and the
contract approved by the ((governing authority)) city and is qualified
for a limited tax exemption under this chapter. The city shall also
determine which specific improvements completed meet the requirements
and required findings.
(3) If the rehabilitation, conversion, or construction is completed
within three years of the date the application for a limited tax
exemption is filed under this chapter, or within an authorized
extension of this time limit, and the authorized representative of the
city determines that improvements were constructed consistent with the
application and other applicable requirements, including affordable
housing requirements, and the owner's property is qualified for a
limited tax exemption under this chapter, the city shall file the
certificate of tax exemption with the county assessor within ten days
of the expiration of the thirty-day period provided under subsection
(2) of this section.
(4) The authorized representative of the city shall notify the
applicant that a certificate of tax exemption is not going to be filed
if the authorized representative determines that:
(a) The rehabilitation or new construction was not completed within
three years of the application date, or within any authorized extension
of the time limit;
(b) The improvements were not constructed consistent with the
application or other applicable requirements; ((or))
(c) The affordable housing requirements established by the
governing authority as required in RCW 84.14.040 were not met; or
(d) The owner's property is otherwise not qualified for limited
exemption under this chapter.
(5) If the authorized representative of the city finds that
construction or rehabilitation of multiple-unit housing was not
completed within the required time period due to circumstances beyond
the control of the owner and that the owner has been acting and could
reasonably be expected to act in good faith and with due diligence, the
governing authority or the city official authorized by the governing
authority may extend the deadline for completion of construction or
rehabilitation for a period not to exceed twenty-four consecutive
months.
(6) The governing authority may provide by ordinance for an appeal
of a decision by the deciding officer or authority that an owner is not
entitled to a certificate of tax exemption to the governing authority,
a hearing examiner, or other city officer authorized by the governing
authority to hear the appeal in accordance with such reasonable
procedures and time periods as provided by ordinance of the governing
authority. The owner may appeal a decision by the deciding officer or
authority that is not subject to local appeal or a decision by the
local appeal authority that the owner is not entitled to a certificate
of tax exemption in superior court under RCW 34.05.510 through
34.05.598, if the appeal is filed within thirty days of notification by
the city to the owner of the decision being challenged.

Sec. 10 RCW 84.14.100 and 1995 c 375 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Thirty days after the anniversary of the date of the certificate of
tax exemption and each year for a period of ten years, the owner of the
rehabilitated or newly constructed property shall file with a
designated ((agent)) authorized representative of the city an annual
report indicating the following:
(1) A statement of occupancy and vacancy of the rehabilitated or
newly constructed property during the twelve months ending with the
anniversary date;
(2) The total number of units produced and the number and
percentage of units affordable to low and moderate-income households;
(3) The actual development cost of each unit receiving a tax
exemption;
(4) The total monthly rent or sale amount of each unit receiving a
tax exemption;
(5) The income of each renter household at the time of initial
occupancy and the income of each initial purchaser of owner-occupied
units at the time of purchase for each of the units receiving a tax
exemption;
(6) A certification by the owner that the property has not changed
use and that the property has been in compliance with the affordable
housing requirements established by the governing authority as required
in RCW 84.14.040 since the date of the certificate approved by the
city; ((and
(3))) (7) A description of changes or improvements constructed
after issuance of the certificate of tax exemption; and
(8) Any additional information requested by the city in regards to
the units receiving a tax exemption.

Sec. 11 RCW 84.14.110 and 2002 c 146 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If improvements have been exempted under this chapter, the
improvements continue to be exempted and not be converted to another
use for at least ten years from date of issuance of the certificate of
tax exemption. If the owner intends to convert the multifamily
development to another use, or if the owner intends to discontinue
compliance with the affordable housing requirements established by the
governing authority as required in RCW 84.14.040, the owner shall
notify the assessor within sixty days of the change in use. If, after
a certificate of tax exemption has been filed with the county assessor,
the ((city or assessor or agent)) authorized representative of the
governing authority discovers that a portion of the property is changed
or will be changed to a use that is other than residential or that
housing or amenities no longer meet the requirements, including
affordable housing requirements, as previously approved or agreed upon
by contract between the ((governing authority)) city and the owner and
that the multifamily housing, or a portion of the housing, no longer
qualifies for the exemption, the tax exemption must be canceled and the
following must occur:
(a) Additional real property tax must be imposed upon the value of
the nonqualifying improvements in the amount that would normally be
imposed, plus a penalty must be imposed amounting to twenty percent.
This additional tax is calculated based upon the difference between the
property tax paid and the property tax that would have been paid if it
had included the value of the nonqualifying improvements dated back to
the date that the improvements were converted to a nonmultifamily use;
(b) The tax must include interest upon the amounts of the
additional tax at the same statutory rate charged on delinquent
property taxes from the dates on which the additional tax could have
been paid without penalty if the improvements had been assessed at a
value without regard to this chapter; and
(c) The additional tax owed together with interest and penalty must
become a lien on the land and attach at the time the property or
portion of the property is removed from multifamily use or the
amenities no longer meet applicable requirements, and has priority to
and must be fully paid and satisfied before a recognizance, mortgage,
judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with which the land
may become charged or liable. The lien may be foreclosed upon
expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner
provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property
taxes. An additional tax unpaid on its due date is delinquent. From
the date of delinquency until paid, interest must be charged at the
same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(2) Upon a determination that a tax exemption is to be canceled for
a reason stated in this section, the governing authority or authorized
representative shall notify the record owner of the property as shown
by the tax rolls by mail, return receipt requested, of the
determination to cancel the exemption. The owner may appeal the
determination to the governing authority or authorized representative,
within thirty days by filing a notice of appeal with the clerk of the
governing authority, which notice must specify the factual and legal
basis on which the determination of cancellation is alleged to be
erroneous. The governing authority or a hearing examiner or other
official authorized by the governing authority may hear the appeal. At
the hearing, all affected parties may be heard and all competent
evidence received. After the hearing, the deciding body or officer
shall either affirm, modify, or repeal the decision of cancellation of
exemption based on the evidence received. An aggrieved party may
appeal the decision of the deciding body or officer to the superior
court under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.
(3) Upon determination by the governing authority or authorized
representative to terminate an exemption, the county officials having
possession of the assessment and tax rolls shall correct the rolls in
the manner provided for omitted property under RCW 84.40.080. The
county assessor shall make such a valuation of the property and
improvements as is necessary to permit the correction of the rolls.
The value of the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements added to the rolls shall be considered as
new construction for the purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW. The owner may
appeal the valuation to the county board of equalization under chapter
84.48 RCW and according to the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. If there
has been a failure to comply with this chapter, the property must be
listed as an omitted assessment for assessment years beginning January
1 of the calendar year in which the noncompliance first occurred, but
the listing as an omitted assessment may not be for a period more than
three calendar years preceding the year in which the failure to comply
was discovered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 84.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All cities, which issue certificates of tax exemption for
multiunit housing that conform to the requirements of this chapter,
shall report annually by December 31st of each year, beginning in 2007,
to the department of community, trade, and economic development. The
report must include the following information:
(a) A statement of the city affordable housing requirements
established by the governing authority as required in RCW 84.14.040 and
the rationale used in determining those requirements;
(b) The number of tax exemption certificates granted;
(c) The total number and type of units produced or to be produced;
(d) The number and type of units produced or to be produced meeting
the city affordable housing requirements;
(e) The actual development cost of each unit produced;
(f) The total monthly rent or total sale amount of each unit
produced;
(g) The income of each renter household at the time of initial
occupancy and the income of each initial purchaser of owner-occupied
units at the time of purchase for each of the units receiving a tax
exemption and a summary of these figures for the city; and
(h) The value of the tax exemption for each project receiving a tax
exemption and the total value of tax exemptions granted.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
may also establish performance measures specifically for the tax
exemption program upon which the participating cities shall annually
report or may require cities to report upon existing affordable housing
performance measures related to the tax exemption program.
(3) Cities must include this report in all local housing plans and
the department of community, trade, and economic development must
include a consolidated summary of program reports in all state housing
plans.
(4) Beginning in 2009, all cities, which issue certificates of tax
exemption for multiunit housing that conform to the requirements of
this chapter and which receive over five hundred thousand dollars a
year during the previous calendar year from: State housing-related
funding sources, including the housing trust fund; Washington state
housing finance commission programs; and the ending homelessness
program surcharge in RCW 36.22.179 and the surcharges in RCW 36.22.178,
shall apply to the full examination Washington state quality award
program once every three years beginning by January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act is applicable only to applications
for tax exemption certificates submitted under this chapter after the
effective date of this act, except for those applications approved on
or before November 30, 2007.

--- END ---