BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.40.020 and 1999 c 361 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall
have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Abuse of authority" means: Use of power and authority in a
manner that is intimidating, coercive, or demeaning; willful
malfeasance; or willful omission to perform a duty that adversely
affects the rights of another person and results in improper personal
gain or advantage.
(2) "Auditor" means the office of the state auditor.
(((2))) (3) "Employee" means any individual employed or holding
office in any department or agency of state government.
(((3))) (4) "Good faith" means a reasonable basis in fact for the
communication. "Good faith" is lacking when the employee knows or
reasonably ought to know that the report is malicious, false, or
frivolous.
(((4))) (5) "Gross mismanagement" means the arbitrary or capricious
exercise of management responsibilities in a manner grossly deviating
from the standard of care or competence that a reasonable person would
observe in the same situation.
(6) "Gross waste of funds" means to spend or use funds or to allow
funds to be used without valuable result in a manner grossly deviating
from the standard of care or competence that a reasonable person would
observe in the same situation.
(((5))) (7)(a) "Improper governmental action" means any action by
an employee undertaken in the performance of the employee's official
duties:
(i) Which is (([a])) a gross waste of public funds or resources as
defined in this section;
(ii) Which is in violation of federal or state law or rule, if the
violation is not merely technical or of a minimum nature; ((or))
(iii) Which is of substantial and specific danger to the public
health or safety;
(iv) Which is gross mismanagement as defined in this section;
(v) Which is an abuse of authority as defined in this section; or
(vi) Which impedes the communication of scientific opinion or
alters technical findings without scientifically valid justification.
(b) "Improper governmental action" does not include personnel
actions, for which other remedies exist, including but not limited to
employee grievances, complaints, appointments, promotions, transfers,
assignments, reassignments, reinstatements, restorations,
reemployments, performance evaluations, reductions in pay, dismissals,
suspensions, demotions, violations of the state civil service law,
alleged labor agreement violations, reprimands, claims of
discriminatory treatment, or any action which may be taken under
chapter 41.06 RCW, or other disciplinary action except as provided in
RCW 42.40.030.
(((6))) (8) "Substantial and specific danger" means a risk of
serious injury, illness, peril, or loss, to which the exposure of the
public is a gross deviation from the standard of care or competence
which a reasonable person would observe in the same situation.
(((7))) (9) "Use of official authority or influence" includes
taking, directing others to take, recommending, processing, or
approving any personnel action such as an appointment, promotion,
transfer, assignment, reassignment, reinstatement, restoration,
reemployment, performance evaluation, or any adverse action under
chapter 41.06 RCW, or other disciplinary action.
(((8))) (10) "Whistleblower" means an employee who in good faith
reports alleged improper governmental action to the auditor, initiating
an investigation under RCW 42.40.040. For purposes of the provisions
of this chapter and chapter 49.60 RCW relating to reprisals and
retaliatory action, the term "whistleblower" also means: (a) An
employee who in good faith provides information to the auditor in
connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040 and an employee
who is believed to have reported asserted improper governmental action
to the auditor or to have provided information to the auditor in
connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040 but who, in fact,
has not reported such action or provided such information; ((or)) (b)
an employee who in good faith identifies rules warranting review or
provides information to the rules review committee, and an employee who
is believed to have identified rules warranting review or provided
information to the rules review committee but who, in fact, has not
done so; or (c) an employee who refuses to obey an order that he or she
believes in good faith would require him or her to violate a law.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.40.050 and 1999 c 283 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who ((is a whistleblower, as defined in RCW
42.40.020, and who)) has been subjected to workplace reprisal or
retaliatory action and who is a whistleblower, as defined in RCW
42.40.020, or has reported the alleged occurrence of improper
governmental action to a public body is presumed to have established a
cause of action for the remedies provided under chapter 49.60 RCW.
(a) For the purpose of this section, "public body" means the
employee's supervisor, law enforcement, the attorney general,
legislative and executive branches of government, a court of law, and
other governmental authorities.
(b) For the purpose of this section, "reprisal or retaliatory
action" means but is not limited to any of the following:
(((a))) (i) Denial of adequate staff to perform duties;
(((b))) (ii) Frequent staff changes;
(((c))) (iii) Frequent and undesirable office changes;
(((d))) (iv) Refusal to assign meaningful work;
(((e))) (v) Unwarranted and unsubstantiated letters of reprimand or
unsatisfactory performance evaluations;
(((f))) (vi) Demotion;
(((g))) (vii) Reduction in pay;
(((h))) (viii) Denial of promotion;
(((i))) (ix) Suspension;
(((j))) (x) Dismissal;
(((k))) (xi) Denial of employment;
(((l))) (xii) A supervisor or superior encouraging coworkers to
behave in a hostile manner toward the whistleblower; and
(((m))) (xiii) A change in the physical location of the employee's
workplace or a change in the basic nature of the employee's job, if
either are in opposition to the employee's expressed wish.
(2) The agency presumed to have taken retaliatory action under
subsection (1) of this section may rebut that presumption by proving by
a preponderance of the evidence that the agency action or actions were
justified by reasons unrelated to the employee's status as a
whistleblower.
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits an agency from making any
decision exercising its authority to terminate, suspend, or discipline
an employee who engages in workplace reprisal or retaliatory action
against a whistleblower. However, the agency also shall implement any
order under chapter 49.60 RCW (other than an order of suspension if the
agency has terminated the retaliator).

--- END ---