BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The transitional housing operating and rent program is created
in the department to assist homeless individuals and families secure
and retain safe, decent, and affordable housing. For the purposes of
the transitional housing operating and rent program, the department
shall develop program eligibility criteria that includes, but is not
limited to, the definition of homeless person in RCW 43.185C.010, and
shall also take into consideration factors that contribute to or
precipitate homelessness including, but not limited to, domestic
violence. The department shall provide grants to eligible
organizations, as described in RCW 43.185.060, to provide assistance to
program participants. The eligible organizations must use grant moneys
for:
(a) Rental assistance, which includes security or utility deposits,
first and last month's rent assistance, and eligible moving expenses to
be determined by the department;
(b) Case management services designed to assist program
participants to secure and retain immediate housing and to transition
into permanent housing and greater levels of self-sufficiency;
(c) Operating expenses of transitional housing facilities that
serve homeless families with children; and
(d) Administrative costs of the eligible organization, which must
not exceed limits prescribed by the department.
(2) Eligible to receive assistance through the transitional housing
operating and rent program are:
(a) Families with children who are homeless or who are at risk of
becoming homeless and who have household incomes at or below fifty
percent of the median household income for their county; and
(b) Individuals or families without children who are homeless or at
risk of becoming homeless and who have household incomes at or below
thirty percent of the median household income for their county.
(3) All program participants must be willing to create and actively
participate in a housing stability plan for achieving permanent housing
and greater levels of self-sufficiency.
(4) Data on all program participants must be entered into and
tracked through the Washington homeless client management information
system as described in RCW 43.185C.180.
(5) The department encourages all eligible organizations funded
through the program to have a quality management system and to submit
an application to the Washington state quality award program to
evaluate that system. Beginning in 2009, all organizations funded
through the program receiving over five hundred thousand dollars a year
during the previous calendar year from: This program; other state
housing related funding sources, including the housing trust fund;
housing finance commission programs; and the ending homelessness
program surcharge in RCW 36.22.179 and the surcharges in RCW 36.22.178,
shall apply to the full examination Washington state quality award
program once every three years beginning by January 1, 2010.
(6) The department may develop rules, requirements, procedures, and
guidelines as necessary to implement and operate the transitional
housing operating and rent program.
(7) The department shall produce an annual transitional housing
operating and rent program report that must be included in the
department's homeless housing strategic plan as described in
43.185C.040. The report must include performance measures to be
determined by the department that address, at a minimum, the following
issue areas:
(a) The success of the program in helping program participants
transition into permanent housing and increase their levels of self-sufficiency;
(b) The financial performance of the program related to efficient
program administration by the department and program operation by
selected eligible organizations, including an analysis of the costs per
program participant served;
(c) The quality, completeness, and timeliness of the information on
program participants provided to the Washington homeless client
management information system database; and
(d) The satisfaction of program participants in the assistance
provided through the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
The transitional housing operating and rent account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from sources directed
to the transitional housing operating and rent program must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
solely for the purpose of the transitional housing operating and rent
program as described in section 1 of this act. Only the director of
the department or the director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sum of seven million five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general
fund to the transitional housing operating and rent account created in
section 2 of this act for the purpose of implementing and operating the
transitional housing operating and rent program. The first two million
five hundred dollars of the appropriation shall be distributed to
eligible organizations that will utilize available funds, less
appropriate administrative costs of the department of community, trade,
and economic development, to be used for the purposes described in
section 1(1) (a) through (d) of this act solely to serve families with
children under the age of eighteen. All remaining appropriated moneys,
less appropriate administrative costs of the department of community,
trade, and economic development, shall be used solely for the purposes
described in section 1(1) (a), (b), and (d) of this act to serve those
eligible under section 1(2) of this act.
(2) The sum of seven million five hundred thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the transitional housing
operating and rent account created in section 2 of this act for the
purpose of implementing and operating the transitional housing
operating and rent program. The first two million five hundred dollars
of the appropriation shall be distributed to eligible organizations
that will utilize available funds, less appropriate administrative
costs of the department of community, trade, and economic development,
to be used for the purposes described in section 1(1) (a) through (d)
of this act solely to serve families with children under the age of
eighteen. All remaining appropriated moneys, less appropriate
administrative costs of the department of community, trade, and
economic development, shall be used solely for the purposes described
in section 1(1) (a), (b), and (d) of this act to serve those eligible
under section 1(2) of this act.

--- END ---