BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Protecting the public health, safety, and welfare by ensuring
that housing resources are available to needy or vulnerable persons,
such as youth exiting the state dependency system, is a fundamental
purpose of government;
(2) Providing needy youth exiting the state dependency system with
safe and viable options for housing to avoid homelessness confers a
valuable benefit on the public that constitutes consideration for
financial assistance to such youth; and
(3) The state must establish goals regarding the self-sufficiency
status of youth exiting the state dependency system, which must
include:
(a) Ensuring that all youth exiting the state dependency system
have access to a decent, appropriate, and affordable home in a healthy
safe environment to prevent such young people from experiencing
homelessness;
(b) Reducing each year the percentage of young people eligible for
state assistance upon exiting from the state dependency system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development;
(b) "Eligible youth" means an individual who:
(i) On or after September 1, 2006, is at least eighteen, was a
dependent of the state under chapter 13.34 RCW in the month before his
or her eighteenth birthday, and has not yet reached the age of twenty-three;
(ii) Except as provided in subsection (3)(b)(ii) of this section,
has a total income from all sources, except for temporary sources that
include, but are not limited to, overtime wages, bonuses, or short-term
temporary assignments, that does not exceed fifty percent of the area
median income;
(iii) Is not receiving services under RCW 74.13.031(10)(b);
(iv) Complies with other eligibility requirements the department
may establish;
(c) "Independent housing" means a housing unit that is not owned by
or located within the home of the eligible youth's biological parents
or any of the eligible youth's former foster care families or
dependency guardians. "Independent housing" may include a unit in a
transitional or other supportive housing facility;
(d) "Fair market rent" means the fair market rent in each county of
the state, as determined by the United States department of housing and
urban development;
(e) "Individual development account" or "account" means an account
established by contract between a low-income individual and a
sponsoring organization for the benefit of the low-income individual
and funded through periodic contributions by the low-income individual
that are matched with contributions by or through the sponsoring
organization; and
(f) "Subcontractor organization" means an eligible organization
described under RCW 43.185A.040 that contracts with the department to
administer the independent youth housing program.
(2) The independent youth housing program is created in the
department to provide housing stipends to eligible youth to be used for
independent housing. The department must serve the maximum number of
eligible youth possible within the available funding for the program.
The department shall capitalize upon existing department administrative
resources by administering this program as a component of the
transitional housing operating, and rent program created in chapter
43.185C RCW by chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1921), Laws of
2007 or, if chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1921), Laws of
2007 is not enacted, as a component of any other similar department
program that provides rental assistance and case management services to
low-income individuals or families who are homeless or at risk of
becoming homeless. The department shall solicit input from a variety
of stakeholders involved with dependent youth, homeless youth, and
homeless young adults to develop a plan for the design, implementation,
and operation of the independent youth housing program. The
department, in consultation with the department of social and health
services, shall:
(a) Develop, administer, supervise, and monitor the independent
youth housing program; and
(b) Ensure that the independent youth housing program is integrated
and aligned with other state rental assistance and case management
programs, such as the transitional housing operating and rent program
created in chapter 43.185C RCW by chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill
No. 1921), Laws of 2007, as well as all existing services and programs
designed to assist foster youth transition to independent living.
Whenever possible, the program must be aligned and collaborated with
the independent living program, the transitional living program, and
other related programs offered by the department of social and health
services to maximize resources and provide the greatest number and
variety of services to eligible youth. The program must also be
included in the state homeless housing strategic plan under RCW
43.185C.040 and any other state or local homeless or affordable housing
plans. The outcomes of the independent youth housing program must be
included in the measurement of any performance measures described in
chapter 43.185C RCW.
(3) To receive services under the independent youth housing
program, an eligible youth must:
(a) Sign a program compliance agreement stating that the youth
agrees to:
(i) Timely pay his or her portion of the independent housing cost;
(ii) Comply with an independent living plan; and
(iii) Comply with other program requirements and policies the
department may establish;
(b) Maintain his or her status as an eligible youth, except that if
the youth's total income exceeds fifty percent of the area median
income during the course of his or her participation in the program,
the department shall establish policies and procedures to allow the
youth to remain in the program and continue to receive a housing
stipend. The policies must require that the youth agrees to:
(i) Participate in the individual development account program
established under RCW 43.31.460 and invest a portion, to be determined
by the department, of his or her income that exceeds fifty percent of
the area median income in an individual development account; or
(ii) If the youth is unable to participate in the individual
development account program due to the program's capacity limits or
eligibility requirements, participate in an alternate supervised
savings program approved by the department, as long as the youth
qualifies for and may participate in this savings program.
(4) An eligible youth may participate in the independent youth
housing program for any duration of time and may apply to enroll in the
program with the department at any time.
(5)(a) A youth may be terminated from the independent youth housing
program for a violation of department policies.
(b) Youth who are terminated from the program may apply to the
department for reenrollment in the program through a procedure to be
developed by the department. The department shall establish criteria
to evaluate a reenrollment application and may accept or deny a
reenrollment application based on the department's evaluation.
(6) Under the independent youth housing program, the department of
social and health services shall:
(a) Refer a potential eligible youth to the department before the
youth's eighteenth birthday, if feasible, and indicate, if known, where
the youth plans to reside after exiting foster care;
(b) Collaborate with the department to provide information to all
youth aged fifteen or older, who are dependents of the state under
chapter 13.34 RCW, about the independent youth housing program, and
encourage all dependents of the state nearing their eighteenth birthday
to consider applying for enrollment in the program;
(c) Encourage organizations participating in the independent living
program and the transitional living program to collaborate with the
independent youth housing program whenever possible to capitalize on
resources and provide the greatest amount and variety of services to
eligible youth;
(d) Annually provide to the department data reflecting changes in
the percentage of youth exiting the state dependency system each year
who are eligible for state assistance, as well as any other data and
performance measures that may assist the department to measure program
success; and
(e) Annually, beginning by December 31, 2007, provide to the
appropriate committees of the legislature and the interagency council
on homelessness as described under RCW 43.185C.170 recommendations of
strategies to reach the state goals of:
(i) Ensuring that all youth exiting the state dependency system
have access to a decent, appropriate, and affordable home in a healthy,
safe environment to prevent these youth from experiencing homelessness;
and
(ii) Reducing each year the percentage of young people eligible for
state assistance upon exiting from the state dependency system.
(7) Under the independent youth housing program, the department
shall:
(a) Adopt policies, requirements, and procedures necessary for the
program;
(b) Contract with one or more eligible organizations described
under RCW 43.185A.040 to provide services and conduct administrative
activities as described in subsection (8) of this section. Moneys
awarded to these subcontractor organizations may be used for housing
stipends, security deposits, first and last month's rent stipends, case
management program costs, and administrative costs. Administrative
costs for each subcontractor organization may not exceed twelve percent
of the estimated total annual grant amount to the subcontractor
organization;
(c) Establish the eligibility criteria of youth for the independent
youth housing program;
(d) Refer interested youth to the designated subcontractor
organization administering the program in the area in which the youth
intends to reside;
(e) Develop a method for determining the amount of the housing
stipend, and first and last month's rent and security deposit where
applicable, to be dedicated to participating youth. The method for
determining a housing stipend must take into account a youth's age, the
fair market rent for the area in which the youth lives or intends to
live, and a variety of possible living situations, including when youth
are custodial parents of young children or two or more youth
participating in the program choose to live together. The amount of
housing stipends must be adjusted, by a method and formula established
by the department, to promote the successful transition for youth to
complete housing self-sufficiency over time. All housing stipends
under this section are payable only to a landlord or housing manager of
any type of independent housing; and
(f) Annually review and report on the performance of subcontractor
organizations, as well as the performance of the program as a whole, in
the state homeless housing strategic plan under RCW 43.185C.040 and any
other relevant state or local homeless or affordable housing plans,
beginning in 2007. The outcomes of the independent youth housing
program must be included in the measurement of any performance measures
described in chapter 43.185C RCW. The independent youth housing
program report must include, at a minimum:
(i) An update on the following program performance measures, as
well as any other performance measures the department may establish,
for enrolled youth in consultation with the department of social and
health services, to be measured statewide and by county:
(A) Increases in housing stability;
(B) Increases in economic self-sufficiency;
(C) Increases in independent living skills;
(D) Increases in education and job training attainment;
(E) Decreases in the use of all state-funded services over time;
and
(F) Decreases in the percentage of youth exiting the state
dependency system each year who are eligible for state assistance as
reported to the department by the department of social and health
services; and
(ii) Recommendations to the legislature and to the interagency
council on homelessness as described under RCW 43.185C.170 on program
improvements and on departmental strategies that might assist the state
to reach its goals of:
(A) Ensuring that all youth exiting the state dependency system
have access to a decent, appropriate, and affordable home in a healthy
safe environment to prevent these youth from experiencing homelessness;
and
(B) Reducing each year the percentage of young people eligible for
state assistance upon exiting from the state dependency system.
(8) Under the independent youth housing program, subcontractor
organizations shall:
(a) Enroll eligible youth who are referred by the department and
who choose to reside in their assigned service area;
(b) Enter eligible youth program participants into the homeless
client management information system as described in RCW 43.185C.180;
(c) Issue housing stipends as well as security deposits and first
and last month's rent, where applicable;
(d) Monitor participating youth's housing status;
(e) Evaluate participating youth's eligibility and compliance with
department policies and procedures at least twice a year;
(f) Assist participating youth to develop or update an independent
living plan focused on obtaining and retaining independent housing or
collaborate with a case manager with whom the youth is already involved
to ensure that the youth has an independent living plan;
(g) Educate participating youth on tenant rights and
responsibilities;
(h) Provide support to participating youth in the form of general
case management and information and referral services, when necessary,
or collaborate with a case manager with whom the youth is already
involved to ensure that the youth is receiving the case management and
information and referral services needed;
(i) Connect participating youth, when possible, with individual
development account programs, other financial literacy programs, and
other programs that are designed to help young people acquire economic
independence and self-sufficiency, or collaborate with a case manager
with whom the youth is already involved to ensure that the youth is
receiving information and referrals to these programs, when
appropriate;
(j) Submit expenditure and performance reports, including
information related to the performance measures in subsection (7)(f)(i)
of this section, to the department on a time schedule determined by the
department; and
(k) Provide recommendations to the department regarding program
improvements and strategies that might assist the state to reach its
goals as described in subsection (7)(f)(ii) of this section.
(9) Section 1 of this act and this section do not create:
(a) An entitlement to services;
(b) Judicial authority to extend the jurisdiction of juvenile court
in a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW to a youth who has reached the
age of eighteen or to order the provision of services to the youth; or
(c) A private right of action or claim on the part of any
individual, entity, or agency against the department, the department of
social and health services, or any contractor of the departments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW
to read as follows:
The independent youth housing account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. All revenue directed to the independent youth
housing program must be deposited into this account. Expenditures from
the account may only be used for the independent youth housing program
as described in this act. Only the director of the department or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Beginning in September 2008, the Washington
state institute for public policy shall conduct a study measuring the
outcomes for youth who are participating or who have participated in
the independent youth housing program created in section 2 of this act.
The institute shall issue a report containing its preliminary findings
to the legislature by December 1, 2009, and a final report by December
1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---