BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.76.020 and 1979 c 158 s 189 are each amended to
read as follows:
Application for a transporter's license shall be made on a form
provided for that purpose by the director of licensing and when
executed shall be forwarded to the director together with the proper
fee. The application shall contain the name and address of the
applicant, state whether or not the license will be used to provide
towing services for monetary compensation as described in RCW 46.55.025
and, if so, whether or not the applicant is a registered tow truck
operator, and ((such)) contain other information as the director may
require.

--- END ---