BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.55.140 and 1995 c 360 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A registered tow truck operator who has a valid and signed
impoundment authorization has a lien upon the impounded vehicle for
services provided in the towing and storage of the vehicle, unless the
impoundment is determined to have been invalid. The lien does not
apply to personal property in or upon the vehicle that is not
permanently attached to or is not an integral part of the vehicle
except for items of personal property registered or titled with the
department. The registered tow truck operator also has a deficiency
claim against the registered owner of the vehicle for services provided
in the towing and storage of the vehicle not to exceed the sum of
((five hundred)) one thousand dollars after deduction of the amount bid
at auction, and for vehicles of over ten thousand pounds gross vehicle
weight, the operator has a deficiency claim of ((one)) five thousand
dollars after deduction of the amount bid at auction, unless the
impound is determined to be invalid. The limitation on towing and
storage deficiency claims does not apply to an impound directed by a
law enforcement officer. In no case may the cost of the auction or a
buyer's fee be added to the amount charged for the vehicle at the
auction, the vehicle's lien, or the overage due. A registered owner
who has completed and filed with the department the seller's report as
provided for by RCW 46.12.101 and has timely and properly filed the
seller's report is relieved of liability under this section. The
person named as the new owner of the vehicle on the timely and properly
filed seller's report shall assume liability under this section.
(2) Any person who tows, removes, or otherwise disturbs any vehicle
parked, stalled, or otherwise left on privately owned or controlled
property, and any person owning or controlling the private property, or
either of them, are liable to the owner or operator of a vehicle, or
each of them, for consequential and incidental damages arising from any
interference with the ownership or use of the vehicle which does not
comply with the requirements of this chapter.

--- END ---