BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
Prior adequate written notice shall be given to the child, child's
representative, and caregiver before denying, reducing, or terminating
foster care benefits; and if requested by the child, child's
representative, or caregiver, an administrative fair hearing shall be
granted before such reductions may be implemented. The hearing will be
no different than those involved in appealing medicaid, temporary
assistance for needy families, or other benefits issues in that it
shall be before an administrative law judge.

--- END ---