BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that
greenhouse gases offset contracts, credits, and other greenhouse gases
mitigation efforts are a recognized utility purpose that confers a
direct benefit on the utility's ratepayers. The legislature declares
that this act is intended to reverse the result of Okeson v. City of
Seattle (January 18, 2007) by expressly granting municipal utilities
and public utility districts the statutory authority to engage in
mitigation activities to offset their utility's impact on the
environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or town authorized to acquire and operate utilities for
the purpose of furnishing the city or town and its inhabitants and
other persons with electricity for lighting and other purposes may
develop and make publicly available a plan to reduce its greenhouse
gases emissions or achieve no-net emissions from all sources of
greenhouse gases that the utility owns, leases, uses, contracts for, or
otherwise controls.
(2) A city or town authorized to acquire and operate utilities for
the purpose of furnishing the city or town and its inhabitants and
other persons with electricity for lighting and other purposes may, as
part of its utility operation, mitigate the environmental impacts, such
as greenhouse gases emissions, of its operation and any power
purchases. The mitigation may include, but is not limited to, those
greenhouse gases mitigation mechanisms recognized by independent,
qualified organizations with proven experience in emissions mitigation
activities. Mitigation mechanisms may include the purchase, trade, and
banking of greenhouse gases offsets or credits. If a state greenhouse
gases registry is established, a utility that has purchased, traded, or
banked greenhouse gases mitigation mechanisms under this section shall
receive credit in the registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A public utility district may develop and make publicly
available a plan for the district to reduce its greenhouse gases
emissions or achieve no-net emissions from all sources of greenhouse
gases that the district owns, leases, uses, contracts for, or otherwise
controls.
(2) A public utility district may, as part of its utility
operation, mitigate the environmental impacts, such as greenhouse gases
emissions, of its operation and any power purchases. Mitigation may
include, but is not limited to, those greenhouse gases mitigation
mechanisms recognized by independent, qualified organizations with
proven experience in emissions mitigation activities. Mitigation
mechanisms may include the purchase, trade, and banking of greenhouse
gases offsets or credits. If a state greenhouse gases registry is
established, a public utility district that has purchased, traded, or
banked greenhouse gases mitigation mechanisms under this section shall
receive credit in the registry.

--- END ---