BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 2 and 3 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Agricultural activities" means agricultural uses and practices
including, but not limited to: Producing, breeding, or increasing
agricultural products; rotating and changing agricultural crops;
allowing land used for agricultural activities to lie fallow in which
it is plowed and tilled but left unseeded; allowing land used for
agricultural activities to lie dormant as a result of adverse
agricultural market conditions; allowing land used for agricultural
activities to lie dormant because the land is enrolled in a local,
state, or federal conservation program, or the land is subject to a
conservation easement; conducting agricultural operations; maintaining,
repairing, and replacing agricultural equipment; maintaining,
repairing, and replacing agricultural facilities, when the replacement
facility is no closer to the shoreline than the original facility; and
maintaining agricultural lands under production or cultivation.
(2) "Agricultural land" means those specific land areas on which
agriculture activities are conducted.
(3) "Center" means the William D. Ruckelshaus center at Washington
State University and the University of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Beginning July 1, 2007, the center shall
design and carry out a process to identify issues that cause conflicts
between agricultural activities occurring on agricultural lands and
development regulations to protect critical areas.
(2) The center shall involve stakeholders from diverse perspectives
in the process, including but not limited to representatives of
counties, cities, the agriculture industry, the environmental
community, Native American tribes, and state agencies.
(3) By October 1, 2008, the center shall report to the governor and
the appropriate committees of the legislature its findings and
recommendations for resolving or reducing these conflicts, including
statutory changes for consideration during the 2009 legislative
session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Development regulations that protect
critical areas adopted under this chapter do not apply to agricultural
activities occurring on agricultural land until there is a resolution
of issues causing conflicts between such activities and regulations.
The legislature intends this act to be curative, remedial, and to apply
retroactively and prospectively to development regulations that protect
critical areas adopted under this chapter.
(2) This chapter does not exempt from development regulations to
protect critical areas: (a) New agricultural activities on land not
meeting the definition of agricultural land; (b) conversion of
agricultural lands to other uses; or (c) development not meeting the
definition of agricultural activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 36.70A RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.70A.060 and 2005 c 423 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) ((Except as provided in RCW 36.70A.1701,)) Each county that
is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each city
within such county, shall adopt development regulations on or before
September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest,
and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
Regulations adopted under this subsection may not prohibit uses legally
existing on any parcel prior to their adoption and shall remain in
effect until the county or city adopts development regulations pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure that the use of lands
adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands shall not
interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed manner and in
accordance with best management practices, of these designated lands
for the production of food, agricultural products, or timber, or for
the extraction of minerals.
(b) Counties and cities shall require that all plats, short plats,
development permits, and building permits issued for development
activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands designated as
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a
notice that the subject property is within or near designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands on which a
variety of commercial activities may occur that are not compatible with
residential development for certain periods of limited duration. The
notice for mineral resource lands shall also inform that an application
might be made for mining-related activities, including mining,
extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and
recycling of minerals.
(2) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that
protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW
36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the
counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on
or before March 1, 1992.
(3) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.
(4) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban growth
areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land or
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.
(5) The application of this section is subject to section 3 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---