BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.525
RCW to read as follows:
Each public school in Washington shall be made available to the
public as an emergency shelter during states of emergency. The
facilities must have a system in place to alert members of the public
that such facilities are available to the general public during states
of emergency and, to the best of their ability, provide water, shelter,
and utilities to the public.

--- END ---