BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.53.020 and 2005 c 105 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created an office of civil legal aid as an independent
agency of the judicial branch.
(2) Activities of the office of civil legal aid shall be carried
out by a director of civil legal aid services. The director of civil
legal aid services shall be appointed by the supreme court from a list
of three names forwarded by the access to justice board.
Qualifications for the director include admission to practice law in
this state for at least five years; experience in representation of
low-income people in civil matters, which experience may be in the form
of volunteer representation; knowledge of and demonstrated commitment
to promoting access to the civil justice system for indigent persons;
and proven managerial or supervisory experience. The director shall
serve at the pleasure of the supreme court and receive a salary to be
fixed by the oversight committee.
(3) The director shall:
(a) Contract with one or more qualified legal aid providers to
provide civil legal aid services authorized by RCW 2.53.030;
(b) ((Monitor)) Administer, support, and oversee the use of state
funding to ensure efficient and effective delivery of state funded
civil legal aid and compliance with this chapter;
(c) Report quarterly to the civil legal aid oversight committee
established in RCW 2.53.010 and the supreme court's access to justice
board on the use of state funds for legal aid; and report biennially on
the status of access to the civil justice system for low-income people
eligible for state-funded legal aid; and
(d) Submit a biennial budget request.
(4) The office shall not provide direct representation of clients.

--- END ---