BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Appliances, fixtures, and items of equipment" means furnaces,
boilers, oil tanks and fittings, air purifiers, air handling equipment,
ventilating fans, ceiling fans, air conditioning equipment, water
heaters, pumps, stoves, ranges, ovens, refrigerators, garbage
disposals, compactors, dishwashers, automatic door openers, washers and
dryers, bathtubs, sinks, toilets, faucets and fittings, lighting
fixtures, lighting control and energy management systems, security
systems, circuit breakers, and other similar items.
(2) "Builder" means any person, corporation, general contractor, or
other legal entity that:
(a) Is engaged in the business of erecting or otherwise
constructing a new home; or
(b) Purchases a completed new home for resale in the course of its
business.
(3) "Defect" means any violation or nonconformity with applicable
building codes, regulations, or permits that has an adverse effect or
will have an adverse effect on the new home or component of the new
home alleged to be in violation of the new home warranty. As used in
this subsection, an "adverse effect" must be more than technical and
must be significant to a reasonable person. To establish an adverse
effect, the person alleging the breach is not required to prove that
the breach renders the new home uninhabitable or unfit for its intended
purpose.
(4) "Electrical systems" means all wiring, electrical boxes,
switches, outlets, and connections to the public utility system.
(5) "Heating, cooling, and ventilating systems" means all duct
work, gas, steam, water and refrigerant lines, registers, convectors,
solar panels, radiation elements, and dampers.
(6) "Load-bearing portions of the home" means the load-bearing
portions of the:
(a) Foundation system and footings;
(b) Beams;
(c) Girders;
(d) Lintels;
(e) Columns;
(f) Walls and partitions;
(g) Floor systems; and
(h) Roof framing systems.
(7)(a) "New home" means every newly constructed private dwelling
unit in the state and the appliances, fixtures, and items of equipment
and structure that are made a part of a newly constructed private
dwelling unit at the time of construction. Newly constructed private
dwelling units include substantial remodels. "Substantial remodel"
means a remodel of a residence, for which the total cost exceeds one-half of the assessed value of the improvements for property tax
purposes at the time the contract for remodel was made.
(b) "New home" does not include:
(i) A condominium, as defined in RCW 64.34.020, used for
residential purposes, as defined in RCW 64.34.020;
(ii) A residential timeshare as defined in RCW 64.36.010;
(iii) A manufactured home or mobile home as defined in RCW
65.20.020;
(iv) Outbuildings, including detached garages and carports, except
outbuildings that contain plumbing, electrical, heating, cooling, or
ventilation systems serving the new home, and then only to the extent
that defects to the outbuildings could affect these systems;
(v) Driveways;
(vi) Walkways;
(vii) Boundary walls;
(viii) Retaining walls not necessary for the structural stability
of the new home;
(ix) Landscaping;
(x) Sprinkler or irrigation systems;
(xi) Fences;
(xii) Off-site improvements;
(xiii) Appurtenant recreational facilities; and
(xiv) Other similar items as determined by the director of the
department of labor and industries by rule.
(8) "New home warranty" means the warranty created in section 2 of
this act.
(9) "Owner" means the purchaser of a new home or any subsequent
owner of a home to which the warranty created in section 2 of this act
applies.
(10) "Plumbing systems" means:
(a) Gas supply lines and fittings;
(b) Water supply, waste, and vent pipes and their fittings;
(c) Septic tanks and their drain fields; and
(d) Water, gas, and sewer service piping and their extensions to
the tie-in of a public utility connection, or on-site wells and sewage
disposal systems.
(11)(a) "Structural defect" means any defect in the load-bearing
portions of a new home that adversely affects its load-bearing function
to the extent that the home becomes or is in danger of becoming unsafe,
unsanitary, or otherwise not reasonably safely inhabitable.
(b) "Structural defect" also includes damage due to subsidence,
expansion, or lateral movement of soil that has been disturbed or
relocated by the builder.
(c) "Structural defect" does not include damage caused by movement
of the soil:
(i) Resulting from a flood or earthquake; or
(ii) For which compensation has been provided.
(12) "Warranty date" means the first day on which the owner
occupies the new home, closes on the new home, makes the final contract
payment on the new home, or obtains an occupancy permit for the new
home if the home is built on the owner's property, whichever is
earlier.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) Except as excluded under (b) of this
subsection, every contract for the construction or sale of a new home
includes, as a matter of law, a warranty from the residential builder
that shall warrant at a minimum that:
(i) For two years, beginning on the warranty date, the new home is
free from any defects in materials and workmanship;
(ii) For three years, beginning on the warranty date, the new home
is free from any defects in the electrical, plumbing, heating, cooling,
and ventilating systems, except that in the case of appliances,
fixtures, and items of equipment, the warranty need not exceed the
length and scope of the warranty offered by the manufacturer, and the
warranty of merchantability, fitness, and all other implied warranties
with respect to appliances, fixtures, and items of equipment shall be
governed by the Washington uniform commercial code;
(iii) For five years, beginning on the warranty date, the new home
is free from any defects that permit or, without repair, will lead to
water penetration; and
(iv) For ten years, beginning on the warranty date, the new home is
free from any structural defects.
(b) The new home warranty excludes the following:
(i) Damage to real property that is not part of the home covered by
the warranty or that is not included in the purchase price of the home;
(ii) Bodily injury or damage to personal property;
(iii) Any defect in materials supplied or work performed by anyone
other than the builder or the builder's employees, agents, or
subcontractors;
(iv) Any damage that the owner knew or had reason to know existed
but has not taken reasonable action to mitigate;
(v) Normal wear and tear or expiration of normal useful life;
(vi) Insect damage, except where the builder has failed to use
proper materials or construction methods designed to prevent insect
infestation;
(vii) Any loss or damage that arises while the home is being used
primarily for nonresidential purposes;
(viii) Any damage to the extent it is caused or made worse by
negligence, improper maintenance, or improper operations by anyone
other than the builder or its employees, agents, or subcontractors;
(ix) Any damage to the extent it is caused or made worse by changes
of the grading of the ground by anyone other than the builder, its
employees, agents, or subcontractors; and
(x) Any loss or damage caused by acts of God.
(2) The warranty created by this section runs from the builder to
the owner. This warranty entitles the owner to recover from the
builder all costs associated with repairing the defects, including all
incidental and consequential damages. The liability of a builder under
the new home warranty shall be limited to the fair market value of the
home. Absence of privity of contract between the owner and the builder
is not a defense to the enforcement of this warranty.
(3) If the defect is the result of work performed by a
subcontractor, the builder has a right of contribution from that
subcontractor for amounts paid to the owner as a result of the new home
warranty.
(4) No action to enforce the new home warranty created by this
section may be commenced after six years have passed from the time the
defect is discovered or, with reasonable diligence, should have been
discovered. However, an action may not be brought under this section
more than ten years after the warranty date. Providing written notice
and a reasonable description of a defect to the builder has the effect
of tolling the limitation periods established by this subsection and
subsection (5) of this section. Tolling continues until the builder
completes the repair to the owner's satisfaction, or the builder gives
the owner written notice that the builder refuses to make the repair or
has completed as much of the repair as the builder intends to complete.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, no action
to enforce the new home warranty created by this section may be filed
later than the time periods described in subsection (1)(a) of this
section.
(6) The new home warranty is a cumulative remedy, and shall not
have the effect of diminishing or replacing any other remedy or
warranty created by law or equity or agreement between the parties.
(7) The new home warranty does not expire on the subsequent sale of
a new home by the owner to a subsequent purchaser, but continues to
protect later purchasers until the warranties provided in subsection
(1)(a) of this section expire.
(8) The new home warranty created in this section may not be
omitted, waived, or disclaimed in any way.
(9) All new homes must include in the purchase and sale agreement
between the builder and the buyer the following statement: "This home
was built in accordance with the statutory warranty set forth in
chapter 64.-- RCW (sections 1 and 2 of this act), which representation
and warranty may not be omitted, waived, or disclaimed in any way."
This subsection is intended to provide notice to owners of their rights
under the new home warranty created under sections 1 and 2 of this act
and is not intended to create a separate cause of action under this
act.
(10) This chapter is not intended to create an independent right to
maintain a class action against any builder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A committee on residential construction
is created. The committee consists of the following members who have
experience and expertise in residential construction law or residential
construction:
(a) One member from each caucus of the senate, appointed by the
president of the senate;
(b) One member from each caucus of the house of representatives,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(c) The following eleven members jointly appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives and the president of the senate:
(i) One builder of single-family homes, based upon the
recommendation of the statewide building industry association;
(ii) One residential construction defense attorney with experience
representing builders in single-family construction defect actions;
(iii) One residential construction plaintiff attorney with
experience representing homeowners in single-family construction defect
actions;
(iv) Three representatives of the Washington homeowners coalition;
(v) One third-party private building inspector;
(vi) One architect;
(vii) One representative of the statewide building industry
association;
(viii) One representative of the insurance industry; and
(ix) One expert in water penetration issues affecting residential
construction; and
(d) One person appointed by the governor to serve as chair of the
committee.
(2) The committee shall:
(a) Study the cause, extent, and type of construction defects
currently existing with single-family residential construction;
(b) Evaluate the existing remedies for homeowners in Washington for
single-family residential construction defects;
(c) Examine what contractors and their industry groups can do to
improve the quality of construction to minimize construction defects
and, as a result, reduce contractors' liability costs as well as reduce
problems for their customers;
(d) Examine the issue of contractor licensing including, but not
limited to, whether contractors should be licensed and what education
and training requirements should exist;
(e) Evaluate whether current surety bond requirements are
sufficient or if increased or additional bonding requirements are
necessary to protect both construction professionals and homebuyers;
(f) Determine whether there should be increased standards for city
and county building inspectors and examine if changes are needed to the
permit sign off process;
(g) Assess whether changes to the building code are necessary to
avoid water penetration problems; and
(h) Examine the costs and benefits of the statutory warranty
created in section 2 of this act, including availability of insurance,
efficient access to justice, and potential application of alternative
dispute resolution, and evaluate whether there is a more cost-effective
way to protect both the homeowners and the residential construction
industry in Washington state. Within this evaluation, the committee
shall examine other states that have implemented statutory home
warranties including, at a minimum, Maryland and California.
(3) Staff support for the committee must be provided by senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(4) Legislative members of the committee must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(5) By December 31, 2007, the committee shall deliver to the
consumer protection and housing committee of the senate and the
judiciary committee of the house of representatives a report of the
findings and conclusions of the committee and any proposed legislation.
(6) This section expires on January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 64 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect
July 1, 2008.

--- END ---