BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that state
agencies dispose of state-owned lands when these lands cannot be
advantageously used by the agency or when dispositions are beneficial
to the public's interest. The legislature also recognizes that
dispositions of state-owned land can create opportunities for counties,
cities, and towns wishing to purchase or otherwise acquire the lands,
and citizens wishing to enjoy the lands for recreational or other
purposes. However, the legislature finds that absent a specific
requirement obligating state agencies to notify affected local
governments of proposed land dispositions, occasions for governmental
acquisition and public enjoyment of certain lands can be permanently
lost.
Therefore, the legislature intends to enact an express and
supplemental requirement obligating state agencies to notify local
governments of proposed land dispositions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Disposition" means sales, exchanges, or other actions
resulting in a transfer of land ownership.
(b) "State agencies" includes:
(i) The department of natural resources established in chapter
43.30 RCW;
(ii) The department of fish and wildlife established in chapter
43.300 RCW;
(iii) The department of transportation established in chapter 47.01
RCW;
(iv) The parks and recreation commission established in chapter
79A.05 RCW; and
(v) The department of general administration established in this
chapter.
(2) State agencies proposing disposition of state-owned land must
provide written notice of the proposed disposition to the legislative
authorities of the counties, cities, and towns in which the land is
located at least sixty days before entering into the disposition
agreement.
(3) The requirements of this section are in addition and
supplemental to other requirements of the laws of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.11 RCW
to read as follows:
Actions under this chapter are subject to the notification
requirements of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 79.17 RCW
to read as follows:
Actions under this chapter are subject to the notification
requirements of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 79.22 RCW
to read as follows:
Actions under this chapter are subject to the notification
requirements of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.300 RCW
to read as follows:
Actions under this chapter are subject to the notification
requirements of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 77.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Actions under this chapter are subject to the notification
requirements of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Actions under this chapter are subject to the notification
requirements of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 47.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Actions under this chapter are subject to the notification
requirements of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Actions under this chapter are subject to the notification
requirements of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05
RCW to read as follows:
Actions under this chapter are subject to the notification
requirements of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
Actions under this chapter are subject to the notification
requirements of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---