BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.250 and 2006 c 209 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following employment and licensing information is exempt from
public inspection and copying under this chapter:
(1) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination;
(2) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant;
(3) The dates of birth, residential addresses, residential
telephone numbers, personal wireless telephone numbers, personal
electronic mail addresses, social security numbers, and emergency
contact information of employees or volunteers of a public agency, and
the names, dates of birth, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, personal wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail
addresses, social security numbers, and emergency contact information
of dependents of employees or volunteers of a public agency that are
held by any public agency in personnel records, public employment
related records, or volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing
list of employees or volunteers of any public agency. For purposes of
this subsection, "employees" includes independent provider home care
workers as defined in RCW 74.39A.240;
(4) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (a) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (b) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed;
(5) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting a current investigation of a possible unfair practice under
chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other federal, state,
or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment; and
(6) Except as provided in RCW 47.64.220, salary and employee
benefit information collected under RCW 47.64.220(1) and described in
RCW 47.64.220(2).

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.230 and 2005 c 274 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following personal information is exempt from public
inspection and copying under this chapter:
(((1))) (a) Personal information in any files maintained for
students in public schools, patients or clients of public institutions
or public health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(((2))) (b) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(((3))) (c) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with
the assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would (((a))) (i) be prohibited to such
persons by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340 or (((b)))
(ii) violate the taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair
competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer; and
(((4))) (d) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic
check numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial
account numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or
governed by other law.
(2) As used in this section, "personal information" includes, but
is not limited to, information in RCW 42.56.250(3).

--- END ---