BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71.002 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the purpose of the medical ((quality assurance commission))
board for safety and quality to ((regulate)) protect the public health
through regulating the competency and quality of ((professional health
care providers)) physicians and physician assistants under its
jurisdiction by establishing, monitoring, and enforcing qualifications
for licensing, consistent standards of practice, continuing competency
mechanisms and quality care improvement programs, and ((discipline)) an
efficient and fair disciplinary process. Rules, policies, and
procedures developed by the ((commission)) board must promote the
delivery of safe quality health care to the residents of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.71.003 and 1955 c 202 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter is passed:
(1) In the exercise of the police power of the state to protect
public health, to promote the welfare of the state, and to provide an
adequate public agency to act as a disciplinary body for the members of
the medical profession licensed to practice medicine and surgery in
this state;
(2) Because the health and well-being of the people of this state
are of paramount importance;
(3) Because the conduct, which is of a unique and personal nature,
of members of the medical profession licensed to practice medicine and
surgery in this state plays a vital role in preserving the health and
well-being of the people of the state; and
(4) Because the ((agency which now exists to handle disciplinary
proceedings for members of the medical profession licensed to practice
medicine and surgery in this state is ineffective and very infrequently
employed, and consequently there is no effective means of handling such
disciplinary proceedings when they are necessary for the protection of
the public health)) public expects greater accountability of the
members of the medical profession who are licensed to practice medicine
and surgery in this state.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.71.010 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following terms used in this chapter shall have the meanings
set forth in this section unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise:
(1) (("Commission")) "Board" means the Washington state medical
((quality assurance commission)) board for safety and quality.
(2) (("Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(3))) "Resident physician" means an individual who has graduated
from a school of medicine which meets the requirements set forth in RCW
18.71.055 and is serving a period of postgraduate clinical medical
training sponsored by a college or university in this state or by a
hospital accredited by this state. For purposes of this chapter, the
term shall include individuals designated as intern or medical fellow.
(((4))) (3) "Emergency medical care" or "emergency medical service"
has the same meaning as in chapter 18.73 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.71.015 and 2006 c 8 s 103 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state medical ((quality assurance commission)) board
for safety and quality is established, consisting of thirteen
individuals licensed to practice medicine in the state of Washington
under this chapter, two individuals who are licensed as physician
assistants under chapter 18.71A RCW, and six individuals who are
members of the public. At least two of the public members shall not be
from the health care industry. Each congressional district now
existing or hereafter created in the state must be represented by at
least one physician member of the ((commission)) board. The terms of
office of members of the ((commission)) board are not affected by
changes in congressional district boundaries. Public members of the
((commission)) board may not be a member of any other health care
licensing board or commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a
facility rendering health services regulated by the ((commission))
board, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of
health services regulated by the ((commission)) board.
The members of the ((commission)) board shall be appointed by the
governor. Members of the initial ((commission)) board may be appointed
to staggered terms of one to four years, and thereafter all terms of
appointment shall be for four years. The governor shall consider such
physician and physician assistant members who are recommended for
appointment by the appropriate professional associations in the state.
In appointing the initial members of the ((commission)) board, it is
the intent of the legislature that, to the extent possible, the
existing members of the ((board of medical examiners and medical
disciplinary board repealed under section 336, chapter 9, Laws of 1994
sp. sess.)) medical quality assurance commission be appointed to the
((commission)) board. No member may serve more than two consecutive
full terms. Each member shall hold office until a successor is
appointed.
Each member of the ((commission)) board must be a citizen of the
United States, must be an actual resident of this state, and, if a
physician, must have been licensed to practice medicine in this state
for at least five years.
The ((commission)) board shall meet as soon as practicable after
appointment and elect officers each year. Meetings shall be held at
least four times a year and at such place as the ((commission)) board
determines and at such other times and places as the ((commission))
board deems necessary. A majority of the ((commission)) board members
appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
((commission)) board business.
The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the
((commission)) board is required to carry any motion or resolution, to
adopt any rule, or to pass any measure. The ((commission)) board may
appoint panels consisting of at least three members. A quorum for the
transaction of any business by a panel is a minimum of three members.
A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is required to transact
business delegated to it by the ((commission)) board.
Each member of the ((commission)) board shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.265 and in addition thereto shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of
the ((commission)) board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. Any such expenses shall be paid from funds ((appropriated
to the department of health)) in the medical professions account.
Whenever the governor is satisfied that a member of ((a
commission)) the board has been guilty of neglect of duty, misconduct,
or malfeasance or misfeasance in office, the governor shall file with
the secretary of state a statement of the causes for and the order of
removal from office, and the secretary shall forthwith send a certified
copy of the statement of causes and order of removal to the last known
post office address of the member.
Vacancies in the membership of the ((commission)) board shall be
filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor.
The members of the ((commission)) board are immune from suit in an
action, civil or criminal, based on its disciplinary proceedings or
other official acts performed in good faith as members of the
((commission)) board.
Whenever the workload of the ((commission)) board requires, the
((commission)) board may request that the ((secretary)) governor
appoint pro tempore members of the ((commission)) board. When serving,
pro tempore members of the ((commission)) board have all of the powers,
duties, and immunities, and are entitled to all of the emoluments,
including travel expenses, of regularly appointed members of the
((commission)) board.
The governor shall from time to time request that the board, a
panel of the board, or individual board members meet with her or him to
discuss the activities of the board.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.71.017 and 2000 c 171 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((commission)) board may adopt such rules as are not
inconsistent with the laws of this state as may be determined necessary
or proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The
((commission)) board is the successor in interest of the ((board of
medical examiners and the medical disciplinary board)) medical quality
assurance commission. All contracts, undertakings, agreements, rules,
regulations, and policies continue in full force and effect on ((July
1, 1994)) the effective date of this act, unless otherwise repealed or
rejected by this chapter or by the ((commission)) board.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.71.019 and 1996 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((Uniform)) medical disciplinary act, chapter ((18.130 RCW))
18.-- RCW (sections 44 through 88 of this act), governs unlicensed
practice and the issuance and denial of licenses and discipline of
licensees under this chapter. ((When a panel of the commission revokes
a license, the respondent may request review of the revocation order of
the panel by the remaining members of the commission not involved in
the initial investigation. The respondent's request for review must be
filed within twenty days of the effective date of the order revoking
the respondent's license. The review shall be scheduled for hearing by
the remaining members of the commission not involved in the initial
investigation within sixty days. The commission shall adopt rules
establishing review procedures.))

Sec. 7 RCW 18.71.0191 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 326 are each amended
to read as follows:
The ((secretary of the department of health)) governor shall
appoint, from a list of three names supplied by the ((commission))
board, an executive director who shall act to carry out the provisions
of this chapter. The ((secretary)) executive director may be removed
by either the governor or the board. The executive director at the
direction of the board shall ((also)) employ such additional staff
including attorneys, administrative assistants, investigators, and
clerical staff as are required to enable the ((commission)) board to
accomplish its duties and responsibilities. The executive director is
exempt from the provisions of the civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW,
as now or hereafter amended.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.71.0195 and 2005 c 274 s 227 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The contents of any report filed under ((RCW 18.130.070))
section 50 of this act shall be confidential and exempt from public
disclosure pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW, except that it may be
reviewed (a) by the licensee involved or his or her counsel or
authorized representative who may submit any additional exculpatory or
explanatory statements or other information, which statements or other
information shall be included in the file, or (b) by a representative
of the ((commission)) board, or investigator thereof, who has been
assigned to review the activities of a licensed physician.
Upon a determination that a report is without merit, the
((commission's)) board's records may be purged of information relating
to the report.
(2) Every individual, medical association, medical society,
hospital, ((medical service bureau)) health service contractor, health
insurance carrier or agent, professional liability insurance carrier,
professional standards review organization, agency of the federal,
state, or local government, or the entity established by RCW 18.71.300
and its officers, agents, and employees are immune from civil
liability, whether direct or derivative, for providing information to
the ((commission)) board under ((RCW 18.130.070)) section 50 of this
act, or for which an individual health care provider has immunity under
the provisions of RCW 4.24.240, 4.24.250, or 4.24.260.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.71.030 and 1996 c 178 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to or interfere
in any way with the practice of religion or any kind of treatment by
prayer; nor shall anything in this chapter be construed to prohibit:
(1) The furnishing of medical assistance in cases of emergency
requiring immediate attention;
(2) The domestic administration of family remedies;
(3) The administration of oral medication of any nature to students
by public school district employees or private elementary or secondary
school employees as provided for in chapter 28A.210 RCW;
(4) The practice of dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery,
nursing, chiropractic, podiatric medicine and surgery, optometry,
naturopathy, or any other healing art licensed under the methods or
means permitted by such license;
(5) The practice of medicine in this state by any commissioned
medical officer serving in the armed forces of the United States or
public health service or any medical officer on duty with the United
States veterans administration while such medical officer is engaged in
the performance of the duties prescribed for him or her by the laws and
regulations of the United States;
(6) The practice of medicine by any practitioner licensed by
another state or territory in which he or she resides, provided that
such practitioner shall not open an office or appoint a place of
meeting patients or receiving calls within this state;
(7) The practice of medicine by a person who is a regular student
in a school of medicine approved and accredited by the ((commission))
board, however, the performance of such services be only pursuant to a
regular course of instruction or assignments from his or her
instructor, or that such services are performed only under the
supervision and control of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter;
(8) The practice of medicine by a person serving a period of
postgraduate medical training in a program of clinical medical training
sponsored by a college or university in this state or by a hospital
accredited in this state, however, the performance of such services
shall be only pursuant to his or her duties as a trainee;
(9) The practice of medicine by a person who is regularly enrolled
in a physician assistant program approved by the ((commission)) board,
however, the performance of such services shall be only pursuant to a
regular course of instruction in said program and such services are
performed only under the supervision and control of a person licensed
pursuant to this chapter;
(10) The practice of medicine by a licensed physician assistant
which practice is performed under the supervision and control of a
physician licensed pursuant to this chapter;
(11) The practice of medicine, in any part of this state which
shares a common border with Canada and which is surrounded on three
sides by water, by a physician licensed to practice medicine and
surgery in Canada or any province or territory thereof;
(12) The administration of nondental anesthesia by a dentist who
has completed a residency in anesthesiology at a school of medicine
approved by the ((commission)) board, however, a dentist allowed to
administer nondental anesthesia shall do so only under authorization of
the patient's attending surgeon, obstetrician, or psychiatrist, and the
((commission)) board has jurisdiction to discipline a dentist
practicing under this exemption and enjoin or suspend such dentist from
the practice of nondental anesthesia according to this chapter and
chapter ((18.130 RCW)) 18.-- RCW (sections 44 through 88 of this act);
(13) Emergency lifesaving service rendered by a physician's trained
emergency medical service intermediate life support technician and
paramedic, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, if the emergency lifesaving
service is rendered under the responsible supervision and control of a
licensed physician;
(14) The provision of clean, intermittent bladder catheterization
for students by public school district employees or private school
employees as provided for in RCW 18.79.290 and 28A.210.280.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.71.040 and 2003 c 275 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The physicians and physician assistants of the state of Washington
are responsible for all costs associated with the licensing,
regulation, and discipline, pursuant to the medical disciplinary act,
chapter 18.-- RCW (section 44 through 88 of this act), of the medical
profession. Every applicant for a license to practice medicine and
surgery shall pay a fee determined by the ((secretary as provided in
RCW 43.70.250)) board to cover such costs. The board shall from time
to time establish the amount of all application fees, license fees,
registration fees, examination fees, permit fees, renewal fees, and any
other fees associated with the licensing, regulation, or discipline of
the profession. In fixing the fees, the board shall set the fees at a
sufficient level to defray the costs of administering the board
pursuant to this act and the board's obligations pursuant to the
medical disciplinary act. All such fees shall be fixed by rule adopted
by the board in accordance with the provisions of the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.71.050 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 307 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Each applicant who has graduated from a school of medicine
located in any state, territory, or possession of the United States,
the District of Columbia, or the Dominion of Canada, shall file an
application for licensure with the ((commission)) board on a form
prepared and approved by the ((secretary with the approval of the
commission)) board. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to
the ((commission)) board of the following:
(a) That the applicant has attended and graduated from a school of
medicine approved by the ((commission)) board;
(b) That the applicant has completed ((two)) three years of
postgraduate medical training in a program acceptable to the
((commission)) board, provided that applicants graduating before July
28, 1985, may complete only one year of postgraduate medical training;
(c) That the applicant is of good moral character; and
(d) That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of safely
carrying on the practice of medicine. The ((commission)) board may
require any applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as
it deems necessary to determine an applicant's physical and/or mental
capability to safely and competently practice medicine. The costs of
such examination or examinations shall be paid by the applicant.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the
((commission)) board from requiring such additional information from
applicants as it deems necessary. The issuance and denial of licenses
are subject to chapter ((18.130 RCW)) 18.-- RCW (sections 44 through 88
of this act), the ((Uniform)) medical disciplinary act.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.71.051 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 308 are each amended
to read as follows:
Applicants for licensure to practice medicine who have graduated
from a school of medicine located outside of the states, territories,
and possessions of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the
Dominion of Canada, shall file an application for licensure with the
((commission)) board on a form prepared and approved by the ((secretary
with the approval of the commission)) board. Each applicant shall
furnish proof satisfactory to the ((commission)) board of the
following:
(1) That he or she has completed in a school of medicine a resident
course of professional instruction equivalent to that required in this
chapter for applicants generally;
(2) That he or she meets all the requirements, including but not
limited to RCW 18.71.050(1) (a) through (c) which must be met by
graduates of the United States and Canadian school of medicine except
that he or she need not have graduated from a school of medicine
approved by the ((commission)) board;
(3) That he or she has satisfactorily passed the examination given
by the educational council for foreign medical graduates or has met the
requirements in lieu thereof as set forth in rules adopted by the
((commission)) board;
(4) That he or she has the ability to read, write, speak,
understand, and be understood in the English language.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.71.055 and 1996 c 178 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((commission)) board may approve any school of medicine which
is located in any state, territory, or possession of the United States,
the District of Columbia, or in the Dominion of Canada, provided that
it:
(1) Requires collegiate instruction which includes courses deemed
by the ((commission)) board to be prerequisites to medical education;
(2) Provides adequate instruction in the following subjects:
Anatomy, biochemistry, microbiology and immunology, pathology,
pharmacology, physiology, anaesthesiology, dermatology, gynecology,
internal medicine, neurology, obstetrics, ophthalmology, orthopedic
surgery, otolaryngology, pediatrics, physical medicine and
rehabilitation, preventive medicine and public health, psychiatry,
radiology, surgery, and urology, and such other subjects determined by
the ((commission)) board;
(3) Provides clinical instruction in hospital wards and out-patient
clinics under guidance.
Approval may be withdrawn by the ((commission)) board at any time
a medical school ceases to comply with one or more of the requirements
of this section.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the
((commission)) board to approve a school of osteopathic medicine and
surgery, or osteopathic medicine, for purposes of qualifying an
applicant to be licensed under this chapter by direct licensure,
reciprocity, or otherwise.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.71.060 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 310 are each amended
to read as follows:
The ((commission)) board shall keep an official record of all its
proceedings, a part of which record shall consist of a register of all
applicants for licensure under this chapter, with the result of each
application. The record shall be evidence of all the proceedings of
the ((commission)) board that are set forth in it.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.71.070 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 311 are each amended
to read as follows:
With the exception of those applicants granted licensure through
the provisions of RCW 18.71.090 or 18.71.095, applicants for licensure
must successfully complete an examination either administered or
approved by the ((commission)) board to determine their professional
qualifications. The ((commission)) board shall prepare and give, or
approve the preparation and giving of, an examination which shall cover
those general subjects and topics, a knowledge of which is commonly and
generally required of candidates for the degree of doctor of medicine
conferred by approved colleges or schools of medicine in the United
States. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the ((commission))
board has the sole responsibility for determining the proficiency of
applicants under this chapter, and, in so doing, may waive any
prerequisite to licensure not set forth in this chapter.
The ((commission)) board may by rule establish the passing grade
for the examination.
Examination results shall be part of the records of the
((commission)) board and shall be permanently kept with the applicant's
file.

Sec. 16 RCW 18.71.080 and 1996 c 191 s 52 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every person licensed to practice medicine in this state shall pay
licensing fees established by the board under RCW 18.71.040 and renew
his or her license in accordance with ((administrative)) the procedures
and ((administrative)) requirements adopted ((as provided in RCW
43.70.250 and 43.70.280)) by the board.
The board shall establish by rule the procedures, requirements, and
fees for initial issue, renewal, and reissue of a license to practice
medicine under this chapter, including procedures and requirements for
late renewals and uniform application of late renewal penalties.
Failure to renew invalidates the license and all privileges granted by
the license.
The board may, from time to time, extend or otherwise modify the
duration of the licensing period, whether an initial or renewal period,
if the board determines that it would result in a more economical or
efficient operation of state government and that the public health,
safety, or welfare would not be substantially adversely affected
thereby. However, no license may be issued or approved for a period in
excess of four years, without renewal. Such extension, reduction, or
other modification of a licensing period shall be by rule of the board
adopted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW. Such
rules may provide a method for imposing and collecting such additional
proportional fee as may be required for the extended or modified
period.
The ((commission)) board may establish rules governing mandatory
continuing education requirements which shall be met by physicians
applying for renewal of licenses. The rules shall provide that
mandatory continuing education requirements may be met in part by
physicians showing evidence of the completion of approved activities
relating to professional liability risk management. The ((commission))
board, in its sole discretion, may permit an applicant who has not
renewed his or her license to be licensed without examination if it is
satisfied that such applicant meets all the requirements for licensure
in this state, and is competent to engage in the practice of medicine.

Sec. 17 RCW 18.71.085 and 1996 c 191 s 53 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((commission)) board may adopt rules pursuant to this section
authorizing an inactive license status.
(1) An individual licensed pursuant to this chapter ((18.71 RCW))
may place his or her license on inactive status. The holder of an
inactive license shall not practice medicine and surgery in this state
without first activating the license.
(2) The ((administrative)) procedures, ((administrative))
requirements, and fees for inactive renewal shall be established
pursuant to RCW ((43.70.250 and 43.70.280)) 18.71.040 and 18.71.080.
(3) An inactive license may be placed in an active status upon
compliance with rules established by the ((commission)) board.
(4) Provisions relating to disciplinary action against a person
with a license shall be applicable to a person with an inactive
license, except that when disciplinary proceedings against a person
with an inactive license have been initiated, the license shall remain
inactive until the proceedings have been completed.

Sec. 18 RCW 18.71.090 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 314 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any applicant who meets the requirements of RCW 18.71.050 and has
been licensed under the laws of another state, territory, or possession
of the United States, or of any province of Canada, or an applicant who
has satisfactorily passed examinations given by the national board of
medical examiners may, in the discretion of the ((commission)) board,
be granted a license without examination on the payment of the fees
required by this chapter: PROVIDED, That the applicant must file with
the ((commission)) board a copy of the license certified by the proper
authorities of the issuing state to be a full, true copy thereof, and
must show that the standards, eligibility requirements, and
examinations of that state are at least equal in all respects to those
of this state.

Sec. 19 RCW 18.71.095 and 2001 c 114 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((commission)) board may, without examination, issue a limited
license to persons who possess the qualifications set forth herein:
(1) The ((commission)) board may, upon the written request of the
secretary of the department of social and health services or the
secretary of corrections, issue a limited license to practice medicine
in this state to persons who have been accepted for employment by the
department of social and health services or the department of
corrections as physicians; who are licensed to practice medicine in
another state of the United States or in the country of Canada or any
province or territory thereof; and who meet all of the qualifications
for licensure set forth in RCW 18.71.050.
Such license shall permit the holder thereof to practice medicine
only in connection with patients, residents, or inmates of the state
institutions under the control and supervision of the secretary of the
department of social and health services or the department of
corrections.
(2) The ((commission)) board may issue a limited license to
practice medicine in this state to persons who have been accepted for
employment by a county or city health department as physicians; who are
licensed to practice medicine in another state of the United States or
in the country of Canada or any province or territory thereof; and who
meet all of the qualifications for licensure set forth in RCW
18.71.050.
Such license shall permit the holder thereof to practice medicine
only in connection with his or her duties in employment with the city
or county health department.
(3) Upon receipt of a completed application showing that the
applicant meets all of the requirements for licensure set forth in RCW
18.71.050 except for completion of ((two)) three years of postgraduate
medical training, and that the applicant has been appointed as a
resident physician in a program of postgraduate clinical training in
this state approved by the ((commission)) board, the ((commission))
board may issue a limited license to a resident physician. Such
license shall permit the resident physician to practice medicine only
in connection with his or her duties as a resident physician and shall
not authorize the physician to engage in any other form of practice.
Each resident physician shall practice medicine only under the
supervision and control of a physician licensed in this state, but such
supervision and control shall not be construed to necessarily require
the personal presence of the supervising physician at the place where
services are rendered.
(4)(a) Upon nomination by the dean of the school of medicine at the
University of Washington or the chief executive officer of a hospital
or other appropriate health care facility licensed in the state of
Washington, the ((commission)) board may issue a limited license to a
physician applicant invited to serve as a teaching-research member of
the institution's instructional staff if the sponsoring institution and
the applicant give evidence that he or she has graduated from a
recognized medical school and has been licensed or otherwise privileged
to practice medicine at his or her location of origin. Such license
shall permit the recipient to practice medicine only within the
confines of the instructional program specified in the application and
shall terminate whenever the holder ceases to be involved in that
program, or at the end of one year, whichever is earlier. Upon request
of the applicant and the institutional authority, the license may be
renewed.
(b) Upon nomination by the dean of the school of medicine of the
University of Washington or the chief executive officer of any hospital
or appropriate health care facility licensed in the state of
Washington, the ((commission)) board may issue a limited license to an
applicant selected by the sponsoring institution to be enrolled in one
of its designated departmental or divisional fellowship programs
provided that the applicant shall have graduated from a recognized
medical school and has been granted a license or other appropriate
certificate to practice medicine in the location of the applicant's
origin. Such license shall permit the holder only to practice medicine
within the confines of the fellowship program to which he or she has
been appointed and, upon the request of the applicant and the
sponsoring institution, the license may be renewed by the
((commission)) board for no more than a total of two years.
All persons licensed under this section shall be subject to the
jurisdiction of the ((commission)) board to the same extent as other
members of the medical profession, in accordance with this chapter and
chapter ((18.130 RCW)) 18.-- RCW (sections 44 through 88 of this act).
Persons applying for licensure and renewing licenses pursuant to
this section shall comply with ((administrative)) procedures,
((administrative)) requirements, and fees determined by the board as
provided in RCW ((43.70.250 and 43.70.280)) 18.71.040 and 18.71.080.
Any person who obtains a limited license pursuant to this section may
apply for licensure under this chapter, but shall submit a new
application form and comply with all other licensing requirements of
this chapter.

Sec. 20 RCW 18.71.205 and 1996 c 191 s 55 and 1996 c 178 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of the department of health, in conjunction with
the advice and assistance of the emergency medical services licensing
and certification advisory committee as prescribed in RCW 18.73.050,
and the ((commission)) board, shall prescribe:
(a) Practice parameters, training standards for, and levels of,
physician trained emergency medical service intermediate life support
technicians and paramedics;
(b) Minimum standards and performance requirements for the
certification and recertification of physician's trained emergency
medical service intermediate life support technicians and paramedics;
and
(c) Procedures for certification, recertification, and
decertification of physician's trained emergency medical service
intermediate life support technicians and paramedics.
(2) Initial certification shall be for a period established by the
secretary pursuant to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(3) Recertification shall be granted upon proof of continuing
satisfactory performance and education, and shall be for a period
established by the secretary pursuant to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(4) As used in this chapter((s 18.71)) and chapter 18.73 RCW,
"approved medical program director" means a person who:
(a) Is licensed to practice medicine and surgery pursuant to this
chapter ((18.71 RCW)) or osteopathic medicine and surgery pursuant to
chapter 18.57 RCW; and
(b) Is qualified and knowledgeable in the administration and
management of emergency care and services; and
(c) Is so certified by the department of health for a county, group
of counties, or cities with populations over four hundred thousand in
coordination with the recommendations of the local medical community
and local emergency medical services and trauma care council.
(5) The Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
uncertified practice, the issuance and denial of certificates, and the
disciplining of certificate holders under this section. The secretary
shall be the disciplining authority under this section. Disciplinary
action shall be initiated against a person credentialed under this
chapter in a manner consistent with the responsibilities and duties of
the medical program director under whom such person is responsible.
(6) Such activities of physician's trained emergency medical
service intermediate life support technicians and paramedics shall be
limited to actions taken under the express written or oral order of
medical program directors and shall not be construed at any time to
include free standing or nondirected actions, for actions not
presenting an emergency or life-threatening condition.

Sec. 21 RCW 18.71.230 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 317 are each amended
to read as follows:
A right to practice medicine and surgery by an individual in this
state pursuant to RCW 18.71.030 (5) through (12) shall be subject to
discipline by order of the ((commission)) board upon a finding by the
((commission)) board of an act of unprofessional conduct as defined in
((RCW 18.130.180)) section 70 of this act or that the individual is
unable to practice with reasonable skill or safety due to a mental or
physical condition as described in ((RCW 18.130.170)) section 67 of
this act. Such physician shall have the same rights of notice,
hearing, and judicial review as provided licensed physicians generally
under this chapter and chapter ((18.130 RCW)) 18.-- RCW (sections 44
through 88 of this act).

Sec. 22 RCW 18.71.300 and 1998 c 132 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 18.71.310
through 18.71.340 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Entity" means a nonprofit corporation formed by physicians who
have expertise in the areas of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, alcoholism,
other drug addictions, and mental illness and who broadly represent the
physicians of the state and that has been designated to perform any or
all of the activities set forth in RCW 18.71.310(1) by the
((commission)) board.
(2) "Impaired" or "impairment" means the inability to practice
medicine with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of
physical or mental illness including alcohol abuse, drug abuse,
alcoholism, other drug addictions, or other debilitating conditions.
(3) "Impaired physician program" means the program for the
prevention, detection, intervention, monitoring, and treatment of
impaired physicians established by the ((commission)) board pursuant to
RCW 18.71.310(1).
(4) "Physician" or "practitioner" means a person licensed under
this chapter, chapter 18.71A RCW, or a professional licensed under
another chapter of Title 18 RCW whose disciplining authority has a
contract with the entity for an impaired practitioner program for its
license holders.
(5) "Treatment program" means a plan of care and rehabilitation
services provided by those organizations or persons authorized to
provide such services to be approved by the ((commission)) board or
entity for impaired physicians taking part in the impaired physician
program created by RCW 18.71.310.

Sec. 23 RCW 18.71.310 and 2001 c 109 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((commission)) board shall enter into a contract with the
entity to implement an impaired physician program. The ((commission))
board may enter into a contract with the entity for up to six years in
length. The impaired physician program may include any or all of the
following:
(a) Entering into relationships supportive of the impaired
physician program with professionals who provide either evaluation or
treatment services, or both;
(b) Receiving and assessing reports of suspected impairment from
any source;
(c) Intervening in cases of verified impairment, or in cases where
there is reasonable cause to suspect impairment;
(d) Upon reasonable cause, referring suspected or verified impaired
physicians for evaluation or treatment;
(e) Monitoring the treatment and rehabilitation of impaired
physicians including those ordered by the ((commission)) board;
(f) Providing monitoring and continuing treatment and
rehabilitative support of physicians;
(g) Performing such other activities as agreed upon by the
((commission)) board and the entity; and
(h) Providing prevention and education services.
(2) A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section
shall be financed by a surcharge of not less than twenty-five and not
more than thirty-five dollars per year on each license renewal or
issuance of a new license to be collected by the department of health
from every physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter in
addition to other license fees. These moneys shall be placed in the
impaired physician account to be used solely for the implementation of
the impaired physician program.

Sec. 24 RCW 18.71.315 and 1998 c 132 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The impaired physician account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from RCW 18.71.310 from license
surcharges on physicians and physician assistants shall be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may only be used for
the impaired physician program under this chapter. Only the
((secretary of health or the secretary's designee)) board or its
executive director may authorize expenditures from the account. No
appropriation is required for expenditures from this account.

Sec. 25 RCW 18.71.320 and 1998 c 132 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The entity shall develop procedures in consultation with the
((commission)) board for:
(1) Periodic reporting of statistical information regarding
impaired physician activity;
(2) Periodic disclosure and joint review of such information as the
((commission)) board may deem appropriate regarding reports received,
contacts or investigations made, and the disposition of each report.
However, the entity shall not disclose any personally identifiable
information except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this
section;
(3) Immediate reporting to the ((commission)) board of the name and
results of any contact or investigation regarding any suspected or
verified impaired physician who is reasonably believed probably to
constitute an imminent danger to himself or herself or to the public;
(4) Reporting to the ((commission)) board, in a timely fashion, any
suspected or verified impaired physician who fails to cooperate with
the entity, fails to submit to evaluation or treatment, or whose
impairment is not substantially alleviated through treatment, or who,
in the opinion of the entity, is probably unable to practice medicine
with reasonable skill and safety;
(5) Informing each participant of the impaired physician program of
the program procedures, the responsibilities of program participants,
and the possible consequences of noncompliance with the program.

Sec. 26 RCW 18.71.330 and 1998 c 132 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the ((commission)) board has reasonable cause to believe that a
physician is impaired, the ((commission)) board shall cause an
evaluation of such physician to be conducted by the entity or the
entity's designee or the ((commission's)) board's designee for the
purpose of determining if there is an impairment. The entity or
appropriate designee shall report the findings of its evaluation to the
((commission)) board.

Sec. 27 RCW 18.71.350 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 333 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Every institution or organization providing professional
liability insurance to physicians shall send a complete report to the
((commission)) board of all malpractice settlements, awards, or
payments ((in excess of twenty thousand dollars)) as a result of a
claim or action for damages alleged to have been caused by an insured
physician's incompetency or negligence in the practice of medicine.
Such institution or organization shall also report the award,
settlement, or payment of three or more claims during a five-year time
period as the result of the alleged physician's incompetence or
negligence in the practice of medicine regardless of the dollar amount
of the award or payment.
(2) Reports required by this section shall be made within sixty
days of the date of the settlement or verdict. Failure to comply with
this section is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred
fifty dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 (1) There is created in the state treasury
an account to be known as the medical professions account. All fees or
other funds received by the board for licenses, registration,
certifications, renewals, or examinations and any civil penalties
assessed and collected by the board under chapter 18.-- RCW (sections
44 through 88 of this act) shall be forwarded to the state treasurer
who shall credit such moneys to the medical professions account. Any
residue in the medical professions account shall be accumulated and
shall not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium. Any
interest accrued from surplus funds in the medical professions account
shall be deposited in the medical professions account and shall not
revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium.
(2) Expenditures from the medical professions account may be used
only for the exclusive purpose of carrying out the licensing,
disciplinary, and other functions of the board as set forth in chapters
18.71, 18.71A, and 18.-- (sections 44 through 88 of this act) RCW. No
appropriation is required for expenditures from this account.
(3) Only the board or its executive director may authorize
expenditures from the medical professions account.
(4) All funds not appropriated but deposited in the medical
professions account from licensing fees and other funds collected from
physician and physician assistants prior to July 2007 shall be
transferred into the medical professions account by the state
treasurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 The board shall provide an annual report of
the activities of the board to the legislature and shall make itself
available to answer questions of the legislature at such times as are
mutually convenient to both the board and the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 31 through 36 of this act unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Entity" means a nonprofit corporation formed by physicians who
have expertise in the areas of medical standards of care, ethical
conduct, and other professional standards, and who broadly represent
the physicians of the state of Washington, and has been designated to
perform any or all of the activities set forth in section 32 of this
act by the board.
(2) "Physician education and improvement program" means a quality
care improvement program that seeks to educate and improve physician
proficiency with regard to quality of care, professional standards,
ethical guidelines, and other practice standard issues established by
the board pursuant to section 32 of this act.
(3) "Physician" or "practitioner" means a person licensed under
this chapter or chapter 18.71A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 It is the purpose of the legislature to
improve patient safety and the quality of patient care through the
creation of an organization that can assist physicians and physician
assistants whose care may be lacking in certain respects, but does not
yet present a significant threat to the public and is not yet
actionable under the medical disciplinary act. The goal of the
voluntary organization is to help improve the care of physicians and
physician assistants so that they can provide safer and higher quality
care to the citizens of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 (1) The board shall enter into a contract
with the entity to implement a physician education and improvement
program. The board may enter into a contract with the entity for up to
six years in length. The physician education and improvement program
may include any or all of the following:
(a) Entering into relationships supportive of the physician
education and improvement program with professionals who provide the
following services: Evaluation, education, or quality care
improvement;
(b) Receiving and assessing reports from any source raising issues
with a physician's or physician assistant's care or conduct that may
need improvement;
(c) Intervening in cases of questionable behavior or care, or in
cases where there is reasonable cause to suspect there is a quality of
care or behavior issue;
(d) Upon reasonable cause, referring physicians or physician
assistants for evaluation, education, or quality improvement;
(e) Monitoring the education and quality improvement of physicians
and physician assistants;
(f) Providing monitoring and continuing rehabilitative support of
physicians and physician assistants;
(g) Performing such other activities as agreed upon by the board
and the entity; and
(h) Providing prevention, education, and quality improvement
services.
(2) A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section
shall be financed by funds in the medical professions account; or if
determined necessary by the board, a surcharge of not less than
twenty-five and not more than thirty-five dollars per year on each
license renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the
board from every physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter in
addition to other license fees. These moneys shall be placed in the
physician education and improvement account to be used solely for the
implementation of the physician education and improvement program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 The physician education and improvement
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts
from section 32 of this act from license surcharges on physicians and
physician assistants shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may only be used for the physician education and
improvement program under sections 30 through 36 of this act. Only the
board or its executive director may authorize expenditures from the
account. No appropriation is required for expenditures from this
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 The entity shall develop procedures in
consultation with the board for:
(1) Periodic reporting of statistical information regarding
physician education and improvement program activity;
(2) Periodic disclosure and joint review of such information as the
board may deem appropriate regarding reports received, contacts or
investigations made, and the disposition of each report. However, the
entity shall not disclose any personally identifiable information
except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section;
(3) Immediate reporting to the board of the name and results of any
contact or investigation regarding any physician who is reasonably
believed to constitute a danger to himself or herself or to the public;
(4) Reporting to the board, in a timely fashion, any physician who
fails to cooperate with the entity, who fails to submit to evaluation
or rehabilitation, whose problems are not substantially alleviated
through education or a quality improvement course, or who, in the
opinion of the entity, is probably unable to practice medicine with
reasonable skill and safety;
(5) Informing each participant of the physician education and
improvement program of the program procedures, the responsibilities of
program participants, and the possible consequences of noncompliance
with the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 If the board has reasonable cause to
believe that a physician's practice is deficient in some capacity, but
the behavior is not egregious enough to constitute unprofessional
conduct under the medical disciplinary act, chapter 18.-- RCW (sections
44 through 88 of this act), the board may cause an evaluation of such
physician to be conducted by the entity or the entity's designee or the
board's designee for the purpose of determining if education is
appropriate for the physician. The entity or appropriate designee
shall report the findings of its evaluation to the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 All entity records and all findings
pursuant to sections 31 through 35 of this act are not subject to
disclosure pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 37 RCW 18.71A.010 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 318 are each amended
to read as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Physician assistant" means a person who is licensed by the
((commission)) board to practice medicine to a limited extent only
under the supervision of a physician as defined in chapter 18.71 RCW
and who is academically and clinically prepared to provide health care
services and perform diagnostic, therapeutic, preventative, and health
maintenance services.
(2) (("Commission")) "Board" means the Washington state medical
((quality assurance commission)) board for safety and quality.
(3) "Practice medicine" has the meaning defined in RCW 18.71.011.
(((4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.))

Sec. 38 RCW 18.71A.020 and 1999 c 127 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((commission)) board shall adopt rules fixing the
qualifications and the educational and training requirements for
licensure as a physician assistant or for those enrolled in any
physician assistant training program. The requirements shall include
completion of an accredited physician assistant training program
approved by the ((commission)) board and within one year successfully
take and pass an examination approved by the ((commission)) board, if
the examination tests subjects substantially equivalent to the
curriculum of an accredited physician assistant training program. An
interim permit may be granted by the department of health for one year
provided the applicant meets all other requirements. Physician
assistants licensed by the board of medical examiners, ((or)) the
medical quality assurance commission, or the board as of ((July 1,
1999,)) the effective date of this act shall continue to be licensed.
(2)(a) The ((commission)) board shall adopt rules governing the
extent to which:
(i) Physician assistant students may practice medicine during
training; and
(ii) Physician assistants may practice after successful completion
of a physician assistant training course.
(b) Such rules shall provide:
(i) That the practice of a physician assistant shall be limited to
the performance of those services for which he or she is trained; and
(ii) That each physician assistant shall practice medicine only
under the supervision and control of a physician licensed in this
state, but such supervision and control shall not be construed to
necessarily require the personal presence of the supervising physician
or physicians at the place where services are rendered.
(3) Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the
((commission)) board on a form prepared and approved by the ((secretary
with the approval of the commission)) board, detailing the education,
training, and experience of the physician assistant and such other
information as the ((commission)) board may require. The application
shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the ((secretary)) board as
provided in RCW ((43.70.250 and 43.70.280)) 18.71.040 and 18.71.080.
A surcharge of twenty-five dollars per year shall be charged on each
license renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the
((department)) board and deposited into the impaired physician account
for physician assistant participation in the impaired physician
program. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the
((commission)) board of the following:
(a) That the applicant has completed an accredited physician
assistant program approved by the ((commission)) board and is eligible
to take the examination approved by the ((commission)) board;
(b) That the applicant is of good moral character; and
(c) That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of
practicing medicine as a physician assistant with reasonable skill and
safety. The ((commission)) board may require an applicant to submit to
such examination or examinations as it deems necessary to determine an
applicant's physical or mental capability, or both, to safely practice
as a physician assistant.
(4) The ((commission)) board may approve, deny, or take other
disciplinary action upon the application for license as provided in the
((Uniform)) medical disciplinary act, chapter ((18.130 RCW)) 18.-- RCW
(sections 44 through 88 of this act). The license shall be renewed as
determined under RCW ((43.70.250 and 43.70.280)) 18.71.040 and
18.71.080. The ((commission)) board may authorize the use of
alternative supervisors who are licensed either under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW.

Sec. 39 RCW 18.71A.025 and 1986 c 259 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((uniform)) medical disciplinary act, chapter ((18.130 RCW))
18.-- RCW (sections 44 through 88 of this act), governs the issuance
and denial of licenses and the discipline of licensees under this
chapter.

Sec. 40 RCW 18.71A.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 320 are each amended
to read as follows:
A physician assistant may practice medicine in this state only with
the approval of the practice arrangement plan by the ((commission))
board and only to the extent permitted by the ((commission)) board. A
physician assistant who has received a license but who has not received
((commission)) board approval of the practice arrangement plan under
RCW 18.71A.040 may not practice. A physician assistant shall be
subject to discipline under chapter ((18.130 RCW)) 18.-- RCW (sections
44 through 88 of this act).

Sec. 41 RCW 18.71A.040 and 1996 c 191 s 58 and 1996 c 191 s 40
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) No physician assistant practicing in this state shall be
employed or supervised by a physician or physician group without the
approval of the ((commission)) board.
(2) Prior to commencing practice, a physician assistant licensed in
this state shall apply to the ((commission)) board for permission to be
employed or supervised by a physician or physician group. The practice
arrangement plan shall be jointly submitted by the physician or
physician group and physician assistant. ((Administrative))
Procedures, ((administrative)) requirements, and fees shall be
established as provided in RCW ((43.70.250 and 43.70.280)) 18.71.040
and 18.71.080. The practice arrangement plan shall delineate the
manner and extent to which the physician assistant would practice and
be supervised. Whenever a physician assistant is practicing in a
manner inconsistent with the approved practice arrangement plan, the
((commission)) board may take disciplinary action under chapter
((18.130 RCW)) 18.-- RCW (sections 44 through 88 of this act).

Sec. 42 RCW 18.71A.050 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 323 are each amended
to read as follows:
No physician who supervises a licensed physician assistant in
accordance with and within the terms of any permission granted by the
((commission)) board is considered as aiding and abetting an unlicensed
person to practice medicine. The supervising physician and physician
assistant shall retain professional and personal responsibility for any
act which constitutes the practice of medicine as defined in RCW
18.71.011 when performed by the physician assistant.

Sec. 43 RCW 18.71A.085 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 325 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any physician assistant acupuncturist currently licensed by the
((commission)) board may continue to perform acupuncture under the
physician assistant license as long as he or she maintains licensure as
a physician assistant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 44 Protecting patients is one of the
legislature's most important goals and a necessary component of an
efficient health delivery system. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to improve patient safety by requiring greater
accountability from the procedures, processes, and organization
responsible for disciplining the state's licensed physicians and
physician assistants through the establishment of a separate
disciplinary act, the medical disciplinary act, with procedures and
processes unique to the medical profession and the creation of a
separate independent medical review body responsible for ruling on
medical disciplinary cases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 45 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the Washington state medical board for safety and
quality, which has the authority to take disciplinary action against a
holder of, or applicant for, a license to practice medicine upon a
finding of a violation of this chapter.
(2) "Medical review panel" means an independent adjudicative panel
responsible for acting as the impartial trier of fact and issuing final
orders for all disciplinary hearings brought pursuant to this chapter.
(3) "Medical law judge" means an attorney licensed in the state of
Washington responsible for (a) ensuring all disciplinary hearings
requested pursuant to this chapter are conducted in a fair and
efficient manner, (b) presiding over all disciplinary hearings and
ruling on all procedural and evidentiary motions, (c) assisting the
medical review panel with other general issues of procedure and
process, and (d) signing off on all orders, stipulations, subpoena
requests, statements of charges, summary suspensions, or other actions
taken by the board or the medical review panel.
(4) "Unlicensed practice" means:
(a) Practicing medicine without holding a valid, unexpired,
unrevoked, and unsuspended license to do so; or
(b) Representing to a consumer, through offerings, advertisements,
or use of a professional title or designation, that the individual is
qualified to practice medicine, without holding a valid, unexpired,
unrevoked, and unsuspended license to do so.
(5) "Disciplinary action" means sanctions identified in section 65
of this act.
(6) "Practice review" means an investigative audit of records
related to the complaint, without prior identification of specific
patient or consumer names, or an assessment of the conditions,
circumstances, and methods of the professional's practice related to
the complaint, to determine whether unprofessional conduct may have
been committed.
(7) "Health agency" means city and county health departments and
the department of health.
(8) "License," "licensing," and "licensure" shall be deemed
equivalent to the terms "license," "licensing," "licensure,"
"certificate," "certification," and "registration" as those terms are
defined in RCW 18.120.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 46 (1) This chapter applies to the medical
board for safety and quality and the physicians and physician
assistants licensed under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW.
(2) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
board has the authority to grant or deny licenses based on the
conditions and criteria established in this chapter. This chapter also
governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to denial of
licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the applicant's
compliance with an order entered pursuant to section 65 of this act by
the board or medical review panel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 47 The board has the following authority:
(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind such rules as are deemed necessary
to carry out this chapter, and, in consultation with the medical review
panel, to adopt, amend, and rescind such rules as are deemed necessary
to carry out the activities of the medical review panel as set forth in
this chapter;
(2) To investigate all complaints or reports of unprofessional
conduct as defined in this chapter;
(3) To issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any
investigation or proceeding held under this chapter;
(4) To take or cause depositions to be taken and use other
discovery procedures as needed in any investigation or proceeding held
under this chapter;
(5) In the course of investigating a complaint or report of
unprofessional conduct, to conduct practice reviews;
(6) To take emergency action ordering summary suspension of a
license, or restriction or limitation of the license holder's practice
pending completion of all required proceedings provided for in this
chapter. Consistent with section 82 of this act, the board shall issue
a summary suspension of the license or temporary practice permit of a
license holder prohibited from practicing medicine in another state,
federal, or foreign jurisdiction because of an act of unprofessional
conduct that is substantially equivalent to an act of unprofessional
conduct prohibited by this chapter. The summary suspension remains in
effect until all required proceedings provided for in this chapter have
been completed;
(7) To use individual members of the board to direct
investigations;
(8) To enter into contracts for professional services determined to
be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;
(9) To contract with licensees or other persons or organizations to
provide services necessary for the monitoring and supervision of
licensees who are placed on probation, whose professional activities
are restricted, or who are for any authorized purpose subject to
monitoring by the board;
(10) To adopt standards of professional conduct or practice;
(11) To grant or deny license applications, and in the event of a
finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder, to
impose any sanction against a license applicant or license holder
provided by this chapter;
(12) To establish panels consisting of three or more members of the
board to perform any duty or authority within the board's jurisdiction
under this chapter;
(13) To review and audit the records of licensed health facilities'
or services' quality assurance committee decisions in which a
licensee's practice privilege or employment is terminated or
restricted. Each health facility or service shall produce and make
accessible to the board the appropriate records and otherwise
facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall not be
subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action
pursuant to RCW 70.41.200(3);
(14) To employ such investigative, administrative, and clerical
staff as necessary for the enforcement of this chapter;
(15) To establish fees to be paid for witnesses, expert witnesses,
and consultants used in any investigation;
(16) To conduct investigations and practice reviews, issue
subpoenas, administer oaths, and take depositions in the course of
conducting investigations and practice reviews;
(17) To establish a system to recruit potential public members,
review the qualifications of such potential members, and provide
orientation to those public members appointed by the governor;
(18) To adopt rules requiring every license holder to report
information identified in section 50 of this act;
(19) To appoint pro tem members to participate as members of the
board or a panel of the board in connection with proceedings
specifically identified by the board. Individuals so appointed must
meet the same minimum qualifications as regular members of the board.
Pro tem members appointed for matters under this chapter are appointed
for a term of no more than one year. No pro tem member may serve more
than four one-year terms. While serving as board members pro tem,
persons so appointed have all the powers, duties, and immunities and
are entitled to the emoluments, including travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, of regular members of the board. The
chairperson of a panel of the board shall be a regular member of the
board appointed by the board chairperson. Board panels have authority
to act as directed by the board with respect to all matters concerning
the review, investigation, and settlement of all complaints,
allegations, charges, and matters subject to the jurisdiction of the
board. The authority to act through board panels does not restrict the
authority of the board to act as a single body at any phase of
proceedings within the board's jurisdiction. Board panels may make
interim orders and issue final orders with respect to matters and cases
delegated to the panel by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 48 The medical review panel has the following
authority:
(1) Assist the board with its responsibility of adopting, amending,
and rescinding rules deemed necessary to carry out the activities of
the medical review panel as set forth in this chapter;
(2) In consultation with the board, enter into contracts for
professional services determined necessary for administering this
chapter;
(3) Upon a finding, after a disciplinary hearing, that a license
holder or applicant has committed unprofessional conduct or is unable
to practice with reasonable skill and safety due to a physical or
mental condition, the panel may issue an order pursuant to section 65
of this act;
(4) Authorize the board to monitor, supervise, and enforce any
sanction or order issued by the panel against a licensee;
(5) Review all board summary suspensions within ten days for
probable cause;
(6) Appoint pro tem members to participate as members of the panel
in connection with disciplinary proceedings. Individuals so appointed
must meet the same minimum qualifications as regular members of the
panel. Pro tem members appointed for matters under this chapter are
appointed for a term of no more than one year. No pro tem member may
serve more than four one-year terms. While serving as panel members
pro tem, persons so appointed have all the powers, duties, and
immunities and are entitled to the emoluments, including travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, of regular
members of the panel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 49 The medical law judge has the following
authority:
(1) To schedule and preside over all disciplinary hearings as
provided for in this chapter;
(2) To rule on procedural and other motions, issue subpoenas, and
administer oaths in connection with disciplinary hearings;
(3) To compel attendance of witnesses at disciplinary hearings;
(4) To sign off on all orders, stipulations, subpoena requests,
statements of charges, summary suspensions, or other actions taken by
the board or the medical review panel;
(5) To employ such administrative and clerical staff as necessary
for the enforcement of this chapter;
(6) To provide legal, administrative, and other assistance as
requested by the medical review panel;
(7) To establish fees to witnesses in any disciplinary proceeding
as authorized by RCW 34.05.446.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 50 (1)(a) The board shall adopt rules
requiring every license holder to report to the board any conviction,
determination, or finding that another license holder has committed an
act which constitutes unprofessional conduct, or to report information
to the board, an impaired practitioner program, voluntary substance
abuse monitoring program approved by the board, or physician education
and improvement program approved by the board, which indicates that the
other license holder may not be able to practice his or her profession
with reasonable skill and safety to consumers as a result of a mental
or physical condition.
(b) The board may adopt rules to require other persons, including
corporations, organizations, health care facilities, impaired
practitioner programs, voluntary substance abuse monitoring programs
approved by the board, or physician education and improvement program
approved by the board, and state or local government agencies to
report:
(i) Any conviction, determination, or finding that a license holder
has committed an act which constitutes unprofessional conduct; or
(ii) Information to the board, an impaired practitioner program,
voluntary substance abuse monitoring program approved by the board, or
physician education and improvement program approved by the board,
which indicates that the license holder may not be able to practice his
or her profession with reasonable skill and safety to consumers as a
result of a mental or physical condition.
(c) If a report has been made by a hospital to the department of
health pursuant to RCW 70.41.210, the department shall forward the
report to the board. To facilitate meeting the intent of this section,
the cooperation of agencies of the federal government is requested by
reporting any conviction, determination, or finding that a federal
employee or contractor regulated by the board has committed an act
which constituted unprofessional conduct and reporting any information
which indicates that a federal employee or contractor regulated by the
board may not be able to practice his or her profession with reasonable
skill and safety as a result of a mental or physical condition.
(d) Reporting under this section is not required by:
(i) Any entity with a peer review committee, quality improvement
committee, or other similarly designated professional review committee,
or by a license holder who is a member of such committee, during the
investigative phase of the respective committee's operations if the
investigation is completed in a timely manner; or
(ii) An impaired practitioner program, voluntary substance abuse
monitoring program approved by the board, or physician education and
improvement program approved by the board, if (A) the license holder is
currently enrolled in the program, (B) the license holder actively
participates in the program, and (C) the license holder's impairment
does not constitute a clear and present danger to the public health,
safety, or welfare.
(2) If a person fails to furnish a required report, the board may
petition the superior court of the county in which the person resides
or is found, and the court shall issue to the person an order to
furnish the required report. A failure to obey the order is a contempt
of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW.
(3) A person is immune from civil liability, whether direct or
derivative, for providing information to the board pursuant to the
rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(4)(a) The holder of a license subject to the jurisdiction of this
chapter shall report to the board:
(i) Any conviction, determination, or finding that he or she has
committed unprofessional conduct or is unable to practice with
reasonable skill or safety; and
(ii) Any disqualification from participation in the federal
medicare program, under Title XVIII of the federal social security act,
or the federal medicaid program, under Title XIX of the federal social
security act.
(b) Failure to report within thirty days of notice of the
conviction, determination, finding, or disqualification constitutes
grounds for disciplinary action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 51 (1) If an individual licensed in another
state that has licensing standards substantially equivalent to
Washington applies for a license, the board shall issue a temporary
practice permit authorizing the applicant to practice the profession
pending completion of documentation that the applicant meets the
requirements for a license and is also not subject to denial of a
license or issuance of a conditional license under this chapter. The
temporary permit may reflect statutory limitations on the scope of
practice. The permit shall be issued only upon the board receiving
verification from the states in which the applicant is licensed that
the applicant is currently licensed and is not subject to charges or
disciplinary action for unprofessional conduct or impairment.
Notwithstanding RCW 34.05.422(3), the board shall establish, by rule,
the duration of the temporary practice permits.
(2) Failure to surrender the temporary practice permit is a
misdemeanor under RCW 9A.20.010 and is unprofessional conduct under
this chapter.
(3) The issuance of temporary permits is subject to the provisions
of this chapter, including summary suspensions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 52 (1) A person, including but not limited to
consumers, licensees, corporations, organizations, health care
facilities, impaired practitioner programs, voluntary substance abuse
monitoring programs approved by the board, physician education and
improvement programs approved by the board, and state and local
governmental agencies, may submit a written complaint to the board
charging a license holder or applicant with unprofessional conduct and
specifying the grounds therefor or to report information to the board,
voluntary substance abuse monitoring program, an impaired practitioner
program approved by the board, or physician education and improvement
program approved by the board, which indicates that the license holder
may not be able to practice his or her profession with reasonable skill
and safety to consumers as a result of a mental or physical condition.
If the board determines that the complaint merits investigation, or if
the board has reason to believe, without a formal complaint, that a
license holder or applicant may have engaged in unprofessional conduct,
the board shall investigate to determine whether there has been
unprofessional conduct. In determining whether or not to investigate,
the board shall consider any prior complaints received by the board,
any prior findings of fact under section 58 of this act, any
stipulations to informal disposition under section 68 of this act, and
any comparable action taken by other state disciplining authorities.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the board shall
initiate an investigation in every instance where the board receives
information that a license holder has been disqualified from
participating in the federal medicare program, under Title XVIII of the
federal social security act, or the federal medicaid program, under
Title XIX of the federal social security act.
(3) A person who files a complaint or reports information under
this section in good faith is immune from suit in any civil action
related to the filing or contents of the complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 53 If the board communicates in writing to a
complainant, or his or her representative, regarding his or her
complaint, such communication shall not include the address or
telephone number of the license holder against whom he or she has
complained. The board shall inform all applicants for a license of the
provisions of this section and chapter 42.56 RCW regarding the release
of address and telephone information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 54 (1) If the board determines, upon
investigation, that there is reason to believe a violation of section
70 of this act has occurred, a statement of charge or charges shall be
prepared and served upon the license holder or applicant at the
earliest practical time. The statement of charge or charges shall be
accompanied by a notice that the license holder or applicant may
request a hearing before a medical review panel to contest the charge
or charges. The license holder or applicant must file a request for
hearing with the presiding medical law judge within twenty days after
being served the statement of charges. If the twenty-day limit results
in a hardship upon the license holder or applicant, he or she may
request for good cause an extension not to exceed sixty additional
days. If the medical law judge finds that there is good cause, the
judge shall grant the extension. The failure to request a hearing
constitutes a default, whereupon the board may enter a decision on the
basis of the facts available to it.
(2) If a hearing is requested, the time of the hearing shall be
fixed by the medical law judge as soon as convenient, but the hearing
shall not be held earlier than thirty days after service of the charges
upon the license holder or applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 55 (1)(a) The board shall develop uniform
procedural rules to respond to public inquiries concerning complaints
and their disposition, active investigations, statements of charges,
findings of fact, and final orders involving a licensee, applicant, or
unlicensed person. Rules adopted by the board related to hearings
before the medical review panel shall be developed by the board in
consultation with the medical review panel. The procedural rules
adopted under this subsection apply to all adjudicative proceedings
conducted under this chapter and shall include provisions for
establishing time periods for initial assessment, investigation,
charging, discovery, settlement, and adjudication of complaints, and
shall include enforcement provisions for violations of the specific
time periods by the board, the medical review panel, and the
respondent. A licensee must be notified upon receipt of a complaint,
except when the notification would impede an effective investigation.
At the earliest point of time the licensee must be allowed to submit a
written statement about that complaint, which statement must be
included in the file. Complaints are exempt from public disclosure
under chapter 42.56 RCW until the complaint has been initially assessed
and determined to warrant an investigation by the board. Complaints
determined not to warrant an investigation by the board are no longer
considered complaints, but must remain in the records and tracking
system of the board. Information about complaints that did not warrant
an investigation, including the existence of the complaint, may be
released only upon receipt of a written public disclosure request or
pursuant to an interagency agreement as provided in (b) of this
subsection. Complaints determined to warrant no cause for action after
investigation are subject to public disclosure, must include an
explanation of the determination to close the complaint, and must
remain in the records and tracking system of the board.
(b) The board shall enter into interagency agreements for the
exchange of records, which may include complaints filed but not yet
assessed, with other state agencies if access to the records will
assist those agencies in meeting their federal or state statutory
responsibilities. Records obtained by state agencies under the
interagency agreements are subject to the limitations on disclosure
contained in (a) of this subsection.
(2) The procedures for conducting investigations shall provide that
prior to taking a written statement:
(a) For violation of this chapter, the investigator shall inform
such person, in writing of: (i) The nature of the complaint; (ii) that
the person may consult with legal counsel at his or her expense prior
to making a statement; and (iii) that any statement that the person
makes may be used in an adjudicative proceeding conducted under this
chapter; and
(b) From a witness or potential witness in an investigation under
this chapter, the investigator shall inform the person, in writing,
that the statement may be released to the licensee, applicant, or
unlicensed person under investigation if a statement of charges is
issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 56 (1) The settlement process must be uniform
for all licensees governed under this chapter. The board may also use
alternative dispute resolution to resolve complaints during
adjudicative proceedings.
(2) Disclosure of the identity of reviewing board members who
participate in the settlement process is available to the respondent or
his or her representative upon request.
(3) The settlement conference will occur only if a settlement is
not achieved through written documents. The respondent will have the
opportunity to conference either by phone or in person with the
reviewing board member if the respondent chooses. The respondent may
also have his or her attorney conference either by phone or in person
with the reviewing board member without the respondent being present
personally.
(4) If the respondent wants to meet in person with the reviewing
board member, he or she will travel to the reviewing board member and
have such a conference with another board representative in attendance
either by phone or in person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 57 Except as otherwise set forth in this
chapter, the procedures governing adjudicative proceedings before
agencies under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act,
govern all hearings before the medical review panel. The medical
review panel and medical law judge have, in addition to the powers and
duties set forth in this chapter, all of the powers and duties under
chapter 34.05 RCW, which include, without limitation, all powers
relating to the administration of oaths, the receipt of evidence, the
issuance and enforcing of subpoenas, and the taking of depositions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 58 (1) In the event of a finding of
unprofessional conduct by the board or after a hearing by the medical
review panel, the board or the medical review panel, as the case may
be, shall prepare and serve findings of fact and an order as provided
in chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act. If the license
holder or applicant is found to have not committed unprofessional
conduct by the board or after a hearing by the medical review panel,
the board or the medical review panel, as the case may be, shall
forthwith prepare and serve findings of fact and an order of dismissal
of the charges, including public exoneration of the licensee or
applicant. The findings of fact and order shall be retained by the
board or the medical review panel, as the case may be, as a permanent
record.
(2) The board shall report the issuance of statements of charges
and final orders, including final orders issued by the medical review
panel, to:
(a) The person or agency who brought to the board's attention
information which resulted in the initiation of the case;
(b) Appropriate organizations, public or private, which serve the
professions;
(c) The public. Notification of the public shall include press
releases to appropriate local news media and the major news wire
services; and
(d) Counterpart licensing boards in other states, or associations
of state licensing boards.
(3) This section shall not be construed to require the reporting of
any information which is exempt from public disclosure under chapter
42.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 59 The board shall not issue any license to
any person whose license has been denied, revoked, or suspended by the
board or medical review panel except in conformity with the terms and
conditions of the certificate or order of denial, revocation, or
suspension, or in conformity with any order of reinstatement issued by
the board or medical review panel, or in accordance with the final
judgment in any proceeding for review instituted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 60 The board shall suspend the license of any
person who has been certified by a lending agency and reported to the
board for nonpayment or default on a federally or state-guaranteed
educational loan or service-conditional scholarship. Prior to the
suspension, the board must provide the person an opportunity for a
brief adjudicative proceeding under RCW 34.05.485 through 34.05.494 and
issue a finding of nonpayment or default on a federally or state-guaranteed educational loan or service-conditional scholarship. The
person's license shall not be reissued until the person provides the
board with a written release issued by the lending agency stating that
the person is making payments on the loan in accordance with a
repayment agreement approved by the lending agency. If the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for licensure during the
suspension, reinstatement shall be automatic upon receipt of the notice
and payment of any reinstatement fee the board may impose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 61 The board shall immediately suspend the
license of any person subject to this chapter who has been certified by
the department of social and health services as a person who is not in
compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 62 An order pursuant to proceedings authorized
by this chapter, after due notice and findings in accordance with this
chapter and chapter 34.05 RCW, or an order of summary suspension
entered under this chapter, shall take effect immediately upon its
being served. The order, if appealed to the court, shall not be stayed
pending the appeal unless the board or medical review panel that issued
the order or court to which the appeal is taken enters an order staying
the order of the board or medical review panel, which stay shall
provide for terms necessary to protect the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 63 An individual who has been disciplined or
whose license has been denied by the board or medical review panel may
appeal the decision as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 64 A person whose license has been suspended
or revoked under this chapter may petition the board for reinstatement
after an interval as determined by the board or medical review panel in
its order. The board shall hold hearings on the petition and may deny
the petition or may order reinstatement and impose terms and conditions
as provided in section 65 of this act and issue an order of
reinstatement. The board may require successful completion of an
examination as a condition of reinstatement.
A person whose license has been suspended for noncompliance with a
support order under RCW 74.20A.320 may petition for reinstatement at
any time by providing the board a release issued by the department of
social and health services stating that the person is in compliance
with the order. If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, the board shall
automatically reissue the person's license upon receipt of the release,
and payment of a reinstatement fee, if any.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 65 Upon a finding, after hearing before the
medical review panel, that a license holder or applicant has committed
unprofessional conduct or is unable to practice with reasonable skill
and safety due to a physical or mental condition, the medical review
panel may consider the imposition of sanctions, taking into account any
prior findings of fact under section 58 of this act, any stipulations
to informal disposition under section 68 of this act, and any action
taken by other in-state or out-of-state disciplining authorities, and
issue an order providing for one or any combination of the following:
(1) Revocation of the license;
(2) Suspension of the license for a fixed or indefinite term;
(3) Restriction or limitation of the practice;
(4) Requiring the satisfactory completion of a specific program of
remedial education or treatment;
(5) The monitoring of the practice by a supervisor approved by the
medical review panel;
(6) Censure or reprimand;
(7) Compliance with conditions of probation for a designated period
of time;
(8) Payment of a fine for each violation of this chapter, not to
exceed five thousand dollars per violation. Funds received shall be
placed in the medical professions account;
(9) Denial of the license request;
(10) Corrective action;
(11) Refund of fees billed to and collected from the consumer;
(12) A surrender of the practitioner's license in lieu of other
sanctions, which must be reported to the federal data bank.
Any of the actions under this section may be totally or partly
stayed by the medical review panel. Safeguarding the public's health
and safety is the paramount responsibility of the medical review panel
and in determining what action is appropriate, the medical review panel
must first consider what sanctions are necessary to protect or
compensate the public. Only after such provisions have been made may
the medical review panel consider and include in the order requirements
designed to rehabilitate the license holder or applicant. All costs
associated with compliance with orders issued under this section are
the obligation of the license holder or applicant.
The licensee or applicant may enter into a stipulated disposition
of charges with the board that includes one or more of the sanctions of
this section, but only after a statement of charges has been issued and
the licensee has been afforded the opportunity for a hearing before the
medical review panel and has elected on the record to forego such a
hearing. The stipulation shall either contain one or more specific
findings of unprofessional conduct or inability to practice, or a
statement by the licensee acknowledging that evidence is sufficient to
justify one or more specified findings of unprofessional conduct or
inability to practice. The stipulation entered into pursuant to this
subsection shall be considered formal disciplinary action for all
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 66 Where an order for payment of a fine is
made as a result of a hearing under section 57 or 72 of this act and
timely payment is not made as directed in the final order, the board
may enforce the order for payment in the superior court in the county
in which the hearing was held. This right of enforcement shall be in
addition to any other rights the board may have as to any licensee
ordered to pay a fine but shall not be construed to limit a licensee's
ability to seek judicial review under section 63 of this act.
In any action for enforcement of an order of payment of a fine, the
board or medical panel's order, as the case may be, is conclusive proof
of the validity of the order of payment of a fine and the terms of
payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 67 (1) If the board believes a license holder
or applicant may be unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety
to consumers by reason of any mental or physical condition, a statement
of charges in the name of the board shall be served on the license
holder or applicant and notice shall also be issued providing an
opportunity for a hearing before the medical review panel. The hearing
shall be limited to the sole issue of the capacity of the license
holder or applicant to practice with reasonable skill and safety. If
the medical review panel determines that the license holder or
applicant is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety for
one of the reasons stated in this subsection, the medical review panel
shall impose such sanctions under section 65 of this act as is deemed
necessary to protect the public. If the license holder chooses not to
have the case heard before the medical review panel, the board must
assume the allegations raised in the statement of charges are correct
and shall impose sanctions under section 65 of this act as is deemed
necessary to protect the public.
(2)(a) In investigating a complaint or report that a license holder
or applicant may be unable to practice with reasonable skill or safety
by reason of any mental or physical condition, the board may require a
license holder or applicant to submit to a mental or physical
examination by one or more licensed or certified health professionals
designated by the board. The license holder or applicant shall be
provided written notice of the board's intent to order a mental or
physical examination, which notice shall include: (i) A statement of
the specific conduct, event, or circumstances justifying an
examination; (ii) a summary of the evidence supporting the board's
concern that the license holder or applicant may be unable to practice
with reasonable skill and safety by reason of a mental or physical
condition, and the grounds for believing such evidence to be credible
and reliable; (iii) a statement of the nature, purpose, scope, and
content of the intended examination; (iv) a statement that the license
holder or applicant has the right to respond in writing within twenty
days to challenge the board's grounds for ordering an examination or to
challenge the manner or form of the examination; and (v) a statement
that if the license holder or applicant timely responds to the notice
of intent, then the license holder or applicant will not be required to
submit to the examination while the response is under consideration.
(b) Upon submission of a timely response to the notice of intent to
order a mental or physical examination, the license holder or applicant
shall have an opportunity to respond to or refute such an order by
submission of evidence or written argument or both. The evidence and
written argument supporting and opposing the mental or physical
examination shall be reviewed by the medical review panel. The medical
review panel may, in its discretion, ask for oral argument from the
parties. The medical review panel shall prepare a written decision as
to whether there is reasonable cause to believe that the license holder
or applicant may be unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety
by reason of a mental or physical condition, or the manner or form of
the mental or physical examination that is appropriate, or both.
(c) Upon receipt by the board of the written decision, or upon the
failure of the license holder or applicant to timely respond to the
notice of intent, the board may issue an order requiring the license
holder or applicant to undergo a mental or physical examination. All
such mental or physical examinations shall be narrowly tailored to
address only the alleged mental or physical condition and the ability
of the license holder or applicant to practice with reasonable skill
and safety. An order of the board requiring the license holder or
applicant to undergo a mental or physical examination is not a final
order for purposes of appeal. The cost of the examinations ordered by
the board shall be paid out of the medical professions account. In
addition to any examinations ordered by the board, the licensee may
submit physical or mental examination reports from licensed or
certified health professionals of the license holder's or applicant's
choosing and expense.
(d) If the board finds that a license holder or applicant has
failed to submit to a properly ordered mental or physical examination,
then the board may order appropriate action or discipline under section
70(9) of this act, unless the failure was due to circumstances beyond
the person's control. However, no such action or discipline may be
imposed unless the license holder or applicant has had the notice and
opportunity to challenge the board's grounds for ordering the
examination, to challenge the manner and form, to assert any other
defenses, and to have such challenges or defenses considered by the
medical review panel. Further, the action or discipline ordered by the
board shall not be more severe than a suspension of the license,
certification, registration, or application until such time as the
license holder or applicant complies with the properly ordered mental
or physical examination.
(e) Nothing in this section restricts the power of the board to act
in an emergency under RCW 34.05.422(4), 34.05.479, and section 47(6) of
this act.
(f) A determination by a court of competent jurisdiction that a
license holder or applicant is mentally incompetent or mentally ill is
presumptive evidence of the license holder's or applicant's inability
to practice with reasonable skill and safety. An individual affected
under this section shall at reasonable intervals be afforded an
opportunity, at his or her expense, to demonstrate that the individual
can resume competent practice with reasonable skill and safety to the
consumer.
(3) For the purpose of subsection (2) of this section, an applicant
or license holder governed by this chapter, by making application,
practicing, or filing a license renewal, is deemed to have given
consent to submit to a mental, physical, or psychological examination
when directed in writing by the board and further to have waived all
objections to the admissibility or use of the examining health
professional's testimony or examination reports by the board on the
ground that the testimony or reports constitute privileged
communications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 68 (1) Prior to serving a statement of charges
under section 54 or 67 of this act, the board may furnish a statement
of allegations to the licensee or applicant along with a detailed
summary of the evidence relied upon to establish the allegations and a
proposed stipulation for informal resolution of the allegations. These
documents shall be exempt from public disclosure until such time as the
allegations are resolved either by stipulation or otherwise.
(2) The board and the applicant or licensee may stipulate that the
allegations may be disposed of informally in accordance with this
subsection. The stipulation shall contain a statement of the facts
leading to the filing of the complaint; the act or acts of
unprofessional conduct alleged to have been committed or the alleged
basis for determining that the applicant or licensee is unable to
practice with reasonable skill and safety; a statement that the
stipulation is not to be construed as a finding of either
unprofessional conduct or inability to practice; an acknowledgement
that a finding of unprofessional conduct or inability to practice, if
proven, constitutes grounds for discipline under this chapter; and an
agreement on the part of the licensee or applicant that the sanctions
set forth in section 65 of this act, except section 65 (1), (2), (6),
and (8) of this act, may be imposed as part of the stipulation, except
that no fine may be imposed but the licensee or applicant may agree to
reimburse the board the costs of investigation and processing the
complaint up to an amount not exceeding one thousand dollars per
allegation; and an agreement on the part of the board to forego further
disciplinary proceedings concerning the allegations. A stipulation
entered into pursuant to this subsection shall not be considered formal
disciplinary action.
(3) If the licensee or applicant declines to agree to disposition
of the charges by means of a stipulation pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, the board may proceed to formal disciplinary action
pursuant to section 54 or 67 of this act.
(4) Upon execution of a stipulation under subsection (2) of this
section by both the licensee or applicant and the board, the complaint
is deemed disposed of and shall become subject to public disclosure on
the same basis and to the same extent as other records of the board.
Should the licensee or applicant fail to pay any agreed reimbursement
within thirty days of the date specified in the stipulation for
payment, the board may seek collection of the amount agreed to be paid
in the same manner as enforcement of a fine under section 66 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 69 (1) In lieu of disciplinary action under
section 65 of this act and if the board determines that the
unprofessional conduct may be the result of substance abuse, the board
may refer the license holder to a voluntary substance abuse monitoring
program approved by the board.
The cost of the treatment is the responsibility of the license
holder, but the responsibility does not preclude payment by an
employer, existing insurance coverage, or other sources. Primary
alcoholism or other drug addiction treatment shall be provided by
approved treatment programs under RCW 70.96A.020 or by any other
provider approved by the board. However, nothing shall prohibit the
board from approving additional services and programs as an adjunct to
primary alcoholism or other drug addiction treatment. The board may
also approve the use of out-of-state programs. Referral of the license
holder to the program shall be done only with the consent of the
license holder. Referral to the program may also include probationary
conditions for a designated period of time. If the license holder does
not consent to be referred to the program or does not successfully
complete the program, the board may take appropriate action under
section 65 of this act which includes suspension of the license unless
or until the board, in consultation with the director of the voluntary
substance abuse monitoring program, determines the license holder is
able to practice safely. The board shall adopt rules for the
evaluation of a relapse or program violation on the part of a license
holder in the substance abuse monitoring program. The evaluation shall
encourage program participation with additional conditions, in lieu of
disciplinary action, when the board determines that the license holder
is able to continue to practice with reasonable skill and safety.
(2) In addition to approving substance abuse monitoring programs
that may receive referrals from the board, the board may establish by
rule requirements for participation of license holders who are not
being investigated or monitored by the board for substance abuse.
License holders voluntarily participating in the approved programs
without being referred by the board shall not be subject to
disciplinary action under section 65 of this act for their substance
abuse, and shall not have their participation made known to the board,
if they meet the requirements of this section and the program in which
they are participating.
(3) The license holder shall sign a waiver allowing the program to
release information to the board if the licensee does not comply with
the requirements of this section or is unable to practice with
reasonable skill or safety. The substance abuse program shall report
to the board any license holder who fails to comply with the
requirements of this section or the program or who, in the opinion of
the program, is unable to practice with reasonable skill or safety.
License holders shall report to the board if they fail to comply with
this section or do not complete the program's requirements. License
holders may, upon the agreement of the program and board, reenter the
program if they have previously failed to comply with this section.
(4) The treatment and pretreatment records of license holders
referred to or voluntarily participating in approved programs are
confidential, exempt from chapter 42.56 RCW, and not subject to
discovery by subpoena or admissible as evidence except for monitoring
records reported to the board for cause as defined in subsection (3) of
this section. Monitoring records relating to license holders referred
to the program by the board or relating to license holders reported to
the board by the program for cause shall be released to the board at
the request of the board. Records held by the board under this section
are exempt from chapter 42.56 RCW and are not subject to discovery by
subpoena except by the license holder.
(5) "Substance abuse," as used in this section, means the
impairment, as determined by the board, of a license holder's
professional services by an addiction to, a dependency on, or the use
of alcohol, legend drugs, or controlled substances.
(6) This section does not affect an employer's right or ability to
make employment-related decisions regarding a license holder. This
section does not restrict the authority of the board to take
disciplinary action for any other unprofessional conduct.
(7) A person who, in good faith, reports information or takes
action in connection with this section is immune from civil liability
for reporting information or taking the action.
(a) The immunity from civil liability provided by this section
shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes of this section
and the persons entitled to immunity include:
(i) An approved monitoring treatment program;
(ii) The professional association operating the program;
(iii) Members, employees, or agents of the program or association;
(iv) Persons reporting a license holder as being possibly impaired
or providing information about the license holder's impairment; and
(v) Professionals supervising or monitoring the course of the
impaired license holder's treatment or rehabilitation.
(b) The courts are strongly encouraged to impose sanctions on
clients and their attorneys whose allegations under this subsection are
not made in good faith and are without either reasonable objective or
substantive grounds, or both.
(c) The immunity provided in this section is in addition to any
other immunity provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 70 The following conduct, acts, or conditions
constitute unprofessional conduct for any license holder or applicant
under the jurisdiction of this chapter:
(1) The commission of any act involving moral turpitude,
dishonesty, or corruption relating to the practice of medicine, whether
the act constitutes a crime or not. If the act constitutes a crime,
conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a condition precedent to
disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction, however, the judgment and
sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing disciplinary hearing of
the guilt of the license holder or applicant of the crime described in
the indictment or information, and of the person's violation of the
statute on which it is based. For the purposes of this section,
conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere is the basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which
the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section
abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;
(2) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in
obtaining a license or in reinstatement thereof;
(3) All advertising which is false, fraudulent, or misleading;
(4) Incompetence, negligence, or malpractice which results in
injury to a patient or which creates an unreasonable risk that a
patient may be harmed. The use of a nontraditional treatment by itself
does not constitute unprofessional conduct, provided that it does not
result in injury to a patient or create an unreasonable risk that a
patient may be harmed;
(5) Suspension, revocation, or restriction of the individual's
license to practice medicine by a competent authority in any state,
federal, or foreign jurisdiction, a certified copy of the order,
stipulation, or agreement being conclusive evidence of the revocation,
suspension, or restriction;
(6) The possession, use, prescription for use, or distribution of
controlled substances or legend drugs in any way other than for
legitimate or therapeutic purposes, diversion of controlled substances
or legend drugs, the violation of any drug law, or prescribing
controlled substances for oneself;
(7) Violation of any state or federal statute or administrative
rule regulating the practice of medicine, including any statute or rule
defining or establishing standards of patient care or professional
conduct or practice;
(8) Failure to cooperate with the board or the medical review panel
by:
(a) Not furnishing any papers or documents;
(b) Not furnishing in writing a full and complete explanation
covering the matter contained in the complaint filed with the board;
(c) Not responding to subpoenas issued by the board or the medical
review panel, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena is the
accused in the proceeding; or
(d) Not providing reasonable and timely access for authorized
representatives of the board seeking to perform practice reviews at
facilities utilized by the license holder;
(9) Failure to comply with an order issued by the board or the
medical review panel or a stipulation for informal disposition entered
into with the board;
(10) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice when a
license is required;
(11) Violations of rules established by any health agency;
(12) Practice beyond the scope of practice as defined by law or
rule;
(13) Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the
business or profession;
(14) Failure to adequately supervise auxiliary staff to the extent
that the consumer's health or safety is at risk;
(15) Engaging in the practice of medicine involving contact with
the public while suffering from a contagious or infectious disease
involving serious risk to public health;
(16) Promotion for personal gain of any unnecessary or
inefficacious drug, device, treatment, procedure, or service;
(17) Conviction of (a) a felony, or (b) any gross misdemeanor
relating to the practice of the person's profession. For the purposes
of this subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea
of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction and all
proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended.
Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A
RCW;
(18) The procuring, or aiding or abetting in procuring, a criminal
abortion;
(19) The offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat
disease by a secret method, procedure, treatment, or medicine, or the
treating, operating, or prescribing for any health condition by a
method, means, or procedure which the licensee refuses to divulge upon
demand of the board;
(20) The willful betrayal of a practitioner-patient privilege as
recognized by law;
(21) Violation of chapter 19.68 RCW;
(22) Interference with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding
by willful misrepresentation of facts before the board or its
authorized representative, or by the use of threats or harassment
against any patient or witness to prevent him or her from providing
evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal action, or by
the use of financial inducements to any patient or witness to prevent
or attempt to prevent him or her from providing evidence in a
disciplinary proceeding;
(23) Current misuse of:
(a) Alcohol;
(b) Controlled substances; or
(c) Legend drugs;
(24) Abuse of a client or patient or sexual contact with a client
or patient;
(25) Acceptance of more than a nominal gratuity, hospitality, or
subsidy offered by a representative or vendor of medical or health-related products or services intended for patients, in contemplation of
a sale or for use in research publishable in professional journals,
where a conflict of interest is presented, as defined by rules of the
board, based on recognized professional ethical standards;
(26) When requested by the board, upon application, renewal, or
otherwise, the failure of a licensee or applicant to report to the
board final actions taken against him or her by another licensing
jurisdiction, peer review body, health care institution, professional
or medical society or association, governmental agency, law enforcement
agency, or court for acts or conduct similar to acts or conduct that
would constitute unprofessional conduct under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 71 If a person or business regulated by this
chapter violates section 67 or 70 of this act, the attorney general,
any prosecuting attorney, the board, or any other person may maintain
an action in the name of the state of Washington to enjoin the person
from committing the violations. The injunction shall not relieve the
offender from criminal prosecution, but the remedy by injunction shall
be in addition to the liability of the offender to criminal prosecution
and disciplinary action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 72 (1) The board shall investigate complaints
concerning the practice of medicine by unlicensed persons.
(2) The board may issue a notice of intention to issue a cease and
desist order to any person whom the board has reason to believe is
engaged in the unlicensed practice of medicine. The person to whom
such notice is issued may request an adjudicative proceeding before the
medical review panel to contest the charges. The request for hearing
must be filed within twenty days after service of the notice of
intention to issue a cease and desist order. The failure to request a
hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the board may enter a
permanent cease and desist order, which may include a civil fine. All
proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) If the medical review panel makes a final determination that a
person has engaged or is engaging in unlicensed practice of medicine,
the medical review panel may issue a cease and desist order. In
addition, the medical review panel may impose a civil fine in an amount
not exceeding one thousand dollars for each day upon which the person
engaged in unlicensed practice of medicine. The proceeds of such fines
shall be deposited into the medical professions account.
(4) If the board makes a written finding of fact that the public
interest will be irreparably harmed by delay in issuing an order, the
board may issue a temporary cease and desist order. The person
receiving a temporary cease and desist order shall be provided an
opportunity for a prompt hearing before a medical review panel. The
temporary cease and desist order shall remain in effect until further
order of the medical review panel. The failure to request a prompt or
regularly scheduled hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the board
may enter a permanent cease and desist order, which may include a civil
fine.
(5) Neither the issuance of a cease and desist order nor payment of
a civil fine relieves the person so practicing without a license from
criminal prosecution, but the remedy of a cease and desist order or
civil fine is in addition to any criminal liability. The cease and
desist order is conclusive proof of unlicensed practice and may be
enforced under RCW 7.21.060. This method of enforcement of the cease
and desist order or civil fine may be used in addition to, or as an
alternative to, any provisions for enforcement of agency orders set out
in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) The attorney general, a county prosecuting attorney, the board,
or any person may in accordance with the laws of this state governing
injunctions, maintain an action in the name of this state to enjoin any
person practicing medicine without a license from engaging in such
practice until the required license is secured. However, the
injunction does not relieve the person so practicing without a license
from criminal prosecution therefor, but the remedy by injunction is in
addition to any criminal liability.
(7)(a) Unlicensed practice of medicine, unless otherwise exempted
by law, constitutes a gross misdemeanor for a single violation.
(b) Each subsequent violation, whether alleged in the same or in
subsequent prosecutions, is a class C felony punishable according to
chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(8) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or
assessed by a court because of a violation of this section shall be
remitted to the medical professions account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 73 A person or business that violates an
injunction issued under this chapter shall pay a civil penalty, as
determined by the court, of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars,
which shall be placed in the medical professions account. For the
purpose of this section, the superior court issuing any injunction
shall retain jurisdiction and the cause shall be continued, and in such
cases the attorney general acting in the name of the state may petition
for the recovery of civil penalties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 74 A person who attempts to obtain, obtains,
or attempts to maintain a license by willful misrepresentation or
fraudulent representation is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 75 If the board determines or has cause to
believe that a license holder has committed a crime, the board,
immediately subsequent to issuing findings of fact and a final order,
shall notify the attorney general or the county prosecuting attorney in
the county in which the act took place of the facts known to the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 76 The board may adopt rules pursuant to this
section authorizing a retired active license status. Such a licensee
shall meet the continuing education or continued competency
requirements, if any, established by the board for renewals and is
subject to the provisions of this chapter. Individuals who have
entered into retired status agreements with the board in any
jurisdiction do not qualify for a retired active license under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 77 (1) The board, medical review panel,
medical law judge, or individuals acting on their behalf are immune
from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on any disciplinary
proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their
duties.
(2) A voluntary substance abuse monitoring program, an impaired
practitioner program, or a physician education and improvement program,
approved by the board, or individuals acting on their behalf, are
immune from suit in a civil action based on any disciplinary
proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their
duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 78 Subject to RCW 40.07.040, the board shall
submit a biennial report to the legislature on its proceedings during
the biennium, detailing the number of complaints made, investigated,
and adjudicated and manner of disposition. The report may include
recommendations for improving the disciplinary process, including
proposed legislation. The board shall develop a uniform report format.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 79 The department of health shall coordinate
and assist the board with prescriptive authority in the development of
uniform guidelines for addressing opiate therapy for acute pain,
chronic pain associated with cancer and other terminal diseases, and
other chronic or intractable pain conditions. The purpose of the
guidelines is to assure the provision of effective medical treatment in
accordance with recognized national standards and consistent with
requirements of the public health and safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 80 This chapter does not affect the use of
records, obtained from the board, in any existing investigation or
action by any state agency. Nor does this chapter limit any existing
exchange of information between the board and other state agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 81 (1) As used in this section, "emergency or
disaster" has the same meaning as in RCW 38.52.010.
(2) The board shall issue a retired volunteer medical worker
license to any applicant who:
(a) Has held an active license issued by the board no more than ten
years prior to applying for an initial license under this section;
(b) Does not have any current restrictions on the ability to obtain
a license for violations of this chapter; and
(c) Submits proof of registration as a volunteer with a local
organization for emergency services or management as defined by chapter
38.52 RCW.
(3) License holders under this section must be supervised and may
practice only those duties that correspond to the scope of their
emergency worker assignment not to exceed their scope of practice prior
to retirement.
(4) The board shall adopt rules and policies to implement this
section.
(5) The board shall establish standards for the renewal of licenses
issued under this section, including continuing competency
requirements.
(6) License holders under this section are subject to the
provisions of this chapter as they may apply to the issuance and denial
of credentials, unauthorized practice, and discipline for acts of
unprofessional conduct.
(7) Nothing in this section precludes a physician or physician
assistant who holds an active license from providing medical services
during an emergency or disaster.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 82 Any individual who applies for a license or
temporary practice permit or holds a license or temporary practice
permit and is prohibited from practicing medicine in another state
because of an act of unprofessional conduct that is substantially
equivalent to an act of unprofessional conduct prohibited by this
chapter is prohibited from practicing medicine in this state until
proceedings of the board have been completed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 83 The board shall specify in an annual report
to the governor and legislature the number of full-time employees
designated as investigators and attorneys and the costs associated with
supporting their activities. The board shall also specify the
additional full-time employees designated as investigators and
attorneys that are required to achieve a staffing level that is able to
respond promptly, competently, and appropriately to the workload
associated with medical disciplinary activities and the costs
associated with supporting disciplinary activities. In identifying the
need for additional staff, the board shall develop a formula based on
its prior experience with staff levels compared to the number of
providers, complaints, investigations, and other criteria that the
board determines is relevant to staffing level decisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 84 (1) This chapter may be known and cited as
the medical disciplinary act.
(2) This chapter applies to any conduct, acts, or conditions
occurring on or after the effective date of this act.
(3) This chapter does not apply to or govern the construction of
and disciplinary action for any conduct, acts, or conditions occurring
prior to the effective date of this act. Such conduct, acts, or
conditions must be construed and disciplinary action taken according to
the provisions of law existing at the time of the occurrence in the
same manner as if this chapter had not been enacted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 85 There is created an independent medical
review panel for the state of Washington to be known as the Washington
state medical review panel. The panel shall consist of fourteen
members appointed by the governor who either previously served,
including as a pro tem member, on the former medical quality assurance
commission or the board, or are currently licensed to practice medicine
in the state of Washington under chapter 18.71 RCW. Members of the
panel shall include two physician assistants, four public members, and
eight physician members. Members of the initial panel may be appointed
to staggered terms of one to four years, and thereafter all terms of
appointment shall be for four years. There is not a limit as to the
number of former commission or board members that may serve on the
panel at any one time.
Prior to each disciplinary hearing a three-person hearing panel
shall be selected from the medical review panel to hear and rule on the
case. If the hearing is requested by a physician, then the hearing
panel shall consist of two physicians and one public panel member. If
the hearing is requested by a physician assistant, then the hearing
panel shall consist of one physician assistant, one physician, and one
public panel member.
A majority of the hearing panel shall make all determinations as to
findings of unprofessional conduct or other violations of the medical
disciplinary act, and determinations of final actions against the
licensee pursuant to section 58 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 86 The governor shall appoint three medical
law judges. The initial judges may be appointed to staggered terms of
two to six years, and thereafter all terms of appointment shall be for
six years. Each judge shall preside as acting judge for one four-month
term each year. As acting judge the medical law judge is responsible
for carrying out the duties and responsibilities set forth in this
section.
The judges must have the following minimum qualifications: Be
licensed to practice in the state of Washington, be in good standing
with the state bar, and have a minimum of five years' experience in
health law, including familiarity with medical disciplinary issues.
The ideal candidate will also have judicial experience as a pro tem
justice or other similar experience.
A medical law judge shall be present at all disciplinary hearings
to provide the hearing panel with assistance as necessary and shall
rule on all procedural, evidentiary, and other motions raised by the
parties. The medical law judge does not participate in the hearing
panel's deliberation or ruling process.
The medical law judge shall also:
(1) Schedule all disciplinary hearings as provided for in this
chapter;
(2) Rule on all procedural and other motions, issue subpoenas, and
administer oaths in connection with disciplinary hearings;
(3) Compel attendance of witnesses at disciplinary hearings;
(4) Sign off on all orders, stipulations, subpoena requests,
statements of charges, summary suspensions, or other actions taken by
the board or the medical review panel;
(5) Employ such administrative and clerical staff as necessary for
the enforcement of this chapter;
(6) Provide legal, administrative, and other assistance to the
medical review panel;
(7) Establish fees to witnesses in any disciplinary proceeding as
authorized by RCW 34.05.446.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 87 The board is responsible for funding the
functions and obligations of the medical review panel and medical law
judges under this chapter and ensuring that all activities of the
medical review panel and medical law judges remain independent from the
board's activities. The board, in collaboration with the panel, shall
adopt rules necessary for the medical review panel and medical law
judges to fulfill their obligations under this chapter. Compensation
of the panel, including the medical law judges, shall be determined by
the board.
Whenever the governor is satisfied that a member of the medical
review panel or a medical law judge has been guilty of neglect of duty,
misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office, the governor shall
file with the secretary of state a statement of the causes for and the
order of removal from office, and the secretary shall forthwith send a
certified copy of the statement of causes and order of removal to the
last known post office address of the member.
A vacancy on the medical review panel or as a medical law judge
shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor
as set forth in section 86 of this act.
The members of the medical review panel and the medical law judges
are immune from suit in an action, civil or criminal, based on their
official acts performed in good faith as members of the medical review
panel or as medical law judges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 88 The board or a panel of the board may
summarily suspend a license holder's license without a hearing if the
board or panel makes a good faith determination that the license holder
poses an immediate threat to the public health and safety, and within
ten days of the effective date of the order revoking the license, an
independent medical review panel shall review the board's summary
suspension order. The medical review panel may overturn the summary
suspension order if the board is unable to show probable cause that the
license holder poses an immediate threat to the public health and
safety. If the board is able to show probable cause that the license
holder poses an immediate threat to the public health and safety, the
suspension remains in effect.
Within twenty days of the medical review panel's determination to
sustain the suspension, the license holder may request a full hearing
before a new medical review panel to contest the basis for the board's
issuance of the summary suspension order. The full hearing before the
medical review panel shall be scheduled by the medical law judge within
ninety days of receipt of the request for a hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 89 (1) The medical quality assurance
commission is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions
are hereby transferred to the medical board for safety and quality.
All references to the medical quality assurance commission in the
Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the medical board
for safety and quality.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the medical quality
assurance commission shall be delivered to the custody of the medical
board for safety and quality. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
medical quality assurance commission shall be made available to the
medical board for safety and quality. All funds, credits, or other
assets held by the medical quality assurance commission shall be
assigned to the medical board for safety and quality.
(b) Any appropriations made to the medical quality assurance
commission shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred
and credited to the medical board for safety and quality.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the medical quality assurance commission are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the medical board for safety and
quality. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state
civil service law, are assigned to the medical board for safety and
quality to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly,
without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be
appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing
state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the medical quality
assurance commission shall be continued and acted upon by the medical
board for safety and quality. All existing contracts and obligations
shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the medical board
for safety and quality.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the medical quality assurance commission shall not affect the validity
of any act performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 90 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the department of health pertaining to licensing and disciplining of
physicians and physician assistants are transferred to the medical
board for safety and quality. All references to the secretary or the
department of health in the Revised Code of Washington shall be
construed to mean the medical board for safety and quality when
referring to the functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
health pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be delivered to the custody of the medical board for safety and
quality. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed by the department of health in
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
made available to the medical board for safety and quality. All funds,
credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions,
and duties transferred shall be assigned to the medical board for
safety and quality.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of health for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
medical board for safety and quality.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of health engaged in performing
the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the medical board for safety and quality. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the medical board for safety and quality to
perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any
loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
health pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be continued and acted upon by the medical board for safety and
quality. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full
force and shall be performed by the medical board for safety and
quality.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of health shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

Sec. 91 RCW 18.130.040 and 2004 c 38 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(viii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(ix) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(x) Persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(xi) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and
family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xii) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xiii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiv) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xvi) Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(xvii) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xviii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xix) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xx) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;
(xxi) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
and
(xxii) Recreational therapists.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) ((The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x))) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(((xi))) (x) The board of occupational therapy practice as
established in chapter 18.59 RCW;
(((xii))) (xi) The nursing care quality assurance commission as
established in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations
issued under that chapter;
(((xiii))) (xii) The examining board of psychology and its
disciplinary committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(((xiv))) (xiii) The veterinary board of governors as established
in chapter 18.92 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses
based on the conditions and criteria established in this chapter and
the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter
also governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to
denial of licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the
applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW 18.130.160
by the disciplining authority.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 92 RCW 18.50.115 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 707 are each amended
to read as follows:
A midwife licensed under this chapter may obtain and administer
prophylactic ophthalmic medication, postpartum oxytocic, vitamin K, Rho
immune globulin (human), and local anesthetic and may administer such
other drugs or medications as prescribed by a physician. A pharmacist
who dispenses such drugs to a licensed midwife shall not be liable for
any adverse reactions caused by any method of use by the midwife.
The secretary, after consultation with representatives of the
midwife advisory committee, the board of pharmacy, and the medical
((quality assurance commission)) board for safety and quality, may
adopt rules that authorize licensed midwives to purchase and use legend
drugs and devices in addition to the drugs authorized in this chapter.

Sec. 93 RCW 69.41.030 and 2003 c 142 s 3 and 2003 c 53 s 323 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, deliver, or
possess any legend drug except upon the order or prescription of a
physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon
under chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53
RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, a
dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon
under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a
commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed
forces or public health service in the discharge of his or her official
duties, a duly licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans
administration in the discharge of his or her official duties, a
registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner under
chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the nursing care quality assurance
commission, an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW
when authorized by the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, a
physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the
medical ((quality assurance commission)) board for safety and quality,
a physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a physician
licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist
licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon
licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, or a veterinarian
licensed to practice veterinary medicine, in any province of Canada
which shares a common border with the state of Washington or in any
state of the United States: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the above
provisions shall not apply to sale, delivery, or possession by drug
wholesalers or drug manufacturers, or their agents or employees, or to
any practitioner acting within the scope of his or her license, or to
a common or contract carrier or warehouseman, or any employee thereof,
whose possession of any legend drug is in the usual course of business
or employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter or
chapter 18.64 RCW shall prevent a family planning clinic that is under
contract with the department of social and health services from
selling, delivering, possessing, and dispensing commercially
prepackaged oral contraceptives prescribed by authorized, licensed
health care practitioners.
(2)(a) A violation of this section involving the sale, delivery, or
possession with intent to sell or deliver is a class B felony
punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(b) A violation of this section involving possession is a
misdemeanor.

Sec. 94 RCW 69.45.010 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 738 are each amended
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the board of pharmacy.
(2) "Drug samples" means any federal food and drug administration
approved controlled substance, legend drug, or products requiring
prescriptions in this state, which is distributed at no charge to a
practitioner by a manufacturer or a manufacturer's representative,
exclusive of drugs under clinical investigations approved by the
federal food and drug administration.
(3) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate
precursor of such drug or substance, so designated under or pursuant to
chapter 69.50 RCW, the uniform controlled substances act.
(4) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or
attempted transfer from one person to another of a drug or device,
whether or not there is an agency relationship.
(5) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a drug, biological, or device and, pursuant to that prescription or
order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or
packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(6) "Distribute" means to deliver, other than by administering or
dispensing, a legend drug.
(7) "Legend drug" means any drug that is required by state law or
by regulations of the board to be dispensed on prescription only or is
restricted to use by practitioners only.
(8) "Manufacturer" means a person or other entity engaged in the
manufacture or distribution of drugs or devices, but does not include
a manufacturer's representative.
(9) "Person" means any individual, corporation, government or
governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership, association, or any other legal entity.
(10) "Practitioner" means a physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an
osteopathic physician or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.57 RCW, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric
physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under
chapter 18.92 RCW, a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, a commissioned
medical or dental officer in the United States armed forces or the
public health service in the discharge of his or her official duties,
a duly licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans
administration in the discharge of his or her official duties, a
registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner under
chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized to prescribe by the nursing care
quality assurance commission, an osteopathic physician assistant under
chapter 18.57A RCW when authorized by the board of osteopathic medicine
and surgery, or a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when
authorized by the medical ((quality assurance commission)) board for
safety and quality.
(11) "Manufacturer's representative" means an agent or employee of
a drug manufacturer who is authorized by the drug manufacturer to
possess drug samples for the purpose of distribution in this state to
appropriately authorized health care practitioners.
(12) "Reasonable cause" means a state of facts found to exist that
would warrant a reasonably intelligent and prudent person to believe
that a person has violated state or federal drug laws or regulations.
(13) "Department" means the department of health.
(14) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

Sec. 95 RCW 69.50.402 and 2003 c 53 s 338 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person:
(a) Who is subject to Article III to distribute or dispense a
controlled substance in violation of RCW 69.50.308;
(b) Who is a registrant, to manufacture a controlled substance not
authorized by his or her registration, or to distribute or dispense a
controlled substance not authorized by his or her registration to
another registrant or other authorized person;
(c) Who is a practitioner, to prescribe, order, dispense,
administer, supply, or give to any person:
(i) Any amphetamine, including its salts, optical isomers, and
salts of optical isomers classified as a schedule II controlled
substance by the board of pharmacy pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW; or
(ii) Any nonnarcotic stimulant classified as a schedule II
controlled substance and designated as a nonnarcotic stimulant by the
board of pharmacy pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW;
except for the treatment of narcolepsy or for the treatment of
hyperkinesis, or for the treatment of drug-induced brain dysfunction,
or for the treatment of epilepsy, or for the differential diagnostic
psychiatric evaluation of depression, or for the treatment of
depression shown to be refractory to other therapeutic modalities, or
for the clinical investigation of the effects of such drugs or
compounds, in which case an investigative protocol therefor shall have
been submitted to and reviewed and approved by the state board of
pharmacy before the investigation has been begun: PROVIDED, That the
board of pharmacy, in consultation with the medical ((quality assurance
commission)) board for safety and quality and the osteopathic
disciplinary board, may establish by rule, pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, disease states or conditions in addition to those listed in this
subsection for the treatment of which Schedule II nonnarcotic
stimulants may be prescribed, ordered, dispensed, administered,
supplied, or given to patients by practitioners: AND PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That investigations by the board of pharmacy of abuse of
prescriptive authority by physicians, licensed pursuant to chapter
18.71 RCW, pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be done
in consultation with the medical ((quality assurance commission)) board
for safety and quality;
(d) To refuse or fail to make, keep or furnish any record,
notification, order form, statement, invoice, or information required
under this chapter;
(e) To refuse an entry into any premises for any inspection
authorized by this chapter; or
(f) Knowingly to keep or maintain any store, shop, warehouse,
dwelling, building, vehicle, boat, aircraft, or other structure or
place, which is resorted to by persons using controlled substances in
violation of this chapter for the purpose of using these substances, or
which is used for keeping or selling them in violation of this chapter.
(2) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class C
felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than two
years, fined not more than two thousand dollars, or both.

Sec. 96 RCW 69.51A.010 and 1999 c 2 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Medical use of marijuana" means the production, possession, or
administration of marijuana, as defined in RCW 69.50.101(q), for the
exclusive benefit of a qualifying patient in the treatment of his or
her terminal or debilitating illness.
(2) "Primary caregiver" means a person who:
(a) Is eighteen years of age or older;
(b) Is responsible for the housing, health, or care of the patient;
(c) Has been designated in writing by a patient to perform the
duties of primary caregiver under this chapter.
(3) "Qualifying patient" means a person who:
(a) Is a patient of a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or
18.57 RCW;
(b) Has been diagnosed by that physician as having a terminal or
debilitating medical condition;
(c) Is a resident of the state of Washington at the time of such
diagnosis;
(d) Has been advised by that physician about the risks and benefits
of the medical use of marijuana; and
(e) Has been advised by that physician that they may benefit from
the medical use of marijuana.
(4) "Terminal or debilitating medical condition" means:
(a) Cancer, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), multiple sclerosis,
epilepsy or other seizure disorder, or spasticity disorders; or
(b) Intractable pain, limited for the purpose of this chapter to
mean pain unrelieved by standard medical treatments and medications; or
(c) Glaucoma, either acute or chronic, limited for the purpose of
this chapter to mean increased intraocular pressure unrelieved by
standard treatments and medications; or
(d) Any other medical condition duly approved by the Washington
state medical ((quality assurance board [commission])) board for safety
and quality as directed in this chapter.
(5) "Valid documentation" means:
(a) A statement signed by a qualifying patient's physician, or a
copy of the qualifying patient's pertinent medical records, which
states that, in the physician's professional opinion, the potential
benefits of the medical use of marijuana would likely outweigh the
health risks for a particular qualifying patient; and
(b) Proof of identity such as a Washington state driver's license
or identicard, as defined in RCW 46.20.035.

Sec. 97 RCW 69.51A.070 and 1999 c 2 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state medical ((quality assurance board
[commission])) board for safety and quality, or other appropriate
agency as designated by the governor, shall accept for consideration
petitions submitted by physicians or patients to add terminal or
debilitating conditions to those included in this chapter. In
considering such petitions, the Washington state medical ((quality
assurance board [commission])) board for safety and quality shall
include public notice of, and an opportunity to comment in a public
hearing upon, such petitions. The Washington state medical ((quality
assurance board [commission])) board for safety and quality shall,
after hearing, approve or deny such petitions within one hundred eighty
days of submission. The approval or denial of such a petition shall be
considered a final agency action, subject to judicial review.

Sec. 98 RCW 70.41.200 and 2005 c 291 s 3 and 2005 c 33 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every hospital shall maintain a coordinated quality improvement
program for the improvement of the quality of health care services
rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical
malpractice. The program shall include at least the following:
(a) The establishment of a quality improvement committee with the
responsibility to review the services rendered in the hospital, both
retrospectively and prospectively, in order to improve the quality of
medical care of patients and to prevent medical malpractice. The
committee shall oversee and coordinate the quality improvement and
medical malpractice prevention program and shall ensure that
information gathered pursuant to the program is used to review and to
revise hospital policies and procedures;
(b) A medical staff privileges sanction procedure through which
credentials, physical and mental capacity, and competence in delivering
health care services are periodically reviewed as part of an evaluation
of staff privileges;
(c) The periodic review of the credentials, physical and mental
capacity, and competence in delivering health care services of all
persons who are employed or associated with the hospital;
(d) A procedure for the prompt resolution of grievances by patients
or their representatives related to accidents, injuries, treatment, and
other events that may result in claims of medical malpractice;
(e) The maintenance and continuous collection of information
concerning the hospital's experience with negative health care outcomes
and incidents injurious to patients, patient grievances, professional
liability premiums, settlements, awards, costs incurred by the hospital
for patient injury prevention, and safety improvement activities;
(f) The maintenance of relevant and appropriate information
gathered pursuant to (a) through (e) of this subsection concerning
individual physicians within the physician's personnel or credential
file maintained by the hospital;
(g) Education programs dealing with quality improvement, patient
safety, medication errors, injury prevention, staff responsibility to
report professional misconduct, the legal aspects of patient care,
improved communication with patients, and causes of malpractice claims
for staff personnel engaged in patient care activities; and
(h) Policies to ensure compliance with the reporting requirements
of this section.
(2) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such
activity. Any person or entity participating in a coordinated quality
improvement program that, in substantial good faith, shares information
or documents with one or more other programs, committees, or boards
under subsection (8) of this section is not subject to an action for
civil damages or other relief as a result of the activity. For the
purposes of this section, sharing information is presumed to be in
substantial good faith. However, the presumption may be rebutted upon
a showing of clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the
information shared was knowingly false or deliberately misleading.
(3) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a
quality improvement committee are not subject to review or disclosure,
except as provided in this section, or discovery or introduction into
evidence in any civil action, and no person who was in attendance at a
meeting of such committee or who participated in the creation,
collection, or maintenance of information or documents specifically for
the committee shall be permitted or required to testify in any civil
action as to the content of such proceedings or the documents and
information prepared specifically for the committee. This subsection
does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the discovery of the
identity of persons involved in the medical care that is the basis of
the civil action whose involvement was independent of any quality
improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the testimony of any
person concerning the facts which form the basis for the institution of
such proceedings of which the person had personal knowledge acquired
independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil action by a health
care provider regarding the restriction or revocation of that
individual's clinical or staff privileges, introduction into evidence
information collected and maintained by quality improvement committees
regarding such health care provider; (d) in any civil action,
disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or
restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any and the
reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil action, discovery and
introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by
regulation of the department of health to be made regarding the care
and treatment received.
(4) Each quality improvement committee shall, on at least a
semiannual basis, report to the governing board of the hospital in
which the committee is located. The report shall review the quality
improvement activities conducted by the committee, and any actions
taken as a result of those activities.
(5) The department of health shall adopt such rules as are deemed
appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this section.
(6) The medical ((quality assurance commission)) board for safety
and quality or the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, as
appropriate, may review and audit the records of committee decisions in
which a physician's privileges are terminated or restricted. Each
hospital shall produce and make accessible to the commission or board
the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review and audit.
Information so gained shall not be subject to the discovery process and
confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section. Failure of a hospital to comply with this subsection is
punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.
(7) The department, the joint commission on accreditation of health
care organizations, and any other accrediting organization may review
and audit the records of a quality improvement committee or peer review
committee in connection with their inspection and review of hospitals.
Information so obtained shall not be subject to the discovery process,
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section. Each hospital shall produce and make accessible to the
department the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review
and audit.
(8) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a quality
improvement committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250
with one or more other coordinated quality improvement programs
maintained in accordance with this section or RCW 43.70.510, a quality
assurance committee maintained in accordance with RCW 18.20.390 or
74.42.640, or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250, for the
improvement of the quality of health care services rendered to patients
and the identification and prevention of medical malpractice. The
privacy protections of chapter 70.02 RCW and the federal health
insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 and its
implementing regulations apply to the sharing of individually
identifiable patient information held by a coordinated quality
improvement program. Any rules necessary to implement this section
shall meet the requirements of applicable federal and state privacy
laws. Information and documents disclosed by one coordinated quality
improvement program to another coordinated quality improvement program
or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 and any information and
documents created or maintained as a result of the sharing of
information and documents shall not be subject to the discovery process
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section, RCW 18.20.390 (6) and (8), 74.42.640 (7) and (9), and
4.24.250.
(9) A hospital that operates a nursing home as defined in RCW
18.51.010 may conduct quality improvement activities for both the
hospital and the nursing home through a quality improvement committee
under this section, and such activities shall be subject to the
provisions of subsections (2) through (8) of this section.
(10) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence
per se.

Sec. 99 RCW 70.41.230 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 744 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to granting or renewing clinical privileges or
association of any physician or hiring a physician, a hospital or
facility approved pursuant to this chapter shall request from the
physician and the physician shall provide the following information:
(a) The name of any hospital or facility with or at which the
physician had or has any association, employment, privileges, or
practice;
(b) If such association, employment, privilege, or practice was
discontinued, the reasons for its discontinuation;
(c) Any pending professional medical misconduct proceedings or any
pending medical malpractice actions in this state or another state, the
substance of the allegations in the proceedings or actions, and any
additional information concerning the proceedings or actions as the
physician deems appropriate;
(d) The substance of the findings in the actions or proceedings and
any additional information concerning the actions or proceedings as the
physician deems appropriate;
(e) A waiver by the physician of any confidentiality provisions
concerning the information required to be provided to hospitals
pursuant to this subsection; and
(f) A verification by the physician that the information provided
by the physician is accurate and complete.
(2) Prior to granting privileges or association to any physician or
hiring a physician, a hospital or facility approved pursuant to this
chapter shall request from any hospital with or at which the physician
had or has privileges, was associated, or was employed, the following
information concerning the physician:
(a) Any pending professional medical misconduct proceedings or any
pending medical malpractice actions, in this state or another state;
(b) Any judgment or settlement of a medical malpractice action and
any finding of professional misconduct in this state or another state
by a licensing or disciplinary board; and
(c) Any information required to be reported by hospitals pursuant
to RCW 18.71.0195.
(3) The medical ((quality assurance commission)) board for safety
and quality shall be advised within thirty days of the name of any
physician denied staff privileges, association, or employment on the
basis of adverse findings under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A hospital or facility that receives a request for information
from another hospital or facility pursuant to subsections (1) and (2)
of this section shall provide such information concerning the physician
in question to the extent such information is known to the hospital or
facility receiving such a request, including the reasons for
suspension, termination, or curtailment of employment or privileges at
the hospital or facility. A hospital, facility, or other person
providing such information in good faith is not liable in any civil
action for the release of such information.
(5) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected, and maintained by a
quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or
introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was
in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the
creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents
specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to
testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or
the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee.
This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the
discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that
is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of
any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the
testimony of any person concerning the facts which form the basis for
the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal
knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil
action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or
revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges,
introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by
quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d)
in any civil action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were
terminated or restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed,
if any and the reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil
action, discovery and introduction into evidence of the patient's
medical records required by regulation of the department of health to
be made regarding the care and treatment received.
(6) Hospitals shall be granted access to information held by the
medical ((quality assurance commission)) board for safety and quality
and the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery pertinent to
decisions of the hospital regarding credentialing and recredentialing
of practitioners.
(7) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence
per se.

Sec. 100 RCW 74.09.290 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 749 are each amended
to read as follows:
The secretary of the department of social and health services or
his authorized representative shall have the authority to:
(1) Conduct audits and investigations of providers of medical and
other services furnished pursuant to this chapter, except that the
Washington state medical ((quality assurance commission)) board for
safety and quality shall generally serve in an advisory capacity to the
secretary in the conduct of audits or investigations of physicians.
Any overpayment discovered as a result of an audit of a provider under
this authority shall be offset by any underpayments discovered in that
same audit sample. In order to determine the provider's actual, usual,
customary, or prevailing charges, the secretary may examine such random
representative records as necessary to show accounts billed and
accounts received except that in the conduct of such examinations,
patient names, other than public assistance applicants or recipients,
shall not be noted, copied, or otherwise made available to the
department. In order to verify costs incurred by the department for
treatment of public assistance applicants or recipients, the secretary
may examine patient records or portions thereof in connection with
services to such applicants or recipients rendered by a health care
provider, notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 5.60.060, 18.53.200,
18.83.110, or any other statute which may make or purport to make such
records privileged or confidential: PROVIDED, That no original patient
records shall be removed from the premises of the health care provider,
and that the disclosure of any records or information by the department
of social and health services is prohibited and shall be punishable as
a class C felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, unless such disclosure
is directly connected to the official purpose for which the records or
information were obtained: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the disclosure of
patient information as required under this section shall not subject
any physician or other health services provider to any liability for
breach of any confidential relationship between the provider and the
patient, but no evidence resulting from such disclosure may be used in
any civil, administrative, or criminal proceeding against the patient
unless a waiver of the applicable evidentiary privilege is obtained:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the secretary shall destroy all copies of
patient medical records in their possession upon completion of the
audit, investigation or proceedings;
(2) Approve or deny applications to participate as a provider of
services furnished pursuant to this chapter;
(3) Terminate or suspend eligibility to participate as a provider
of services furnished pursuant to this chapter; and
(4) Adopt, promulgate, amend, and repeal administrative rules, in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to
carry out the policies and purposes of RCW 74.09.200 through 74.09.290.

Sec. 101 RCW 74.42.230 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 751 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The resident's attending or staff physician or authorized
practitioner approved by the attending physician shall order all
medications for the resident. The order may be oral or written and
shall be limited by time. An "authorized practitioner," as used in
this section, is a registered nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW when
authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission, an
osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW when
authorized by the committee of osteopathic examiners, or a physician
assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the medical
((quality assurance commission)) board for safety and quality.
(2) An oral order shall be given only to a licensed nurse,
pharmacist, or another physician. The oral order shall be recorded and
signed immediately by the person receiving the order. The attending
physician shall sign the record of the oral order in a manner
consistent with good medical practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 18.71.401 (Funds collected -- Where deposited) and 1997 c 79
s 1; and
(2) RCW 18.71.420 (Allocation of all appropriated funds) and 1991
c 3 s 171 & 1983 c 71 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 Sections 28 through 36 of this act are
each added to chapter 18.71 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 Sections 44 through 88 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---