BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.890 and 2006 c 151 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
eligible persons of services rendered in respect to operating,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of livestock nutrient
management equipment and facilities, or to sales of tangible personal
property that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment and
facilities.
(2)(a) To be eligible, the equipment and facilities must be used
((exclusively)) for activities necessary to maintain a livestock
nutrient management plan.
(b) The exemption applies to sales made after the livestock
nutrient management plan is: (i) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW;
(ii) approved as part of the permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or
(iii) approved as required under subsection (4)(c)(iii) of this
section.
(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
department of agriculture must provide a list of eligible persons, as
defined in subsection (4)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section, to the
department of revenue. Conservation districts must maintain lists of
eligible persons as defined in subsection (4)(c)(iii) of this section
to allow the department of revenue to verify eligibility. The
application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department
and must contain information regarding the location of the dairy or
animal feeding operation and other information the department may
require.
(b) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.890 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Animal feeding operation" means a lot or facility, other than
an aquatic animal production facility, where the following conditions
are met:
(i) Animals, other than aquatic animals, have been, are, or will be
stabled or confined and fed or maintained for a total of forty-five
days or more in any twelve-month period; and
(ii) Crops, vegetation, forage growth, or postharvest residues are
not sustained in the normal growing season over any portion of the lot
or facility.
(b) "Conservation district" means a subdivision of state government
organized under chapter 89.08 RCW.
(c) "Eligible person" means a person (i) licensed to produce milk
under chapter 15.36 RCW who has a certified dairy nutrient management
plan, as required by chapter 90.64 RCW; (ii) who owns an animal feeding
operation and has a permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (iii) who
owns an animal feeding operation and has a nutrient management plan
approved by a conservation district as meeting natural resource
conservation service field office technical guide standards.
(d) "Livestock nutrient management equipment and facilities" means
machinery, equipment, and structures used in the handling and treatment
of livestock manure((, such as aerators, agitators, alley scrapers,
augers, dams, gutter cleaners, loaders, lagoons, pipes, pumps,
separators, and tanks)). The term also includes tangible personal
property that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment and
facilities, including repair and replacement parts.
(e) "Permit" means either a state waste discharge permit or a
national pollutant discharge elimination system permit, or both.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.890 and 2006 c 151 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use by an eligible person of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of livestock nutrient management equipment and
facilities, as defined in RCW 82.08.890, or to labor and services
rendered in respect to repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
eligible tangible personal property.
(2)(a) To be eligible, the equipment and facilities must be used
((exclusively)) for activities necessary to maintain a livestock
nutrient management plan.
(b) The exemption applies to the use of tangible personal property
or labor and services made after the livestock nutrient management plan
is: (i) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW; (ii) approved as part of
the permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (iii) approved as
required under RCW 82.08.890(4)(c)(iii).
(3) The exemption certificate and recordkeeping requirements of RCW
82.08.890 apply to this section. The definitions in RCW 82.08.890
apply to this section.

--- END ---