BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that pesticide use
reporting is crucial for the protection of human health and safety and
to protect Washington's water and environment. The legislature further
finds that the development of a comprehensive, reliable, and cost-effective system for collecting and organizing information on all
categories of pesticide use in Washington allows people to obtain
information with a single contact regarding what pesticide was used,
where it was used, and under what conditions it was used. This
information is valuable when used for conducting detailed studies of
human exposure to pesticides, environmental monitoring, and the
relationship to human health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(2) "Pesticide" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.104.020.
(3) "Pesticide user" means any person who uses or applies a
pesticide in the course of business or any other for-profit enterprise,
or for a governmental entity, or in a location that is intended for
public use or access.
(4) "Retail pesticide user" means a person who sells, offers for
sale, handles, displays, or distributes any pesticide but who is not
licensed under RCW 15.58.180.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department shall establish and implement
a pesticide use reporting system. In establishing and implementing the
system, the department shall:
(1) Design, develop, and implement the system in order to collect,
evaluate, summarize, retain, and report information on the use of
pesticides in each major category of use in Washington, including
agriculture, forestry, industrial, urban commercial, and urban
homeowner uses;
(2) Collect the best data practicable at least once per year from
each major category of pesticide use in a manner that reduces paperwork
and reporting costs;
(3) Require all pesticide users to report basic information on
their use of pesticides that includes:
(a) The location of use. For pesticide use within an urban area,
as defined by the department by rule, the pesticide user shall report
the location of use by identifying the five-digit zip code for the
location. For pesticide use that is not within the urban area, the
pesticide user shall report the location of use by identifying the
five-digit zip code for the location or by use of other identification
as defined by the department by rule;
(b) The name and United States environmental protection agency
registration number for the pesticide product used;
(c) The quantity of pesticide product applied;
(d) The purpose of and type of site of the application; and
(e) The month of the application;
(4) Develop a mechanism to ensure the accuracy, reliability, and
validity of the database by providing for an independent review of the
pesticide use data and collection procedures by data quality assurance
specialists; and
(5) Develop a specific mechanism to identify household and other
urban uses of pesticides. If this mechanism involves sales reporting
by retail pesticide dealers, the department shall develop a minimum
monthly sales quantity below which the retail pesticide dealer is
exempt from reporting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In carrying out its responsibilities under
this chapter, the department shall seek technical assistance as
appropriate from at least the following entities:
(1) The commission on pesticide registration;
(2) The department of ecology;
(3) The department of fish and wildlife;
(4) The department of general administration;
(5) The department of health;
(6) The department of labor and industries; and
(7) The department of natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) In implementing the pesticide use
reporting system, the department shall publish an annual report
summarizing the pesticide use data reported to the department under
section 3 of this act. The report shall include:
(a) An analysis of trends in pesticide use;
(b) An assessment of the accuracy of the pesticide use reporting
data; and
(c) Pesticide use information summarized by zip code or other
identification method as described in section 3(3)(a) of this act.
(2) The department shall adopt rules relating to the release of
pesticide use information. The rules must ensure that the identity of
the owner or lessee of a specific property where a pesticide has been
applied remains confidential, except where the release of the
information is otherwise authorized by law.
(3) The department shall adopt rules regarding the transmittal of
information required under RCW 17.21.100(1), and any additional
information required, for inclusion into the pesticide use reporting
system.
(4) The department shall adopt rules imposing civil penalties for
failure to transmit information as required by subsection (3) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

--- END ---