BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the blue
ribbon commission on health care costs and access has recommended that
Washington state become a leader in prevention and management of
chronic illness. Their consensus recommendation provides that state
health purchasing agencies, including the medical assistance program,
will integrate proven chronic care management into all state programs.
The state further finds that full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries,
who are eligible for both the federal medicare program and medical
assistance benefits, are among the most chronically ill medical
assistance clients.
(2) The legislature intends to take an opportunity to realize the
blue ribbon commission's recommendation by directing the department of
social and health services to continue to support the enrollment of
some full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries in the managed health
care plan of their choice, in coordination with the federal medicare
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall pay the premiums associated with
enrollment in a medicare advantage plan for those full benefit dual
eligible beneficiaries who were enrolled on November 1, 2006, in a
medicare advantage plan sponsored by an entity accredited by the
national committee for quality assurance and for whom the department
had been paying the medicare advantage plan premium as of that date.
(2) The department shall undertake, directly or by contract, a
study to determine the cost-effectiveness of paying premiums for
enrollment of full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries in medicare
advantage plans in lieu of paying full benefit dual eligible
beneficiaries' medicare cost-sharing. The study shall compare the cost
and health outcomes experience for three groups of full benefit dual
eligible beneficiaries:
(a) A group of full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries who have
been continuously enrolled in a medicare advantage plan sponsored by an
entity accredited by the national committee for quality assurance for
at least the past three years;
(b) A group of full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries who have
been enrolled in a medicare special needs plan for a minimum of six
months; and
(c) A group of full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries who receive
their medicare services through the medicare fee for service system.
The department shall attempt to have consistency across the three
groups with respect to the health status of the full benefit dual
eligible beneficiaries being compared. The study shall compare the
health status and utilization of health and long-term care services for
the three groups, and the impact of access to a medical home and
specialty care, over a period of two years to determine any differences
in health status, health outcomes, and state expenditures that result.
The department shall submit the results of the study to the
governor and the legislature on or before December 1, 2009.
(3) For purposes of this section, "full benefit dual eligible
beneficiary" means an individual who, for any month: (a) Has coverage
for the month under a medicare prescription drug plan or medicare
advantage plan with part D coverage; and (b) is determined eligible by
the state for full medicaid benefits for the month under any
eligibility category in the state's medicaid plan or a section 1115
demonstration waiver that provides pharmacy benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---