BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A competitive grant program is created to assist nonprofit
organizations in improving or constructing public school district
facilities for the purpose of operating youth-oriented activity
programs. Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this
purpose in the capital budget, the superintendent of public instruction
shall allocate up to five grants per fiscal year to private nonprofit
organizations.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall conduct a
statewide solicitation of applications from private nonprofit
organizations that operate youth-oriented activities, as determined by
the superintendent.
(3) Applications under this section must be for the improvement or
construction of facilities on public school district property that
would enable, or enhance the ability of, the applying organizations to
operate youth-oriented activity programs.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall establish and
publish criteria for evaluating applications received under this
section. The criteria shall give priority to organizations whose
programs target underserved, disadvantaged, or multicultural
populations.
(5) All statutes and rules applicable to use of public school
district facilities, including RCW 28A.335.150 and 28A.335.155, shall
apply to all such facilities constructed or improved by a nonprofit
organization using a grant under this section.

--- END ---