BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of manufacturing products where the person uses substantial recycled
material in lieu of raw or virgin material to manufacture the products;
as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business
shall, in the case of manufacturers, be equal to the value of products,
including byproducts, manufactured, or in the case of processors for
hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
selling, at wholesale or retail, products manufactured by the person
where the person is subject to the rate in (a) of this subsection for
the manufacturing of the products; as to such persons the amount of the
tax with respect to the business shall be equal to the gross proceeds
of sales of the products multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Material" means metal, glass, plastic, or rubber.
(b) "Reclaimed material" means material derived from postconsumer
waste, industrial scrap, or other items, that is collected and used in
a process designed to produce recycled material.
(c) "Recycled material" means a material derived from a reclaimed
material that can be readily utilized without further processing in
place of raw or virgin material in manufacturing a product.
(d) "Substantial" means at least fifty percent, as determined by
weight.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.440 and 2006 c 300 s 8 and 2006 c 84 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities that are subject to tax
under two or more provisions of RCW 82.04.230 through 82.04.298,
inclusive, shall be taxable under each provision applicable to those
activities.
(2) Persons taxable under section 1 of this act, RCW 82.04.2909(2),
82.04.250, 82.04.270, 82.04.294(2), or 82.04.260 (1)(c), (4), (11), or
(12) with respect to selling products in this state, including those
persons who are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, shall be allowed a
credit against those taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with
respect to the manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or
(b) extracting taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so
sold in this state or ingredients of products so sold in this state.
Extracting taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section
may also be taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under
this subsection. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those
products.
(3) Persons taxable as manufacturers under section 1 of this act,
RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260 (1)(b) or (12), including those persons who
are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, shall be allowed a credit against
those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with respect to extracting
the ingredients of the products so manufactured in this state. The
amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising under
this chapter with respect to the manufacturing of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under section 1 of this act, RCW 82.04.230,
82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1), 82.04.294(1), 82.04.2404, or 82.04.260 (1),
(2), (4), (11), or (12), including those persons who are also taxable
under RCW 82.04.261, with respect to extracting or manufacturing
products in this state shall be allowed a credit against those taxes
for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to another state with respect to
the sales of the products so extracted or manufactured in this state,
(ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of
products using ingredients so extracted in this state, or (iii)
manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing activities
completed in another state for products so manufactured in this state.
The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising
under this chapter with respect to the extraction or manufacturing of
those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in section 1 of this act, RCW 82.04.240,
82.04.2404, 82.04.2909(1), 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (11), and (12), and
82.04.294(1); (ii) the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who
are engaged in business as a manufacturer; and (iii) similar gross
receipts taxes paid to other states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes (i)
the tax imposed on extractors in RCW 82.04.230 and 82.04.260(12); (ii)
the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who are engaged in
business as an extractor; and (iii) similar gross receipts taxes paid
to other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect October 1, 2007.

--- END ---