BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that overpayments are
a serious problem for state agencies given the magnitude and complexity
of state operations and ongoing audit findings for agency internal
control weaknesses. Overpayments waste tax dollars and detract from
the efficiency and effectiveness of state operations by diverting
resources from their intended uses. An overpayment occurs when an
individual, vendor, or other entity receives a government payment in
error or in excess of the legal amount entitled. In order to improve
the economy and efficiency of governmental operations, the state shall
contract for recovery audits to recoup any overpayments made of state
or federal tax dollars. The legislature recognizes that recovery
audits are a nationally recognized best practice for disbursements
management and will provide insight for improving operational
efficiency and internal controls in the state's disbursement of tax
dollars. Additionally, recovery audits will not cost the state any
resources as the contractor's costs are deducted from any dollars
recovered, making the recovery audits self-funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Consultant" means a private contractor with recovery audit
expertise.
(2) "Director" means the director of financial management.
(3) "Overpayment" includes:
(a) Failure to meet eligibility requirements;
(b) Duplicate payments;
(c) Invoice and pricing errors;
(d) Failure to apply discounts, rebates, or other allowances;
(e) Failure to comply with purchasing agreements; and
(f) Any other inadvertent errors resulting in overpayments.
(4) "Recovery audit" means a financial management technique used to
identify overpayments made by a state agency with respect to
individuals, vendors, and other entities in connection with a payment
activity.
(5) "State agency" means a department, office, board, commission,
bureau, division, institution, or institution of higher education.
"State agency" includes individual state agencies and programs, as well
as those programs and activities that cross agency lines, all statewide
elected offices, and the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The director shall contract with private
consultants to conduct recovery audits of payments made by state
agencies to individuals, vendors, and other entities.
(2) A contract under this section:
(a) May provide for reasonable compensation for services provided
under the contract, including compensation determined by the
application of a specified percentage of the total amount recovered
because of the consultant's audit activities;
(b) May permit or require the consultant to pursue a judicial
action in a court inside or outside this state to recover an overpaid
amount; and
(c) Must allow time for the performance of existing state payment
auditing procedures and may not allow a recovery audit of a payment
during the ninety-day period after the date the payment was made.
(3) The director or a state agency whose payments are being audited
shall provide a person acting under a contract authorized by this
section with any confidential information in the custody of the
director or state agency that is necessary for the performance of the
audit or the recovery audit of an overpayment, to the extent the
director and state agency are not prohibited from sharing the
information under an agreement with another state or the federal
government. A person acting under a contract authorized by this
section, and each employee or agent of the person, is subject to all
prohibitions against the disclosure of confidential information
obtained from the state in connection with the contract that apply to
the director or applicable state agency or an employee of the director
or applicable state agency. A person acting under a contract
authorized by this section or an employee or agent of the person who
discloses confidential information in violation of a prohibition made
applicable to the person under this subsection is subject to
prosecution for a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The director shall require that recovery
audits be performed on the payments to individuals, vendors, and other
entities made by each state agency that has total expenditures from all
funds during a state fiscal biennium in an amount that exceeds fifty
million dollars. Each state agency described by this subsection shall
provide the recovery audit consultant with all information necessary
for the audit.
(2) In addition, the director shall require recovery audits for any
state agency that receives an audit finding by the state auditor for
internal control weaknesses concerning agency payments and contracts.
Each state agency under by this subsection shall provide the recovery
audit consultant with all information necessary for the audit.
(3) The director may exempt from mandatory recovery audit process
a state agency that has a low proportion of its expenditures made to
individuals, vendors, and other entities, according to criteria the
director adopts by rule after consideration of the likely costs and
benefits of performing recovery audits for agencies that make
relatively few or small payments to vendors. The director shall
provide the state auditor and legislative fiscal committees with a
report by December 31st of each year detailing any exemptions from
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The director shall adopt by rule
reasonable compensation for services provided under recovery audit
contracts based on a specified percentage of the total amount recovered
because of a consultant's audit activities.
(2) A state agency shall expend or return to the federal government
any federal money that is recovered through a recovery audit conducted
under this chapter. The state agency shall expend or return the
federal money in accordance with the rules of the federal program
through which the agency received the federal money.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The director shall provide copies,
including electronic form copies, of any reports received from a
consultant contracting under this chapter to:
(a) The governor;
(b) The state auditor's office; and
(c) The legislative fiscal committees of the legislature.
(2) The director shall provide the copies required by subsection
(1) of this section not later than the seventh business day after the
date the director receives the consultant's report.
(3) Not later than December 31st of each year, the director shall
issue a report to the legislature summarizing the contents of all
reports received under this chapter during the past fiscal year. This
report shall also be posted on the office of financial management's
website.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The director shall adopt rules necessary
to implement this chapter in a timely manner so that the director may
begin contracting with consultants under this chapter not later than
January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---