BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.19.460 and 1987 c 377 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any schedule of rates or rating plan for automobile liability and
physical damage insurance submitted to or filed with the commissioner
shall provide for an appropriate reduction in premium charges except
for underinsured motorist coverage for those insureds who are fifty-five years of age and older, for a two-year period after successfully
completing a motor vehicle accident prevention course meeting the
criteria of the department of licensing with a minimum of eight hours,
or additional hours as determined by rule of the department of
licensing. ((An eight-hour program-learning self-instruction course
shall be made available in areas in which a classroom course meeting
the criteria of this section is not offered.)) The classroom course
may be conducted by a public or private agency approved by the
department. ((The self-instruction course shall be conducted by an
agency approved by the department to conduct classroom courses under
this section.)) An eight-hour course meeting the criteria of the
department of licensing may be offered via an alternative delivery
method of instruction, which may include internet, video, or other
technology-based delivery methods. An agency seeking approval from the
department to offer an alternative delivery method course of
instruction is not required to conduct classroom courses under this
section. The department of licensing may adopt rules to ensure that
insureds who seek certification for taking a course offered via an
alternative delivery method have completed the course.

--- END ---