BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.020 and 2004 c 105 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory committee" means the nonhighway and off-road vehicle
activities advisory committee established in RCW 46.09.280.
(2) "Committee" means the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation established in RCW 79A.25.110.
(3) (("Dealer" means a person, partnership, association, or
corporation engaged in the business of selling off-road vehicles at
wholesale or retail in this state.
(4))) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((5))) (4) "Highway," for the purpose of this chapter only, means
the entire width between the boundary lines of every roadway publicly
maintained by the state department of transportation or any county or
city with funding from the motor vehicle fund. A highway is generally
capable of travel by a conventional two-wheel drive passenger
automobile during most of the year and in use by such vehicles.
(((6))) (5) "Motorized vehicle" means a vehicle that derives motive
power from an internal combustion engine.
(((7))) (6) "Nonhighway road" means any road owned or managed by a
public agency or any private road for which the owner has granted an
easement for public use for which appropriations from the motor vehicle
fund were not used for (a) original construction or reconstruction in
the last twenty-five years; or (b) maintenance in the last four years.
(((8))) (7) "Nonhighway road recreation facilities" means
recreational facilities that are adjacent to, or accessed by, a
nonhighway road and intended primarily for nonhighway road recreational
users.
(((9))) (8) "Nonhighway road recreational user" means a person
whose purpose for consuming fuel on a nonhighway road or off-road is
primarily for nonhighway road recreational purposes, including, but not
limited to, hunting, fishing, camping, sightseeing, wildlife viewing,
picnicking, driving for pleasure, kayaking/canoeing, and gathering
berries, firewood, mushrooms, and other natural products.
(((10))) (9) "Nonhighway vehicle" means any motorized vehicle
including an ORV when used for recreational purposes on nonhighway
roads, trails, or a variety of other natural terrain.
Nonhighway vehicle does not include:
(a) Any vehicle designed primarily for travel on, over, or in the
water;
(b) Snowmobiles or any military vehicles; or
(c) Any vehicle eligible for a motor vehicle fuel tax exemption or
rebate under chapter 82.36 RCW while an exemption or rebate is claimed.
This exemption includes but is not limited to farm, construction, and
logging vehicles.
(((11))) (10) "Nonmotorized recreational facilities" means
recreational trails and facilities that are adjacent to, or accessed
by, a nonhighway road and intended primarily for nonmotorized
recreational users.
(((12))) (11) "Nonmotorized recreational user" means a person whose
purpose for consuming fuel on a nonhighway road or off-road is
primarily for nonmotorized recreational purposes including, but not
limited to, walking, hiking, backpacking, climbing, cross-country
skiing, snowshoeing, mountain biking, horseback riding, and pack animal
activities.
(((13))) (12) "Off-road vehicle" or "ORV" means any nonstreet
licensed vehicle when used for recreational purposes on nonhighway
roads, trails, or a variety of other natural terrain. Such vehicles
include, but are not limited to, all-terrain vehicles, motorcycles,
four-wheel drive vehicles, and dune buggies.
(((14))) (13) "Operator" means each person who operates, or is in
physical control of, any nonhighway vehicle.
(((15))) (14) "Organized competitive event" means any competition,
advertised in advance through written notice to organized clubs or
published in local newspapers, sponsored by recognized clubs, and
conducted at a predetermined time and place.
(((16))) (15) "ORV recreation facilities" include, but are not
limited to, ORV trails, trailheads, campgrounds, ORV sports parks, and
ORV use areas, designated for ORV use by the managing authority that
are intended primarily for ORV recreational users.
(((17))) (16) "ORV recreational user" means a person whose purpose
for consuming fuel on nonhighway roads or off-road is primarily for ORV
recreational purposes, including but not limited to riding an all-terrain vehicle, motorcycling, or driving a four-wheel drive vehicle or
dune buggy.
(((18))) (17) "ORV ((sport[s])) sports park" means a facility
designed to accommodate competitive ORV recreational uses including,
but not limited to, motocross racing, four-wheel drive competitions,
and flat track racing. Use of ORV sports parks can be competitive or
noncompetitive in nature.
(((19))) (18) "ORV trail" means a multiple-use corridor designated
by the managing authority and maintained for recreational use by
motorized vehicles.
(((20))) (19) "ORV use permit" means a permit issued for operation
of an off-road vehicle under this chapter.
(((21))) (20) "Owner" means the person other than the lienholder,
having an interest in or title to a nonhighway vehicle, and entitled to
the use or possession thereof.
(((22))) (21) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.70.011 and 2006 c 364 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Vehicle" means ((and includes)) every device capable of being
moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or
property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway,
excepting devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively
upon stationary rails or tracks. "Vehicle" includes off-road vehicles
as defined in RCW 46.09.020 and snowmobiles as defined in RCW
46.10.010.
(2) "Motor vehicle" means every vehicle which is self-propelled and
every vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from
overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails, and which is
required to be registered and titled under ((Title 46 RCW, Motor
Vehicles)) this title. "Motor vehicle" includes off-road vehicles as
defined in RCW 46.09.020 and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(3) "Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor home,
truck camper, or camping trailer that is primarily designed and used as
temporary living quarters, is either self-propelled or mounted on or
drawn by another vehicle, is transient, is not occupied as a primary
residence, and is not immobilized or permanently affixed to a mobile
home lot.
(4) "Vehicle dealer" means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, not excluded by subsection (5) of this section,
engaged in the business of buying, selling, listing, exchanging,
offering, brokering, leasing with an option to purchase, auctioning,
soliciting, or advertising the sale of new or used vehicles, or
arranging or offering or attempting to solicit or negotiate on behalf
of others, a sale, purchase, or exchange of an interest in new or used
motor vehicles, irrespective of whether the motor vehicles are owned by
that person. Vehicle dealers shall be classified as follows:
(a) A "motor vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals in new
or used motor vehicles, or both;
(b) A "mobile home and travel trailer dealer" is a vehicle dealer
that deals in mobile homes, park trailers, or travel trailers, or more
than one type of these vehicles;
(c) A "miscellaneous vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals
in motorcycles ((or)), vehicles other than motor vehicles ((or)),
mobile homes and travel trailers, off-road vehicles as defined in RCW
46.09.020, snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010, or any combination
of such vehicles;
(d) A "recreational vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals
in travel trailers, motor homes, truck campers, or camping trailers
that are primarily designed and used as temporary living quarters, are
either self-propelled or mounted on or drawn by another vehicle, are
transient, are not occupied as a primary residence, and are not
immobilized or permanently affixed to a mobile home lot.
(5) The term "vehicle dealer" does not include, nor do the
licensing requirements of RCW 46.70.021 apply to, the following
persons, firms, associations, or corporations:
(a) Receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians, or
other persons appointed by, or acting under a judgment or order of, any
court; or
(b) Public officers while performing their official duties; or
(c) Employees of vehicle dealers who are engaged in the specific
performance of their duties as such employees; or
(d) Any person engaged in an isolated sale of a vehicle in which
that person is the registered or legal owner, or both, thereof; or
(e) Any person, firm, association, corporation, or trust, engaged
in the selling of equipment other than vehicles, subject to
registration, used for agricultural or industrial purposes; or
(f) A real estate broker licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW, or an
affiliated licensee, who, on behalf of another negotiates the purchase,
sale, lease, or exchange of a manufactured or mobile home in
conjunction with the purchase, sale, exchange, rental, or lease of the
land upon which the manufactured or mobile home is, or will be,
located; or
(g) Owners who are also operators of the special highway
construction equipment or of the highway construction equipment for
which a vehicle license and display vehicle license number plate is
required as defined in RCW 46.16.010; or
(h) Any bank, trust company, savings bank, mutual savings bank,
savings and loan association, credit union, and any parent, subsidiary,
or affiliate thereof, authorized to do business in this state under
state or federal law with respect to the sale or other disposition of
a motor vehicle owned and used in their business; or with respect to
the acquisition and sale or other disposition of a motor vehicle in
which the entity has acquired an interest as a lessor, lessee, or
secured party; or
(i) Any person who is regularly engaged in the business of
acquiring leases or installment contracts by assignment, with respect
to the acquisition and sale or other disposition of a motor vehicle in
which the person has acquired an interest as a result of the business.
(6) "Vehicle salesperson" means any person who for any form of
compensation sells, auctions, leases with an option to purchase, or
offers to sell or to so lease vehicles on behalf of a vehicle dealer.
(7) "Department" means the department of licensing, which shall
administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.
(8) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(9) "Manufacturer" means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who manufactures or
assembles new and unused vehicles or remanufactures vehicles in whole
or in part and further includes the terms:
(a) "Distributor," which means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who in whole or in part
offers for sale, sells, or distributes any new and unused vehicle to
vehicle dealers or who maintains factory representatives.
(b) "Factory branch," which means a branch office maintained by a
manufacturer for the purpose of selling or offering for sale, vehicles
to a distributor, wholesaler, or vehicle dealer, or for directing or
supervising in whole or in part factory or distributor representatives,
and further includes any sales promotion organization, whether a
person, firm, or corporation, which is engaged in promoting the sale of
new and unused vehicles in this state of a particular brand or make to
vehicle dealers.
(c) "Factory representative," which means a representative employed
by a manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch for the purpose of
making or promoting for the sale of their vehicles or for supervising
or contracting with their dealers or prospective dealers.
(10) "Established place of business" means a location meeting the
requirements of RCW 46.70.023(1) at which a vehicle dealer conducts
business in this state.
(11) "Principal place of business" means that dealer firm's
business location in the state, which place the dealer designates as
their principal place of business.
(12) "Subagency" means any place of business of a vehicle dealer
within the state, which place is physically and geographically
separated from the principal place of business of the firm or any place
of business of a vehicle dealer within the state, at which place the
firm does business using a name other than the principal name of the
firm, or both.
(13) "Temporary subagency" means a location other than the
principal place of business or subagency within the state where a
licensed vehicle dealer may secure a license to conduct the business
and is licensed for a period of time not to exceed ten days for a
specific purpose such as auto shows, shopping center promotions, tent
sales, exhibitions, or similar merchandising ventures. No more than
six temporary subagency licenses may be issued to a licensee in any
twelve-month period.
(14) "Wholesale vehicle dealer" means a vehicle dealer who buys and
sells other than at retail.
(15) "Retail vehicle dealer" means a vehicle dealer who may buy and
sell at both wholesale and retail.
(16) "Listing dealer" means a used mobile home dealer who makes
contracts with sellers who will compensate the dealer for obtaining a
willing purchaser for the seller's mobile home.
(17) "Auction" means a transaction conducted by means of exchanges
between an auctioneer and the members of the audience, constituting a
series of oral invitations for offers for the purchase of vehicles made
by the auctioneer, offers to purchase by members of the audience, and
the acceptance of the highest or most favorable offer to purchase.
(18) "Auction company" means a sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, or other legal or commercial entity licensed under chapter
18.11 RCW that only sells or offers to sell vehicles at auction or only
arranges or sponsors auctions.
(19) "Buyer's agent" means any person, firm, partnership,
association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership,
or corporation retained or employed by a consumer to arrange for or to
negotiate, or both, the purchase or lease of a new motor vehicle on
behalf of the consumer, and who is paid a fee or receives other
compensation from the consumer for its services.
(20) "New motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle that is self-propelled and is required to be registered and titled under Title 46
RCW, has not been previously titled to a retail purchaser or lessee,
and is not a "used vehicle" as defined under RCW 46.04.660.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.10.010 and 2005 c 235 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter the words and phrases in this section shall
have the designated meanings unless a different meaning is expressly
provided or the context otherwise clearly indicated.
(1) "Person" shall mean any individual, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation.
(2) "Snowmobile" shall mean any self-propelled vehicle capable of
traveling over snow or ice, which utilizes as its means of propulsion
an endless belt tread, or cleats, or any combination of these or other
similar means of contact with the surface upon which it is operated,
and which is steered wholly or in part by skis or sled type runners,
and which is not otherwise registered as, or subject to the motor
vehicle excise tax in the state of Washington.
(3) "Vintage snowmobile" means a snowmobile manufactured at least
thirty years ago.
(4) "All terrain vehicle" shall mean any self-propelled vehicle
other than a snowmobile, capable of cross-country travel on or
immediately over land, water, snow, ice, marsh, swampland, and other
natural terrain, including, but not limited to, four-wheel vehicles,
amphibious vehicles, ground effect or air cushion vehicles, and any
other means of land transportation deriving motive power from any
source other than muscle or wind; except any vehicle designed primarily
for travel on, over, or in the water, farm vehicles, or any military or
law enforcement vehicles.
(5) "Owner" shall mean the person, other than a lienholder, having
the property in or title to a snowmobile or all terrain vehicle, and
entitled to the use or possession thereof.
(6) "Operator" means each person who operates, or is in physical
control of, any snowmobile or all terrain vehicle.
(7) "Public roadway" shall mean the entire width of the right of
way of any road or street designed and ordinarily used for travel or
parking of motor vehicles, which is controlled by a public authority
other than the Washington state department of transportation, and which
is open as a matter of right to the general public for ordinary
vehicular traffic.
(8) "Highways" shall mean the entire width of the right of way of
all primary and secondary state highways, including all portions of the
interstate highway system.
(9) "Dealer" means a person, partnership, association, or
corporation licensed as a miscellaneous vehicle dealer under chapter
46.70 RCW and engaged in the business of selling snowmobiles or all
terrain vehicles at wholesale or retail in this state.
(10) "Department" shall mean the department of licensing.
(11) "Director" shall mean the director of the department of
licensing.
(12) "Commission" shall mean the Washington state parks and
recreation commission.
(13) "Hunt" shall mean any effort to kill, injure, capture, or
disturb a wild animal or wild bird.
(14) "Committee" means the Washington state parks and recreation
commission snowmobile advisory committee.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.10.043 and 1982 c 17 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each snowmobile dealer ((registered pursuant to the provisions of
RCW 46.10.050)) shall register the snowmobile or, in the event the
snowmobile is currently registered, transfer the registration to the
new owner prior to delivering the snowmobile to that new owner
subsequent to the sale thereof by the dealer. Applications for
registration and transfer of registration of snowmobiles shall be made
to agents of the department authorized as such in accordance with RCW
46.01.140 and 46.01.150 as now or hereafter amended.
All registrations for snowmobiles must be valid for the current
registration period prior to the transfer of any registration,
including assignment to a dealer. Upon the sale of a snowmobile by a
dealer, the dealer may issue a temporary registration as provided by
rules adopted by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall immediately suspend any license issued under
this chapter if the holder of the license has been certified under RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has
continued to meet all other license requirements under this chapter
during the suspension, the department shall automatically reissue the
license when the department receives a release issued by the department
of social and health services stating that the person is in compliance
with the support order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 46.09.080 (ORV dealers -- Permits -- Fees -- Number plates -- Title
application -- Violations) and 1990 c 250 s 24, 1986 c 206 s 5, 1977
ex.s. c 220 s 7, 1972 ex.s. c 153 s 9, & 1971 ex.s. c 47 s 13;
(2) RCW 46.09.085 (Selling ORV without use permit) and 2004 c 105
s 10;
(3) RCW 46.10.050 (Snowmobile dealers' registration -- Fee -- Dealer
number plates, use -- Sale or demonstration unlawful without
registration) and 1990 c 250 s 26, 1982 c 17 s 5, & 1971 ex.s. c 29 s
5; and
(4) RCW 46.10.055 (Denial, suspension, or revocation of dealer
registration or assessment of monetary civil penalty, when) and 1982 c
17 s 4.

--- END ---