BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is an unfair practice for any person, whether acting for
himself, herself, or another, to discriminate in the rental of a
dwelling to, or to refuse to negotiate or enter into a rental agreement
with, a person because of the person's lawful source of income.
(2)(a) When a finding has been made under RCW 49.60.250 that the
respondent has engaged in an unfair practice under this section, the
administrative law judge shall promptly issue an order for appropriate
relief for the aggrieved party, which may include actual damages and
injunctive or other equitable relief. The order may, to further the
public interest, assess a civil penalty against the respondent:
(i) In an amount up to two thousand five hundred dollars if the
respondent is determined not to have committed any prior unfair
practices under this section;
(ii) In an amount up to seven thousand five hundred dollars if the
respondent is determined to have committed one other unfair practice
under this section during the five-year period ending on the date of
the filing of this charge; or
(iii) In an amount up to ten thousand dollars if the respondent is
determined to have committed two or more unfair practices under this
section during the seven-year period ending on the date of the filing
of this charge.
(b) Civil penalties assessed under this section shall be paid into
the state treasury and credited to the general fund.
(3) This section does not:
(a) Apply to rental transactions involving the sharing of a
dwelling unit as defined in RCW 59.18.030, or the rental or subleasing
of a portion of a dwelling unit, when the dwelling unit is to be
occupied by the owner or subleasor;
(b) Affect the rights, responsibilities, and remedies of landlords
and tenants under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW, except to the extent of
inconsistencies with the nondiscrimination requirements of this
section; or
(c) Limit the applicability of RCW 49.60.215 relating to unfair
practices in places of public accommodation or RCW 49.60.222 through
49.60.227 relating to unfair practices in real estate transactions.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "lawful source of income"
means verifiable legal income, including income derived from
employment, social security, supplemental security income, other
retirement programs, child support, alimony, and any federal, state, or
local government or nonprofit-administered benefit or subsidy program,
including rental assistance programs, public assistance, and general
assistance programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.60.250 and 1993 c 510 s 23 and 1993 c 69 s 14 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In case of failure to reach an agreement for the elimination of
such unfair practice, and upon the entry of findings to that effect,
the entire file, including the complaint and any and all findings made,
shall be certified to the chairperson of the commission. The
chairperson of the commission shall thereupon request the appointment
of an administrative law judge under Title 34 RCW to hear the complaint
and shall cause to be issued and served in the name of the commission
a written notice, together with a copy of the complaint, as the same
may have been amended, requiring the respondent to answer the charges
of the complaint at a hearing before the administrative law judge, at
a time and place to be specified in such notice.
(2) The place of any such hearing may be the office of the
commission or another place designated by it. The case in support of
the complaint shall be presented at the hearing by counsel for the
commission: PROVIDED, That the complainant may retain independent
counsel and submit testimony and be fully heard. No member or employee
of the commission who previously made the investigation or caused the
notice to be issued shall participate in the hearing except as a
witness, nor shall the member or employee participate in the
deliberations of the administrative law judge in such case. Any
endeavors or negotiations for conciliation shall not be received in
evidence.
(3) The respondent shall file a written answer to the complaint and
appear at the hearing in person or otherwise, with or without counsel,
and submit testimony and be fully heard. The respondent has the right
to cross-examine the complainant.
(4) The administrative law judge conducting any hearing may permit
reasonable amendment to any complaint or answer. Testimony taken at
the hearing shall be under oath and recorded.
(5) If, upon all the evidence, the administrative law judge finds
that the respondent has engaged in any unfair practice, the
administrative law judge shall state findings of fact and shall issue
and file with the commission and cause to be served on such respondent
an order requiring such respondent to cease and desist from such unfair
practice and to take such affirmative action, including, (but not
limited to) hiring, reinstatement or upgrading of employees, with or
without back pay, an admission or restoration to full membership rights
in any respondent organization, or to take such other action as, in the
judgment of the administrative law judge, will effectuate the purposes
of this chapter, including action that could be ordered by a court,
except that damages for humiliation and mental suffering shall not
exceed ten thousand dollars, and including a requirement for report of
the matter on compliance. Relief available for violations of RCW
49.60.222 through 49.60.224 shall be limited to the relief specified in
RCW 49.60.225. Relief available for violations of section 1 of this
act shall be limited to the relief specified in section 1(2) of this
act.
(6) If a determination is made that retaliatory action, as defined
in RCW 42.40.050, has been taken against a whistleblower, as defined in
RCW 42.40.020, the administrative law judge may, in addition to any
other remedy, impose a civil penalty upon the retaliator of up to three
thousand dollars and issue an order to the state employer to suspend
the retaliator for up to thirty days without pay. At a minimum, the
administrative law judge shall require that a letter of reprimand be
placed in the retaliator's personnel file. All penalties recovered
shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the general fund.
(7) The final order of the administrative law judge shall include
a notice to the parties of the right to obtain judicial review of the
order by appeal in accordance with the provisions of RCW 34.05.510
through 34.05.598, and that such appeal must be served and filed within
thirty days after the service of the order on the parties.
(8) If, upon all the evidence, the administrative law judge finds
that the respondent has not engaged in any alleged unfair practice, the
administrative law judge shall state findings of fact and shall
similarly issue and file an order dismissing the complaint.
(9) An order dismissing a complaint may include an award of
reasonable attorneys' fees in favor of the respondent if the
administrative law judge concludes that the complaint was frivolous,
unreasonable, or groundless.
(10) The commission shall establish rules of practice to govern,
expedite, and effectuate the foregoing procedure.

--- END ---