BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.43.040 and 2000 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following will be considered as minimum evidence
satisfactory to the board that the applicant is qualified for
registration as a professional engineer, engineer-in-training,
professional land surveyor, or land-surveyor-in-training, respectively:
(a)(i) As a professional engineer: A specific record of eight
years or more of experience in engineering work of a character
satisfactory to the board and indicating that the applicant is
competent to practice engineering; and successfully passing a written
or oral examination, or both, in engineering as prescribed by the
board.
(ii) Graduation in an approved engineering curriculum of four years
or more from a school or college approved by the board as of
satisfactory standing shall be considered equivalent to four years of
such required experience. The satisfactory completion of each year of
such an approved engineering course without graduation shall be
considered as equivalent to a year of such required experience.
Graduation in a curriculum other than engineering from a school or
college approved by the board shall be considered as equivalent to two
years of such required experience((: PROVIDED, That)). However, no
applicant shall receive credit for more than four years of experience
because of undergraduate educational qualifications. The board may, at
its discretion, give credit as experience not in excess of one year,
for satisfactory postgraduate study in engineering.
(iii) Structural engineering is recognized as a specialized branch
of professional engineering. To receive a certificate of registration
in structural engineering, an applicant must hold a current
registration in this state in engineering and have at least two years
of structural engineering experience, of a character satisfactory to
the board, in addition to the eight years' experience required for
registration as a professional engineer. An applicant for registration
as a structural engineer must also pass an additional examination as
prescribed by the board. Applicants for a certificate of registration
in structural engineering who have had their application approved by
the board prior to July 1, 2001, are not required to have an additional
two years of structural engineering experience if the applicant passes
the additional structural examination before January 30, 2002.
(iv) An engineer must be registered as a structural engineer in
order to provide structural engineering services for significant
structures. The board may waive the requirements of this subsection
(1)(a)(iv) until December 31, 2009, if:
(A) On January 1, 2007, the engineer is registered with the board
as a professional engineer; and
(B) Within two years of January 1, 2007, the engineer demonstrates
to the satisfaction of the board that the engineer has sufficient
experience in the duties typically provided by a professional
structural engineer regarding significant structures.
(b)(i) As an engineer-in-training: An applicant for registration
as a professional engineer shall take the prescribed examination in two
stages. The first stage of the examination may be taken upon
submission of his or her application for registration as an engineer-in-training and payment of the application fee prescribed in RCW
18.43.050 at any time after the applicant has completed four years of
the required engineering experience, as defined in this section, or has
achieved senior standing in a school or college approved by the board.
The first stage of the examination shall test the applicant's knowledge
of appropriate fundamentals of engineering subjects, including
mathematics and the basic sciences.
(ii) At any time after the completion of the required eight years
of engineering experience, as defined in this section, the applicant
may take the second stage of the examination upon submission of an
application for registration and payment of the application fee
prescribed in RCW 18.43.050. This stage of the examination shall test
the applicant's ability, upon the basis of his or her greater
experience, to apply his or her knowledge and experience in the field
of his or her specific training and qualifications.
(c)(i) As a professional land surveyor: A specific record of eight
years or more of experience in land surveying work of a character
satisfactory to the board and indicating that the applicant is
competent to practice land surveying, and successfully passing a
written or oral examination, or both, in surveying as prescribed by the
board.
(ii) Graduation from a school or college approved by the board as
of satisfactory standing, including the completion of an approved
course in surveying, shall be considered equivalent to four years of
the required experience. Postgraduate college courses approved by the
board shall be considered for up to one additional year of the required
experience.
(d)(i) As a land-surveyor-in-training: An applicant for
registration as a professional land surveyor shall take the prescribed
examination in two stages. The first stage of the examination may be
taken upon submission of his or her application for registration as a
land-surveyor-in-training and payment of the application fee prescribed
in RCW 18.43.050 at any time after the applicant has completed four
years of the required land surveying experience, as defined in this
section, or has achieved senior standing in a school or college
approved by the board. The first stage of the examination shall test
the applicant's knowledge of appropriate fundamentals of land surveying
subjects, including mathematics and the basic sciences.
(ii) At any time after the completion of the required eight years
of land surveying experience, as defined in this section, the applicant
may take the second stage of the examination upon submission of an
application for registration and payment of the application fee
prescribed in RCW 18.43.050. This stage of the examination shall test
the applicant's ability, upon the basis of greater experience, to apply
knowledge and experience in the field of land surveying.
(iii) The first stage shall be successfully completed before the
second stage may be attempted. Applicants who have been approved by
the board to take the examination based on the requirement for six
years of experience under this section before July 1, 1996, are
eligible to sit for the examination.
(2) No person shall be eligible for registration as a professional
engineer, engineer-in-training, professional land surveyor, or land-surveyor-in-training, who is not of good character and reputation.
(3) Teaching, of a character satisfactory to the board shall be
considered as experience not in excess of two years for the appropriate
profession.
(4) The mere execution, as a contractor, of work designed by a
professional engineer, or the supervision of the construction of such
work as a foreman or superintendent shall not be deemed to be practice
of engineering.
(5) Any person having the necessary qualifications prescribed in
this chapter to entitle him or her to registration shall be eligible
for such registration although the person may not be practicing his or
her profession at the time of making his or her application.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.43.020 and 1995 c 356 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) ((Engineer: The term)) "Engineer" ((as used in this chapter
shall)) means a professional engineer as ((hereinafter)) defined in
this section.
(2) ((Professional engineer: The term)) "Professional engineer"
((within the meaning and intent of this chapter, shall)) means a person
who, by reason of his or her special knowledge of the mathematical and
physical sciences and the principles and methods of engineering
analysis and design, acquired by professional education and practical
experience, is qualified to practice engineering as ((hereinafter))
defined in this section, as attested by his or her legal registration
as a professional engineer.
(3) ((Engineer-in-training: The term)) "Engineer-in-training" ((as
used in this chapter)) means a candidate who ((has)): (a) Has
satisfied the experience requirements in RCW 18.43.040 for
registration; (b) has successfully passed the examination in the
fundamental engineering subjects; and (c) is enrolled by the board as
an engineer-in-training.
(4) ((Engineering: The term)) "Engineering" ((as used in this
chapter shall)) means the "practice of engineering" as ((hereinafter))
defined in this section.
(5) ((Practice of engineering: The term)) (a) "Practice of
engineering" ((within the meaning and intent of this chapter shall))
means any professional service or creative work requiring engineering
education, training, and experience and the application of special
knowledge of the mathematical, physical, and engineering sciences to
such professional services or creative work as consultation,
investigation, evaluation, planning, design, and supervision of
construction for the purpose of assuring compliance with specifications
and design, in connection with any public or private utilities,
structures, buildings, machines, equipment, processes, works, or
projects.
(b) A person shall be construed to practice or offer to practice
engineering, within the meaning and intent of this chapter, who
practices any branch of the profession of engineering; or who, by
verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, or in any other
way represents himself or herself to be a professional engineer, or
through the use of some other title implies that he or she is a
professional engineer; or who holds himself or herself out as able to
perform, or who does perform, any engineering service or work or any
other professional service designated by the practitioner or recognized
by educational authorities as engineering.
(c) The practice of engineering ((shall)) does not include the work
ordinarily performed by persons who operate or maintain machinery or
equipment.
(6) ((Land surveyor: The term)) "Land surveyor" ((as used in this
chapter shall)) means a professional land surveyor.
(7) ((Professional land surveyor: The term)) "Professional land
surveyor" ((as used in this chapter)) means a person who, by reason of
his or her special knowledge of the mathematical and physical sciences
and principles and practices of land surveying, which is acquired by
professional education and practical experience, is qualified to
practice land surveying and as attested to by his or her legal
registration as a professional land surveyor.
(8) ((Land-surveyor-in-training: The term)) "Land-surveyor-in-training" ((as used in this chapter)) means a candidate who: (a) Has
satisfied the experience requirements in RCW 18.43.040 for
registration; (b) successfully passes the examination in the
fundamental land surveying subjects; and (c) is enrolled by the board
as a land-surveyor-in-training.
(9) ((Practice of land surveying: The term)) "Practice of land
surveying" ((within the meaning and intent of this chapter, shall))
means assuming responsible charge of the surveying of land for the
establishment of corners, lines, boundaries, and monuments, the laying
out and subdivision of land, the defining and locating of corners,
lines, boundaries, and monuments of land after they have been
established, the survey of land areas for the purpose of determining
the topography thereof, the making of topographical delineations and
the preparing of maps and accurate records thereof, when the proper
performance of such services requires technical knowledge and skill.
(10) ((Board: The term)) "Board" ((as used in this chapter shall))
means the state board of registration for professional engineers and
land surveyors, provided for by this chapter.
(11) "Significant structures" include:
(a) Hazardous facilities, defined as: Structures housing,
supporting, or containing sufficient quantities of explosive substances
to be of danger to the safety of the public if released;
(b) Essential facilities that have a ground area of more than five
thousand square feet and are more than twenty feet in mean roof height
above average ground level. Essential facilities are defined as:
(i) Hospitals and other medical facilities having surgery and
emergency treatment areas;
(ii) Fire and police stations;
(iii) Tanks or other structures containing, housing, or supporting
water or fire suppression material or equipment required for the
protection of essential or hazardous facilities or special occupancy
structures;
(iv) Emergency vehicle shelters and garages;
(v) Structures and equipment in emergency preparedness centers;
(vi) Standby power-generating equipment for essential facilities;
(vii) Structures and equipment in government communication centers
and other facilities requiring emergency response;
(viii) Aviation control towers, air traffic control centers, and
emergency aircraft hangars; and
(ix) Buildings and other structures having critical national
defense functions;
(c) Structures exceeding one hundred feet in height above average
ground level;
(d) Buildings that are customarily occupied by human beings and are
five stories or more above average ground level;
(e) Bridges having a total span of more than two hundred feet and
piers having a surface area greater than ten thousand square feet; and
(f) Buildings and other structures where more than three hundred
people congregate in one area.

--- END ---