BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining a
license. The director may waive the fees when, in the discretion of
the director, the fees would not be in the best interest of public
health and safety, or when the fees would be to the financial
disadvantage of the state.
(2) Fees charged shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost
to the department for the licensure of the activity or class of
activities and may include costs of necessary inspection.
(3) The director shall establish the fees charged by rule.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.300 and 2006 c 265 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An agency may be denied a license, or any license issued
pursuant to this chapter may be suspended, revoked, modified, or not
renewed by the director upon proof (a) that the agency has failed or
refused to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the
requirements adopted pursuant to this chapter; or (b) that the
conditions required for the issuance of a license under this chapter
have ceased to exist with respect to such licenses. ((RCW 43.20A.205))
Section 3 of this act governs notice of a license denial, revocation,
suspension, or modification and provides the right to an adjudicative
proceeding.
(2) In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial,
modification, suspension, or revocation of any license under this
chapter, the department's decision shall be upheld if it is supported
by a preponderance of the evidence.
(3) The department may assess civil monetary penalties upon proof
that an agency has failed or refused to comply with the rules adopted
under this chapter or that an agency subject to licensing under this
chapter is operating without a license except that civil monetary
penalties shall not be levied against a licensed foster home. Monetary
penalties levied against unlicensed agencies that submit an application
for licensure within thirty days of notification and subsequently
become licensed will be forgiven. These penalties may be assessed in
addition to or in lieu of other disciplinary actions. Civil monetary
penalties, if imposed, may be assessed and collected, with interest,
for each day an agency is or was out of compliance. Civil monetary
penalties shall not exceed seventy-five dollars per violation for a
family day care home and two hundred fifty dollars per violation for
child day care centers. Each day upon which the same or substantially
similar action occurs is a separate violation subject to the assessment
of a separate penalty. The department shall provide a notification
period before a monetary penalty is effective and may forgive the
penalty levied if the agency comes into compliance during this period.
The department may suspend, revoke, or not renew a license for failure
to pay a civil monetary penalty it has assessed pursuant to this
chapter within ten days after such assessment becomes final. ((Chapter
43.20A RCW)) Section 4 of this act governs notice of a civil monetary
penalty and provides the right ((of)) to an adjudicative proceeding.
The preponderance of evidence standard shall apply in adjudicative
proceedings related to assessment of civil monetary penalties.
(4)(a) In addition to or in lieu of an enforcement action being
taken, the department may place a child day care center or family day
care provider on nonreferral status if the center or provider has
failed or refused to comply with this chapter or rules adopted under
this chapter or an enforcement action has been taken. The nonreferral
status may continue until the department determines that: (i) No
enforcement action is appropriate; or (ii) a corrective action plan has
been successfully concluded.
(b) Whenever a child day care center or family day care provider is
placed on nonreferral status, the department shall provide written
notification to the child day care center or family day care provider.
(5) The department shall notify appropriate public and private
child care resource and referral agencies of the department's decision
to: (a) Take an enforcement action against a child day care center or
family day care provider; or (b) place or remove a child day care
center or family day care provider on nonreferral status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall give written notice of the denial of an
application for a license to the applicant or his or her agent. The
department shall give written notice of revocation, suspension, or
modification of a license to the licensee or his or her agent. The
notice shall state the reasons for the action. The notice shall be
personally served in the manner of service of a summons in a civil
action or shall be given in another manner that shows proof of receipt.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and in
subsection (4) of this section, revocation, suspension, or modification
is effective twenty-eight days after the licensee or the agent receives
the notice.
(a) The department may make the date the action is effective later
than twenty-eight days after receipt. If the department does so, it
shall state the effective date in the written notice given the licensee
or agent.
(b) The department may make the date the action is effective sooner
than twenty-eight days after receipt when necessary to protect the
public health, safety, or welfare. When the department does so, it
shall state the effective date and the reasons supporting the effective
date in the written notice given to the licensee or agent.
(c) When the department has received certification pursuant to
chapter 74.20A RCW from the division of child support that the licensee
is a person who is not in compliance with a support order, the
department shall provide that the suspension is effective immediately
upon receipt of the suspension notice by the licensee.
(3) Except for licensees suspended for noncompliance with a support
order under chapter 74.20A RCW, a license applicant or licensee who is
aggrieved by a department denial, revocation, suspension, or
modification has the right to an adjudicative proceeding. The
proceeding is governed by the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW. The application must be in writing, state the basis for
contesting the adverse action, include a copy of the adverse notice, be
served on and received by the department within twenty-eight days of
the license applicant's or licensee's receiving the adverse notice, and
be served in a manner that shows proof of receipt.
(4)(a) If the department gives a licensee twenty-eight or more
days' notice of revocation, suspension, or modification and the
licensee files an appeal before its effective date, the department
shall not implement the adverse action until the final order has been
entered. The presiding or reviewing officer may permit the department
to implement part or all of the adverse action while the proceedings
are pending if the appellant causes an unreasonable delay in the
proceeding, if the circumstances change so that implementation is in
the public interest, or for other good cause.
(b) If the department gives a licensee less than twenty-eight days'
notice of revocation, suspension, or modification and the licensee
timely files a sufficient appeal, the department may implement the
adverse action on the effective date stated in the notice. The
presiding or reviewing officer may order the department to stay
implementation of part or all of the adverse action while the
proceedings are pending if staying implementation is in the public
interest or for other good cause.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall give written notice to the person against
whom it assesses a civil fine. The notice shall state the reasons for
the adverse action. The notice shall be personally served in the
manner of service of a summons in a civil action or shall be given in
another manner that shows proof of receipt.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section,
the civil fine is due and payable twenty-eight days after receipt. The
department may make the date the fine is due later than twenty-eight
days after receipt. When the department does so, it shall state the
effective date in the written notice given the person against whom it
assesses the fine.
(3) The person against whom the department assesses a civil fine
has the right to an adjudicative proceeding. The proceeding is
governed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. The
application must be in writing, state the basis for contesting the
fine, include a copy of the adverse notice, be served on and received
by the department within twenty-eight days of the person's receiving
the notice of civil fine, and be served in a manner that shows proof of
receipt.
(4) If the person files a timely and sufficient appeal, the
department shall not implement the action until the final order has
been served. The presiding or reviewing officer may permit the
department to implement part or all of the action while the proceedings
are pending if the appellant causes an unreasonable delay in the
proceedings or for other good cause.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.43.838 and 2005 c 421 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After January 1, 1988, and notwithstanding any provision of RCW
43.43.700 through 43.43.810 to the contrary, the state patrol shall
furnish a transcript of the conviction record pertaining to any person
for whom the state patrol or the federal bureau of investigation has a
record upon the written request of:
(a) The subject of the inquiry;
(b) Any business or organization for the purpose of conducting
evaluations under RCW 43.43.832;
(c) The department of social and health services;
(d) Any law enforcement agency, prosecuting authority, or the
office of the attorney general; ((or))
(e) The department of social and health services for the purpose of
meeting responsibilities set forth in chapter 74.15, 18.51, 18.20, or
72.23 RCW, or any later-enacted statute which purpose is to regulate or
license a facility which handles vulnerable adults. However, access to
conviction records pursuant to this subsection (1)(e) does not limit or
restrict the ability of the department to obtain additional information
regarding conviction records and pending charges as set forth in RCW
74.15.030(2)(b) (as recodified by this act); or
(f) The department of early learning for the purpose of meeting
responsibilities in chapter 43.215 RCW.
(2) The state patrol shall by rule establish fees for disseminating
records under this section to recipients identified in subsection
(1)(a) and (b) of this section. The state patrol shall also by rule
establish fees for disseminating records in the custody of the national
crime information center. The revenue from the fees shall cover, as
nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs to the state
patrol of disseminating the records. No fee shall be charged to a
nonprofit organization for the records check. In the case of record
checks using fingerprints requested by school districts and educational
service districts, the state patrol shall charge only for the
incremental costs associated with checking fingerprints in addition to
name and date of birth. Record checks requested by school districts
and educational service districts using only name and date of birth
shall continue to be provided free of charge.
(3) No employee of the state, employee of a business or
organization, or the business or organization is liable for defamation,
invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with
any lawful dissemination of information under RCW 43.43.830 through
43.43.840 or 43.43.760.
(4) Before July 26, 1987, the state patrol shall adopt rules and
forms to implement this section and to provide for security and privacy
of information disseminated under this section, giving first priority
to the criminal justice requirements of this chapter. The rules may
include requirements for users, audits of users, and other procedures
to prevent use of civil adjudication record information or criminal
history record information inconsistent with this chapter.
(5) Nothing in RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840 shall authorize an
employer to make an inquiry not specifically authorized by this
chapter, or be construed to affect the policy of the state declared in
chapter 9.96A RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.48.010 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 207 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Individually identifiable" means that a record contains
information which reveals or can likely be associated with the identity
of the person or persons to whom the record pertains.
(2) "Legally authorized representative" means a person legally
authorized to give consent for the disclosure of personal records on
behalf of a minor or a legally incompetent adult.
(3) "Personal record" means any information obtained or maintained
by a state agency which refers to a person and which is declared exempt
from public disclosure, confidential, or privileged under state or
federal law.
(4) "Research" means a planned and systematic sociological,
psychological, epidemiological, biomedical, or other scientific
investigation carried out by a state agency, by a scientific research
professional associated with a bona fide scientific research
organization, or by a graduate student currently enrolled in an
advanced academic degree curriculum, with an objective to contribute to
scientific knowledge, the solution of social and health problems, or
the evaluation of public benefit and service programs. This definition
excludes methods of record analysis and data collection that are
subjective, do not permit replication, and are not designed to yield
reliable and valid results.
(5) "Research record" means an item or grouping of information
obtained for the purpose of research from or about a person or
extracted for the purpose of research from a personal record.
(6) "State agency" means: (a) The department of social and health
services; (b) the department of corrections; (c) an institution of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016; ((or)) (d) the
department of health; or (e) the department of early learning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following sections are each recodified
as sections in chapter 43.215 RCW:
RCW 74.15.030
RCW 74.13.0903

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 43.215.2201 (Licensed day care centers--Notice of pesticide use) and 2001 c 333 s 5 are each repealed.

Sec. 9 RCW 35.21.688 and 2003 c 286 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
no city or town may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance,
development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy,
or administrative practice that prohibits the use of a residential
dwelling, located in an area zoned for residential or commercial use,
as a family day-care provider's facility serving twelve or fewer
children.
(2) A city or town may require that the facility: (a) Comply with
all building, fire, safety, health code, and business licensing
requirements; (b) conform to lot size, building size, setbacks, and lot
coverage standards applicable to the zoning district except if the
structure is a legal nonconforming structure; (c) is certified by the
((office of child care policy)) department of early learning licensor
as providing a safe passenger loading area; (d) include signage, if
any, that conforms to applicable regulations; and (e) limit hours of
operations to facilitate neighborhood compatibility, while also
providing appropriate opportunity for persons who use family day-care
who work a nonstandard work shift.
(3) A city or town may also require that the family day-care
provider, before state licensing, require proof of written notification
by the provider that the immediately adjoining property owners have
been informed of the intent to locate and maintain such a facility. If
a dispute arises between neighbors and the day-care provider over
licensing requirements, the licensor may provide a forum to resolve the
dispute.
(4) This section may not be construed to prohibit a city or town
from imposing zoning conditions on the establishment and maintenance of
a family day-care provider's home serving twelve or fewer children in
an area zoned for residential or commercial use, if the conditions are
no more restrictive than conditions imposed on other residential
dwellings in the same zone and the establishment of such facilities is
not precluded. As used in this section, "family day-care provider" is
as defined in RCW ((74.15.020)) 43.215.010.

Sec. 10 RCW 35.63.185 and 2003 c 286 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
no city may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development
regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or
administrative practice that prohibits the use of a residential
dwelling, located in an area zoned for residential or commercial use,
as a family day-care provider's home facility.
(2) A city may require that the facility: (a) Comply with all
building, fire, safety, health code, and business licensing
requirements; (b) conform to lot size, building size, setbacks, and lot
coverage standards applicable to the zoning district except if the
structure is a legal nonconforming structure; (c) is certified by the
((office of child care policy)) department of early learning licensor
as providing a safe passenger loading area; (d) include signage, if
any, that conforms to applicable regulations; and (e) limit hours of
operations to facilitate neighborhood compatibility, while also
providing appropriate opportunity for persons who use family day-care
and who work a nonstandard work shift.
(3) A city may also require that the family day-care provider,
before state licensing, require proof of written notification by the
provider that the immediately adjoining property owners have been
informed of the intent to locate and maintain such a facility. If a
dispute arises between neighbors and the family day-care provider over
licensing requirements, the licensor may provide a forum to resolve the
dispute.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a city
from imposing zoning conditions on the establishment and maintenance of
a family day-care provider's home in an area zoned for residential or
commercial use, so long as such conditions are no more restrictive than
conditions imposed on other residential dwellings in the same zone and
the establishment of such facilities is not precluded. As used in this
section, "family day-care provider" is as defined in RCW ((74.15.020))
43.215.010.

Sec. 11 RCW 35A.63.215 and 2003 c 286 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
no city may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development
regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or
administrative practice that prohibits the use of a residential
dwelling, located in an area zoned for residential or commercial use,
as a family day-care provider's home facility.
(2) A city may require that the facility: (a) Comply with all
building, fire, safety, health code, and business licensing
requirements; (b) conform to lot size, building size, setbacks, and lot
coverage standards applicable to the zoning district except if the
structure is a legal nonconforming structure; (c) is certified by the
((office of child care policy)) department of early learning licensor
as providing a safe passenger loading area; (d) include signage, if
any, that conforms to applicable regulations; and (e) limit hours of
operations to facilitate neighborhood compatibility, while also
providing appropriate opportunity for persons who use family day-care
and who work a nonstandard work shift.
(3) A city may also require that the family day-care provider,
before state licensing, require proof of written notification by the
provider that the immediately adjoining property owners have been
informed of the intent to locate and maintain such a facility. If a
dispute arises between neighbors and the family day-care provider over
licensing requirements, the licensor may provide a forum to resolve the
dispute.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a city
from imposing zoning conditions on the establishment and maintenance of
a family day-care provider's home in an area zoned for residential or
commercial use, so long as such conditions are no more restrictive than
conditions imposed on other residential dwellings in the same zone and
the establishment of such facilities is not precluded. As used in this
section, "family day-care provider" is as defined in RCW ((74.15.020))
43.215.010.

Sec. 12 RCW 36.70.757 and 2003 c 286 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
no county may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development
regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or
administrative practice that prohibits the use of a residential
dwelling, located in an area zoned for residential or commercial use,
as a family day-care provider's facility serving twelve or fewer
children.
(2) A county may require that the facility: (a) Comply with all
building, fire, safety, health code, and business licensing
requirements; (b) conform to lot size, building size, setbacks, and lot
coverage standards applicable to the zoning district except if the
structure is a legal nonconforming structure; (c) is certified by the
((office of child care policy)) department of early learning licensor
as providing a safe passenger loading area; (d) include signage, if
any, that conforms to applicable regulations; and (e) limit hours of
operations to facilitate neighborhood compatibility, while also
providing appropriate opportunity for persons who use family day-care
who work a nonstandard work shift.
(3) A county may also require that the family day-care provider,
before state licensing, require proof of written notification by the
provider that the immediately adjoining property owners have been
informed of the intent to locate and maintain such a facility. If a
dispute arises between neighbors and the day-care provider over
licensing requirements, the licensor may provide a forum to resolve the
dispute.
(4) This section may not be construed to prohibit a county from
imposing zoning conditions on the establishment and maintenance of a
family day-care provider's home serving twelve or fewer children in an
area zoned for residential or commercial use, if the conditions are no
more restrictive than conditions imposed on other residential dwellings
in the same zone and the establishment of such facilities is not
precluded. As used in this section, "family day-care provider" is as
defined in RCW ((74.15.020)) 43.215.010.

Sec. 13 RCW 36.70A.450 and 2003 c 286 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
no county or city may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance,
development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy,
or administrative practice that prohibits the use of a residential
dwelling, located in an area zoned for residential or commercial use,
as a family day-care provider's home facility.
(2) A county or city may require that the facility: (a) Comply
with all building, fire, safety, health code, and business licensing
requirements; (b) conform to lot size, building size, setbacks, and lot
coverage standards applicable to the zoning district except if the
structure is a legal nonconforming structure; (c) is certified by the
((office of child care policy)) department of early learning licensor
as providing a safe passenger loading area; (d) include signage, if
any, that conforms to applicable regulations; and (e) limit hours of
operations to facilitate neighborhood compatibility, while also
providing appropriate opportunity for persons who use family day-care
and who work a nonstandard work shift.
(3) A county or city may also require that the family day-care
provider, before state licensing, require proof of written notification
by the provider that the immediately adjoining property owners have
been informed of the intent to locate and maintain such a facility. If
a dispute arises between neighbors and the family day-care provider
over licensing requirements, the licensor may provide a forum to
resolve the dispute.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a county
or city from imposing zoning conditions on the establishment and
maintenance of a family day-care provider's home in an area zoned for
residential or commercial use, so long as such conditions are no more
restrictive than conditions imposed on other residential dwellings in
the same zone and the establishment of such facilities is not
precluded. As used in this section, "family day-care provider" is as
defined in RCW ((74.15.020)) 43.215.010.

--- END ---