BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.06.040 and 1987 c 43 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The court shall sit in panels of three judges and decisions shall
be rendered by not less than a majority of the panel. In the
determination of causes all decisions of the court shall be given in
writing and the grounds of the decisions shall be stated. All
decisions of the court having precedential value shall be published as
opinions of the court. Each panel shall determine whether a decision
of the court has sufficient precedential value to be published as an
opinion of the court. Decisions determined not to have precedential
value shall not be published. Panels in the first division shall be
comprised of such judges as the chief judge thereof shall from time to
time direct. Judges of the respective divisions may sit in other
divisions and causes may be transferred between divisions, as directed
by written order of the chief justice. The court may hold sessions in
cities as may be designated by rule.
((No judge of the court shall be entitled to per diem or mileage
for services performed at either his legal residence or the
headquarters of the division of the court of which he is a member.))
The court may establish rules supplementary to and not in conflict
with rules of the supreme court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 2.06 RCW
to read as follows:
The court of appeals is authorized to adopt rules providing for the
reimbursement of work-related travel expenses from a judge's customary
residence to the division headquarters of the court and back. Judges
elected from or residing in the county in which the division is
headquartered are not eligible for reimbursement under this section.
The rates of reimbursement are as set forth in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

--- END ---