BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature believes that vulnerable,
frail, and elderly Washingtonians have a right to live in appropriate
and the least restrictive long-term care settings. Adult family homes
are a critical component of Washington's long-term care system, and it
is important that they be utilized in the most appropriate manner. In
order to utilize them correctly, the legislature needs to understand
how they are currently used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct a comprehensive study that examines the current
adult family home system in Washington state. Specifically, the study
shall include:
(a) A summary of how adult family homes fit into the long-term care
system;
(b) An analysis of the current client acuity levels in adult family
homes;
(c) An analysis of the training mechanism for caregivers in adult
family homes;
(d) An analysis of the liability exemption for adult family homes;
(e) A regional needs analysis for adult family homes, broken down
by city and county;
(f) An analysis of current regulation and oversight of adult family
homes;
(g) An analysis of the average wages and benefits for adult family
home caregivers; and
(h) An analysis of the average length of stay for caregivers in an
adult family home.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall submit
the final report to the legislature by October 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---