BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Under chapters 18.57A and 18.71A RCW, physician assistants are
granted authority to practice medicine under the supervision and
control of a physician licensed in this state under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW; such supervision and control does not require the personal
presence of the supervising physician at the place where services are
rendered; and the physician assistant may practice medicine in this
state only pursuant to the terms of a practice arrangement plan
approved by the licensing body of the supervising physician.
(2) Physician assistants working under the supervision of a
physician and pursuant to a practice arrangement plan can safely
improve the efficiency of our health care delivery system by freeing up
additional time for physicians to care for patients, and the ability of
physician assistants to practice medicine under the supervision of a
physician pursuant to a practice arrangement plan but not under the
direct supervision of a physician also increases the availability of
health care to rural or underserved populations where physicians are
often times less available.
(3) Some state agencies and departments do not accept the signature
of physician assistants on certain certificates, reports, and other
documents that their supervising physician is permitted to sign,
notwithstanding the fact that the signing of such documents is within
the physician assistant's scope of practice, covered under their
practice arrangement plan, and permitted pursuant to WAC 246-918-140.
It is therefore the intent of the legislature to clarify in statute
what was adopted by rule in WAC 246-918-140, that a physician assistant
may sign and attest to any document that might ordinarily be signed by
the supervising physician and that is consistent with the terms of the
practice arrangement plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.57A RCW
to read as follows:
An osteopathic physician's assistant may sign and attest to any
certificates, cards, forms, or other required documentation that the
osteopathic physician's assistant's supervising osteopathic physician
or osteopathic physician group may sign, provided that it is within the
osteopathic physician's assistant's scope of practice and is consistent
with the terms of the osteopathic physician's assistant's practice
arrangement plan as required by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.71A RCW
to read as follows:
A physician assistant may sign and attest to any certificates,
cards, forms, or other required documentation that the physician
assistant's supervising physician or physician group may sign, provided
that it is within the physician assistant's scope of practice and is
consistent with the terms of the physician assistant's practice
arrangement plan as required by this chapter.

--- END ---