BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon a guilty plea or conviction of a person for violations of
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the
state patrol of such guilty plea or conviction.
(2) When the state patrol receives information that a person has
pled guilty to or been convicted of one of the violations under
subsection (1) of this section, the state patrol shall transmit that
information to the department of health. It is the duty of the
department of health to identify whether the person holds a credential
issued by the medical quality assurance commission under RCW 18.130.040
and chapter 18.71 RCW, and provide this information to the commission.
The commission shall review the information provided by the department
of health and assess whether or not the physician should be referred to
the impaired physician program under RCW 18.71.330 and 18.130.175.

--- END ---