BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Certificate" means a certificate of competency granted by the
director under the terms of this chapter, and is valid within the state
and all political subdivisions, and meets all of the requirements for
license or certification that may be applied by the political
subdivisions.
(2) "Contractor" means any person, corporation, or other entity,
licensed under chapter 18.160 RCW, which performs any work covered by
the provisions of this chapter.
(3) "Director" means the state director of fire protection.
(4) "Fire protection sprinkler fitting" means installing, altering,
and repairing sprinkler, standpipe, hose, or other hazard systems for
fire protection purposes that are an assembly of piping or conduit
beginning at the connection to the primary water supply within a
building, sprinkler tank heaters, air lines, and all tanks and pumps
attached thereto.
(5) "Journey-level sprinkler fitter" means any person who has been
issued a certificate by the director as provided by this chapter.
(6) "NFPA 13-D" means the standard in use by the national fire
protection association for the installation of fire protection
sprinkler systems in one and two-family dwellings and manufactured
homes whenever the provisions of this chapter are applied.
(7) "NFPA 13-R" means the standard in use by the national fire
protection association for the installation of fire protection
sprinkler systems in residential dwellings up to and including four
stories in height whenever the provisions of this chapter are applied.
(8) "Person" means a natural person, including an owner, manager,
partner, officer, employee, or occupant.
(9) "Residential sprinkler fitter" means anyone who has been issued
a certificate by the director limited to installation, maintenance, and
repair of the fire protection sprinkler system of residential
occupancies as defined by NFPA 13-D and NFPA 13-R.
(10) "Trainee" means anyone who has been issued a training
certificate by the director who is learning the fire protection
sprinkler fitting trade under the direct supervision of a journey-level
sprinkler fitter or residential sprinkler fitter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) This chapter shall be administered by
the director.
(2) The director may adopt rules necessary for the administration
of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) No person may engage in the trade of
fire protection sprinkler fitting without having a valid journey-level
sprinkler fitter certificate, residential sprinkler fitter certificate,
training certificate, or temporary certificate, with the exception of
a certified plumber installing a residential fire protection sprinkler
system connected to potable water requiring a plumbing certificate.
(2) No contractor may employ a person in violation of subsection
(1) of this section to perform fire protection sprinkler fitting work.
(3) A person found by the director to have committed an infraction
under this chapter shall be assessed a monetary penalty as set by rule.
(4) Each day in which a person engages in the trade of fire
protection sprinkler fitting in violation of subsection (1) of this
section or employs a person in violation of subsection (2) of this
section is considered a separate infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The director shall adopt a written
examination to be administered to applicants for certificates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Every applicant for a certificate shall
pay an examination fee and satisfactorily pass an examination as
provided by rule.
(2) Every applicant for a certificate shall apply to the director
on an application form provided by the director and pay the application
fee as provided by rule.
(3)(a) Every applicant for a journey-level sprinkler fitter
certificate shall provide evidence to the director on a form provided
by the director of at least eight thousand hours of trade-related fire
protection sprinkler fitting experience.
(b) Every applicant for a residential sprinkler fitter certificate
shall provide evidence to the director on a form provided by the
director of at least four thousand hours of trade-related fire
protection sprinkler fitting or residential sprinkler fitting
experience.
(4) Every applicant for a training certificate shall provide
evidence to the director on a form provided by the director of trade-related employment by a contractor.
(5)(a) The director shall grant a journey-level sprinkler fitter
certificate without examination to any applicant who, during the ninety
days following the effective date of this section, submits an
application for such certification and evidence of his or her
employment as a journey-level sprinkler fitter for a period of not less
than eight thousand hours.
(b) The director shall grant a residential sprinkler fitter
certificate without examination to any applicant who, during the ninety
days following the effective date of this section, submits an
application for such certification and evidence of his or her
employment as a journey-level sprinkler fitter or a residential
sprinkler fitter for a period of not less than four thousand hours.
(6) The director may grant a certificate without examination to any
applicant who is a journey-level sprinkler fitter or residential
sprinkler fitter from a state whose requirements for certification are
at least substantially equivalent to the requirements of this state,
and which extends the same privileges of reciprocity to journey-level
sprinkler fitters or residential sprinkler fitters from this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A certificate expires on December 31st.
(2) The certificate shall be renewed every other year.
(3) Before the expiration date of the certificate, every applicant
shall reapply to the director on an application form provided by the
director and pay the application fee as provided by rule.
(4) If a certificate is not renewed before its expiration date, an
applicant must:
(a) Apply to the director on an application form provided by the
director;
(b) Pay an application fee to the director as provided by rule;
(c) Pay an examination fee as provided by rule; and
(d) Successfully pass the written examination required by this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 All receipts from fees and charges or from
the money generated by the rules adopted under this chapter shall be
deposited into the fire protection contractor license fund created in
RCW 18.160.050 and used for the purposes authorized under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 An authorized representative of the director
may investigate alleged violations of this chapter. Upon request of an
authorized representative, a person performing fire protection
sprinkler fitting or residential sprinkler fitting work must produce
evidence of a certificate issued by the director in accordance with
this chapter. Failure to produce such evidence is an infraction as
provided by section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A person wishing to appeal a determination
of infraction under this chapter must file an appeal within twenty days
of the date of the notice of infraction in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The director shall immediately suspend any
certificate issued under this chapter if the holder has been certified
pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If
the person has continued to meet all other requirements for
certification during the suspension, reissuance of the certificate
shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by
the department of social and health services stating that the person is
in compliance with the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---