BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.200 and 1979 ex.s. c 152 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds and declares it to be in the public
interest and for the protection of the health and welfare of the
residents of the state of Washington that a proper regulatory and
inspection program be instituted in connection with the providing of
medical, dental, and other health services to recipients of public
assistance and medically indigent persons. In order to effectively
accomplish such purpose and to assure that the recipient of such
services receives such services as are paid for by the state of
Washington, the acceptance by the recipient of such services, and by
practitioners of reimbursement for performing such services, shall
authorize the secretary of the department of social and health services
or his designee, to inspect and audit all records in connection with
the providing of such services.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the regulatory and
inspection program authorized in this section shall include:
(a) A systematic pharmacy audit program for determining compliance
with state and federal laws relating to payment for providing services
to recipients under this chapter;
(b) A technical assistance program to identify pharmacies that
could benefit from technical assistance from the department with regard
to billing for payment, and to provide that assistance; and
(c) A systematic method to gather data for program improvement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary or his or her authorized representative shall
develop and implement a program of technical assistance to pharmacies
providing services under this chapter that:
(a) Offers education to pharmacies regarding compliance with the
payment requirements for programs under this chapter; and
(b) Offers technical assistance to pharmacies that request such
assistance or who, as identified in a prepayment or other preaudit
review, would benefit from such assistance.
(2) The department may order a pharmacy to comply with a corrective
plan if, during technical assistance or prepayment or other preaudit
review, a pattern of technical deficiencies is identified. If the
pharmacy fails to comply with the corrective plan, the pharmacy may be
referred for audit under this chapter.
(3) The department shall develop a plan to incorporate into the
provider payment system, by January 1, 2009, system capability to
identify and report a pattern of technical deficiencies by pharmacies
in making payment claims. Technical deficiencies identified by this
system may be used to determine pharmacies to which technical
assistance will be offered. The department must report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2008, and
September 1, 2008, on the progress made to implement this system
requirement.
(4) As used in this section, "technical deficiency" means the same
as defined in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) With respect to audits of the records of pharmacies licensed
under chapter 18.64 RCW, the secretary or his or her authorized
representative shall develop and implement a program under this chapter
that:
(a) Establishes a regular audit cycle and prioritizes pharmacy
audits based on criteria to be developed by the department including,
but not limited to, a history of compliance with this chapter and rules
adopted under this chapter; and
(b) Conducts audits, subject to the following:
(i)(A) Except as provided in (b)(i)(B) of this subsection,
technical deficiencies may not be the basis for finding an overpayment
if the pharmacy can substantiate through documentation that the
services or goods were provided to the recipient and that the technical
deficiency did not adversely affect direct patient care of the
recipient, unless recoupment of the payment is specifically mandated in
state or federal law or rule or failure to recoup payment will result
in the loss of federal matching funds or other penalty against the
state; and
(B) In response to an audit finding technical deficiencies,
including a pattern of noncompliance with technical requirements, the
department may order the pharmacy to comply with a corrective plan. If
the pharmacy fails to comply with the corrective plan, action to recoup
overpayments may be taken based on technical deficiencies;
(ii) An audited pharmacy may use the written records of a hospital,
physician, or other authorized pharmacy to validate the audited
pharmacy's record;
(iii) Findings and recommendations related to overpayments or
underpayments may be based on an extrapolation from a sample of
records. However, extrapolation may not be used to calculate the
amount of an overpayment, and recoupment of an overpayment must be
based on the actual overpayment unless the projection is part of a
settlement agreed to by the pharmacy;
(iv) The pharmacy must be given at least forty-five days from the
date on which the draft audit findings were delivered to the pharmacy
to respond with additional documentation or other relevant information.
Extensions of this time period shall be granted for good cause; and
(v) A final audit report must be delivered to the pharmacy within
one hundred eighty days after delivering a draft audit report to the
pharmacy or after the close of a dispute conference, whichever occurs
later. If extensions of time are granted to the pharmacy under (b)(iv)
of this subsection, the time period for delivery of the final audit
report shall include the additional days allowed for the extension. An
audit report delivered after the time period specified in this
subsection must be deemed to be a draft audit report.
(2) This section does not apply to an audit that is based on an
investigation for fraudulent or abusive practices under RCW 74.09.210.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Draft audit report" includes any audit which contains findings
not previously contained in an audit report delivered to the pharmacy.
(b) "Technical deficiency" means an error or omission in
documentation by a pharmacy that does not affect direct patient care
of, or receipt of services by, the recipient, but does not include:
(i) Lack of medical necessity or failure to document medical
necessity in a manner that meets professionally recognized applicable
standards of care;
(ii) Failure to provide care of a quality that meets professionally
recognized standards of care;
(iii) Failure to obtain prior or concurrent authorization of the
service if required under this chapter or rules adopted under this
chapter; or
(iv) Fraud, a pattern of abusive billing or noncompliance, or a
gross or flagrant violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The secretary of the department of social
and health services may adopt rules as necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act applies retroactively
to audits commenced by the department of social and health services
under chapter 74.09 RCW on or after April 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---