BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The director or the director's agents shall not renew a vehicle
license unless the applicant has paid all monetary penalties for
traffic infractions. This section does not apply to an applicant who
is in compliance with a payment plan for monetary penalties with the
court. For purposes of this section, "payment plan" has the same
meaning as in RCW 46.63.110(6).

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.031 and 2002 c 279 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall not issue a driver's license to a person:
(1) Who is under the age of sixteen years;
(2) Whose driving privilege has been withheld unless and until the
department may authorize the driving privilege under RCW 46.20.311;
(3) Who has been classified as an alcoholic, drug addict, alcohol
abuser, or drug abuser by a program approved by the department of
social and health services. The department may, however, issue a
license if the person:
(a) Has been granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05
RCW; or
(b) Is satisfactorily participating in or has successfully
completed an alcohol or drug abuse treatment program approved by the
department of social and health services and has established control of
his or her alcohol or drug abuse problem;
(4) Who has previously been adjudged ((to be mentally ill or
insane,)) as a person with mental illness or ((to be)) incompetent due
to a mental disability or disease. The department shall, however,
issue a license to the person if he or she otherwise qualifies and:
(a) Has been restored to competency by the methods provided by law;
or
(b) The superior court finds the person able to operate a motor
vehicle with safety upon the highways during such incompetency;
(5) Who has not passed the driver's licensing examination required
by RCW 46.20.120 and 46.20.305, if applicable;
(6) Who is required under the laws of this state to deposit proof
of financial responsibility and who has not deposited such proof;
(7) Who is unable to safely operate a motor vehicle upon the
highways due to a physical or mental disability. The department's
conclusion that a person is barred from licensing under this subsection
must be reasonable and be based upon good and substantial evidence.
This determination is subject to review by a court of competent
jurisdiction;
(8) Who has not paid all monetary penalties for traffic infractions
unless the person is in compliance with a payment plan with the court.
For purposes of this subsection, "payment plan" has the same meaning as
in RCW 46.63.110(6).

--- END ---