BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may not drive, operate, or be in physical control of
a commercial motor vehicle with the presence of any Schedule I drug, as
listed in RCW 69.50.204, or its metabolite, or Schedule II drug, as
listed in RCW 69.50.206, or its metabolite, in his or her blood and be
involved in a motor vehicle accident in which there is:
(a) A human fatality;
(b) Bodily injury to any person who, as a result of the injury,
immediately receives medical treatment away from the scene of the
accident; or
(c) One or more motor vehicles that incur disabling damage as a
result of the accident, requiring the motor vehicle to be transported
away from the scene by a tow truck or other motor vehicle.
(2) Law enforcement or appropriate officials shall issue an out-of-service order valid for twenty-four hours against a person who drives,
operates, or is in physical control of a commercial motor vehicle with
the presence of any Schedule I drug, as listed in RCW 69.50.204, or its
metabolite, or Schedule II drug, as listed in RCW 69.50.206, or its
metabolite, in his or her blood and is involved in a motor vehicle
accident in which subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) of this section
occurs, or who refuses to take a test to determine the presence of any
Schedule I drug, as listed in RCW 69.50.204, or its metabolite, or
Schedule II drug, as listed in RCW 69.50.206, or its metabolite, in his
or her blood under RCW 46.25.120(3).
(3) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)
of this section, which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of
the evidence, that the defendant had a valid prescription for any
controlled substance consumed, and that the defendant consumed the
controlled substance according to the prescription's directions and
warnings.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.25.090 and 2006 c 327 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of not less than one year if a report has been
received by the department pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 or 46.25.120, or
if the person has been convicted of a first violation, within this or
any other jurisdiction, of:
(a) Driving a motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol or any
drug;
(b) Driving a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol
concentration in the person's system is 0.04 or more, or driving a
noncommercial motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration in the
person's system is 0.08 or more, or is 0.02 or more if the person is
under age twenty-one, as determined by any testing methods approved by
law in this state or any other state or jurisdiction;
(c) Leaving the scene of an accident involving a motor vehicle
driven by the person;
(d) Using a motor vehicle in the commission of a felony;
(e) Refusing to submit to a test or tests to determine the driver's
alcohol concentration or the presence of any drug while driving a motor
vehicle;
(f) Driving a commercial motor vehicle when, as a result of prior
violations committed while operating a commercial motor vehicle, the
driver's commercial driver's license is revoked, suspended, or
canceled, or the driver is disqualified from operating a commercial
motor vehicle;
(g) Causing a fatality through the negligent operation of a
commercial motor vehicle, including but not limited to the crimes of
vehicular homicide and negligent homicide;
(h) Driving a commercial motor vehicle with the presence of any
Schedule I drug, as listed in RCW 69.50.204, or its metabolite, or
Schedule II drug, as listed in RCW 69.50.206, or its metabolite, in his
or her blood and being involved in a motor vehicle accident in which
there is:
(i) A human fatality;
(ii) Bodily injury to any person who, as a result of the injury,
immediately receives medical treatment away from the scene of the
accident; or
(iii) One or more motor vehicles that incur disabling damage as a
result of the accident, requiring the motor vehicle to be transported
away from the scene by a tow truck or other motor vehicle.
If any of the violations set forth in this subsection occurred
while transporting hazardous material, the person is disqualified for
a period of not less than three years.
(2) A person is disqualified for life if it has been determined
that the person has committed or has been convicted of two or more
violations of any of the offenses specified in subsection (1) of this
section, or any combination of those offenses, arising from two or more
separate incidents.
(3) The department may adopt rules, in accordance with federal
regulations, establishing guidelines, including conditions, under which
a disqualification for life under subsection (2) of this section may be
reduced to a period of not less than ten years.
(4) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for life who uses a motor vehicle in the commission of a felony
involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled
substance, as defined by chapter 69.50 RCW, or possession with intent
to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance, as
defined by chapter 69.50 RCW.
(5)(a) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(i) Not less than sixty days if:
(A) Convicted of or found to have committed a second serious
traffic violation while driving a commercial motor vehicle; or
(B) Convicted of reckless driving, where there has been a prior
serious traffic violation; or
(ii) Not less than one hundred twenty days if:
(A) Convicted of or found to have committed a third or subsequent
serious traffic violation while driving a commercial motor vehicle; or
(B) Convicted of reckless driving, where there has been two or more
prior serious traffic violations.
(b) The disqualification period under (a)(ii) of this subsection
must be in addition to any other previous period of disqualification.
(c) For purposes of determining prior serious traffic violations
under this subsection, each conviction of or finding that a driver has
committed a serious traffic violation while driving a commercial motor
vehicle or noncommercial motor vehicle, arising from a separate
incident occurring within a three-year period, must be counted.
(6) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(a) Not less than ninety days nor more than one year if convicted
of or found to have committed a first violation of an out-of-service
order while driving a commercial vehicle;
(b) Not less than one year nor more than five years if, during a
ten-year period, the person is convicted of or is found to have
committed two violations of out-of-service orders while driving a
commercial motor vehicle in separate incidents;
(c) Not less than three years nor more than five years if, during
a ten-year period, the person is convicted of or is found to have
committed three or more violations of out-of-service orders while
driving commercial motor vehicles in separate incidents;
(d) Not less than one hundred eighty days nor more than two years
if the person is convicted of or is found to have committed a first
violation of an out-of-service order while transporting hazardous
materials, or while operating motor vehicles designed to transport
sixteen or more passengers, including the driver. A person is
disqualified for a period of not less than three years nor more than
five years if, during a ten-year period, the person is convicted of or
is found to have committed subsequent violations of out-of-service
orders, in separate incidents, while transporting hazardous materials,
or while operating motor vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more
passengers, including the driver.
(7) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle if a report has been received by the department under RCW
46.25.125 that the person has received a verified positive drug test or
positive alcohol confirmation test as part of the testing program
conducted under 49 C.F.R. 40. A disqualification under this subsection
remains in effect until the person undergoes a drug and alcohol
assessment by a substance abuse professional meeting the requirements
of 49 C.F.R. 40, and the person presents evidence of satisfactory
participation in or successful completion of a drug or alcohol
treatment and/or education program as recommended by the substance
abuse professional, and until the person has met the requirements of
RCW 46.25.100. The substance abuse professional shall forward a
diagnostic evaluation and treatment recommendation to the department of
licensing for use in determining the person's eligibility for driving
a commercial motor vehicle. Persons who are disqualified under this
subsection more than twice in a five-year period are disqualified for
life.
(8)(a) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for the period of time specified in (b) of this subsection if
he or she is convicted of or is found to have committed one of the
following six offenses at a railroad-highway grade crossing while
operating a commercial motor vehicle in violation of a federal, state,
or local law or regulation:
(i) For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to
slow down and check that the tracks are clear of an approaching train;
(ii) For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to
stop before reaching the crossing, if the tracks are not clear;
(iii) For drivers who are always required to stop, failing to stop
before driving onto the crossing;
(iv) For all drivers, failing to have sufficient space to drive
completely through the crossing without stopping;
(v) For all drivers, failing to obey a traffic control device or
the directions of an enforcement officer at the crossing;
(vi) For all drivers, failing to negotiate a crossing because of
insufficient undercarriage clearance.
(b) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(i) Not less than sixty days if the driver is convicted of or is
found to have committed a first violation of a railroad-highway grade
crossing violation;
(ii) Not less than one hundred twenty days if the driver is
convicted of or is found to have committed a second railroad-highway
grade crossing violation in separate incidents within a three-year
period;
(iii) Not less than one year if the driver is convicted of or is
found to have committed a third or subsequent railroad-highway grade
crossing violation in separate incidents within a three-year period.
(9) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for not more than one year if a report has been received by the
department from the federal motor carrier safety administration that
the person's driving has been determined to constitute an imminent
hazard as defined by 49 C.F.R. 383.5. A person who is simultaneously
disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle under this
subsection and under other provisions of this chapter, or under 49
C.F.R. 383.52, shall serve those disqualification periods concurrently.
(10) Within ten days after suspending, revoking, or canceling a
commercial driver's license or disqualifying a driver from operating a
commercial motor vehicle, the department shall update its records to
reflect that action.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.25.120 and 2006 c 327 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who drives a commercial motor vehicle within this
state is deemed to have given consent, subject to RCW 46.61.506, to
take a test or tests of that person's blood or breath for the purpose
of determining that person's alcohol concentration or the presence of
other drugs.
(2) A test or tests may be administered at the direction of a law
enforcement officer, who after stopping or detaining the commercial
motor vehicle driver, has probable cause to believe that driver was
driving a commercial motor vehicle while having alcohol in his or her
system or while under the influence of any drug.
(3) Any person who drives a commercial motor vehicle within this
state and is involved in a motor vehicle accident in which there is:
(a) A human fatality; (b) bodily injury to any person who, as a result
of the injury, immediately receives medical treatment away from the
scene of the accident; or (c) one or more motor vehicles that incur
disabling damage as a result of the accident, requiring the motor
vehicle to be transported away from the scene by a tow truck or other
motor vehicle shall, at the direction of a law enforcement officer,
submit to a test of his or her breath or blood for the purpose of
determining the alcohol concentration in his or her breath or blood and
a test of his or her blood for the purpose of determining the presence
of any Schedule I drug, as listed in RCW 69.50.204, or its metabolite,
or Schedule II drug, as listed in RCW 69.50.206, or its metabolite, in
his or her blood.
(4) The law enforcement officer requesting the test under
subsection (1) of this section shall warn the person requested to
submit to the test that a refusal to submit will result in that person
being disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle under RCW
46.25.090.
(((4))) (5) If the person refuses testing, ((or)) submits to a test
that discloses an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more, or submits to
a blood test under subsection (3) of this section that discloses the
presence of any Schedule I drug, as listed in RCW 69.50.204, or its
metabolite, or Schedule II drug, as listed in RCW 69.50.206, or its
metabolite, the law enforcement officer shall submit a sworn report to
the department certifying that the test was requested pursuant to
subsection (1) or (3) of this section and that the person refused to
submit to testing, ((or)) submitted to a test that disclosed an alcohol
concentration of 0.04 or more, or submitted to a blood test under
subsection (3) of this section that disclosed the presence of any
Schedule I drug, as listed in RCW 69.50.204, or its metabolite, or
Schedule II drug, as listed in RCW 69.50.206, or its metabolite.
(((5))) (6) Upon receipt of the sworn report of a law enforcement
officer under subsection (((4))) (5) of this section, the department
shall disqualify the driver from driving a commercial motor vehicle
under RCW 46.25.090, subject to the hearing provisions of RCW 46.20.329
and 46.20.332. The hearing shall be conducted in the county of the
arrest. For the purposes of this section, the hearing shall cover the
issues of whether a law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to
believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control
of a commercial motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in
the person's system or while under the influence of any drug, whether
the person refused to submit to the test or tests upon request of the
officer after having been informed that the refusal would result in the
disqualification of the person from driving a commercial motor vehicle,
((and,)) if the test was administered, whether the results indicated an
alcohol concentration of 0.04 percent or more or the presence of any
Schedule I drug, as listed in RCW 69.50.204, or its metabolite, or
Schedule II drug, as listed in RCW 69.50.206, or its metabolite,
whether the person had a valid prescription for any controlled
substance consumed, and whether the person consumed the controlled
substance according to the prescription's directions and warnings. The
department shall order that the disqualification of the person either
be rescinded or sustained. Any decision by the department
disqualifying a person from driving a commercial motor vehicle is
stayed and does not take effect while a formal hearing is pending under
this section or during the pendency of a subsequent appeal to superior
court so long as there is no conviction for a moving violation or no
finding that the person has committed a traffic infraction that is a
moving violation during the pendency of the hearing and appeal. If the
disqualification of the person is sustained after the hearing, the
person who is disqualified may file a petition in the superior court of
the county of arrest to review the final order of disqualification by
the department in the manner provided in RCW 46.20.334.
(((6))) (7) If a motor carrier or employer who is required to have
a testing program under 49 C.F.R. 382 knows that a commercial driver in
his or her employ has refused to submit to testing under this section
and has not been disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle,
the employer may notify law enforcement or his or her medical review
officer or breath alcohol technician that the driver has refused to
submit to the required testing.
(((7))) (8) The hearing provisions of this section do not apply to
those persons disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle
under RCW 46.25.090(7).

Sec. 4 RCW 46.25.170 and 1989 c 178 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person subject to RCW 81.04.405 who is determined by the
utilities and transportation commission, after notice, to have
committed an act that is in violation of RCW 46.25.020, 46.25.030,
46.25.040, 46.25.050, ((or)) 46.25.110, or section 1 of this act is
liable to Washington state for the civil penalties provided for in RCW
81.04.405.
(2) A person who violates or fails to comply with, or who procures,
aids, or abets in the violation of any provision of RCW 46.25.020,
46.25.030, 46.25.040, 46.25.050, ((or)) 46.25.110, or section 1 of this
act is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---