BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning on July 1, 2007, the rates of payment for boarding
home medicaid contracted services under chapter 74.39A RCW shall be
established by the department using the "home and community rates
model," developed by the department and published on November 22, 2006.
The "home and community rates model" shall be updated using the 2005
nursing home cost report data to estimate the cost of care for assisted
living services, enhanced adult residential care services, and adult
residential care services. The payment rates established under this
subsection shall be adjusted by:
(a) Acuity classification groups and geographic areas in accordance
with the "home and community rates model"; and
(b) An economic trends and conditions factor which shall be the
lower of a factor determined by the percentage change in the consumer
price index for all urban consumers from the actual index of the
quarter ending June 30th, from the year two years immediately preceding
the rate period to the forecasted index of the quarter ending June
30th, immediately preceding the rate period from the data provided by
the bureau of labor statistics, titled the consumer price index for all
urban consumers, as is published for the quarter ending June 30th, one
year immediately preceding the rate period, or six percent; so that:
For the rate period commencing July 1, 2007, the adjustment for
economic trends and conditions is the lower of the calculated
percentage change of the actual index from the quarter ending June 30,
2005, compared to the forecasted index for the quarter ending June 30,
2007, or six percent.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2008, and for all assisted living services,
enhanced adult residential care services, and adult residential care
rates established on each subsequent July 1st occurring in
even-numbered years, the June 30th rate shall be adjusted by a factor
determined by the percentage change in the consumer price index for all
urban consumers from the actual index of the quarter ending June 30th,
from the year two years immediately preceding the rate period to the
forecasted index of the quarter ending June 30th, from the year one
year immediately preceding the rate period from the data provided by
the bureau of labor statistics, titled the consumer price index for all
urban consumers, as is published for the quarter ending June 30th, in
the year two years immediately preceding the rate period; so that: For
the rate period commencing July 2008, the adjustment for economic
trends and conditions is the calculated percentage change of the actual
index from the quarter ending June 30, 2006, compared to the forecasted
index for the quarter ending June 30, 2007; and so forth.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2009, and for all assisted living services,
enhanced adult residential care services, and adult residential care
rates established on each subsequent July 1st occurring in odd-numbered
years, the June 30th rate in each year shall be adjusted by a factor
determined by the percentage change in the consumer price index for all
urban consumers from the actual index of the quarter ending June 30th,
from the year two years immediately preceding the rate period to the
actual index of the quarter ending June 30th, from the year one year
immediately preceding the rate period from the data provided by the
bureau of labor statistics, titled the consumer price index for all
urban consumers, as is published for the quarter ending June 30th, in
the year one year immediately preceding the rate period; so that: For
the rate period commencing July 2009, the adjustment for economic
trends and conditions is the calculated percentage change of the actual
index from the quarter ending June 30, 2007, compared to the actual
index for the quarter ending June 30, 2008; and so forth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---