BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) For the purposes of this section,
"commercial ticket seller" means a person or entity who in the normal
course of business, for compensation, commission, or otherwise, sells
or resells admission tickets to sporting, musical, theater, or any
other entertainment event.
(2) Any broadcast, print media, or written advertising by a
commercial ticket seller must fully disclose the price of an admission
ticket sold by the commercial ticket seller, including any order
processing and delivery charges and other fees to be imposed in excess
of the face value of a ticket.
(3) It is unlawful for any commercial ticket seller to:
(a) Fail to disclose to a purchaser, prior to any purchase of a
ticket, any order processing and delivery charges and other fees to be
imposed in excess of the face value of the ticket; or
(b) Fail to have the amount of any order processing and delivery
charges and other fees or charges imprinted on the ticket.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business, and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---