BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.320.125 and 2002 c 205 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((By June 1, 2002, within existing resources, the
superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
representatives from the emergency management division of the state
military department, educators, classified staff, principals,
superintendents, administrators, the American society for industrial
security, the state criminal justice training commission, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and others as
determined by the superintendent, shall provide guidance to school
districts in developing comprehensive safe school plans for each
school. This guidance shall include, but shall not be limited to, a
comprehensive school safety checklist to use as a tool when developing
their own individual comprehensive safe school plans, and successful
models of comprehensive safe school plans that include prevention,
intervention, all-hazards/crisis response, and postcrisis recovery.))
The legislature considers it to be a matter of public safety for public
schools and staff to have current safe school plans and procedures in
place, fully consistent with federal law. The legislature further
finds and intends, by requiring safe school plans to be in place, that
school districts will become eligible for federal assistance. The
legislature further finds that schools are in a position to serve the
community in the event of an emergency resulting from natural disasters
or man-made disasters.
(2) Schools and school districts shall consider the guidance
provided by the superintendent of public instruction, including the
comprehensive school safety checklist and the model comprehensive safe
school plans that include prevention, intervention, all hazard/crisis
response, and postcrisis recovery, when developing their own individual
comprehensive safe school plans. Each school district shall adopt, no
later than September 1, 2008, and implement a safe school plan
consistent with the school mapping information system pursuant to RCW
36.28A.060. The plan shall:
(a) Include required school safety policies and procedures;
(b) Address emergency mitigation, preparedness, response, and
recovery;
(c) Include provisions for assisting and communicating with
students and staff, including those with special needs or disabilities;
(d) Use the training guidance provided by the Washington emergency
management division of the state military department in collaboration
with the Washington state office of superintendent of public
instruction school safety center and the school safety center advisory
committee;
(e) Require the building principal to be certified on the incident
command system;
(f) Take into account the manner in which the school facilities may
be used as a community asset in the event of a community-wide
emergency; and
(g) Set guidelines for requesting city or county law enforcement
agencies, local fire departments, emergency service providers, and
county emergency management agencies to meet with school districts and
participate in safety-related drills annually.
(3) ((The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation
with school district superintendents, shall establish timelines for
school districts to develop individual comprehensive safe school plans.
The superintendent of public instruction shall require school districts
to periodically report progress on their comprehensive safe school
plans.
(4))) School districts shall annually:
(a) Review and update safe school plans in collaboration with local
emergency response agencies;
(b) Conduct an inventory of all hazardous materials;
(c) Update information on the school mapping information system to
reflect current staffing and updated plans, including:
(i) Identifying all staff members who are trained on the national
incident management system, trained on the incident command system, or
are certified on the incident command system; and
(ii) Identifying school transportation procedures for evacuation,
to include bus staging areas, evacuation routes, communication systems,
parent-student reunification sites, and secondary transportation
agreements consistent with the school mapping information system; and
(d) Provide information to all staff on the use of emergency
supplies and notification and alert procedures.
(4) School districts are required to annually record and report on
the information and activities required in subsection (3) of this
section to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.
(5) School districts are encouraged to work with local emergency
management agencies and other emergency responders to conduct one
tabletop exercise, one functional exercise, and two full-scale
exercises within a four-year period.
(6) Schools shall conduct no less than one safety-related drill
each month that school is in session. Schools shall complete no less
than one drill using the school mapping information system, one drill
for lockdowns, one drill for shelter-in-place, and six drills for fire
evacuation in accordance with the state fire code. Schools should
consider drills for earthquakes, tsunamis, or other high risk local
events. Schools shall document the date and time of such drills. This
subsection is intended to satisfy all federal requirements for
comprehensive school emergency drills and evacuations.
(7) Educational service districts are encouraged to apply for
federal emergency response and crisis management grants with the
assistance of the superintendent of public instruction and the
Washington emergency management division of the state military
department.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to
implement provisions of this section. These rules may include, but are
not limited to, provisions for ((periodic drills and testing,))
evacuations, lockdowns, or other components of a comprehensive safe
school plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A task force on gangs in schools is created to examine current
adult and youth gang activities that are affecting school safety. The
task force shall work under the guidance of the superintendent of
public instruction school safety center, the school safety center
advisory committee, and the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs.
(2) The task force shall be comprised of representatives, selected
by the superintendent of public instruction, who possess expertise
relevant to gang activity in schools. The task force shall outline
methods for preventing new gangs, eliminating existing gangs, gathering
intelligence, and sharing information about gang activities.
(3) Beginning December 1, 2007, the task force shall annually
report its findings and recommendations to the education committees of
the legislature.

--- END ---