BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that it
is essential for the economic well-being of the state and for the
maintenance of a high quality of life that the people of the state have
an efficient transportation system. The ability of the state to
provide an efficient transportation system will be enhanced by a
public-private sector program providing for private entities to
undertake the study, planning, design, development, acquisition,
installation, construction or improvement, operation, and maintenance
of existing transportation systems. In order to ensure the most
effective operation of this program, it is appropriate to undertake a
pilot project on a portion of the Interstate 5 corridor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Repair" means any activity that restores or mends to a sound
or good condition by replacing or fixing after decay, injury,
dilapidation, or partial destruction has occurred;
(b) "Maintenance" means to preserve or retain in a condition of
good repair or efficiency;
(c) "Traffic services" means maintenance activities such as, but
not limited to: Pavement striping; pavement marking; raised pavement
markers; repairing and replacing highway signage, guideposts, and
guardrails; traffic signal maintenance; and highway lighting.
(2)(a) The secretary of transportation or the secretary's designee
shall solicit proposals and enter into an agreement with a private
entity under which the private entity shall conduct all the necessary
study, planning, design, construction, operation, and maintenance of
the Interstate 5 corridor from the southern border of Skagit county to
the northern border of Whatcom county.
(b) The agreement must retain state ownership of all existing state
facilities.
(c) The agreement may provide for private ownership of any new
facility during the construction period. After completion and final
acceptance of the facility or a discrete segment of the facility, the
agreement must provide for state ownership.
(d) The department shall negotiate the terms and compensation due
to the private entity under the agreement. The total amount of
compensation to be agreed upon must be comprised of a mix of funds from
the Interstate 5 corridor pilot project trust account created in
section 4 of this act and tax credits and incentives described in
subsection (3) of this section. The department shall make every effort
to maximize compensation from tax incentives and credits, and minimize
direct payments from the Interstate 5 corridor pilot project trust
account. Payments to private entities must be completed within twenty-five years of the date the project is certified as complete and control
is returned to the state.
(3) In negotiating an agreement under this section, the department
shall propose compensating private sector participants with a
combination of funds from the Interstate 5 corridor pilot project trust
account and from tax incentives. Tax incentives eligible for
compensation include:
(a) Proceeds from tax increment financing, based upon new
development associated with the project;
(b) Property tax deferrals for new development associated with the
project;
(c) Property tax exemptions for new development associated with the
project;
(d) Sales tax deferrals for new development associated with the
project; and
(e) Sales tax exemptions for new development associated with the
project.
(4) The secretary of transportation or the secretary's designee
shall consult with legal, financial, and other experts within and
outside of state government in the negotiation and development of the
agreement.
(5) The tax imposed and collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW, less any credits allowed under chapter 82.14 RCW, on the initial
construction for a transportation project under this section must be
transferred to the Interstate 5 corridor pilot project trust account to
defray costs on that transportation project.
(6) For the purpose of facilitating this project and to assist the
private entity in the development, construction, maintenance, and
operation of the portion of the Interstate 5 corridor designated in
subsection (2)(a) of this section, the agreement must, as required by
the private entity, include provisions for the department of
transportation to exercise its authority, including the following:
Leasing of facilities, rights-of-way, and airspace; exercising the
power of eminent domain; granting development rights and opportunities;
granting necessary easements and rights of access; issuing permits and
other authorizations; granting contractual and real property rights;
and negotiating acquisition of rights-of-way in excess of appraised
value and any other provision deemed necessary.
(7) Operation and maintenance services to be provided by the
private entity include, but are not limited to, roadway maintenance and
repair, drainage maintenance and slope repair, roadside and landscape
maintenance, bridge and urban tunnel maintenance, snow and ice control,
traffic services, and rest area maintenance.
(8) For the purpose of environmental mitigation of transportation
projects constructed under this section, any county may require the
department of transportation to participate in the county's purchase of
development rights program. If the county requires the department's
participation, the department must transfer to the county's purchase of
development rights program environmental mitigation moneys for
transportation projects constructed under this section. Rights in
perpetuity to future development of any open space land, farm and
agricultural land, and timber land, which are designated as such by the
county, may be used as environmental mitigation moneys for
transportation projects in lieu of wetlands or other mitigation
required for such a transportation project.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.68.090 and 2005 c 314 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle
fund from the motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be
first expended for purposes enumerated in (a) and (b) of this
subsection. The remaining net tax amount shall be distributed monthly
by the state treasurer in accordance with subsections (2) through (7)
of this section.
(a) For payment of refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special
fuel tax that has been paid and is refundable as provided by law;
(b) For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to
appropriations for the administrative expenses of the offices of state
treasurer, state auditor, and the department of licensing of the state
of Washington in the administration of the motor vehicle fuel tax and
the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed monthly.
(2) All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(1) and 82.38.030(1) shall be distributed as set forth in (a)
through (((j))) (k) of this section.
(a) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
44.387 percent to be expended for highway purposes of the state as
defined in RCW 46.68.130;
(b) For distribution to the special category C account, hereby
created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent to
be expended for special category C projects. Special category C
projects are category C projects that, due to high cost only, will
require bond financing to complete construction.
The following criteria, listed in order of priority, shall be used
in determining which special category C projects have the highest
priority:
(i) Accident experience;
(ii) Fatal accident experience;
(iii) Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable
speeds without undue congestion; and
(iv) Continuity of development of the highway transportation
network.
Moneys deposited in the special category C account in the motor
vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the
proceeds of which are used to finance special category C projects under
this subsection (2)(b);
(c) For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;
(d) For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction
account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent;
(e) For distribution to the urban arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;
(f) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and expended
in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;
(g) For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW
46.68.110;
(h) For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an
amount equal to 19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there shall be
distributed from time to time, as directed by the department of
transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out the
provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to
the county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW
47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed
monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW
46.68.120;
(i) For distribution to the county arterial preservation account,
hereby created in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565
percent. These funds shall be distributed by the county road
administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the
number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each
county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the structural,
safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road
administration board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies
to implement this program and to assure that a pavement management
system is used;
(j) For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended in
accordance with RCW 36.79.020;
(k) For distribution to the Interstate 5 corridor pilot project
trust account in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to forty-two
percent of the net tax amount collected in Skagit county and forty-four
percent of the net tax amount collected in Whatcom county.
(3) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(2)
and 82.38.030(2) shall be distributed to the transportation 2003
account (nickel account).
(4) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(3)
and 82.38.030(3) shall be distributed as follows:
(a) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to the incorporated cities
and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;
(b) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to counties of the state in
accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and
(c) The remainder shall be distributed to the transportation
partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.
(5) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(4)
and 82.38.030(4) shall be distributed as follows:
(a) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to the incorporated cities
and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;
(b) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to counties of the state in
accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and
(c) The remainder shall be distributed to the transportation
partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.
(6) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025 (5)
and (6) and 82.38.030 (5) and (6) shall be distributed to the
transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.
(7) Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so
as to violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway
construction bond issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and
whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid from any excise
taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The Interstate 5 corridor pilot project trust account is created in
the motor vehicle fund. All receipts from the distributions
established under RCW 46.68.090(2)(k) must be deposited in the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for payments made under
an agreement entered into under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.06.142 and 2002 c 354 s 208 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any department, agency, or institution of higher education may
purchase services, including services that have been customarily and
historically provided by employees in the classified service under this
chapter, by contracting with individuals, nonprofit organizations,
businesses, employee business units, or other entities if the following
criteria are met:
(a) The invitation for bid or request for proposal contains
measurable standards for the performance of the contract;
(b) Employees in the classified service whose positions or work
would be displaced by the contract are provided an opportunity to offer
alternatives to purchasing services by contract and, if these
alternatives are not accepted, compete for the contract under
competitive contracting procedures in subsection (4) of this section;
(c) The contract with an entity other than an employee business
unit includes a provision requiring the entity to consider employment
of state employees who may be displaced by the contract;
(d) The department, agency, or institution of higher education has
established a contract monitoring process to measure contract
performance, costs, service delivery quality, and other contract
standards, and to cancel contracts that do not meet those standards;
and
(e) The department, agency, or institution of higher education has
determined that the contract results in savings or efficiency
improvements. The contracting agency must consider the consequences
and potential mitigation of improper or failed performance by the
contractor.
(2) Any provision contrary to or in conflict with this section in
any collective bargaining agreement in effect on July 1, 2005, is not
effective beyond the expiration date of the agreement.
(3) Contracting for services that is expressly mandated by the
legislature or was authorized by law prior to July 1, 2005, including
contracts and agreements between public entities, shall not be subject
to the processes set forth in subsections (1) and (4) through (6) of
this section.
(4) Competitive contracting shall be implemented as follows:
(a) At least ninety days prior to the date the contracting agency
requests bids from private entities for a contract for services
provided by classified employees, the contracting agency shall notify
the classified employees whose positions or work would be displaced by
the contract. The employees shall have sixty days from the date of
notification to offer alternatives to purchasing services by contract,
and the agency shall consider the alternatives before requesting bids.
(b) If the employees decide to compete for the contract, they shall
notify the contracting agency of their decision. Employees must form
one or more employee business units for the purpose of submitting a bid
or bids to perform the services.
(c) The director of personnel, with the advice and assistance of
the department of general administration, shall develop and make
available to employee business units training in the bidding process
and general bid preparation.
(d) The director of general administration, with the advice and
assistance of the department of personnel, shall, by rule, establish
procedures to ensure that bids are submitted and evaluated in a fair
and objective manner and that there exists a competitive market for the
service. Such rules shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
Prohibitions against participation in the bid evaluation process by
employees who prepared the business unit's bid or who perform any of
the services to be contracted; (ii) provisions to ensure no bidder
receives an advantage over other bidders and that bid requirements are
applied equitably to all parties; and (iii) procedures that require the
contracting agency to receive complaints regarding the bidding process
and to consider them before awarding the contract. Appeal of an
agency's actions under this subsection is an adjudicative proceeding
and subject to the applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act, with the final decision to be rendered by
an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW.
(e) An employee business unit's bid must include the fully
allocated costs of the service, including the cost of the employees'
salaries and benefits, space, equipment, materials, and other costs
necessary to perform the function. An employee business unit's cost
shall not include the state's indirect overhead costs unless those
costs can be attributed directly to the function in question and would
not exist if that function were not performed in state service.
(f) A department, agency, or institution of higher education may
contract with the department of general administration to conduct the
bidding process.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Employee business unit" means a group of employees who perform
services to be contracted under this section and who submit a bid for
the performance of those services under subsection (4) of this section.
(b) "Indirect overhead costs" means the pro rata share of existing
agency administrative salaries and benefits, and rent, equipment costs,
utilities, and materials associated with those administrative
functions.
(c) "Competitive contracting" means the process by which classified
employees of a department, agency, or institution of higher education
compete with businesses, individuals, nonprofit organizations, or other
entities for contracts authorized by subsection (1) of this section.
(6) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct
a performance audit of the implementation of this section, including
the adequacy of the appeals process in subsection (4)(d) of this
section, and report to the legislature by January 1, 2007, on the
results of the audit.
(7) An agreement with a private entity entered into under section
2 of this act is exempt from the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---