BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Legislature finds and declares all of
the following:
(1) Washington's economy would be enhanced by investment in new
communications and video programming infrastructure, including fiber
optic and internet protocol technologies.
(2) Cable services and video services bring important daily
benefits to Washington by providing news, education, and entertainment.
(3) Competitive cable service providers and video service providers
are capable of providing new video programming services and competition
to consumers in Washington and have stated their desire to do so.
(4) There has been only minimal competitive entry into the
facilities-based video programming market since Washington's
franchising requirements were first enacted.
(5) The cable franchise requirements and associated build-out
requirements have acted as a barrier to entry to many new
facilities-based entrants, because time-to-market and reasonable cost
of entry are critical for new entrants seeking to compete with the
cable incumbents.
(6) Under both federal and state law, there is considerable
uncertainty concerning whether and to what degree the cable franchise
requirements apply to various competitive cable service providers and
competitive video service providers, especially to the extent those new
entrants are already subject to public right-of-way management under
other state regulatory schemes.
(7) To remove legal uncertainty under state law with respect to the
authority of competitive cable service providers and video service
providers to use the public rights-of-way to the extent the cable
franchise requirements do not apply, and to promote competitive entry
by all competitive cable service providers and video service providers,
the state of Washington can and should provide a state-issued
authorization for competitive cable service providers and video service
providers to deploy their systems and provide cable service and video
service to residents of the state. This state-issued grant will allow
all competitive cable service providers and video service providers to
move forward in making the significant investments required to provide
new services and competition for video programming.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cable operator" means any person or group of persons who
provides cable service over a cable system and directly or through one
or more affiliates owns a significant interest in the cable system, or
who otherwise controls or is responsible for, through any arrangement,
the management and operation of such a cable system.
(2) "Cable service" means the one-way transmission to subscribers
of video or other programming service, and subscriber interaction, if
any, which is required for the selection or use of such video
programming or other programming service.
(3) "Cable system" means a facility, consisting of a set of closed
transmission paths and associated signal generation, reception, and
control equipment that is designed to provide cable service that
includes video programming and that is provided to multiple subscribers
within a community. "Cable system" does not include:
(a) A facility that serves only to retransmit the television
signals of one or more television broadcast stations;
(b) A facility that serves subscribers without using any public
right-of-way;
(c) A facility of a common carrier, except that such a facility is
considered a cable system to the extent the facility is used in the
transmission of video programming directly to subscribers, unless the
extent of use is solely to provide interactive on-demand services;
(d) An open video system; or
(e) Any facilities of any electric utility used solely for
operating its electric utility system.
(4) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(5) "Competitive cable service provider" means:
(a) A person authorized by this chapter to provide cable service
over a cable system other than the incumbent cable operator providing
service in the area to be served by the competitive cable service
provider; or
(b) A cable operator authorized by this chapter to provide cable
services over a cable system in areas where it currently does not have
an existing franchise agreement as of the effective date of this
section.
(6) "Competitive cable service provider fee" means the amount paid
by a competitive cable service provider under section 4 of this act.
(7) "Competitive video service provider" means a person authorized
by this chapter to provide video service. "Competitive video service
provider" does not include a cable operator, and a competitive video
service provider is not considered a cable operator, and the facilities
of a competitive video service provider is not considered a cable
system.
(8) "Competitive video service provider fee" means the amount paid
by a competitive video service provider under section 4 of this act.
(9) "Franchise" means an initial authorization, or renewal of an
authorization, issued by a franchising entity, regardless of whether
the authorization is designed as a franchise, permit, license,
resolution, contract, certificate, agreement, or otherwise, that
authorizes the construction and operation of a cable system or video
service provider's network in the public rights-of-way.
(10) "Franchising entity" means the city or county entitled to
require franchises and impose fees under local ordinances.
(11) "Public rights-of-way" means the area on, below, or above a
public roadway, highway, street, public sidewalk, alley, or waterway,
or utility easements dedicated for compatible uses.
(12) "Video programming" means programming provided by, or
generally considered comparable to programming provided by, a
television broadcast station.
(l3) "Video service" means video programming services provided
through wireline facilities located at least in part in the public
rights-of-way without regard to delivery technology, including internet
protocol technology. "Video service" does not include any video
programming provided by a commercial mobile service provider or cable
service provided by a competitive cable service provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Any entity certificated to provide local
exchange service in the state that seeks to operate or operates as a
competitive cable service provider or competitive video service
provider in its local exchange service area automatically possesses
authorization upon the effective date of this section.
(2) Any other competitive cable service provider or competitive
video service provider possesses authorization upon securing permission
from the commission.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules to govern the cable service or
video service authorization application process for competitive cable
service providers and competitive video service providers included in
this subsection. To the extent required by applicable law, any cable
or video service authorization granted by this chapter or the
commission constitutes a franchise for purposes of 47 U.S.C. Sec.
541(b)(1). To the extent required for purposes of 47 U.S.C. Secs.
521-561, only the state of Washington holds the exclusive franchising
authority for competitive cable service providers and competitive video
service providers in this state.
(4) No franchising entity or other political entity of the state
may:
(a) Require a competitive cable service provider or competitive
video service provider to obtain a separate franchise; or
(b) Otherwise impose any fee or franchise requirement on any
competitive cable service provider or competitive video service
provider, except as provided in this chapter. For purposes of this
subsection, a franchise requirement includes, without limitation, any
provision regulating rates charged by competitive cable service
providers or competitive video service providers or requiring
competitive cable service providers or competitive video service
providers to satisfy any build-out requirements or deploy any
facilities or equipment.
(5) A cable operator with an existing franchise to provide cable
service in any municipality in the state as of the effective date of
this section is not eligible to seek a state authorization to provide
cable service or video service under this chapter as to such a
municipality until the expiration date of the existing franchise
agreement.
(6)(a) No later than one hundred eighty days after a request by a
municipality or county in which the competitive cable service provider
or the competitive video service provider is providing cable service or
video service, the holder of a state authorization to provide cable
service or video service shall designate a sufficient amount of
capacity on its communications network to allow the provision of a
comparable number of channels or capacity of public, educational, and
governmental noncommercial programming provided by the incumbent cable
operator.
(b) The content to be provided over the public, educational, and
governmental noncommercial programming access under this section is the
responsibility of the municipality or county receiving the benefit of
the capacity. The holder of a state authorization to provide cable
service or video service bears only the responsibility for the
transmission of the content, subject to technological restraints.
(7) The municipality or county shall ensure that all transmissions,
content, or programming to be transmitted by a holder of a state
authorization to provide cable service or video service are provided or
submitted to the competitive cable service provider or competitive
video service provider in a manner or form that is capable of being
accepted and transmitted by a provider, without requirement for
additional alteration or change in the content by the provider, over
the particular network of the competitive cable service provider or
competitive video service provider, that is compatible with the
technology or protocol utilized by the competitive cable service
provider or competitive video service provider to deliver services.
(8) When technically feasible, the holder of a state authorization
to provide cable service or video service and an incumbent cable
service provider shall use reasonable efforts to interconnect their
cable or video systems for the purpose of providing public,
educational, and governmental noncommercial programming.
Interconnection may be accomplished by direct cable, microwave link,
satellite, or other reasonable method of connection. Holders of a
state authorization to provide cable service or video service and
incumbent cable service providers shall negotiate in good faith and
incumbent cable service providers may not withhold interconnection of
public, educational, and governmental noncommercial programming
channels.
(9) Except as provided in subsections (1) through (3) of this
section, competitive cable service providers and competitive video
service providers enjoy the same rights under the laws of the state of
Washington as incumbent cable operators and other providers of video
programming.
(10) The commission is solely responsible for enforcing this
chapter and may do so by filing a complaint in superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A competitive cable service provider or
competitive video service provider shall provide notice to each
franchising entity with jurisdiction in any locality in which a
competitive cable service provider or competitive video service
provider begins to offer cable service or video service.
(2) In any locality in which a competitive cable service provider
offers cable service or a competitive video service provider offers
video service, the competitive cable service provider or competitive
video service provider shall calculate and pay the competitive cable
service provider or competitive video service provider fee to the
franchising entity with jurisdiction in that locality upon the
franchising entity's written request. If the franchising entity makes
such a request, the competitive cable service provider or competitive
video service provider fee is due on a quarterly basis, forty-five days
after the close of the quarter, and is calculated as a percentage of
gross revenues. The franchising entity may not demand any additional
fees or charges from the competitive cable service provider or
competitive video service provider, and may not demand the use of any
other calculation method.
(3) The percentage to be applied against gross revenues pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section is set by the franchising entity and
identified in its written request equal to the percentage paid by the
incumbent cable operator or five percent, whichever is less.
(4)(a) For purposes of this section, "gross revenues" means all
consideration of any kind or nature including, without limitation,
cash, credits, property, and in-kind contributions received by the
provider from subscribers for the provision of cable service over a
cable system by a competitive cable provider or video service by a
competitive video service provider within the franchising entity's
jurisdiction. Competitive cable service providers and competitive
video service providers are subject to and required to pay either the
competitive cable service provider fee or the competitive video service
provider fee, but never both the competitive cable service provider and
competitive video service provider fees.
(b) For purposes of this section, "gross revenues" does not
include:
(i) Revenues not actually received, even if billed, such as bad
debt;
(ii) Revenues received by any affiliate or any other person in
exchange for supplying goods or services used by the provider to
provide cable service or video service;
(iii) Refunds, rebates, or discounts made to subscribers, leased
access providers, advertisers, or any municipality or other unit of
local government;
(iv) Any revenues from services not classified as cable service or
video service including, without limitation, revenue received from
telecommunications services, revenue received from information
services, revenue received in connection with advertising, revenue
received in connection with home shopping services, or any other
revenues attributed by the competitive cable service provider or
competitive video service provider to noncable service or nonvideo
service in accordance with any applicable laws, rules, regulations,
standards, or orders;
(v) Any revenue paid by subscribers to home shopping programmers
directly from the sale of merchandise through any home shopping channel
offered as part of the cable services or video services;
(vi) The sale of cable services or video services for resale in
which the purchaser is required to collect the five percent fee from
the purchaser's customer;
(vii) Any tax of general applicability imposed upon the competitive
cable service provider or competitive video service provider or upon
subscribers by a city, state, federal, or any other governmental entity
and required to be collected by the competitive cable service provider
or competitive video service provider and remitted to the taxing entity
including, but not limited to, sales and use tax, gross receipts tax,
excise tax, utility users tax, public service tax, and
telecommunications taxes, and including the five percent fee specified
in this section;
(viii) The provision of cable services or video services to public
institutions, public schools, or governmental entities at no charge;
(ix) Any foregone revenue from the competitive cable service
provider's or competitive video service provider's provision of free or
reduced-cost video service to any person including, without limitation,
any municipality and other public institutions or other institutions;
(x) Sales of capital assets or sales of surplus equipment;
(xi) Reimbursement by programmers of marketing costs incurred by
the competitive cable service provider or competitive video service
provider for the introduction or promotion of new programming;
(xii) Directory or internet advertising revenue including, but not
limited to, yellow pages, white pages, banner advertisement, and
electronic publishing; or
(xiii) Copyright fees paid to the United States copyright office.
(5) At the request of a franchising entity, no more than once per
year, the commission may perform reasonable audits of the competitive
cable service provider's or competitive video service provider's
calculation of the competitive cable service provider or competitive
video service provider fee.
(6) Any competitive cable service provider or competitive video
service provider may identify and collect the amount of the competitive
cable service provider fee or competitive video service provider fee as
a separate line item on the regular bill of each subscriber.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A franchising entity shall allow the
holder of a state authorization to provide cable service or video
service to install, construct, and maintain a communications network
within a public right-of-way and shall provide the holder of a state
authorization to provide cable service or video service with open,
comparable, nondiscriminatory, and competitively neutral access to the
public right-of-way.
(2) A franchising entity may not discriminate against the holder of
a state authorization to provide cable service or video service by
denying any of the following:
(a) The authorization or placement of a communications network in
public rights-of-way;
(b) Access to a building; or
(c) A municipal utility pole attachment term.
(3) A franchising entity may impose on a competitive cable service
provider or competitive video service provider a permitting fee only to
the extent it imposes such a fee on incumbent cable operators, and any
fee may not exceed the actual, direct costs incurred by the franchising
entity for issuing the relevant permit. In no event may a fee under
this subsection be levied under the following circumstances: (a) If
the competitive cable service provider or competitive video service
provider already has paid a permit fee of any kind in connection with
the same activity that would otherwise be covered by the permit fee
under this subsection or is otherwise authorized by law or contract to
place the facilities used by the competitive cable service provider or
competitive video service provider in the public rights-of-way; or (b)
for general revenue purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A competitive cable service provider or
competitive video service provider that has been granted a state
authorization to provide cable service or video service may not deny
access to service to any group of potential residential subscribers
because of the income of the residents in the local area in which the
group resides.
(2) The holder of a state authorization to provide cable service or
video service may use direct-to-home satellite service or another
alternative technology that provides comparable content, service, and
functionality to satisfy the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) This chapter is intended to be
consistent with the federal cable act, 47 U.S.C. Sec. 521 et seq.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in sections 2 through 6 of this
act, this chapter does not prevent a competitive cable service
provider, competitive video service provider, cable operator, or
franchising entity from seeking clarification of its rights and
obligations under federal law or to exercise any right or authority
under federal or state law.

Sec. 8 RCW 35.21.860 and 2000 c 83 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No city or town may impose a franchise fee or any other fee or
charge of whatever nature or description upon the light and power, or
gas distribution businesses, as defined in RCW 82.16.010, or telephone
business, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, or service provider for use of
the right of way, except:
(a) A tax authorized by RCW 35.21.865 may be imposed;
(b) A fee may be charged to such businesses or service providers
that recovers actual administrative expenses incurred by a city or town
that are directly related to receiving and approving a permit, license,
and franchise, to inspecting plans and construction, or to the
preparation of a detailed statement pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW;
(c) Taxes permitted by state law on service providers; and
(d) ((Franchise requirements and fees for cable television services
as allowed by federal law; and
(e))) A site-specific charge pursuant to an agreement between the
city or town and a service provider of personal wireless services
acceptable to the parties for:
(i) The placement of new structures in the right of way regardless
of height, unless the new structure is the result of a mandated
relocation in which case no charge will be imposed if the previous
location was not charged;
(ii) The placement of replacement structures when the replacement
is necessary for the installation or attachment of wireless facilities,
and the overall height of the replacement structure and the wireless
facility is more than sixty feet; or
(iii) The placement of personal wireless facilities on structures
owned by the city or town located in the right of way. However, a
site-specific charge shall not apply to the placement of personal
wireless facilities on existing structures, unless the structure is
owned by the city or town.
A city or town is not required to approve the use permit for the
placement of a facility for personal wireless services that meets one
of the criteria in this subsection absent such an agreement. If the
parties are unable to agree on the amount of the charge, the service
provider may submit the amount of the charge to binding arbitration by
serving notice on the city or town. Within thirty days of receipt of
the initial notice, each party shall furnish a list of acceptable
arbitrators. The parties shall select an arbitrator; failing to agree
on an arbitrator, each party shall select one arbitrator and the two
arbitrators shall select a third arbitrator for an arbitration panel.
The arbitrator or arbitrators shall determine the charge based on
comparable siting agreements involving public land and rights of way.
The arbitrator or arbitrators shall not decide any other disputed
issues, including but not limited to size, location, and zoning
requirements. Costs of the arbitration, including compensation for the
arbitrator's services, must be borne equally by the parties
participating in the arbitration and each party shall bear its own
costs and expenses, including legal fees and witness expenses, in
connection with the arbitration proceeding.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit franchise fees
imposed on an electrical energy, natural gas, or telephone business, by
contract existing on April 20, 1982, with a city or town, for the
duration of the contract, but the franchise fees shall be considered
taxes for the purposes of the limitations established in RCW 35.21.865
and 35.21.870 to the extent the fees exceed the costs allowable under
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 35.99.020 and 2000 c 83 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A city or town may grant, issue, or deny permits for the use of the
right of way by a service provider for installing, maintaining,
repairing, or removing facilities for telecommunications services ((or
cable television services)) pursuant to ordinances, consistent with
chapter 83, Laws of 2000.

Sec. 10 RCW 35.102.020 and 2003 c 79 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Chapter 79, Laws of 2003 does not apply to taxes on any service
that historically or traditionally has been taxed as a utility business
for municipal tax purposes, such as:
(1) A light and power business or a natural gas distribution
business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010;
(2) A telephone business, as defined in RCW 82.04.065;
(3) ((Cable television services;
(4))) Sewer or water services;
(((5))) (4) Drainage services;
(((6))) (5) Solid waste services; or
(((7))) (6) Steam services.

Sec. 11 RCW 80.36.370 and 1990 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall not regulate the following:
(1) ((One way broadcast or cable television transmission of
television or radio signals;
(2))) Private telecommunications systems;
(((3))) (2) Telegraph services;
(((4))) (3) Any sale, lease, or use of customer premises equipment
except such equipment as is regulated on July 28, 1985;
(((5))) (4) Private shared telecommunications services, unless the
commission finds, upon notice and investigation, that customers of such
services have no alternative access to local exchange
telecommunications companies. If the commission makes such a finding,
it may require the private shared telecommunications services provider
to make alternative facilities or conduit space available on reasonable
terms and conditions at reasonable prices;
(((6))) (5) Radio communications services provided by a regulated
telecommunications company, except that when those services are the
only voice grade, local exchange telecommunications service available
to a customer of the company the commission may regulate the radio
communication service of that company.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

--- END ---