BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
RIGHT TO FARM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 This chapter may be known and cited as the
Washington right to farm act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The legislature finds that the state's
agricultural industry is diversified, productive, and a major
contributor to the Washington economy. Urban and rural communities
statewide benefit from the direct and indirect jobs, income, and
revenues generated by agricultural production. Agricultural land is
essential to providing citizens with food and fiber and to ensuring
aesthetic values through the preservation of open spaces. However, the
legislature also finds that excessive government regulation can cause
agricultural land to be converted to nonagricultural uses, and that
inconsistencies between federal and state regulations can cause
confusion for those persons affected. In addition, agricultural
activities conducted on farmland are often subjected to nuisance
lawsuits that encourage and even force the premature removal of the
lands from agricultural uses. The legislature further finds that for
the agricultural industry to survive, farms must be able to adopt new
technologies and to diversify into new products. The legislature
intends with this chapter that agricultural activities conducted on
farmland that are consistent with good agricultural practices will be
protected from excessive, inconsistent regulation by government and
from nuisance lawsuits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agricultural activity" means the growing, raising, or
production of horticultural or viticultural crops, berries, poultry,
livestock, shellfish, grain, mint, hay, and dairy products, and
conditions or activities that occur on a farm in connection with the
commercial production of farm products, including but not limited to:
Marketed produce at roadside stands or farm markets; noise; odors;
dust; fumes; operation of machinery and irrigation pumps; movement
including, but not limited to, use of current county road ditches,
streams, rivers, canals, and drains, and use of water for agricultural
activities; ground and aerial application of seed, fertilizers,
conditioners, and plant protection products; employment and use of
labor; roadway movement of equipment and livestock; protection from
damage by wildlife; prevention of trespass; construction and
maintenance of buildings, fences, roads, bridges, ponds, drains,
waterways, and similar features and maintenance of streambanks and
watercourses; and conversion from one agricultural activity to another.
(2) "Agricultural storm water" or "storm water runoff" means any
precipitation-related discharge of manure, litter, or process
wastewater from land areas where the manure, litter, or process
wastewater has been applied in accordance with site-specific nutrient
management practices that ensure appropriate agricultural utilization
of nutrients.
(3) "Farm" means the land, buildings, freshwater ponds, freshwater
culturing and growing facilities, and machinery used in the commercial
production of farm products.
(4) "Farm product" means those plants and animals useful to humans
and includes, but is not limited to, forages and sod crops, dairy and
dairy products, poultry and poultry products, livestock including
breeding, grazing, and recreational equine use, fruits, vegetables,
flowers, seeds, grasses, trees, freshwater fish and fish products,
apiaries, equine and other similar products, or any other product that
incorporates the use of food, feed, fiber, or fur.
(5) "Farmland" means land or freshwater ponds devoted primarily to
the production, for commercial purposes, of livestock, freshwater
aquacultural, or other agricultural commodities.
(6) "Forest practice" has the same meaning as in RCW 76.09.020.
(7) "Fugitive dust" means a particulate emission made airborne by
human activity, forces of wind, or both, that do not pass through a
stack, chimney, vent, or other functionally equivalent opening.
(8) "Good agricultural practices" means economically feasible
practices which are customary among or appropriate to farms and ranches
of a similar nature in the local area.

Sec. 104 RCW 7.48.305 and 1992 c 151 s 1 and 1992 c 52 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
((Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,)) (1)
Agricultural activities conducted on farmland and forest practices, if
consistent with good agricultural and forest practices ((and
established prior to surrounding nonagricultural and nonforestry
activities)), are presumed to be reasonable and shall not be found to
constitute a nuisance unless the activity has a substantial adverse
effect on the public health and safety.
(2) If those agricultural activities and forest practices are
undertaken in conformity with all applicable laws and rules, the
activities are presumed to be good agricultural and forest practices
not adversely affecting the public health and safety for purposes of
this ((section and RCW 7.48.300)) chapter. An agricultural activity
that is in conformity with such laws and rules shall not be restricted
as to the hours of the day or day or days of the week during which it
may be conducted.
(3) Nothing in this section shall affect or impair any right to sue
for damages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 (1) Odors or fugitive dust caused by
agricultural activity consistent with good agricultural practices on
agricultural land are exempt from the requirements of chapter 70.94 RCW
unless they have a substantial adverse effect on public health. In
determining whether agricultural activity is consistent with good
agricultural practices, the department of ecology or board of any
authority shall consult with a recognized third-party expert in the
activity prior to issuing any notice of violation.
(2) Any notice of violation issued under chapter 70.94 RCW
pertaining to odors or fugitive dust caused by agricultural activity
shall include a statement as to why the activity is inconsistent with
good agricultural practices, or a statement that the odors or fugitive
dust have substantial adverse effect on public health.
(3) In any appeal to the pollution control hearings board or any
judicial appeal, the agency issuing a final order pertaining to odors
or fugitive dust caused by agricultural activity shall prove the
activity is inconsistent with good agricultural practices or that the
odors or fugitive dust have a substantial adverse impact on public
health.
(4) The exemption in this section does not apply:
(a) If a person engaged in agricultural activity on a contiguous
piece of agricultural land sells or has sold a portion of that land for
residential purposes;
(b) To facilities subject to RCW 70.94.151 as specified in WAC 173-400-100 as of July 24, 2005, 70.94.152, or 70.94.161.
(5) As used in this section, "agricultural land" means at least
five acres of land devoted primarily to the commercial production of
livestock, agricultural commodities, or cultured aquatic products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 A seller of real property, as defined in
chapter 64.06 RCW, shall make available to the buyer the following
statement: "This notice is to inform you that the real property you
are considering for purchase may lie in close proximity to a farm. The
operation of a farm involves usual and customary agricultural
practices, which are protected under chapter 15.-- RCW (sections 101
through 103, 105 through 110, and 301 of this act), the Washington
right to farm act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 Organic matter or inorganic matter
discharged into any waters of the state as a result of an agricultural
activity is exempt from the prohibition in RCW 90.48.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 No permit system pertaining to sources of
pollution arising from agricultural storm water may be authorized and
no civil or criminal penalties may be imposed with respect to any
agricultural activities conducted in full compliance with the
applicable provisions of chapters 90.64 and 90.48 RCW, any rules
adopted thereunder, and any applicable approvals or directives of the
department of ecology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 The definitions of "wetland" or "wetlands"
in RCW 36.70A.030(21) and 36.70A.175 do not include wetlands converted
to agricultural use before December 23, 1985, in accordance with the
federal food security act of 1985 (99 Stat. 1354), unless they are
converted to a nonagricultural use, at which time they are subject to
a new delineation and the provisions of chapter 36.70A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 The definition of "waters of the state" in
RCW 90.48.020 may not be construed to include wetlands converted to
agricultural use before December 23, 1985, in accordance with the
federal food security act of 1985 (99 Stat. 1354), unless they are
converted to a nonagricultural use, at which time they are subject to
a new delineation and the provisions of chapter 90.48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 7.48.300 (Agricultural activities and forest practices--Legislative finding and purpose) and 1992 c 52 s 2 & 1979 c 122 s 1;
(2) RCW 7.48.310 (Agricultural activities and forest practices--Definitions) and 1992 c 52 s 4, 1991 c 317 s 2, & 1979 c 122 s 3; and
(3) RCW 90.48.450 (Discharges from agricultural activity--Consideration to be given as to whether enforcement action would
contribute to conversion of land to nonagricultural use -- Minimize the
possibility) and 1981 c 297 s 31.

PART II
TECHNICAL AMENDMENTS
Sec. 201 RCW 64.06.022 and 2006 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A seller of real property shall make available to the buyer the
((following)) statement((: "This notice is to inform you that the real
property you are considering for purchase may lie in close proximity to
a farm. The operation of a farm involves usual and customary
agricultural practices, which are protected under RCW 7.48.305, the
Washington right to farm act.")) required in section 106 of this act.

Sec. 202 RCW 70.94.640 and 2005 c 511 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) As provided in section 105 of this act, odors or fugitive
dust caused by agricultural activity ((consistent with good
agricultural practices on agricultural land)) are exempt from the
requirements of this chapter ((unless they have a substantial adverse
effect on public health. In determining whether agricultural activity
is consistent with good agricultural practices, the department of
ecology or board of any authority shall consult with a recognized
third-party expert in the activity prior to issuing any notice of
violation.
(2) Any notice of violation issued under this chapter pertaining to
odors or fugitive dust caused by agricultural activity shall include a
statement as to why the activity is inconsistent with good agricultural
practices, or a statement that the odors or fugitive dust have
substantial adverse effect on public health.
(3) In any appeal to the pollution control hearings board or any
judicial appeal, the agency issuing a final order pertaining to odors
or fugitive dust caused by agricultural activity shall prove the
activity is inconsistent with good agricultural practices or that the
odors or fugitive dust have a substantial adverse impact on public
health.
(4) If a person engaged in agricultural activity on a contiguous
piece of agricultural land sells or has sold a portion of that land for
residential purposes, the exemption of this section shall not apply.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Agricultural activity" means the growing, raising, or
production of horticultural or viticultural crops, berries, poultry,
livestock, shellfish, grain, mint, hay, and dairy products.
(b) "Good agricultural practices" means economically feasible
practices which are customary among or appropriate to farms and ranches
of a similar nature in the local area.
(c) "Agricultural land" means at least five acres of land devoted
primarily to the commercial production of livestock, agricultural
commodities, or cultured aquatic products.
(d) "Fugitive dust" means a particulate emission made airborne by
human activity, forces of wind, or both, and which do not pass through
a stack, chimney, vent, or other functionally equivalent opening.
(6) The exemption for fugitive dust provided in subsection (1) of
this section does not apply to facilities subject to RCW 70.94.151 as
specified in WAC 173-400-100 as of July 24, 2005, 70.94.152, or
70.94.161)).

Sec. 203 RCW 90.48.080 and 1987 c 109 s 126 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in section 107 of this act, it shall be unlawful
for any person to throw, drain, run, or otherwise discharge into any of
the waters of this state, or to cause, permit or suffer to be thrown,
run, drained, allowed to seep or otherwise discharged into such waters
any organic or inorganic matter that shall cause or tend to cause
pollution of such waters according to the determination of the
department, as provided for in this chapter.

Sec. 204 RCW 36.70A.030 and 2005 c 423 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new
comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land
use plan.
(2) "Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the
commercial production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural,
dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay,
straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax
imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish in upland
hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.
(3) "City" means any city or town, including a code city.
(4) "Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan"
means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the
governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this
chapter.
(5) "Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems:
(a) Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers
used for potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation
areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and (e) geologically hazardous
areas.
(6) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(7) "Development regulations" or "regulation" means the controls
placed on development or land use activities by a county or city,
including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas
ordinances, shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit
development ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan
ordinances together with any amendments thereto. A development
regulation does not include a decision to approve a project permit
application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the decision may
be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body of
the county or city.
(8) "Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for
long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically
and practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees
subject to the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through
84.33.140, and that has long-term commercial significance. In
determining whether forest land is primarily devoted to growing trees
for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be
economically and practically managed for such production, the following
factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban,
suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for
timber production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and
services conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.
(9) "Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because of
their susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other
geological events, are not suited to the siting of commercial,
residential, or industrial development consistent with public health or
safety concerns.
(10) "Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing
capacity, productivity, and soil composition of the land for long-term
commercial production, in consideration with the land's proximity to
population areas, and the possibility of more intense uses of the land.
(11) "Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic
substances.
(12) "Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways,
sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic
water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational
facilities, and schools.
(13) "Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law
enforcement, public health, education, recreation, environmental
protection, and other governmental services.
(14) "Recreational land" means land so designated under RCW
36.70A.1701 and that, immediately prior to this designation, was
designated as agricultural land of long-term commercial significance
under RCW 36.70A.170. Recreational land must have playing fields and
supporting facilities existing before July 1, 2004, for sports played
on grass playing fields.
(15) "Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and
development established by a county in the rural element of its
comprehensive plan:
(a) In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation
predominate over the built environment;
(b) That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based
economies, and opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;
(c) That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in
rural areas and communities;
(d) That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and
for fish and wildlife habitat;
(e) That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development;
(f) That generally do not require the extension of urban
governmental services; and
(g) That are consistent with the protection of natural surface
water flows and ground water and surface water recharge and discharge
areas.
(16) "Rural development" refers to development outside the urban
growth area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource
lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can
consist of a variety of uses and residential densities, including
clustered residential development, at levels that are consistent with
the preservation of rural character and the requirements of the rural
element. Rural development does not refer to agriculture or forestry
activities that may be conducted in rural areas.
(17) "Rural governmental services" or "rural services" include
those public services and public facilities historically and typically
delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include
domestic water systems, fire and police protection services,
transportation and public transit services, and other public utilities
associated with rural development and normally not associated with
urban areas. Rural services do not include storm or sanitary sewers,
except as otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).
(18) "Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of
land for the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable
surfaces to such a degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of
land for the production of food, other agricultural products, or fiber,
or the extraction of mineral resources, rural uses, rural development,
and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A
pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW
36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over
wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental
services. "Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban
growth located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area
with urban growth on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.
(19) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a county
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.
(20) "Urban governmental services" or "urban services" include
those public services and public facilities at an intensity
historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including
storm and sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street
cleaning services, fire and police protection services, public transit
services, and other public utilities associated with urban areas and
normally not associated with rural areas.
(21) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are inundated or
saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration
sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support,
a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and
similar areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands
intentionally created from nonwetland sites((,)) including, but not
limited to((,)): Irrigation and drainage ditches((,)); grass-lined
swales((,)); canals((,)); detention facilities((,)); wastewater
treatment facilities((,)); farm ponds((,)); wetlands converted to
agricultural use, as provided in section 109 of this act; and landscape
amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990, that were
unintentionally created as a result of the construction of a road,
street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands
intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to mitigate
conversion of wetlands.

Sec. 205 RCW 36.70A.175 and 1995 c 382 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Wetlands regulated under development regulations adopted pursuant
to this chapter shall be delineated in accordance with the manual
adopted by the department pursuant to RCW 90.58.380, except wetlands
converted to agricultural use, as provided in section 109 of this act.

Sec. 206 RCW 90.48.020 and 2002 c 161 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever the word "person" is used in this chapter, it shall be
construed to include any political subdivision, government agency,
municipality, industry, public or private corporation, copartnership,
association, firm, individual or any other entity whatsoever.
(2) Wherever the words "waters of the state" shall be used in this
chapter, they shall be construed to include lakes, rivers, ponds,
streams, inland waters, underground waters, salt waters and all other
surface waters and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the state of
Washington, but shall not be construed to include wetlands converted to
agricultural use, as provided in section 110 of this act.
(3) Whenever the word "pollution" is used in this chapter, it shall
be construed to mean such contamination, or other alteration of the
physical, chemical or biological properties, of any waters of the
state, including change in temperature, taste, color, turbidity, or
odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid, gaseous, solid,
radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the state as will or
is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters harmful,
detrimental or injurious to the public health, safety or welfare, or to
domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or other
legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds, fish
or other aquatic life.
(4) Wherever the word "department" is used in this chapter it shall
mean the department of ecology.
(5) Whenever the word "director" is used in this chapter it shall
mean the director of ecology.
(6) Whenever the words "aquatic noxious weed" are used in this
chapter, they have the meaning prescribed under RCW 17.26.020.
(7) Whenever the words "general sewer plan" are used in this
chapter they shall be construed to include all sewerage general plans,
sewer general comprehensive plans, plans for a system of sewerage, and
other plans for sewer systems adopted by a local government entity
including but not limited to cities, towns, public utility districts,
and water-sewer districts.
(8) Whenever the words "agricultural storm water" or "storm water
runoff" are used in this chapter they shall have the same meaning as
that contained in section 103(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 A new section is added to chapter 90.48
RCW to read as follows:
No permit system pertaining to sources of pollution arising from
agricultural storm water may be authorized and no civil or criminal
penalties may be imposed with respect to any agricultural activities
conducted as provided in section 108 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to chapter 90.64
RCW to read as follows:
No permit system pertaining to sources of pollution arising from
agricultural storm water may be authorized and no civil or criminal
penalties may be imposed with respect to any agricultural activities
conducted as provided in section 108 of this act.

PART III
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 Sections 101 through 103, 105 through 110,
and 301 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 The following sections are each recodified
in the following order in the new chapter created in section 302 of
this act.
RCW 7.48.305 after section 103 of this act
RCW 7.48.315 before section 105 of this act
RCW 7.48.320 before section 105 of this act
RCW 7.48.905

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---