BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A public or private landowner or the possessor of land is not
civilly liable for a person's injuries caused by: (a) The theft or
attempted theft, by the person or a third party, of copper, aluminum,
steel, or other metal material from the property of the landowner or
possessor; or (b) a dangerous condition created as a result of the
theft or attempted theft of copper, aluminum, steel, or other metal
material from property of the landowner or the possessor when the
landowner or possessor did not know and could not have reasonably known
of the dangerous condition.
(2) This section does not create or impose a duty of care upon a
landowner or possessor of land that would not otherwise exist under
common law.

--- END ---