BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.170.010 and 2004 c 50 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Armed private security guard" means a private security guard
who has a current firearms certificate issued by the commission and is
licensed as an armed private security guard under this chapter.
(2) "Armored vehicle guard" means a person who transports in an
armored vehicle under armed guard, from one place to another place,
valuables, jewelry, currency, documents, or any other item that
requires secure delivery.
(3) "Burglar alarm response runner" means a person employed by a
private security company to respond to burglar alarm system signals.
(4) "Burglar alarm system" means a device or an assembly of
equipment and devices used to detect or signal unauthorized intrusion,
movement, or exit at a protected premises, other than in a vehicle, to
which police or private security guards are expected to respond.
(5) "Chief law enforcement officer" means the elected or appointed
police administrator of a municipal, county, or state police or
sheriff's department that has full law enforcement powers in its
jurisdiction.
(6) "Classroom instruction" means instruction or training that
takes place in a setting where individuals receiving training are
assembled together and learn through lectures, study papers, class
discussion, textbook study, or other means of organized formal
education techniques, such as video, closed circuit, or other forms of
electronic means, and as distinguished from on-the-job education or
training.
(7) "Commission" means the criminal justice training commission
established in chapter 43.101 RCW.
(8) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(9) "Department-certified trainer" includes any person who has been
approved by the department by receiving a passing score on a
department-administered examination, to administer, test, or certify
training requirements have been met.
(10) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(((10))) (11) "Employer" includes any individual, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, company, society, manager,
contractor, subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent
of any of the foregoing that employs or seeks to enter into an
arrangement to employ any person as a private security guard.
(((11))) (12) "Firearms certificate" means the certificate issued
by the commission.
(((12))) (13) "Initial postassignment training" means eight hours
of training that occurs consistent with section 2 of this act in either
an assisted field environment or in a classroom instruction setting, or
both.
(14) "Instruction" means the preassignment or postassignment
training that takes place in either an on-the-job or classroom setting,
or other means of formal education techniques, such as video, closed
circuit, internet, or other forms of electronic means.
(15) "Licensee" means a person granted a license required by this
chapter.
(((13))) (16) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor,
subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent or employee
of any of the foregoing.
(((14))) (17) "Postassignment or on-the-job training" means
training that occurs in either an assisted field environment or in a
classroom instruction setting, or both. Postassignment or on-the-job
training must be in the topic areas established by the director and may
occur in a classroom instruction setting, in the field, or a
combination of the two. A department-certified trainer need not report
postassignment or on-the-job training. However, a department-certified
trainer must attest in writing that the training occurred.
(((15))) (18) "Postassignment refresher training" means four hours
of annual refresher training that occurs each year following the last
required date the postassignment training requirement occurred under
section 2 of this act.
(19) "Preassignment training" means ((the classroom training
completed prior to being assigned to work independently)) a total of
eight hours of preassignment training, comprised of four hours of
classroom instruction, and an additional four hours of either classroom
instruction or on-the-job training.
(((16))) (20) "Principal corporate officer" means the president,
vice-president, treasurer, secretary, comptroller, or any other person
who performs the same functions for the corporation as performed by
these officers.
(((17))) (21) "Private security company" means a person or entity
licensed under this chapter and engaged in the business of providing
the services of private security guards on a contractual basis.
(((18))) (22) "Private security guard" means an individual who is
licensed under this chapter and principally employed as or typically
referred to as one of the following:
(a) Security officer or guard;
(b) Patrol or merchant patrol service officer or guard;
(c) Armed escort or bodyguard;
(d) Armored vehicle guard;
(e) Burglar alarm response runner; or
(f) Crowd control officer or guard.
(((19))) (23) "Qualifying agent" means an officer or manager of a
corporation who meets the requirements set forth in this chapter for
obtaining a license to own or operate a private security company.
(((20))) (24) "Sworn peace officer" means a person who is an
employee of the federal government, the state, a political subdivision,
agency, or department branch of a municipality, or other unit of local
government, and has law enforcement powers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.170 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To promote the safety of persons and the security of property,
the director shall meet with interested parties to develop lists of
suggested preassignment, postassignment, and postassignment refresher
training by rule.
(2) All security guards licensed on or after July 1, 2005, must
complete at least eight hours of preassignment training.
(3)(a) All security guards licensed on or after July 1, 2005, must
complete at least eight hours of initial postassignment training that
shall be administered to each security guard by their company and
attested to by a department-certified trainer. Security guards who
received their temporary security guard registration card on or before
the effective date of this act must receive their initial
postassignment training before June 30, 2008. Security guards who
received their temporary security guard registration card after the
effective date of this act must receive their initial postassignment
training as specified in subsection (2) of this section and (b) and (c)
of this subsection.
(b) Security guards licensed between January 1st and June 30th of
any calendar year may receive eight hours of postassignment training
any time between the day following the issuance of a temporary security
guard registration card with their company and June 30th of the year
following initial issuance of their license by the department.
(c) Security guards initially licensed between July 1st and
December 31st of any calendar year may receive eight hours of
postassignment training at any time between the day following the
issuance of a temporary security guard registration card with their
company and December 31st of the year following initial issuance of
their security guard license by the department.
(4) Following completion of the preassignment and postassignment
training, at least four total hours of annual postassignment refresher
training shall be administered to security guards each subsequent year.
The subsequent year begins, for postassignment refresher training
purposes, the day following the last date the security guard is
required to receive the initial eight hours of postassignment training,
and meets the following requirements:
(a) No more than one hour per year of postassignment refresher
training may focus directly on customer service related skills or
topics.
(b) Consistent with subsection (1) of this section, the remaining
three hours per year of postassignment refresher training must focus on
emergency response concepts, skills, or topics including but not
limited to knowledge of site post orders or life safety.
(5) A company may waive the eight hours of preassignment training
for security guards already licensed who transfer from another company,
if the security guard presents appropriate training records signed by
a department-certified trainer from the previous company, or a signed
affidavit that the individual has already completed the required
preassignment training provided by his or her previous company or if
the individual has been a sworn peace officer within the past five
years and successfully passes the examination typically provided by the
department to applicants at the conclusion of preassignment training.
(6) The director shall require companies to maintain records
regarding the training hours completed by each employee. All such
records are subject to inspection by the department. The training
requirements and test results must be recorded and attested to as
appropriate by a certified trainer. Training records must contain a
description of the topics covered, the name and signature of the
trainer, and the name and signature of the security guard.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 18.170.100 (Training and testing
requirements) and 2004 c 50 s 2, 1995 c 277 s 7, & 1991 c 334 s 10 are
each repealed.

--- END ---