BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A mobile home lot is exempt from tax, as provided in this
section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Manufactured home" and "mobile home" are defined, as provided
in RCW 59.20.030.
(b) "Mobile home lot" means a portion of a mobile home park or
manufactured housing community designated as the location of one mobile
home or manufactured home and its accessory buildings, and leased for
the exclusive use as a primary residence by the occupants of that
mobile home or manufactured home. This definition only includes real
property that is land.
(c) "Value" means the estimated assessed value of the mobile home
lot, determined by multiplying the assessed value of the parcel within
which the mobile or manufactured home is located by the ratio of the
area of the mobile home lot to the area of the parcel.
(3) The benefit of the exemption must inure to the owner of the
mobile or manufactured home.
(4) The owner of the mobile or manufactured home must meet all the
requirements in RCW 84.36.381 (1), (2), and (3).
(5) The amount of the exemption must be calculated based on the
value of the mobile home lot, as provided in this subsection.
(a) If the owner of the mobile or manufactured home qualifies for
the property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.381(5)(a), then the mobile
home lot is exempt from excess property taxes.
(b) If the owner of the mobile or manufactured home qualifies for
the property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.381(5)(b)(i), the mobile
home lot is exempt from regular property taxes on the portion of its
value equal to the lesser of:
(i) Seventy thousand dollars; or
(ii) The greater of:
(A) Fifty thousand dollars, less the value exempted for the owner
of the mobile or manufactured home under RCW 84.36.381(5)(b)(i); or
(B) Thirty-five percent of the value of the mobile home lot, less
the value exempted for the owner of the mobile or manufactured home
under RCW 84.36.381(5)(b)(i).
(c) If the owner of the mobile or manufactured home qualifies for
the property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.381(5)(b)(ii), the mobile
home lot is exempt from regular property taxes on the portion of its
value equal to the greater of:
(i) Sixty thousand dollars, less the value exempted for the owner
of the mobile or manufactured home under RCW 84.36.381(5)(b)(i); or
(ii) Sixty percent of the value of the mobile home lot, less the
value exempted for the owner of the mobile or manufactured home under
RCW 84.36.381(5)(b)(i).
(d) If the owner of the mobile or manufactured home qualifies for
the exemption under RCW 84.36.381(6), the value of the mobile home lot
shall be based on the assessed value of the parcel within which the
mobile or manufactured home is located in the year the owner of the
mobile or manufactured home applies for the exemption under this
section.
(6) In order for the mobile home lot to be eligible for the
exemption under this section, the owner of the mobile or manufactured
home must apply to the assessor of the county in which the mobile home
lot is located. This application shall be made upon forms prescribed
by the department of revenue and supplied by the county assessor. The
owner of the mobile home park or manufactured housing community shall
provide a copy of the lease indicating that the benefit of the
exemption under this section will inure to the owner of the mobile or
manufactured home.

--- END ---