BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) By January 1, 2010, the state department
of health shall draft a strategic plan to decrease obesity rates in
children and adults by ten percent. The department shall consult with
physicians, health professionals, school educators, worksite wellness
and employee benefits counselors, athletic trainers in schools, and
professional athletes and trainers.
(2) In developing its strategic plan, the department shall address
the following:
(a) Identify barriers to effective control of obesity including the
impact of diet, exercise, and lifestyle;
(b) Review the current health effects of obesity and morbid obesity
including rampant diabetes and make recommendations on best practices
and appropriate clinical guidelines to manage diabetes mellitus;
(c) Review current screening, treatment, and related activities in
this state related to diabetes and identify gaps in service;
(d) Identify actions to be taken to reduce the morbidity and
mortality from obesity and morbid obesity, including diabetes, by
September 1, 2009; and
(e) Establish a timeline for taking those actions.
(3) The department shall, by January 1, 2010, report its findings
to the legislature and the governor's office. The report shall also
include recommended policy and procedural changes, as well as required
funding necessary to achieve the goals of the strategic plan.

--- END ---