BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.19.020 and 2001 c 251 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means an agency or facility operated, licensed, or
certified by the state of Washington.
(2) "Agency affiliated counselor" means a person credentialed under
this chapter who is engaged in therapeutic counseling and employed by
an agency.
(3) "Client" means an individual who receives or participates in
counseling or group counseling.
(((2) "Counseling" means employing any therapeutic techniques,
including but not limited to social work, mental health counseling,
marriage and family therapy, and hypnotherapy, for a fee that offer,
assist or attempt to assist an individual or individuals in the
amelioration or adjustment of mental, emotional, or behavioral
problems, and includes therapeutic techniques to achieve sensitivity
and awareness of self and others and the development of human
potential. For the purposes of this chapter, nothing may be construed
to imply that the practice of hypnotherapy is necessarily limited to
counseling.
(3) "Counselor" means an individual, practitioner, therapist, or
analyst who engages in the practice of counseling to the public for a
fee, including for the purposes of this chapter, hypnotherapists.))
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(5) "Hypnotherapist" means a person registered under this chapter
who is practicing hypnosis as a modality.
(6) "Mental health adviser" means a person credentialed under this
chapter who is engaged in therapeutic counseling under the direct
supervision, as defined in RCW 18.19.090(3)(b), of a licensed mental
health practitioner.
(7) "Mental health practitioner" means a licensed mental health
counselor, marriage and family therapist, independent clinical social
worker and advanced social worker psychologist, psychiatrist, or
psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner.
(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or the
secretary's designee.
(9) "Therapeutic counseling" means assisting a client or clients in
the amelioration or adjustment of mental, emotional, and behavioral
problems by employing a recognized theory of mental health treatment
based on an understanding of human development, emotional disorders,
and well-being, and the use of recognized counseling techniques,
including the use of self. Therapeutic counseling does not include:
(a) Counseling done by vocational counselors related to employment,
career development, or vocational rehabilitation; school counselors
employed or contracted with a school or college who work to promote the
academic career and personal and social development of students; peer
counselors, peer counselor trainers, and student peer counselors who
use their own experience to help people in similar situations; domestic
violence treatment providers; crime victim advocates; or camp
counselors; or
(b) Supportive services such as case management activities, human
services, residential support, or administration of tests unless these
services are provided in conjunction with therapeutic counseling.
"Therapeutic counseling" does not imply proficiency in the practice or
competencies of licensed marriage and family therapy, mental health
counselor, social work, chemical dependency professional, psychiatric
nurse practice, psychology, or psychiatry that are regulated under
other laws.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.19.030 and 2001 c 251 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
((No)) A person may not, ((for a fee or)) as a part of his or her
position as an employee of a state agency, practice therapeutic
counseling without being ((registered)) credentialed to practice as an
agency affiliated counselor or mental health adviser by the department
under this chapter unless exempt under RCW 18.19.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.19 RCW
to read as follows:
A person may not, for a fee or as a part of his or her position as
an employee of a state agency, practice hypnotherapy without being
registered to practice as a hypnotherapist by the department under this
chapter unless exempt under RCW 18.19.040.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.19.040 and 2001 c 251 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice of a profession by a person who is either
registered, certified, licensed, or similarly regulated under the laws
of this state and who is performing services within the person's
authorized scope of practice, including any attorney admitted to
practice law in this state when providing counseling incidental to and
in the course of providing legal counsel;
(2) The practice of therapeutic counseling by an employee or
trainee of any federal agency, or the practice of counseling by a
student of a college or university, if the employee, trainee, or
student is practicing solely under the supervision of and accountable
to the agency, college, or university, through which he or she performs
such functions as part of his or her position for no additional fee
other than ordinary compensation;
(3) The practice of therapeutic counseling by a person ((without a
mandatory charge)) for no compensation;
(4) The practice of therapeutic counseling by persons offering
services for public and private nonprofit organizations or charities
not primarily engaged in therapeutic counseling for a fee when approved
by the organizations or agencies for whom they render their services;
(5) Evaluation, consultation, planning, policy-making, research, or
related services conducted by social scientists for private
corporations or public agencies;
(6) The practice of therapeutic counseling by a person under the
auspices of a religious denomination, church, or organization, or the
practice of religion itself;
(7) ((Counselors whose residency is not)) Mental health advisers
who reside outside Washington state from providing up to ten days per
quarter of training or workshops in the state, as long as they
((don't)) do not hold themselves out to be ((registered)) credentialed
in Washington state.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.19.050 and 2001 c 251 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the
secretary has the following authority:
(a) To adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary
to implement this chapter;
(b) To set all ((registration)) credential and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and to collect and deposit all such fees
in the health professions account established under RCW 43.70.320;
(c) To establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(d) To hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement this chapter; and
(e) To issue a ((registration)) credential to any applicant who has
met the requirements ((for registration; and
(f) To develop a dictionary of recognized professions and
occupations providing counseling services to the public included under
this chapter)) of this chapter.
(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the
issuance and denial of ((registrations)) credentials and the discipline
of ((registrants)) persons credentialed under this chapter. The
secretary shall be the disciplining authority under this chapter.
((The absence of educational or training requirements for counselors
registered under this chapter or the counselor's use of nontraditional
nonabusive therapeutic techniques shall not, in and of itself, give the
secretary authority to unilaterally determine the training and
competence or to define or restrict the scope of practice of such
individuals.))
(3) The department shall publish and disseminate information ((in
order)) to educate the public about the responsibilities of therapeutic
counselors, the types of therapeutic counselors, and the rights and
responsibilities of clients established under this chapter. ((Solely
for the purposes of administering this education requirement,)) The
secretary ((shall)) may assess an additional fee for each application
and renewal((, equal to five percent of the fee. The revenue collected
from the assessment fee may be appropriated by the legislature for the
department's use in educating consumers pursuant to this section. The
authority to charge the assessment fee shall terminate on June 30,
1994)) to fund public education efforts under this section.
(4) The department may seek the advice and consultation of the
mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social
workers advisory committee established under RCW 18.225.060 as
necessary for the administration of the professions established in this
chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.19.060 and 2001 c 251 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
Persons ((registered)) credentialed under this chapter shall
provide clients at the commencement of any program of treatment with
accurate disclosure information concerning their practice, in
accordance with guidelines developed by the department, that will
inform clients of the purposes of and resources available under this
chapter, including the right of clients to refuse treatment, the
responsibility of clients for choosing the provider and treatment
modality which best suits their needs, and the extent of
confidentiality provided by this chapter, the department, another
agency, or other jurisdiction. The disclosure statement must inform
the client that the mental health adviser is under the supervision of
a licensed mental health practitioner. The disclosure information
provided by the ((counselor)) credential holder, the receipt of which
shall be acknowledged in writing by the ((counselor)) credential holder
and client, shall include any relevant education and training, the
therapeutic orientation of the practice, the proposed course of
treatment where known, any financial requirements, referral resources,
and such other information as the department may require by rule. The
disclosure statement must inform the client of any disciplinary action
taken against the credential holder by the department, other agency, or
other jurisdiction. The disclosure information shall also include a
statement that ((registration of an individual)) a credential issued
under this chapter does not include a recognition of any practice
standards, nor necessarily imply the effectiveness of any treatment.
The client is not liable for any fees or charges for services rendered
prior to receipt of the disclosure statement.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.19.090 and 1991 c 3 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The secretary shall issue a registration to any applicant who
submits, on forms provided by the secretary, the applicant's name,
address, occupational title, name and location of business, and other
information as determined by the secretary, including information
necessary to determine whether there are grounds for denial of
registration or issuance of a conditional registration under this
chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW.
Applicants)) (1) Applications for ((registration shall register as
counselors or may register as hypnotherapists if employing hypnosis as
a modality. Applicants shall, in addition, provide in their titles a
description of their therapeutic orientation, discipline, theory, or
technique. Each applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary
as provided in RCW 43.70.250, which shall accompany the application.))
credential as agency affiliated counselors, mental health advisers, or
hypnotherapists must be made on forms approved by the secretary. The
secretary may require information necessary to determine whether
applicants meet the qualifications for the credential and whether there
are any grounds for denial or issuance of a conditional credential
under this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW. An application for a
credential as an agency affiliated counselor or mental health adviser
shall include a description of their therapeutic orientation,
discipline, theory, or technique to the department.
(2) Applicants for registration as agency affiliated counselors
must provide satisfactory documentation that they are employed by an
agency or have an offer of employment from an agency.
(3) Applicants for credential as mental health advisers are
required to:
(a) Have a baccalaureate degree in social work, mental health
counseling, psychology, or some other field from an accredited college
or university; and
(b) Have a written supervision agreement with a licensed mental
health practitioner. The department must develop rules defining
supervisory requirements and a model supervision agreement. After
January 1, 2009, the practice of mental health advisers is limited to
group practice settings as defined by the secretary. Provided that,
persons obtaining the mental health adviser credential who will be
practicing solely under the provisions of chapter 18.155 RCW are exempt
from the supervision and practice setting requirements of this
subsection.
(4) Each applicant shall include payment of the fee determined by
the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 18.19 RCW
to read as follows:
Agency affiliated counselors shall notify the department if they
are either no longer employed by the agency identified on their
application or are now employed with another agency, or both. Agency
affiliated counselors may not engage in the practice of therapeutic
counseling unless they are currently affiliated with an agency.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.19.100 and 1996 c 191 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall establish administrative procedures,
administrative requirements, and fees for renewal of ((registrations))
credentials as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The secretary
may establish continuing education requirements for renewal of
credentials.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.225.010 and 2001 c 251 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced social work" means the application of social work
theory and methods including emotional and biopsychosocial assessment,
psychotherapy under the supervision of a licensed independent clinical
social worker, case management, consultation, advocacy, counseling, and
community organization.
(2) "Applicant" means a person who completes the required
application, pays the required fee, is at least eighteen years of age,
and meets any background check requirements and uniform disciplinary
act requirements.
(3) "Associate" means a person with a master's degree in a mental
health field as described in RCW 18.225.090 who is gaining the
supervision and supervised experience necessary to become a licensed
independent clinical social worker, a licensed advanced social worker,
a licensed mental health counselor, or a licensed marriage and family
therapist.
(4) "Committee" means the Washington state mental health
counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers advisory
committee.
(((4))) (5) "Department" means the department of health.
(((5))) (6) "Disciplining authority" means the department.
(((6))) (7) "Independent clinical social work" means the diagnosis
and treatment of emotional and mental disorders based on knowledge of
human development, the causation and treatment of psychopathology,
psychotherapeutic treatment practices, and social work practice as
defined in advanced social work. Treatment modalities include but are
not limited to diagnosis and treatment of individuals, couples,
families, groups, or organizations.
(((7))) (8) "Marriage and family therapy" means the diagnosis and
treatment of mental and emotional disorders, whether cognitive,
affective, or behavioral, within the context of relationships,
including marriage and family systems. Marriage and family therapy
involves the professional application of psychotherapeutic and family
systems theories and techniques in the delivery of services to
individuals, couples, and families for the purpose of treating such
diagnosed nervous and mental disorders. The practice of marriage and
family therapy means the rendering of professional marriage and family
therapy services to individuals, couples, and families, singly or in
groups, whether such services are offered directly to the general
public or through organizations, either public or private, for a fee,
monetary or otherwise.
(((8))) (9) "Mental health counseling" means the application of
principles of human development, learning theory, psychotherapy, group
dynamics, and etiology of mental illness and dysfunctional behavior to
individuals, couples, families, groups, and organizations, for the
purpose of treatment of mental disorders and promoting optimal mental
health and functionality. Mental health counseling also includes, but
is not limited to, the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of mental
and emotional disorders, as well as the application of a wellness model
of mental health.
(((9))) (10) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.225.020 and 2001 c 251 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person must not represent himself or herself as a licensed
advanced social worker, a licensed independent clinical social worker,
a licensed mental health counselor, ((or)) a licensed marriage and
family therapist, a licensed social work associate - advanced, a
licensed social work associate - independent clinical, a licensed
mental health counselor associate, or a licensed marriage and family
therapist associate, without being licensed by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 18.225
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue an associate license to any applicant
who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that the
applicant meets the following requirements for the applicant's practice
area and submits a declaration that the applicant is working toward
full licensure in that category:
(a) Licensed social worker - advanced or licensed social worker -clinical: Graduation from a master's or doctorate social work
educational program accredited by the council on social work education
and approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized
standards;
(b) Licensed mental health counselor: Graduation from a master's
or doctoral level educational program in mental health counseling or a
related discipline from a college or university approved by the
secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;
(c) Licensed marriage and family therapist: Graduation from a
master's degree or doctoral degree educational program in marriage and
family therapy or graduation from an educational program in an allied
field equivalent to a master's degree or doctoral degree in marriage
and family therapy approved by the secretary based upon nationally
recognized standards.
(2) Associates may not provide independent social work, mental
health counseling, or marriage and family therapy for a fee, monetary
or otherwise. Associates must work under the supervision of an
approved supervisor.
(3) Associates shall provide each client or patient, during the
first professional contact, with a disclosure form according to RCW
18.225.100, disclosing that he or she is an associate under the
supervision of an approved supervisor.
(4) The department shall establish by rule what constitutes
adequate proof of compliance with the requirements of this section.
(5) Applicants are subject to the denial of a license or issuance
of a conditional license for the reasons set forth in chapter 18.130
RCW.
(6) An associate license may be renewed no more than four times.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.225.070 and 2001 c 251 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of health may seek the advice and assistance of the
advisory committee in administering this chapter, including, but not
limited to:
(1) Advice and recommendations regarding the establishment or
implementation of rules related to the administration of this chapter;
(2) Advice, recommendations, and consultation regarding case
disposition guidelines and priorities related to unprofessional conduct
cases regarding licensed mental health counselors, licensed clinical
social workers, licensed advanced social workers, ((and)) licensed
marriage and family therapists, and associates;
(3) Assistance and consultation of individual committee members as
needed in the review, analysis, and disposition of reports of
unprofessional conduct and consumer complaints;
(4) Assistance and recommendations to enhance consumer education;
((and))
(5) Assistance and recommendations regarding any continuing
education and continuing competency programs administered under the
provisions of ((the [this])) this chapter; and
(6) Advice and assistance regarding the establishment or
implementation of rules related to agency-affiliated counselors and
mental health advisers credentialed under chapter 18.19 RCW.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.225.090 and 2006 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue a license to any applicant who
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that the applicant
meets the following education and experience requirements for the
applicant's practice area.
(a) Licensed social work classifications:
(i) Licensed advanced social worker:
(A) Graduation from a master's or doctorate social work educational
program accredited by the council on social work education and approved
by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;
(B) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(C) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of three thousand two
hundred hours with ninety hours of supervision by a licensed
independent clinical social worker or a licensed advanced social worker
who has been licensed or certified for at least two years. Of those
hours, fifty hours must include direct supervision by a licensed
advanced social worker or licensed independent clinical social worker;
the other forty hours may be with an equally qualified licensed mental
health practitioner. Forty hours must be in one-to-one supervision and
fifty hours may be in one-to-one supervision or group supervision.
Distance supervision is limited to forty supervision hours. Eight
hundred hours must be in direct client contact; and
(D) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(ii) Licensed independent clinical social worker:
(A) Graduation from a master's or doctorate level social work
educational program accredited by the council on social work education
and approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized
standards;
(B) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(C) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of four thousand hours
of experience, of which one thousand hours must be direct client
contact, over a three-year period supervised by a licensed independent
clinical social worker who has been licensed or certified for at least
five years and who has had at least one year of experience in
supervising the clinical social work practice of others, with
supervision of at least one hundred thirty hours by a licensed mental
health practitioner. Of the total supervision, seventy hours must be
with an independent clinical social worker meeting the qualifications
under this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(C); the other sixty hours may be with
an equally qualified licensed mental health practitioner. Sixty hours
must be in one-to-one supervision and seventy hours may be in one-to-one supervision or group supervision. Distance supervision is limited
to sixty supervision hours; and
(D) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(b) Licensed mental health counselor:
(i) Graduation from a master's or doctoral level educational
program in mental health counseling or a related discipline from a
college or university approved by the secretary based upon nationally
recognized standards;
(ii) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(iii) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of thirty-six months
full-time counseling or three thousand hours of postgraduate mental
health counseling under the supervision of a qualified licensed mental
health counselor or equally qualified licensed mental health
practitioner, in an approved setting. The three thousand hours of
required experience includes a minimum of one hundred hours spent in
immediate supervision with the qualified licensed mental health
counselor, and includes a minimum of one thousand two hundred hours of
direct counseling with individuals, couples, families, or groups; and
(iv) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(c) Licensed marriage and family therapist:
(i) Graduation from a master's degree or doctoral degree
educational program in marriage and family therapy or graduation from
an educational program in an allied field equivalent to a master's
degree or doctoral degree in marriage and family therapy approved by
the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;
(ii) Successful passage of an approved examination;
(iii) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of two calendar years
of full-time marriage and family therapy. Of the total supervision,
one hundred hours must be with a licensed marriage and family therapist
with at least five years' clinical experience; the other one hundred
hours may be with an equally qualified licensed mental health
practitioner. Total experience requirements include:
(A) A minimum of three thousand hours of experience, one thousand
hours of which must be direct client contact; at least five hundred
hours must be gained in diagnosing and treating couples and families;
plus
(B) At least two hundred hours of qualified supervision with a
supervisor. At least one hundred of the two hundred hours must be one-on-one supervision, and the remaining hours may be in one-on-one or
group supervision.
Applicants who have completed a master's program accredited by the
commission on accreditation for marriage and family therapy education
of the American association for marriage and family therapy may be
credited with five hundred hours of direct client contact and one
hundred hours of formal meetings with an approved supervisor; and
(iv) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(2) The department shall establish by rule what constitutes
adequate proof of meeting the criteria.
(3) In addition, applicants shall be subject to the grounds for
denial of a license or issuance of a conditional license under chapter
18.130 RCW.
(4) Persons who apply for licensure by July 1, 2009, and who meet
the education requirements for any of the credentials issued under this
section and who have held a Washington state counselor credential
issued under chapter 18.19 RCW for five years since obtaining their
master's degree are exempt from documenting the supervision and
experience requirements of this section.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.225.150 and 2001 c 251 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary shall establish by rule the procedural requirements
and fees for renewal of a license or associate license. Failure to
renew shall invalidate the license or associate license and all
privileges granted by the license. If an associate license has lapsed,
the person shall submit an updated declaration, in accordance with
rules adopted by the department, that the person is working toward full
licensure. If a license has lapsed for a period longer than three
years, the person shall demonstrate competence to the satisfaction of
the secretary by taking continuing education courses, or meeting other
standards determined by the secretary. If an associate license has
lapsed, the person shall submit an updated declaration, in accordance
with rules adopted by the department, that the person is working toward
full licensure.

Sec. 16 RCW 18.205.020 and 1998 c 243 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Certification" means a voluntary process recognizing an
individual who qualifies by examination and meets established
educational prerequisites, and which protects the title of practice.
(2) (("Certified)) "Chemical dependency professional" means an
individual certified in chemical dependency counseling, under this
chapter.
(3) "Chemical dependency professional trainee" means an individual
working toward the education and experience requirements for
certification as a chemical dependency professional.
(4) "Chemical dependency counseling" means employing the core
competencies of chemical dependency counseling to assist or attempt to
assist ((an alcohol or drug addicted)) a chemically dependent person to
develop and maintain abstinence from alcohol and other mood-altering
drugs.
(((4))) (5) "Committee" means the chemical dependency certification
advisory committee established under this chapter.
(((5))) (6) "Core competencies of chemical dependency counseling"
means competency in the nationally recognized knowledge, skills, and
attitudes of professional practice, including assessment and diagnosis
of chemical dependency, chemical dependency treatment planning and
referral, patient and family education in the disease of chemical
dependency, individual and group counseling with ((alcoholic and drug
addicted)) chemically dependent individuals, relapse prevention
counseling, and case management, all oriented to assist ((alcoholic and
drug addicted)) chemically dependent patients to achieve and maintain
abstinence from mood-altering substances and develop independent
support systems.
(((6))) (7) "Department" means the department of health.
(((7))) (8) "Health profession" means a profession providing health
services regulated under the laws of this state.
(((8))) (9) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.

Sec. 17 RCW 18.205.030 and 2000 c 171 s 41 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person may represent oneself as a ((certified)) chemical
dependency professional or chemical dependency professional trainee or
use any title or description of services of a ((certified)) chemical
dependency professional or chemical dependency professional trainee
without applying for certification or registration under this chapter,
meeting the required qualifications, and being certified or registered
by the department of health, unless otherwise exempted by this chapter.

Sec. 18 RCW 18.205.040 and 1998 c 243 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the use of
the title "((certified)) chemical dependency professional" or "chemical
dependency professional trainee" when treating patients in settings
other than programs approved under chapter 70.96A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 18.205
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue a chemical dependency professional
trainee credential to any applicant who demonstrates to the
satisfaction of the secretary that he or she is working toward the
education and experience requirements in RCW 18.205.090.
(2) A chemical dependency professional trainee credentialed under
this section shall submit to the secretary for approval a declaration,
in accordance with rules adopted by the department, that he or she is
enrolled in an approved education program and actively pursuing the
experience requirements in RCW 18.205.090. This declaration must be
updated with the trainee's annual renewal.
(3) A trainee certified under this section may practice only under
the supervision of a certified chemical dependency professional. The
first fifty hours of any face-to-face client contact must be under
direct observation. All remaining experience must be under supervision
in accordance with rules adopted by the department.
(4) A chemical dependency professional trainee provides chemical
dependency assessments, counseling, and case management within a state
regulated agency and can provide clinical services to patients
consistent with his or her education, training, and experience as
determined by his or her approved supervisor.
(5) A chemical dependency professional trainee credential may only
be renewed four times.
(6) Applicants are subject to denial of a certificate or issuance
of a conditional certificate for the reasons set forth in chapter
18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 To practice counseling, all registered
counselors must obtain another health profession credential by January
1, 2009. The registered counselor credential shall be abolished
January 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 The department of licensing shall convene
a work group to develop recommendations regarding the need to regulate
those individuals currently registered with the department of health as
counselors and whose practice does not meet the definition of
"therapeutic counseling" or a specified exemption to the definition.
The work group shall consist of a broad representation of registered
counselors that do not practice therapeutic counseling as defined in
RCW 18.19.020, such as life coaches and spiritual counselors, the
clients of such counselors, and representatives of licensed mental
health practitioners as defined in RCW 18.19.020, including members of
the mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and
social workers advisory committee established under RCW 18.225.060.
The work group shall consider the harm to the public if the individuals
are not regulated and the benefit to the public that the regulation
would provide, and alternatives to state regulation. The department of
licensing shall submit the recommendations of the work group to the
legislature by November 15, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Except for sections 21 and 23 of this act,
this act takes effect July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The secretary of health may take the
necessary steps to ensure that this act is implemented on its effective
date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Section 21 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---