BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.190.030 and 1997 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created the office of the state long-term care ombudsman.
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall
contract with a private nonprofit organization to provide long-term
care ombudsman services as specified under, and consistent with, the
federal older Americans act as amended, federal mandates, the goals of
the state, and the needs of its citizens. The office of the state
long-term care ombudsman shall also provide ombudsman services for
persons receiving services from regional support networks and licensed
service providers under chapter 71.24 RCW. The department of
community, trade, and economic development shall ensure that all
program and staff support necessary to enable the ombudsman to
effectively protect the interests of residents, patients, and clients
of all long-term care facilities is provided by the nonprofit
organization that contracts to provide long-term care ombudsman
services. The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall adopt rules to carry out this chapter and the long-term care
ombudsman provisions of the federal older Americans act, as amended,
and applicable federal regulations. The long-term care ombudsman
program shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To provide services for coordinating the activities of long-term care ombudsmen throughout the state;
(2) Carry out such other activities as the department of community,
trade, and economic development deems appropriate;
(3) Establish procedures consistent with RCW 43.190.110 for
appropriate access by long-term care ombudsmen to long-term care
facilities and patients' records, including procedures to protect the
confidentiality of the records and ensure that the identity of any
complainant or resident will not be disclosed without the written
consent of the complainant or resident, or upon court order;
(4) Establish a statewide uniform reporting system to collect and
analyze data relating to complaints and conditions in long-term care
facilities for the purpose of identifying and resolving significant
problems, with provision for submission of such data to the department
of social and health services and to the federal department of health
and human services, or its successor agency, on a regular basis; and
(5) Establish procedures to assure that any files maintained by
ombudsman programs shall be disclosed only at the discretion of the
ombudsman having authority over the disposition of such files, except
that the identity of any complainant or resident of a long-term care
facility shall not be disclosed by such ombudsman unless:
(a) Such complainant or resident, or the complainant's or
resident's legal representative, consents in writing to such
disclosure; or
(b) Such disclosure is required by court order.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.05.360 and 2005 c 504 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person involuntarily detained or committed under the
provisions of this chapter shall be entitled to all the rights set
forth in this chapter, which shall be prominently posted in the
facility, and shall retain all rights not denied him or her under this
chapter except as chapter 9.41 RCW may limit the right of a person to
purchase or possess a firearm or to qualify for a concealed pistol
license.
(b) No person shall be presumed incompetent as a consequence of
receiving an evaluation or voluntary or involuntary treatment for a
mental disorder, under this chapter or any prior laws of this state
dealing with mental illness. Competency shall not be determined or
withdrawn except under the provisions of chapter 10.97 or 11.88 RCW.
(c) Any person who leaves a public or private agency following
evaluation or treatment for mental disorder shall be given a written
statement setting forth the substance of this section.
(2) Each person involuntarily detained or committed pursuant to
this chapter shall have the right to adequate care and individualized
treatment.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to deny
to any person treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance
with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination.
(4) Persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this chapter
shall be given a reasonable choice of an available physician or other
professional person qualified to provide such services.
(5) Whenever any person is detained for evaluation and treatment
pursuant to this chapter, both the person and, if possible, a
responsible member of his or her immediate family, personal
representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, shall be advised as
soon as possible in writing or orally, by the officer or person taking
him or her into custody or by personnel of the evaluation and treatment
facility where the person is detained that unless the person is
released or voluntarily admits himself or herself for treatment within
seventy-two hours of the initial detention:
(a) A judicial hearing in a superior court, either by a judge or
court commissioner thereof, shall be held not more than seventy-two
hours after the initial detention to determine whether there is
probable cause to detain the person after the seventy-two hours have
expired for up to an additional fourteen days without further automatic
hearing for the reason that the person is a person whose mental
disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or that the person is
gravely disabled;
(b) The person has a right to communicate immediately with an
attorney; has a right to have an attorney appointed to represent him or
her before and at the probable cause hearing if he or she is indigent;
and has the right to be told the name and address of the attorney that
the mental health professional has designated pursuant to this chapter;
(c) The person has the right to remain silent and that any
statement he or she makes may be used against him or her;
(d) The person has the right to present evidence and to cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her at the probable cause
hearing; and
(e) The person has the right to refuse psychiatric medications,
including antipsychotic medication beginning twenty-four hours prior to
the probable cause hearing.
(6) When proceedings are initiated under RCW 71.05.150 (2), (3), or
(4)(b), no later than twelve hours after such person is admitted to the
evaluation and treatment facility the personnel of the evaluation and
treatment facility or the designated mental health professional shall
serve on such person a copy of the petition for initial detention and
the name, business address, and phone number of the designated attorney
and shall forthwith commence service of a copy of the petition for
initial detention on the designated attorney.
(7) The judicial hearing described in subsection (5) of this
section is hereby authorized, and shall be held according to the
provisions of subsection (5) of this section and rules promulgated by
the supreme court.
(8) At the probable cause hearing the detained person shall have
the following rights in addition to the rights previously specified:
(a) To present evidence on his or her behalf;
(b) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;
(c) To be proceeded against by the rules of evidence;
(d) To remain silent;
(e) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file.
(9) The physician-patient privilege or the psychologist-client
privilege shall be deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter
relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to
other proceedings under this chapter, the privileges shall be waived
when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines
that such waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person or
the public.
The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to records
or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes
of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person
or on its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony
sought by a petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of
the waiver.
The record maker shall not be required to testify in order to
introduce medical or psychological records of the detained person so
long as the requirements of RCW 5.45.020 are met except that portions
of the record which contain opinions as to the detained person's mental
state must be deleted from such records unless the person making such
conclusions is available for cross-examination.
(10) Insofar as danger to the person or others is not created, each
person involuntarily detained, treated in a less restrictive
alternative course of treatment, or committed for treatment and
evaluation pursuant to this chapter shall have, in addition to other
rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights:
(a) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her
own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential
to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;
(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her
own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;
(c) To have access to individual storage space for his or her
private use;
(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;
(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and
receive confidential calls, consistent with an effective treatment
program;
(f) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including
stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the
mails;
(g) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with professional
persons;
(h) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic
medications and not to thereafter be administered antipsychotic
medications unless ordered by a court under RCW 71.05.217 or pursuant
to an administrative hearing under RCW 71.05.215;
(i) Not to consent to the performance of electroconvulsant therapy
or surgery, except emergency life-saving surgery, unless ordered by a
court under RCW 71.05.217;
(j) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any
circumstances;
(k) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person
has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to
that particular issue;
(l) To complain about rights violations or conditions and request
the assistance of a mental health ombudsman or representative of
Washington protection and advocacy. The facility may not prohibit or
interfere with a resident's decision to consult with an advocate of his
or her choice.
(11) Every person involuntarily detained shall immediately be
informed of his or her right to a hearing to review the legality of his
or her detention and of his or her right to counsel, by the
professional person in charge of the facility providing evaluation and
treatment, or his or her designee, and, when appropriate, by the court.
If the person so elects, the court shall immediately appoint an
attorney to assist him or her.
(12) A person challenging his or her detention or his or her
attorney((,)) shall have the right to designate and have the court
appoint a reasonably available independent physician or licensed mental
health professional to examine the person detained, the results of
which examination may be used in the proceeding. The person shall, if
he or she is financially able, bear the cost of such expert information
[examination], otherwise such expert examination shall be at public
expense.
(13) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the patient
from petitioning by writ of habeas corpus for release.
(14) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a person committed on
or prior to January 1, 1974, from exercising a right available to him
or her at or prior to January 1, 1974, for obtaining release from
confinement.
(15) Nothing in this section permits any person to knowingly
violate a no-contact order or a condition of an active judgment and
sentence or an active condition of supervision by the department of
corrections.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.34.355 and 1985 c 354 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Absent a risk to self or others, minors treated under this chapter
have the following rights, which shall be prominently posted in the
evaluation and treatment facility:
(1) To wear their own clothes and to keep and use personal
possessions;
(2) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of their own
money for canteen expenses and small purchases;
(3) To have individual storage space for private use;
(4) To have visitors at reasonable times;
(5) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and
receive confidential calls;
(6) To have ready access to letter-writing materials, including
stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the
mails;
(7) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with mental health
professionals;
(8) To have the right to adequate care and individualized
treatment;
(9) Not to consent to the performance of electro-convulsive
treatment or surgery, except emergency life-saving surgery, upon him or
her, and not to have electro-convulsive treatment or nonemergency
surgery in such circumstance unless ordered by a court pursuant to a
judicial hearing in which the minor is present and represented by
counsel, and the court shall appoint a psychiatrist, psychologist, or
physician designated by the minor or the minor's counsel to testify on
behalf of the minor. The minor's parent may exercise this right on the
minor's behalf, and must be informed of any impending treatment;
(10) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any
circumstances;
(11) To communicate immediately with a parent or legal guardian
whenever a minor is detained for evaluation and treatment pursuant to
this chapter. Parents or legal guardians may be present at all
hearings;
(12) To complain about rights violations or conditions and request
the assistance of a mental health ombudsman or representative of
Washington protection and advocacy. The facility may not prohibit or
interfere with a resident's decision to consult with an advocate of his
or her choice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 71.24.350 (Mental health ombudsman
office) and 2005 c 504 s 803 are each repealed.

--- END ---