BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.36.080 and 1998 c 245 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All fees and medical charges under this title shall conform to
the fee schedule established by the director and shall be paid within
sixty days of receipt by the department of a proper billing in the form
prescribed by department rule or sixty days after the claim is allowed
by final order or judgment, if an otherwise proper billing is received
by the department prior to final adjudication of claim allowance. The
department shall pay interest at the rate of one percent per month, but
at least one dollar per month, whenever the payment period exceeds the
applicable sixty-day period on all proper fees and medical charges.
Beginning in fiscal year 1987, interest payments under this
subsection may be paid only from funds appropriated to the department
for administrative purposes.
Nothing in this section may be construed to require the payment of
interest on any billing, fee, or charge if the industrial insurance
claim on which the billing, fee, or charge is predicated is ultimately
rejected or the billing, fee, or charge is otherwise not allowable
unless the department has authorized the treatment in writing prior to
rejecting the claim. If the department authorizes treatment in writing
for a claim that is subsequently rejected by the department, the
department shall, at no cost to the employer, reimburse a provider who
provides the authorized treatment prior to the rejection of the claim.
In establishing fees for medical and other health care services,
the director shall consider the director's duty to purchase health care
in a prudent, cost-effective manner without unduly restricting access
to necessary care by persons entitled to the care. With respect to
workers admitted as hospital inpatients on or after July 1, 1987, the
director shall pay for inpatient hospital services on the basis of
diagnosis-related groups, contracting for services, or other prudent,
cost-effective payment method, which the director shall establish by
rules adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The director may establish procedures for selectively or
randomly auditing the accuracy of fees and medical billings submitted
to the department under this title.

--- END ---