BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The long-range health and environmental
well-being of the state requires the conservation of the state's farms
and forests for the economic, environmental, and recreational benefit
of its people. It is the purpose of this chapter to provide an account
to receive funds to provide financial assistance to local governments
for the conservation of working farms and forests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Conservation projects" means any acquisition by a public body
of conservation land that provides multiple public benefits for
habitat, water quality and quantity protection, recreation, or scenic
character, while continuing to be worked economically for agricultural
or timber production, that results in permanent conservation from
conversion to other than farm or forest uses.
(2) "Conservation land" means any working farm or forest property,
including without limitation any conservation easement or other
property interest or development rights therein, and improvements
necessary for or incidental to such a purpose.
(3) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(5) "Eligible cost" means any cost of farm or forest conservation
activities.
(6) "Farm or forest conservation activities" means actions taken by
a public body for the following purposes: (a) To finance conservation
projects; or (b) to steward or manage conservation land for
environmental protection or enhancement and health or human safety
either directly or by contract with another public body, nonprofit
corporation, or other entity.
(7) "Fund" means the farm and forest conservation revolving fund in
the custody of the state treasurer.
(8) "Public body" means any state agency, county, city or town,
other political subdivision of the state, municipal corporation or
quasi-municipal corporation, public corporation, commission or
authority under RCW 35.21.730, and those Indian tribes now or hereafter
recognized as such by the federal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The farm and forest conservation
revolving fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from subsection (2) of this section must be deposited into the
fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for purposes of this
chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.
(2) The fund shall consist of:
(a) All funds appropriated or authorized by the legislature for
deposit to the fund;
(b) Any other revenues derived from gifts or bequests pledged or
donated to the state for the purpose of providing financial assistance
for farm or forest conservation activities;
(c) All repayments of moneys borrowed from the fund;
(d) All interest payments made by borrowers from the fund; and
(e) Any other fee or charge levied in conjunction with
administration of the fund.
(3) In administering the fund, the department shall:
(a) Use accounting, audit, and fiscal procedures that conform to
generally accepted government accounting standards;
(b) Adopt by rule any procedures or standards necessary to carry
out the provisions of this chapter; and
(c) Cooperate with local, regional, and interstate entities
regarding priority farm and forest conservation priorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department shall use the moneys in the
farm and forest conservation revolving fund to provide financial
assistance to public bodies for eligible costs as follows:
(1) To make loans to public bodies to pay eligible costs with the
following terms:
(a) The loans shall be made at or below market interest rates, and
may be interest free loans, for terms not to exceed fifty years;
(b) Annual principal and interest payments, if any, on loans made
from the fund shall commence not later than one year after completion
of any conservation project funded with loan proceeds. All loans shall
be fully amortized within their term. Annual principal or interest
payments, if any, otherwise required to be made in a year may be
deferred for one or more years if the department certifies that the
conservation land failed to generate sufficient positive cash flow to
fund payments in those years;
(c) The outstanding loan balance including accrued interest is due
and payable in full if ownership of the conservation land is
transferred to a party other than a public body. If ownership of the
conservation land is transferred to a public body, the loan may be
assigned to that public body with the written consent of the
department;
(d) A loan is a general obligation or special fund obligation of
the recipient. The recipient of a loan shall pledge revenues derived
from conservation land for repayment of loans that are a special fund
obligation of the recipient. Conservation land revenues may be pledged
to repayment of loans under this chapter on a basis subordinate to the
costs of operating and maintaining the conservation land and to the
payment of bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the public
body.
(2) The department may also use the moneys in the fund for the
following purposes:
(a) To purchase insurance for obligations issued by public bodies
for farm or forest conservation activities if the insurance would
improve credit market access or reduce interest rates, or to provide
loans to a public body for this purpose;
(b) As a source of revenue or security for the payment of principal
and interest on revenue or general obligation bonds issued by the state
if the proceeds of the sale of the bonds will be deposited in the fund;
(c) To earn interest on fund accounts; and
(d) To pay the expenses of the department in administering the
fund.
(3) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 2009, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the fund to the chairs of the senate committee on ways and
means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 2009, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31st of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the loan.
(4) The department may not use the money in the fund for grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any public body seeking a loan from the fund
shall:
(1) Submit an application to the department demonstrating that the
farm or forest conservation activity will achieve multiple public
benefits if the conservation land is protected as an economically
active farm or forest property, as shown by letters of support from
stakeholders and qualified experts or inclusion in conservation
priority processes such as county comprehensive plans, salmon recovery
plans, or other habitat or biodiversity management plans; and
(2) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that it has
sufficient legal authority to incur the debt for which it is applying.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Loans made under this chapter may be secured
by interests in the conservation land as the public body is otherwise
authorized by law to grant including without limitation, a deed of
trust in the conservation land granted on a priority or subordinate
basis or a lease of, easement in, or other property interest in the
conservation land. If a public body defaults on payments due to the
fund, the state may pursue its remedies under the loan agreement,
enforce any interest in the conservation land, and withhold any amounts
otherwise due to the public body and legally available for repayment of
loans under this chapter and direct that the funds be applied for this
purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department shall establish by rule
policies for reviewing loan applications, establishing loan terms, and
administering loans made from the fund to assure that the objectives of
this chapter are met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Loans made to public bodies under this
chapter do not constitute indebtedness for the purpose of any statutory
limitation upon indebtedness.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2006 c 311 s 21 and 2006 c 120 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, the farm and
forest conservation revolving fund, and the reading achievement
account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---