BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.80.080 and 2001 c 237 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board must provide a copy of its record of decision to the
applicant. The board shall submit its record of decision on the
transfer application to the department for review. The board shall
also submit its report of examination to the department summarizing
factual findings on which the board relied in reaching its record of
decision and a copy of the files and records upon which the board's
record of decision is based. The board shall also promptly transmit
notice by mail to any person who objected to the transfer or who
requested notice of the board's record of decision.
(2) Upon receipt of a board's record of decision, the department
shall promptly post the text of the record of decision transmittal form
on the department's internet site. The director shall review each
record of decision made by a board for compliance with applicable state
water law.
(3) Any party to a transfer, third party who alleges his or her
water right will be impaired by the proposed transfer, or other person
may file a letter of concern or support with the department and the
department may consider the concern or support expressed in the letter.
Such letters must be received by the department within thirty days of
the department's receipt of the board's record of decision.
(4) The director shall review the record of decision of the board
and shall affirm, reverse, or modify the action of the board within
forty-five days of receipt. The forty-five day time period may be
extended for an additional thirty days by the director or at the
request of the board or applicant. If the director fails to act within
the prescribed time period, the board's record of decision becomes the
decision of the department and is appealable as provided by RCW
90.80.090. If the director acts within the prescribed time period, the
director's decision to affirm, modify, or reverse is appealable as
provided by RCW 90.80.090, and the director's decision to remand is
appealable as provided by RCW 90.80.120(((2)(b))) (3)(b).
(5) The director's review is limited to compliance with established
statutes. In the case of transfers affecting water supplies for an
established municipality, the director's review shall also consider the
requirements of other state and federal agencies mandating either
sufficient sources of supply or requiring growth to occur within
legally proscribed boundaries, or both. The director shall not
condition or modify board decisions unless they are arbitrary and
capricious.

--- END ---