BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall implement a pilot program within existing
resources to require a licensee to subcontract with a commercial food
service establishment or skill center or community college culinary
program to operate a full-service food establishment in the Pritchard
building and, if feasible, at a satellite location in the legislative
building. The pilot program shall be implemented as provided in this
section, after June 30, 2007, but by no later than January 1, 2008.
(2) The licensee shall operate the facilities with cooperation and
coordination with the commercial food service establishment or skill
center or community college culinary program and the department.
(3) The department shall select the commercial food service
establishment or skill center or community college culinary program
from a list of bids submitted by interested establishments and shall
enter into a contract with the successful bidder. The initial contract
shall be for a period not to exceed three years.
(4) The department shall not be charged rent for this pilot
program.
(5) The director shall submit an electronic report on the pilot
program to the appropriate legislative committees eighteen months after
the pilot program commences operation.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.18.200 and 2003 c 409 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply in RCW 74.18.200 through 74.18.230.
(1) "Business enterprises program" means a program operated by the
department under the federal Randolph-Sheppard Act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 107
et seq., and under this chapter in support of blind persons operating
vending businesses in public buildings.
(2) "Vending facility" means any stand, snack bar, cafeteria, or
business at which food, tobacco, sundries, or other retail merchandise
or service is sold or provided.
(3) "Vending machine" means any coin-operated machine that sells or
provides food, tobacco, sundries, or other retail merchandise or
service.
(4) "Blind person" means a person whose central visual acuity does
not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with correcting lenses or whose
visual acuity, if better than 20/200, is accompanied by a limit to the
field of vision in the better eye to such a degree that its widest
diameter subtends an angle of no greater than twenty degrees. In
determining whether an individual is blind, there shall be an
examination by a physician skilled in diseases of the eye, or by an
optometrist, whichever the individual selects.
(5) "Commercial food service establishment" means any restaurant or
restaurant franchise currently operating in the state of Washington.
(6) "Licensee" means a blind person licensed by the state of
Washington under the Randolph-Sheppard Act, this chapter, and the rules
issued hereunder.
(((6))) (7) "Public building" means any building and immediately
adjacent outdoor space associated therewith, such as a patio or
entryway, which is: (a) Owned by the state of Washington or any
political subdivision thereof or any space leased by the state of
Washington or any political subdivision thereof in any privately-owned
building; and (b) dedicated to the administrative functions of the
state or any political subdivision. However, this term shall not
include property under the jurisdiction and control of a local board of
education without the consent of such board.
(((7))) (8) "Priority" means the department has first and primary
right to operate the food service and vending facilities, including
vending machines, on federal, state, county, municipal, and other local
government property except those otherwise exempted by statute. Such
right may, at the sole discretion of the department, be waived in the
event that the department is temporarily unable to assert the priority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---