BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.80.060 and 2005 c 334 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to qualify for state planning funds available to regional
transportation planning organizations, the regional transportation
planning organizations containing any county with a population in
excess of one million shall provide voting membership on its executive
board to the state transportation commission, the state department of
transportation, ((and)) the four largest public port districts within
the region as determined by gross operating revenues, any city in the
most populous county that has a population greater than three percent
of that county's population, and any city in any other county that has
a population greater than five percent of the population of that county
where the city is located. It shall further assure that at least fifty
percent of the weighted vote attributable to the county and city local
elected officials who serve on the executive board also serve on
transit agency boards or on a regional transit authority.

--- END ---