BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35A.01.040 and 2003 c 331 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Wherever in this title petitions are required to be signed and
filed, the following rules shall govern the sufficiency thereof:
(1) A petition may include any page or group of pages containing an
identical text or prayer intended by the circulators, signers or
sponsors to be presented and considered as one petition and containing
the following essential elements when applicable, except that the
elements referred to in (d) and (e) of this subsection are essential
for petitions referring or initiating legislative matters to the
voters, but are directory as to other petitions:
(a) The text or prayer of the petition which shall be a concise
statement of the action or relief sought by petitioners and shall
include a reference to the applicable state statute or city ordinance,
if any;
(b) If the petition initiates or refers an ordinance, a true copy
thereof;
(c) If the petition seeks the annexation, incorporation,
withdrawal, or reduction of an area for any purpose, an accurate legal
description of the area proposed for such action and if practical, a
map of the area;
(d) Numbered lines for signatures with space provided beside each
signature for the name and address of the signer and the date of
signing;
(e) The warning statement prescribed in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) Petitions shall be printed or typed on single sheets of white
paper of good quality and each sheet of petition paper having a space
thereon for signatures shall contain the text or prayer of the petition
and the following warning:

WARNING

Every person who signs this petition with any other than his or
her true name, or who knowingly signs more than one of these
petitions, or signs a petition seeking an election when he or
she is not a legal voter, or signs a petition when he or she is
otherwise not qualified to sign, or who makes herein any false
statement, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Each signature shall be executed in ink or indelible pencil and
shall be followed by the name and address of the signer and the date of
signing.
(3) The term "signer" means any person who signs his or her own
name to the petition.
(4) To be sufficient a petition must contain valid signatures of
qualified registered voters or property owners, as the case may be, in
the number required by the applicable statute or ordinance. Within
three working days after the filing of a petition that is not a
petition seeking annexation under RCW 35A.14.120, the officer with whom
the petition is filed shall transmit the petition to the county auditor
for petitions signed by registered voters, or to the county assessor
for petitions signed by property owners for determination of
sufficiency. Within three working days after the filing of a petition
for annexation, the officer with whom the petition is filed shall
transmit the petition to the city clerk for determination of
sufficiency. The officer or officers whose duty it is to determine the
sufficiency of the petition shall proceed to make such a determination
with reasonable promptness and shall file with the officer receiving
the petition for filing a certificate stating the date upon which such
determination was begun, which date shall be referred to as the
terminal date. Additional pages of one or more signatures may be added
to the petition by filing the same with the appropriate filing officer
prior to such terminal date. Any signer of a filed petition may
withdraw his or her signature by a written request for withdrawal filed
with the receiving officer prior to such terminal date. Such written
request shall so sufficiently describe the petition as to make
identification of the person and the petition certain. The name of any
person seeking to withdraw shall be signed exactly the same as
contained on the petition and, after the filing of such request for
withdrawal, prior to the terminal date, the signature of any person
seeking such withdrawal shall be deemed withdrawn.
(5) Petitions containing the required number of signatures shall be
accepted as prima facie valid until their invalidity has been proved.
(6) A variation on petitions between the signatures on the petition
and that on the voter's permanent registration caused by the
substitution of initials instead of the first or middle names, or both,
shall not invalidate the signature on the petition if the surname and
handwriting are the same.
(7) Signatures, including the original, of any person who has
signed a petition two or more times shall be stricken.
(8) Signatures followed by a date of signing which is more than six
months prior to the date of filing of the petition shall be stricken.
(9) When petitions that do not seek annexation are required to be
signed by the owners of property, the determination shall be made by
the county assessor. When petitions seek annexation, the determination
shall be made by the city clerk. Where validation of signatures to the
petition is required, the following shall apply:
(a) The signature of a record owner, as determined by the records
of the county auditor, shall be sufficient without the signature of his
or her spouse;
(b) In the case of mortgaged property, the signature of the
mortgagor shall be sufficient, without the signature of his or her
spouse;
(c) In the case of property purchased on contract, the signature of
the contract purchaser, as shown by the records of the county auditor,
shall be deemed sufficient, without the signature of his or her spouse;
(d) Any officer of a corporation owning land within the area
involved ((who is duly authorized to execute deeds or encumbrances on
behalf of the corporation,)) may sign under oath on behalf of such
corporation((, and shall attach to the petition a certified excerpt
from the bylaws of such corporation showing such authority));
(e) When property stands in the name of a deceased person or any
person for whom a guardian has been appointed, the signature of the
executor, administrator, or guardian, as the case may be, shall be
equivalent to the signature of the owner of the property; and
(f) When a parcel of property is owned by multiple owners, the
signature of an owner designated by the multiple owners is sufficient.
(10) The officer or officers responsible for determining the
sufficiency of the petition shall do so in writing and transmit the
written certificate to the officer with whom the petition was
originally filed.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.13.130 and 1990 c 33 s 566 are each amended to read
as follows:
A petition for annexation of an area contiguous to a city or town
may be made in writing addressed to and filed with the legislative body
of the municipality to which annexation is desired. Except where all
the property sought to be annexed is property of a school district, and
the school directors thereof file the petition for annexation as in RCW
28A.335.110 authorized, the petition must be signed by the owners of
not less than ((seventy-five)) sixty percent in value according to the
assessed valuation for general taxation of the property reflective of
any taxation exempt status for which annexation is petitioned:
PROVIDED, That in cities and towns with populations greater than one
hundred sixty thousand located east of the Cascade mountains, the owner
of tax exempt property may sign an annexation petition and have the tax
exempt property annexed into the city or town, but the value of the tax
exempt property shall not be used in calculating the sufficiency of the
required property owner signatures unless only tax exempt property is
proposed to be annexed into the city or town. The petition shall set
forth a description of the property according to government legal
subdivisions or legal plats which is in compliance with RCW 35.02.170,
and shall be accompanied by a plat which outlines the boundaries of the
property sought to be annexed. If the legislative body has required
the assumption of all or of any portion of city or town indebtedness by
the area annexed, and/or the adoption of a comprehensive plan for the
area to be annexed, these facts, together with a quotation of the
minute entry of such requirement or requirements shall be set forth in
the petition: PROVIDED, That a petition for annexation of an area
having at least eighty percent of its boundaries contiguous with a
portion of the boundaries of the city, not including that portion of
the boundary of the area proposed to be annexed that is coterminous
with a portion of the boundary between two counties in this state, must
be signed by only the owners of not less than fifty percent in value
according to the assessed valuation for general taxation of the
property for which the annexation is petitioned. Such petition shall
set forth a description of the property according to government legal
subdivisions or legal plats and shall be accompanied by a map which
outlines the boundaries of the property sought to be annexed. If the
legislative body has required the assumption of all or any portion of
city indebtedness by the area annexed or the adoption of a proposed
zoning regulation, these facts, together with a quotation of the minute
entry of such requirement, shall also be set forth in the petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 35.13.171 (Review board -- Convening -- Composition) and 1995
c 399 s 35, 1985 c 6 s 2, 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s 14, & 1965 c 7 s
35.13.171;
(2) RCW 35.13.172 (When review procedure may be dispensed with) and
1981 c 260 s 6;
(3) RCW 35.13.173 (Determination by review board -- Factors
considered -- Filing of findings) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s 16 & 1965 c
7 s 35.13.173; and
(4) RCW 35.13.174 (Date for annexation election if review board's
determination favorable) and 1997 c 429 s 38, 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s
17, & 1965 c 7 s 35.13.174.

--- END ---