BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.112.100 and 2001 c 218 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Methyl tertiary-butyl ether may not be intentionally added to any
gasoline, motor fuel, or clean fuel produced for sale or use in the
state of Washington after December 31, 2003((, and)). In no event may
methyl tertiary-butyl ether be knowingly mixed in gasoline above ((six-tenths)) fifteen one-hundredths of one percent by volume.

--- END ---