BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.04.180 and 1988 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((On)) A contract for any public works project((s)) in which a
trench excavation will exceed a depth of four feet((, any contract
therefor)) shall require adequate safety systems ((for the trench
excavation)) that meet the requirements of the Washington industrial
safety and health act, chapter 49.17 RCW. ((This requirement shall be
included in the cost estimates and bidding forms as a separate item.
The costs of trench safety systems shall not be considered as
incidental to any other contract item and any attempt to include the
trench safety systems as an incidental cost is prohibited.))

--- END ---