BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.04.010 and 2000 c 138 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The term state shall include the state of Washington and all
departments, supervisors, commissioners and agencies thereof.
The term)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Award" means the formal decision by the state or municipality
notifying a responsible bidder with the lowest responsive bid of the
state or municipality's acceptance of the bid and intent to enter into
a contract with the bidder.
(2) "Contract" means a contract in writing for the execution of
public work for a fixed or determinable amount duly awarded after
advertisement and competitive bid, or a contract awarded under the
small works roster process in RCW 39.04.155.
(3) "Municipality" ((shall include)) means every city, county,
town, district, or other public agency ((thereof which is)) authorized
by law to require the execution of public work, except drainage
districts, diking districts, diking and drainage improvement districts,
drainage improvement districts, diking improvement districts,
consolidated diking and drainage improvement districts, consolidated
drainage improvement districts, consolidated diking improvement
districts, irrigation districts, or ((any such)) other districts ((as
shall from time to time be)) authorized by law for the reclamation or
development of waste or undeveloped lands.
((The term)) (4) "Public work" ((shall include)) means all work,
construction, alteration, repair, or improvement other than ordinary
maintenance, executed at the cost of the state or of any municipality,
or which is by law a lien or charge on any property therein. All
public works, including maintenance when performed by contract shall
comply with ((the provisions of RCW 39.12.020)) chapter 39.12 RCW.
((The term)) "Public work" does not include work, construction,
alteration, repair, or improvement performed under contracts entered
into under RCW 36.102.060(4) or under development agreements entered
into under RCW 36.102.060(7) or leases entered into under RCW
36.102.060(8).
((The term contract shall mean a contract in writing for the
execution of public work for a fixed or determinable amount duly
awarded after advertisement and competitive bid. However, a contract
which is awarded from a small works roster need not be advertised.))
(5) "Responsible bidder" means a contractor who meets the criteria
in section 2 of this act.
(6) "State" means the state of Washington and all departments,
supervisors, commissioners, and agencies of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before award of a public works contract, a bidder must meet the
following responsibility criteria to be considered a responsible bidder
and qualified to be awarded a public works project. The bidder must:
(a) At the time of bid submittal, have a certificate of
registration in compliance with chapter 18.27 RCW;
(b) Have a current state unified business identifier number;
(c) If applicable, have industrial insurance coverage for the
bidder's employees working in Washington as required in Title 51 RCW;
an employment security department number as required in Title 50 RCW;
and a state excise tax registration number as required in Title 82 RCW;
and
(d) Not be disqualified from bidding on any public works contract
under RCW 39.06.010 or 39.12.065(3).
(2) In addition to the bidder responsibility criteria in subsection
(1) of this section, the state or municipality may adopt relevant
supplemental criteria for determining bidder responsibility applicable
to a particular project which the bidder must meet.
(a) Supplemental criteria for determining bidder responsibility,
including the basis for evaluation and the deadline for appealing a
determination that a bidder is not responsible, must be provided in the
invitation to bid or bidding documents.
(b) In a timely manner before the bid submittal deadline, a
potential bidder may request that the state or municipality modify the
supplemental criteria. The state or municipality must evaluate the
information submitted by the potential bidder and respond before the
bid submittal deadline. If the evaluation results in a change of the
criteria, the state or municipality must issue an addendum to the
bidding documents identifying the new criteria.
(c) If the bidder fails to supply information requested concerning
responsibility within the time and manner specified in the bid
documents, the state or municipality may base its determination of
responsibility upon any available information related to the
supplemental criteria or may find the bidder not responsible.
(d) If the state or municipality determines a bidder to be not
responsible, the state or municipality must provide, in writing, the
reasons for the determination. The bidder may appeal the determination
within the time period specified in the bidding documents by presenting
additional information to the state or municipality. The state or
municipality must consider the additional information before issuing
its final determination. If the final determination affirms that the
bidder is not responsible, the state or municipality may not execute a
contract with any other bidder until two business days after the bidder
determined to be not responsible has received the final determination.
(3) The capital projects advisory review board created in RCW
39.10.800 shall develop suggested guidelines to assist the state and
municipalities in developing supplemental bidder responsibility
criteria. The guidelines must be posted on the board's web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 39.06 RCW
to read as follows:
A public works contractor must verify responsibility criteria for
each first tier subcontractor, and a subcontractor of any tier that
hires other subcontractors must verify responsibility criteria for each
of its subcontractors. Verification shall include that each
subcontractor, at the time of subcontract execution, meets the
responsibility criteria listed in section 2(1) of this act and
possesses an electrical contractor license, if required by chapter
19.28 RCW, or an elevator contractor license, if required by chapter
70.87 RCW. This verification requirement, as well as the
responsibility criteria, must be included in every public works
contract and subcontract of every tier.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.04.155 and 2001 c 284 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section provides uniform small works roster provisions to
award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling,
alteration, repair, or improvement of real property that may be used by
state agencies and by any local government that is expressly authorized
to use these provisions. These provisions may be used in lieu of other
procedures to award contracts for such work with an estimated cost of
two hundred thousand dollars or less. The small works roster process
includes the limited public works process authorized under subsection
(3) of this section and any local government authorized to award
contracts using the small works roster process under this section may
award contracts using the limited public works process under subsection
(3) of this section.
(2)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may create a
single general small works roster, or may create a small works roster
for different specialties or categories of anticipated work. Where
applicable, small works rosters may make distinctions between
contractors based upon different geographic areas served by the
contractor. The small works roster or rosters shall consist of all
responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list, and where
required by law are properly licensed or registered to perform such
work in this state. A state agency or local government establishing a
small works roster or rosters may require eligible contractors desiring
to be placed on a roster or rosters to keep current records of any
applicable licenses, certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance,
or other appropriate matters on file with the state agency or local
government as a condition of being placed on a roster or rosters. At
least once a year, the state agency or local government shall publish
in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction a notice
of the existence of the roster or rosters and solicit the names of
contractors for such roster or rosters. In addition, responsible
contractors shall be added to an appropriate roster or rosters at any
time they submit a written request and necessary records. Master
contracts may be required to be signed that become effective when a
specific award is made using a small works roster.
(b) A state agency establishing a small works roster or rosters
shall adopt rules implementing this subsection. A local government
establishing a small works roster or rosters shall adopt an ordinance
or resolution implementing this subsection. Procedures included in
rules adopted by the department of general administration in
implementing this subsection must be included in any rules providing
for a small works roster or rosters that is adopted by another state
agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage in these
activities has been delegated to it by the department of general
administration under chapter 43.19 RCW. An interlocal contract or
agreement between two or more state agencies or local governments
establishing a small works roster or rosters to be used by the parties
to the agreement or contract must clearly identify the lead entity that
is responsible for implementing the provisions of this subsection.
(c) Procedures shall be established for securing telephone,
written, or electronic quotations from contractors on the appropriate
small works roster to assure that a competitive price is established
and to award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder((,)) as defined
in RCW ((43.19.1911)) 39.04.010. Invitations for quotations shall
include an estimate of the scope and nature of the work to be performed
as well as materials and equipment to be furnished. However, detailed
plans and specifications need not be included in the invitation. This
subsection does not eliminate other requirements for architectural or
engineering approvals as to quality and compliance with building codes.
Quotations may be invited from all appropriate contractors on the
appropriate small works roster. As an alternative, quotations may be
invited from at least five contractors on the appropriate small works
roster who have indicated the capability of performing the kind of work
being contracted, in a manner that will equitably distribute the
opportunity among the contractors on the appropriate roster. However,
if the estimated cost of the work is from one hundred thousand dollars
to two hundred thousand dollars, a state agency or local government,
other than a port district, that chooses to solicit bids from less than
all the appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster
must also notify the remaining contractors on the appropriate small
works roster that quotations on the work are being sought. The
government has the sole option of determining whether this notice to
the remaining contractors is made by: (i) Publishing notice in a legal
newspaper in general circulation in the area where the work is to be
done; (ii) mailing a notice to these contractors; or (iii) sending a
notice to these contractors by facsimile or other electronic means.
For purposes of this subsection (2)(c), "equitably distribute" means
that a state agency or local government soliciting bids may not favor
certain contractors on the appropriate small works roster over other
contractors on the appropriate small works roster who perform similar
services.
(d) A contract awarded from a small works roster under this section
need not be advertised.
(e) Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained
shall be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by
telephone inquiry.
(3) In lieu of awarding contracts under subsection (2) of this
section, a state agency or authorized local government may award a
contract for work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement
((project [projects])) projects estimated to cost less than thirty-five
thousand dollars using the limited public works process provided under
this subsection. Public works projects awarded under this subsection
are exempt from the other requirements of the small works roster
process provided under subsection (2) of this section and are exempt
from the requirement that contracts be awarded after advertisement as
provided under RCW 39.04.010.
For limited public works projects, a state agency or authorized
local government shall solicit electronic or written quotations from a
minimum of three contractors from the appropriate small works roster
and shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder as
defined under RCW ((43.19.1911)) 39.04.010. After an award is made,
the quotations shall be open to public inspection and available by
electronic request. A state agency or authorized local government
shall attempt to distribute opportunities for limited public works
projects equitably among contractors willing to perform in the
geographic area of the work. A state agency or authorized local
government shall maintain a list of the contractors contacted and the
contracts awarded during the previous twenty-four months under the
limited public works process, including the name of the contractor, the
contractor's registration number, the amount of the contract, a brief
description of the type of work performed, and the date the contract
was awarded. For limited public works projects, a state agency or
authorized local government may waive the payment and performance bond
requirements of chapter 39.08 RCW and the retainage requirements of
chapter 60.28 RCW, thereby assuming the liability for the contractor's
nonpayment of laborers, mechanics, subcontractors, materialmen,
suppliers, and taxes imposed under Title 82 RCW that may be due from
the contractor for the limited public works project, however the state
agency or authorized local government shall have the right of recovery
against the contractor for any payments made on the contractor's
behalf.
(4) The breaking of any project into units or accomplishing any
projects by phases is prohibited if it is done for the purpose of
avoiding the maximum dollar amount of a contract that may be let using
the small works roster process or limited public works process.
(5) As used in this section, "state agency" means the department of
general administration, the state parks and recreation commission, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife,
the department of transportation, any institution of higher education
as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated
authority by the department of general administration to engage in
construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration,
improvement, or repair activities.

--- END ---