BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the
interests of our state to extend the commute trip reduction program to
include not only employees, but also students from public institutions
of higher education. Traffic congestion is a serious problem that
affects the health and safety of everyone in the state. Therefore, the
inclusion of students in the commute trip reduction programs that
public universities are already operating for their employees would be
greatly beneficial in reaching this state's existing policy goals of
reducing traffic and improving environmental quality.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.94.524 and 2006 c 329 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "A major employer" means a private or public employer,
including state agencies, that employs one hundred or more full-time
employees at a single worksite who begin their regular work day between
6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on weekdays for at least twelve continuous
months during the year.
(2) "Major worksite" means a building or group of buildings that
are on physically contiguous parcels of land or on parcels separated
solely by private or public roadways or rights of way, and at which
there are: (a) One hundred or more full-time employees, who begin
their regular work day between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on weekdays, for
at least twelve continuous months; or (b) one hundred or more students,
who attend courses or activities required by a public institution of
higher education, between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on weekdays, for at
least two continuous months.
(3) "Major employment installation" means a military base or
federal reservation, excluding tribal reservations, at which there are
one hundred or more full-time employees, who begin their regular
workday between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on weekdays, for at least
twelve continuous months during the year.
(4) "Person hours of delay" means the daily person hours of delay
per mile in the peak period of 6:00 a.m. to 9:00 a.m., as calculated
using the best available methodology by the department of
transportation.
(5) "Commute trip" means trips made from a worker's home to a
worksite or a student's home to a public institution of higher
education during the peak period of 6:00 a.m. to 9:00 a.m. on weekdays.
(6) "Proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips" means the
number of commute trips made by single-occupant automobiles divided by
the number of full-time employees.
(7) "Commute trip vehicle miles traveled per employee" means the
sum of the individual vehicle commute trip lengths in miles over a set
period divided by the number of full-time employees during that period.
(8) "Commute trip vehicle miles traveled per student" means the sum
of the individual vehicle commute trip lengths in miles over a set
period divided by the number of students during that period.
(9) "Base year" means the twelve-month period commencing when a
major employer is determined to be participating by the local
jurisdiction, on which commute trip reduction goals shall be based.
(((9))) (10) "Growth and transportation efficiency center" means a
defined, compact, mixed-use urban area that contains jobs or housing
and supports multiple modes of transportation. For the purpose of
funding, a growth and transportation efficiency center must meet
minimum criteria established by the commute trip reduction board under
RCW 70.94.537, and must be certified by a regional transportation
planning organization as established in RCW 47.80.020.
(((10))) (11)(a) "Affected urban growth area" means:
(i) An urban growth area, designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110,
whose boundaries contain a state highway segment exceeding the one
hundred person hours of delay threshold calculated by the department of
transportation, and any contiguous urban growth areas; and
(ii) An urban growth area, designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110,
containing a jurisdiction with a population over seventy thousand that
adopted a commute trip reduction ordinance before the year 2000, and
any contiguous urban growth areas.
(b) Affected urban growth areas will be listed by the department of
transportation in the rules for chapter 329, Laws of 2006 using the
criteria identified in (a) of this subsection.
(((11))) (12) "Certification" means a determination by a regional
transportation planning organization that a locally designated growth
and transportation efficiency center program meets the minimum criteria
developed in a collaborative regional process and the rules established
by the department of transportation.
(13) "Public institution" or "public institution of higher
education" means any single campus location of a public four-year
university or college, operated by the state of Washington or any
political subdivision of the state that has more than one hundred
students at that single campus location, who begin classes between 6:00
a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on weekdays for at least two continuous months.
(14) "Student" means an individual currently enrolled in a public
institution of higher education, as defined in this section, at least
half-time.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.94.527 and 2006 c 329 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county containing an urban growth area, designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110, and each city within an urban growth area
with a state highway segment exceeding the one hundred person hours of
delay threshold calculated by the department of transportation, as well
as those counties and cities located in any contiguous urban growth
areas, shall adopt a commute trip reduction plan and ordinance for
major employers, as well as for a public institution and its students,
in the affected urban growth area by a date specified by the commute
trip reduction board. Jurisdictions located within an urban growth
area with a population greater than seventy thousand that adopted a
commute trip reduction ordinance before the year 2000, as well as any
jurisdiction within contiguous urban growth areas, shall also adopt a
commute trip reduction plan and ordinance for major employers, as well
as for public institutions and their students, in the affected urban
growth area by a date specified by the commute trip reduction board.
Jurisdictions containing a major employment installation in a county
with an affected growth area, designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110,
shall adopt a commute trip reduction plan and ordinance for major
employers in the major employment installation by a date specified by
the commute trip reduction board. The ordinance shall establish the
requirements for major employers and public institutions and provide an
appeals process by which major employers or public institutions, who as
a result of special characteristics of their business or ((its))
locations would be unable to meet the requirements of the ordinance,
may obtain waiver or modification of those requirements. The plan
shall be designed to achieve reductions in the proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips and be consistent with the rules
established by the department of transportation. The county, city, or
town shall submit its adopted plan to the regional transportation
planning organization. The county, city, or town plan shall be
included in the regional commute trip reduction plan for regional
transportation planning purposes, consistent with the rules established
by the department of transportation in RCW 70.94.537.
(2) All other counties, cities, and towns may adopt and implement
a commute trip reduction plan consistent with department of
transportation rules established under RCW 70.94.537. Tribal
governments are encouraged to adopt a commute trip reduction plan for
their lands. State investment in voluntary commute trip reduction
plans shall be limited to those areas that meet criteria developed by
the commute trip reduction board.
(3) The department of ecology may, after consultation with the
department of transportation, as part of the state implementation plan
for areas that do not attain the national ambient air quality standards
for carbon monoxide or ozone, require municipalities other than those
identified in subsection (1) of this section to adopt and implement
commute trip reduction plans if the department determines that such
plans are necessary for attainment of said standards.
(4) A commute trip reduction plan shall be consistent with the
rules established under RCW 70.94.537 and shall include but is not
limited to (a) goals for reductions in the proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips consistent with the state goals
established by the commute trip reduction board under RCW 70.94.537 and
the regional commute trip reduction plan goals established in the
regional commute trip reduction plan; (b) a description of the
requirements for major public and private sector employers, as well as
public institutions to implement commute trip reduction programs; (c)
a commute trip reduction program for employees of the county, city, or
town or students of a public institution located within the county,
city, or town; and (d) means, consistent with rules established by the
department of transportation, for determining base year values and
progress toward meeting commute trip reduction plan goals. The plan
shall be developed in consultation with local transit agencies, the
applicable regional transportation planning organization, major
employers, and other interested parties. If a plan has already been
developed prior to the inclusion of public institutions of higher
education, then the plan must be modified to include the public
institutions. Further, the public institutions are to be consulted in
regards to such plan modifications.
(5) The commute trip reduction plans adopted by counties, cities,
and towns under this chapter shall be consistent with and may be
incorporated in applicable state or regional transportation plans and
local comprehensive plans and shall be coordinated, and consistent
with, the commute trip reduction plans of counties, cities, or towns
with which the county, city, or town has, in part, common borders or
related regional issues. Such regional issues shall include assuring
consistency in the treatment of employers who have worksites subject to
the requirements of this chapter in more than one jurisdiction as well
as public institutions with campus locations subject to the
requirements of this chapter in more than one jurisdiction. Counties,
cities, and towns adopting commute trip reduction plans may enter into
agreements through the interlocal cooperation act or by resolution or
ordinance as appropriate with other jurisdictions, local transit
agencies, transportation management associations or other private or
nonprofit providers of transportation services, or regional
transportation planning organizations to coordinate the development and
implementation of such plans. Transit agencies shall work with
counties, cities, and towns as a part of their six-year transit
development plan established in RCW 35.58.2795 to take into account the
location of major employer or public institution worksites when
planning and prioritizing transit service changes or the expansion of
public transportation services, including rideshare services.
Counties, cities, or towns adopting a commute trip reduction plan shall
review it annually and revise it as necessary to be consistent with
applicable plans developed under RCW 36.70A.070. Regional
transportation planning organizations shall review the local commute
trip reduction plans during the development and update of the regional
commute trip reduction plan.
(6) Each affected regional transportation planning organization
shall adopt a commute trip reduction plan for its region consistent
with the rules and deadline established by the department of
transportation under RCW 70.94.537. The plan shall include, but is not
limited to: (a) Regional program goals for commute trip reduction in
urban growth areas and all designated growth and transportation
efficiency centers; (b) a description of strategies for achieving the
goals; (c) a sustainable financial plan describing projected revenues
and expenditures to meet the goals; (d) a description of the way in
which progress toward meeting the goals will be measured; and (e)
minimum criteria for growth and transportation efficiency centers. (i)
Regional transportation planning organizations shall review proposals
from local jurisdictions to designate growth and transportation
efficiency centers and shall determine whether the proposed growth and
transportation efficiency center is consistent with the criteria
defined in the regional commute trip reduction plan. (ii) Growth and
transportation efficiency centers certified as consistent with the
minimum requirements by the regional transportation planning
organization shall be identified in subsequent updates of the regional
commute trip reduction plan. These plans shall be developed in
collaboration with all affected local jurisdictions, transit agencies,
and other interested parties within the region. The plan will be
reviewed and approved by (([the])) the commute trip reduction board as
established under RCW 70.94.537. Regions without an approved regional
commute trip reduction plan shall not be eligible for state commute
trip reduction program funds.
The regional commute trip reduction plan shall be consistent with
and incorporated into transportation demand management components in
the regional transportation plan as required by RCW 47.80.030.
(7) Each regional transportation planning organization implementing
a regional commute trip reduction program shall, consistent with the
rules and deadline established by the department of transportation,
submit its plan as well as any related local commute trip reduction
plans and certified growth and transportation efficiency center
programs, to the commute trip reduction board established under RCW
70.94.537. The commute trip reduction board shall review the regional
commute trip reduction plan and the local commute trip reduction plans.
The regional transportation planning organization shall collaborate
with the commute trip reduction board to evaluate the consistency of
local commute trip reduction plans with the regional commute trip
reduction plan. Local and regional plans must be approved by the
commute trip reduction board in order to be eligible for state funding
provided for the purposes of this chapter.
(8) Each regional transportation planning organization implementing
a regional commute trip reduction program shall submit an annual
progress report to the commute trip reduction board established under
RCW 70.94.537. The report shall be due at the end of each state fiscal
year for which the program has been implemented. The report shall
describe progress in attaining the applicable commute trip reduction
goals and shall highlight any problems being encountered in achieving
the goals. The information shall be reported in a form established by
the commute trip reduction board.
(9) Any waivers or modifications of the requirements of a commute
trip reduction plan granted by a jurisdiction shall be submitted for
review to the commute trip reduction board established under RCW
70.94.537. The commute trip reduction board may not deny the granting
of a waiver or modification of the requirements of a commute trip
reduction plan by a jurisdiction but they may notify the jurisdiction
of any comments or objections.
(10) Plans implemented under this section shall not apply to
commute trips for seasonal agricultural employees.
(11) Plans implemented under this section shall not apply to
construction worksites when the expected duration of the construction
project is less than two years.
(12) If an affected urban growth area has not previously
implemented a commute trip reduction program and the state has funded
solutions to state highway deficiencies to address the area's exceeding
the person hours of delay threshold, the affected urban growth area
shall be exempt from the duties of this section for a period not
exceeding two years.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.94.528 and 2006 c 329 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county, city, or town may, as part of its commute trip
reduction plan, designate existing activity centers listed in its
comprehensive plan or new activity centers as growth and transportation
efficiency centers and establish a transportation demand management
program in the designated area.
(a) The transportation demand management program for the growth and
transportation efficiency center shall be developed in consultation
with local transit agencies, the applicable regional transportation
planning organization, major employers, public institutions that are a
major worksite with students, and other interested parties. If a plan
has already been developed prior to the inclusion of public
institutions of higher education, then the plan must be modified to
include the public institutions. Further, the public institutions are
to be consulted in regards to such plan modifications.
(b) In order to be eligible for state funding provided for the
purposes of this section, designated growth and transportation
efficiency centers shall be certified by the applicable regional
transportation organization to: (i) Meet the minimum land use and
transportation criteria established in collaboration among local
jurisdictions, transit agencies, the regional transportation planning
organization, and other interested parties as part of the regional
commute trip reduction plan; and (ii) have established a transportation
demand management program that includes the elements identified in (c)
of this subsection and is consistent with the rules established by the
department of transportation in RCW 70.94.537(2). If a designated
growth and transportation efficiency center is denied certification,
the local jurisdiction may appeal the decision to the commute trip
reduction board.
(c) Transportation demand management programs for growth and
transportation efficiency centers shall include, but are not limited
to: (i) Goals for reductions in the proportion of single-occupant
vehicle trips that are more aggressive than the state program goal
established by the commute trip reduction board; (ii) a sustainable
financial plan demonstrating how the program can be implemented to meet
state and regional trip reduction goals, indicating resources from
public and private sources that are reasonably expected to be made
available to carry out the plan, and recommending any innovative
financing techniques consistent with chapter 47.29 RCW, including
public/private partnerships, to finance needed facilities, services,
and programs; (iii) a proposed organizational structure for
implementing the program; (iv) a proposal to measure performance toward
the goal and implementation progress; and (v) an evaluation to which
local land use and transportation policies apply, including parking
policies and ordinances, to determine the extent that they complement
and support the trip reduction investments of major employers and
public institutions. Each of these program elements shall be
consistent with the rules established under RCW 70.94.537.
(d) A designated growth and transportation efficiency center shall
be consistent with the land use and transportation elements of the
local comprehensive plan.
(e) Transit agencies, local governments, and regional
transportation planning organizations shall identify certified growth
and transportation efficiency centers as priority areas for new service
and facility investments in their respective investment plans.
(2) A county, city, or town that has established a growth and
transportation efficiency center program shall support vehicle trip
reduction activities in the designated area. The implementing
jurisdiction shall adopt policies, ordinances, and funding strategies
that will lead to attainment of program goals in those areas.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.94.531 and 2006 c 329 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) State agency worksites are subject to the same requirements
under this section and RCW 70.94.534 as private employers.
(2) Not more than ninety days after the adoption of a
jurisdiction's commute trip reduction plan, each major employer in that
jurisdiction shall perform a baseline measurement consistent with the
rules established by the department of transportation under RCW
70.94.537. A public institution must also perform a baseline
measurement along with the following requirements of this subsection
ninety days after a plan which includes provisions for public
institutions is adopted or ninety days after a plan has been initially
modified to include the public institution. Not more than ninety days
after receiving the results of the baseline measurement, each major
employer and public institution shall develop a commute trip reduction
program and shall submit a description of that program to the
jurisdiction for review. The program shall be implemented not more
than ninety days after approval by the jurisdiction.
(3) A commute trip reduction program of a major employer and public
institution shall consist of, at a minimum (a) designation of a
transportation coordinator and the display of the name, location, and
telephone number of the coordinator in a prominent manner at each
affected worksite; (b) regular distribution of information to employees
regarding alternatives to single-occupant vehicle commuting; (c) a
regular review of employee commuting and reporting of progress toward
meeting the single-occupant vehicle reduction goals to the county,
city, or town consistent with the method established in the commute
trip reduction plan and the rules established by the department of
transportation under RCW 70.94.537; and (d) implementation of a set of
measures designed to achieve the applicable commute trip reduction
goals adopted by the jurisdiction. Such measures may include but are
not limited to:
(i) Provision of preferential parking or reduced parking charges,
or both, for high occupancy vehicles;
(ii) Instituting or increasing parking charges for single-occupant
vehicles;
(iii) Provision of commuter ride matching services to facilitate
employee ridesharing for commute trips;
(iv) Provision of subsidies for transit fares;
(v) Provision of vans for van pools;
(vi) Provision of subsidies for car pooling or van pooling;
(vii) Permitting the use of the employer's or public institution's
vehicles for car pooling or van pooling;
(viii) Permitting flexible work schedules to facilitate employees'
use of transit, car pools, or van pools;
(ix) Cooperation with transportation providers to provide
additional regular or express service to the worksite;
(x) Construction of special loading and unloading facilities for
transit, car pool, and van pool users;
(xi) Provision of bicycle parking facilities, lockers, changing
areas, and showers for employees who bicycle or walk to work;
(xii) Provision of a program of parking incentives such as a rebate
for employees who do not use the parking facility;
(xiii) Establishment of a program to permit employees to work part
or full time at home or at an alternative worksite closer to their
homes;
(xiv) Establishment of a program of alternative work schedules such
as compressed work week schedules which reduce commuting; ((and))
(xv) Implementation of other measures designed to facilitate the
use of high-occupancy vehicles such as on-site day care facilities and
emergency taxi services;
(xvi) Establishment of a program to permit students to participate
in courses at home or at an alternative worksite closer to their homes;
and
(xvii) Establishment of a program of alternative course schedules,
which reduce commuting.
(4) Employers or owners of worksites may form or utilize existing
transportation management associations or other transportation-related
associations authorized by RCW 35.87A.010 to assist members in
developing and implementing commute trip reduction programs.
(5) Employers and public institutions shall make a good faith
effort towards achievement of the goals identified in RCW
70.94.527(4)(d).

Sec. 6 RCW 70.94.534 and 2006 c 329 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each jurisdiction implementing a commute trip reduction plan
under this chapter or as part of a plan or ordinance developed under
RCW 36.70A.070 shall review each employer's and public institution's
initial commute trip reduction program to determine if the program is
likely to meet the applicable commute trip reduction goals. The
employer and public institution shall be notified by the jurisdiction
of its findings. If the jurisdiction finds that the program is not
likely to meet the applicable commute trip reduction goals, the
jurisdiction will work with the employer and public institution to
modify the program as necessary. The jurisdiction shall complete
review of each employer's and public institution's initial commute trip
reduction program within ninety days of receipt.
(2) Employers and public institutions implementing commute trip
reduction programs for employees or students are expected to undertake
good faith efforts to achieve the goals outlined in RCW 70.94.527(4).
Employers and public institutions are considered to be making a good
faith effort if the following conditions have been met:
(a) The employer ((has)) and public institution have met the
minimum requirements identified in RCW 70.94.531;
(b) The employer ((has)) and public institution have notified the
jurisdiction of its intent to substantially change or modify its
program and ((has)) have either received the approval of the
jurisdiction to do so or ((has)) have acknowledged that its program may
not be approved without additional modifications;
(c) The employer ((has)) and public institution have provided
adequate information and documentation of implementation when requested
by the jurisdiction; and
(d) The employer ((is)) and public institution are each working
collaboratively with ((its)) their jurisdiction to continue ((its))
their existing programs or ((is)) are developing and implementing
program modifications likely to result in improvements to ((the)) their
respective programs over an agreed upon length of time.
(3) Each jurisdiction shall review at least once every two years
each employer's and public institution's progress and good faith
efforts toward meeting the applicable commute trip reduction goals for
the employer's employees and the public institution's students. If an
employer or a public institution makes a good faith effort, as defined
in this section, but is not likely to meet the applicable commute trip
reduction goals, the jurisdiction shall work collaboratively with the
employer and collaboratively with the public institution to make
modifications to the commute trip reduction programs. Failure of an
employer or public institution to reach the applicable commute trip
reduction goals is not a violation of this chapter.
(4) If an employer or a public institution fails to make a good
faith effort and fails to meet the applicable commute trip reduction
goals, the jurisdiction shall work collaboratively with the employer
and collaboratively with the public institution to propose
modifications to the program and shall direct the employer or public
institution to revise its program within thirty days to incorporate
those modifications or modifications which the jurisdiction determines
to be equivalent.
(5) Each jurisdiction implementing a commute trip reduction plan
pursuant to this chapter may impose civil penalties, in the manner
provided in chapter 7.80 RCW, for failure by an employer or public
institution to implement a commute trip reduction program or to modify
its commute trip reduction program as required in subsection (4) of
this section. ((No)) A major employer or public institution may not be
held liable for civil penalties for failure to reach the applicable
commute trip reduction goals. No major employer shall be liable for
civil penalties under this chapter if failure to achieve a commute trip
reduction program goal was the result of an inability to reach
agreement with a certified collective bargaining agent under applicable
laws where the issue was raised by the employer and pursued in good
faith.
(6) Jurisdictions shall notify major employers and public
institutions of the procedures for applying for goal modification or
exemption from the commute trip reduction requirements based on the
guidelines established by the commute trip reduction board authorized
under RCW 70.94.537.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.94.537 and 2006 c 329 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((A sixteen)) An eighteen member state commute trip reduction
board is established as follows:
(a) The secretary of the department of transportation or the
secretary's designee who shall serve as chair;
(b) One representative from the office of the governor or the
governor's designee;
(c) The director or the director's designee of one of the following
agencies, to be determined by the governor:
(i) Department of general administration;
(ii) Department of ecology;
(iii) Department of community, trade, and economic development;
(d) Three representatives from cities and towns or counties
appointed by the governor for staggered four-year terms from a list
recommended by the association of Washington cities or the Washington
state association of counties;
(e) Two representatives from transit agencies appointed by the
governor for staggered four-year terms from a list recommended by the
Washington state transit association;
(f) Two representatives from participating regional transportation
planning organizations appointed by the governor for staggered four-year terms;
(g) Four representatives of employers at or owners of major
worksites in Washington, or transportation management associations,
business improvement areas, or other transportation organizations
representing employers, appointed by the governor for staggered four-year terms; ((and))
(h) Two citizens appointed by the governor for staggered four-year
terms; and
(i) Two representatives of public institutions of higher education
appointed by the governor for staggered four-year terms.
Members of the commute trip reduction board shall serve without
compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Members appointed by the governor shall
be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.220. The board has all
powers necessary to carry out its duties as prescribed by this chapter.
(2) By March 1, 2007, the department of transportation shall
establish rules for commute trip reduction plans and implementation
procedures. The commute trip reduction board shall advise the
department on the content of the rules. The rules are intended to
ensure consistency in commute trip reduction plans and goals among
jurisdictions while fairly taking into account differences in
employment and housing density, employer size, public institution size,
existing and anticipated levels of transit service, special employer or
public institution circumstances, and other factors the board
determines to be relevant. The rules shall include:
(a) Guidance criteria for growth and transportation efficiency
centers;
(b) Data measurement methods and procedures for determining the
efficacy of commute trip reduction activities and progress toward
meeting commute trip reduction plan goals;
(c) Model commute trip reduction ordinances;
(d) Methods for assuring consistency in the treatment of: (i)
Employers who have worksites subject to the requirements of this
chapter in more than one jurisdiction or (ii) public institutions that
have campus locations in more than one jurisdiction;
(e) An appeals process by which major employers or public
institutions, who as a result of special characteristics of their
business or its locations would be unable to meet the requirements of
a commute trip reduction plan, may obtain a waiver or modification of
those requirements and criteria for determining eligibility for waiver
or modification;
(f) Establishment of a process for determining the state's affected
areas, including criteria and procedures for regional transportation
planning organizations in consultation with local jurisdictions to
propose to add or exempt urban growth areas;
(g) Listing of the affected areas of the program to be done every
four years as identified in subsection (5) of this section;
(h) Establishment of a criteria and application process to
determine whether jurisdictions that voluntarily implement commute trip
reduction are eligible for state funding;
(i) Guidelines and deadlines for creating and updating local
commute trip reduction plans, including guidance to ensure consistency
between the local commute trip reduction plan and the transportation
demand management strategies identified in the transportation element
in the local comprehensive plan, as required by RCW 36.70A.070;
(j) Guidelines for creating and updating regional commute trip
reduction plans, including guidance to ensure the regional commute trip
reduction plan is consistent with and incorporated into transportation
demand management components in the regional transportation plan;
(k) Methods for regional transportation planning organizations to
evaluate and certify that designated growth and transportation
efficiency center programs meet the minimum requirements and are
eligible for funding;
(l) Guidelines for creating and updating growth and transportation
efficiency center programs; and
(m) Establishment of statewide program goals. The goals shall be
designed to achieve substantial reductions in the proportion of
single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip vehicle
miles traveled per employee, at a level that is projected to improve
the mobility of people and goods by increasing the efficiency of the
state highway system.
(3) The board shall create a state commute trip reduction plan that
shall be updated every four years as discussed in subsection (5) of
this section. The state commute trip reduction plan shall include, but
is not limited to: (a) Statewide commute trip reduction program goals
that are designed to substantially improve the mobility of people and
goods; (b) identification of strategies at the state and regional
levels to achieve the goals and recommendations for how transportation
demand management strategies can be targeted most effectively to
support commute trip reduction program goals; (c) performance measures
for assessing the cost-effectiveness of commute trip reduction
strategies and the benefits for the state transportation system; and
(d) a sustainable financial plan. The board shall review and approve
regional commute trip reduction plans, and work collaboratively with
regional transportation planning organizations in the establishment of
the state commute trip reduction plan.
(4) The board shall work with affected jurisdictions, major
employers, public institutions, and other parties to develop and
implement a public awareness campaign designed to increase the
effectiveness of local commute trip reduction programs and support
achievement of the objectives identified in this chapter.
(5) The board shall evaluate and update the commute trip reduction
program plan and recommend changes to the rules every four years, with
the first assessment report due July 1, 2011, to ensure that the latest
data methodology used by the department of transportation is
incorporated into the program and to determine which areas of the state
should be affected by the program. The board shall review the
definitions of a major employer and public institution no later than
December 1, 2009. The board shall regularly identify urban growth
areas that are projected to be affected by chapter 329, Laws of 2006 in
the next four-year period and may provide advance planning support to
the potentially affected jurisdictions.
(6) The board shall review progress toward implementing commute
trip reduction plans and programs and the costs and benefits of commute
trip reduction plans and programs and shall make recommendations to the
legislature and the governor by December 1, 2009, and every two years
thereafter. In assessing the costs and benefits, the board shall
consider the costs of not having implemented commute trip reduction
plans and programs ((with the assistance of the transportation
performance audit board authorized under chapter 44.75 RCW)). The
board shall examine other transportation demand management programs
nationally and incorporate its findings into its recommendations to the
legislature. The recommendations shall address the need for
continuation, modification, or termination or any or all requirements
of this chapter.
(7) The board shall invite personnel with appropriate expertise
from state, regional, and local government, private, public, and
nonprofit providers of transportation services, representatives from
public institutions, and employers or owners of major worksites in
Washington to act as a technical advisory group. The technical
advisory group shall advise the board on the implementation of local
and regional commute trip reduction plans and programs, program
evaluation, program funding allocations, and state rules and
guidelines.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.94.541 and 2006 c 329 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of transportation shall provide staff support to
the commute trip reduction board in carrying out the requirements of
RCW 70.94.537.
(2) The department of transportation shall provide technical
assistance to regional transportation planning organizations, counties,
cities, and towns, the department of general administration, other
state agencies, and other employers, as well as public institutions, in
developing and implementing commute trip reduction plans and programs
for employees or students. The technical assistance shall include:
(a) Guidance in single measurement methodology and practice to be used
in determining progress in attaining plan goals; (b) developing model
plans and programs appropriate to different situations; and (c)
providing consistent training and informational materials for the
implementation of commute trip reduction programs. Model plans and
programs, training, and informational materials shall be developed in
cooperation with representatives of regional transportation planning
organizations, local governments, transit agencies, ((and)) employers,
and public institutions developing commuter programs for students.
(3) In carrying out this section the department of transportation
may contract with statewide associations representing cities, towns,
and counties to assist cities, towns, and counties in implementing
commute trip reduction plans and programs.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.94.547 and 2006 c 329 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby recognizes the state's crucial leadership
role in establishing and implementing effective commute trip reduction
programs. Therefore, it is the policy of the state that the department
of general administration and other state agencies, including
institutions of higher education, shall aggressively develop
substantive programs to reduce commute trips by state employees.
Further, it is the policy of the state that public institutions of
higher education develop commute trip reduction programs not only for
their employee's, but also their students. Implementation of these
programs will reduce energy consumption, congestion in urban areas, and
air and water pollution associated with automobile travel.

Sec. 10 RCW 70.94.551 and 2006 c 329 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director of the department of general administration may
coordinate an interagency board for the purpose of developing policies
or guidelines that promote consistency among state agency commute trip
reduction programs required by RCW 70.94.527 and 70.94.531. The board
shall include representatives of the departments of transportation,
ecology, and community, trade, and economic development and such other
departments and interested groups as the director of the department of
general administration determines to be necessary. Policies and
guidelines shall be applicable to all state agencies including but not
limited to policies and guidelines regarding parking and parking
charges, employee and student incentives for commuting by other than
single-occupant automobiles, flexible and alternative work schedules,
alternative worksites, and the use of state-owned vehicles for car and
van pools and guaranteed rides home. The policies and guidelines shall
also consider the costs and benefits to state agencies of achieving
commute trip reductions and consider mechanisms for funding state
agency commute trip reduction programs.
(2) State agencies sharing a common location in affected urban
growth areas where the total number of state employees is one hundred
or more shall, with assistance from the department of general
administration, develop and implement a joint commute trip reduction
program. The worksite shall be treated as specified in RCW 70.94.531
and 70.94.534.
(3) The department of general administration shall review the
initial commute trip reduction program of each state agency subject to
the commute trip reduction plan for state agencies to determine if the
program is likely to meet the applicable commute trip reduction goals
and notify the agency of any deficiencies. If it is found that the
program is not likely to meet the applicable commute trip reduction
goals, the department of general administration will work with the
agency to modify the program as necessary.
(4) Each state agency implementing a commute trip reduction plan
shall report at least once per year to its agency director on the
performance of the agency's commute trip reduction program as part of
the agency's quality management, accountability, and performance system
as defined by RCW 43.17.385. The reports shall assess the performance
of the program, progress toward state goals established under RCW
70.94.537, and recommendations for improving the program.
(5) The department of general administration shall review the
agency performance reports defined in subsection (4) of this section
and submit a biennial report for state agencies subject to this chapter
to the governor and incorporate the report in the commute trip
reduction board report to the legislature as directed in RCW
70.94.537(6). The report shall include, but is not limited to, an
evaluation of the most recent measurement results, progress toward
state goals established under RCW 70.94.537, and recommendations for
improving the performance of state agency commute trip reduction
programs. The information shall be reported in a form established by
the commute trip reduction board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
Each public institution of higher education must maintain at least
one full-time equivalent employee for the purpose of managing the
public institution's commute trip reduction program to ensure that the
program is offered to students in addition to employees, as required
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The sum of thirty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to each public
institution of higher education, as defined in this act, for the
purposes of section 11 of this act.

--- END ---