BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Manufacturers of proprietary treatment products that use soil-based denitrification processes in the drain fields of on-site sewage
disposal systems are exempted from registering such proprietary
treatment products with the department only if the following conditions
are met:
(a) The proprietary treatment product must conform to the universal
plumbing code;
(b) Any biological component used in the proprietary treatment
product must meet the conditions of RCW 70.118.060 relating to additive
regulation;
(c) For purposes of product testing, sampling for total nitrogen
discharge to the soil is drawn using a soil vacuum lysimeter or by
other means approved by the department;
(d) The results of product testing in the soil surrounding the
drain field test sites must be at or below ten parts per million of
total nitrogen;
(e) Testing data is submitted to the department for review and
approval or denial; and
(f) The proprietary treatment product is installed into a septic
system with a preexisting on-site permit.
(2) The department must review the testing data submitted under
subsection (1)(e) of this section and approve or deny the soil-based
denitrification process within thirty days of submittal date. If the
department does not approve the process, the department must issue an
explanation citing specific reasons for the lack of approval.
(3) The department shall not charge application fees in excess of
the rate for comparable applications for the in-tank denitrification
processes.
(4) The department shall keep and maintain a list of proprietary
treatment products for use in soil-based denitrification processes that
have been approved under the conditions of subsection (1)(a) through
(f) of this section.
(5) This section applies only to proprietary treatment products
that reduce nitrogen in soil-based proprietary treatment processes.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to add any conditions
to the rules of the department related to certifying and registering
denitrification processes in the tank of on-site sewage disposal
systems.

--- END ---