BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "General authority Washington peace officer" means an officer
authorized to enforce the criminal and traffic laws of the state of
Washington generally.
(2) "Tribal law enforcement officer" means a person:
(a) Who is a duly commissioned officer of the police or public
safety department of any Washington Indian nation or tribe; or
(b) Who is a law enforcement officer employed by the United States
bureau of Indian affairs and is assigned in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) All tribal law enforcement officers
commissioned under subsection (2) of this section shall be recognized
and authorized to act as general authority Washington peace officers.
A tribal law enforcement officer recognized and authorized to act as a
general authority Washington peace officer under this section has the
same powers as any other general authority Washington peace officer to
enforce state laws in Washington, including the power to make arrests
for violations of state laws.
(2) The chief of the Washington state patrol may issue a tribal law
enforcement officer a commission to act as a general authority
Washington peace officer under this section. The procedures to be
followed in the issuance and revocation of commissions granted under
this section and the respective rights and responsibilities of the
departments shall be set forth in a written agreement to be executed
between the chief of the Washington state patrol and the Indian nation
or tribe or the appropriate federal official.
(3) An agreement executed under subsection (2) of this section
shall contain the following conditions:
(a) The Indian nation or tribe, but not the United States bureau of
Indian affairs, shall submit proof of adequate public liability and
property damage insurance for vehicles operated by the peace officers
and police professional liability insurance from a company licensed to
sell insurance in the state;
(b) Each applicant for a commission shall successfully complete
seven hundred twenty hours of basic law enforcement training that is
approved by the executive director of the Washington state criminal
justice training commission;
(c) The chief of the Washington state patrol has the authority to
suspend any commission granted under subsection (2) of this section for
reasons solely within his or her discretion;
(d) If any provision of the agreement is violated by the Indian
nation or tribe or the United States bureau of Indian affairs, or any
agent of the Indian nation or tribe or the United States bureau of
Indian affairs, the chief of the Washington state patrol shall suspend
the agreement on five days' notice, which suspension shall last until
the chief is satisfied that the violation has been corrected and will
not recur;
(e) A copy of any citation issued pursuant to a commission
authorized by this section shall be submitted within five days to the
chief of the Washington state patrol;
(f) Any citation issued pursuant to a commission authorized by this
section shall be to a Washington court, except that any citation issued
to Indians within the exterior boundaries of an Indian reservation may
be cited to a tribal court;
(g) The agreement, or any commission issued pursuant to the
agreement, shall not confer any authority on a tribal court or other
tribal authority that the court or authority would not otherwise
possess;
(h) The authority granted by any agreement entered into under this
section shall be coextensive with the exterior boundaries of the
reservation, except that an officer commissioned under this section may
proceed in fresh pursuit of an offender beyond the exterior boundaries
of the reservation;
(i) The chief of the Washington state patrol, or his or her
designee, and the Indian nation or tribe or the appropriate federal
official is required to meet at least annually at the call of the chief
of the Washington state patrol to discuss the status of the agreement
and invite other law enforcement officials or other officials to attend
as necessary.
(4) For purposes of civil liability, a tribal officer exercising
general authority law enforcement power granted under this chapter
shall be considered an employee of the jurisdiction that commissioned
the officer while he or she is exercising the power. The jurisdiction
that commissioned the officer shall be civilly liable for any tortious
acts or omissions committed by a tribal law enforcement officer while
exercising the general authority law enforcement power granted under
this chapter to the same extent as if the tribal law enforcement
officer was an employee of the jurisdiction that commissioned the
officer.
(5) Nothing in this section impairs or affects the existing status
and sovereignty of an Indian nation or tribe as established under the
laws of the United States.
(6) Nothing in this section limits, impairs, or nullifies the
authority of a county sheriff to appoint duly commissioned state or
federally certified tribal law enforcement officers as deputy sheriffs
authorized to enforce the criminal and traffic laws of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 10 RCW.

--- END ---