BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
establish reasonable guidelines for the collection of signatures for
initiative petitions by paid signature-gatherers. The initiative
petition process is a tool of the people and has a particular role in
a representative democracy. Because the debate, deliberation, and
compromise that underpin the democratic legislative process are absent
from the initiative process, it is necessary to take measures to
protect the voters of this state from fraud, misrepresentation, and
undue influence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Paid signature-gatherer" means a person who is compensated
through payments of money, either as an employee or independent
contractor, to obtain signatures on a petition.
(3) "Petition" means an initiative, referendum, or recall petition
that calls for the enactment, repeal, or recall of state or local
legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 All businesses operating in this state
engaged in the activity of collecting signatures for initiative
petitions and that are using paid signature-gatherers must apply to the
department for a license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) All businesses operating in this state
engaged in the activity of collecting signatures for initiative
petitions and that are using paid signature-gatherers must apply to the
department for a permit for every individual signature-gatherer in its
employ.
(2) The application must demonstrate that the employees for whom
the permit is being requested have been through training on the laws
and rules governing the petition process.
(3) Training must be conducted in consultation with the secretary
of state.
(4) A permit is valid for only one petition. In the event an
individual is gathering signatures for more than one petition, a permit
is required for each petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A petition may not be distributed by a
paid signature-gatherer unless that person has displayed on his or her
person, or on the petition clipboard, the permit for distributing that
petition.
(2) A permitted paid signature-gatherer who submits fraudulent
signatures: (a) Will have his or her permit or permits revoked; and
(b) is prohibited from obtaining future permits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Nothing in this chapter may be construed to
limit the application of any other statute or rule that applies to
petitions or petition gatherers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department is directed to adopt rules to
implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---