BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a license to be designated as a spirits, beer,
and wine nightlife license. This license allows the holder to sell
spirituous liquor by the drink, beer, and wine at retail, for
consumption upon the licensed premises.
(2) This license may be issued only to persons whose business
includes the sale and service of alcohol to its customers, has food
sales and service incidental to the sale and service of alcohol, and
has the following characteristics:
(a) The primary business hours are between nine o'clock in the
evening and two o'clock in the morning; and
(b) The occupancy load of the business premises is greater than the
seating provided.
(3) A licensee must maintain minimum food service as determined by
the board at all times when alcohol is available.
(4) Minors may be allowed on the licensed premises but only in the
areas where no alcohol is served.
(5) The annual fee for this license is two thousand dollars. This
fee amount may be reviewed periodically by the board and adjusted to
reflect a change in the amount of resources necessary to regulate and
enforce this license type.
(6) The board shall refuse a spirits, beer, and wine nightlife
license to any applicant if the board determines that the spirits,
beer, and wine nightlife licenses already granted for the particular
locality are adequate for the reasonable needs of the community.
(7) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.010 and 2006 c 359 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, and
the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license.
(2) For the purpose of considering any application for a license,
the board may cause an inspection of the premises to be made, and may
inquire into all matters in connection with the construction and
operation of the premises. For the purpose of reviewing any
application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension or
revocation of any license, the liquor control board may consider any
prior criminal conduct of the applicant including a criminal history
record information check. The board may submit the criminal history
record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the
identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order
that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and
convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms.
The board shall require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal
history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of
investigation. The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW
shall not apply to such cases. The board may, in its discretion, grant
or refuse the license applied for. Authority to approve an uncontested
or unopposed license may be granted by the board to any staff member
the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting such
authority shall be adopted by rule. No retail license of any kind may
be issued to:
(a) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not
resided in the state for at least one month prior to receiving a
license, except in cases of licenses issued to dining places on
railroads, boats, or aircraft;
(b) A copartnership, unless all of the members thereof are
qualified to obtain a license, as provided in this section;
(c) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or
agent, unless such manager or agent possesses the same qualifications
required of the licensee;
(d) A corporation or a limited liability company, unless it was
created under the laws of the state of Washington or holds a
certificate of authority to transact business in the state of
Washington.
(3)(a) The board may, in its discretion, subject to the provisions
of RCW 66.08.150, suspend or cancel any license; and all rights of the
licensee to keep or sell liquor thereunder shall be suspended or
terminated, as the case may be.
(b) The board shall immediately suspend the license or certificate
of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the
department of social and health services as a person who is not in
compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet
all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension,
reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the
board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and
health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the
order.
(c) The board may request the appointment of administrative law
judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who shall have power to administer
oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the
production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony,
examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry,
investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under
such rules and regulations as the board may adopt.
(d) Witnesses shall be allowed fees and mileage each way to and
from any such inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the
rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446((, as now or hereafter amended)).
Fees need not be paid in advance of appearance of witnesses to testify
or to produce books, records, or other legal evidence.
(e) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order
of the board or a subpoena issued by the board, or any of its members,
or administrative law judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify
to any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated,
the judge of the superior court of the county in which the person
resides, on application of any member of the board or administrative
law judge, shall compel obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the
case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said
court or a refusal to testify therein.
(4) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a
license, the licensee shall forthwith deliver up the license to the
board. Where the license has been suspended only, the board shall
return the license to the licensee at the expiration or termination of
the period of suspension. The board shall notify all vendors in the
city or place where the licensee has its premises of the suspension or
cancellation of the license; and no employee may allow or cause any
liquor to be delivered to or for any person at the premises of that
licensee.
(5)(a) At the time of the original issuance of a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license, the board shall prorate the license fee
charged to the new licensee according to the number of calendar
quarters, or portion thereof, remaining until the first renewal of that
license is required.
(b) Unless sooner canceled, every license issued by the board shall
expire at midnight of the thirtieth day of June of the fiscal year for
which it was issued. However, if the board deems it feasible and
desirable to do so, it may establish, by rule pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, a system for staggering the annual renewal dates for any and all
licenses authorized by this chapter. If such a system of staggered
annual renewal dates is established by the board, the license fees
provided by this chapter shall be appropriately prorated during the
first year that the system is in effect.
(6) Every license issued under this section shall be subject to all
conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by rules adopted
by the board. All conditions and restrictions imposed by the board in
the issuance of an individual license shall be listed on the face of
the individual license along with the trade name, address, and
expiration date.
(7) Every licensee shall post and keep posted its license, or
licenses, in a conspicuous place on the premises.
(8)(a) Unless (b) of this subsection applies, before the board
issues a license to an applicant it shall give notice of such
application to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or
town, if the application is for a license within an incorporated city
or town, or to the county legislative authority, if the application is
for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.
(b) If the application for a special occasion license is for an
event held during a county, district, or area fair as defined by RCW
15.76.120, and the county, district, or area fair is located on
property owned by the county but located within an incorporated city or
town, the county legislative authority shall be the entity notified by
the board under (a) of this subsection. The board shall send a
duplicate notice to the incorporated city or town within which the fair
is located.
(c) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee
selected by it, or the county legislative authority or the official or
employee selected by it, shall have the right to file with the board
within twenty days after date of transmittal of such notice, written
objections against the applicant or against the premises for which the
license is asked. The board may extend the time period for submitting
written objections.
(d) The written objections shall include a statement of all facts
upon which such objections are based, and in case written objections
are filed, may request and the liquor control board may in its
discretion hold a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title
34 RCW.
(e) Upon the granting of a license under this title the board shall
send written notification to the chief executive officer of the
incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to the
county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the
boundaries of incorporated cities or towns. When the license is for a
special occasion license for an event held during a county, district,
or area fair as defined by RCW 15.76.120, and the county, district, or
area fair is located on county-owned property but located within an
incorporated city or town, the written notification shall be sent to
both the incorporated city or town and the county legislative
authority.
(9)(a) Before the board issues any license to any applicant, it
shall give (i) due consideration to the location of the business to be
conducted under such license with respect to the proximity of churches,
schools, and public institutions and (ii) written notice, with receipt
verification, of the application to public institutions identified by
the board as appropriate to receive such notice, churches, and schools
within five hundred feet of the premises to be licensed. The board
shall issue no ((beer retailer)) liquor license for either on-premises
or off-premises consumption ((or wine retailer license for either on-premises or off-premises consumption or spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant license)) covering any premises not now licensed, if such
premises ((are)) is within five hundred feet of the premises of any
tax-supported public elementary or secondary school measured along the
most direct route over or across established public walks, streets, or
other public passageway from the main entrance of the school to the
nearest public entrance of the premises proposed for license, and if,
after receipt by the school of the notice as provided in this
subsection, the board receives written objection, within twenty days
after receiving such notice, from an official representative or
representatives of the school within five hundred feet of said proposed
licensed premises, indicating to the board that there is an objection
to the issuance of such license because of proximity to a school. The
board may extend the time period for submitting objections. For the
purpose of this section, church shall mean a building erected for and
used exclusively for religious worship and schooling or other activity
in connection therewith. ((For the purpose of this section, public
institution shall mean institutions of higher education, parks,
community centers, libraries, and transit centers.))
(b) No liquor license may be issued or reissued by the board to any
motor sports facility or licensee operating within the motor sports
facility unless the motor sports facility enforces a program reasonably
calculated to prevent alcohol or alcoholic beverages not purchased
within the facility from entering the facility and such program is
approved by local law enforcement agencies.
(c) It is the intent under this subsection (9) that a retail
license shall not be issued by the board where doing so would, in the
judgment of the board, adversely affect a private school meeting the
requirements for private schools under Title 28A RCW, which school is
within five hundred feet of the proposed licensee. The board shall
fully consider and give substantial weight to objections filed by
private schools. If a license is issued despite the proximity of a
private school, the board shall state in a letter addressed to the
private school the board's reasons for issuing the license.
(10) The restrictions set forth in subsection (9) of this section
shall not prohibit the board from authorizing the assumption of
existing licenses now located within the restricted area by other
persons or licenses or relocations of existing licensed premises within
the restricted area. In no case may the licensed premises be moved
closer to a church or school than it was before the assumption or
relocation.
(11)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the board, in its
discretion, from issuing a temporary retail or distributor license to
an applicant to operate the retail or distributor premises during the
period the application for the license is pending. The board may
establish a fee for a temporary license by rule.
(b) A temporary license issued by the board under this section
shall be for a period not to exceed sixty days. A temporary license
may be extended at the discretion of the board for additional periods
of sixty days upon payment of an additional fee and upon compliance
with all conditions required in this section.
(c) Refusal by the board to issue or extend a temporary license
shall not entitle the applicant to request a hearing. A temporary
license may be canceled or suspended summarily at any time if the board
determines that good cause for cancellation or suspension exists. RCW
66.08.130 applies to temporary licenses.
(d) Application for a temporary license shall be on such form as
the board shall prescribe. If an application for a temporary license
is withdrawn before issuance or is refused by the board, the fee which
accompanied such application shall be refunded in full.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.24.440 and 1998 c 126 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each spirits, beer, and wine restaurant, spirits, beer, and wine
private club, spirits, beer, and wine nightlife, and sports
entertainment facility licensee shall be entitled to purchase any
spirituous liquor items salable under such license from the board at a
discount of not less than fifteen percent from the retail price fixed
by the board, together with all taxes.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.08.180 and 2000 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 66.24.290(1), moneys in the liquor
revolving fund shall be distributed by the board at least once every
three months in accordance with RCW 66.08.190, 66.08.200 and 66.08.210:
PROVIDED, That the board shall reserve from distribution such amount
not exceeding five hundred thousand dollars as may be necessary for the
proper administration of this title.
(1) All license fees, penalties and forfeitures derived under
chapter 13, Laws of 1935 from spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
licenses; spirits, beer, and wine private club((;)) licenses; spirits,
beer, and wine nightlife licenses; and sports entertainment facility
licenses ((or spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and
wine private club; and sports entertainment facility licensees)) shall
every three months be disbursed by the board as follows:
(a) Three hundred thousand dollars per biennium, to the death
investigations account for the state toxicology program pursuant to RCW
68.50.107; and
(b) Of the remaining funds:
(i) 6.06 percent to the University of Washington and 4.04 percent
to Washington State University for alcoholism and drug abuse research
and for the dissemination of such research; and
(ii) 89.9 percent to the general fund to be used by the department
of social and health services solely to carry out the purposes of RCW
70.96A.050;
(2) The first fifty-five dollars per license fee provided in RCW
66.24.320 and 66.24.330 up to a maximum of one hundred fifty thousand
dollars annually shall be disbursed every three months by the board to
the general fund to be used for juvenile alcohol and drug prevention
programs for kindergarten through third grade to be administered by the
superintendent of public instruction;
(3) Twenty percent of the remaining total amount derived from
license fees pursuant to RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, and
66.24.360, shall be transferred to the general fund to be used by the
department of social and health services solely to carry out the
purposes of RCW 70.96A.050; and
(4) One-fourth cent per liter of the tax imposed by RCW 66.24.210
shall every three months be disbursed by the board to Washington State
University solely for wine and wine grape research, extension programs
related to wine and wine grape research, and resident instruction in
both wine grape production and the processing aspects of the wine
industry in accordance with RCW 28B.30.068. The director of financial
management shall prescribe suitable accounting procedures to ensure
that the funds transferred to the general fund to be used by the
department of social and health services and appropriated are
separately accounted for.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.08.220 and 1999 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall set aside in a separate account in the liquor
revolving fund an amount equal to ten percent of its gross sales of
liquor to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine
private club; spirits, beer, and wine nightlife; and sports
entertainment facility licensees collected from these licensees
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 82.08.150, less the fifteen percent
discount provided for in RCW 66.24.440; and the moneys in said separate
account shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of RCW
66.08.190, 66.08.200 and 66.08.210: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no
election unit in which the sale of liquor under spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; spirits, beer, and
wine nightlife; and sports entertainment facility licenses is unlawful
shall be entitled to share in the distribution of moneys from such
separate account.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.20.310 and 1997 c 321 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) There shall be an alcohol server permit, known as a class 12
permit, for a manager or bartender selling or mixing alcohol, spirits,
wines, or beer for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility.
(b) There shall be an alcohol server permit, known as a class 13
permit, for a person who only serves alcohol, spirits, wines, or beer
for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility.
(c) As provided by rule by the board, a class 13 permit holder may
be allowed to act as a bartender without holding a class 12 permit.
(2)(a) Effective January 1, 1997, except as provided in (d) of this
subsection, every person employed, under contract or otherwise, by an
annual retail liquor licensee holding a license as authorized by RCW
66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, 66.24.400, 66.24.425, 66.24.450,
section 1 of this act, or 66.24.570, who as part of his or her
employment participates in any manner in the sale or service of
alcoholic beverages shall have issued to them a class 12 or class 13
permit.
(b) Every class 12 and class 13 permit issued shall be issued in
the name of the applicant and no other person may use the permit of
another permit holder. The holder shall present the permit upon
request to inspection by a representative of the board or a peace
officer. The class 12 or class 13 permit shall be valid for employment
at any retail licensed premises described in (a) of this subsection.
(c) No licensee described in (a) of this subsection, except as
provided in (d) of this subsection, may employ or accept the services
of any person without the person first having a valid class 12 or class
13 permit.
(d) Within sixty days of initial employment, every person whose
duties include the compounding, sale, service, or handling of liquor
shall have a class 12 or class 13 permit.
(e) No person may perform duties that include the sale or service
of alcoholic beverages on a retail licensed premises without possessing
a valid alcohol server permit.
(3) A permit issued by a training entity under this section is
valid for employment at any retail licensed premises described in
subsection (2)(a) of this section for a period of five years unless
suspended by the board.
(4) The board may suspend or revoke an existing permit if any of
the following occur:
(a) The applicant or permittee has been convicted of violating any
of the state or local intoxicating liquor laws of this state or has
been convicted at any time of a felony; or
(b) The permittee has performed or permitted any act that
constitutes a violation of this title or of any rule of the board.
(5) The suspension or revocation of a permit under this section
does not relieve a licensee from responsibility for any act of the
employee or agent while employed upon the retail licensed premises.
The board may, as appropriate, revoke or suspend either the permit of
the employee who committed the violation or the license of the licensee
upon whose premises the violation occurred, or both the permit and the
license.
(6)(a) After January 1, 1997, it is a violation of this title for
any retail licensee or agent of a retail licensee as described in
subsection (2)(a) of this section to employ in the sale or service of
alcoholic beverages, any person who does not have a valid alcohol
server permit or whose permit has been revoked, suspended, or denied.
(b) It is a violation of this title for a person whose alcohol
server permit has been denied, suspended, or revoked to accept
employment in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages.
(7) Grocery stores licensed under RCW 66.24.360, the primary
commercial activity of which is the sale of grocery products and for
which the sale and service of beer and wine for on-premises consumption
with food is incidental to the primary business, and employees of such
establishments, are exempt from RCW 66.20.300 through 66.20.350.

Sec. 7 RCW 66.40.030 and 1999 c 281 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within any unit referred to in RCW 66.40.010, there may be held a
separate election upon the question of whether the sale of liquor under
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private
club; spirits, beer, and wine nightlife; and sports entertainment
facility licenses, shall be permitted within such unit. The conditions
and procedure for holding such election shall be those prescribed by
RCW 66.40.020, 66.40.040, 66.40.100, 66.40.110 and 66.40.120. Whenever
a majority of qualified voters voting upon said question in any such
unit shall have voted "against the sale of liquor under spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; spirits,
beer, and wine nightlife; and sports entertainment facility licenses",
the county auditor shall file with the liquor control board a
certificate showing the result of the canvass at such election; and
after ninety days from and after the date of the canvass, it shall not
be lawful for licensees to maintain and operate premises within the
election unit licensed under spirits, beer, and wine restaurant;
spirits, beer, and wine private club; spirits, beer, and wine
nightlife; and sports entertainment facility licenses. The addition
after an election under this section of new territory to a city, town,
or county, by annexation, disincorporation, or otherwise, shall not
extend the prohibition against the sale of liquor under spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; spirits,
beer, and wine nightlife; and sports entertainment facility licenses to
the new territory. Elections held under RCW 66.40.010, 66.40.020,
66.40.040, 66.40.100, 66.40.110, 66.40.120 and 66.40.140, shall be
limited to the question of whether the sale of liquor by means other
than under spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine
private club; spirits, beer, and wine nightlife; and sports
entertainment facility licenses shall be permitted within such election
unit.

Sec. 8 RCW 66.40.130 and 1999 c 281 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Ninety days after December 2, 1948, spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; spirits, beer, and
wine nightlife; and sports entertainment facility licenses may be
issued in any election unit in which the sale of liquor is then lawful.
No spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private
club; spirits, beer, and wine nightlife; and sports entertainment
facility license shall be issued in any election unit in which the sale
of liquor is forbidden as the result of an election held under RCW
66.40.010, 66.40.020, 66.40.040, 66.40.100, 66.40.110, 66.40.120 and
66.40.140, unless a majority of the qualified electors in such election
unit voting upon this initiative at the general election in November,
1948, vote in favor of this initiative, or unless at a subsequent
general election in which the question of whether the sale of liquor
under spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine
private club; spirits, beer, and wine nightlife; and sports
entertainment facility licenses shall be permitted within such unit is
submitted to the electorate, as provided in RCW 66.40.030, a majority
of the qualified electors voting upon such question vote "for the sale
of liquor under spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and
wine private club; spirits, beer, and wine nightlife; and sports
entertainment facility licenses."

Sec. 9 RCW 68.50.107 and 1999 c 281 s 13 and 1999 c 40 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
There shall be established in conjunction with the chief of the
Washington state patrol and under the authority of the state forensic
investigations council a state toxicological laboratory under the
direction of the state toxicologist whose duty it will be to perform
all necessary toxicologic procedures requested by all coroners, medical
examiners, and prosecuting attorneys. The state forensic
investigations council, after consulting with the chief of the
Washington state patrol and director of the bureau of forensic
laboratory services, shall appoint a toxicologist as state
toxicologist, who shall report to the director of the bureau of
forensic laboratory services and the office of the chief of the
Washington state patrol. Toxicological services shall be funded by
disbursement from the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits,
beer, and wine private club; spirits, beer, and wine nightlife; and
sports entertainment facility license fees as provided in RCW 66.08.180
and by appropriation from the death investigations account as provided
in RCW 43.79.445.

Sec. 10 RCW 66.24.420 and 2006 c 101 s 3 and 2006 c 85 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license shall be issued
in accordance with the following schedule of annual fees:
(a) The annual fee for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license
shall be graduated according to the dedicated dining area and type of
service provided as follows:

(b) The annual fee for the license when issued to any other
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee outside of incorporated
cities and towns shall be prorated according to the calendar quarters,
or portion thereof, during which the licensee is open for business,
except in case of suspension or revocation of the license.
(c) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation,
association or person operating a bona fide restaurant in an airport
terminal facility providing service to transient passengers with more
than one place where liquor is to be dispensed and sold, such license
shall be issued upon the payment of the annual fee, which shall be a
master license and shall permit such sale within and from one such
place. Such license may be extended to additional places on the
premises at the discretion of the board and a duplicate license may be
issued for each such additional place. The holder of a master license
for a restaurant in an airport terminal facility must maintain in a
substantial manner at least one place on the premises for preparing,
cooking, and serving of complete meals, and such food service shall be
available on request in other licensed places on the premises. An
additional license fee of twenty-five percent of the annual master
license fee shall be required for such duplicate licenses.
(d) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation,
association, or person operating dining places at a publicly or
privately owned civic or convention center with facilities for sports,
entertainment, or conventions, or a combination thereof, with more than
one place where liquor is to be dispensed and sold, such license shall
be issued upon the payment of the annual fee, which shall be a master
license and shall permit such sale within and from one such place.
Such license may be extended to additional places on the premises at
the discretion of the board and a duplicate license may be issued for
each such additional place. The holder of a master license for a
dining place at such a publicly or privately owned civic or convention
center must maintain in a substantial manner at least one place on the
premises for preparing, cooking, and serving of complete meals, and
food service shall be available on request in other licensed places on
the premises. An additional license fee of ten dollars shall be
required for such duplicate licenses.
(e) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation,
association or person operating more than one building containing
dining places at privately owned facilities which are open to the
public and where there is a continuity of ownership of all adjacent
property, such license shall be issued upon the payment of an annual
fee which shall be a master license and shall permit such sale within
and from one such place. Such license may be extended to the
additional dining places on the property or, in the case of a spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant licensed hotel, property owned or controlled
by leasehold interest by that hotel for use as a conference or
convention center or banquet facility open to the general public for
special events in the same metropolitan area, at the discretion of the
board and a duplicate license may be issued for each additional place.
The holder of the master license for the dining place shall not offer
alcoholic beverages for sale, service, and consumption at the
additional place unless food service is available at both the location
of the master license and the duplicate license. An additional license
fee of twenty dollars shall be required for such duplicate licenses.
(2) The board, so far as in its judgment is reasonably possible,
shall confine spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses to the
business districts of cities and towns and other communities, and not
grant such licenses in residential districts, nor within the immediate
vicinity of schools, without being limited in the administration of
this subsection to any specific distance requirements.
(3) The board shall have discretion to issue spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant licenses outside of cities and towns in the state of
Washington. The purpose of this subsection is to enable the board, in
its discretion, to license in areas outside of cities and towns and
other communities, establishments which are operated and maintained
primarily for the benefit of tourists, vacationers and travelers, and
also golf and country clubs, and common carriers operating dining, club
and buffet cars, or boats.
(4) ((The total number of spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
licenses issued in the state of Washington by the board, not including
spirits, beer, and wine private club licenses, shall not in the
aggregate at any time exceed one license for each one thousand four
hundred fifty of population in the state, determined according to the
yearly population determination developed by the office of financial
management pursuant to RCW 43.62.030.
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4) of this
section,)) The board shall refuse a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license to any applicant if in the opinion of the board the spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant licenses already granted for the particular
locality are adequate for the reasonable needs of the community.
(((6))) (5)(a) The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to this
license to allow the licensee to remove the liquor stocks at the
licensed premises, for use as liquor for sale and service at event
locations at a specified date and, except as provided in subsection
(((7))) (6) of this section, place not currently licensed by the board.
If the event is open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society
or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the
event is limited to members or invited guests of the sponsoring
individual, society, or organization, the requirement that the sponsor
must be a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is
waived. Cost of the endorsement is three hundred fifty dollars.
(b) The holder of this license with catering endorsement shall, if
requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of the date,
time, place, and location of any catered event. Upon request, the
licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or requested
information concerning the society or organization that will be holding
the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.
(((7))) (6) Licensees under this section that hold a caterer's
endorsement are allowed to use this endorsement on a domestic winery
premises or on the premises of a passenger vessel under the following
conditions:
(a) Agreements between the domestic winery or passenger vessel, as
the case may be, and the retail licensee shall be in writing, contain
no exclusivity clauses regarding the alcohol beverages to be served,
and be filed with the board; and
(b) The domestic winery or passenger vessel, as the case may be,
and the retail licensee shall be separately contracted and compensated
by the persons sponsoring the event for their respective services.

Sec. 11 RCW 66.24.420 and 2006 c 101 s 3 and 2006 c 85 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license shall be issued
in accordance with the following schedule of annual fees:
(a) The annual fee for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license
shall be graduated according to the dedicated dining area and type of
service provided as follows:

(b) The annual fee for the license when issued to any other
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee outside of incorporated
cities and towns shall be prorated according to the calendar quarters,
or portion thereof, during which the licensee is open for business,
except in case of suspension or revocation of the license.
(c) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation,
association or person operating a bona fide restaurant in an airport
terminal facility providing service to transient passengers with more
than one place where liquor is to be dispensed and sold, such license
shall be issued upon the payment of the annual fee, which shall be a
master license and shall permit such sale within and from one such
place. Such license may be extended to additional places on the
premises at the discretion of the board and a duplicate license may be
issued for each such additional place. The holder of a master license
for a restaurant in an airport terminal facility must maintain in a
substantial manner at least one place on the premises for preparing,
cooking, and serving of complete meals, and such food service shall be
available on request in other licensed places on the premises. An
additional license fee of twenty-five percent of the annual master
license fee shall be required for such duplicate licenses.
(d) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation,
association, or person operating dining places at a publicly or
privately owned civic or convention center with facilities for sports,
entertainment, or conventions, or a combination thereof, with more than
one place where liquor is to be dispensed and sold, such license shall
be issued upon the payment of the annual fee, which shall be a master
license and shall permit such sale within and from one such place.
Such license may be extended to additional places on the premises at
the discretion of the board and a duplicate license may be issued for
each such additional place. The holder of a master license for a
dining place at such a publicly or privately owned civic or convention
center must maintain in a substantial manner at least one place on the
premises for preparing, cooking, and serving of complete meals, and
food service shall be available on request in other licensed places on
the premises. An additional license fee of ten dollars shall be
required for such duplicate licenses.
(e) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation,
association or person operating more than one building containing
dining places at privately owned facilities which are open to the
public and where there is a continuity of ownership of all adjacent
property, such license shall be issued upon the payment of an annual
fee which shall be a master license and shall permit such sale within
and from one such place. Such license may be extended to the
additional dining places on the property or, in the case of a spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant licensed hotel, property owned or controlled
by leasehold interest by that hotel for use as a conference or
convention center or banquet facility open to the general public for
special events in the same metropolitan area, at the discretion of the
board and a duplicate license may be issued for each additional place.
The holder of the master license for the dining place shall not offer
alcoholic beverages for sale, service, and consumption at the
additional place unless food service is available at both the location
of the master license and the duplicate license. An additional license
fee of twenty dollars shall be required for such duplicate licenses.
(2) The board, so far as in its judgment is reasonably possible,
shall confine spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses to the
business districts of cities and towns and other communities, and not
grant such licenses in residential districts, nor within the immediate
vicinity of schools, without being limited in the administration of
this subsection to any specific distance requirements.
(3) The board shall have discretion to issue spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant licenses outside of cities and towns in the state of
Washington. The purpose of this subsection is to enable the board, in
its discretion, to license in areas outside of cities and towns and
other communities, establishments which are operated and maintained
primarily for the benefit of tourists, vacationers and travelers, and
also golf and country clubs, and common carriers operating dining, club
and buffet cars, or boats.
(4) The total number of spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses
issued in the state of Washington by the board, not including spirits,
beer, and wine private club licenses, shall not in the aggregate at any
time exceed one license for each one thousand ((four)) three hundred
fifty of population in the state, determined according to the yearly
population determination developed by the office of financial
management pursuant to RCW 43.62.030.
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4) of this
section, the board shall refuse a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license to any applicant if in the opinion of the board the spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant licenses already granted for the particular
locality are adequate for the reasonable needs of the community.
(6)(a) The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to this license
to allow the licensee to remove the liquor stocks at the licensed
premises, for use as liquor for sale and service at event locations at
a specified date and, except as provided in subsection (7) of this
section, place not currently licensed by the board. If the event is
open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society or organization
as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the event is limited to
members or invited guests of the sponsoring individual, society, or
organization, the requirement that the sponsor must be a society or
organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is waived. Cost of the
endorsement is three hundred fifty dollars.
(b) The holder of this license with catering endorsement shall, if
requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of the date,
time, place, and location of any catered event. Upon request, the
licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or requested
information concerning the society or organization that will be holding
the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.
(7) Licensees under this section that hold a caterer's endorsement
are allowed to use this endorsement on a domestic winery premises or on
the premises of a passenger vessel under the following conditions:
(a) Agreements between the domestic winery or passenger vessel, as
the case may be, and the retail licensee shall be in writing, contain
no exclusivity clauses regarding the alcohol beverages to be served,
and be filed with the board; and
(b) The domestic winery or passenger vessel, as the case may be,
and the retail licensee shall be separately contracted and compensated
by the persons sponsoring the event for their respective services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Section 11 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 11 of this act expires July 1,
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 10 of this act take
effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---