BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.08.290 and 2005 c 450 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The city-county assistance account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from real estate excise tax disbursements
provided under RCW 82.45.060 shall be deposited into the account.
Beginning on July 1, 2007, the state treasurer shall transfer annually
the sum of ten million dollars from the state general fund into the
city-county assistance account. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the purposes provided in this section.
(2) Funds deposited in the city-county assistance account shall be
distributed equally to the cities and counties.
(3)(a) Funds distributed to counties shall, to the extent possible,
increase the revenues received under RCW 82.14.030(1) by each county to
the greater of ((two)) nine hundred ((fifty)) thousand dollars or:
(i) For a county with an unincorporated population of one hundred
thousand or less, seventy percent of the statewide weighted average per
capita level of sales and use tax revenues collected under RCW
82.14.030(1) for the unincorporated areas of all counties imposing the
sales and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous
calendar year; and
(ii) For a county with an unincorporated population of more than
one hundred thousand, sixty-five percent of the statewide weighted
average per capita level of sales and use tax revenues collected under
RCW 82.14.030(1) for the unincorporated areas of all counties imposing
the sales and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous
calendar year.
(b) For each county with an unincorporated population of fifteen
thousand or less, the county shall receive the greater of the amount in
(a) of this subsection or the amount received in local government
assistance provided by section 716, chapter 276, Laws of 2004.
(c) For each county with an unincorporated population of more than
fifteen thousand and less than twenty-two thousand, the county shall
receive in calendar year 2006 and 2007 the greater of the amount
provided in (a) of this subsection or the amount received in local
government assistance provided by section 716, chapter 276, Laws of
2004.
(d) To the extent that revenues are insufficient to fund the
distributions under this subsection, the distributions of all counties
as otherwise determined under this subsection shall be ratably reduced.
(e) To the extent that revenues exceed the amounts needed to fund
the distributions under this subsection, the excess funds shall be
divided ratably based upon unincorporated population among those
counties receiving funds under this subsection and imposing the tax
collected under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate.
(4)(a) For each city with a population of five thousand or less
with a per capita assessed property value less than twice the statewide
average per capita assessed property value for all cities for the
calendar year previous to the certification under subsection (6) of
this section, the city shall receive the greater of the following three
amounts:
(i) An amount necessary to increase the revenues collected under
RCW 82.14.030(1) up to ((fifty-five)) seventy percent of the statewide
weighted average per capita level of sales and use tax revenues
collected under RCW 82.14.030(1) for all cities imposing the sales and
use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous calendar
year.
(ii) The amount received in local government assistance provided
for fiscal year 2005 by section 721, chapter 25, Laws of 2003 1st sp.
sess.
(iii) For a city with a per capita assessed property value less
than fifty-five percent of the statewide average per capita assessed
property value for all cities, an amount determined by subtracting the
city's per capita assessed property value from fifty-five percent of
the statewide average per capita assessed property value, dividing that
amount by one thousand, and multiplying the result by the city's
population.
(b) For each city with a population of more than five thousand with
a per capita assessed property value less than the statewide average
per capita assessed property value for all cities for the calendar year
previous to the certification under subsection (6) of this section, the
city shall receive the greater of the following three amounts:
(i) An amount necessary to increase the revenues collected under
RCW 82.14.030(1) up to ((fifty)) seventy percent of the statewide
weighted average per capita level of sales and use tax revenues
collected under RCW 82.14.030(1) for all cities imposing the sales and
use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous calendar
year.
(ii) For calendar year 2006 and 2007, the amount received in local
government assistance provided for fiscal year 2005 by section 721,
chapter 25, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.
(iii) For a city with a per capita assessed property value less
than fifty-five percent of the statewide average per capita assessed
property value for all cities, an amount determined by subtracting the
city's per capita assessed property value from fifty-five percent of
the statewide average per capita assessed property value, dividing that
amount by one thousand, and multiplying the result by the city's
population.
(c) No city may receive an amount greater than one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars a year under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) To the extent that revenues are insufficient to fund the
distributions under this subsection, the distributions of all cities as
otherwise determined under this subsection shall be ratably reduced.
(e) To the extent that revenues exceed the amounts needed to fund
the distributions under this subsection, the excess funds shall be
divided ratably based upon population among those cities receiving
funds under this subsection and imposing the tax collected under RCW
82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate.
(f) This subsection only applies to cities incorporated prior to
August 1, 2005.
(5) The ((two)) nine hundred ((fifty)) thousand dollar amount in
subsection (3) of this section and the one hundred seventy-five
thousand dollar amount in subsection (4) of this section shall be
increased each year beginning in calendar year ((2006)) 2008 by
inflation as defined in RCW 84.55.005, as determined by the department
of revenue.
(6) Distributions under subsections (3) and (4) of this section
shall be made quarterly beginning on October 1, 2005, based on
population as last determined by the office of financial management.
The department of revenue shall certify the amounts to be distributed
under this section to the state treasurer. The certification shall be
made by October 1, 2005, for the October 1, 2005, distribution and the
January 1, 2006, distribution, based on calendar year 2004 collections.
The certification shall be made by March 1, 2006, for distributions
beginning April 1, 2006, and by March 1st of every year thereafter.
The March 1st certification shall be used for distributions occurring
on April 1st, July 1st, and October 1st of the year of certification
and on January 1st of the year following certification.
(7) All distributions to local governments from the city-county
assistance account constitute increases in state distributions of
revenue to political subdivisions for purposes of state reimbursement
for the costs of new programs and increases in service levels under RCW
43.135.060, including any claims or litigation pending against the
state on or after January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For the purposes of RCW 43.08.290(6), this
act applies to distributions made on or after July 1, 2007.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.135.035 and 2005 c 72 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house, and then only if state expenditures in any fiscal year,
including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure limits
established under this chapter.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
state expenditure limit committee shall adjust the state expenditure
limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the voters under
this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of revenue
generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be
adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
personal income growth?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the nature of the
emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require immediate
government action to alleviate human suffering and provide humanitarian
assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no more
than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund or a related fund to another source of funding,
or if moneys are transferred from the state general fund or a related
fund to another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee,
acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a
transfer of money from the state general fund or a related fund to
another fund or account includes any state legislative action taken
that has the effect of reducing revenues from a particular source,
where such revenues would otherwise be deposited into the state general
fund or a related fund, while increasing the revenues from that
particular source to another state or local government account. This
subsection does not apply to: (a) The dedication or use of lottery
revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW 84.52.068,
in support of education or education expenditures; or (b) transfers to
the city-county assistance account under RCW 43.08.290.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function and the ongoing
revenue necessary to fund the program or function are shifted to the
state general fund or a related fund on or after January 1, 2007, the
state expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW
43.135.025(5), shall increase the state expenditure limit to reflect
the shift.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---