BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.83.040 and 2005 c 518 s 938 are each amended to
read as follows:
When notified of positive screening tests, the state department of
health shall offer the use of its services and facilities, designed to
prevent mental retardation or physical defects in such children, to the
attending physician, or the parents of the newborn child if no
attending physician can be identified.
The services and facilities of the department, and other state and
local agencies cooperating with the department in carrying out programs
of detection and prevention of mental retardation and physical defects
shall be made available to the family and physician to the extent
required in order to carry out the intent of this chapter and within
the availability of funds. ((The department has the authority to
collect a reasonable fee, from the parents or other responsible party
of each infant screened to fund specialty clinics that provide
treatment services for hemoglobin diseases, phenylketonuria, congenital
adrenal hyperplasia, congenital hypothyroidism, and, during the 2005-07
fiscal biennium, other disorders defined by the board of health under
RCW 70.83.020. The fee may be collected through the facility where the
screening specimen is obtained.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.83 RCW
to read as follows:
The department has the authority to collect the following fees from
the parents or other responsible party of each infant screened for
heritable or metabolic disorders as defined by the state board of
health under RCW 70.83.020:
(1) A fee for laboratory testing associated with newborn testing
for the defined disorders; and
(2) A fee of three dollars and fifty cents to fund specialty
clinics that provide treatment services for children with the defined
disorders.
The fee may be collected through the facility where the screening
specimen is obtained.

--- END ---