BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
The legislature recognizes the importance of local school district
control and of decision making at the district level. However,
beginning with the 2008 graduating class, Washington will require
public high school students to meet state standards on the Washington
assessment of student learning or demonstrate that the students have
met state standards through the use of objective alternative
assessments to be eligible to graduate. The legislature finds that
with the increased accountability for student learning the state also
has an increased responsibility to ensure that students are provided a
curriculum that prepares them to meet or exceed state academic
standards. The legislature further finds that a uniform statewide
curriculum in those subject areas assessed on the Washington assessment
of student learning will help to ensure that students are prepared to
meet state standards and excel academically.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By January 15, 2009, within existing resources appropriated for
the administration of the Washington assessment of student learning,
the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a comprehensive
and grade-appropriate curriculum for the instruction of students in
kindergarten and grades one through twelve in the content areas
assessed by the Washington assessment of student learning. The
superintendent shall periodically reevaluate the curriculum to ensure
that it reflects any changes to the content areas assessed by the
Washington assessment of student learning. In developing the
curriculum, the superintendent shall consider input from educators,
parents, publishers of textbooks and related materials, and other
interested parties.
(2) Beginning with the 2009-10 school year, all common school
districts shall adopt the statewide curriculum developed by the
superintendent of public instruction under this section to instruct
students in kindergarten and grades one through twelve in those content
areas addressed by the curriculum. This section does not preclude a
school district from providing instruction in addition to that provided
by the curriculum.

--- END ---