BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.060 and 2003 c 86 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A schedule of the fees and the charges for the cashing and
selling of checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper
serving the same purpose shall be conspicuously and continuously posted
in every location licensed under this chapter. The licensee shall
provide to its customer a receipt for each transaction. The receipt
must include the name of the licensee, the type and amount of the
transaction, and the fee or fees charged for the transaction.
(2) Each licensee shall keep and maintain such business books,
accounts, and records as the director may require to fulfill the
purposes of this chapter. Every licensee shall preserve such books,
accounts, and records as required in rule by the director for at least
two years from the completion of the transaction. Records may be
maintained on an electronic, magnetic, optical, or other storage media.
However, the licensee must maintain the necessary technology to permit
access to the records by the department for the period required under
this chapter.
(3) A check, draft, or money order sold by a licensee shall be
drawn on an account of a licensee maintained in a federally insured
financial institution authorized to do business in the state of
Washington.
(4) Whenever a borrower makes a payment on a small loan that is
secured by a postdated check or draft, the licensee must require the
borrower to sign and date a copy of the receipt, or a similar
statement, recording the amount of cash paid by the borrower. The
licensee must keep the signed receipt in its business records as
required under subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---