BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington
schools and students are making significant progress in improving
achievement in reading and writing. Schools are adapting instruction
and providing remediation for students who need additional assistance.
Reading and writing are being taught across the curriculum. There is
general consensus among educators about the level of reading and
writing skills all students need to demonstrate to be successful after
high school. Reading and writing are broad, cumulative skills that can
be appropriately assessed in a comprehensive fashion. Therefore, the
legislature does not intend to make changes to the Washington
assessment of student learning or high school graduation requirements
in reading and writing.
(2) The legislature further finds, however, that less progress is
being made in improving student achievement in mathematics and science.
Schools are struggling to identify appropriate curriculum and
remediation strategies. There is not a consensus among educators,
parents, and the community about the minimum level of mathematics and
science knowledge and skills that all students need to be successful
after high school, and the essential academic learning requirements and
Washington assessment of student learning do not provide guidance in
creating such a consensus. The core content of mathematics and science
may be more appropriately taught, and therefore assessed, according to
major disciplines rather than in a broad and comprehensive fashion.
Therefore, the legislature intends to make adjustments to the
mathematics and science standards and state assessments, particularly
for high school. These adjustments also necessitate changes to the
high school graduation requirements in mathematics and science.
(3) Finally, the legislature intends to define a minimum level of
knowledge and skills in mathematics and science that will be assessed
on a statewide basis for purposes of individual, state, and federal
accountability. However, students will need additional mathematics and
science beyond this minimum level to graduate from high school and to
be successful in college and in the workforce. The state through the
state board of education's recommendations on a meaningful high school
diploma, and local school districts through their graduation
requirements, should set high expectations for student achievement in
mathematics and science.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2006 c 115 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045, acquisition of the certificate is required for graduation
from a public high school but is not the only requirement for
graduation.
(3)(a) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the
exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a
student who meets the state standards on the reading((,)) and
writing((, and mathematics)) content areas of the high school
Washington assessment of student learning shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(b) Beginning with the graduating class of 2011, in addition to the
content areas required under (a) of this subsection, a student must
meet the state standards on at least two of the end-of-course high
school Washington assessments of student learning in mathematics, one
of which shall be the algebra I assessment, to earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(c) Beginning with the graduating class of 2012, in addition to the
content areas required under (a) and (b) of this subsection, a student
must meet the state standards on at least two of the end-of-course high
school Washington assessments of student learning in science, one of
which shall be the biology assessment, to earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(4) If a student does not successfully meet the state standards in
one or more content areas required for the certificate of academic
achievement, then the student may retake the assessment in the content
area up to four times at no cost to the student. If the student
successfully meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment
then the student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.
Once objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section, a student may use the objective
alternative assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully
meets the state standards for that content area if the student has
retaken the Washington assessment of student learning at least once.
If the student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(((4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2010, a student must
meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content
areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the Washington
assessment of student learning or the objective alternative assessments
in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement.))
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) ((Beginning in 2006,)) School districts must make available to
students the following options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) ((Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall pilot
opportunities for retaking the high school assessment beginning in the
2004-05 school year. Beginning no later than September 2006,))
Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year shall be
available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process, for students to
demonstrate achievement of the state academic standards. The objective
alternative assessments shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning and be objective in its determination of
student achievement of the state standards. Before any objective
alternative assessments in addition to those authorized in RCW
28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a student to
demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content
area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally
approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(b) A student's score on the mathematics portion of the preliminary
scholastic assessment test (PSAT), the scholastic assessment test
(SAT), or the American college test (ACT) may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the mathematics standards for the
certificate of academic achievement. The state board of education
shall identify the scores students must achieve on the mathematics
portion of the PSAT, SAT, or ACT to meet or exceed the state standard
for mathematics. The state board of education shall identify the first
scores by December 1, 2006, and thereafter may increase but not
decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state
standard for mathematics.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for students as provided in this subsection (12).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year. The plan shall include the courses,
competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the student to meet
state academic standards and stay on track for graduation. ((This
requirement shall be phased in as follows:
(i) Beginning no later than the 2004-05 school year ninth grade
students as described in this subsection (12)(a) shall have a plan.
(ii) Beginning no later than the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter eighth grade students as described in this subsection
(12)(a) shall have a plan.
(iii))) (i) The parent or guardian shall be notified, preferably
through a parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was unsuccessful, strategies to help them improve their student's
skills, and the content of the student's plan.
(((iv))) (ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported
to the student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments
to the plan made as necessary.
(b) ((Beginning with the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter,)) All fifth grade students who were not successful in one
or more of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment
of student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of ((a)) the student ((described in this
subsection (12)(b))) shall be notified, preferably through a parent
conference, of the student's results on the Washington assessment of
student learning, actions the school intends to take to improve the
student's skills in any content area in which the student was
unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them improve their
student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2005 c 497 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for the content areas of mathematics and science at the
high school level, the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop essential academic learning requirements that identify the
knowledge and skills all public school students need to know and be
able to do based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210,
develop student assessments, and implement the accountability
recommendations and requests regarding assistance, rewards, and
recognition of the state board of education. Standards and assessments
for the content areas of mathematics and science at the high school
level shall be selected by the state board of education as provided in
section 4 of this act.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. By September 1, 2009, the superintendent shall make any
necessary revisions to the essential academic learning requirements and
grade level expectations in elementary and middle school mathematics to
ensure that mathematics standards, expectations, and assessments are
sequential and aligned with the high school mathematics standards
selected under section 4 of this act. By September 1, 2010, the
superintendent shall make any such necessary revisions to the essential
academic learning requirements and grade level expectations in
elementary and middle school science. Goals one and two shall be
considered primary. To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent
shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and skill areas in the
other goals in the essential academic learning requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the Washington
assessment of student learning and used for state or federal
accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and
identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an
emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content
expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content
expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of
expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven
working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content
expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing
the Washington assessment of student learning.
(3) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to
develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the
content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in
the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if
each student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements
identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall
administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system
((shall)) may include a variety of assessment methods, including
criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the
essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments,
then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5)(((a))) The assessment system shall be designed so that the
results under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to
evaluate instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate
educational support for students who have not mastered the essential
academic learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the
student's educational development.
(((b) Assessments measuring the essential academic learning
requirements in the content area of science shall be available for
mandatory use in middle schools and high schools by the 2003-04 school
year and for mandatory use in elementary schools by the 2004-05 school
year unless the legislature takes action to delay or prevent
implementation of the assessment.))
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall
be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and
easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2007, the state board of education shall select
a set of high school mathematics standards to be the essential academic
learning requirements in high school mathematics. By December 1, 2008,
the state board of education shall select a set of high school science
standards to be the essential academic learning requirements in high
school science. The selected standards shall align with the content of
end-of-course assessments required under subsection (2) of this
section. The selected standards shall provide sufficient detail about
the knowledge and skills expected of students in each content area to
enable school districts to design and offer courses of instruction
containing the content to be assessed by the end-of-course assessments.
(2) The state board of education, in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction, shall select a set of end-of-course assessments for high school mathematics and high school science
that are aligned with the standards selected under subsection (1) of
this section. To facilitate ease of scoring and timely return of
results, the assessments shall rely on multiple choice questions.
School districts shall administer the assessments according to a
uniform assessment schedule and guidelines adopted by the
superintendent to ensure appropriate confidentiality of assessment
questions.
(a) The legislature's intent is that students receive instruction
through credited high school courses in the content areas to be
assessed and have their knowledge and skills assessed after they
complete the courses. However, school districts shall be responsible
for designing and implementing the courses, including determining at
which grade levels and in what format the courses shall be offered in
the district. School districts may provide instruction in the content
areas through integrated courses.
(b) The end-of-course assessments in high school mathematics shall
cover algebra I, geometry, and algebra II. The superintendent shall
make the mathematics assessments available and school districts shall
implement them as the high school Washington assessments of student
learning in mathematics beginning with the 2008-09 school year.
(c) The end-of-course assessments in high school science shall
cover biology, earth science, and chemistry. The superintendent shall
make the science assessments available and school districts shall
implement them as the high school Washington assessments of student
learning in science beginning with the 2009-10 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall:
(a) By September 1, 2009, identify no more than three recommended
mathematics curricula for elementary, middle, and high school that
align with the essential academic learning requirements in mathematics,
revised as directed by RCW 28A.655.070 and section 4 of this act; and
(b) By September 1, 2010, identify no more than three recommended
science curricula for elementary, middle, and high school that align
with the essential academic learning requirements in science, revised
as directed by RCW 28A.655.070 and section 4 of this act.
(2) To the extent possible, the state board of education shall
select curricula with research findings that demonstrate a positive
association with improved student achievement in mathematics and
science.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "curricula" includes
textbooks, online materials, diagnostic and classroom-based
assessments, professional development guides, or other associated
instructional materials.
(4) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, school
districts that adopt one or more of the recommended curricula after the
curricula have been identified by the state board of education shall
receive a financial incentive to offset the cost of purchasing the
curricula.

--- END ---