BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2005 c 513 s 14 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
This act takes effect July 1, 2007, except for sections 1 through
3 of this act which are necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2005, and
section 5, chapter 513, Laws of 2005, which takes effect on the
effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The purpose of this act is to allow persons
to apply for a deferral of taxes under chapter 82.74 RCW before July 1,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---