BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who is deprived of his or her motor vehicle because of
a violation of RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, 9A.56.070, or 9A.56.075 may
file an action in superior court against the perpetrator for the
recovery of actual damages, including the value of any damage to the
vehicle and any property stolen from the vehicle, civil damages of up
to five thousand dollars, and the costs of the suit, including
reasonable attorneys' fees.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, service of any
summons or other process under this section shall be by personal
service.
(b)(i) If the defendant cannot be found after a due and diligent
search, the defendant's violation of RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040,
9A.56.070, or 9A.56.075 shall be deemed to constitute an appointment by
the defendant of the secretary of state of the state of Washington to
be his or her true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served all
lawful summons and processes against him or her under this section.
The plaintiff shall perform the service allowed under this subsection
(2)(b)(i) by leaving two copies of the summons or other process with
the secretary of state or at the secretary of state's office. Service
in this manner constitutes sufficient and valid personal service upon
the defendant.
(ii) After performing service under (b)(i) of this subsection, the
plaintiff shall promptly send notice of service under (b)(i) of this
subsection and a copy of the summons or process to the defendant by
registered mail, with return receipt requested, to the defendant's last
known address. After complying with this subsection (2)(b)(ii), the
plaintiff shall file the following with the secretary of state to be
attached to the summons or process filed under (b)(i) of this
subsection:
(A) An affidavit from the plaintiff attesting to compliance with
(b)(ii) of this subsection; and
(B) An affidavit from the plaintiff's attorney that he or she has,
with due diligence, attempted to serve personal process upon the
defendant at all addresses known to him or her and listing the
addresses at which he or she attempted to personally serve the
defendant. However, if the defendant's endorsed return receipt is
received, then the affidavit need only show that the defendant received
personal service by mail.
(iii) The secretary of state shall send, by prepaid mail, a copy of
the summons or process received under (b)(i) of this subsection to the
defendant's address, if known. The secretary of state shall keep a
record that shows the day of service of all summons and processes made
under (b)(i) of this subsection.
(iv) The court in which an action is brought under this section may
order continuances as may be necessary to afford the defendant a
reasonable opportunity to defend the action.
(v) The secretary of state may charge a fee for his or her services
under (b) of this subsection. The fee shall be part of the costs of
suit that may be awarded to the plaintiff.
(3) The department of licensing shall suspend the driver's license
or driving privilege of a defendant until any monetary obligation
imposed under subsection (1) of this section is paid in full, unless
the defendant has entered into a payment plan under subsection (4) of
this section.
(4) If the court determines that a person is not able to pay a
monetary obligation made under subsection (1) of this section in full,
the court may enter into a payment plan with the person. If the person
fails to meet the obligations of the payment plan, the court may modify
or revoke the plan and order the defendant to pay the obligation in
full. If the court revokes the plan, it shall notify the department of
licensing and the department of licensing shall suspend the driver's
license or driving privilege of the defendant until the monetary
obligation is paid in full.
(5) The court shall notify the department of licensing when the
monetary obligation of a defendant whose license is suspended under
this section is paid in full.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.291 and 1998 c 165 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to suspend the license of a driver
upon a showing by its records or other sufficient evidence that the
licensee:
(1) Has committed an offense for which mandatory revocation or
suspension of license is provided by law;
(2) Has, by reckless or unlawful operation of a motor vehicle,
caused or contributed to an accident resulting in death or injury to
any person or serious property damage;
(3) Has been convicted of offenses against traffic regulations
governing the movement of vehicles, or found to have committed traffic
infractions, with such frequency as to indicate a disrespect for
traffic laws or a disregard for the safety of other persons on the
highways;
(4) Is incompetent to drive a motor vehicle under RCW 46.20.031(3);
(5) Has failed to respond to a notice of traffic infraction, failed
to appear at a requested hearing, violated a written promise to appear
in court, or has failed to comply with the terms of a notice of traffic
infraction or citation, as provided in RCW 46.20.289;
(6) Is subject to suspension under RCW 46.20.305 or section 1 of
this act;
(7) Has committed one of the prohibited practices relating to
drivers' licenses defined in RCW ((46.20.336)) 46.20.0921; or
(8) Has been certified by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a child support
order or a residential or visitation order as provided in RCW
74.20A.320.

--- END ---