BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.38.030 and 2006 c 62 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the conditions in subsections (2) through (6) of this
section are met:
(a) A claimant with a disposable income of forty thousand dollars
or less may defer payment of special assessments and/or real property
taxes on up to eighty percent of the amount of the claimant's equity
value in the claimant's residence ((if the following conditions are
met:)); or
(b) A claimant with a disposable income of more than forty thousand
dollars, but less than or equal to one hundred thousand dollars, may
defer payment of special assessments and/or real property taxes on up
to the lesser of: (i) Eighty percent of the amount of the claimant's
equity value in the claimant's residence; or (ii) two hundred thousand
dollars of the claimant's equity value in the claimant's residence.
(((1))) (2) The claimant must meet all requirements for an
exemption for the residence under RCW 84.36.381, other than the age and
income limits under RCW 84.36.381.
(((2))) (3) The claimant must be sixty years of age or older on
December 31st of the year in which the deferral claim is filed, or must
have been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful
employment by reason of physical disability: PROVIDED, That any
surviving spouse of a person who was receiving a deferral at the time
of the person's death shall qualify if the surviving spouse is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements of
this section.
(((3) The claimant must have a combined disposable income, as
defined in RCW 84.36.383, of forty thousand dollars or less.))
(4) The claimant must have owned, at the time of filing, the
residence on which the special assessment and/or real property taxes
have been imposed. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned
by a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be
owned by each spouse or cotenant. A claimant who has only a share
ownership in cooperative housing, a life estate, a lease for life, or
a revocable trust does not satisfy the ownership requirement.
(5) The claimant must have and keep in force fire and casualty
insurance in sufficient amount to protect the interest of the state in
the claimant's equity value: PROVIDED, That if the claimant fails to
keep fire and casualty insurance in force to the extent of the state's
interest in the claimant's equity value, the amount deferred shall not
exceed one hundred percent of the claimant's equity value in the land
or lot only.
(6) In the case of special assessment deferral, the claimant must
have opted for payment of such special assessments on the installment
method if such method was available.

--- END ---