BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the retail sale
of slaughtering, breaking, and/or processing perishable meat products,
if the meat product is not owned by the person engaged in the
slaughtering, breaking, and/or processing and the finished product is
a perishable meat product for human consumption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of slaughtering, breaking, and/or processing perishable meat products,
if the meat product is not owned by the person engaged in the
slaughtering, breaking, and/or processing and the finished product is
a perishable meat product for human consumption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2007.

--- END ---