BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.415.200 and 1989 c 146 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that it is important to have a teaching force
that reflects the rich diversity of the students served in the public
schools. A diverse and culturally competent teaching force provides a
unique social, emotional, and academic learning environment for a
diverse student body. The legislature further finds that certain
groups, as characterized by ethnic background, are traditionally
underrepresented in the teaching profession in the state of Washington
and that the ethnic diversity of the student population in the state of
Washington is increasing. ((The legislature intends to increase the
number of people from underrepresented groups entering our teaching
force.)) The legislature further finds that Washington lacks a
systemic and strategic recruitment approach to increasing diversity
among educators. Additional steps must be taken to increase the number
of diverse high school students who seek to enter the teaching
profession, especially in teacher shortage areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The recruiting diverse Washington teachers program is
established to recruit and provide training and support for diverse
high school students to enter the teaching profession, especially in
teacher shortage areas. The program shall be administered by the
Washington professional educator standards board.
(2) The program shall consist of the following components:
(a) Targeted recruitment of diverse students in grades nine through
twelve through outreach and communication strategies. The focus of
recruitment efforts shall be on encouraging students to consider and
explore becoming future teachers in mathematics, science, bilingual
education, special education, and English as a second language;
(b) A curriculum that provides future teachers with opportunities
to observe classroom instruction at all grade levels; includes
preteaching internships at all grade levels with a focus on shortage
areas; and covers such topics as lesson planning, learning styles,
student learning data and information, the achievement gap, cultural
competency, and education policy;
(c) Academic and community support services for students to help
them overcome possible barriers to becoming future teachers, such as
supplemental tutoring; advising on college readiness, applications, and
financial aid processes; and mentoring; and
(d) Future teacher camps held on college campuses where students
can attend workshops and interact with college faculty and current
teachers.
(3) As part of its administration of the program, the professional
educator standards board shall:
(a) Develop the curriculum and program guidelines in consultation
with an advisory group of teachers, representatives of teacher
preparation programs, teacher candidates, students, and representatives
of diverse communities;
(b) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, allocate grant
funds through a competitive process to partnerships of high schools,
teacher preparation programs, and community-based organizations to
design and deliver programs that include the components under
subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) Conduct an evaluation of the effectiveness of current
strategies and programs for recruiting diverse teachers in Washington
and in other states. The board shall use the findings from the
evaluation to revise the recruiting diverse Washington teachers program
as necessary and make other recommendations to teacher preparation
programs or the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 28A.415.205 (Minority teacher
recruitment program) and 2005 c 497 s 211, 1991 c 238 s 75, & 1989 c
146 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---