BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature affirms that the designation
of critical areas pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170 and the adoption of
regulations to protect critical areas pursuant to RCW 36.70A.060 are
duties under the growth management act. The legislature recognizes
that the scientific method itself is policy neutral, and in this
context is intended to inform, not dictate, the specific outcome of the
local legislative process.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, counties and cities shall ((include the best available science
in developing)) use the scientific method as set forth in RCW
90.58.100(1) to develop policies and development regulations ((to
protect)) that assure no net loss of the functions and values of
critical areas that existed at the time of their designation pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.170. In addition, counties and cities shall give special
consideration to conservation or protection measures necessary to
preserve or enhance anadromous fisheries.
(2) The requirement to include the scientific method under
subsection (1) of this section is satisfied if buffers in a critical
area ordinance are within the range of buffers previously adopted and
established by any local government based on best available science for
the same category or type of critical area.
(3) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.

--- END ---