BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.70.122 and 2001 c 272 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the purchaser or transferee is a dealer he or she shall, on
selling, leasing, or otherwise disposing of the vehicle, promptly
execute the assignment and warranty of title, in such form as the
director shall prescribe, unless the dealer has rejected a contract
subject to future acceptance under RCW 46.70.180(4). If the dealer has
rejected a contract subject to future acceptance under RCW
46.70.180(4), the dealer is not required to execute an assignment and
warranty of title.
(2) The assignment and warranty shall show any secured party
holding a security interest created or reserved at the time of resale
or lease, to which shall be attached the assigned certificates of
ownership and license registration received by the dealer. The dealer
shall mail or deliver them to the department with the transferee's
application for the issuance of new certificates of ownership and
license registration. The title certificate issued for a vehicle
possessed by a dealer and subject to a security interest shall be
delivered to the secured party who upon request of the dealer's
transferee shall, unless the transfer was a breach of the security
agreement, either deliver the certificate to the transferee for
transmission to the department, or upon receipt from the transferee of
the owner's bill of sale or sale document, the transferee's application
for a new certificate and the required fee, mail or deliver to the
department. Failure of a dealer to deliver the title certificate to
the secured party does not affect perfection of the security interest.

--- END ---