BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds the challenge of
developing realistic, effective, and efficient solutions to the
conservation and management issues facing Puget Sound requires calling
on all available sources of knowledge and creative thinking available
in the collective wisdom of Washington's citizens. The legislature
further finds that Puget Sound is both a dynamic and localized
waterbody with unique local challenges and unique local solutions. As
such, it is essential for the future management of Puget Sound that
citizens, through their local government, have a voice and an
opportunity to share their dedication and interest in the well-being of
their community's unique marine waters, while providing a valuable
contribution to the statewide efforts aimed at restoring the Puget
Sound as a whole.
(2) The legislature further finds that federally led efforts to
establish marine resource committees have proven to be an exciting
vehicle for involving local citizens and community leaders in the
future discussions, decisions, and restoration commitments in the
waters most important to the community. The existing model of using a
community-based, nonregulatory organization to examine issues
particular to a community's corner of Puget Sound, applying for grants,
and thoroughly and fairly investigating available options and solutions
has proved to be a valuable asset to Puget Sound and its communities,
and is worthy of replication throughout the Puget Sound basin.
(3) In this act, the legislature intends to establish a structure
on which interested local communities can harness the dedication,
creativity, and wisdom of their residents in the form of marine
resource committees. These committees are intended to compliment, and
not compete with or undermine, any other governmental efforts to
restore and manage the Puget Sound.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislative authority for each
county that borders the marine waters of Puget Sound is authorized to
establish marine resource committees consistent with the procedures
outlined in section 3 of this act.
(2) The mission of a marine resource committee created under this
section is to address, utilizing sound science, the needs of the marine
ecosystem local to the county initiating the marine resource committee.
(3) A marine resource committee created under this section should
review current data and resource conservation and management programs
and make prioritized recommendations for additional measures that might
be necessary to enhance protection of marine resources.
(4) The role of a marine resource committee in developing
recommendations includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Utilizing existing data and, to the extent necessary, helping
to gather new data on the health of local marine resources;
(b) Making scientifically based recommendations on local candidate
sites for marine protected areas;
(c) Working closely with local and state officials to help
implement recommendations of the marine resource committee;
(d) Promoting public outreach and education around marine resource
conservation and management issues; and
(e) Engaging in any other activities that the initiating county
deems appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A marine resource committee, as
described in section 2 of this act, may be created by the legislative
authority of any county bordering the marine waters of Puget Sound, in
cooperation with all appropriate cities and special districts within
their boundaries. Adjacent county legislative authorities are
encouraged to coordinate their efforts whenever there is a mutual
interest in creating a marine resource committee.
(2) A county may delegate the management and oversight of a marine
resource committee created by it under section 2 of this act to a city,
or cities, within its jurisdiction, if the city or cities are located
on the marine waters of Puget Sound and are willing to accept the
delegation. A county may create multiple marine resource committees,
and delegate the responsibilities of the different marine resource
committees to different cities, if more than one city within a county
is located on the marine waters of Puget Sound, and the marine waters
adjacent to the cities are judged by the county to be sufficiently
distinct.
(3) Participating county legislative authorities must select
members of the marine resource committee, ensuring balanced
representation from: Local government; scientific experts; effected
economic interests; effected recreational interests; and environmental
and conservation interests. An initiating county may delegate its
appointment authority to a city or cities that have received from the
county the delegated responsibilities of managing and overseeing the
marine resource committee.
(4) County residents may petition the county legislative authority
to create a marine resource committee. Upon receipt of a petition, the
county legislative authority must respond in writing within sixty days
as to whether they will authorize the creation of a marine resource
committee as well as the reasons for their decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The action team, or its successor
organization, shall serve as the regional coordinating entity for
marine resource committees created under section 2 of this act.
(2) The regional coordinating entity shall serve as a resource to,
at a minimum:
(a) Coordinate and pool grant applications and other funding
requests for marine resource committees;
(b) Coordinate communications and information among marine resource
committees;
(c) Assist marine resource committees to measure themselves against
regional performance benchmarks;
(d) Assist marine resource committees with coordinating local
projects to compliment regional priorities; and
(e) Assist marine resource committees to interact with and
compliment other marine resource committees, and other similar groups,
constituted under a different authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Nothing in section 2 or 3 of this act is
intended to expand or limit the authority of local marine resource
committees existing as of the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 90.71 RCW.

--- END ---