BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the public
has the following interests in higher education:
(a) Enhancing the supply of professional and technical skills in
fields of public importance that would not be adequate without public
subsidy;
(b) Offering opportunities for citizens to achieve the skills and
knowledge necessary for self-sufficiency; and
(c) Providing learning opportunities for citizens that encourage
academic excellence.
(2) The legislature further finds that efficiency and quality
service to citizens are important objectives that state policymakers
must be able to consider when deciding how best to provide for the
public interest. Since 1997, public institutions of higher education
have developed and maintained a system of performance measures to
monitor progress in improving graduation efficiency, faculty
productivity, student achievement of degrees and certifications, and
other topics. However, the current performance measurement system is
too limited in scope and scale. Additionally, certain data that are
necessary for a complete dialogue between state policymakers,
institution leaders, and governing and coordinating boards, regarding
the challenges facing colleges and universities and the outcomes
expected by the public and the state, are not routinely available. The
state, institutions, and governing and coordinating boards must jointly
discuss and establish clear priorities and ensure progress in meeting
those priorities.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to explore a new
relationship between the state, public institutions of higher
education, governing and coordinating boards, and other related
entities that includes uniform data collection, coordination, and
assessment, uniform cost accounting, and the development and
publication of a consumer report card.

PART 1
DATA COLLECTION AND COORDINATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 43.41
RCW to read as follows:
HIGHER EDUCATION DATA CENTER. (1) The higher education data center
shall be established in the office of financial management and act in
collaboration with legislative committee staff. The higher education
data center shall conduct analyses of higher education issues, and
issues that pertain to student transition into higher education. The
higher education data center shall be considered an education research
agency under applicable federal and state statutes for purposes of
receiving and processing student record data for research purposes.
(2) The higher education data center shall:
(a) Coordinate with other state education agencies to compile
education data and complete higher education focused research projects;
(b) Implement a common student identification number used within K-12 and higher education to track outcomes within all of higher
education and between K-12 and higher education;
(c) Provide research support that focuses on student transitions
from K-12 into higher education and within the higher education system;
(d) Track higher education enrollment and outcomes including, but
not limited to: (i) Application acceptance rates; (ii) enrollment
data; (iii) entrance placement examination scores; (iv) enrollment by
field of study in both lower and upper-division classes; (v) program-specific acceptance rates for freshman; (vi) program-specific
acceptance rates applying to a major after freshman year; (vii)
financial aid use; (viii) graduation rates; and (ix) employment rates
in general fields of study.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction, state board for
community and technical colleges, workforce training and education
coordinating board, higher education coordinating board, public
baccalaureate institutions, and employment security department shall
work with the higher education data center to develop data sharing and
research agreements, consistent with applicable confidentiality
requirements, to facilitate the work of the center. The higher
education data center shall make data from collaborative analyses
available to the education agencies and institutions that contribute
data to the higher education data center to the extent allowed by
federal and state security and confidentiality requirements applicable
to the data of each contributing agency or institution.

PART 2
COST ACCOUNTING
Sec. 201 RCW 28B.76.310 and 2004 c 275 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board, in consultation with the house of representatives
and senate committees responsible for higher education, the respective
fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate, the
office of financial management, the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the state institutions of higher education,
shall develop standardized methods and protocols for measuring the
direct and indirect undergraduate and graduate educational costs for
the state universities, regional universities, and community colleges,
including but not limited to ((the costs of instruction, costs to
provide degrees in specific fields, and costs for precollege
remediation)):
(a) Cost per enrolled undergraduate and graduate student;
(b) Cost per undergraduate and graduate degree;
(c) Cost per degree by field of study;
(d) Precollege remediation costs;
(e) All financial aid and institutional aid per student;
(f) Average faculty, administrator, and classified staff salaries
including those funded by state moneys and moneys from other sources;
(g) Percentage of budget spent on faculty, administration, and
staff; and
(h) Cost per student for support services.
(2) ((By December 1, 2004, the board must propose a schedule of
regular)) Beginning December 1, 2007, and every two years thereafter,
the board shall submit cost study reports intended to meet the
information needs of the governor's office and the legislature and the
requirements of RCW 28B.76.300 ((and submit the proposed schedule)) to
the higher education and fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and the senate for their review.
(3) The institutions of higher education shall participate in the
development of cost study methods and shall provide all necessary data
in a timely fashion consistent with the board's reporting requirements
and consistent with the protocols developed.

PART 3
EFFECTIVENESS
Sec. 301 RCW 28B.76.270 and 2004 c 275 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish an accountability monitoring and
reporting system as part of a continuing effort to make meaningful and
substantial progress towards the achievement of long-term performance
goals in higher education.
(2) Based on guidelines prepared by the board, each four-year
institution and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall submit a biennial plan to achieve measurable and specific
improvements each academic year on statewide and institution-specific
performance measures. Plans shall be submitted to the board along with
the biennial budget requests from the institutions and the state board
for community and technical colleges. Performance measures established
for the community and technical colleges shall reflect the role and
mission of the colleges.
(3) The board shall approve biennial performance targets for each
four-year institution and for the community and technical college
system and shall review actual achievements annually. The state board
for community and technical colleges shall set biennial performance
targets for each college or district, where appropriate.
(4) The board shall submit a report on progress towards the
statewide goals, with recommendations for the ensuing biennium, to the
fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature along with
the board's biennial budget recommendations.
(5) The board, in collaboration with the four-year institutions and
the state board for community and technical colleges, shall
periodically review and update the accountability monitoring and
reporting system.
(6) The board shall develop measurable indicators and benchmarks
for its own performance regarding cost, quantity, ((quality,)) and
timeliness and including the performance of committees and advisory
groups convened under this chapter to accomplish such tasks as
improving transfer and articulation, improving articulation with the K-12 education system, measuring educational costs, or developing data
protocols. The board shall submit its accountability plan to the
legislature concurrently with the biennial report on institution
progress.
(7)(a) The board shall develop a consumer report card that provides
data for educational consumers to assess educational quality. The data
shall focus on the nature of the learning environment at public
institutions of higher education including, but not limited to:
(i) All data collected under section 101(2)(d) of this act;
(ii) Class size;
(iii) Instructor qualifications;
(iv) Teaching and learning assessment practices;
(v) Faculty availability and employment status; and
(vi) Other institutional resources such as research, athletics, and
student services available.
(b) Freshman and seniors attending public baccalaureate
degree-granting institutions at least half time shall be assessed on
the scores on the collegiate learning assessment or college level
examination program tests. Freshman and senior scores shall be
included in the report card.
(c) The consumer report card shall be submitted to the higher
education and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and
senate, and made available for the public by December 15, 2008, and
every two years thereafter.

PART 4
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Part headings and captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

--- END ---