BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state patrol shall create and maintain a call
center and a statewide web site that shall be available for the filing
of incident reports relating to identity crimes under chapter 9.35 RCW.
(2) The web site shall contain instructions to the general public
on how to utilize the web site to create and file an incident report
relating to identity theft. At a minimum, when filing an incident
report, the web site shall request, but is not limited to: The name of
the person completing the form, the complainant's name, address, phone
number, date and place that the incident may have occurred, a
description of the identity theft crime that has taken place, and any
other information that is deemed necessary according to the Washington
state patrol.
(3) The call center shall take all relevant information regarding
the complainant's identity theft-related case for the creation of an
incident report. At a minimum, when filing an incident report, the
call center shall request, but is not limited to: The name of the
person completing the form, the complainant's name, address, phone
number, date and place that the incident may have occurred, a
description of the identity theft crime that has taken place, and any
other information that is deemed necessary according to the Washington
state patrol. The call center shall be open and available to the
public twenty-four hours a day.
(4) The Washington state patrol must provide the complainant with
a response, a case number, and copy of any incident report filed by
phone or via internet within forty eight hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.35 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who has learned or reasonably suspects that his or her
financial information or means of identification has been unlawfully
obtained, used by, or disclosed to another, as described in this
chapter, may file an incident report with the Washington state patrol
via the call center or web site established in section 1 of this act.
The Washington state patrol shall create a police incident report of
the matter, provide the complainant with a copy of that report with a
corresponding case number within forty-eight hours, and may refer the
incident report to another appropriate law enforcement agency.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a law
enforcement agency to investigate reports claiming identity theft. An
incident report filed under this section is not required to be counted
as an open case for purposes of compiling open case statistics.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a person
from filing an incident report with a law enforcement agency other than
the Washington state patrol.

--- END ---