BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The center for disease control estimates
that at least five million three hundred thousand Americans,
approximately two percent of the United States population, currently
have a long-term or lifelong need for help to perform activities of
daily living as a result of a traumatic brain injury. Each year
approximately one million four hundred thousand people in this country,
including children, sustain traumatic brain injuries as a result of a
variety of causes including falls, motor vehicle injuries, being struck
by an object, or as a result of an assault and other violent crimes,
including domestic violence. Additionally, there are significant
numbers of veterans who sustain traumatic brain injuries as a result of
their service in the military.
Traumatic brain injury can cause a wide range of functional changes
affecting thinking, sensation, language, or emotions. It can also
cause epilepsy and increase the risk for conditions such as Alzheimer's
disease, Parkinson's disease, and other brain disorders that become
more prevalent with age. The impact of a traumatic brain injury on the
individual and family can be devastating.
The legislature recognizes that current programs and services are
not funded or designed to address the diverse needs of this population.
It is the intent of the legislature to develop a comprehensive plan to
help individuals with traumatic brain injuries meet their needs. The
legislature also recognizes the efforts of many in the private sector
who are providing services and assistance to individuals with traumatic
brain injuries. The legislature intends to bring together those in
both the public and private sectors with expertise in this area to
address the needs of this growing population.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(2) "Department of health" means the Washington state department of
health created pursuant to RCW 43.70.020.
(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(4) "Traumatic brain injury" means injury to the brain caused by
physical trauma resulting from, but not limited to, incidents involving
motor vehicles, sporting events, falls, and physical assaults.
Documentation of traumatic brain injury shall be based on adequate
medical history, neurological examination, mental status testing, or
neuropsychological evaluation. A traumatic brain injury shall be of
sufficient severity to result in impairments in one or more of the
following areas: Cognition; language memory; attention; reasoning;
abstract thinking; judgment; problem solving; sensory, perceptual, and
motor abilities; psychosocial behavior; physical functions; or
information processing. The term does not apply to brain injuries that
are congenital or degenerative, or to brain injuries induced by birth
trauma.
(5) "Traumatic brain injury account" means the account established
under section 7 of this act.
(6) "Council" means the Washington traumatic brain injury strategic
partnership advisory council created under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington traumatic brain injury
strategic partnership advisory council is created within the
department.
(2) The council shall be composed of the following members who
shall be appointed by the governor:
(a) The secretary or the secretary's designee, and representatives
from the following: Children's administration, mental health division,
aging and disability services administration, and vocational
rehabilitation;
(b) The executive director of a state brain injury association;
(c) A representative from a nonprofit organization serving
individuals with traumatic brain injury;
(d) The secretary of the department of health or the secretary's
designee;
(e) The secretary of the department of corrections or the
secretary's designee;
(f) A representative of the department of community, trade, and
economic development;
(g) A representative from an organization serving veterans;
(h) A representative from the national guard;
(i) A representative of a Native American tribe located in
Washington;
(j) The executive director of the Washington protection and
advocacy system;
(k) A neurologist who has experience working with individuals with
traumatic brain injuries;
(l) A neuropsychologist who has experience working with persons
with traumatic brain injuries;
(m) A social worker or clinical psychologist who has experience in
working with persons who have sustained traumatic brain injuries;
(n) A rehabilitation specialist, such as a speech pathologist,
vocational rehabilitation counselor, occupational therapist, or
physical therapist who has experience working with persons with
traumatic brain injuries;
(o) Two persons who are individuals with a traumatic brain injury;
(p) Two persons who are family members of individuals with
traumatic brain injuries; and
(q) Two members of the public who have experience with issues
related to the causes of traumatic brain injuries.
(3) Council members shall not be compensated for serving on the
council, but may be reimbursed for all reasonable expenses related to
costs incurred in participating in meetings for the council.
(4) Initial appointments to the council shall be made by July 30,
2007. The terms of appointed council members shall be three years,
except that the terms of the appointed members who are initially
appointed shall be staggered by the governor to end as follows:
(a) Four members on June 30, 2008;
(b) Three members on June 30, 2009; and
(c) Three members on June 30, 2010.
(5) No member may serve more than two consecutive terms.
(6) The appointed members of the council shall, to the extent
possible, represent rural and urban areas of the state.
(7) A chairperson shall be elected every two years by majority vote
from among the council members. The chairperson shall act as the
presiding officer of the council.
(8) The duties of the council include:
(a) Collaborating with the department to develop a comprehensive
statewide plan to address the needs of individuals with traumatic brain
injuries;
(b) By November 1, 2007, providing recommendations to the
department on criteria to be used to select programs facilitating
support groups for individuals with traumatic brain injuries and their
families under section 6 of this act;
(c) By December 1, 2007, submitting a report to the legislature and
the governor on the following:
(i) The development of a comprehensive statewide information and
referral network for individuals with traumatic brain injuries;
(ii) The development of a statewide registry to collect data
regarding individuals with traumatic brain injuries;
(iii) The efforts of the department to provide services for
individuals with traumatic brain injuries;
(d) By December 30, 2007, reviewing the preliminary comprehensive
statewide plan developed by the department to meet the needs of
individuals with traumatic brain injuries as required in section 4 of
this act and submitting a report to the legislature and the governor
containing comments and recommendations regarding the plan.
(9) The council may utilize the advice or services of a nationally
recognized expert, or other individuals as the council deems
appropriate, to assist the council in carrying out its duties under
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) By July 30, 2007, the department shall
designate a staff person who shall be responsible for the following:
(a) Coordinating policies, programs, and services for individuals
with traumatic brain injuries; and
(b) Providing staff support to the council created in section 3 of
this act.
(2) The department shall provide data and information to the
council established under section 3 of this act that is requested by
the council and is in the possession or control of the department.
(3) By December 1, 2007, the department shall provide a preliminary
report to the legislature and the governor, and shall provide a final
report by December 1, 2008, containing recommendations for a
comprehensive statewide plan to address the needs of individuals with
traumatic brain injuries, including the use of public-private
partnerships and a public awareness campaign. The comprehensive plan
should be created in collaboration with the council and should consider
the following:
(a) Building provider capacity and provider training;
(b) Improving the coordination of services;
(c) The feasibility of establishing agreements with private sector
agencies to develop services for individuals with traumatic brain
injuries; and
(d) Other areas the council deems appropriate.
(4) By December 1, 2007, the department shall:
(a) Provide information and referral services to individuals with
traumatic brain injuries until the statewide referral and information
network is developed. The referral services may be funded from the
traumatic brain injury account established under section 7 of this act;
and
(b) Encourage and facilitate the following:
(i) Collaboration among state agencies that provide services to
individuals with traumatic brain injuries;
(ii) Collaboration among organizations and entities that provide
services to individuals with traumatic brain injuries; and
(iii) Community participation in program implementation.
(5) By December 1, 2007, and by December 1st each year thereafter,
the department shall issue a report to the governor and the legislature
containing the following:
(a) A summary of action taken by the department to meet the needs
of individuals with traumatic brain injuries; and
(b) Recommendations for improvements in services to address the
needs of individuals with traumatic brain injuries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 By December 1, 2007, in collaboration with
the council, the department shall institute a public awareness campaign
that utilizes funding from the traumatic brain injury account to
leverage a private advertising campaign to persuade Washington
residents to be aware and concerned about the issues facing individuals
with traumatic brain injuries through all forms of media including
television, radio, and print.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) By March 1, 2008, the department shall
provide funding to programs that facilitate support groups to
individuals with traumatic brain injuries and their families.
(2) The department shall use a request for proposal process to
select the programs to receive funding. The council shall provide
recommendations to the department on the criteria to be used in
selecting the programs.
(3) The programs shall be funded solely from the traumatic brain
injury account established in section 7 of this act, to the extent that
funds are available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The traumatic brain injury account is created in the state
treasury. Twenty-four percent of the receipts from RCW 46.20.311
(1)(e)(ii), (2)(b)(ii), and (3)(b) must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation, and may be
used only to provide information and services relating to traumatic
brain injury under sections 5 and 6 of this act, for information and
referral services, and for costs of required department staff who are
providing support for the council established in section 3 of this act.
The secretary of the department of social and health services has the
authority to administer the funds.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.20.311 and 2006 c 73 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall not suspend a driver's license or
privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways for a fixed
period of more than one year, except as specifically permitted under
RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.342, or other provision of law.
(b) Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.289,
46.20.291(5), 46.61.740, or 74.20A.320, whenever the license or driving
privilege of any person is suspended by reason of a conviction, a
finding that a traffic infraction has been committed, pursuant to
chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the
suspension shall remain in effect until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided
in chapter 46.29 RCW.
(c) If the suspension is the result of a nonfelony violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's
eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by the
alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW
46.61.5056 and shall deny reinstatement until enrollment and
participation in an approved program has been established and the
person is otherwise qualified. If the suspension is the result of a
violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), the department shall
determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports
provided by the alcohol or drug dependency agency required under RCW
46.61.524 and shall deny reinstatement until satisfactory progress in
an approved program has been established and the person is otherwise
qualified. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, and the person is required pursuant to RCW
46.20.720 to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning
ignition interlock, the department shall determine the person's
eligibility for licensing based upon written verification by a company
doing business in the state that it has installed the required device
on a vehicle owned or operated by the person seeking reinstatement.
If, based upon notification from the interlock provider or otherwise,
the department determines that an interlock required under RCW
46.20.720 is no longer installed or functioning as required, the
department shall suspend the person's license or privilege to drive.
Whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is suspended or
revoked as a result of noncompliance with an ignition interlock
requirement, the suspension shall remain in effect until the person
provides notice issued by a company doing business in the state that a
vehicle owned or operated by the person is equipped with a functioning
ignition interlock device.
(d) Whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is
suspended as a result of certification of noncompliance with a child
support order under chapter 74.20A RCW or a residential or visitation
order, the suspension shall remain in effect until the person provides
a release issued by the department of social and health services
stating that the person is in compliance with the order.
(e)(i) The department shall not issue to the person a new,
duplicate, or renewal license until the person pays a reissue fee of
seventy-five dollars.
(ii) If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of administrative action under
RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee ((shall)) must be ((one)) two hundred
((fifty)) dollars.
(2)(a) Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor
vehicle on the public highways has been revoked, unless the revocation
was for a cause which has been removed, is not entitled to have the
license or privilege renewed or restored until: (i) After the
expiration of one year from the date the license or privilege to drive
was revoked; (ii) after the expiration of the applicable revocation
period provided by RCW 46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055; (iii) after the
expiration of two years for persons convicted of vehicular homicide; or
(iv) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided
by RCW 46.20.265.
(b)(i) After the expiration of the appropriate period, the person
may make application for a new license as provided by law together with
a reissue fee in the amount of seventy-five dollars.
(ii) If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW
46.20.308, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, the reissue fee ((shall)) must be
((one)) two hundred ((fifty)) dollars. If the revocation is the result
of a nonfelony violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department
shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the
reports provided by the alcoholism agency or probation department
designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license,
permit, or privilege to drive until enrollment and participation in an
approved program has been established and the person is otherwise
qualified. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW
46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by
the alcohol or drug dependency agency required under RCW 46.61.524 and
shall deny reinstatement until satisfactory progress in an approved
program has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If
the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504, and the person is required pursuant to RCW 46.20.720 to
drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device, the department shall
determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon written
verification by a company doing business in the state that it has
installed the required device on a vehicle owned or operated by the
person applying for a new license. If, following issuance of a new
license, the department determines, based upon notification from the
interlock provider or otherwise, that an interlock required under RCW
46.20.720 is no longer functioning, the department shall suspend the
person's license or privilege to drive until the department has
received written verification from an interlock provider that a
functioning interlock is installed.
(c) Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department
shall not then issue a new license unless it is satisfied after
investigation of the driving ability of the person that it will be safe
to grant the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public
highways, and until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of
financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29
RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not
issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the
driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person
the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.
(3)(a) Whenever the driver's license of any person is suspended
pursuant to Article IV of the nonresident violators compact or RCW
46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or 46.20.291(5), the department shall not issue
to the person any new or renewal license until the person pays a
reissue fee of seventy-five dollars.
(b) If the suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of
this or any other state, province, or other jurisdiction involving (i)
the operation or physical control of a motor vehicle upon the public
highways while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or
(ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical test of the driver's blood
alcohol content, the reissue fee ((shall)) must be ((one)) two hundred
((fifty)) dollars.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.68.041 and 2004 c 95 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
the department shall forward all funds accruing under the provisions of
chapter 46.20 RCW together with a proper identifying, detailed report
to the state treasurer who shall deposit such moneys to the credit of
the highway safety fund.
(2) ((Sixty-three)) Forty-eight percent of each fee collected by
the department under RCW 46.20.311 (1)(e)(ii), (2)(b)(ii), and (3)(b)
((shall)) must be deposited in the impaired driving safety account.
(3) Twenty-four percent of each fee collected by the department
under RCW 46.20.311 (1)(e)(ii), (2)(b)(ii), and (3)(b) must be
deposited in the traumatic brain injury account created in section 7 of
this act.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.84.092 and 2006 c 337 s 11, 2006 c 311 s 23, 2006
c 171 s 10, 2006 c 56 s 10, and 2006 c 6 s 8 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the Columbia river basin water supply development
account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization
account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense
account, the developmental disabilities community trust account, the
drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance
administrative account, the drinking water assistance repayment
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account,
the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account,
the election account, the emergency reserve fund, the energy freedom
account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the
federal forest revolving account, the freight mobility investment
account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll
lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public works
assistance account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the regional mobility grant
program account, the resource management cost account, the rural
Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement
and sidewalk account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the
traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 74 RCW.

--- END ---