BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.93.030 and 2003 c 337 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Conveyance" means a boat, airplane, or vehicle.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(4) "Disposable package or container" means all packages or
containers defined as such by rules adopted by the department of
ecology.
(5) "Junk vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
46.55.010.
(6) "Litter" means all waste material including but not limited to
disposable packages or containers thrown or deposited as herein
prohibited and solid waste that is illegally dumped, but not including
the wastes of the primary processes of mining, logging, sawmilling,
farming, or manufacturing. "Litter" includes the material described in
subsection (((10))) (11) of this section as "potentially dangerous
litter."
(7) "Litter bag" means a bag, sack, or other container made of any
material which is large enough to serve as a receptacle for litter
inside the vehicle or watercraft of any person. It is not necessarily
limited to the state approved litter bag but must be similar in size
and capacity.
(8) "Litter receptacle" means those containers adopted by the
department of ecology and which may be standardized as to size, shape,
capacity, and color and which shall bear the state anti-litter symbol,
as well as any other receptacles suitable for the depositing of litter.
(9) "Official gathering" means an event where authorization to hold
the event is approved, recognized, or issued by a government, public
body, or authority, including but not limited to fairs, musical
concerts, athletic games, festivals, tournaments, or any other formal
or ceremonial event, during which beverages are sold by a vendor or
vendors in single-use aluminum, glass, or plastic bottles or cans.
(10) "Person" means any political subdivision, government agency,
municipality, industry, public or private corporation, copartnership,
association, firm, individual, or other entity whatsoever.
(((10))) (11) "Potentially dangerous litter" means litter that is
likely to injure a person or cause damage to a vehicle or other
property. "Potentially dangerous litter" means:
(a) Cigarettes, cigars, or other tobacco products that are capable
of starting a fire;
(b) Glass;
(c) A container or other product made predominantly or entirely of
glass;
(d) A hypodermic needle or other medical instrument designed to cut
or pierce;
(e) Raw human waste, including soiled baby diapers, regardless of
whether or not the waste is in a container of any sort; and
(f) Nails or tacks.
(((11))) (12) "Public place" means any area that is used or held
out for use by the public whether owned or operated by public or
private interests.
(((12))) (13) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing
waste materials into a finished product for use other than landfill
disposal or incineration.
(((13))) (14) "Recycling center" means a central collection point
for recyclable materials.
(((14))) (15) "Sports facility" means an outdoor recreational
sports facility, including but not limited to athletic fields and
ballparks, at which beverages are sold by a vendor or vendors in
single-use aluminum, glass, or plastic bottles or cans.
(16) "To litter" means a single or cumulative act of disposing of
litter.
(((15))) (17) "Vehicle" includes every device capable of being
moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or
property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway,
excepting devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively
upon stationary rails or tracks.
(((16))) (18) "Waste reduction" means reducing the amount or
toxicity of waste generated or reusing materials.
(((17))) (19) "Watercraft" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or
other floating craft.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.93 RCW
to read as follows:
In communities where there is an established curbside service and
where recycling service is available to businesses, a recycling program
must be provided at every official gathering and at every sports
facility by the vendors who sell beverages in single-use aluminum,
glass, or plastic bottles or cans. A recycling program includes
provision of receptacles or reverse vending machines, and provisions to
transport and recycle the collected materials. Facility managers or
event coordinators may choose to work with vendors to coordinate the
recycling program. The recycling receptacles or reverse vending
machines must be clearly marked, and must be provided for the aluminum,
glass, or plastic bottles or cans that contain the beverages sold by
the vendor.

--- END ---