BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Identity theft and identity fraud have
become the fastest growing crimes in Washington. Figures from the
federal trade commission show that the state of Washington ranks
seventh nationally in the number of reported identity theft victims by
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A work group on identity theft is
established. The work group shall consist of the following members:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(c) The chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's
designee;
(d) The insurance commissioner of the office of the insurance
commissioner or the insurance commissioner's designee;
(e) An elected sheriff or police chief, a sergeant, and a detective
selected by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;
(f) The state attorney general or the attorney general's designee;
(g) A representative from the banking industry;
(h) A representative of the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys;
(i) A representative of the Washington association of criminal
defense lawyers; and
(j) A representative from a consumer reporting agency.
(2) The work group, where feasible, may consult with:
(a) Federal postal inspectors;
(b) Agents representing the federal bureau of investigation;
(c) Attorneys representing the United States office of the attorney
general; and
(d) Individuals from the public and private sector.
(3) The work group shall meet quarterly at a date and place of its
choice, and at such other times as shall be designated by the chief of
the Washington state patrol or the chief's designee, to review and make
recommendations to the legislature and the governor regarding identity
theft crimes and policies in Washington state. In preparing the
recommendations, the committee shall, at a minimum, review the
following issues:
(a) Developing approaches to reducing identity theft crimes in
Washington;
(b) How to share resources in the investigation of identity theft
crimes;
(c) Reviewing state and federal laws and penalties related to bank,
mail, and wire fraud, immigration and passport fraud, technology and
computer crimes, and various other identity theft-related offenses;
(d) Reviewing how various local, state, and federal agencies that
handle identity theft-related crimes communicate, and how to improve
the utilization and sharing of services between agencies; and
(e) Considering whether the creation of county or multiple county
identity theft task forces made up of local, state, and federal
agencies would be feasible and helpful in deterring identity theft
crimes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires January 31, 2008.

--- END ---