BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that classified
school employees are essential to the K-12 school system. The
contributions of classified school employees to the health, safety, and
efficient operation of each school building and each school district
should not be, but all too frequently are, underestimated. Students
cannot learn without an effective learning environment. The provision
of such a learning environment should be one of the core goals of the
basic education act and the state resources that are allocated to
support basic education. Yet more than forty percent of classified
school employees are paid through local dollars rather than by state
dollars. The state funding formulas for classified school staffing
have not been revised since their inception nearly thirty years ago.
Therefore, the legislature intends to take steps that will lead to the
desired outcome of reducing school district reliance on local funds to
support classified school employees and increase the state's commitment
to provide adequate levels of staffing in these critical support areas.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall examine current
classified school staffing patterns and trends in school districts and
identify the levels of staffing, by type of staff, necessary to support
an effective learning environment. The superintendent shall examine
the extent to which classified staff are serving local and federally
funded supplemental programs and the extent to which classified staff
support state-funded programs. Based on this examination, the
superintendent shall recommend a staffing and funding level and
methodology for state-supported classified school employees. The
superintendent shall also recommend a strategic plan for increasing
state support for classified school employees.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit the
findings and recommendations by December 1, 2007.

--- END ---