BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.803 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
The department shall establish rules for issuing a certificate of
capital authorization. Applications for a certificate of capital
authorization shall be submitted and approved on a biennial basis. The
rules for a certificate of capital authorization shall be consistent
with the following principles:
(1) ((The certificate of capital authorization shall be approved on
a first-come, first-served basis.
(2) Those projects that do not receive approval in one
authorization period shall have priority the following biennium should
the project be resubmitted.
(3))) In processing and approving certificates of capital
authorization, priority shall be given to construction or major
renovation of existing facilities or replacement facilities. Those
existing or replacement facilities with the greatest length of time
between its last major renovation or construction shall be given first
priority. A certificate of capital authorization is only required for
capital expenditures exceeding the expenditure minimum as defined in
RCW 70.38.025.
(2) Certificates of capital authorization for new facilities shall
receive last priority and be assigned on a first-come, first-served
basis.
(3) Certificate of capital authorization applications must be filed
with the department by the end of the previous state fiscal year to be
considered for priority assignment in the following state fiscal year
beginning July 1st. Within ninety days of receipt of an application,
the department shall either reject the application as unacceptable or
act upon it. To the extent that the annual capital authorization level
is not reached through such priority assignment, subsequently completed
certificate of capital authorization applications shall be approved on
a first-come, first-served basis through the fiscal year.
(4) The department shall have the authority to give first priority
for a project that is necessitated by an emergency situation even if
the project is not submitted in a timely fashion. ((The department
shall establish rules for determining what constitutes an emergency.))
Projects shall be considered on an emergency basis if the construction
or renovation must be completed as soon as possible to:
(a) Retain a facility's license or certification;
(b) Protect the health or safety of the facility's residents; or
(c) Avoid closure.
(((4))) (5) The department shall establish deadlines for progress
and the department shall have the authority to withdraw the certificate
of capital authorization where the holder of the certificate has not
complied with those deadlines in a good faith manner. A project that
is not completed and ready for occupancy by the last day of the fiscal
year for which the certificate of capital authorization was issued
shall be given an extended completion deadline if it can be established
that substantial and continuing progress toward commencement of the
project has been made.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.807 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 15 are each amended
to read as follows:
The total minimum capital authorization available for any biennial
period shall be specified in the biennial appropriations act and shall
be calculated on an annual basis. ((When setting the capital
authorization level, the legislature shall consider both the need for,
and the cost of, new and replacement beds.)) The annual capital
authorization level shall be at least one-fortieth of the current
replacement value of all licensed skilled nursing facilities in the
state of Washington using the most current cost criteria contained in
the Marshall and Swift valuation service.

--- END ---