BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature strongly supports
continuation and expansion of secondary career and technical education
programs, as evidenced by legislation enacted in 2006 to support
secondary preapprenticeships in the trades; require course
equivalencies between academic and technical courses; develop a career
and technical alternative assessment option to the Washington
assessment of student learning; and provide a focus on rigorous
programs that lead to industry certification. A logical next step is
to provide incentives and support for high schools to combine all
aspects of best practice in career and technical education:
Integration of academic and technical instruction, coherent and
sequenced curriculum that is articulated with postsecondary education,
meaningful assessment options, rigorous programming focused on high
demand fields, and strong partnerships between schools, businesses, and
labor organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Subject to funds appropriated for this
purpose, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide grants
to up to four high school partnerships to develop career and technical
fields of study programs in high demand fields.
(2) To be eligible for a grant, high schools must form partnerships
of parents, students, special populations, academic and career and
technical education teachers and administrators, workforce development
faculty and administrators, career guidance and academic counselors,
representatives of tech-prep consortia, local workforce development
councils, representatives of local skill centers and local skills
panels, apprenticeship councils, and business and labor organizations
in the community.
(3) Grant recipients must develop and implement a model curriculum
in a high demand field of study, such as health care, trades, mechanics
and engineering, or other field. The partnership must select a high
demand field of study appropriate to meet the workforce education needs
in its region. Grant funds shall be used for start-up costs, primarily
for the development of the curriculum and assessments described in this
section and for professional development for teachers using the
curriculum and assessments. If sufficient funds remain, grant funds
may be used to upgrade equipment within the program to meet industry
standards.
(4) A field of study program shall:
(a) Integrate core academic standards for reading, writing, and
mathematics with high quality career and technical preparation based on
the accepted industry standards for that field;
(b) Incorporate secondary and postsecondary education elements;
(c) Be coherent, sequenced, and articulated to community and
technical college courses to provide high school students with dual
credit for both high school graduation and college, and to prepare
students to succeed in postsecondary education programs in the field;
(d) Lead to an industry-recognized credential or certificate at the
postsecondary level or an associate or baccalaureate degree; and
(e) Emphasize projects and application of knowledge and skills and
provide extensive opportunities for work-based learning and
internships.
(5) Students who are struggling with core academic skills,
including the Washington assessment of student learning, shall receive
supplemental assistance and instruction within the program, including
assistance to create a career and technical collection of evidence as
an alternative to the Washington assessment of learning.
(6) Participants in a high demand field of study program should
expect to complete a high school diploma and the appropriate courses in
a high quality career and technical program and graduate ready to
pursue postsecondary education.
(7) With assistance from the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and the workforce training and education coordinating
board, grant recipients shall develop end-of-program assessments for
their high demand field of study program. The assessments shall also
be integrated to include academic, work readiness, and technical
knowledge and skills. The legislature's intent is to use these
assessments as prototypes for possible future additional alternative
assessments for career and technical education students to demonstrate
they meet the state's learning standards.
(8) Grant recipients must develop a communications strategy for
parents and students in other area high schools and middle schools to
promote the model field of study programs as a high quality learning
option for students and prepare plans for replication of the programs.
(9) For the purposes of this section, "field of study program"
shall have the same meaning as a career and technical program of study
under P.L. 109-270, the Carl D. Perkins career and technical education
improvement act of 2006.
(10) This section expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---