BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
CREATING A NEW CHAPTER DEDICATED TO LARGE ON-SITE
SEWAGE SYSTEMS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND INTENT. The legislature finds
that:
(1) Protection of the environment and public health requires
properly designed, operated, and maintained on-site sewage systems.
Failure of those systems can pose certain health and environmental
hazards if sewage leaks above ground or if untreated sewage reaches
surface or groundwater.
(2) Chapter 70.118A RCW provides a framework for ongoing management
of on-site sewage systems located in marine recovery areas and
regulated by local health jurisdictions under state board of health
rules. This chapter will provide a framework for comprehensive
management of large on-site sewage systems statewide.
(3) The primary purpose of this chapter is to establish, in a
single state agency, comprehensive regulation of the design, operation,
and maintenance of large on-site sewage systems, and their operators,
that provides both public health and environmental protection. To
accomplish these purposes, this chapter provides for:
(a) The permitting and continuing oversight of large on-site sewage
systems;
(b) The establishment by the department of standards and rules for
the siting, design, construction, installation, operation, maintenance,
and repair of large on-site sewage systems; and
(c) The enforcement by the department of the standards and rules
established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the state department of health.
(2) "Industrial wastewater" means the water or liquid carried waste
from an industrial process. These wastes may result from any process
or activity of industry, manufacture, trade, or business, from the
development of any natural resource, or from animal operations such as
feedlots, poultry houses, or dairies. The term includes contaminated
storm water and leachate from solid waste facilities.
(3) "Large on-site sewage system" means an on-site sewage system
with design flows of between three thousand five hundred gallons per
day and one hundred thousand gallons per day.
(4) "On-site sewage system" means an integrated system of
components, located on or nearby the property it serves, that conveys,
stores, treats, and provides subsurface soil treatment and disposal of
domestic sewage. It consists of a collection system, a treatment
component or treatment sequence, and a subsurface soil disposal
component. It may or may not include a mechanical treatment system.
An on-site sewage system also refers to a holding tank sewage system or
other system that does not have a soil dispersal component. A system
into which storm water or industrial wastewater is discharged is not
included in the definition of on-site sewage system.
(5) "Person" means any individual, corporation, company,
association, firm, partnership, governmental agency, or any other
entity whatsoever, and the authorized agents of any such entities.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(7) "Waters of the state" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
90.48.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 AUTHORIZING THE DEPARTMENT TO PROVIDE
COMPREHENSIVE REGULATION OF LARGE ON-SITE SEWAGE SYSTEMS. (1) For the
protection of human health and the environment the department shall:
(a) Establish and provide for the comprehensive regulation of large
on-site sewage systems including, but not limited to, system siting,
design, construction, installation, operation, maintenance, and repair;
(b) Control and prevent pollution of streams, lakes, rivers, ponds,
inland waters, salt waters, water courses, and other surface and
underground waters of the state of Washington, except to the extent
authorized by permits issued under this chapter;
(c) Issue annual operating permits for large on-site sewage systems
based on the system's ability to function properly in compliance with
the applicable comprehensive regulatory requirements; and
(d) Enforce the large on-site sewage system requirements.
(2) Large on-site sewage systems permitted by the department may
not be used for treatment and disposal of industrial wastewater or
combined sanitary sewer and storm water systems.
(3) The work group convened under RCW 70.118A.080(4) to make
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature for
the development of certification or licensing of maintenance
specialists shall include recommendations for the development of
certification or licensing of large on-site system operators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 ANNUAL OPERATING PERMITS REQUIRED--APPLICATION. (1) A person may not install or operate a large on-site
sewage system without an operating permit as provided in this chapter
after July 1, 2009. The owner of the system is responsible for
obtaining a permit.
(2) The department shall issue operating permits in accordance with
the rules adopted under section 5 of this act.
(3) The department shall ensure the system meets all applicable
siting, design, construction, and installation requirements prior to
issuing an initial operating permit. Prior to renewing an operating
permit, the department may review the performance of the system to
determine compliance with rules and any permit conditions.
(4) At the time of initial permit application or at the time of
permit renewal the department shall impose those permit conditions,
requirements for system improvements, and compliance schedules as it
determines are reasonable and necessary to ensure that the system will
be operated and maintained properly. Each application must be
accompanied by a fee as established in rules adopted by the department.
(5) Operating permits shall be issued for a term of one year, and
shall be renewed annually, unless the operator fails to apply for a new
permit or the department finds good cause to deny the application for
renewal.
(6) Each permit may be issued only for the site and owner named in
the application. Permits are not transferable or assignable except
with the written approval of the department.
(7) The department may deny an application for a permit or modify,
suspend, or revoke a permit in any case in which it finds that the
permit was obtained by fraud or there is or has been a failure,
refusal, or inability to comply with the requirements of this chapter
or the standards or rules adopted under this chapter. RCW 43.70.115
governs notice of denial, revocation, suspension, or modification and
provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding for systems that
dispose of between three thousand five hundred and fourteen thousand
five hundred gallons per day of wastewater under this section. Chapter
43.21B RCW provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding regarding
the initial issuance, denial, or modification of a permit for systems
that dispose of between fourteen thousand five hundred and one hundred
thousand gallons per day of wastewater under this section.
(8) The department shall ensure adequate public notification and
opportunity for public review and comment of an initial proposed permit
for siting, denial, revocation, suspension, or modification of a large
on-site sewage system. Methods of providing notice may include
electronic mail, posting on the department's internet site, publication
in a local newspaper, press releases, mailings, and other information
that the department may determine appropriate.
(9) Any permit issued by the department of ecology for a large
on-site sewage system under chapter 90.48 RCW is valid until it first
expires after the effective date of this section. The system owner
shall apply for an operating permit at least one hundred twenty days
prior to expiration of the department of ecology permit.
(10) Systems required to meet operator certification requirements
under chapter 70.95B RCW must continue to meet those requirements as a
condition of the department operating permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RULE MAKING. (1) For the protection of
human health and the environment, the secretary shall adopt rules for
the comprehensive regulation of large on-site sewage systems, which
includes, but is not limited to, the siting, design, construction,
installation, maintenance, repair, and permitting of the systems.
(2) In adopting the rules, the secretary shall, in consultation
with the department of ecology, require that large on-site sewage
systems comply with the applicable sections of chapter 90.48 RCW
regarding control and prevention of pollution of waters of the state,
including but not limited to:
(a) Surface and ground water standards established under RCW
90.48.035; and
(b) Those provisions requiring all known, available, and reasonable
methods of treatment.
(3) In adopting the rules, the secretary shall ensure that
requirements for large on-site sewage systems are consistent with the
requirements of any comprehensive plans or development regulations
adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW or any other applicable comprehensive
plan, land use plan, or development regulation adopted by a city, town,
or county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 CIVIL PENALTIES. (1) A person who violates
a law or rule regulating on-site sewage systems administered by the
department is subject to a penalty of not more than ten thousand
dollars per day for every violation. Every violation is a separate and
distinct offense. In case of a continuing violation, each day's
continuing violation is a separate and distinct violation. The penalty
assessed must reflect the significance of the violation and the
previous record of compliance on the part of the person responsible for
compliance with on-site sewage system requirements.
(2) Every person who, through an act of commission or omission,
procures, aids, or abets a violation is considered to have violated the
provisions of this section and is subject to the penalty provided in
this section.
(3) The penalty provided for in this section must be imposed by a
notice in writing to the person against whom the civil penalty is
assessed and must describe the violation. The notice must be
personally served in the manner of service of a summons in a civil
action or in a manner that shows proof of receipt. A penalty imposed
by this section is due twenty-eight days after receipt of notice unless
application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed as provided in
subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Within twenty-eight days after notice is received, the person
incurring the penalty may file an application for an adjudicative
proceeding and may pursue subsequent review as provided in chapter
34.05 RCW and applicable rules.
(5) A penalty imposed by a final administrative order is due upon
service of the final administrative order. A person who fails to pay
a penalty assessed by a final administrative order within thirty days
of service of the final administrative order shall pay, in addition to
the amount of the penalty, interest at the rate of one percent of the
unpaid balance of the assessed penalty for each month or part of a
month that the penalty remains unpaid, commencing with the month in
which the notice of penalty was served, and reasonable attorneys' fees
as are incurred if civil enforcement of the final administrative order
is required to collect the penalty.
(6) A person who institutes proceedings for judicial review of a
final administrative order assessing a civil penalty under this chapter
shall place the full amount of the penalty in an interest-bearing
account in the registry of the reviewing court. At the conclusion of
the proceeding the court shall, as appropriate, enter a judgment on
behalf of the department and order that the judgment be satisfied to
the extent possible from moneys paid into the registry of the court or
shall enter a judgment in favor of the person appealing the penalty
assessment and order return of the moneys paid into the registry of the
court together with accrued interest to the person appealing. The
judgment may award reasonable attorneys' fees for the cost of the
attorney general's office in representing the department.
(7) If no appeal is taken from a final administrative order
assessing a civil penalty under this chapter, the department may file
a certified copy of the final administrative order with the clerk of
the superior court in which the on-site sewage system is located or in
Thurston county, and the clerk shall enter judgment in the name of the
department and in the amount of the penalty assessed in the final
administrative order.
(8) A judgment entered under subsection (6) or (7) of this section
has the same force and effect as, and is subject to all of the
provisions of law relating to, a judgment in a civil action, and may be
enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court in which
it is entered.
(9) The large on-site sewage systems account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from penalties imposed
under this section shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account shall be used by the department to provide training
and technical assistance to on-site sewage system owners and operator.
Only the secretary or the secretary's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 INJUNCTIONS. Notwithstanding the existence
or use of any other remedy, the department may bring an action to
enjoin a violation or threatened violation of this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter. The department may bring the action in the
superior court of the county in which the large on-site sewage system
is located or in the superior court of Thurston county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The authority and duties created in this
chapter are in addition to any authority and duties already provided in
law. Nothing in this chapter limits the powers of the state or any
political subdivision to exercise such authority.

PART 2
AMENDING CHAPTERS 70.118 AND 70.05 RCW TO ENHANCE LOCAL
HEALTH OFFICER ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY REGARDING ON-SITE SYSTEMS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW
to read as follows:
CIVIL PENALTIES. A local health officer who is responsible for
administering and enforcing regulations regarding on-site sewage
disposal systems is authorized to issue civil penalties for violations
of those regulations under the same limitations and requirements
imposed on the department under section 6 of this act, except that
judgments shall be entered in the name of the local health jurisdiction
and penalties shall be placed into the general fund or funds of the
entity or entities operating the local health jurisdiction.

Sec. 10 RCW 70.05.070 and 1999 c 391 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The local health officer, acting under the direction of the local
board of health or under direction of the administrative officer
appointed under RCW 70.05.040 or 70.05.035, if any, shall:
(1) Enforce the public health statutes of the state, rules of the
state board of health and the secretary of health, and all local health
rules, regulations and ordinances within his or her jurisdiction
including imposition of penalties authorized under RCW 70.119A.030 and
section 9 of this act, the confidentiality provisions in RCW 70.24.105
and rules adopted to implement those provisions, and filing of actions
authorized by RCW 43.70.190;
(2) Take such action as is necessary to maintain health and
sanitation supervision over the territory within his or her
jurisdiction;
(3) Control and prevent the spread of any dangerous, contagious or
infectious diseases that may occur within his or her jurisdiction;
(4) Inform the public as to the causes, nature, and prevention of
disease and disability and the preservation, promotion and improvement
of health within his or her jurisdiction;
(5) Prevent, control or abate nuisances which are detrimental to
the public health;
(6) Attend all conferences called by the secretary of health or his
or her authorized representative;
(7) Collect such fees as are established by the state board of
health or the local board of health for the issuance or renewal of
licenses or permits or such other fees as may be authorized by law or
by the rules of the state board of health;
(8) Inspect, as necessary, expansion or modification of existing
public water systems, and the construction of new public water systems,
to assure that the expansion, modification, or construction conforms to
system design and plans;
(9) Take such measures as he or she deems necessary in order to
promote the public health, to participate in the establishment of
health educational or training activities, and to authorize the
attendance of employees of the local health department or individuals
engaged in community health programs related to or part of the programs
of the local health department.

PART 3
AMENDING STATE BOARD OF HEALTH RULE-MAKING AUTHORITY FOR
ON-SITE SEWAGE SYSTEMS
Sec. 11 RCW 43.20.050 and 1993 c 492 s 489 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of health shall provide a forum for the
development of public health policy in Washington state. It is
authorized to recommend to the secretary means for obtaining
appropriate citizen and professional involvement in all public health
policy formulation and other matters related to the powers and duties
of the department. It is further empowered to hold hearings and
explore ways to improve the health status of the citizenry.
(a) At least every five years, the state board shall convene
regional forums to gather citizen input on public health issues.
(b) Every two years, in coordination with the development of the
state biennial budget, the state board shall prepare the state public
health report that outlines the health priorities of the ensuing
biennium. The report shall:
(i) Consider the citizen input gathered at the forums;
(ii) Be developed with the assistance of local health departments;
(iii) Be based on the best available information collected and
reviewed according to RCW 43.70.050 and recommendations from the
council;
(iv) Be developed with the input of state health care agencies. At
least the following directors of state agencies shall provide timely
recommendations to the state board on suggested health priorities for
the ensuing biennium: The secretary of social and health services, the
health care authority administrator, the insurance commissioner, the
superintendent of public instruction, the director of labor and
industries, the director of ecology, and the director of agriculture;
(v) Be used by state health care agency administrators in preparing
proposed agency budgets and executive request legislation;
(vi) Be submitted by the state board to the governor by January 1st
of each even-numbered year for adoption by the governor. The governor,
no later than March 1st of that year, shall approve, modify, or
disapprove the state public health report.
(c) In fulfilling its responsibilities under this subsection, the
state board may create ad hoc committees or other such committees of
limited duration as necessary.
(2) In order to protect public health, the state board of health
shall:
(a) Adopt rules necessary to assure safe and reliable public
drinking water and to protect the public health. Such rules shall
establish requirements regarding:
(i) The design and construction of public water system facilities,
including proper sizing of pipes and storage for the number and type of
customers;
(ii) Drinking water quality standards, monitoring requirements, and
laboratory certification requirements;
(iii) Public water system management and reporting requirements;
(iv) Public water system planning and emergency response
requirements;
(v) Public water system operation and maintenance requirements;
(vi) Water quality, reliability, and management of existing but
inadequate public water systems; and
(vii) Quality standards for the source or supply, or both source
and supply, of water for bottled water plants.
(b) Adopt rules and standards for prevention, control, and
abatement of health hazards and nuisances related to the disposal of
wastes, solid and liquid, including but not limited to sewage, garbage,
refuse, and other environmental contaminants; adopt standards and
procedures governing the design, construction, and operation of sewage,
garbage, refuse and other solid waste collection, treatment, and
disposal facilities;
(c) Adopt rules controlling public health related to environmental
conditions including but not limited to heating, lighting, ventilation,
sanitary facilities, cleanliness and space in all types of public
facilities including but not limited to food service establishments,
schools, institutions, recreational facilities and transient
accommodations and in places of work;
(d) Adopt rules for the imposition and use of isolation and
quarantine;
(e) Adopt rules for the prevention and control of infectious and
noninfectious diseases, including food and vector borne illness, and
rules governing the receipt and conveyance of remains of deceased
persons, and such other sanitary matters as admit of and may best be
controlled by universal rule; and
(f) Adopt rules for accessing existing data bases for the purposes
of performing health related research.
(3) The state board shall adopt rules for the design, construction,
installation, operation, and maintenance of those on-site sewage
systems with design flows of less than three thousand five hundred
gallons per day.
(4) The state board may delegate any of its rule-adopting authority
to the secretary and rescind such delegated authority.
(((4))) (5) All local boards of health, health authorities and
officials, officers of state institutions, police officers, sheriffs,
constables, and all other officers and employees of the state, or any
county, city, or township thereof, shall enforce all rules adopted by
the state board of health. In the event of failure or refusal on the
part of any member of such boards or any other official or person
mentioned in this section to so act, he or she shall be subject to a
fine of not less than fifty dollars, upon first conviction, and not
less than one hundred dollars upon second conviction.
(((5))) (6) The state board may advise the secretary on health
policy issues pertaining to the department of health and the state.

PART 4
EXEMPTING OPERATORS
CERTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Sec. 12 RCW 90.48.162 and 1972 ex.s. c 140 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any county or any municipal or public corporation operating or
proposing to operate a sewerage system, including any system which
collects only domestic sewerage, which results in the disposal of waste
material into the waters of the state shall procure a permit from the
department of ecology before so disposing of such materials. This
section is intended to extend the permit system of RCW 90.48.160 to
counties and municipal or public corporations and the provisions of RCW
90.48.170 through ((90.48.210)) 90.48.200 and 90.52.040 shall be
applicable to the permit requirement imposed under this section. A
permit under this chapter is not required for large on-site sewage
systems permitted by the department of health under chapter 70.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 8 of this act) or for on-site sewage systems
permitted by local health jurisdictions under rules of the state board
of health.

Sec. 13 RCW 90.48.110 and 2002 c 161 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except under subsection (2) of this section, all engineering
reports, plans, and specifications for the construction of new sewerage
systems, sewage treatment or disposal plants or systems, or for
improvements or extensions to existing sewerage systems or sewage
treatment or disposal plants, and the proposed method of future
operation and maintenance of said facility or facilities, shall be
submitted to and be approved by the department, before construction
thereof may begin. No approval shall be given until the department is
satisfied that said plans and specifications and the methods of
operation and maintenance submitted are adequate to protect the quality
of the state's waters as provided for in this chapter. Approval under
this chapter is not required for large on-site sewage systems permitted
by the department of health under chapter 70.-- RCW (sections 1 through
8 of this act) or for on-site sewage systems regulated by local health
jurisdictions under rules of the state board of health.
(2) To promote efficiency in service delivery and intergovernmental
cooperation in protecting the quality of the state's waters, the
department may delegate the authority for review and approval of
engineering reports, plans, and specifications for the construction of
new sewerage systems, sewage treatment or disposal plants or systems,
or for improvements or extensions to existing sewerage system or sewage
treatment or disposal plants, and the proposed method of future
operations and maintenance of said facility or facilities and
industrial pretreatment systems, to local units of government
requesting such delegation and meeting criteria established by the
department.
(3) For any new or revised general sewer plan submitted for review
under this section, the department shall review and either approve,
conditionally approve, reject, or request amendments within ninety days
of the receipt of the submission of the plan. The department may
extend this ninety-day time limitation for new submittals by up to an
additional ninety days if insufficient time exists to adequately review
the general sewer plan. For rejections of plans or extensions of the
timeline, the department shall provide in writing to the local
government entity the reason for such action. In addition, the
governing body of the local government entity and the department may
mutually agree to an extension of the deadlines contained in this
section.

PART 5
AMENDING RCW 36.94.010 TO CLARIFY ITS APPLICABILITY TO
LARGE ON-SITE SEWAGE SYSTEMS
Sec. 14 RCW 36.94.010 and 1997 c 447 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) A "system of sewerage" means and may include any or all of the
following:
(a) Sanitary sewage collection, treatment, and/or disposal
facilities and services, including without limitation on-site or off-site sanitary sewerage facilities, large on-site sewage systems defined
under section 2 of this act, inspection services and maintenance
services for private or public on-site systems, or any other means of
sewage treatment and disposal approved by the county;
(b) Combined sanitary sewage disposal and storm or surface water
drains and facilities;
(c) Storm or surface water drains, channels, and facilities;
(d) Outfalls for storm drainage or sanitary sewage and works,
plants, and facilities for storm drainage or sanitary sewage treatment
and disposal, and rights and interests in property relating to the
system;
(e) Combined water and sewerage systems;
(f) Point and nonpoint water pollution monitoring programs that are
directly related to the sewerage facilities and programs operated by a
county;
(g) Public restroom and sanitary facilities;
(h) The facilities and services authorized in RCW 36.94.020; and
(i) Any combination of or part of any or all of such facilities.
(2) A "system of water" means and includes:
(a) A water distribution system, including dams, reservoirs,
aqueducts, plants, pumping stations, transmission and lateral
distribution lines and other facilities for distribution of water;
(b) A combined water and sewerage system;
(c) Any combination of or any part of any or all of such
facilities.
(3) A "sewerage and/or water general plan" means a general plan for
a system of sewerage and/or water for the county which shall be an
element of the comprehensive plan established by the county pursuant to
RCW 36.70.350(6) and/or chapter 35.63 RCW, if there is such a
comprehensive plan.
(a) A sewerage general plan shall include the general location and
description of treatment and disposal facilities, trunk and interceptor
sewers, pumping stations, monitoring and control facilities, channels,
local service areas and a general description of the collection system
to serve those areas, a description of on-site sanitary sewerage system
inspection services and maintenance services, and other facilities and
services as may be required to provide a functional and implementable
plan, including preliminary engineering to assure feasibility. The
plan may also include a description of the regulations deemed
appropriate to carrying out surface drainage plans.
(b) A water general plan shall include the general location and
description of water resources to be utilized, wells, treatment
facilities, transmission lines, storage reservoirs, pumping stations,
and monitoring and control facilities as may be required to provide a
functional and implementable plan.
(c) Water and/or sewerage general plans shall include preliminary
engineering in adequate detail to assure technical feasibility and, to
the extent then known, shall further discuss the methods of
distributing the cost and expense of the system and shall indicate the
economic feasibility of plan implementation. The plans may also
specify local or lateral facilities and services. The sewerage and/or
water general plan does not mean the final engineering construction or
financing plans for the system.
(4) "Municipal corporation" means and includes any city, town,
metropolitan municipal corporation, any public utility district which
operates and maintains a sewer or water system, any sewer, water,
diking, or drainage district, any diking, drainage, and sewerage
improvement district, and any irrigation district.
(5) A "private utility" means and includes all utilities, both
public and private, which provide sewerage and/or water service and
which are not municipal corporations within the definition of this
chapter. The ownership of a private utility may be in a corporation,
nonprofit or for profit, in a cooperative association, in a mutual
organization, or in individuals.
(6) "Board" means one or more boards of county commissioners and/or
the legislative authority of a home rule charter county.

PART 6
JURISDICTION OF THE POLLUTION CONTROL HEARINGS BOARD
Sec. 15 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2003 c 393 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, and the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW, the
department of health, or local health departments:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and
90.56.330.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(i) Decisions of the department of health relating to the initial
issuance, denial, revocation, suspension, or modification of a permit
for a large on-site sewage system that disposes of between fourteen
thousand five hundred gallons per day and one hundred thousand gallons
per day of wastewater.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Proceedings conducted by the department, or the department's
designee, under RCW 90.03.160 through 90.03.210 or 90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Captions and part headings used in this act
are not any part of the law.

--- END ---