BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
PURPOSE OF ACT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to make
technical, nonsubstantive changes to the Washington clean air act,
chapter 70.94 RCW, in order to improve organization, readability, and
clarity. No provision of this act may be construed as a substantive
change to the Washington clean air act.

PART 2
AMENDATORY SECTIONS
Sec. 101 RCW 70.94.011 and 1991 c 199 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is declared to be the public policy to preserve, protect,
and enhance the air quality for current and future generations. Air is
an essential resource that must be protected from harmful levels of
pollution. Improving air quality is a matter of statewide concern and
is in the public interest. It is the intent of this chapter to secure
and maintain levels of air quality that protect human health and
safety, including the most sensitive members of the population, to
comply with the requirements of the federal clean air act, to prevent
injury to plant, animal life, and property, to foster the comfort and
convenience of Washington's inhabitants, to promote the economic and
social development of the state, and to facilitate the enjoyment of the
natural attractions of the state.
(2) It is further the intent of this chapter to protect the public
welfare, to preserve visibility, to protect scenic, aesthetic,
historic, and cultural values, and to prevent air pollution problems
that interfere with the enjoyment of life, property, or natural
attractions.
(3) Because of the extent of the air pollution problem the
legislature finds it necessary to return areas with poor air quality to
levels adequate to protect health and the environment as expeditiously
as possible but no later than December 31, 1995. Further, it is the
intent of this chapter to prevent any areas of the state with
acceptable air quality from reaching air contaminant levels that are
not protective of human health and the environment.
(4) The legislature recognizes that air pollution control projects
may affect other environmental media. In selecting air pollution
control strategies state and local agencies shall support those
strategies that lessen the negative environmental impact of the project
on all environmental media, including air, water, and land.
(5) The legislature further recognizes that energy efficiency and
energy conservation can help to reduce air pollution and shall
therefore be considered when making decisions on air pollution control
strategies and projects.
(6) It is the policy of the state that the costs of protecting the
air resource and operating state and local air pollution control
programs shall be shared as equitably as possible among all sources
whose emissions cause air pollution.
(7) It is also declared as public policy that regional air
pollution control programs are to be encouraged and supported to the
extent practicable as essential instruments for the securing and
maintenance of appropriate levels of air quality.
(8) To these ends it is the purpose of this chapter to safeguard
the public interest through an intensive, progressive, and coordinated
statewide program of air pollution prevention and control, to provide
for an appropriate distribution of responsibilities, and to encourage
coordination and cooperation between the state, regional, and local
units of government, to improve cooperation between state and federal
government, public and private organizations, and the concerned
individual, as well as to provide for the use of all known, available,
and reasonable methods to reduce, prevent, and control air pollution.
(9) The legislature recognizes that the problems and effects of air
pollution cross political boundaries, are frequently regional or
interjurisdictional in nature, and are dependent upon the existence of
human activity in areas having common topography and weather conditions
conducive to the buildup of air contaminants. In addition, the
legislature recognizes that air pollution levels are aggravated and
compounded by increased population, and its consequences. These
changes often result in increasingly serious problems for the public
and the environment.
(10) The legislature further recognizes that air emissions from
thousands of small individual sources are major contributors to air
pollution in many regions of the state. As the population of a region
grows, small sources may contribute an increasing proportion of that
region's total air emissions. It is declared to be the policy of the
state to achieve significant reductions in emissions from those small
sources whose aggregate emissions constitute a significant contribution
to air pollution in a particular region.
(11) It is the intent of the legislature that air pollution goals
be incorporated in the missions and actions of state agencies.

Sec. 102 RCW 70.94.015 and 1998 c 321 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The air pollution control account is established in the state
treasury. All receipts collected by or on behalf of the department
from RCW 70.94.151(2) (as recodified by this act), and receipts from
nonpermit program sources under RCW 70.94.152(1) and 70.94.154(7) (as
recodified by this act), and all receipts from RCW 70.94.650((,)) and
70.94.660((, 82.44.020(2), and 82.50.405)) (as recodified by this act)
shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be
used only to develop and implement the provisions of ((chapters 70.94))
this chapter and chapter 70.120 RCW.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the amounts
collected and allocated in accordance with this section shall be
expended upon appropriation except ((as otherwise provided in this
section and in accordance with the following limitations:)) that
portions of moneys received by the department ((of ecology)) from the
air pollution control account shall be distributed by the department to
local authorities based on:
(a) The level and extent of air quality problems within ((such))
the authority's jurisdiction;
(b) The costs associated with implementing air pollution regulatory
programs by ((such)) the authority; and
(c) The amount of funding available to ((such)) the authority from
other sources, whether state, federal, or local, that could be used to
implement ((such)) their programs.
(((3) The air operating permit account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. All receipts collected by or on behalf of the
department from permit program sources under RCW 70.94.152(1),
70.94.161, 70.94.162, and 70.94.154(7) shall be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
activities described in RCW 70.94.152(1), 70.94.161, 70.94.162, and
70.94.154(7). Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.))

Sec. 103 RCW 70.94.017 and 2005 c 295 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Money deposited in the segregated subaccount of the air
pollution control account under RCW 46.68.020(2) shall be distributed
as follows:
(a) Eighty-five percent shall be distributed to air pollution
control authorities created under this chapter. The money must be
distributed in direct proportion with the amount of fees imposed under
RCW 46.12.080, 46.12.170, and 46.12.181 that are collected within the
boundaries of each authority. However, an amount in direct proportion
with those fees collected in counties for which no air pollution
control authority exists must be distributed to the department.
(b) The remaining fifteen percent shall be distributed to the
department.
(2) Money distributed to air pollution control authorities and the
department under subsection (1) of this section must be used as
follows:
(a) Eighty-five percent of the money received by an air pollution
control authority or the department is available on a priority basis to
retrofit school buses with exhaust emission control devices or to
provide funding for fueling infrastructure necessary to allow school
bus fleets to use alternative, cleaner fuels. In addition, the
director ((of ecology)) or the air pollution control officer may direct
funding under this section for other publicly owned diesel equipment if
the director ((of ecology)) or the air pollution control officer finds
that funding for other publicly owned diesel equipment will provide
public health benefits and further the purposes of this chapter.
(b) The remaining fifteen percent may be used by the air pollution
control authority or department to reduce transportation-related air
contaminant emissions and clean up air pollution, or reduce and monitor
toxic air contaminants.
(3) Money in the air pollution control account may be spent by the
department only after appropriation.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2020.

Sec. 104 RCW 70.94.030 and 2005 c 197 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Acid deposition" means wet or dry deposition from the
atmosphere of chemical compounds with a pH of less than 5.6.
(2)(a) "Affected urban growth area" means:
(i) An urban growth area, designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110,
whose boundaries contain a state highway segment exceeding the one
hundred person hours of delay threshold calculated by the department of
transportation, and any contiguous urban growth areas; and
(ii) An urban growth area, designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110,
containing a jurisdiction with a population over seventy thousand that
adopted a commute trip reduction ordinance before the year 2000, and
any contiguous urban growth areas.
(b) Affected urban growth areas will be listed by the department of
transportation in the rules for chapter 329, Laws of 2006 using the
criteria identified in (a) of this subsection.
(3) "Agricultural activity" means the growing, raising, or
production of horticultural or viticultural crops, berries, poultry,
livestock, shellfish, grain, mint, hay, and dairy products.
(4) "Agricultural land" means at least five acres of land devoted
primarily to the commercial production of livestock, agricultural
commodities, or cultured aquatic products.
(5) "Air contaminant" means dust, fumes, mist, smoke, other
particulate matter, vapor, gas, odorous substance, or any combination
((thereof)) of these substances.
(((2))) (6) "Air pollution" is presence in the outdoor atmosphere
of one or more air contaminants in sufficient quantities and of such
characteristics and duration as is, or is likely to be, injurious to
human health, plant or animal life, or property, or which unreasonably
interfere with enjoyment of life and property. For the purpose of this
chapter, air pollution shall not include air contaminants emitted in
compliance with chapter 17.21 RCW.
(((3))) (7) "Air quality standard" means an established
concentration, exposure time, and frequency of occurrence of an air
contaminant or multiple air contaminants in the ambient air which shall
not be exceeded.
(((4))) (8) "Ambient air" means the surrounding outside air.
(((5))) (9) "Areas threatening to exceed air quality standards"
means areas projected by the department to exceed air quality standards
within five years.
(10) "Authority" and "authorities" means any air pollution control
agency created under RCW 70.94.053 (as recodified by this act) whose
jurisdictional boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of one or
more counties.
(((6))) (11) "Base year" means the twelve-month period commencing
when a major employer is determined to be participating by the local
jurisdiction, on which commute trip reduction goals shall be based.
(12) "Best available control technology" (((BACT))) or "BACT" means
an emission limitation based on the maximum degree of reduction for
each air pollutant subject to regulation under this chapter emitted
from or that results from any new or modified stationary source, that
the permitting authority, on a case-by-case basis, taking into account
energy, environmental, and economic impacts and other costs, determines
is achievable for such a source or modification through application of
production processes and available methods, systems, and techniques,
including fuel cleaning, clean fuels, or treatment or innovative fuel
combustion techniques for control of each such a pollutant. ((In no
event shall application of "best available control technology" result
in emissions of any pollutants that will exceed the emissions allowed
by any applicable standard under 40 C.F.R. Part 60 and Part 61, as they
exist on July 25, 1993, or their later enactments as adopted by
reference by the director by rule. Emissions from any source utilizing
clean fuels, or any other means, to comply with this subsection shall
not be allowed to increase above levels that would have been required
under the definition of BACT as it existed prior to enactment of the
federal clean air act amendments of 1990.
(7))) (13) "Best available retrofit technology" (((BART))) or
"BART" means an emission limitation based on the degree of reduction
achievable through the application of the best system of continuous
emission reduction for each pollutant that is emitted by an existing
stationary facility. The emission limitation must be established, on
a case-by-case basis, taking into consideration the technology
available, the costs of compliance, the energy and nonair quality
environmental impacts of compliance, any pollution control equipment in
use or in existence at the source, the remaining useful life of the
source, and the degree of improvement in visibility that might
reasonably be anticipated to result from the use of the technology.
(((8))) (14) "Board" means the board of directors of an authority.
(((9))) (15) "Bubble" or "bubble concept" means an air pollution
control system that permits aggregate measurements of allowable
emissions for a single category of pollutant and for emissions points
from a specified emissions-generating facility or facilities.
(16) "Certification" means a determination by a regional
transportation planning organization that a locally designated growth
and transportation efficiency center program meets the minimum criteria
developed in a collaborative regional process and the rules established
by the department of transportation.
(17) "Commute trip" means trips made from a worker's home to a
worksite during the peak period of 6:00 a.m. to 9:00 a.m. on weekdays.
(18) "Commute trip vehicle miles traveled per employee" means the
sum of the individual vehicle commute trip lengths in miles over a set
period divided by the number of full-time employees during that period.
(19) "Component city," "component town," or "component county"
means a city, town, or county that is a component of an authority.
(20) "Control officer" means the air pollution control officer of
any authority.
(((10))) (21) "Critical level of acid deposition and lake, stream,
and soil acidification" means the level at which irreparable damage may
occur unless corrective action is taken.
(22) "De minimis new sources" means new sources with trivial levels
of emissions that do not pose a threat to human health or the
environment.
(23) "Department" ((or "ecology")) means the department of ecology.
(((11))) (24) "Director" means the director of the department.
(25) "Emission" means a release of air contaminants into the
ambient air.
(((12))) (26) "Emission standard" and "emission limitation" mean a
requirement established under the federal clean air act or this chapter
that limits the quantity, rate, or concentration of emissions of air
contaminants on a continuous basis, including any requirement relating
to the operation or maintenance of a source to assure continuous
emission reduction, and any design, equipment, work practice, or
operational standard adopted under the federal clean air act or this
chapter.
(((13))) (27) "Episode" means an air pollution episode, as
described in RCW 70.94.710 (as recodified by this act).
(28) "Fine particulate" means particulates with a diameter of two
and one-half microns and smaller.
(((14))) (29) "Fireplace" means:
(a) Any permanently installed masonry fireplace; or
(b) Any factory-built metal solid fuel burning device designed to
be used with an open combustion chamber and without features to control
the air to fuel ratio.
(30) "Fugitive dust" means a particulate emission made airborne by
human activity, forces of wind, or both, and which do not pass through
a stack, chimney, vent, or other functionally equivalent opening.
(31) "Good agricultural practices" means economically feasible
practices that are customary among or appropriate to farms and ranches
of a similar nature in the local area.
(32) "Grain" means a grain or a pulse.
(33) "Grain warehouse" or "grain elevator" is an establishment
classified in standard industrial classification (SIC) code 5153 for
wholesale trade for which a license, as defined by this section, is
required and includes, but is not limited to, a licensed facility that
also conducts cleaning operations for grain.
(34) "Growth and transportation efficiency center" means a defined,
compact, mixed-use urban area that contains jobs or housing and
supports multiple modes of transportation. For the purpose of funding,
a growth and transportation efficiency center must meet minimum
criteria established by the commute trip reduction board under RCW
70.94.537 (as recodified by this act), and must be certified by a
regional transportation planning organization as established in RCW
47.80.020.
(35) "License" is a license issued by the department of agriculture
licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator under
chapter 22.09 RCW or a license issued by the federal government
licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator for
purposes similar to those of licensure for the facility under chapter
22.09 RCW.
(36) "Lowest achievable emission rate" (((LAER))) or "LAER" means
for any source that rate of emissions that reflects:
(a) The most stringent emission limitation that is contained in the
implementation plan of any state for such class or category of source,
unless the owner or operator of the proposed source demonstrates that
such limitations are not achievable; or
(b) The most stringent emission limitation that is achieved in
practice by such class or category of source, whichever is more
stringent.
In no event shall the application of this term permit a proposed
new or modified source to emit any pollutant in excess of the amount
allowable under applicable new source performance standards.
(((15))) (37) "Major employer" means a private or public employer,
including state agencies, that employs one hundred or more full-time
employees at a single worksite who begin their regular work day between
6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on weekdays for at least twelve continuous
months during the year.
(38) "Major employment installation" means a military base or
federal reservation, excluding tribal reservations, at which there are
one hundred or more full-time employees, who begin their regular
workday between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on weekdays, for at least
twelve continuous months during the year.
(39) "Major worksite" means a building or group of buildings that
are on physically contiguous parcels of land or on parcels separated
solely by private or public roadways or rights of way, and at which
there are one hundred or more full-time employees, who begin their
regular work day between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on weekdays, for at
least twelve continuous months.
(40) "Modification" means any physical change in, or change in the
method of operation of, a stationary source that increases the amount
of any air contaminant emitted by such source or that results in the
emission of any air contaminant not previously emitted. The term
modification shall be construed consistent with the definition of
modification in Section 7411, Title 42, United States Code, and with
rules implementing that section.
(((16))) (41) "Multicounty authority" means an authority which
consists of two or more counties.
(((17))) (42) "New source" means (a) the construction or
modification of a stationary source that increases the amount of any
air contaminant emitted by such source or that results in the emission
of any air contaminant not previously emitted, and (b) any other
project that constitutes a new source under the federal clean air act.
(((18))) (43) "New wood stove" means a wood stove that:
(a) Is sold at retail, bargained, exchanged, or given away for the
first time by the manufacturer, the manufacturer's dealer or agency, or
a retailer; and
(b) Has not been so used to have become what is commonly known as
"second hand" within the ordinary meaning of that term.
(44) "Nonurban areas" are unincorporated areas within a county that
is not designated as an urban growth area under chapter 36.70A RCW.
(45) "Opacity" means the degree to which an object seen through a
plume is obscured, stated as a percentage. The methods approved by the
department in accordance with RCW 70.94.331 (as recodified by this act)
must be used to establish opacity for the purposes of this chapter.
(46) "Outdoor burning" means the combustion of material of any type
in an open fire or in an outdoor container without providing for the
control of combustion or the control of emissions from the combustion.
(47) "Permit program source" means a source required to apply for
or to maintain an operating permit under RCW 70.94.161 (as recodified
by this act).
(((19))) (48) "Person" means an individual, firm, public or private
corporation, association, partnership, political subdivision of the
state, municipality, or governmental agency.
(((20))) (49) "Person hours of delay" means the daily person hours
of delay per mile in the peak period of 6:00 a.m. to 9:00 a.m., as
calculated using the best available methodology by the department of
transportation.
(50) "Proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips" means
the number of commute trips made by single-occupant automobiles divided
by the number of full-time employees.
(51) "Reasonably available control technology" (((RACT))) or "RACT"
means the lowest emission limit that a particular source or source
category is capable of meeting by the application of control technology
that is reasonably available considering technological and economic
feasibility. ((RACT is determined on a case-by-case basis for an
individual source or source category taking into account the impact of
the source upon air quality, the availability of additional controls,
the emission reduction to be achieved by additional controls, the
impact of additional controls on air quality, and the capital and
operating costs of the additional controls. RACT requirements for a
source or source category shall be adopted only after notice and
opportunity for comment are afforded.
(21))) (52) "Regulated pollutant" has the same meaning as defined
in section 502(b) of the federal clean air act as it existed on July
25, 1993, or its later enactment as adopted by reference by the
director by rule.
(53) "Regulated refrigerant" means a class I or class II substance
as listed in Title VI of section 602 of the federal clean air act
amendments of November 15, 1990.
(54) "Silvicultural burning" means burning of wood fiber on forest
land consistent with the provisions of RCW 70.94.660 (as recodified by
this act).
(((22))) (55) "Solid fuel burning device" means any device for
burning wood, coal, or any other nongaseous and nonliquid fuel,
including a wood stove and fireplace.
(56) "Source" means all of the emissions units including
quantifiable fugitive emissions, that are located on one or more
contiguous or adjacent properties, and are under the control of the
same person, or persons under common control, whose activities are
ancillary to the production of a single product or functionally related
group of products.
(((23))) (57) "Stationary source" means any building, structure,
facility, or installation that emits or may emit any air contaminant.
(((24))) (58) "Substantially remodeled" means any alteration or
restoration of a building exceeding sixty percent of the appraised
value of the building within a twelve-month period.
(59) "Trigger level" means the ambient level of fine particulates,
measured in micrograms per cubic meter, that must be detected prior to
initiating a first or second stage of impaired air quality under ((RCW
70.94.473)) section 316 of this act.
(60) "Wood stove" means a solid fuel burning device, other than a
fireplace not meeting the requirements of RCW 70.94.457 (as recodified
by this act), including any fireplace insert, wood stove, wood burning
heater, wood stick boiler, coal-fired furnace, coal stove, or similar
device burning any solid fuel used for aesthetic or space-heating
purposes in a private residence or commercial establishment, which has
a heat input less than one million British thermal units per hour.
"Wood stove" does not include wood cook stoves.

Sec. 105 RCW 70.94.035 and 1991 c 199 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a technical assistance unit
within its air quality program, consistent with the federal clean air
act, to provide the regulated community, especially small businesses
with:
(((1))) (a) Information on air pollution laws, rules, compliance
methods, and technologies;
(((2))) (b) Information on air pollution prevention methods and
technologies, and prevention of accidental releases;
(((3))) (c) Assistance in obtaining permits and developing emission
reduction plans;
(((4))) (d) Information on the health and environmental effects of
air pollution.
(2) No representatives of the department designated as part of the
technical assistance unit created in this section may have any
enforcement authority.
(3) Staff of the technical assistance unit created in this section
who provide on-site consultation at an industrial or commercial
facility and who observe violations of air quality rules shall
immediately inform the owner or operator of the facility of such
violations. On-site consultation visits shall not be regarded as an
inspection or investigation and no notices or citations may be issued
or civil penalties assessed during such a visit. However, violations
shall be reported to the appropriate enforcement agency and the
facility owner or operator shall be notified that the violations will
be reported.
(4) No enforcement action shall be taken by the enforcement agency
for violations reported by technical assistance unit staff unless and
until the facility owner or operator has been provided reasonable time
to correct the violation((.)), except that violations that place any
person in imminent danger of death or substantial bodily harm or cause
physical damage to the property of another in an amount exceeding one
thousand dollars may result in immediate enforcement action by the
appropriate enforcement agency.

Sec. 106 RCW 70.94.037 and 1991 c 199 s 219 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, in areas subject
to a state implementation plan under this chapter, no state agency,
metropolitan planning organization, or local government shall approve
or fund a transportation plan, program, or project within or that
affects a nonattainment area unless a determination has been made that
the plan, program, or project conforms with the state implementation
plan for air quality as required by the federal clean air act.
(2) Conformity determinations under this section shall be made by
the state or local government or metropolitan planning organization
administering or developing the plan, program, or project.
((No later than eighteen months after May 15, 1991,)) (3) A project
with a scope that is limited to preservation or maintenance, or both,
is exempt from a conformity determination requirement under this
section.
(4) The director of the department ((of ecology)) and the secretary
of transportation, in consultation with other state, regional, and
local agencies as appropriate, shall adopt by rule criteria and
guidance for demonstrating and assuring conformity of plans, programs,
and projects that are wholly or partially federally funded.
((A project with a scope that is limited to preservation or
maintenance, or both, shall be exempted from a conformity determination
requirement.))

Sec. 107 RCW 70.94.040 and 1980 c 175 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except where specified in a variance permit, as provided in RCW
70.94.181 (as recodified by this act), it shall be unlawful for any
person to cause air pollution or permit it to be caused in violation of
this chapter, or of any ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation
validly ((promulgated hereunder)) adopted under this chapter.

Sec. 108 RCW 70.94.041 and 1991 c 199 s 506 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any building or
structure listed on the national register of historic sites,
structures, or buildings established pursuant to 80 Stat. 915, 16
U.S.C. Sec. 470a, or on the state register established pursuant to RCW
27.34.220, shall be permitted to burn wood as it would have when it was
a functioning facility as an authorized exception to the provisions of
this chapter. ((Such))
(2) The burning of wood permitted under this section shall not be
exempted from the provisions of RCW 70.94.710 ((through 70.94.730)),
70.94.715, 70.94.720, 70.94.725, or 70.94.730 (as recodified by this
act).

Sec. 109 RCW 70.94.053 and 1995 c 135 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In each county of the state there is hereby created an air
pollution control authority, which shall bear the name of the county
within which it is located. The boundaries of each authority shall be
coextensive with the boundaries of the county within which it is
located. An authority shall include all incorporated and
unincorporated areas of the county within which it is located.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 70.94.262 (as recodified by this
act), all authorities which are presently activated authorities shall
carry out the duties and exercise the powers provided in this chapter.
Those activated authorities which encompass contiguous counties are
declared to be and directed to function as a multicounty authority.
(3) All other air pollution control authorities are hereby
designated as inactive authorities.
(4) The boards of those authorities designated as activated
authorities by this chapter shall be comprised of such individuals as
is provided in RCW 70.94.100 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 110 RCW 70.94.055 and 1995 c 135 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county may activate an air
pollution control authority following a public hearing on its own
motion, or upon a filing of a petition signed by one hundred property
owners within the county. If the county legislative authority
determines as a result of the public hearing that((:
(1))) air pollution exists or is likely to occur((;)) and
(((2))) the city or town ordinances, or county resolutions, or
their enforcement, are inadequate to prevent or control air pollution,
it may by resolution activate an air pollution control authority or
combine with a contiguous county or counties to form a multicounty air
pollution control authority.
(2)(a) The respective boards of county commissioners of two or more
contiguous counties may merge any combination of their several inactive
or activated authorities to form one activated multicounty authority.
Upon a determination that the purposes of this chapter will be served
by such a merger, each board of county commissioners may adopt the
resolution providing for a merger. The resolution becomes effective
only when a similar resolution is adopted by the other contiguous
county or counties comprising the proposed authority.
(b) The boundaries of the multicounty authority must be coextensive
with the boundaries of the counties within which it is located.
(c) The name of a multicounty authority organized under this
section must either bear the names of the counties making up the
multicounty authority or a name adopted by the board of such a
multicounty authority.

Sec. 111 RCW 70.94.069 and 1969 ex.s. c 168 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever there occurs a merger of an inactive authority with an
activated authority or authorities, or of two activated authorities to
form a multicounty authority, the board of directors shall be
reorganized as provided in RCW 70.94.100((, 70.94.110,)) and 70.94.120
(as recodified by this act).
(2) In the case of the merger of two or more activated authorities
the rules and regulations of each authority shall continue in effect
and shall be enforced within the jurisdiction of each until such time
as the board of directors adopts rules and regulations applicable to
the newly formed multicounty authority.
(3) In the case of the merger of an inactive authority with an
activated authority or authorities, upon approval of such merger by the
board or boards of county commissioners of the county or counties
comprising the existing activated authority or authorities, the rules
and regulations of the activated authority or authorities shall remain
in effect until superseded by the rules and regulations of the
multicounty authority as provided in RCW 70.94.230 (as recodified by
this act).

Sec. 112 RCW 70.94.070 and 1969 ex.s. c 168 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The resolution or resolutions activating an ((air pollution))
authority shall specify:
(a) The name of the authority and participating political bodies;
(b) The authority's principal place of business;
(c) The territory included within ((it)) the authority; and
(d) The effective date upon which ((such)) the authority shall
begin to transact business and exercise its powers.
(2) In addition, ((such)) a resolution or resolutions activating an
air pollution authority may specify:
(a) The amount of money to be contributed annually by each
political subdivision((,)); or
(b) A method of dividing expenses of the air pollution control
program.
(3) Upon the adoption of a resolution or resolutions calling for
the activation of an authority or the merger of an inactive or
activated authority or several activated authorities to form a
multicounty authority, the governing body of each shall ((cause)) file
a certified copy of each such ordinance or resolution ((to be filed
in)) with the office of the secretary of state of the state of
Washington. From and after the date of filing with the secretary of
state a certified copy of each ((such)) resolution, or resolutions, or
the date specified in such resolution or resolutions, whichever is
later, the authority may begin to function and may exercise its powers.
(4) Any authority activated by the provisions of this chapter shall
((cause)) file a certified copy of all information required by this
section ((to be filed in)) with the office of the secretary of state of
the state of Washington.

Sec. 113 RCW 70.94.081 and 1969 ex.s. c 168 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) An activated authority shall:
(a) Be deemed a municipal corporation;
(b) Have right to perpetual succession; and
(c) Adopt and use a seal((;)).
(2) An activated authority may:
(a) Sue and be sued in the name of the authority in all courts and
in all proceedings; and((, may))
(b) Receive, account for, and disburse funds, employ personnel, and
acquire or dispose of any interest in real or personal property within
or without the authority in the furtherance of its purposes.
(3) An authority may not be deemed to be a state agency.

Sec. 114 RCW 70.94.085 and 2003 c 70 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An authority may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant to recover from the applicant the
reasonable costs incurred by the authority in carrying out the
requirements of this chapter, as well as the requirements of other
relevant laws, as they relate to permit coordination, environmental
review, application review, technical studies, and permit processing.
The cost-reimbursement agreement shall identify the specific tasks,
costs, and schedule for work to be conducted under the agreement.
(2) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be negotiated
with the permit applicant. Under the provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant shall be used by the
((air pollution control)) authority to contract with an independent
consultant to carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement
agreement. The ((air pollution control)) authority may also use funds
provided under a cost-reimbursement agreement to assign current staff
to review the work of the consultant, to provide necessary technical
assistance when an independent consultant with comparable technical
skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable and necessary direct
and indirect costs that arise from processing the permit. The ((air
pollution control)) authority shall, in developing the agreement,
ensure that final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the
agency and not by the consultant. The ((air pollution control))
authority shall make an estimate of the number of permanent staff hours
to process the permits, and shall contract with consultants to replace
the time and functions committed by these permanent staff to the
project. The billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost
accounting and may include a billing cycle that provides for progress
payments. Use of cost-reimbursement agreements shall not reduce the
current level of staff available to work on permits not covered by
cost-reimbursement agreements. The ((air pollution control)) authority
may not use any funds under a cost-reimbursement agreement to replace
or supplant existing funding.
(3) The provisions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a cost-reimbursement agreement. Members of the ((air pollution control))
authority's board of directors shall be considered as state officers,
and employees of the ((air pollution control)) authority shall be
considered as state employees, for the sole purpose of applying the
restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW to this section.
(((3))) (4) An ((air pollution control)) authority may not enter
into any new cost-reimbursement agreements on or after July 1, 2007.
The authority may continue to administer any cost-reimbursement
agreement that was entered into before July 1, 2007, until the project
is completed.

Sec. 115 RCW 70.94.091 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 84 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) An activated authority shall have the power to levy additional
taxes in excess of either the constitutional ((and/or)) or statutory
tax limitations, or both, for any of the authorized purposes of
((such)) the activated authority, not in excess of twenty-five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value a year when authorized so to do
by the electors of ((such)) the authority by a three-fifths majority of
those voting on the proposition at a special election, to be held in
the year in which the levy is made, in the manner set forth in Article
VII, section 2 (a) of the Constitution of this state, as amended by
Amendment 59 and as thereafter amended. The expense of all special
elections held under this section must be paid by the authority.
(2) It is the duty of the assessor of each component county to
certify annually to the board the aggregate assessed valuation of all
taxable property in all incorporated and unincorporated areas situated
in any activated authority, as the information appears from the last
assessment roll in the county.
(3) Nothing ((herein)) in this section shall be construed to
prevent holding the foregoing special election at the same time as that
fixed for a general election. ((The expense of all special elections
held pursuant to this section shall be paid by the authority.))

Sec. 116 RCW 70.94.092 and 1991 c 199 s 703 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 1.16.030,)) (1) The budget
year of each activated authority shall be the fiscal year beginning
July 1st and ending on the following June 30th.
(2) On or before the fourth Monday in June of each year, each
activated authority shall adopt a budget for the following fiscal year.
The activated authority budget shall contain adequate funding and
provide for staff sufficient to carry out the provisions of all
applicable ordinances, resolutions, and local regulations related to
the reduction, prevention, and control of air pollution. ((The
legislature acknowledges the need for the state to provide reasonable
funding to local authorities to carry out the requirements of this
chapter.))
(3) The budget shall contain an estimate of all revenues to be
collected during the following budget year, including any surplus funds
remaining unexpended from the preceding year. The remaining funds
required to meet budget expenditures, if any, shall be designated as
"supplemental income" and shall be obtained from the component cities,
towns, and counties in the manner provided in this chapter.
(4) The affirmative vote of three-fourths of all members of the
board ((shall be)) is required to authorize emergency expenditures.
(5) The legislature acknowledges the need for the state to provide
reasonable funding to local authorities to carry out the requirements
of this chapter.

Sec. 117 RCW 70.94.093 and 1969 ex.s. c 168 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Each component city or town shall pay ((such)) a proportion of
the supplemental income to the authority as determined by either one of
the following prescribed methods described in (a) and (b) of this
subsection or by a combination of fifty percent of ((one)) the method
described in (a) of this subsection and fifty percent of the ((other))
method described in (b) of this subsection, as provided in ((subsection
(1)))(c) of this ((section:)) subsection.
(a) Each component city or town shall pay ((such)) the proportion
of the supplemental income ((as)) that the assessed valuation of
property within ((its)) the limits of the city or town bears to the
total assessed valuation of taxable property within the activated
authority.
(b) Each component city or town shall pay ((such)) the proportion
of the supplemental income ((as)) that the total population of ((such))
the city or town bears to the total population of the activated
authority. The population of the city or town shall be determined by
the most recent census, estimate, or survey by the federal bureau of
census or any state board or commission authorized to make ((such)) a
census, estimate, or survey.
(c) Each component city or town shall pay a combination of the
methods prescribed in (a) and (b) of this subsection((: PROVIDED, That
such)). However, the combination ((shall)) must be of fifty percent of
the method prescribed in (a) of this subsection and fifty percent of
the method prescribed in (b) of this subsection.
(2) Each component county shall pay ((such)) a proportion of
((such)) the supplemental income to the authority as determined by
either ((one of the following prescribed methods)) the method described
in (a) of this subsection, the method described in (b) of this
subsection, or by a combination of fifty percent of ((one)) the amount
calculated under (a) of this subsection and fifty percent of the
((other)) amount calculated under (b) of this subsection as prescribed
in ((subsection (2)))(c) of this ((section:)) subsection.
(a) Each component county shall pay ((such)) the proportion of
((such)) the supplemental income ((as)) that the assessed valuation of
the property within the unincorporated area of ((such)) the county
lying within the activated authority bears to the total assessed
valuation of taxable property within the activated authority.
(b) Each component county shall pay ((such)) the proportion of the
supplemental income ((as)) that the total population of the
unincorporated area of ((such)) the county bears to the total
population of the activated authority. The population of the county
shall be determined by the most recent census, estimate, or survey by
the federal bureau of census or any state board or commission
authorized to make ((such)) a census, estimate, or survey.
(c) Each component county shall pay a combination of the methods
prescribed in (a) and (b) of this subsection((: PROVIDED, That such)).
However, the combination ((shall)) must be of fifty percent of the
method prescribed in (a) of this subsection and fifty percent of the
method prescribed in (b) of this subsection.
(3)(a) In making ((such)) a determination of the assessed valuation
of property in the component cities, towns, and counties, the board
shall use the last available assessed valuations.
(b) The board shall certify to each component city, town, and
county, prior to the fourth Monday in June of each year, the share of
the supplemental income to be paid by ((such)) the component city,
town, or county for the next calendar year. ((The latter shall then
include such amount in its budget for the ensuing calendar year, and
during such year shall pay to the activated authority, in equal
quarterly installments, the amount of its supplemental share.))

Sec. 118 RCW 70.94.094 and 1969 ex.s. c 168 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A component city, town, or county receiving a certified notice
from a board under RCW 70.94.093 (as recodified by this act) shall
include an amount equal to the amount certified by the board in its
budget for the ensuing calendar year, and during that calendar year
shall pay to the activated authority, in equal quarterly installments,
the amount of its supplemental share.
(2) The treasurer of each component city, town, or county shall
create a separate fund into which shall be paid all money collected
from taxes, or from any other available sources, levied by or obtained
for the activated authority on property, or on any other available
sources, located in ((such)) the city, town, or county ((and such)).
Any money collected in the separate fund shall be forwarded quarterly
by the treasurer of ((each such)) the city, town, or county to the
treasurer of the county designated by the board as the authority
treasurer.
(3) The treasurer of the county ((so)) designated to serve as the
treasurer of the authority shall establish and maintain ((such)) the
funds as ((may be)) authorized by the board. Money shall be disbursed
from ((such)) funds upon warrants drawn by the auditor of the county
designated by the board as the authority auditor as authorized by the
board.
(4) The respective county shall be reimbursed by the board for
services rendered by the treasurer and auditor of the ((respective))
county in connection with the receipt and disbursement of ((such))
funds under this chapter.

Sec. 119 RCW 70.94.096 and 1969 ex.s. c 168 s 12 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) An activated authority ((shall have)) has the power, when
authorized by a majority of all members of the board, to borrow money
from any component city, town, or county ((and such)).
(2) Component cities, towns, and counties ((are hereby authorized
to)) may make ((such)) loans or advances ((on such terms as may be
mutually agreed upon by the board and the legislative bodies of any
such component city, town or county)) to activated authorities in order
to provide funds to carry out the purposes of the activated authority.
(3) Any loans or advances made under this section must be made on
terms mutually agreed upon by the board of the borrowing authority and
the legislative body of the lending component city, town, or county.

Sec. 120 RCW 70.94.097 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 106 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to paying its share of the supplemental income of
((the)) an activated authority under RCW 70.94.093 (as recodified by
this act), each component city, town, or county ((shall have)) has the
power to contract with ((such)) an authority and expend funds ((for
the)) to conduct ((of)) special studies, investigations, plans,
research, advice, or consultation relating to air pollution and its
causes, effects, prevention, abatement, and control ((as such may
affect)) if the study involves the effects of air pollution on any area
within the boundaries of the component city, town, or county, and
((which)) could not be performed by the authority with funds otherwise
available to it.
(2) Any component city, town, or county which contracts for ((the
conduct of such)) special air pollution studies, investigations, plans,
research, advice, or consultation with any entity other than ((the)) an
activated authority shall require that ((such an)) contracted entity
consult with the activated authority.

Sec. 121 RCW 70.94.100 and 2006 c 227 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governing body of each authority shall be known as the
board of directors.
(2)(a) In the case of an authority comprised of one county((,))
with a population of less than four hundred thousand people, the board
shall be comprised of two appointees of the city selection committee((,
at least one of whom shall represent the city having the most
population in the county,)) established under RCW 70.94.120 (as
recodified by this act) and two representatives to be designated by the
board of county commissioners. At least one of the two appointees made
by the city selection committee must represent the city with the
largest population in the county.
(b) In the case of an authority comprised of one county((,)) with
a population of equal to or greater than four hundred thousand people,
the board shall be comprised of three appointees of cities((, one each
from the two cities with the most population in the county and one
appointee of the city selection committee representing the other
cities,)) and one representative to be designated by the board of
county commissioners. Of the three city appointees, the two cities
with the highest population in the county must each be represented by
one appointee, and the third appointee must be selected by the city
selection committee established under RCW 70.94.120 (as recodified by
this act) to represent the other cities in the county.
(c) In the case of an authority comprised of two, three, four, or
five counties, the board shall be comprised of one appointee from each
county, who shall represent the city having the most population in
((such)) the county((, to be designated by the mayor and city council
of such city,)) and one representative from each county ((to be)). The
county appointee must be designated by the board of county
commissioners of each component county ((making up the authority)) and
the appointees representing cities must be designated by the mayor and
city council of the city.
(d) In the case of an authority comprised of six or more counties,
the board shall be comprised of one representative from each county, to
be designated by the board of county commissioners of each component
county ((making up the authority)), and three appointees, one each from
the three largest cities within the local authority's jurisdiction, to
be appointed by the mayor and city council of ((such)) the city.
(3) If the board of an authority otherwise would consist of an even
number, the members selected as ((above)) provided by this section
shall agree upon and elect an additional member who shall be:
(a) In the case of an authority comprised of one county with a
population of equal to or greater than four hundred thousand people, a
citizen residing in the county who demonstrates significant
professional experience in the field of public health, air quality
protection, or meteorology; or
(b) In the case of an authority comprised of one county, with a
population less than four hundred thousand people, or of more than one
county, either a member of the governing body of one of the towns,
cities, or counties comprising the authority, or a private citizen
residing in the authority.
(4) The terms of office of board members shall be four years.
(((5) Wherever a member of a board has a potential conflict of
interest in an action before the board, the member shall declare to the
board the nature of the potential conflict prior to participating in
the action review. The board shall, if the potential conflict of
interest, in the judgment of a majority of the board, may prevent the
member from a fair and objective review of the case, remove the member
from participation in the action.))

Sec. 122 RCW 70.94.120 and 1995 c 261 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be a separate and distinct city selection committee
for each county making up an authority. The membership of each
committee consists of the mayor of each incorporated city and town
within the county, except that the mayors of the cities with the most
population in a county, having already designated appointees to the
board of an authority comprised of a single county under RCW 70.94.100
(as recodified by this act), may not be members of the committee. A
majority of the members of each city selection committee constitutes a
quorum.
(2)(a) The city selection committee of each component county
((which is included within an authority)) shall meet within one month
after the activation of ((such)) the authority for the purpose of
making ((its)) initial appointments to the board of ((such)) the
authority under RCW 70.94.100 (as recodified by this act) and
((thereafter whenever)) at other times necessary for the purpose of
making succeeding appointments.
(b) All meetings ((shall be)) held ((upon)) under this section must
be announced with at least two weeks' written notice given by the
county auditor to each member of the city selection committee of each
county ((and he shall give such)). In addition, the county auditor
shall provide notice upon request of any member of ((such)) the
committee. A similar notice shall be given to the general public by
((a)) the publication ((of such notice)) in a newspaper of general
circulation in ((such)) the authority. The county auditor shall act as
recording officer, maintain its records, and give appropriate notice of
its proceedings and actions.
(((2))) (3) As an alternative to meeting in accordance with
subsection (((1))) (2) of this section, the county auditor may mail
ballots by certified mail to the members of the city selection
committee, specifying a date by which to complete the ballot, and a
date by which to return the completed ballot. Each mayor who chooses
to participate in the balloting shall write in the choice for
appointment, sign the ballot, and return the ballot to the county
auditor. Each completed ballot shall be date-stamped upon receipt by
the mayor or staff of the mayor of the city or town. The timely return
of completed ballots by a majority of the members of each city
selection committee constitutes a quorum and the common choice by a
majority of the quorum constitutes a valid appointment.
(((3))) (4) Balloting shall be preceded by at least two weeks'
written notice, given by the county auditor to each member of the city
selection committee. A similar notice shall be given to the general
public by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the
authority.

Sec. 123 RCW 70.94.130 and 1998 c 342 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The board shall exercise all powers of the authority except as
otherwise provided.)) (1) The board shall conduct its ((first))
initial meeting within thirty days ((after all of its members have been
appointed or)) of its member's appointments or as otherwise designated
as provided in RCW 70.94.100 (as recodified by this act).
(2) The board shall meet at least ten times per year((.)) with all
meetings ((shall be)) publicly announced prior to their occurrence((.
All meetings shall be)) and open to the public. A majority of the
board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and
shall be necessary for any action taken by the board.
(3) The board shall elect from its members a chair and ((such))
other officers as may be necessary.
(4) Any member of the board may designate a regular alternate to
serve on the board in his or her place with the same authority as the
member when he or she is unable to attend. However, in no event may a
regular alternate serve as the permanent chair.
(5) Each member of the board, or his or her representative, shall
receive from the authority compensation, not to exceed one thousand
dollars per year, consistent with ((such)) the authority's rates (((but
not to exceed one thousand dollars per year))) for time spent in the
performance of duties under this chapter, plus the actual and necessary
expenses incurred by the member ((in such performance)). The board may
appoint a control officer, and any other personnel, and shall determine
their salaries((, and pay same,)). The board shall pay salaries
together with any other proper indebtedness, from authority funds.

Sec. 124 RCW 70.94.141 and 1991 c 199 s 706 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided, the board of any activated authority,
in addition to any other powers vested in them by law, shall ((have))
exercise all powers of the authority, including but not limited to the
power to:
(1) Adopt, amend, and repeal its own rules and regulations,
implementing this chapter and consistent with it, after consideration
at a public hearing held in accordance with chapter 42.30 RCW. Rules
and regulations shall also be adopted in accordance with the notice and
adoption procedures set forth in RCW 34.05.320, those provisions of RCW
34.05.325 that are not in conflict with chapter 42.30 RCW, and with the
procedures of RCW 34.05.340, ((34.05.355)) 34.05.360, 34.05.365 through
34.05.380, and with chapter 34.08 RCW, except that rules ((shall)) need
not be published in the Washington Administrative Code. Judicial
review of rules adopted by an authority shall be in accordance with
Part V of chapter 34.05 RCW((. An air pollution control authority
shall not be deemed to be a state agency.));
(2) Hold hearings relating to any aspect of or matter in the
administration of this chapter not prohibited by the provisions of
chapter 62, Laws of 1970 ex. sess. ((and in connection therewith))
When holding hearings the authority may issue subpoenas to compel the
attendance of witnesses and the production of evidence, administer
oaths, and take the testimony of any person under oath((.));
(3) Issue ((such)) orders ((as)) that may be necessary to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter and enforce ((the same)) this
chapter by all appropriate administrative and judicial proceedings
subject to the rights of appeal as provided in chapter 62, Laws of 1970
ex. sess.;
(4) Require access to records, books, files, and other information
specific to the control, recovery, or release of air contaminants into
the atmosphere((.));
(5) Secure necessary scientific, technical, administrative, and
operational services, including laboratory facilities, by contract or
otherwise((.));
(6) Prepare and develop a comprehensive plan or plans for the
prevention, abatement, and control of air pollution within ((its)) the
jurisdiction((.)) of the authority;
(7) Encourage voluntary cooperation by persons or affected groups
to achieve the purposes of this chapter((.));
(8) Encourage and conduct studies, investigation, and research
relating to air pollution and its causes, effects, prevention,
abatement, and control((.));
(9) Collect and disseminate information and conduct educational and
training programs relating to air pollution((.));
(10) Advise, consult, cooperate, and contract with agencies and
departments and the educational institutions of the state, other
political subdivisions, industries, other states, interstate or
interlocal agencies, and the United States government, and with
interested persons or groups((.));
(11) ((Consult, upon request, with any person proposing to
construct, install, or otherwise acquire an air contaminant source or
device or system for the control thereof, concerning the efficacy of
such device or system, or the air pollution problems which may be
related to the source, device or system. Nothing in any such
consultation shall be construed to relieve any person from compliance
with this chapter, ordinances, resolutions, rules and regulations in
force pursuant thereto, or any other provision of law.
(12))) Accept, receive, disburse, and administer grants or other
funds or gifts from any source, including public and private agencies
and the United States government for the purpose of carrying out any of
the functions of this chapter.

Sec. 125 RCW 70.94.142 and 1987 c 109 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
In connection with the subpoena powers given in RCW 70.94.141(2)
(as recodified by this act):
(1) In any hearing held under RCW 70.94.181 ((and 70.94.221)) (as
recodified by this act), the board or the department, and their
authorized agents:
(a) Shall issue a subpoena upon the request of any party and, to
the extent required by rule or regulation, upon a statement or showing
of general relevance and reasonable scope of the evidence sought;
(b) May issue a subpoena upon their own motion.
(2) The subpoena powers given in RCW 70.94.141(2) (as recodified by
this act) shall be statewide in effect.
(3)(a) Witnesses appearing under the compulsion of a subpoena in a
hearing before the board or the department shall be paid the same fees
and mileage that are provided for witnesses in the courts of this
state. ((Such fees))
(b) Fees and mileage, and the cost of duplicating records required
to be produced by subpoena issued upon the motion of the board or
department, shall be paid by the board or department. ((Such))
(c) Fees and mileage, and the cost of producing records required to
be produced by subpoena issued upon the request of a party, shall be
paid by that party.
(4)(a) If an individual fails to obey ((the)) a subpoena issued
under this chapter, or obeys the subpoena but refuses to testify when
required concerning any matter under examination or investigation or
that is the subject of the hearing, the board or department shall file
its written report ((thereof)) and proof of service of its subpoena, in
any court of competent jurisdiction in the county where the
examination, hearing, or investigation is being conducted.
((Thereupon, the))
(b) A court ((shall forthwith)) receiving a written report and
proof of service from a board or the department under this subsection
shall cause the individual to be brought before it and, upon being
satisfied that the subpoena is within the jurisdiction of the board or
department and otherwise in accordance with law, shall punish ((him as
if the failure or refusal related to)) the subject of the subpoena in
the same manner as that court would punish an individual who fails or
refuses to abide by a subpoena ((from or testimony in)) issued by that
court.
(5) The department may ((make such)) adopt rules ((and
regulations)) as to the issuance of its own subpoenas ((as)) that are
not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 126 RCW 70.94.151 and 2005 c 138 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The board of any activated authority ((or)) and the
department((,)) may classify air contaminant sources, by ordinance,
resolution, rule, or regulation, which in ((its)) the judgment of the
board or department may cause or contribute to air pollution((,)).
(b) Classifications made pursuant to this section:
(i) Must be made according to levels and types of emissions and
other characteristics which cause or contribute to air pollution((,
and));
(ii) May require either registration or reporting, or both, for any
((such)) class or classes((. Classifications made pursuant to this
section));
(iii) May be for application to the area of jurisdiction of
((such)) the authority, or the state as a whole, or to any designated
area within the jurisdiction((,)); and ((shall))
(iv) Must be made with special reference to effects on health,
economic and social factors, and physical effects on property.
(2) ((Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any
person operating or responsible for the operation of air contaminant
sources of any class for which the ordinances, resolutions, rules or
regulations of the department or board of the authority, require
registration and reporting shall register therewith and make reports
containing information as may be required by such department or board
concerning location, size and height of contaminant outlets, processes
employed, nature of the contaminant emission and such other information
as is relevant to air pollution and available or reasonably capable of
being assembled. The department or board may require that such
registration be accompanied by a fee and may determine the amount of
such fee for such class or classes: PROVIDED, That the amount of the
fee shall only be to compensate for the costs of administering such
registration program which shall be defined as initial registration and
annual or other periodic reports from the source owner providing
information directly related to air pollution registration, on-site
inspections necessary to verify compliance with registration
requirements, data storage and retrieval systems necessary for support
of the registration program, emission inventory reports and emission
reduction credits computed from information provided by sources
pursuant to registration program requirements, staff review, including
engineering analysis for accuracy and currentness, of information
provided by sources pursuant to registration program requirements,
clerical and other office support provided in direct furtherance of the
registration program, and administrative support provided in directly
carrying out the registration program: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any such
registration made with either the board or the department shall
preclude a further registration with any other board or the department.
All registration program fees collected by the department shall be
deposited in the air pollution control account. All registration
program fees collected by the local air authorities shall be deposited
in their respective treasuries.
(3) If a registration or report has been filed for a grain
warehouse or grain elevator as required under this section,
registration, reporting, or a registration program fee shall not, after
January 1, 1997, again be required under this section for the warehouse
or elevator unless the capacity of the warehouse or elevator as listed
as part of the license issued for the facility has been increased since
the date the registration or reporting was last made. If the capacity
of the warehouse or elevator listed as part of the license is
increased, any registration or reporting required for the warehouse or
elevator under this section must be made by the date the warehouse or
elevator receives grain from the first harvest season that occurs after
the increase in its capacity is listed in the license.
This subsection does not apply to a grain warehouse or grain
elevator if the warehouse or elevator handles more than ten million
bushels of grain annually.
(4) For the purposes of subsection (3) of this section:
(a) A "grain warehouse" or "grain elevator" is an establishment
classified in standard industrial classification (SIC) code 5153 for
wholesale trade for which a license is required and includes, but is
not limited to, such a licensed facility that also conducts cleaning
operations for grain;
(b) A "license" is a license issued by the department of
agriculture licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator
under chapter 22.09 RCW or a license issued by the federal government
licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator for
purposes similar to those of licensure for the facility under chapter
22.09 RCW; and
(c) "Grain" means a grain or a pulse)) This section does not apply
to any program permit source under RCW 70.94.161 (as recodified by this
act) after the effective date of the United States environmental
protection agency's approval of the state operating permit program.

Sec. 127 RCW 70.94.152 and 1996 c 67 s 1 and 1996 c 29 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department ((of ecology)) or board of any authority may
require notice of the establishment of any proposed new sources, except
for single family and duplex dwellings or de minimis new sources as
defined in rules adopted under subsection (((11))) (9) of this section.
(2)(a) The department ((of ecology)) or board may require ((such))
notice under this section to be accompanied by a fee ((and determine)).
The amount of ((such)) the fee((: PROVIDED, That the amount of the
fee)) must be determined by the department or board consistent with
this section, but may not exceed the cost of reviewing the plans,
specifications, and other information and administering such a
notice((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any such notice given or notice of
construction application submitted to either the board or to the
department of ecology shall preclude a further submittal of a duplicate
application to any board or to the department of ecology)).
(((2))) (b) The department shall, after opportunity for public
review and comment, adopt rules that establish a workload-driven
process for determination and review of the fee covering the direct and
indirect costs of processing a notice of construction application and
a methodology for tracking revenues and expenditures. All new source
fees collected by the delegated local air authorities from sources
shall be deposited in the dedicated accounts of their respective
treasuries.
(c) All new source fees collected by the department from sources
shall be deposited in the air pollution control account created in RCW
70.94.015 (as recodified by this act).
(3) Notice given or notice of construction application submitted to
either the board or to the department under this section precludes a
further submittal of a duplicate application to any board or to the
department.
(4)(a) Within thirty days of receipt of a notice of a construction
application under this section, the department ((of ecology)) or board
shall either notify the applicant in writing that the application is
complete or notify the applicant in writing of all additional
information necessary to complete the application. The department or
board may require, as a condition precedent to the establishment of the
new source or sources covered ((thereby)) by the notice, the submission
of plans, specifications, and ((such)) other information as ((it)) the
department or board deems necessary ((to determine)) in determining
whether the proposed new source will be in ((accord)) compliance with
the applicable rules and regulations ((in force)) adopted under this
chapter.
(b) If on the basis of plans, specifications, or other information
required under this section, the department ((of ecology)) or board
determines that the proposed new source will not be in ((accord))
compliance with this chapter or the applicable ordinances, resolutions,
rules, and regulations adopted under this chapter, ((it)) the
department or board shall issue an order denying permission to
establish the new source.
(c) If on the basis of plans, specifications, or other information
required under this section, the department ((of ecology)) or board
determines that the proposed new source will be in ((accord))
compliance with this chapter, and the applicable rules and regulations
adopted under this chapter, ((it)) the department or board shall issue
an order of approval for the establishment of the new source or
sources((, which)). An order of approval may provide ((such))
conditions ((as)) that are reasonably necessary to ((assure)) ensure
the maintenance of compliance with this chapter and the applicable
rules and regulations adopted under this chapter. Every order of
approval under this chapter must be reviewed prior to issuance by a
professional engineer or staff under the supervision of a professional
engineer in the employ of the department ((of ecology)) or board.
(((4))) (d) Within sixty days of receipt of a complete application,
the department or board shall either (i) issue a final decision on the
application, or (ii) for those projects subject to public notice,
initiate notice and comment on a proposed decision, followed as
promptly as possible by a final decision. A person seeking approval to
construct or modify a source that requires an operating permit may
elect to integrate review of the operating permit application or
amendment required by RCW 70.94.161 (as recodified by this act) and the
notice of construction application required by this section. A notice
of construction application designated for integrated review must be
processed in accordance with operating permit program procedures and
deadlines.
(e) A notice of construction approval required under this
subsection must include a determination that the new source will
achieve best available control technology. If more stringent controls
are required under federal law, the notice of construction must include
a determination that the new source will achieve the more stringent
federal requirements. Nothing in this subsection is intended to
diminish other state authorities under this chapter.
(f) The determination required under this subsection (((3) of this
section)) shall include a determination of whether the operation of the
new air contaminant source at the location proposed will cause any
ambient air quality standard to be exceeded.
(5) New source review of a modification shall be limited to the
emission unit or units proposed to be modified and the air contaminants
whose emissions would increase as a result of the modification.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the
department ((of ecology)) or board to require the use of emission
control equipment or other equipment, machinery, or devices of any
particular type, from any particular supplier, or produced by any
particular manufacturer.
(7) Any features, machines, and devices constituting parts of or
called for by plans, specifications, or other information submitted
pursuant to subsection (1) or (((3))) (4) of this section shall be
maintained and operate in good working order.
(8) The absence of an ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation,
or the failure to issue an order pursuant to this section shall not
relieve any person from his or her obligation to comply with applicable
emission control requirements or with any other provision of law.
(9) ((Within thirty days of receipt of a notice of construction
application the department of ecology or board shall either notify the
applicant in writing that the application is complete or notify the
applicant in writing of all additional information necessary to
complete the application. Within sixty days of receipt of a complete
application the department or board shall either (a) issue a final
decision on the application, or (b) for those projects subject to
public notice, initiate notice and comment on a proposed decision,
followed as promptly as possible by a final decision. A person seeking
approval to construct or modify a source that requires an operating
permit may elect to integrate review of the operating permit
application or amendment required by RCW 70.94.161 and the notice of
construction application required by this section. A notice of
construction application designated for integrated review shall be
processed in accordance with operating permit program procedures and
deadlines.
(10) A notice of construction approval required under subsection
(3) of this section shall include a determination that the new source
will achieve best available control technology. If more stringent
controls are required under federal law, the notice of construction
shall include a determination that the new source will achieve the more
stringent federal requirements. Nothing in this subsection is intended
to diminish other state authorities under this chapter.
(11))) No person is required to submit a notice of construction or
receive approval for a new source that is deemed by the department ((of
ecology)) or board to have de minimis impact on air quality. The
department ((of ecology)) shall adopt and periodically update rules
identifying categories of de minimis new sources. The department ((of
ecology)) may identify de minimis new sources by category, size, or
emission thresholds.
(((12) For purposes of this section, "de minimis new sources" means
new sources with trivial levels of emissions that do not pose a threat
to human health or the environment.))

Sec. 128 RCW 70.94.153 and 1991 c 199 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person proposing to replace or substantially alter the
emission control technology installed on an existing stationary source
emission unit shall file a notice of construction application with the
jurisdictional permitting authority. For projects not otherwise
reviewable under RCW 70.94.152 (as recodified by this act), the
permitting authority may (((1))):
(a) Require that the owner or operator employ reasonably available
control technology for the affected emission unit; and (((2) may))
(b) Prescribe reasonable operation and maintenance conditions for
the control equipment.
(2) Within thirty days of receipt of an application for notice of
construction under this section, the permitting authority shall either
notify the applicant in writing that the application is complete or
notify the applicant in writing of all additional information necessary
to complete the application.
(3) Within thirty days of receipt of a complete application the
permitting authority shall either issue an order of approval or a
proposed RACT determination for the proposed project. Construction
shall not commence on a project subject to review under this section
until the permitting authority issues a final order of approval.
However, any notice of construction application filed under this
section shall be deemed to be approved without conditions if the
permitting authority takes no action within thirty days of receipt of
a complete application for a notice of construction.

Sec. 129 RCW 70.94.154 and 1996 c 29 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) RACT, as defined in RCW 70.94.030 (as recodified by this act),
is required for existing sources, except as otherwise provided in RCW
70.94.331(((9))) (as recodified by this act).
(2) RACT is to be determined on a case-by-case basis for an
individual source or source category taking into account the impact of
the source upon air quality, the availability of additional controls,
the emission reduction to be achieved by additional controls, the
impact of additional controls on air quality, and the capital and
operating costs of the additional controls. RACT for each source
category containing three or more sources shall be determined by rule,
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section. RACT
requirements for a source or source category must be adopted only after
notice and opportunity for comment are afforded.
(3) Source-specific RACT determinations may be performed under any
of the following circumstances:
(a) As authorized by RCW 70.94.153 (as recodified by this act);
(b) When required by the federal clean air act;
(c) For sources in source categories containing fewer than three
sources;
(d) When an air quality problem, for which the source is a
contributor, justifies a source-specific RACT determination prior to
development of a categorical RACT rule; or
(e) When a source-specific RACT determination is needed to address
either specific air quality problems for which the source is a
significant contributor or source-specific economic concerns.
(4) ((By January 1, 1994, ecology)) (a) The department shall
((develop)) maintain a list of sources and source categories requiring
RACT review and a schedule for conducting that review((. Ecology)) and
shall review the list and schedule within six months of receiving the
initial operating permit applications and at least once every five
years thereafter.
(b) In developing the list to determine the schedule of RACT
review, ((ecology)) the department shall consider:
(i) Emission reductions achievable through the use of new available
technologies and the impacts of those incremental reductions on air
quality((,));
(ii) The remaining useful life of previously installed control
equipment((,));
(iii) The impact of the source or source category on air
quality((,));
(iv) The number of years since the last BACT, RACT, or LAER
determination for that source; and
(v) Other relevant factors.
(c) Prior to finalizing the list and schedule, ((ecology)) the
department shall consult with local air authorities, the regulated
community, environmental groups, and other interested individuals and
organizations. ((The department and local authorities shall revise
RACT requirements, as needed, based on the review conducted under this
subsection.))
(5) In determining RACT, ((ecology)) the department and local
authorities shall utilize the factors set forth in ((RCW 70.94.030))
subsection (2) of this section and shall consider RACT determinations
and guidance made by the federal environmental protection agency, other
states and local authorities for similar sources, and other relevant
factors. In establishing or revising RACT requirements, ((ecology))
the department and local authorities shall address, where practicable,
all air contaminants deemed to be of concern for that source or source
category. The department and local authorities shall revise RACT
requirements, as needed, based on the review conducted under subsection
(4) of this section.
(6) Emission standards and other requirements contained in rules or
regulatory orders in effect at the time of operating permit issuance or
renewal shall be considered RACT for purposes of permit issuance or
renewal. RACT determinations under subsections (2) and (3) of this
section shall be incorporated into operating permits as provided in RCW
70.94.161 (as recodified by this act) and rules implementing that
section.
(7)(a) The department and local air authorities are authorized to
assess and collect a fee to cover the costs of developing,
establishing, or reviewing categorical or case-by-case RACT
requirements. The fee shall apply to determinations of RACT
requirements as defined under this section and RCW 70.94.331(((9))) (as
recodified by this act).
(b) The amount of the fee may not exceed the direct and indirect
costs of establishing the requirement for the particular source or the
pro rata portion of the direct and indirect costs of establishing the
requirement for the relevant source category.
(c) The department shall, after opportunity for public review and
comment, adopt rules that establish a workload-driven process for
determination and review of the fee covering the direct and indirect
costs of its RACT determinations and a methodology for tracking
revenues and expenditures.
(d) All ((such)) RACT determination fees collected by the delegated
local air authorities from sources shall be deposited in the dedicated
accounts of their respective treasuries. All ((such)) RACT fees
collected by the department from sources shall be deposited in the air
pollution control account created in RCW 70.94.015 (as recodified by
this act).

Sec. 130 RCW 70.94.155 and 1991 c 199 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) As used in subsection (3) of this section, the term "bubble"
means an air pollution control system which permits aggregate
measurements of allowable emissions, for a single category of
pollutant, for emissions points from a specified emissions-generating
facility or facilities. Individual point source emissions levels from
such specified facility or facilities may be modified provided that the
aggregate limit for the specified sources is not exceeded.
(2))) Whenever any regulation relating to emission standards or
other requirements for the control of emissions is adopted which
provides for compliance with ((such)) the standards or requirements no
later than a specified time after the date of adoption of the
regulation, the appropriate activated ((air pollution control))
authority or, ((if there be none)) when applicable, the department ((of
ecology)) shall, by permit or regulatory order, issue to air
contaminant sources subject to the standards or requirements, schedules
of compliance setting forth timetables for the achievement of
compliance as expeditiously as practicable, but in no case later than
the time specified in the regulation. Interim dates in ((such))
schedules for the completion of steps of progress toward compliance
shall be as enforceable as the final date for full compliance
((therein.
(3) Wherever requirements necessary for the attainment of air
quality standards or, where such standards are not exceeded, for the
maintenance of air quality can be achieved through the use of a control
program involving the bubble concept, such program may be authorized by
a regulatory order or orders or permit issued to the air contaminant
source or sources involved. Such order or permit shall only be
authorized after the control program involving the bubble concept is
accepted by [the] United States environmental protection agency as part
of an approved state implementation plan. Any such order or permit
provision shall restrict total emissions within the bubble to no more
than would otherwise be allowed in the aggregate for all emitting
processes covered. The orders or permits provided for by this
subsection shall be issued by the department or the authority with
jurisdiction. If the bubble involves interjurisdictional approval,
concurrence in the total program must be secured from each regulatory
entity concerned)).

Sec. 131 RCW 70.94.157 and 1991 c 199 s 315 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department and local ((air pollution control)) authorities
shall preempt the application of chapter 9 of the uniform building code
and article 80 of the uniform fire code when implemented by other state
agencies and local governments for the purposes of controlling outdoor
air pollution from industrial and commercial sources, except where
authorized by chapter 199, Laws of 1991. Actions by other state
agencies and local governments under article 80 of the uniform fire
code to take immediate action in response to an emission that presents
a physical hazard or imminent health hazard are not preempted.

Sec. 132 RCW 70.94.161 and 1993 c 252 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department ((of ecology)), or board of an authority, shall
require renewable permits for the operation of air contaminant sources,
including sources operated by government agencies, subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(1) Permits shall be issued for a term of five years. A permit may
be modified or amended during its term at the request of the permittee,
or for any reason allowed by the federal clean air act. ((The rules
adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall include rules
for permit amendments and modifications.)) The terms and conditions of
a permit shall remain in effect after the permit itself expires if the
permittee submits a timely and complete application for permit renewal.
(2)(a) Rules establishing the elements for a statewide operating
permit program and the process for permit application and renewal,
consistent with federal requirements, shall be established by the
department ((by January 1, 1993)). ((The))
(b) Rules ((shall)) adopted under this section must:
(i) Provide that every proposed permit must be reviewed prior to
issuance by a professional engineer or staff under the direct
supervision of a professional engineer in the employ of the permitting
authority;
(ii) Include rules for permit amendments and modifications;
(iii) Specify procedures for public notice and comment consistent
with this section; and
(iv) Not preclude a delegated local air authority from including in
a permit its own more stringent emission standards and operating
restrictions.
(c) The permit program established by ((these)) the rules adopted
under this section shall be administered by the department and
delegated local air authorities. ((Rules developed under this
subsection shall not preclude a delegated local air authority from
including in a permit its own more stringent emission standards and
operating restrictions.
(b))) (3)(a) Except for the authority granted the energy facility
site evaluation council to issue permits for the new construction,
reconstruction, or enlargement or operation of new energy facilities
under chapter 80.50 RCW, the department may exercise the authority, as
delegated by the environmental protection agency, to administer Title
IV of the federal clean air act, as amended, and to delegate the
administration to local authorities as authorized by (b) of this
subsection.
(b)(i) The board of any ((local air pollution control)) authority
may apply to the department ((of ecology)) for a delegation order
authorizing the ((local)) authority to administer the operating permit
program for sources under that authority's jurisdiction. A delegation
request must include adequate information about the local authority's
resources to enable the department to make the findings required by
this subsection.
(ii) The department shall, by order, approve ((such)) a delegation
to an authority, if the department finds that the ((local)) authority
has the technical and financial resources((,)) to discharge the
responsibilities of a permitting authority under the federal clean air
act. ((A delegation request shall include adequate information about
the local authority's resources to enable the department to make the
findings required by this subsection; provided,)) Any delegation order
issued under this subsection shall take effect ninety days after the
environmental protection agency authorizes the local authority to issue
operating permits under the federal clean air act.
(((c) Except for the authority granted the energy facility site
evaluation council to issue permits for the new construction,
reconstruction, or enlargement or operation of new energy facilities
under chapter 80.50 RCW, the department may exercise the authority, as
delegated by the environmental protection agency, to administer Title
IV of the federal clean air act as amended and to delegate such
administration to local authorities as applicable pursuant to (b) of
this subsection.
(3))) (4) In establishing technical standards, ((defined in RCW
70.94.030,)) the permitting authority shall consider and, if found to
be appropriate, give credit for waste reduction within the process.
(((4))) (5)(a) Operating permits shall apply to all sources
(((a))):
(i) Where required by the federal clean air act((,)); and (((b) for
any source))
(ii) That may cause or contribute to air pollution in ((such)) a
quantity ((as to create)) that creates a threat to the public health or
welfare. ((Subsection))
(b) The provisions of (a)(ii) of this subsection ((is)) are not
intended to apply to small businesses, except when both of the
following limitations are satisfied:
(i) The source is in an area exceeding or threatening to exceed
federal or state air quality standards, as that term is defined in RCW
70.94.030 (as recodified by this act); and
(ii) The department provides a reasonable justification that
requiring a source to have a permit is necessary to meet a federal or
state air quality standard, or to prevent exceeding a standard in an
area threatening to exceed the standard. ((For purposes of this
subsection "areas threatening to exceed air quality standards" shall
mean areas projected by the department to exceed such standards within
five years.))
(c) Prior to identifying threatened areas the department shall hold
a public hearing or hearings within the proposed areas.
(((5) Sources operated by government agencies are not exempt under
this section.))
(6) Within one hundred eighty days after the United States
environmental protection agency approves the state operating permit
program, a person required to have a permit shall submit to the
permitting authority a compliance plan and permit application, signed
by a responsible official, certifying the accuracy of the information
submitted. Until permits are issued, existing sources ((shall be)) are
allowed to operate under presently applicable standards and conditions
provided that ((such)) the sources submit complete and timely permit
applications.
(7) All draft permits ((shall be)) are subject to public notice and
comment. The rules adopted pursuant to ((subsection (2) of)) this
section shall specify procedures for public notice and comment.
((Such)) The procedures shall provide the permitting agency with an
opportunity to respond to comments received from interested parties
prior to the time that the proposed permit is submitted to the
environmental protection agency for review pursuant to section 505(a)
of the federal clean air act. In the event that the environmental
protection agency objects to a proposed permit pursuant to section
505(b) of the federal clean air act, the permitting authority shall not
issue the permit, unless the permittee consents to the changes required
by the environmental protection agency.
(8) The procedures contained in chapter 43.21B RCW shall apply to
permit appeals. The pollution control hearings board may stay the
effectiveness of any permit issued under this section during the
pendency of an appeal filed by the permittee, if the permittee
demonstrates that compliance with the permit during the pendency of the
appeal would require significant expenditures that would not be
necessary in the event that the permittee prevailed on the merits of
the appeal.
(9) After the effective date of any permit program ((promulgated))
adopted under this section, it ((shall be)) is unlawful for any person
to:
(a) Operate a permitted source in violation of any requirement of
a permit issued under this section; or
(b) Fail to submit a permit application at the time required by
rules adopted under ((subsection (2) of)) this section.
(10) Each air operating permit shall state the origin of and
specific legal authority for each requirement included ((therein)) in
the permit. Every requirement in an operating permit shall be based
upon the most stringent of the following requirements:
(a) The federal clean air act and rules implementing ((that)) the
federal clean air act, including provisions of the approved state
implementation plan;
(b) This chapter and rules adopted ((thereunder)) under this
chapter;
(c) In permits issued by a local ((air pollution control))
authority, the requirements of any order or regulation adopted by that
authority;
(d) Chapter 70.98 RCW and rules adopted ((thereunder)) under
chapter 70.98 RCW; and
(e) Chapter 80.50 RCW and rules adopted ((thereunder)) under
chapter 80.50 RCW.
(11) Consistent with the provisions of the federal clean air act,
the permitting authority may issue general permits covering categories
of permitted sources, and temporary permits authorizing emissions from
similar operations at multiple temporary locations.
(12)(a) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, permit
program sources within the territorial jurisdiction of an authority
delegated the operating permit program under this section shall file
their permit applications with that authority((, except that)).
(b) Permit applications for sources regulated on a statewide basis
pursuant to RCW 70.94.395 (as recodified by this act), and permit
program sources outside the territorial jurisdiction of a delegated
authority shall be filed with the department. ((Permit program sources
outside the territorial jurisdiction of a delegated authority shall
file their applications with the department.))
(c) Permit program sources subject to chapter 80.50 RCW shall,
irrespective of their location, file their applications with the energy
facility site evaluation council.
(13) When issuing operating permits to coal fired electric
generating plants, the permitting authority shall establish
requirements consistent with Title IV of the federal clean air act.
(14)(((a) The department and the local air authorities are
authorized to assess and to collect, and each source emitting one
hundred tons or more per year of a regulated pollutant shall pay an
interim assessment to fund the development of the operating permit
program during fiscal year 1994.
(b) The department shall conduct a workload analysis and prepare an
operating permit program development budget for fiscal year 1994. The
department shall allocate among all sources emitting one hundred tons
or more per year of a regulated pollutant during calendar year 1992 the
costs identified in its program development budget according to a
three-tiered model, with each of the three tiers being equally
weighted, based upon:
(i) The number of sources;
(ii) The complexity of sources; and
(iii) The size of sources, as measured by the quantity of each
regulated pollutant emitted by the source.
(c) Each local authority and the department shall collect from
sources under their respective jurisdictions the interim fee determined
by the department and shall remit the fee to the department.
(d) Each local authority may, in addition, allocate its fiscal year
1994 operating permit program development costs among the sources under
its jurisdiction emitting one hundred tons or more per year of a
regulated pollutant during calendar year 1992 and may collect an
interim fee from these sources. A fee assessed pursuant to this
subsection (14)(d) shall be collected at the same time as the fee
assessed pursuant to (c) of this subsection.
(e) The fees assessed to a source under this subsection shall be
limited to the first seven thousand five hundred tons for each
regulated pollutant per year.
(15) The department shall determine the persons liable for the fee
imposed by subsection (14) of this section, compute the fee, and
provide by November 1 of 1993 the identity of the fee payer with the
computation of the fee to each local authority and to the department of
revenue for collection. The department of revenue shall collect the
fee computed by the department from the fee payers under the
jurisdiction of the department. The administrative, collection, and
penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW shall apply to the collection
of the fee by the department of revenue. The department shall provide
technical assistance to the department of revenue for decisions made by
the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 82.32.160 and 82.32.170. All
interim fees collected by the department of revenue on behalf of the
department and all interim fees collected by local authorities on
behalf of the department shall be deposited in the air operating permit
account. The interim fees collected by the local air authorities to
cover their permit program development costs under subsection (14)(d)
of this section shall be deposited in the dedicated accounts of their
respective treasuries.
All fees identified in this section shall be due and payable on
March 1 of 1994, except that the local air pollution control
authorities may adopt by rule an earlier date on which fees are to be
due and payable. The section 5, chapter 252, Laws of 1993 amendments
to RCW 70.94.161 do not have the effect of terminating, or in any way
modifying, any liability, civil or criminal, incurred pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 70.94.161 (15) and (17) as they existed prior to July
25, 1993.
(16))) For sources or source categories not required to obtain
permits under ((subsection (4) of)) this section, the department or
((local)) authority may establish, by rule, control technology
requirements. If control technology rule revisions are made by the
department or local authority under this subsection, the department or
local authority shall consider the remaining useful life of control
equipment previously installed on existing sources before requiring
technology changes. The department or any ((local air)) authority may
issue a general permit, as authorized under the federal clean air act,
for such sources.
(((17) RCW 70.94.151 shall not apply to any permit program source
after the effective date of United States environmental protection
agency approval of the state operating permit program.))

Sec. 133 RCW 70.94.162 and 1998 c 245 s 129 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The department and delegated local air authorities are
authorized to determine, assess, and collect, and)) Each permit program
source, other than a source that receives its operating permit from the
United States environmental protection agency as the permitting
authority, shall pay((,)) annual fees sufficient to cover the direct
and indirect costs of implementing a state operating permit program
approved by the United States environmental protection agency under the
federal clean air act. ((However, a source that receives its operating
permit from the United States environmental protection agency shall not
be considered a permit program source so long as the environmental
protection agency continues to act as the permitting authority for that
source.))
(2) The department and delegated authorities are authorized to
determine, assess, and collect fees required under this section. Each
permitting authority shall develop by rule a fee schedule consistent
with section 309 of this act allocating among its permit program
sources the costs of the operating permit program, and may, by rule,
establish a payment schedule ((whereby)) allowing periodic installments
of the annual fee ((are due and payable more frequently)). The
department shall establish, by rule, procedures for administrative
appeals to the department regarding the fee assessed under this
section.
(3) All operating permit program fees collected by the department
shall be deposited in the air operating permit account created in
section 301 of this act. All operating permit program fees collected
by the delegated local air authorities shall be deposited in their
respective air operating permit accounts or other accounts dedicated
exclusively to support of the operating permit program.
(4) The fees assessed under this ((subsection)) section shall first
be due not less than forty-five days after the United States
environmental protection agency delegates to the department the
authority to administer the operating permit program and then annually
thereafter.
((The department shall establish, by rule, procedures for
administrative appeals to the department regarding the fee assessed
pursuant to this subsection.
(2) The fee schedule developed by each permitting authority shall
fully cover and not exceed both its permit administration costs and the
permitting authority's share of statewide program development and
oversight costs.
(a) Permit administration costs are those incurred by each
permitting authority, including the department, in administering and
enforcing the operating permit program with respect to sources under
its jurisdiction. Costs associated with the following activities are
fee eligible as these activities relate to the operating permit program
and to the sources permitted by a permitting authority, including,
where applicable, sources subject to a general permit:
(i) Preapplication assistance and review of an application and
proposed compliance plan for a permit, permit revision, or renewal;
(ii) Source inspections, testing, and other data-gathering
activities necessary for the development of a permit, permit revision,
or renewal;
(iii) Acting on an application for a permit, permit revision, or
renewal, including the costs of developing an applicable requirement as
part of the processing of a permit, permit revision, or renewal,
preparing a draft permit and fact sheet, and preparing a final permit,
but excluding the costs of developing BACT, LAER, BART, or RACT
requirements for criteria and toxic air pollutants;
(iv) Notifying and soliciting, reviewing and responding to comment
from the public and contiguous states and tribes, conducting public
hearings regarding the issuance of a draft permit and other costs of
providing information to the public regarding operating permits and the
permit issuance process;
(v) Modeling necessary to establish permit limits or to determine
compliance with permit limits;
(vi) Reviewing compliance certifications and emissions reports and
conducting related compilation and reporting activities;
(vii) Conducting compliance inspections, complaint investigations,
and other activities necessary to ensure that a source is complying
with permit conditions;
(viii) Administrative enforcement activities and penalty
assessment, excluding the costs of proceedings before the pollution
control hearings board and all costs of judicial enforcement;
(ix) The share attributable to permitted sources of the development
and maintenance of emissions inventories;
(x) The share attributable to permitted sources of ambient air
quality monitoring and associated recording and reporting activities;
(xi) Training for permit administration and enforcement;
(xii) Fee determination, assessment, and collection, including the
costs of necessary administrative dispute resolution and penalty
collection;
(xiii) Required fiscal audits, periodic performance audits, and
reporting activities;
(xiv) Tracking of time, revenues and expenditures, and accounting
activities;
(xv) Administering the permit program including the costs of
clerical support, supervision, and management;
(xvi) Provision of assistance to small businesses under the
jurisdiction of the permitting authority as required under section 507
of the federal clean air act; and
(xvii) Other activities required by operating permit regulations
issued by the United States environmental protection agency under the
federal clean air act.
(b) Development and oversight costs are those incurred by the
department in developing and administering the state operating permit
program, and in overseeing the administration of the program by the
delegated local permitting authorities. Costs associated with the
following activities are fee eligible as these activities relate to the
operating permit program:
(i) Review and determinations necessary for delegation of authority
to administer and enforce a permit program to a local air authority
under RCW 70.94.161(2) and 70.94.860;
(ii) Conducting fiscal audits and periodic performance audits of
delegated local authorities, and other oversight functions required by
the operating permit program;
(iii) Administrative enforcement actions taken by the department on
behalf of a permitting authority, including those actions taken by the
department under RCW 70.94.785, but excluding the costs of proceedings
before the pollution control hearings board and all costs of judicial
enforcement;
(iv) Determination and assessment with respect to each permitting
authority of the fees covering its share of the costs of development
and oversight;
(v) Training and assistance for permit program administration and
oversight, including training and assistance regarding technical,
administrative, and data management issues;
(vi) Development of generally applicable regulations or guidance
regarding the permit program or its implementation or enforcement;
(vii) State codification of federal rules or standards for
inclusion in operating permits;
(viii) Preparation of delegation package and other activities
associated with submittal of the state permit program to the United
States environmental protection agency for approval, including ongoing
coordination activities;
(ix) General administration and coordination of the state permit
program, related support activities, and other agency indirect costs,
including necessary data management and quality assurance;
(x) Required fiscal audits and periodic performance audits of the
department, and reporting activities;
(xi) Tracking of time, revenues and expenditures, and accounting
activities;
(xii) Public education and outreach related to the operating permit
program, including the maintenance of a permit register;
(xiii) The share attributable to permitted sources of compiling and
maintaining emissions inventories;
(xiv) The share attributable to permitted sources of ambient air
quality monitoring, related technical support, and associated recording
activities;
(xv) The share attributable to permitted sources of modeling
activities;
(xvi) Provision of assistance to small business as required under
section 507 of the federal clean air act as it exists on July 25, 1993,
or its later enactment as adopted by reference by the director by rule;
(xvii) Provision of services by the department of revenue and the
office of the state attorney general and other state agencies in
support of permit program administration;
(xviii) A one-time revision to the state implementation plan to
make those administrative changes necessary to ensure coordination of
the state implementation plan and the operating permit program; and
(xix) Other activities required by operating permit regulations
issued by the United States environmental protection agency under the
federal clean air act.
(3) The responsibility for operating permit fee determination,
assessment, and collection is to be shared by the department and
delegated local air authorities as follows:
(a) Each permitting authority, including the department, acting in
its capacity as a permitting authority, shall develop a fee schedule
and mechanism for collecting fees from the permit program sources under
its jurisdiction; the fees collected by each authority shall be
sufficient to cover its costs of permit administration and its share of
the department's costs of development and oversight. Each delegated
local authority shall remit to the department its share of the
department's development and oversight costs.
(b) Only those local air authorities to whom the department has
delegated the authority to administer the program pursuant to RCW
70.94.161(2) (b) and (c) and 70.94.860 shall have the authority to
administer and collect operating permit fees. The department shall
retain the authority to administer and collect such fees with respect
to the sources within the jurisdiction of a local air authority until
the effective date of program delegation to that air authority.
(c) The department shall allocate its development and oversight
costs among all permitting authorities, including the department, in
proportion to the number of permit program sources under the
jurisdiction of each authority, except that extraordinary costs or
other costs readily attributable to a specific permitting authority may
be assessed that authority. For purposes of this subsection, all
sources covered by a single general permit shall be treated as one
source.
(4) The department and each delegated local air authority shall
adopt by rule a general permit fee schedule for sources under their
respective jurisdictions after such time as the department adopts
provisions for general permit issuance. Within ninety days of the time
that the department adopts a general permit fee schedule, the
department shall report to the relevant standing committees of the
legislature regarding the general permit fee schedules adopted by the
department and by the delegated local air authorities. The permit
administration costs of each general permit shall be allocated
equitably among only those sources subject to that general permit. The
share of development and oversight costs attributable to each general
permit shall be determined pursuant to subsection (3)(c) of this
section.
(5) The fee schedule developed by the department shall allocate
among the sources for whom the department acts as a permitting
authority, other than sources subject to a general permit, those
portions of the department's permit administration costs and the
department's share of the development and oversight costs which the
department does not plan to recover under its general permit fee
schedule or schedules as follows:
(a) The department shall allocate its permit administration costs
and its share of the development and oversight costs not recovered
through general permit fees according to a three-tiered model based
upon:
(i) The number of permit program sources under its jurisdiction;
(ii) The complexity of permit program sources under its
jurisdiction; and
(iii) The size of permit program sources under its jurisdiction, as
measured by the quantity of each regulated pollutant emitted by the
source.
(b) Each of the three tiers shall be equally weighted.
(c) The department may, in addition, allocate activities-based
costs readily attributable to a specific source to that source under
RCW 70.94.152(1) and 70.94.154(7).
The quantity of each regulated pollutant emitted by a source shall
be determined based on the annual emissions during the most recent
calendar year for which data is available.
(6) The department shall, after opportunity for public review and
comment, adopt rules that establish a process for development and
review of its operating permit program fee schedule, a methodology for
tracking program revenues and expenditures and, for both the department
and the delegated local air authorities, a system of fiscal audits,
reports, and periodic performance audits.
(a) The fee schedule development and review process shall include
the following:
(i) The department shall conduct a biennial workload analysis. The
department shall provide the opportunity for public review of and
comment on the workload analysis. The department shall review and
update its workload analysis during each biennial budget cycle, taking
into account information gathered by tracking previous revenues, time,
and expenditures and other information obtained through fiscal audits
and performance audits.
(ii) The department shall prepare a biennial budget based upon the
resource requirements identified in the workload analysis for that
biennium. In preparing the budget, the department shall take into
account the projected operating permit account balance at the start of
the biennium. The department shall provide the opportunity for public
review of and comment on the proposed budget. The department shall
review and update its budget each biennium.
(iii) The department shall develop a fee schedule allocating the
department's permit administration costs and its share of the
development and oversight costs among the department's permit program
sources using the methodology described in subsection (5) of this
section. The department shall provide the opportunity for public
review of and comment on the allocation methodology and fee schedule.
The department shall provide procedures for administrative resolution
of disputes regarding the source data on which allocation
determinations are based; these procedures shall be designed such that
resolution occurs prior to the completion of the allocation process.
The department shall review and update its fee schedule annually.
(b) The methodology for tracking revenues and expenditures shall
include the following:
(i) The department shall develop a system for tracking revenues and
expenditures that provides the maximum practicable information. At a
minimum, revenues from fees collected under the operating permit
program shall be tracked on a source-specific basis and time and
expenditures required to administer the program shall be tracked on the
basis of source categories and functional categories. Each general
permit will be treated as a separate source category for tracking and
accounting purposes.
(ii) The department shall use the information obtained from
tracking revenues, time, and expenditures to modify the workload
analysis required in subsection (6)(a) of this section.
(iii) The information obtained from tracking revenues, time, and
expenditures shall not provide a basis for challenge to the amount of
an individual source's fee.
(c) The system of fiscal audits, reports, and periodic performance
audits shall include the following:
(i) The department and the delegated local air authorities shall
prepare annual reports and shall submit the reports to, respectively,
the appropriate standing committees of the legislature and the board of
directors of the local air authority.
(ii) The department shall arrange for fiscal audits and routine
performance audits and for periodic intensive performance audits of
each permitting authority and of the department.
(7) Each local air authority requesting delegation shall, after
opportunity for public review and comment, publish regulations which
establish a process for development and review of its operating permit
program fee schedule, and a methodology for tracking its revenues and
expenditures. These regulations shall be submitted to the department
for review and approval as part of the local authority's delegation
request.
(8) As used in this section and in RCW 70.94.161(14), "regulated
pollutant" shall have the same meaning as defined in section 502(b) of
the federal clean air act as it exists on July 25, 1993, or its later
enactment as adopted by reference by the director by rule.
(9) Fee structures as authorized under this section shall remain in
effect until such time as the legislature authorizes an alternative
structure following receipt of the report required by this
subsection.))

Sec. 134 RCW 70.94.163 and 1991 c 199 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall prepare recommendations to reduce air
emissions for source categories not generally required to have a permit
under RCW 70.94.161 (as recodified by this act). ((Such)) The
recommendations shall not require any action by the owner or operator
of a source and shall be consistent with rules adopted under chapter
70.95C RCW. The recommendations shall include but not be limited to:
Process changes, product substitution, equipment modifications,
hazardous substance use reduction, recycling, and energy efficiency.

Sec. 135 RCW 70.94.165 and 1996 c 294 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A gasoline vapor recovery device that captures vapors during
vehicle fueling may only be required at a service station, or any other
gasoline dispensing facility supplying fuel to the general public, in
any of the following circumstances:
(a) The facility sells in excess of six hundred thousand gallons of
gasoline per year and is located in a county, any part of which is
designated as nonattainment for ozone under the federal clean air act,
42 U.S.C. Sec. 7407; or
(b) The facility sells in excess of six hundred thousand gallons of
gasoline per year and is located in a county where a maintenance plan
has been adopted by ((a local air pollution control)) an authority or
the department ((of ecology)) that includes gasoline vapor recovery
devices as a control strategy; or
(c) ((From March 30, 1996, until December 31, 1998, in any facility
that sells in excess of one million two hundred thousand gallons of
gasoline per year and is located in an ozone-contributing county. For
purposes of this section, an ozone-contributing county means a county
in which the emissions have contributed to the formation of ozone in
any county where violations of federal ozone standards have been
measured, and includes: Cowlitz, Island, Kitsap, Lewis, Skagit,
Thurston, Wahkiakum, and Whatcom counties; or
(d) After December 31, 1998, in any)) The facility that sells in
excess of eight hundred forty thousand gallons of gasoline per year and
is located in any county, no part of which is designated as
nonattainment for ozone under the federal clean air act, 42 U.S.C. Sec.
7407, provided that the department ((of ecology)) determines by
December 31, 1997, that the use of gasoline vapor control devices in
the county is important to achieving or maintaining attainment status
in any other county.
(2) This section does not preclude the department ((of ecology)) or
any ((local air pollution)) authority from requiring a gasoline vapor
recovery device that captures vapors during vehicle refueling as part
of the regulation of sources as provided in RCW 70.94.152, 70.94.331,
or 70.94.141 (as recodified by this act) or where required under 42
U.S.C. Sec. 7412.

Sec. 136 RCW 70.94.170 and 1991 c 199 s 707 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any activated authority which has adopted an ordinance, resolution,
or valid rules and regulations as provided ((herein)) in this chapter
for the control and prevention of air pollution shall appoint a full-
time control officer((, whose)). The sole responsibility ((shall be))
of the control officer is to observe and enforce the provisions of this
chapter and all orders, ordinances, resolutions, or rules and
regulations of ((such)) the activated authority pertaining to the
control and prevention of air pollution.

Sec. 137 RCW 70.94.181 and 1991 c 199 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who owns or is in control of any plant, building,
structure, establishment, process, or equipment may apply to the
department ((of ecology)) or appropriate local authority board for a
variance from rules or regulations governing the quality, nature,
duration, or extent of discharges of air contaminants. The application
shall be accompanied by ((such)) information and data as the department
((of ecology)) or board may require. The department ((of ecology)) or
board may grant ((such)) a variance, provided that variances to state
rules shall require the department's approval prior to being issued by
a local authority board. The total time period for a variance ((and))
or renewal of ((such)) a variance shall not exceed one year. Variances
may be issued by either the department or a local board ((but only))
after a public hearing or other due notice, if the department or board
finds that:
(a) The emissions occurring or proposed to occur do not endanger
public health or safety or the environment; and
(b) Compliance with the rules or regulations from which variance is
sought would produce serious hardship without equal or greater benefits
to the public.
(2) No variance shall be granted pursuant to this section until the
department ((of ecology)) or board has considered the relative
interests of the applicant, other owners of property likely to be
affected by the discharges, and the general public.
(3) Any variance or renewal ((thereof)) of a variance shall be
granted within the requirements of subsection (1) of this section and
((under)) consistent with the following conditions ((consistent with
the reasons therefor,)) and ((within the following)) limitations:
(a) If ((the)) a variance is granted ((on the ground that)) because
there is no practicable means known or available for the adequate
prevention, abatement, or control of the pollution involved, ((it shall
be only until)) the variance expires when the necessary means for
prevention, abatement, or control become known and available((, and))
. In addition, the variance is subject to ((the taking of)) any
substitute or alternate measures that the department ((of ecology)) or
board may prescribe.
(b) If ((the)) a variance is granted ((on the ground that)) because
compliance with the particular requirement or requirements from which
variance is sought will require the taking of measures which, because
of their extent or cost, must be spread over a considerable period of
time, ((it)) the effective date of the variance shall be ((for)) a
period not to exceed such reasonable time as, in the view of the
department ((of ecology)) or board, is ((requisite)) required for the
taking of the necessary measures. A variance granted on ((the)) this
ground ((specified herein)) shall contain a timetable for the taking of
action in an expeditious manner and shall be conditioned on adherence
to ((such)) the timetable.
(c) If the variance is granted ((on the ground that)) because it is
justified to relieve or prevent hardship of a kind other than that
provided for in (a) and (b) of this subsection, ((it)) the effective
date of the variance shall ((be for)) not exceed more than one year.
(4) Any variance granted pursuant to this section may be renewed on
terms and conditions and for periods which would be appropriate on
initial granting of a variance. However, no renewal may be granted
without an application for renewal. Any renewal application must be
made at least sixty days prior to the expiration of the variance.
Immediately upon receipt of an application for renewal, the department
or board shall give public notice of the application in accordance with
rules of the department or board. If a complaint is made to the
department ((of ecology)) or board on account of the variance to be
renewed, ((no renewal thereof shall)) a renewal of the variance may not
be granted unless ((following a public hearing on the complaint on due
notice)) the department or board finds that a renewal of the variance
is justified after conducting a public hearing with due notice on the
complaint. ((No renewal shall be granted except on application
therefor. Any such application shall be made at least sixty days prior
to the expiration of the variance. Immediately upon receipt of an
application for renewal, the department of ecology or board shall give
public notice of such application in accordance with rules of the
department of ecology or board.))
(5) A variance or renewal shall not be a right of the applicant or
holder ((thereof)) but shall be granted at the discretion of the
department ((of ecology)) or board. However, any applicant adversely
affected by the denial or the terms and conditions of the granting of
an application for a variance or renewal of a variance by the
department ((of ecology)) or board may obtain judicial review
((thereof)) of the denial or terms and conditions under the provisions
of chapter 34.05 RCW ((as now or hereafter amended)).
(6) Nothing in this section and no variance or renewal granted
pursuant ((hereto)) to this section shall be construed to prevent or
limit the application of the emergency provisions and procedures of RCW
70.94.710 through 70.94.730 (as recodified by this act) to any person
or his or her property.
(7) An application for a variance, or for the renewal ((thereof))
of a variance, submitted to the department ((of ecology)) or board
pursuant to this section shall be approved or disapproved by the
department or board within sixty-five days of receipt unless the
applicant and the department ((of ecology)) or board agree to a
continuance.
(8) Variances approved under this section shall not be included in
orders or permits provided for in RCW 70.94.161 or 70.94.152 (as
recodified by this act) until such time as the variance has been
accepted by the United States environmental protection agency as part
of an approved state implementation plan.

Sec. 138 RCW 70.94.200 and 1987 c 109 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
((For the purpose of investigating conditions specific to the
control, recovery or release of air contaminants into the atmosphere,))
(1) A control officer, the department, or their duly authorized
representatives, ((shall)) have the power to enter at reasonable times
upon any private or public property, excepting nonmultiple unit private
dwellings housing two families or less, for the purpose of
investigating conditions specific to the control, recovery, or release
of air contaminants into the atmosphere.
(2) No person shall refuse entry or access to any control officer,
the department, or their duly authorized representatives, who requests
entry for the purpose of an inspection authorized under this section,
and who presents appropriate credentials((; nor shall any)).
(3) A person may not obstruct, hamper, or interfere with any ((such
inspection)) control officer, the department, or their duly authorized
representatives, during an inspection authorized under this section.

Sec. 139 RCW 70.94.205 and 1991 c 199 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Whenever)) (1) Any records or other information furnished to or
obtained by the department or the board of any authority under this
chapter, other than ambient air quality data or emission data,
((furnished to or obtained by the department of ecology or the board of
any authority under this chapter,)) must be held only for the
confidential use of the department or board if the information or
records are certified by the owner or operator of the associated
processes or production to (a) relate to processes or production unique
to the owner or operator((,)); or ((is)) (b) be likely to affect
adversely the competitive position of ((such)) the owner or operator if
released to the public or to a competitor((, and the owner or operator
of such processes or production so certifies, such records or
information shall be only for the confidential use of the department of
ecology or board)).
(2) Nothing ((herein)) in this section shall be construed to
prevent the use of records or information by the department ((of
ecology)) or board in compiling or publishing analyses or summaries
relating to the general condition of the outdoor atmosphere((:
PROVIDED, That such)) as long as the analyses or summaries do not
reveal any information that is otherwise confidential under the
provisions of this section((: PROVIDED FURTHER,)) and that emission
data furnished to or obtained by the department ((of ecology)) or board
((shall be)) is correlated with applicable emission limitations and
other control measures and ((shall be)) is made available for public
inspection during normal business hours at offices of the department
((of ecology)) or board.

Sec. 140 RCW 70.94.211 and 1991 c 199 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) At least thirty days prior to the commencement of any formal
enforcement action under RCW 70.94.430 or 70.94.431 ((a local air)) (as
recodified by this act) an authority shall cause written notice to be
served upon the alleged violator or violators. The notice shall
specify the provision of this chapter or the rule or regulation alleged
to be violated, ((and)) the facts alleged to constitute a violation
((thereof)), and may include an order directing that necessary
corrective action be taken within a reasonable time.
(2) In lieu of an order, the board or the control officer may
require that the alleged violator or violators appear before the board
for a hearing.
(3) Every notice of violation shall offer to the alleged violator
an opportunity to meet with the ((local air)) authority prior to the
commencement of enforcement action.
(4) Any order issued by the board or by the control officer becomes
final unless the order is appealed to the pollution control hearings
board as provided in chapter 43.21B RCW.

Sec. 141 RCW 70.94.230 and 1969 ex.s. c 168 s 28 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The rules and regulations ((hereafter)) adopted by an authority
under the provisions of this chapter shall supersede the existing
rules, regulations, resolutions, and ordinances of any of the component
((bodies)) city, town, or county included within ((said)) the authority
in all matters relating to the control and enforcement of air pollution
as ((contemplated)) provided by this chapter((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That)).
(2) All existing rules, regulations, resolutions, and ordinances
adopted by a component city, town, county, or other applicable
authority shall remain in effect until ((such)) the rules, regulations,
resolutions, and ordinances are superseded as provided in this
section((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing herein)).
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow the rules
and regulations adopted by an authority to supersede any local
county((,)) or city ordinances or resolutions, or any provision of the
statutory or common law pertaining to:
(a) Nuisance; ((nor to affect))
(b) Any aspect of employer-employee relationship relating to
conditions in a place of work, including without limitation,
statutes((,)) and rules or regulations governing industrial health and
safety standards or performance standards incorporated in zoning
ordinances ((or resolutions of the component bodies where such)); and
(c) Standards relating to air pollution control or air quality
((containing requirements)) that are not less stringent than those of
the authority.

Sec. 142 RCW 70.94.240 and 1991 c 199 s 709 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of any authority may appoint an air pollution control
advisory council to advise and consult with ((such)) the board((,)) and
the control officer appointed consistent with RCW 70.94.170 (as
recodified by this act) in effectuating the purposes of this chapter.
(2) The advisory council shall consist of at least five appointed
members who are residents of the authority and who are preferably
skilled and experienced in the field of air pollution control,
chemistry, meteorology, public health, or a related field((,)). At
least one ((of whom)) member of the advisory council shall serve as a
representative of industry and one ((of whom)) shall serve as a
representative of the environmental community.
(3) The chair of the board of ((any such)) the authority shall
serve as ex officio member of the advisory council and be ((its)) the
advisory council's chair.
(4) Each member of the advisory council shall receive from the
authority per diem and travel expenses in an amount not to exceed that
provided for the state board in this chapter (((but not to exceed)) or
one thousand dollars per year(())), whichever is less, for each full
day spent in the performance of his or her duties under this chapter.

Sec. 143 RCW 70.94.260 and 1979 ex.s. c 30 s 12 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) An ((air pollution control)) authority may be deactivated prior
to the term provided in the original or subsequent agreement by the
component county or counties ((comprising such authority upon)) by the
adoption by the board((, following a hearing held upon ten days notice,
to said counties,)) of a resolution for dissolution or deactivation
((and upon)).
(2) Prior to a board's adoption of a dissolution or deactivation
resolution, a hearing must be held on the proposed action and the
approval by the legislative authority of each component county
((comprising the authority)) must be secured. Any hearing conducted
under this subsection must follow at least ten days of public notice.
(3) In ((such)) the event that a dissolution or deactivation
resolution is adopted by a board, the board shall proceed to wind up
the affairs of the authority and pay all indebtedness ((thereof)) of
the authority. Any surplus of funds shall be paid over to the
component counties ((comprising the authority)) in proportion to their
last contribution.
(4) Upon the completion of the process of closing the affairs of
the authority, the board shall, by resolution entered in its minutes,
declare the authority deactivated and file a certified copy of ((such))
the resolution ((shall be filed)) with the secretary of state and the
authority shall be deemed inactive.

Sec. 144 RCW 70.94.262 and 1991 c 125 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any county that is part of a multicounty authority, pursuant to
RCW 70.94.053 (as recodified by this act), may withdraw from the
multicounty authority after January 1, 1992, if the county wishes to
provide for air quality protection and regulation by an alternate air
quality authority. A withdrawing county shall:
(a) Create its own single county authority;
(b) Join another existing multicounty authority with which its
boundaries are contiguous;
(c) Join with one or more contiguous inactive authorities to
operate as a new multicounty authority; or
(d) Become an inactive authority and subject to regulation by the
department ((of ecology)).
(2) In order to withdraw from an existing multicounty authority, a
county shall make arrangements, by interlocal agreement, for division
of assets and liabilities and the appropriate release of any and all
interest in assets of the multicounty authority.
(3) In order to effectuate any of the alternate arrangements in
subsection (1) of this section, the procedures of this chapter to
create an ((air pollution control)) authority shall be met and the
actions must be taken at least six months prior to the effective date
of withdrawal. The rules of the original multicounty authority shall
continue in force for the withdrawing county until such time as all
conditions to create an ((air pollution control)) authority have been
met.
(4) At the effective date of a county's withdrawal, the remaining
counties shall reorganize and reconstitute the legislative authority
pursuant to this chapter. The air pollution control regulations of the
existing multicounty authority shall remain in force and effect after
the reorganization.
(5) If a county elects to withdraw from an existing multicounty
authority, the air pollution control regulations shall remain in effect
for the withdrawing county until suspended by the adoption of rules,
regulations, or ordinances adopted under one of the alternatives of
subsection (1) of this section. A county shall initiate proceedings to
adopt such rules, regulations, or ordinances on or before the effective
date of the county's withdrawal.

Sec. 145 RCW 70.94.331 and 1991 c 199 s 710 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department ((shall have)) has all the powers as provided in
RCW 70.94.141 (as recodified by this act).
(2) The department, in addition to any other powers vested in it by
law after consideration at a public hearing held in accordance with
chapters 42.30 and 34.05 RCW shall:
(a) Adopt rules establishing air quality objectives and air quality
standards;
(b) Adopt emission standards which shall constitute minimum
emission standards throughout the state. An authority may enact more
stringent emission standards, except for emission performance standards
for new wood stoves and opacity levels for residential solid fuel
burning devices which shall be statewide, but in no event may less
stringent standards be enacted by an authority without the prior
approval of the department after public hearing and due notice to
interested parties;
(c)(i) Adopt by rule air quality standards and emission standards
for the control or prohibition of emissions to the outdoor atmosphere
of radionuclides, dust, fumes, mist, smoke, other particulate matter,
vapor, gas, odorous substances, or any combination ((thereof)) of these
emissions. ((Such)) The requirements may be based upon a system of
classification by types of emissions or types of sources of emissions,
or combinations ((thereof)) of sources and types, which ((it)) the
department determines most feasible for the purposes of this chapter.
((However,))
(ii) An industry, or the ((air pollution control)) authority having
jurisdiction, can choose((, subject to the submittal of appropriate
data that the industry has quantified,)) to have any limit on the
opacity of emissions from a source whose emission standard is stated in
terms of a weight of particulate per unit volume of air (((e.g., grains
per dry standard cubic foot))) be based on the applicable particulate
emission standard for that source, such that any violation of the
opacity limit accurately indicates a violation of the applicable
particulate emission standard. An industry choosing to apply the
emission standard must submit appropriate data to the department or
authority that has been quantified by the department. Any alternative
opacity limit provided by this section that would result in increasing
air contaminants emissions in any nonattainment area ((shall)) may only
be granted if equal or greater emission reductions are provided for by
the same source obtaining the revised opacity limit. A reasonable fee
may be assessed to the industry to which the alternate opacity standard
would apply. The fee shall cover only those costs to the ((air
pollution control)) authority which are directly related to the
determination on the acceptability of the alternate opacity standard,
including testing, oversight, and review of data.
(3) Except for emission performance standards for new wood stoves
and opacity levels for residential solid fuel burning devices that must
apply statewide, the air quality standards and emission standards
adopted under this section may ((be for)) apply to the state as a whole
or may vary from area to area or source to source((, except that
emission performance standards for new wood stoves and opacity levels
for residential solid fuel burning devices shall be statewide,)) as may
be appropriate to facilitate the accomplishment of the objectives of
this chapter and to take necessary or desirable account of varying
local conditions of population concentration, the existence of actual
or reasonably foreseeable air pollution, topographic and meteorologic
conditions, and other pertinent variables.
(4) ((The department is directed to cooperate with the appropriate
agencies of the United States or other states or any interstate
agencies or international agencies with respect to the control of air
pollution and air contamination, or for the formulation for the
submission to the legislature of interstate air pollution control
compacts or agreements.
(5))) The department is directed to conduct or cause to be
conducted a continuous surveillance program to monitor the quality of
the ambient atmosphere as to concentrations and movements of air
contaminants and conduct or cause to be conducted a program to
determine the quantity of emissions to the atmosphere.
(((6) The department shall enforce the air quality standards and
emission standards throughout the state except where a local authority
is enforcing the state regulations or its own regulations which are
more stringent than those of the state.
(7))) (5) The department shall encourage local units of government
to handle air pollution problems within their respective jurisdictions;
and, on a cooperative basis provide technical and consultative
assistance ((therefor)).
(((8) The department shall have the power to require the addition
to or deletion of a county or counties from an existing authority in
order to carry out the purposes of this chapter. No such addition or
deletion shall be made without the concurrence of any existing
authority involved. Such action shall only be taken after a public
hearing held pursuant to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(9) The department shall establish rules requiring sources or
source categories to apply reasonable and available control methods.
Such rules shall apply to those sources or source categories that
individually or collectively contribute the majority of statewide air
emissions of each regulated pollutant. The department shall review,
and if necessary, update its rules every five years to ensure
consistency with current reasonable and available control methods. The
department shall have adopted rules required under this subsection for
all sources by July 1, 1996.
For the purposes of this section, "reasonable and available control
methods" shall include but not be limited to, changes in technology,
processes, or other control strategies.))

Sec. 146 RCW 70.94.332 and 1991 c 199 s 711 are each amended to
read as follows:
At least thirty days prior to the commencement of any formal
enforcement action under RCW 70.94.430 and 70.94.431 (as recodified by
this act), the department ((of ecology)) shall cause written notice to
be served upon the alleged violator or violators. The notice shall
specify the provision of this chapter or the rule or regulation alleged
to be violated, and the facts alleged to constitute a violation
((thereof)), and may include an order that necessary corrective action
be taken within a reasonable time. In lieu of an order, the department
may require that the alleged violator or violators appear before it for
the purpose of providing the department information pertaining to the
violation or the charges ((complained of)). Every notice of violation
shall offer to the alleged violator an opportunity to meet with the
department prior to the commencement of enforcement action.

Sec. 147 RCW 70.94.335 and 1994 c 257 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The procedural requirements of this chapter shall not apply to any
person conducting a remedial action at a facility pursuant to a consent
decree, order, or agreed order issued pursuant to chapter 70.105D RCW,
or to the department ((of ecology)) when it conducts a remedial action
under chapter 70.105D RCW. The department ((of ecology)) shall ensure
compliance with the substantive requirements of this chapter through
the consent decree, order, or agreed order issued pursuant to chapter
70.105D RCW, or during the department-conducted remedial action,
through the procedures developed by the department pursuant to RCW
70.105D.090.

Sec. 148 RCW 70.94.350 and 1987 c 109 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department is authorized to contract for or otherwise agree to
the use of personnel of municipal corporations or other agencies or
private persons((;)) and ((the department is further authorized)) to
reimburse ((such)) the municipal corporations or agencies for the
employment of ((such)) personnel. Merit system regulations or
standards for the employment of personnel may be waived for personnel
hired under contract as provided for in this section. The department
shall provide, within available appropriations, for the scientific,
technical, legal, administrative, and other necessary services and
facilities for performing the functions under this chapter.

Sec. 149 RCW 70.94.370 and 1979 c 141 s 123 are each amended to
read as follows:
No provision of this chapter or any recommendation of the state
board or of any local or regional ((air pollution program)) authority
is a limitation:
(1) On the power of any city, town, or county to declare, prohibit,
and abate nuisances.
(2) On the power of the secretary of social and health services to
provide for the protection of the public health under any authority
presently vested in that office or which may be ((hereafter))
prescribed by law.
(3) On the power of a state agency in the enforcement, or
administration of any provision of law which it is specifically
permitted or required to enforce or administer.
(4) On the right of any person to maintain at any time any
appropriate action for relief against any air pollution.

Sec. 150 RCW 70.94.380 and 1987 c 405 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, every
activated authority operating an air pollution control program shall
have requirements for the control of emissions which are no less
stringent than those adopted by the department ((of ecology)) for the
geographic area in which ((such)) the air pollution control program is
located.
(b) Less stringent requirements than are compelled by this section
may be included in a local or regional air pollution control program
only after approval by the department ((of ecology)) following
demonstration to the satisfaction of the department ((of ecology)) that
the proposed requirements are consistent with the purposes of this
chapter((: PROVIDED, That such)). However, any approval shall be
preceded by public hearing, of which notice has been given in
accordance with chapter 42.30 RCW.
(c) The department ((of ecology)), upon receiving evidence that
conditions have changed or that additional information is relevant to
a decision with respect to the requirements for emission control, may,
after public hearing on due notice, withdraw any approval previously
given to a less stringent local or regional requirement.
(([(2)])) (2) Except for the emission performance standards for new
wood stoves and the opacity levels for residential solid fuel burning
devices provided in RCW 70.94.473 (as recodified by this act), which
are applicable statewide, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
prevent a local or regional ((air pollution control)) authority from
adopting and enforcing more stringent emission control requirements
than those adopted by the department ((of ecology and)) that are
applicable within the jurisdiction of the local or regional ((air
pollution control)) authority((, except that the emission performance
standards for new wood stoves and the opacity levels for residential
solid fuel burning devices shall be statewide)).

Sec. 151 RCW 70.94.385 and 1991 c 199 s 712 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Any authority exercising the powers and duties prescribed in
this chapter may make application for, receive, administer, and expend
any federal aid under federal legislation from any agency of the
federal government, for the prevention and control of air pollution or
the development and administration of programs related to air pollution
control and prevention, as permitted by RCW 70.94.141(11) (as
recodified by this act).
(b) Any application for federal aid submitted by an authority shall
be first submitted to and approved by the department. The department
shall adopt rules and regulations establishing standards for approval
and shall approve any application, if it is consistent with this
chapter, and any other applicable requirements of law.
(2) Any authority may apply to the department for state financial
aid.
(a) The department shall annually establish the amount of state
funds available for the local authorities taking into consideration
available federal and state funds. The establishment of funding
amounts shall be consistent with federal requirements and local
maintenance of effort necessary to carry out the provisions of this
chapter.
(b) Any ((such)) state aid shall be expended from the general fund
or from other appropriations as the legislature may provide for this
purpose((: PROVIDED, That)). However, federal funds shall be utilized
to the maximum unless otherwise approved by the department((: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That)).
(c) The amount of state funds provided to local authorities during
the previous year shall not be reduced without a public notice or
public hearing held by the department if requested by the affected
local authority, unless such changes are the direct result of a
reduction in the available federal funds for air pollution control
programs.
(((2))) (d) Before any ((such)) application for state funding is
approved and financial aid is given or approved by the department, the
authority shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that
it is fulfilling the requirements of this chapter. If the department
has not adopted ambient air quality standards and objectives as
permitted by RCW 70.94.331 (as recodified by this act), the authority
shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that it is
acting in good faith and doing all that is possible and reasonable to
control and prevent air pollution within its jurisdictional boundaries
and to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(((3))) (e) The department shall adopt rules requiring the
submission of ((such)) information by each authority, including the
submission of its proposed budget and a description of its program in
support of the application for state financial aid, as necessary to
enable the department to determine the need for state aid.

Sec. 152 RCW 70.94.390 and 1987 c 109 s 42 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may, at any time and on its own motion, hold a
hearing to determine if the activation of an authority is necessary for
the prevention, abatement, and control of air pollution which exists or
is likely to exist in any area of the state. Notice of ((such)) the
hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapters 42.30 ((RCW))
and ((chapter)) 34.05 RCW.
(2) If, at ((such)) a hearing conducted under this section, the
department finds that air pollution exists or is likely to occur in a
particular area, and that the purposes of this chapter and the public
interest will be best served by the activation of an authority, it
shall designate the boundaries of ((such)) an area and set forth in a
report to the appropriate county or counties recommendations for the
activation of an authority((: PROVIDED, That)).
(3) If, at ((such)) a hearing conducted under this section, the
department determines that the activation of an authority is not
practical or feasible for the reason that a local or regional air
pollution control program cannot be successfully established or
operated due to unusual circumstances and conditions, but that either
the control ((and/or)) or prevention, or both, of air pollution is
necessary for the purposes of this chapter and the public interest, it
may declare and assume jurisdiction ((and so declare)) by order.
((Such order)) Orders entered under this subsection shall designate the
geographic area ((in which)) assumed by the department, and the
effective date upon which((,)) the department will exercise
jurisdiction for either the control ((and/or)) or prevention, or both,
of air pollution. The department shall exercise its powers and duties
in the same manner as if it had assumed authority under RCW 70.94.410
(as recodified by this act).
(4)(a) All expenses incurred by the department in the control and
prevention of air pollution in any county pursuant to the provisions of
RCW 70.94.390 and 70.94.410 (as recodified by this act) shall
constitute a claim against ((such)) the county. The department shall
certify the expenses to the auditor of the county, who promptly shall
issue his or her warrant on the county treasurer payable out of the
current expense fund of the county.
(b) In the event that the amount in the current expense fund of the
county is not adequate to meet the expenses incurred by the department,
the department shall certify to the state treasurer that they have a
prior claim on any money in the (("))liquor excise tax fund((")) that
is to be apportioned to that county by the state treasurer as provided
in RCW 82.08.170. In the event that the amount in the (("))liquor
excise tax fund((")) that is to be apportioned to that county by the
state treasurer is not adequate to meet the expenses incurred by the
department, the department shall certify to the state treasurer that
they have a prior claim on any excess funds from the liquor revolving
fund that are to be distributed to that county as provided in RCW
66.08.190 through 66.08.220.
(c) All moneys that are collected as provided in this section shall
be placed in the general fund in the account of the office of air
programs of the department.

Sec. 153 RCW 70.94.395 and 1991 c 199 s 713 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the department finds, after public hearing upon due notice
to all interested parties, that the emissions from a particular type or
class of air contaminant source should be regulated on a statewide
basis in the public interest and for the protection of the welfare of
the citizens of the state, it may adopt and enforce rules to either
control ((and/or)) or prevent, or both, the emission of air
contaminants from ((such)) the source.
(2)(a) An authority may, after public hearing and a finding by the
board of a need for more stringent rules than those adopted by the
department under this section, propose the adoption of ((such)) rules
by the department for the control of emissions from the particular type
or class of air contaminant source within the geographical area of the
authority.
(b) The department shall hold a public hearing and shall adopt the
proposed rules within the area of the requesting authority, unless it
finds that the proposed rules are inconsistent with the rules adopted
by the department under this section.
(c) When ((such)) standards are adopted by the department ((it)),
the department shall delegate solely to the requesting authority all
powers necessary for their enforcement at the request of the authority.
(3) If after public hearing the department finds that the
regulation on a statewide basis of a particular type or class of air
contaminant source is no longer required for the public interest and
the protection of the welfare of the citizens of the state, the
department may relinquish exclusive jurisdiction over ((such)) the
source.

Sec. 154 RCW 70.94.400 and 1987 c 109 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If, at the end of ninety days after the department issues a
report as provided for in RCW 70.94.390 (as recodified by this act), to
the appropriate county or counties recommending the activation of an
authority ((such)), and the county or counties have not performed those
actions recommended by the department, and the department is still of
the opinion that the activation of an authority is necessary for the
prevention, abatement, and control of air pollution which exists or is
likely to exist, then the department may, at its discretion, issue an
order activating an authority. ((Such order))
(2) When the department issues an order under this section, a
certified copy of ((which shall)) the order must be filed with the
secretary of state((, shall)). The order must specify the
participating county or counties and the effective date by which the
authority shall begin to function and exercise its powers.
(3) Any authority activated by order of the department under this
section shall choose the members of its board as provided in RCW
70.94.100 (as recodified by this act) and begin to function in the same
manner as if it had been activated by resolutions of the county or
counties included within its boundaries.
(4) The department may, upon due notice to all interested parties,
conduct a hearing in accordance with chapters 42.30 ((RCW)) and
((chapter)) 34.05 RCW within six months after ((the)) an order under
this section was issued to review ((such)) the order and to ascertain
if ((such)) the order is being carried out in good faith. At such time
the department may amend any ((such)) order issued under this section,
or take the appropriate action as is provided in RCW 70.94.410 (as
recodified by this act), if it is determined by the department that
((such)) the order is being carried out in bad faith ((or the
department may take the appropriate action as is provided in RCW
70.94.410)).

Sec. 155 RCW 70.94.405 and 1991 c 199 s 714 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) At any time after an authority has been activated for no less
than one year, the department may, on its own motion, conduct a hearing
held in accordance with chapters 42.30 and 34.05 RCW, to determine
whether or not the air pollution prevention and control program of
((such)) the authority is being carried out in good faith and is as
effective as possible.
(2) If ((at such hearing)) the department finds at a hearing held
under this section that ((such)) the authority is not carrying out its
air pollution control or prevention program in good faith, is not doing
all that is possible and reasonable to either control ((and/or)) or
prevent, or both, air pollution within the geographical area over which
it has jurisdiction, or is not carrying out the provisions of this
chapter, ((it)) the department shall set forth in a report or order to
the appropriate authority: (((1))) (a) Its recommendations as to how
either air pollution prevention ((and/or)) or control, or both, might
be more effectively accomplished; and (((2))) (b) guidelines which will
assist the authority in carrying out the recommendations of the
department.

Sec. 156 RCW 70.94.410 and 1991 c 199 s 715 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If, after thirty days from the time that the department issues
a report or order to an authority under RCW 70.94.400 and 70.94.405 (as
recodified by this act), ((such)) the authority has not taken action
which indicates that it is attempting in good faith to implement the
recommendations or actions of the department as set forth in the report
or order, the department may, by order, declare as null and void any or
all ordinances, resolutions, rules, or regulations of such authority
relating to either the control ((and/or)) or prevention, or both, of
air pollution((, and at such time)).
(2) If the department declares an authority's actions as null and
void under this section, the department shall become the sole body with
authority to make and enforce rules and regulations for either the
control ((and/or)) or prevention, or both, of air pollution within the
geographical area of ((such)) the authority. If this occurs, the
department may assume all those powers which are given to it by law to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter.
(3) The department may, by order, continue in effect and enforce
provisions of the ordinances, resolutions, or rules of ((such)) the
authority which are not less stringent than those requirements which
the department may have found applicable to the area under RCW
70.94.331 (as recodified by this act), until such time as the
department adopts its own rules. Any rules ((promulgated)) adopted by
the department shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.
Any enforcement actions shall be subject to RCW 43.21B.300 or
43.21B.310.
(((2))) (4) No provision of this chapter is intended to prohibit
any authority from reestablishing its air pollution control program
which meets with the approval of the department and which complies with
the purposes of this chapter and with applicable rules and orders of
the department.
(((3))) (5)(a) Nothing in this chapter ((shall)) prevents the
department from withdrawing the exercise of its jurisdiction over an
authority upon its own motion if the department ((has found)) finds at
a hearing, held in accordance with chapters 42.30 and 34.05 RCW, that
the air pollution prevention and control program of ((such)) the
authority:
(i) Will be carried out in good faith((,));
(ii) That ((such)) the program will do all that is possible and
reasonable to either control ((and/or)) or prevent, or both, air
pollution within the geographical area over which it has
jurisdiction((,)); and
(iii) That the program complies with the provisions of this
chapter.
(b) Upon the withdrawal of the department, the department shall
prescribe certain recommendations as to how either air pollution
prevention ((and/or)) or control, or both, is to be effectively
accomplished and guidelines which will assist the authority in carrying
out the recommendations of the department.

Sec. 157 RCW 70.94.420 and 1991 c 199 s 716 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is ((declared to be)) the intent of the legislature ((of the
state of Washington)) that any state department or agency having
jurisdiction over any building, installation, other property, or other
activity creating or likely to create significant air pollution shall
cooperate with the department and with air pollution control agencies
in preventing ((and/or)) or controlling the pollution of the air in any
area ((insofar as)) if the discharge of air contaminants from or by
((such)) the building, installation, other property, or activity may
cause or contribute to pollution of the air ((in such area)). ((Such))
Each state department or agency shall comply with the provisions of
this chapter and with any ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation
issued ((hereunder)) under this chapter in the same manner as any other
person subject to ((such)) the laws or rules.

Sec. 158 RCW 70.94.422 and 1993 c 252 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of health ((shall have)) has all the enforcement
powers as provided in RCW 70.94.332, 70.94.425, 70.94.430, 70.94.431
(1) through (7), and 70.94.435 (as recodified by this act) with respect
to emissions of radionuclides. This section does not preclude the
department ((of ecology)) from exercising its authority under this
chapter.
(2)(a) Permits for energy facilities subject to chapter 80.50 RCW
shall be issued by the energy facility site evaluation council.
However, the permits become effective only if the governor approves an
application for certification and executes a certification agreement
under chapter 80.50 RCW. The council ((shall have)) has all powers
necessary to administer an operating permits program pertaining to such
facilities, consistent with applicable air quality standards
established by the department or ((local air pollution control))
authorities, or both, and to obtain the approval of the United States
environmental protection agency.
(b) The council's powers include, but are not limited to, all of
the enforcement powers provided in RCW 70.94.332, 70.94.425, 70.94.430,
70.94.431 (1) through (7), and 70.94.435 (as recodified by this act)
with respect to permit program sources required to obtain certification
from the council under chapter 80.50 RCW.
(c) To the extent not covered under RCW 80.50.071, the council may
collect fees as granted to delegated ((local air)) authorities under
RCW 70.94.152, ((70.94.161 (14) and (15),)) 70.94.162, and 70.94.154(7)
(as recodified by this act) with respect to permit program sources
required to obtain certification from the council under chapter 80.50
RCW.
(d) The council and the department shall each establish procedures
that provide maximum coordination and avoid duplication between the two
agencies in carrying out the requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 159 RCW 70.94.425 and 1987 c 109 s 48 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding the existence or use of any other remedy, whenever
any person has engaged in, or is about to engage in, any acts or
practices which constitute or will constitute a violation of any
provision of this chapter, or any rule, regulation, or order issued
((thereunder)) under this chapter, the governing body or board or the
department, after notice to ((such)) the person and an opportunity to
comply, may petition the superior court of the county ((wherein)) where
the violation is alleged to be occurring or to have occurred for a
restraining order or a temporary or permanent injunction or another
appropriate order.

Sec. 160 RCW 70.94.430 and 2003 c 53 s 355 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this
chapter ((70.94)) or chapter 70.120 RCW, or any ordinance, resolution,
or regulation in force pursuant ((thereto)) to this chapter or chapter
70.120 RCW is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and, upon conviction
((thereof)), shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand
dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one
year, or by both for each separate violation.
(2) Any person who negligently releases into the ambient air any
substance listed by the department ((of ecology)) as a hazardous air
pollutant, other than in compliance with the terms of an applicable
permit or emission limit, and who at the time negligently places
another person in imminent danger of death or substantial bodily harm
is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be
punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars, or by
imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.
(3) Any person who knowingly releases into the ambient air any
substance listed by the department ((of ecology)) as a hazardous air
pollutant, other than in compliance with the terms of an applicable
permit or emission limit, and who knows at the time that he or she
thereby places another person in imminent danger of death or
substantial bodily harm, is guilty of a class C felony and shall, upon
conviction, be punished by a fine of not less than fifty thousand
dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than five years, or both.
(4) Any person who knowingly fails to disclose a potential conflict
of interest under RCW 70.94.100 (as recodified by this act) is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished
by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars.

Sec. 161 RCW 70.94.431 and 1995 c 403 s 630 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 43.05.060 through 43.05.080 and
43.05.150, and in addition to or as an alternate to any other penalty
provided by law, any person who violates any of the provisions of this
chapter ((70.94 RCW,)) or chapter 70.120 RCW, or any of the rules in
force under ((such)) this chapter((s)) or chapter 70.120 RCW may incur
a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars per day
for each violation. Each ((such)) violation ((shall be)) is a separate
and distinct offense, and in case of a continuing violation, each day's
continuance ((shall be)) is a separate and distinct violation.
(b) Any person who fails to take action as specified by an order
issued pursuant to this chapter ((shall be)) is liable for a civil
penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars for each day of continued
noncompliance.
(c) The maximum penalty amounts established in this section may be
increased annually to account for inflation as determined by the
Washington state economic and revenue forecast council.
(2) Penalties incurred under this section but not paid shall accrue
interest, beginning on the ninety-first day following the date that the
penalty becomes due and payable, at the highest rate allowed by RCW
19.52.020 on the date that the penalty becomes due and payable. If
violations or penalties are appealed, interest shall not begin to
accrue until the thirty-first day following final resolution of the
appeal.
((The maximum penalty amounts established in this section may be
increased annually to account for inflation as determined by the state
office of the economic and revenue forecast council.))
(3) Each act of commission or omission which procures, aids, or
abets in the violation ((shall be)) is considered a violation under the
provisions of this section and subject to the same penalty. The
penalties provided in this section shall be imposed pursuant to RCW
43.21B.300.
(4) All penalties recovered under this section by the department
shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the air pollution
control account established in RCW 70.94.015 (as recodified by this
act) or, if recovered by the authority, shall be paid into the treasury
of the authority and credited to its funds. If a prior penalty for the
same violation has been paid to a local authority, the penalty imposed
by the department under subsection (1) of this section shall be reduced
by the amount of the payment.
(5) To secure the penalty incurred under this section, the state or
the authority shall have a lien on any vessel used or operated in
violation of this chapter which shall be enforced as provided in RCW
60.36.050.
(6) Public or private entities that are recipients or potential
recipients of department grants, whether for air quality related
activities or not, may have such grants rescinded or withheld by the
department for failure to comply with provisions of this chapter.
(7) In addition to other penalties provided by this chapter,
persons knowingly under-reporting emissions or other information used
to set fees, or persons required to pay emission or permit fees who are
more than ninety days late with such payments may be subject to a
penalty equal to three times the amount of the original fee owed.
(8) By January 1, 1992, the department shall develop rules for
excusing excess emissions from enforcement action if ((such)) the
excess emissions are unavoidable. The rules shall specify the criteria
and procedures for the department and ((local air)) authorities to
determine whether a period of excess emissions is excusable in
accordance with the state implementation plan.

Sec. 162 RCW 70.94.435 and 1967 c 238 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
As an additional means of enforcing this chapter, the governing
body or board may accept an assurance of discontinuance of any act or
practice deemed in violation of this chapter or of any ordinance,
resolution, rule, or regulation adopted pursuant ((hereto)) to this
chapter, from any person engaging in, or who has engaged in, such act
or practice. Any ((such)) assurance shall specify a time limit during
which such a discontinuance is to be accomplished. Failure to perform
the terms of any ((such)) assurance shall constitute prima facie proof
of a violation of this chapter or the ordinances, resolutions, rules,
or regulations, or order ((issued pursuant thereto)), which make the
alleged act or practice unlawful for the purpose of securing any
injunction or other relief from the superior court as provided in RCW
70.94.425.

Sec. 163 RCW 70.94.440 and 1967 c 238 s 63 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter may be known and cited as the "Washington clean air
act"((.)) or the "state clean air act."

Sec. 164 RCW 70.94.450 and 1987 c 405 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the interest of the public health and welfare and in keeping
with the objectives of RCW 70.94.011 (as recodified by this act), the
legislature declares it to be the public policy of the state to
control, reduce, and prevent air pollution caused by wood stove
emissions. It is the state's policy to reduce wood stove emissions by
encouraging the department ((of ecology)) to continue efforts to
educate the public about the effects of wood stove emissions, other
heating alternatives, and the desirability of achieving better emission
performance and heating efficiency from wood stoves. The legislature
further declares that: (1) The purchase of certified wood stoves will
not solve the problem of pollution caused by wood stove emissions; and
(2) the reduction of air pollution caused by wood stove emissions will
only occur when wood stove users adopt proper methods of wood burning.

Sec. 165 RCW 70.94.455 and 1991 c 199 s 503 are each amended to
read as follows:
((After January 1, 1992,)) (1) No used solid fuel burning device
shall be installed in new or existing buildings unless such device is
certified by either the Oregon department of environmental quality as
phase II or the United States environmental protection agency
((certified)) or a pellet stove either certified or exempt from
certification by the United States environmental protection agency.
(((1) By July 1, 1992,)) (2) The state building code council shall
adopt rules requiring an adequate source of heat other than wood stoves
in all new and substantially remodeled, as that term is defined in RCW
70.94.030 (as recodified by this act), residential and commercial
construction. This rule ((shall apply)) applies:
(a) To areas designated by a county to be an urban growth area
under chapter 36.70A RCW; and
(b) To areas designated by the environmental protection agency as
being in nonattainment for particulate matter.
(((2) For purposes of this section, "substantially remodeled" means
any alteration or restoration of a building exceeding sixty percent of
the appraised value of such building within a twelve-month period.))

Sec. 166 RCW 70.94.457 and 1995 c 205 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The department of ecology shall establish by rule under chapter
34.05 RCW:
(1) Statewide emission performance standards for new solid fuel
burning devices. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter
which allows an authority to adopt more stringent emission standards,
no authority shall adopt any emission standard for new solid fuel
burning devices other than the statewide standard adopted by the
department under this section.
(a) After January 1, 1995,)) (1) No solid fuel burning device shall
be offered for sale in this state to residents of this state that does
not meet the following particulate air contaminant emission standards
under the test methodology of the United States environmental
protection agency in effect on January 1, 1991, or an equivalent
standard under any test methodology adopted by the United States
environmental protection agency subsequent to ((such date)) January 1,
1991:
(((i))) (a) Two and one-half grams per hour for catalytic wood
stoves; and
(((ii))) (b) Four and one-half grams per hour for all other solid
fuel burning devices.
(2) For the purposes of this ((subsection)) section, "equivalent"
((shall)) means the emissions limits specified in this ((subsection))
section multiplied by a statistically reliable conversion factor
determined by the department that compares the difference between the
emission test methodology established by the United States
environmental protection agency prior to May 15, 1991, with the test
methodology adopted subsequently by the agency. ((Subsection (a) of
this subsection does not apply to fireplaces.
(b) After January 1, 1997,)) (3)(a) No fireplace, except masonry
fireplaces, shall be offered for sale unless ((such)) the fireplace
meets the 1990 United States environmental protection agency standards
for wood stoves or an equivalent standard that may be established by
the state building code council by rule. ((Prior to January 1, 1997,))
(b) The state building code council shall establish by rule a
methodology for the testing of factory-built fireplaces. The
methodology shall be designed to achieve a particulate air emission
standard equivalent to the 1990 United States environmental protection
agency standard for wood stoves. ((In developing the rules, the
council shall include on the technical advisory committee at least one
representative from the masonry fireplace builders and at least one
representative of the factory-built fireplace manufacturers.
(c) Prior to January 1, 1997,)) (c) The state building code council
shall establish by rule design standards for the construction of new
masonry fireplaces in Washington ((state. In developing the rules, the
council shall include on the technical advisory committee at least one
representative from the masonry fireplace builders and at least one
representative of the factory-built fireplace manufacturers)). It
shall be the goal of the council to develop design standards that
generally achieve reductions in particulate air contaminant emissions
commensurate with the reductions being achieved by factory-built
fireplaces at the time the standard is established.
(((d) Actions of the department and local air pollution control
authorities under this section shall preempt actions of other state
agencies and local governments for the purposes of controlling air
pollution from solid fuel burning devices, except where authorized by
chapter 199, Laws of 1991.
(e) Subsection (1)(a) of this section shall not apply to
fireplaces.
(f) Notwithstanding (a) of this subsection, the department is
authorized to adopt, by rule, emission standards adopted by the United
States environmental protection agency for new wood stoves sold at
retail. For solid fuel burning devices for which the United States
environmental protection agency has not established emission standards,
the department may exempt or establish, by rule, statewide standards
including emission levels and test procedures for such devices and such
emission levels and test procedures shall be equivalent to emission
levels per pound per hour burned for other new wood stoves and
fireplaces regulated under this subsection.
(2) A program to:
(a) Determine whether a new solid fuel burning device complies with
the statewide emission performance standards established in subsection
(1) of this section; and
(b) Approve the sale of devices that comply with the statewide
emission performance standards.))

Sec. 167 RCW 70.94.460 and 1995 c 205 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
((After July 1, 1988,)) (1) No person shall sell, offer to sell, or
knowingly advertise to sell a new wood stove in this state to a
resident of this state unless the wood stove has been approved by the
department under the program established under ((RCW 70.94.457))
section 317 of this act.
(2) Any person found in violation of this section is subject to the
penalties and enforcement actions provided under this chapter.
(3) Nothing in this section applies to a radio station, television
station, publisher, printer, or distributor of a newspaper, magazine,
billboard, or other advertising medium that accepts advertising in good
faith and without knowledge of its violation of this chapter.

Sec. 168 RCW 70.94.470 and 1991 c 199 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish, by rule under chapter 34.05
RCW((,)):
(a) A statewide opacity level of twenty percent for residential
solid fuel burning devices for the purpose of enforcement on a
complaint basis; and
(b) A statewide opacity of ten percent for purposes of public
education.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter which may
allow an authority to adopt a more stringent opacity level, no
authority shall adopt or enforce an opacity level for solid fuel
burning devices other than established in this section.
(3) Actions of the department and ((local air pollution control))
authorities under this section shall preempt actions of other state
agencies and local governments for the purposes of controlling air
pollution from solid fuel burning devices, except where authorized by
chapter 199, Laws of 1991.

Sec. 169 RCW 70.94.473 and 2005 c 197 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person in a residence or commercial establishment which has
an adequate source of heat without burning wood shall:
(a) Not burn wood in any solid fuel burning device whenever the
department has determined under RCW 70.94.715 (as recodified by this
act) that any air pollution episode exists in that area;
(b) Not burn wood in any solid fuel burning device in the
geographical area and for the period of time that a first stage of
impaired air quality has been determined by the department or any
authority for that area under section 316 of this act, except ((those
which)) for:
(i) Solid fuel burning devices that are either certified by the
Oregon department of environmental quality as phase II or the United
States environmental protection agency ((certified or));
(ii) Solid fuel burning devices that are certified by the
department under RCW 70.94.457(1) (as recodified by this act); or ((a))
(iii) Pellet stoves either certified or issued an exemption by the
United States environmental protection agency in accordance with Title
40, Part 60 of the code of federal regulations((, in the geographical
area and for the period of time that a first stage of impaired air
quality has been determined, by the department or any authority, for
that area)). ((A first stage of impaired air quality is reached when:
(i) Fine particulates are at an ambient level of thirty-five
micrograms per cubic meter measured on a twenty-four hour average; and
(ii) Forecasted meteorological conditions are not expected to allow
levels of fine particulates to decline below thirty-five micrograms per
cubic meter for a period of forty-eight hours or more from the time
that the fine particulates are measured at the trigger level; and
(c))) (2) Any person in a residence or commercial establishment
that has an adequate source of heat without burning wood may not burn
wood in any solid fuel burning device in a geographical area and for
the period of time that a second stage of impaired air quality has been
determined by the department or any authority((,)) for that area under
section 316 of this act. ((A second stage of impaired air quality is
reached when:
(i) A first stage of impaired air quality has been in force and not
been sufficient to reduce the increasing fine particle [particulate]
pollution trend;
(ii) Fine particulates are at an ambient level of sixty micrograms
per cubic meter measured on a twenty-four hour average; and
(iii) Forecasted meteorological conditions are not expected to
allow levels of fine particulates to decline below sixty micrograms per
cubic meter for a period of forty-eight hours or more from the time
that the fine particulates are measured at the trigger level.
(2))) (3) Actions of the department and ((local air pollution
control)) authorities under this section shall preempt actions of other
state agencies and local governments for the purposes of controlling
air pollution from solid fuel burning devices, except where authorized
by chapter 199, Laws of 1991.

Sec. 170 RCW 70.94.475 and 1990 c 157 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
A condominium owners' association or an association formed by
residents of a multiple-family dwelling are not liable for violations
of RCW 70.94.473 (as recodified by this act) by a resident of a
condominium or multiple-family dwelling. The associations shall
cooperate with ((local air pollution control)) authorities to acquaint
residents with the provisions of this section.

Sec. 171 RCW 70.94.477 and 1995 c 205 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) Unless allowed by rule, under chapter 34.05 RCW, a person
shall not cause or allow any of the following materials to be burned in
any residential solid fuel burning device:
(((a))) (1) Garbage;
(((b))) (2) Treated wood;
(((c))) (3) Plastics;
(((d))) (4) Rubber products;
(((e))) (5) Animals;
(((f))) (6) Asphaltic products;
(((g))) (7) Waste petroleum products;
(((h))) (8) Paints; or
(((i))) (9) Any substance, other than properly seasoned fuel wood,
which normally emits dense smoke or obnoxious odors.
(((2) For the sole purpose of a contingency measure to meet the
requirements of section 172(c)(9) of the federal clean air act, a local
authority or the department may prohibit the use of solid fuel burning
devices, except fireplaces as defined in RCW 70.94.453(3), wood stoves
meeting the standards set forth in RCW 70.94.457 or pellet stoves
either certified or issued an exemption by the United States
environmental protection agency in accordance with Title 40, Part 60 of
the code of federal regulations, if the United States environmental
protection agency, in consultation with the department and the local
authority makes written findings that:
(a) The area has failed to make reasonable further progress or
attain or maintain a national ambient air quality standard; and
(b) Emissions from solid fuel burning devices from a particular
geographic area are a contributing factor to such failure to make
reasonable further progress or attain or maintain a national ambient
air quality standard.
A prohibition issued by a local authority or the department under
this subsection shall not apply to a person in a residence or
commercial establishment that does not have an adequate source of heat
without burning wood.))

Sec. 172 RCW 70.94.480 and 1990 c 128 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department ((of ecology)) shall establish a program to
educate wood stove dealers and the public about:
(a) The effects of wood stove emissions on health and air quality;
(b) Methods of achieving better efficiency and emission performance
from wood stoves;
(c) Wood stoves that have been approved by the department;
(d) The benefits of replacing inefficient wood stoves with stoves
approved under RCW 70.94.457 (as recodified by this act).
(2) Persons selling new wood stoves shall distribute and verbally
explain educational materials describing when a stove can and cannot be
legally used to customers purchasing new wood stoves.

Sec. 173 RCW 70.94.483 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 932 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The wood stove education and enforcement account is ((hereby))
created in the state treasury. Money placed in the account shall
include all money received under subsection (2) of this section and any
other money appropriated by the legislature. Money in the account
shall be spent for the purposes of the wood stove education program
established under RCW 70.94.480 (as recodified by this act) and for
enforcement of the wood stove program, and ((shall be)) is subject to
legislative appropriation. ((However, during the 2003-05 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the wood stove education
and enforcement account to the air pollution control account such
amounts as specified in the omnibus operating budget bill.))
(2)(a) The department ((of ecology)), with the advice of ((the)) an
advisory committee, shall set a flat fee of thirty dollars, on the
retail sale, as defined in RCW 82.04.050, of each solid fuel burning
device ((after January 1, 1992)). The fee shall be imposed upon the
consumer and shall not be subject to the retail sales tax provisions of
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The fee may be adjusted annually above
thirty dollars to account for inflation as determined by the state
office of the economic and revenue forecast council.
(b) The fee shall be collected by the department of revenue in
conjunction with the retail sales tax under chapter 82.08 RCW. If the
seller fails to collect the fee ((herein imposed)) or fails to remit
the fee to the department of revenue in the manner prescribed in
chapter 82.08 RCW, the seller shall be personally liable to the state
for the amount of the fee. The collection provisions of chapter 82.32
RCW shall apply.
(c) The department of revenue shall deposit fees collected under
this section in the wood stove education and enforcement account
created in this section.

Sec. 174 RCW 70.94.510 and 1987 c 109 s 49 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is declared to be the policy of the state of Washington
through the department ((of ecology)) to cooperate with the federal
government in order to ((insure)) ensure the coordination of the
provisions of the federal and state clean air acts((, and)).
(2) The department is authorized and directed to implement and
enforce the provisions of this chapter in carrying out this policy as
follows:
(((1))) (a) To accept and administer grants from the federal
government for carrying out the provisions of this chapter((.));
(((2))) (b) To take all action necessary to secure to the state the
benefits of the federal clean air act.
(3) The department may accept delegation of programs as provided
for in the federal clean air act. Subject to federal approval, the
department may, in turn, delegate the programs to the local authority
with jurisdiction in a given area.
(4) The department shall cooperate with the appropriate agencies of
the United States or other states or any interstate agencies or
international agencies with respect to the control of air pollution and
air contamination, or for the formulation for the submission to the
legislature of interstate air pollution control compacts or agreements.

Sec. 175 RCW 70.94.521 and 1997 c 250 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that automotive traffic in Washington's
metropolitan areas is the major source of emissions of air
contaminants. This air pollution causes significant harm to public
health, causes damage to trees, plants, structures, and materials and
degrades the quality of the environment.
(2) The legislature further finds that increasing automotive
traffic is also aggravating traffic congestion in Washington's
metropolitan areas. This traffic congestion imposes significant costs
on Washington's businesses, governmental agencies, and individuals in
terms of lost working hours and delays in the delivery of goods and
services. Traffic congestion worsens automobile-related air pollution,
increases the consumption of fuel, and degrades the habitability of
many of Washington's cities and suburban areas. The capital and
environmental costs of fully accommodating the existing and projected
automobile traffic on roads and highways are prohibitive. Decreasing
the demand for vehicle trips is significantly less costly and at least
as effective in reducing traffic congestion and its impacts as
constructing new transportation facilities such as roads and bridges,
to accommodate increased traffic volumes.
(3) The legislature ((also)) further finds that increasing
automotive transportation is a major factor in increasing consumption
of gasoline and, thereby, increasing reliance on imported sources of
petroleum. Moderating the growth in automotive travel is essential to
stabilizing and reducing dependence on imported petroleum and improving
the nation's energy security.
(4) The legislature further finds that reducing the number of
commute trips to work made via single-occupant cars and light trucks is
an effective way of reducing automobile-related air pollution, traffic
congestion, and energy use. Major employers have significant
opportunities to encourage and facilitate reducing single-occupant
vehicle commuting by employees. In addition, the legislature also
recognizes the importance of increasing individual citizens' awareness
of air quality, energy consumption, and traffic congestion, and the
contribution individual actions can make towards addressing these
issues.
(5) The intent of this chapter is to require local governments in
those counties experiencing the greatest automobile-related air
pollution and traffic congestion to develop and implement plans to
reduce single-occupant vehicle commute trips. ((Such)) These plans
shall require major employers and employers at major worksites to
implement programs to reduce single-occupant vehicle commuting by
employees at major worksites. Local governments in counties
experiencing significant but less severe automobile-related air
pollution and traffic congestion may also implement ((such)) these
plans. State agencies shall implement programs to reduce single-occupant vehicle commuting at all major worksites throughout the state.

Sec. 176 RCW 70.94.527 and 2006 c 329 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Each county containing an urban growth area, designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110, and each city within an urban growth area
with a state highway segment exceeding the one hundred person hours of
delay threshold calculated by the department of transportation, as well
as those counties and cities located in any contiguous urban growth
areas, shall adopt a commute trip reduction plan and ordinance for
major employers in the affected urban growth area by a date specified
by the commute trip reduction board.
(b) Jurisdictions located within an urban growth area with a
population greater than seventy thousand that adopted a commute trip
reduction ordinance before the year 2000, as well as any jurisdiction
within contiguous urban growth areas, shall also adopt a commute trip
reduction plan and ordinance for major employers in the affected urban
growth area by a date specified by the commute trip reduction board.
(c) Jurisdictions containing a major employment installation in a
county with an affected growth area, designated pursuant to RCW
36.70A.110, shall adopt a commute trip reduction plan and ordinance for
major employers in the major employment installation by a date
specified by the commute trip reduction board.
((The)) An ordinance adopted pursuant to this section shall
establish the requirements for major employers and provide an appeals
process by which major employers, who as a result of special
characteristics of their business or its locations would be unable to
meet the requirements of the ordinance, may obtain waiver or
modification of those requirements. The plan shall be designed to
achieve reductions in the proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute
trips and be consistent with the rules established by the department of
transportation. The county, city, or town shall submit its adopted
plan to the regional transportation planning organization. The county,
city, or town plan shall be included in the regional commute trip
reduction plan for regional transportation planning purposes,
consistent with the rules established by the department of
transportation in RCW 70.94.537 (as recodified by this act).
(2) All other counties, cities, and towns may adopt and implement
a commute trip reduction plan consistent with department of
transportation rules established under RCW 70.94.537 (as recodified by
this act). Tribal governments are encouraged to adopt a commute trip
reduction plan for their lands. State investment in voluntary commute
trip reduction plans shall be limited to those areas that meet criteria
developed by the commute trip reduction board.
(3) The department ((of ecology)) may, after consultation with the
department of transportation, as part of the state implementation plan
for areas that do not attain the national ambient air quality standards
for carbon monoxide or ozone, require municipalities other than those
identified in subsection (1) of this section to adopt and implement
commute trip reduction plans if the department determines that such
plans are necessary for attainment of ((said)) standards.
(4) A commute trip reduction plan shall be consistent with the
rules established under RCW 70.94.537 (as recodified by this act),
developed in consultation with local transit agencies, the applicable
regional transportation planning organization, major employers, and
other interested parties, and shall include but is not limited to:
(a) Goals for reductions in the proportion of single-occupant
vehicle commute trips consistent with the state goals established by
the commute trip reduction board under RCW 70.94.537 (as recodified by
this act) and the regional commute trip reduction plan goals
established in the regional commute trip reduction plan;
(b) A description of the requirements for major public and private
sector employers to implement commute trip reduction programs;
(c) A commute trip reduction program for employees of the county,
city, or town; and
(d) Means, consistent with rules established by the department of
transportation, for determining base year values and progress toward
meeting commute trip reduction plan goals. ((The plan shall be
developed in consultation with local transit agencies, the applicable
regional transportation planning organization, major employers, and
other interested parties.))
(5)(a) The commute trip reduction plans adopted by counties,
cities, and towns under this chapter shall be consistent with and may
be incorporated in applicable state or regional transportation plans
and local comprehensive plans and shall be coordinated, and consistent
with, the commute trip reduction plans of counties, cities, or towns
with which the county, city, or town has, in part, common borders or
related regional issues. ((Such)) Regional issues shall include
assuring consistency in the treatment of employers who have worksites
subject to the requirements of this chapter in more than one
jurisdiction.
(b) Counties, cities, and towns adopting commute trip reduction
plans may enter into agreements through the interlocal cooperation act
or by resolution or ordinance as appropriate with other jurisdictions,
local transit agencies, transportation management associations or other
private or nonprofit providers of transportation services, or regional
transportation planning organizations to coordinate the development and
implementation of such plans.
(c) Transit agencies shall work with counties, cities, and towns as
a part of their six-year transit development plan established in RCW
35.58.2795 to take into account the location of major employer
worksites when planning and prioritizing transit service changes or the
expansion of public transportation services, including rideshare
services.
(d) Counties, cities, or towns adopting a commute trip reduction
plan shall review it annually and revise it as necessary to be
consistent with applicable plans developed under RCW 36.70A.070.
(e) Regional transportation planning organizations shall review the
local commute trip reduction plans during the development and update of
the regional commute trip reduction plan.
(6) Each affected regional transportation planning organization
shall adopt a commute trip reduction plan for its region consistent
with the rules and deadline established by the department of
transportation under RCW 70.94.537 (as recodified by this act). The
plan shall include, but is not limited to:
(a) Regional program goals for commute trip reduction in urban
growth areas and all designated growth and transportation efficiency
centers;
(b) A description of strategies for achieving the goals;
(c) A sustainable financial plan describing projected revenues and
expenditures to meet the goals;
(d) A description of the way in which progress toward meeting the
goals will be measured; and
(e) Minimum criteria for growth and transportation efficiency
centers.
(i) Regional transportation planning organizations shall review
proposals from local jurisdictions to designate growth and
transportation efficiency centers and shall determine whether the
proposed growth and transportation efficiency center is consistent with
the criteria defined in the regional commute trip reduction plan.
(ii) Growth and transportation efficiency centers certified as
consistent with the minimum requirements by the regional transportation
planning organization shall be identified in subsequent updates of the
regional commute trip reduction plan. These plans shall be developed
in collaboration with all affected local jurisdictions, transit
agencies, and other interested parties within the region. The plan
will be reviewed and approved by (([the])) the commute trip reduction
board as established under RCW 70.94.537 (as recodified by this act).
Regions without an approved regional commute trip reduction plan shall
not be eligible for state commute trip reduction program funds.
(iii) The regional commute trip reduction plan shall be consistent
with and incorporated into transportation demand management components
in the regional transportation plan as required by RCW 47.80.030.
(7) Each regional transportation planning organization implementing
a regional commute trip reduction program shall, consistent with the
rules and deadline established by the department of transportation,
submit its plan as well as any related local commute trip reduction
plans and certified growth and transportation efficiency center
programs, to the commute trip reduction board established under RCW
70.94.537 (as recodified by this act). The commute trip reduction
board shall review the regional commute trip reduction plan and the
local commute trip reduction plans. The regional transportation
planning organization shall collaborate with the commute trip reduction
board to evaluate the consistency of local commute trip reduction plans
with the regional commute trip reduction plan. Local and regional
plans must be approved by the commute trip reduction board in order to
be eligible for state funding provided for the purposes of this
chapter.
(8) Each regional transportation planning organization implementing
a regional commute trip reduction program shall submit an annual
progress report to the commute trip reduction board established under
RCW 70.94.537 (as recodified by this act). The report shall be due at
the end of each state fiscal year for which the program has been
implemented. The report shall describe progress in attaining the
applicable commute trip reduction goals and shall highlight any
problems being encountered in achieving the goals. The information
shall be reported in a form established by the commute trip reduction
board.
(9) Any waivers or modifications of the requirements of a commute
trip reduction plan granted by a jurisdiction shall be submitted for
review to the commute trip reduction board established under RCW
70.94.537 (as recodified by this act). The commute trip reduction
board may not deny the granting of a waiver or modification of the
requirements of a commute trip reduction plan by a jurisdiction but
they may notify the jurisdiction of any comments or objections.
(10) Plans implemented under this section shall not apply to
commute trips for seasonal agricultural employees.
(11) Plans implemented under this section shall not apply to
construction worksites when the expected duration of the construction
project is less than two years.
(12) If an affected urban growth area has not previously
implemented a commute trip reduction program and the state has funded
solutions to state highway deficiencies to address the area's exceeding
the person hours of delay threshold, the affected urban growth area
shall be exempt from the duties of this section for a period not
exceeding two years.

Sec. 177 RCW 70.94.528 and 2006 c 329 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A county, city, or town may, as part of its commute trip
reduction plan implemented under this chapter, designate existing
activity centers listed in its comprehensive plan or new activity
centers as growth and transportation efficiency centers and establish
a transportation demand management program in the designated area.
(a) The transportation demand management program for the growth and
transportation efficiency center shall be developed in consultation
with local transit agencies, the applicable regional transportation
planning organization, major employers, and other interested parties.
(b) In order to be eligible for state funding provided for the
purposes of this section, designated growth and transportation
efficiency centers shall be certified by the applicable regional
transportation organization to: (i) Meet the minimum land use and
transportation criteria established in collaboration among local
jurisdictions, transit agencies, the regional transportation planning
organization, and other interested parties as part of the regional
commute trip reduction plan; and (ii) have established a transportation
demand management program that includes the elements identified in (c)
of this subsection and is consistent with the rules established by the
department of transportation in RCW 70.94.537(2) (as recodified by this
act). If a designated growth and transportation efficiency center is
denied certification, the local jurisdiction may appeal the decision to
the commute trip reduction board.
(c) Transportation demand management programs for growth and
transportation efficiency centers shall include, but are not limited
to: (i) Goals for reductions in the proportion of single-occupant
vehicle trips that are more aggressive than the state program goal
established by the commute trip reduction board; (ii) a sustainable
financial plan demonstrating how the program can be implemented to meet
state and regional trip reduction goals, indicating resources from
public and private sources that are reasonably expected to be made
available to carry out the plan, and recommending any innovative
financing techniques consistent with chapter 47.29 RCW, including
public/private partnerships, to finance needed facilities, services,
and programs; (iii) a proposed organizational structure for
implementing the program; (iv) a proposal to measure performance toward
the goal and implementation progress; and (v) an evaluation to which
local land use and transportation policies apply, including parking
policies and ordinances, to determine the extent that they complement
and support the trip reduction investments of major employers. Each of
these program elements shall be consistent with the rules established
under RCW 70.94.537 (as recodified by this act).
(d) A designated growth and transportation efficiency center shall
be consistent with the land use and transportation elements of the
local comprehensive plan.
(e) Transit agencies, local governments, and regional
transportation planning organizations shall identify certified growth
and transportation efficiency centers as priority areas for new service
and facility investments in their respective investment plans.
(2) A county, city, or town that has established a growth and
transportation efficiency center program shall support vehicle trip
reduction activities in the designated area. The implementing
jurisdiction shall adopt policies, ordinances, and funding strategies
that will lead to attainment of program goals in those areas.

Sec. 178 RCW 70.94.531 and 2006 c 329 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) State agency worksites are subject to the same requirements
under this section and RCW 70.94.534 (as recodified by this act) as
private employers.
(2) Not more than ninety days after the adoption of a
jurisdiction's commute trip reduction plan, each major employer in that
jurisdiction shall perform a baseline measurement consistent with the
rules established by the department of transportation under RCW
70.94.537 (as recodified by this act). Not more than ninety days after
receiving the results of the baseline measurement, each major employer
shall develop a commute trip reduction program and shall submit a
description of that program to the jurisdiction for review. The
program shall be implemented not more than ninety days after approval
by the jurisdiction.
(3) A commute trip reduction program of a major employer shall
consist of, at a minimum:
(a) Designation of a transportation coordinator and the display of
the name, location, and telephone number of the coordinator in a
prominent manner at each affected worksite;
(b) Regular distribution of information to employees regarding
alternatives to single-occupant vehicle commuting;
(c) A regular review of employee commuting and reporting of
progress toward meeting the single-occupant vehicle reduction goals to
the county, city, or town consistent with the method established in the
commute trip reduction plan and the rules established by the department
of transportation under RCW 70.94.537 (as recodified by this act); and
(d) Implementation of a set of measures designed to achieve the
applicable commute trip reduction goals adopted by the jurisdiction.
Such measures may include but are not limited to:
(i) Provision of preferential parking or reduced parking charges,
or both, for high occupancy vehicles;
(ii) Instituting or increasing parking charges for single-occupant
vehicles;
(iii) Provision of commuter ride matching services to facilitate
employee ridesharing for commute trips;
(iv) Provision of subsidies for transit fares;
(v) Provision of vans for van pools;
(vi) Provision of subsidies for car pooling or van pooling;
(vii) Permitting the use of the employer's vehicles for car pooling
or van pooling;
(viii) Permitting flexible work schedules to facilitate employees'
use of transit, car pools, or van pools;
(ix) Cooperation with transportation providers to provide
additional regular or express service to the worksite;
(x) Construction of special loading and unloading facilities for
transit, car pool, and van pool users;
(xi) Provision of bicycle parking facilities, lockers, changing
areas, and showers for employees who bicycle or walk to work;
(xii) Provision of a program of parking incentives such as a rebate
for employees who do not use the parking facility;
(xiii) Establishment of a program to permit employees to work part
or full time at home or at an alternative worksite closer to their
homes;
(xiv) Establishment of a program of alternative work schedules such
as compressed work week schedules which reduce commuting; and
(xv) Implementation of other measures designed to facilitate the
use of high-occupancy vehicles such as on-site day care facilities and
emergency taxi services.
(4) Employers or owners of worksites may form or utilize existing
transportation management associations or other transportation-related
associations authorized by RCW 35.87A.010 to assist members in
developing and implementing commute trip reduction programs.
(5) Employers shall make a good faith effort towards achievement of
the goals identified in RCW 70.94.527(4)(d) (as recodified by this
act).

Sec. 179 RCW 70.94.534 and 2006 c 329 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each jurisdiction implementing a commute trip reduction plan
under this chapter or as part of a plan or ordinance developed under
RCW 36.70A.070 shall review each employer's initial commute trip
reduction program to determine if the program is likely to meet the
applicable commute trip reduction goals. The employer shall be
notified by the jurisdiction of its findings. If the jurisdiction
finds that the program is not likely to meet the applicable commute
trip reduction goals, the jurisdiction will work with the employer to
modify the program as necessary. The jurisdiction shall complete
review of each employer's initial commute trip reduction program within
ninety days of receipt.
(2) Employers implementing commute trip reduction programs are
expected to undertake good faith efforts to achieve the goals outlined
in RCW 70.94.527(4) (as recodified by this act). Employers are
considered to be making a good faith effort if the following conditions
have been met:
(a) The employer has met the minimum requirements identified in RCW
70.94.531 (as recodified by this act);
(b) The employer has notified the jurisdiction of its intent to
substantially change or modify its program and has either received the
approval of the jurisdiction to do so or has acknowledged that its
program may not be approved without additional modifications;
(c) The employer has provided adequate information and
documentation of implementation when requested by the jurisdiction; and
(d) The employer is working collaboratively with its jurisdiction
to continue its existing program or is developing and implementing
program modifications likely to result in improvements to the program
over an agreed upon length of time.
(3) Each jurisdiction shall review at least once every two years
each employer's progress and good faith efforts toward meeting the
applicable commute trip reduction goals. If an employer makes a good
faith effort, as defined in this section, but is not likely to meet the
applicable commute trip reduction goals, the jurisdiction shall work
collaboratively with the employer to make modifications to the commute
trip reduction program. Failure of an employer to reach the applicable
commute trip reduction goals is not a violation of this chapter.
(4) If an employer fails to make a good faith effort and fails to
meet the applicable commute trip reduction goals, the jurisdiction
shall work collaboratively with the employer to propose modifications
to the program and shall direct the employer to revise its program
within thirty days to incorporate those modifications or modifications
which the jurisdiction determines to be equivalent.
(5) Each jurisdiction implementing a commute trip reduction plan
pursuant to this chapter may impose civil penalties, in the manner
provided in chapter 7.80 RCW, for failure by an employer to implement
a commute trip reduction program or to modify its commute trip
reduction program as required in subsection (4) of this section. No
major employer may be held liable for civil penalties for failure to
reach the applicable commute trip reduction goals. No major employer
shall be liable for civil penalties under this chapter if failure to
achieve a commute trip reduction program goal was the result of an
inability to reach agreement with a certified collective bargaining
agent under applicable laws where the issue was raised by the employer
and pursued in good faith.
(6) Jurisdictions shall notify major employers of the procedures
for applying for goal modification or exemption from the commute trip
reduction requirements based on the guidelines established by the
commute trip reduction board authorized under RCW 70.94.537 (as
recodified by this act).

Sec. 180 RCW 70.94.537 and 2006 c 329 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A sixteen member state commute trip reduction board is
established, with membership arranged as follows:
(a) The secretary of the department of transportation or the
secretary's designee who shall serve as chair;
(b) One representative from the office of the governor or the
governor's designee;
(c) The director or the director's designee of one of the following
agencies, to be determined by the governor:
(i) Department of general administration;
(ii) Department of ecology;
(iii) Department of community, trade, and economic development;
(d) Three representatives from cities and towns or counties
appointed by the governor for staggered four-year terms from a list
recommended by ((the)) a statewide association of ((Washington)) cities
or ((the Washington state association of)) counties;
(e) Two representatives from transit agencies appointed by the
governor for staggered four-year terms from a list recommended by the
((Washington state)) statewide transit association;
(f) Two representatives from participating regional transportation
planning organizations appointed by the governor for staggered four-year terms;
(g) Four representatives of employers at or owners of major
worksites in Washington, or transportation management associations,
business improvement areas, or other transportation organizations
representing employers, appointed by the governor for staggered four-year terms; and
(h) Two citizens appointed by the governor for staggered four-year
terms.
(2) Members of the commute trip reduction board shall serve without
compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Members appointed by the governor shall
be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.220. The board has all
powers necessary to carry out its duties as prescribed by this chapter.
(((2))) (3) By March 1, 2007, the department of transportation
shall establish rules for commute trip reduction plans and
implementation procedures. The commute trip reduction board shall
advise the department on the content of the rules. The rules are
intended to ensure consistency in commute trip reduction plans and
goals among jurisdictions while fairly taking into account differences
in employment and housing density, employer size, existing and
anticipated levels of transit service, special employer circumstances,
and other factors the board determines to be relevant. The rules shall
include:
(a) Guidance criteria for growth and transportation efficiency
centers;
(b) Data measurement methods and procedures for determining the
efficacy of commute trip reduction activities and progress toward
meeting commute trip reduction plan goals;
(c) Model commute trip reduction ordinances;
(d) Methods for assuring consistency in the treatment of employers
who have worksites subject to the requirements of this chapter in more
than one jurisdiction;
(e) An appeals process by which major employers, who as a result of
special characteristics of their business or its locations would be
unable to meet the requirements of a commute trip reduction plan, may
obtain a waiver or modification of those requirements and criteria for
determining eligibility for waiver or modification;
(f) Establishment of a process for determining the state's affected
areas, including criteria and procedures for regional transportation
planning organizations in consultation with local jurisdictions to
propose to add or exempt urban growth areas;
(g) Listing of the affected areas of the program to be done every
four years as identified in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section;
(h) Establishment of a criteria and application process to
determine whether jurisdictions that voluntarily implement commute trip
reduction are eligible for state funding;
(i) Guidelines and deadlines for creating and updating local
commute trip reduction plans, including guidance to ensure consistency
between the local commute trip reduction plan and the transportation
demand management strategies identified in the transportation element
in the local comprehensive plan, as required by RCW 36.70A.070;
(j) Guidelines for creating and updating regional commute trip
reduction plans, including guidance to ensure the regional commute trip
reduction plan is consistent with and incorporated into transportation
demand management components in the regional transportation plan;
(k) Methods for regional transportation planning organizations to
evaluate and certify that designated growth and transportation
efficiency center programs meet the minimum requirements and are
eligible for funding;
(l) Guidelines for creating and updating growth and transportation
efficiency center programs; and
(m) Establishment of statewide program goals. The goals shall be
designed to achieve substantial reductions in the proportion of
single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip vehicle
miles traveled per employee, at a level that is projected to improve
the mobility of people and goods by increasing the efficiency of the
state highway system.
(((3))) (4)(a) The board shall create a state commute trip
reduction plan that shall be updated every four years as discussed in
subsection (((5))) (6) of this section.
(b) The state commute trip reduction plan shall include, but is not
limited to:
(((a))) (i) Statewide commute trip reduction program goals that are
designed to substantially improve the mobility of people and goods;
(((b))) (ii) Identification of strategies at the state and regional
levels to achieve the goals and recommendations for how transportation
demand management strategies can be targeted most effectively to
support commute trip reduction program goals;
(((c))) (iii) Performance measures for assessing the
cost-effectiveness of commute trip reduction strategies and the
benefits for the state transportation system; and
(((d))) (iv) A sustainable financial plan.
(c) The board shall review and approve regional commute trip
reduction plans, and work collaboratively with regional transportation
planning organizations in the establishment of the state commute trip
reduction plan.
(((4))) (5) The board shall work with affected jurisdictions, major
employers, and other parties to develop and implement a public
awareness campaign designed to increase the effectiveness of local
commute trip reduction programs and support achievement of the
objectives identified in this chapter.
(((5))) (6) The board shall evaluate and update the commute trip
reduction program plan and recommend changes to the rules every four
years, with the first assessment report due July 1, 2011, to ensure
that the latest data methodology used by the department of
transportation is incorporated into the program and to determine which
areas of the state should be affected by the program. The board shall
review the definition of a major employer provided in RCW 70.94.030 (as
recodified by this act) no later than December 1, 2009. The board
shall regularly identify urban growth areas that are projected to be
affected by chapter 329, Laws of 2006 in the next four-year period and
may provide advance planning support to the potentially affected
jurisdictions.
(((6))) (7) The board shall review progress toward implementing
commute trip reduction plans and programs and the costs and benefits of
commute trip reduction plans and programs and shall make
recommendations to the legislature and the governor by December 1,
2009, and every two years thereafter. In assessing the costs and
benefits, the board shall consider the costs of not having implemented
commute trip reduction plans and programs ((with the assistance of the
transportation performance audit board authorized under chapter 44.75
RCW)). The board shall examine other transportation demand management
programs nationally and incorporate its findings into its
recommendations to the legislature. The recommendations shall address
the need for continuation, modification, or termination or any or all
requirements of this chapter.
(((7))) (8) The board shall invite personnel with appropriate
expertise from state, regional, and local government, private, public,
and nonprofit providers of transportation services, and employers or
owners of major worksites in Washington to act as a technical advisory
group. The technical advisory group shall advise the board on the
implementation of local and regional commute trip reduction plans and
programs, program evaluation, program funding allocations, and state
rules and guidelines.

Sec. 181 RCW 70.94.541 and 2006 c 329 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of transportation shall provide staff support to
the commute trip reduction board in carrying out the requirements of
RCW 70.94.537 (as recodified by this act).
(2) The department of transportation shall provide technical
assistance to regional transportation planning organizations, counties,
cities, and towns, the department of general administration, other
state agencies, and other employers in developing and implementing
commute trip reduction plans and programs. The technical assistance
shall include: (a) Guidance in single measurement methodology and
practice to be used in determining progress in attaining plan goals;
(b) developing model plans and programs appropriate to different
situations; and (c) providing consistent training and informational
materials for the implementation of commute trip reduction programs.
Model plans and programs, training, and informational materials shall
be developed in cooperation with representatives of regional
transportation planning organizations, local governments, transit
agencies, and employers.
(3) In carrying out this section the department of transportation
may contract with statewide associations representing cities, towns,
and counties to assist cities, towns, and counties in implementing
commute trip reduction plans and programs.

Sec. 182 RCW 70.94.544 and 2006 c 329 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
A portion of the funds made available for the purposes of this
chapter shall be used to fund the commute trip reduction board in
carrying out the responsibilities of RCW 70.94.537 (as recodified by
this act), and the department of transportation, including the
activities authorized under RCW 70.94.541(2) (as recodified by this
act), and to assist regional transportation planning organizations,
counties, cities, and towns implementing commute trip reduction plans.
The commute trip reduction board created in RCW 70.94.537 (as
recodified by this act) shall determine the allocation of program funds
made available for the purposes of this chapter to regional
transportation planning organizations, counties, cities, and towns
implementing commute trip reduction plans. If state funds for the
purposes of this chapter are provided to those jurisdictions
implementing voluntary commute trip reduction plans, the funds shall be
disbursed based on criteria established by the commute trip reduction
board under RCW 70.94.537 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 183 RCW 70.94.547 and 2006 c 329 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature ((hereby)) recognizes the state's crucial
leadership role in establishing and implementing effective commute trip
reduction programs. Therefore, it is the policy of the state that the
department of general administration and other state agencies,
including institutions of higher education, shall aggressively develop
substantive programs to reduce commute trips by state employees.
Implementation of these programs will reduce energy consumption,
congestion in urban areas, and air and water pollution associated with
automobile travel.

Sec. 184 RCW 70.94.551 and 2006 c 329 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The director of the department of general administration may
coordinate an interagency board for the purpose of developing policies
or guidelines that promote consistency among state agency commute trip
reduction programs required by RCW 70.94.527 and 70.94.531 (as
recodified by this act).
(b) The interagency board shall include representatives of the
department, departments of transportation((, ecology,)) and community,
trade, and economic development, and ((such)) other departments and
interested groups as the director of the department of general
administration determines to be necessary.
(c) Policies and guidelines ((shall be)) for the interagency board
are applicable to all state agencies including but not limited to
policies and guidelines regarding parking and parking charges, employee
incentives for commuting by other than single-occupant automobiles,
flexible and alternative work schedules, alternative worksites, and the
use of state-owned vehicles for car and van pools and guaranteed rides
home. The policies and guidelines shall also consider the costs and
benefits to state agencies of achieving commute trip reductions and
consider mechanisms for funding state agency commute trip reduction
programs.
(2) State agencies sharing a common location in affected urban
growth areas where the total number of state employees is one hundred
or more shall, with assistance from the department of general
administration, develop and implement a joint commute trip reduction
program. The worksite shall be treated as specified in RCW 70.94.531
and 70.94.534 (as recodified by this act).
(3) The department of general administration shall review the
initial commute trip reduction program of each state agency subject to
the commute trip reduction plan for state agencies to determine if the
program is likely to meet the applicable commute trip reduction goals
and notify the agency of any deficiencies. If it is found that the
program is not likely to meet the applicable commute trip reduction
goals, the department of general administration will work with the
agency to modify the program as necessary.
(4) Each state agency implementing a commute trip reduction plan
shall report at least once per year to its agency director on the
performance of the agency's commute trip reduction program as part of
the agency's quality management, accountability, and performance system
as defined by RCW 43.17.385. The reports shall assess the performance
of the program, progress toward state goals established under RCW
70.94.537 (as recodified by this act), and recommendations for
improving the program.
(5) The department of general administration shall review the
agency performance reports defined in subsection (4) of this section
and submit a biennial report for state agencies subject to this chapter
to the governor and incorporate the report in the commute trip
reduction board report to the legislature as directed in RCW
70.94.537(6) (as recodified by this act). The report shall include,
but is not limited to, an evaluation of the most recent measurement
results, progress toward state goals established under RCW 70.94.537
(as recodified by this act), and recommendations for improving the
performance of state agency commute trip reduction programs. The
information shall be reported in a form established by the commute trip
reduction board.

Sec. 185 RCW 70.94.600 and 1979 ex.s. c 30 s 14 are each amended
to read as follows:
All authorities in the state shall submit quarterly reports to the
department ((of ecology)) detailing the current status of air pollution
control regulations in the authority and, by county, the progress made
toward bringing all sources in the authority into compliance with
authority standards.

Sec. 186 RCW 70.94.610 and 1991 c 319 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
may not burn used oil as fuel in a land-based facility or in state
waters unless the used oil meets the following standards:
(a) Cadmium: 2 ppm maximum
(b) Chromium: 10 ppm maximum
(c) Lead: 100 ppm maximum
(d) Arsenic: 5 ppm maximum
(e) Total halogens: 1000 ppm maximum
(f) Polychlorinated biphenyls: 2 ppm maximum
(g) Ash: .1 percent maximum
(h) Sulfur: 1.0 percent maximum
(i) Flash point: 100 degrees Fahrenheit minimum.
(2) This section shall not apply to: (a) Used oil burned in space
heaters if the space heater has a maximum heat output of not greater
than 0.5 million btu's per hour or used oil burned in facilities
permitted by the department or ((a local air pollution control)) an
authority; or (b) ocean-going vessels.
(3) This section shall not apply to persons in the business of
collecting used oil from residences when under authorization by a city,
county, or the utilities and transportation commission.

Sec. 187 RCW 70.94.620 and 1994 c 232 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
If a metals mining and milling operation is issued a permit
pursuant to this chapter, then it will be subject to special inspection
requirements. The department ((of ecology)) shall inspect these mining
operations at least quarterly in order to ensure that the operation is
in compliance with the conditions of any permit issued to it pursuant
to this chapter. The department shall conduct additional inspections
during the construction phase of the mining and milling operation in
order to ensure compliance with this chapter.

Sec. 188 RCW 70.94.630 and 1997 c 368 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The sulfur dioxide abatement account is created. All receipts
from subsection (2) of this section must be deposited in the account.
Expenditures in the account may be used only for the purposes of
subsection (3) of this section. Only the director of revenue or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2)(a) Upon application by the owners of a generation facility, the
department ((of ecology)) shall make a determination of whether the
owners are making initial progress in the construction of air pollution
control facilities. Evidence of initial progress may include, but is
not limited to((,)):
(i) Engineering work((,));
(ii) Agreements to proceed with construction((,));
(iii) Contracts to purchase((,)); or
(iv) Contracts for construction of air pollution control
facilities. ((However,))
(b) If the owners' progress is impeded due to actions caused by
regulatory delays or by defensive litigation, certification of initial
progress may not be withheld.
(c) Upon certification of initial progress by the department ((of
ecology and after January 1, 1999)), an amount equal to all sales and
use taxes paid under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, that were
obtained from the sales of coal to, or use of coal by, a business for
use at a generation facility shall be deposited in the account under
RCW 82.32.392.
(d)(i) By June 1st of each year during construction of the air
pollution control facilities and during the verification period
required in RCW 82.08.811(2)(d) and 82.12.811(2)(d), the department
((of ecology)) shall make an assessment regarding the continued
progress of the pollution control facilities.
(ii) Evidence of continued progress may include, but is not limited
to, acquisition of construction material, visible progress on
construction, or other actions that have occurred that would verify
progress under general construction time tables.
(iii) The treasurer shall continue to deposit an amount equal to
the tax revenues to the sulfur dioxide abatement account unless the
department ((of ecology)) fails to certify that reasonable progress has
been made during the previous year.
(iv) The operator of a generation facility shall file documentation
accompanying its combined monthly excise tax return that identifies all
sales and use tax payments made by the owners for coal used at the
generation facility during the reporting period.
(3) When a generation facility emits no more than ten thousand tons
of sulfur dioxide during a consecutive twelve-month period, the
department ((of ecology)) shall certify this to the department of
revenue and the state treasurer by the end of the following month.
Within thirty days of receipt of certification under this subsection,
the department of revenue shall approve the tax exemption application
and the director or the director's designee shall authorize the release
of any moneys in the sulfur dioxide abatement account to the operator
of the generation facility. The operator shall disburse the payment
among the owners of record according to the terms of their contractual
agreement.
(4)(a) If the department of revenue has not approved a tax
exemption under RCW 82.08.811 and 82.12.811 by March 1, 2005, any
moneys in the sulfur dioxide abatement account shall be transferred to
the general fund and the appropriate local governments in accordance
with chapter 82.14 RCW, and the sulfur dioxide abatement account shall
cease to exist after March 1, 2005.
(b) The dates in (a) of this subsection must be extended if the
owners of a generation facility have experienced difficulties in
complying with this section, or RCW 82.08.811, ((82.08.812,))
82.12.811, ((82.12.812,)) and 82.32.392, due to actions caused by
regulatory delays or by defensive litigation.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Air pollution control facilities" means any treatment works,
control devices and disposal systems, machinery, equipment, structure,
property, property improvements and accessories, that are installed or
acquired for the primary purpose of reducing, controlling, or disposing
of industrial waste that, if released to the outdoor atmosphere, could
cause air pollution, or that are required to meet regulatory
requirements applicable to their construction, installation, or
operation; and
(b) "Generation facility" means a coal-fired thermal electric
generation facility placed in operation after December 3, 1969, and
before July 1, 1975.

Sec. 189 RCW 70.94.640 and 2005 c 511 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Odors or fugitive dust caused by agricultural activity
consistent with good agricultural practices on agricultural land are
exempt from the requirements of this chapter unless they have a
substantial adverse effect on public health. In determining whether
agricultural activity is consistent with good agricultural practices,
the department ((of ecology)) or board of any authority shall consult
with a recognized third-party expert in the activity prior to issuing
any notice of violation.
(2) Any notice of violation issued under this chapter pertaining to
odors or fugitive dust caused by agricultural activity shall include a
statement as to why the activity is inconsistent with good agricultural
practices, or a statement that the odors or fugitive dust have
substantial adverse effect on public health.
(3) In any appeal to the pollution control hearings board or any
judicial appeal, the agency issuing a final order pertaining to odors
or fugitive dust caused by agricultural activity shall prove the
activity is inconsistent with good agricultural practices or that the
odors or fugitive dust have a substantial adverse impact on public
health.
(4) If a person engaged in agricultural activity on a contiguous
piece of agricultural land sells or has sold a portion of that land for
residential purposes, the exemption of this section shall not apply.
(5) ((As used in this section:
(a) "Agricultural activity" means the growing, raising, or
production of horticultural or viticultural crops, berries, poultry,
livestock, shellfish, grain, mint, hay, and dairy products.
(b) "Good agricultural practices" means economically feasible
practices which are customary among or appropriate to farms and ranches
of a similar nature in the local area.
(c) "Agricultural land" means at least five acres of land devoted
primarily to the commercial production of livestock, agricultural
commodities, or cultured aquatic products.
(d) "Fugitive dust" means a particulate emission made airborne by
human activity, forces of wind, or both, and which do not pass through
a stack, chimney, vent, or other functionally equivalent opening.
(6))) The exemption for fugitive dust provided in subsection (1) of
this section does not apply to facilities subject to RCW 70.94.151 (as
recodified by this act) as specified in WAC 173-400-100 as of July 24,
2005, 70.94.152 (as recodified by this act), or 70.94.161 (as
recodified by this act).

Sec. 190 RCW 70.94.650 and 1998 c 43 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A permit from an authority, the department, or a local entity
delegated permitting authority under RCW 70.94.654 (as recodified by
this act) is required for any person who proposes to set fires in the
course of:
(a) Weed abatement;
(b) Instruction in methods of fire fighting, except training to
fight structural fires as provided in RCW 52.12.150 ((or)), training to
fight aircraft crash rescue fires as provided in ((subsection (5) of
this section)) section 321 of this act, and ((except)) forest fire
training; or
(c) Agricultural activities((,
shall obtain a permit from an air pollution control authority, the
department of ecology, or a local entity delegated permitting authority
under RCW 70.94.654)).
(2) General ((permit)) criteria of statewide applicability for
permits required under this section shall be established by the
department, by rule, after consultation with the various ((air
pollution control)) authorities.
(3) Permits ((shall be)) issued under this section must be based on
seasonal operations or by individual operations, or both. All permits
shall be conditioned to ((insure)) ensure that the public interest in
air, water, and land pollution and safety to life and property is fully
considered, and must be designed to minimize air pollution to the
degree practical.
(4) In addition to any other requirements established by the
department to protect air quality pursuant to other laws, applicants
for permits must show that the setting of fires as requested is the
most reasonable procedure to follow in safeguarding life or property
under all circumstances or is otherwise reasonably necessary to
successfully carry out the enterprise in which the applicant is
engaged, or both. ((All burning permits will be designed to minimize
air pollution insofar as practical. Nothing in this section shall
relieve the applicant from obtaining permits, licenses, or other
approvals required by any other law. An application for a permit to
set fires in the course of agricultural burning for controlling
diseases, insects, weed abatement or development of physiological
conditions conducive to increased crop yield, shall be acted upon
within seven days from the date such application is filed.))
(5)(a) The department ((of ecology)) and ((local air)) authorities
shall provide convenient methods for issuance and oversight of
agricultural burning permits. The department and ((local air))
authorities shall, through agreement, work with counties and cities to
provide convenient methods for granting permission for agricultural
burning, including telephone, facsimile transmission, issuance from
local city or county offices, or other methods. ((A local air))
(b) An application for a permit to set fires in the course of
agricultural burning for controlling diseases, insects, weed abatement,
or development of physiological conditions conducive to increased crop
yield, must be acted upon within seven days from the date the
application is filed.
(6) An authority administering the permit program under this
((subsection (1)(c))) section shall not limit the number of days of
allowable agricultural burning, but may consider the time of year,
meteorological conditions, and other criteria specified in rules
adopted by the department to implement ((this subsection (1)(c))) the
permit program under this section.
(((2))) (7) Nothing in this section relieves the applicant from
obtaining permits, licenses, or other approvals required by any other
law.
(8)(a) Permit fees shall be assessed for burning under this section
and shall be collected by the department ((of ecology)), the
((appropriate local air)) authority, or a local entity delegated
permitting authority pursuant to RCW 70.94.654 (as recodified by this
act) at the time the permit is issued.
(b) All fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the
air pollution control account created in RCW 70.94.015 (as recodified
by this act), except for that portion of the fee necessary to cover
local costs of administering a permit issued under this section.
(c) Permit fees shall be set by rule by the permitting agency at
the level determined by the task force created by ((subsection (4) of
this)) section 323 of this act, but shall not exceed two dollars and
fifty cents per acre to be burned. After fees are established by rule,
any increases in such fees shall be limited to annual inflation
adjustments as determined by the state office of the economic and
revenue forecast council.
(((3) Conservation districts and the Washington State University
agricultural extension program in conjunction with the department shall
develop public education material for the agricultural community
identifying the health and environmental effects of agricultural
outdoor burning and providing technical assistance in alternatives to
agricultural outdoor burning.
(4) An agricultural burning practices and research task force shall
be established under the direction of the department. The task force
shall be composed of a representative from the department who shall
serve as chair; one representative of eastern Washington local air
authorities; three representatives of the agricultural community from
different agricultural pursuits; one representative of the department
of agriculture; two representatives from universities or colleges
knowledgeable in agricultural issues; one representative of the public
health or medical community; and one representative of the conservation
districts. The task force shall identify best management practices for
reducing air contaminant emissions from agricultural activities and
provide such information to the department and local air authorities.
The task force shall determine the level of fees to be assessed by the
permitting agency pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, based
upon the level necessary to cover the costs of administering and
enforcing the permit programs, to provide funds for research into
alternative methods to reduce emissions from such burning, and to the
extent possible be consistent with fees charged for such burning
permits in neighboring states. The fee level shall provide, to the
extent possible, for lesser fees for permittees who use best management
practices to minimize air contaminant emissions. The task force shall
identify research needs related to minimizing emissions from
agricultural burning and alternatives to such burning. Further, the
task force shall make recommendations to the department on priorities
for spending funds provided through this chapter for research into
alternative methods to reduce emissions from agricultural burning.
(5) A permit is not required under this section, or under RCW
70.94.743 through 70.94.780, from an air pollution control authority,
the department, or any local entity with delegated permit authority,
for aircraft crash rescue fire training activities meeting the
following conditions:
(a) Fire fighters participating in the training fires must be
limited to those who provide fire fighting support to an airport that
is either certified by the federal aviation administration or operated
in support of military or governmental activities;
(b) The fire training may not be conducted during an air pollution
episode or any stage of impaired air quality declared under RCW
70.94.715 for the area where training is to be conducted;
(c) The number of training fires allowed per year without a permit
shall be the minimum number necessary to meet federal aviation
administration or other federal safety requirements;
(d) The facility shall use current technology and be operated in a
manner that will minimize, to the extent possible, the air contaminants
generated during operation; and
(e) Prior to the commencement of the aircraft fire training, the
organization conducting training shall notify both the: (i) Local fire
district or fire department; and (ii) air pollution control authority,
department of ecology, or local entity delegated permitting authority
under RCW 70.94.654, having jurisdiction within the area where training
is to be conducted.
Written approval from the department or a local air pollution
control authority shall be obtained prior to the initial operation of
aircraft crash rescue fire training. Such approval will be granted to
fire training activities meeting the conditions in this subsection.
(6) Aircraft crash rescue fire training activities conducted in
compliance with this subsection are not subject to the prohibition, in
RCW 70.94.775(1), of outdoor fires containing petroleum products and
are not considered outdoor burning under RCW 70.94.743 through
70.94.780.
(7) To provide for fire fighting instruction in instances not
governed by subsection (6) of this section, or other actions to protect
public health and safety, the department or a local air pollution
control authority may issue permits that allow limited burning of
prohibited materials listed in RCW 70.94.775(1).))

Sec. 191 RCW 70.94.651 and 1991 c 199 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit fires
necessary:
(((1))) (a) To promote the regeneration of rare and endangered
plants found within natural area preserves as identified under chapter
79.70 RCW; and
(((2))) (b) For Indian ceremonies or for the sending of smoke
signals if part of a religious ritual.
(2) Permits issued for burning under this section shall be drafted
to minimize emissions, including denial of permission to burn during
periods of adverse meteorological conditions.

Sec. 192 RCW 70.94.654 and 1993 c 353 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever an ((air pollution control)) authority, or the department
((of ecology)) for areas outside the jurisdictional boundaries of an
activated ((air pollution control)) authority, ((shall)) finds that any
fire protection agency, county, or conservation district is willing to
and capable of effectively administering the issuance and enforcement
of burning permits ((for any or all of the kinds of burning))
identified in RCW 70.94.650 ((and desirous of doing so)) (as recodified
by this act), the authority or the department ((of ecology)), as
appropriate, may delegate the powers necessary for the issuance or
enforcement, or both, of burning permits ((for any or all of the kinds
of burning)) to the fire protection agency, county, or conservation
district. ((Such)) Delegation of authority under this section may be
withdrawn by the authority or the department ((of ecology)) upon
finding that the fire protection agency, county, or conservation
district is not effectively administering the permit program.

Sec. 193 RCW 70.94.656 and 1998 c 245 s 130 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is ((hereby declared to be)) the policy of this state that
strong efforts should be made to minimize adverse effects on air
quality from the open burning of field and turf grasses grown for seed.
((To such end)) As such, this section is intended to promote the
development of economical and practical alternate agricultural
practices to ((such)) open burning, and to provide for interim
regulation of ((such)) burning until practical alternates are found.
(((1))) (2)(a) The department shall approve of a study or studies
for the exploration and identification of economical and practical
alternate agricultural practices to the open burning of field and turf
grasses grown for seed.
(b) Any study conducted pursuant to this section shall be conducted
by Washington State University. The university may not charge more
than eight percent for administrative overhead.
(3)(a) Prior to the issuance of any permit for such burning under
RCW 70.94.650 (as recodified by this act), there shall be collected a
fee not to exceed one dollar per acre of crop to be burned. Any
((such)) fees received by any authority shall be transferred to the
department ((of ecology)). The department ((of ecology)) shall deposit
all ((such)) acreage fees in a special grass seed burning research
account, hereby created, in the state treasury. (((2))) The department
shall allocate moneys annually from this account for the support of any
approved study or studies as provided for in ((subsection (1) of)) this
section.
(b) Whenever the department ((of ecology shall)) concludes that
sufficient reasonably available alternates to open burning have been
developed, and ((at such time as)) once all costs of any studies have
been paid, the grass seed burning research account shall be dissolved,
and any money remaining ((therein)) shall revert to the general fund.
The fee collected under ((subsection (1) of)) this section shall
constitute the research portion of fees required under RCW 70.94.650
(as recodified by this act) for open burning of grass grown for seed.
(((3))) (4)(a) Whenever, on the basis of information available to
it, the department ((after public hearings have been conducted wherein
testimony will be received and considered from interested parties
wishing to testify shall)) concludes that any procedure, program,
technique, or device constitutes a practical alternate agricultural
practice to the open burning of field or turf grasses grown for seed,
the department shall, by order, certify approval of ((such)) the
alternate. ((Thereafter,))
(b) The department may not issue an order under this subsection
without first conducting public hearings where testimony from
interested parties willing to participate may be received and
considered.
(c) Once an order is issued under this subsection, in any case
which ((any such)) an approved alternate is reasonably available, the
open burning of field and turf grasses grown for seed shall be
disallowed and no permit shall issue ((therefor)).
(((4))) (5) Until approved alternates become available, the
department or the authority may limit the number of acres on a pro rata
basis among those affected for which permits to burn will be issued in
order to effectively control emissions from this source.
(((5))) (6) Permits issued for burning of field and turf grasses
may be conditioned to minimize emissions ((insofar as)) to the degree
practical, including the denial of permission to burn during periods of
adverse meteorological conditions.
(((6))) (7) By November 1, 1996, and every two years thereafter
until grass seed burning is prohibited, Washington State University may
prepare a brief report assessing the potential of the university's
research to result in economical and practical alternatives to grass
seed burning.

Sec. 194 RCW 70.94.660 and 1991 c 199 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the department of
natural resources shall have the responsibility for issuing and
regulating burning permits, consistent with RCW 70.94.670 (as
recodified by this act), required by it relating to the following
activities for the protection of life or property and/or for the public
health, safety, and welfare:
(a) Abating a forest fire hazard;
(b) Prevention of a fire hazard;
(c) Instruction of public officials in methods of forest fire
fighting;
(d) Any silvicultural operation to improve the forest lands of the
state; and
(e) Silvicultural burning used to improve or maintain fire
dependent ecosystems for rare plants or animals within state, federal,
and private natural area preserves, natural resource conservation
areas, parks, and other wildlife areas.
(2) ((The department of natural resources shall not retain such
authority, but it shall be)) Permitting and regulating outdoor burning
on lands where the department of natural resources does not have fire
protection responsibility is the responsibility of the appropriate fire
protection agency ((for permitting and regulating outdoor burning on
lands where)) and not the department of natural resources ((does not
have fire protection responsibility)).
(3)(a) Permit fees shall be assessed for silvicultural burning
under the jurisdiction of the department of natural resources and
collected by the department of natural resources as provided for in
this section.
(b) All fees shall be deposited in the air pollution control
account, created in RCW 70.94.015 (as recodified by this act). The
legislature shall appropriate to the department of natural resources
funds from the air pollution control account to enforce and administer
the program under RCW 70.94.665 ((and)), 70.94.660, 70.94.670, and
70.94.690 (as recodified by this act). Fees shall be set by rule by
the department of natural resources at the level necessary to cover the
costs of the program after receiving recommendations on ((such)) the
fees from the public and the forest fire advisory board established by
RCW 76.04.145.

Sec. 195 RCW 70.94.665 and 1995 c 143 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided under section 319 of this act, the
department of natural resources shall administer a program to reduce
statewide emissions from silvicultural forest burning ((so as)) to
achieve ((the following minimum objectives:
(a))) a twenty percent reduction by December 31, 1994 ((providing
a ceiling for emissions until December 31, 2000;)), and
(((b))) a fifty percent reduction by December 31, 2000, providing
a ceiling for emissions thereafter.
(b) Reductions under this section shall be calculated from the
average annual emissions level from calendar years 1985 to 1989, using
the same methodology for both reduction and base year calculations.
(2) The department of natural resources((, within twelve months
after May 15, 1991,)) shall ((develop)) maintain a plan((,)) based upon
the existing smoke management agreement to carry out the programs as
described in this section in the most efficient, cost-effective manner
possible. The plan shall:
(a) Be developed in consultation with the department ((of
ecology)), public and private landowners engaged in silvicultural
forest burning, and representatives of the public((.));
((The plan shall)) (b) Recognize the variations in silvicultural
forest burning including, but not limited to, a landowner's
responsibility to abate an extreme fire hazard under chapter 76.04 RCW
and other objectives of burning, including abating and preventing a
fire hazard, geographic region, climate, elevation and slope, proximity
to populated areas, and diversity of land ownership((. The plan
shall));
(c) Establish priorities that the department of natural resources
shall use to allocate allowable emissions, including but not limited
to, silvicultural burning used to improve or maintain fire dependent
ecosystems for rare plants or animals within state, federal, and
private natural area preserves, natural resource conservation areas,
parks, and other wildlife areas((. The plan shall also));
(d) Include a tracking system designed to measure the degree of
progress toward the emission reductions goals set in this section;
(e) Recognize the real costs of the emissions program and recommend
equitable fees to cover the costs of the program;
(f) Include an annual report to the department and the legislature
on the status of the plan, emission reductions, and progress toward
meeting the objectives specified in this section, and the goals of this
chapter and chapter 76.04 RCW.
(3) The emission reductions in this section are to apply to all
forest lands, including those owned and managed by the United States.
If the United States does not participate in implementing the plan, the
((departments)) department and the department of natural resources
((and ecology)) shall use all appropriate and available methods or
enforcement powers to ensure participation.
((The plan shall include a tracking system designed to measure the
degree of progress toward the emission reductions goals set in this
section. The department of natural resources shall report annually to
the department of ecology and the legislature on the status of the
plan, emission reductions and progress toward meeting the objectives
specified in this section, and the goals of this chapter and chapter
76.04 RCW.
(3))) (4) If the December 31, 1994, emission reductions targets in
this section are not met, the department of natural resources, in
consultation with the department ((of ecology)), shall use its
authority granted in this chapter and chapter 76.04 RCW to immediately
limit emissions from ((such)) burning to the 1994 target levels and
limit silvicultural forest burning in subsequent years to achieve equal
annual incremental reductions so as to achieve the December 31, 2000,
target level. If, as a result of the program established in this
section, the emission reductions are met in 1994, but are not met by
December 31, 2000, the department of natural resources, in consultation
with the department ((of ecology)), shall immediately limit
silvicultural forest burning to reduce emissions from ((such)) burning
to the December 31, 2000, target level in all subsequent years.
(((4) Emissions from silvicultural burning in eastern Washington
that is conducted for the purpose of restoring forest health or
preventing the additional deterioration of forest health are exempt
from the reduction targets and calculations in this section if the
following conditions are met:
(a) The landowner submits a written request to the department
identifying the location of the proposed burning and the nature of the
forest health problem to be corrected. The request shall include a
brief description of alternatives to silvicultural burning and reasons
why the landowner believes the alternatives not to be appropriate.
(b) The department determines that the proposed silvicultural
burning operation is being conducted to restore forest health or
prevent additional deterioration to forest health; meets the
requirements of the state smoke management plan to protect public
health, visibility, and the environment; and will not be conducted
during an air pollution episode or during periods of impaired air
quality in the vicinity of the proposed burn.
(c) Upon approval of the request by the department and before
burning, the landowner is encouraged to notify the public in the
vicinity of the burn of the general location and approximate time of
ignition.
(5) The department of ecology may conduct a limited, seasonal
ambient air quality monitoring program to measure the effects of forest
health burning conducted under subsection (4) of this section. The
monitoring program may be developed in consultation with the department
of natural resources, private and public forest landowners, academic
experts in forest health issues, and the general public.))

Sec. 196 RCW 70.94.670 and 1991 c 199 s 405 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of natural resources, in granting burning
permits for fires for the purposes set forth in RCW 70.94.660 (as
recodified by this act), shall condition the issuance and use of
((such)) the permits to comply with air quality standards established
by the department ((of ecology)) after full consultation with the
department of natural resources. ((Such))
(2) Burning allowed by the department of natural resources shall
not cause the state air quality standards to be exceeded in the ambient
air up to two thousand feet above ground level over critical areas
designated by the department ((of ecology)), otherwise subject to air
pollution from other sources, and shall not cause damage to public
health or the environment.
(3) Air quality standards shall be established and published by the
department ((of ecology)) which shall also establish a procedure for
advising the department of natural resources when and where air
contaminant levels exceed or threaten to exceed the ambient air
standards over ((such)) the critical areas. The air quality shall be
quantitatively measured by the department ((of ecology)), or the
appropriate ((local air pollution control)) authority, at established
monitoring stations over ((such)) the designated areas. ((Further,
such permitted burning shall not cause damage to public health or the
environment.))
(4) The department of natural resources shall set forth smoke
dispersal objectives designed consistent with this section to minimize
any air pollution from permitted burning, and the procedures necessary
to meet those objectives.
(5) All permits issued under this section shall be subject to all
applicable fees, permitting, penalty, and enforcement provisions of
this chapter. ((The department of natural resources shall set forth
smoke dispersal objectives designed consistent with this section to
minimize any air pollution from such burning and the procedures
necessary to meet those objectives.
The department of natural resources shall encourage more intense
utilization in logging and alternative silviculture practices to reduce
the need for burning. The department of natural resources shall,
whenever practical, encourage landowners to develop and use alternative
acceptable disposal methods subject to the following priorities: (1)
Slash production minimization, (2) slash utilization, (3) nonburning
disposal, (4) silvicultural burning. Such alternative methods shall be
evaluated as to the relative impact on air, water, and land pollution,
public health, and their financial feasibility.))
(6) The department of natural resources shall not issue burning
permits and shall revoke previously issued permits at any time in any
area where the department ((of ecology)) or local board has declared a
stage of impaired air quality as defined in ((RCW 70.94.473)) section
316 of this act.

Sec. 197 RCW 70.94.690 and 1991 c 199 s 406 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In the regulation of outdoor burning not included in RCW
70.94.660 ((requiring)) (as recodified by this act), that requires
permits from the department of natural resources, ((said)) the
department of natural resources and the ((state,)) department or
local((, or regional air pollution control)) authorities will cooperate
in regulating ((such)) the burning so as to minimize ((insofar)), as
far as possible, duplicate inspections and separate permits while still
accomplishing the objectives and responsibilities of the respective
agencies.
(2) The department of natural resources shall include any local
authority's burning regulations with permits issued where applicable
pursuant to ((RCW 70.94.740 through 70.94.775)) this chapter. The
department shall develop agreements with all local authorities to
coordinate regulations.
(3) Permits shall be withheld by the department of natural
resources when so requested by the department ((of ecology)) if a
forecast, alert, warning, or emergency condition exists as defined in
the episode criteria of the department ((of ecology)).

Sec. 198 RCW 70.94.700 and 1971 ex.s. c 232 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
The department of natural resources and the department ((of
ecology)) may adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement their
respective responsibilities under the provisions of RCW 70.94.650
((through 70.94.700)), 70.94.651, 70.94.654, 70.94.660, 70.94.665,
70.94.670, and 70.94.690 (as recodified by this act) and sections 319
through 323 of this act.

Sec. 199 RCW 70.94.710 and 1971 ex.s. c 194 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that whenever meteorological conditions
occur which reduce the effective volume of air into which air
contaminants are introduced, there is a high danger that normal
operations at air contaminant sources in the area affected will be
detrimental to public health or safety. This condition is known as an
air pollution episode. Whenever ((such conditions, herein denominated
as)) air pollution episodes((,)) are forecast, there is a need for
rapid short-term emission reduction in order to avoid adverse health or
safety consequences.
(2) Therefore, it is declared to be the policy of this state that
an episode avoidance plan should be developed and implemented for the
temporary reduction of emissions during air pollution episodes.
(3) It is further declared that power should be vested in the
governor to issue emergency orders for the reduction or discontinuance
of emissions when ((such)) emissions and weather combine to create
conditions imminently dangerous to public health and safety.

Sec. 200 RCW 70.94.715 and 1990 c 128 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department ((of ecology)) is ((hereby)) authorized to
develop an episode avoidance plan, consistent with section 315 of this
act, providing for the phased reduction of emissions wherever and
whenever an air pollution episode is forecast. ((Such an)) The episode
avoidance plan shall conform with any applicable federal standards and
shall be effective statewide. The episode avoidance plan may be
implemented on an area basis in accordance with the occurrence of air
pollution episodes in any given area.
(2) The department ((of ecology)) may delegate authority to adopt
source emission reduction plans and the authority to implement all
stages of occurrence up to and including the warning stage, and all
intermediate stages up to the warning stage, in any area of the state,
to the ((air pollution control)) authority with jurisdiction
((therein)) over the area.
((The episode avoidance plan, which shall be established by
regulation in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, shall include, but not
be limited to the following:
(1) The designation of episode criteria and stages, the occurrence
of which will require the carrying out of preplanned episode avoidance
procedures. The stages of occurrence shall be (a) forecast, (b) alert,
(c) warning, (d) emergency, and such intermediate stages as the
department shall designate. "Forecast" means the presence of
meteorological conditions that are conducive to accumulation of air
contaminants and is the first stage of an episode. The department
shall not call a forecast episode prior to the department or an
authority calling a first stage impaired air quality condition as
provided by RCW 70.94.473(1)(b) or calling a single-stage impaired air
quality condition as provided by RCW 70.94.473(2). "Alert" means
concentration of air contaminants at levels at which short-term health
effects may occur, and is the second stage of an episode. "Warning"
means concentrations are continuing to degrade, contaminant
concentrations have reached a level which, if maintained, can result in
damage to health, and additional control actions are needed and is the
third level of an episode. "Emergency" means the air quality is posing
an imminent and substantial endangerment to public health and is the
fourth level of an episode;
(2) The requirement that persons responsible for the operation of
air contaminant sources prepare and obtain approval from the director
of source emission reduction plans, consistent with good operating
practice and safe operating procedures, for reducing emissions during
designated episode stages;
(3) Provision for the director of the department of ecology or his
authorized representative, or the air pollution control officer if
implementation has been delegated, on the satisfaction of applicable
criteria, to declare and terminate the forecast, alert, warning and all
intermediate stages, up to the warning episode stage, such declarations
constituting orders for action in accordance with applicable source
emission reduction plans;
(4) Provision for the governor to declare and terminate the
emergency stage and all intermediate stages above the warning episode
stage, such declarations constituting orders in accordance with
applicable source emission reduction plans;
(5) Provisions for enforcement by state and local police, personnel
of the departments of ecology and social and health services, and
personnel of local air pollution control agencies; and
(6) Provisions for reduction or discontinuance of emissions
immediately, consistent with good operating practice and safe operating
procedures, under an air pollution emergency as provided in RCW
70.94.720.))
(3) Source emission reduction plans shall be considered orders of
the department and shall be subject to appeal to the pollution control
hearings board according to the procedure in chapter 43.21B RCW.

Sec. 201 RCW 70.94.720 and 1971 ex.s. c 194 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
((Whenever)) If the governor or the governor's authorized
representative finds that emissions from the operation of one or more
air contaminant sources is causing imminent danger to public health or
safety, ((he)) the governor or the governor's authorized representative
may declare an air pollution emergency and may order the person or
persons responsible for the operation of ((such)) the air contaminant
source or sources to reduce or discontinue emissions consistent with
good operating practice, safe operating procedures, and source emission
reduction plans, if any, adopted by the department ((of ecology)) or
any ((local air pollution control)) authority ((to which the department
of ecology has delegated authority to adopt emission reduction plans))
under RCW 70.94.715 (as recodified by this act). Orders authorized by
this section shall be in writing and may be issued without prior notice
or hearing. ((In the absence of the governor, any findings,
declarations and orders authorized by this section may be made and
issued by his authorized representative.))

Sec. 202 RCW 70.94.725 and 1971 ex.s. c 194 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever any order has been issued pursuant to RCW 70.94.710
((through)), 70.94.715, 70.94.720, or 70.94.730 (as recodified by this
act), the attorney general, upon request from the governor, the
director ((of the department of ecology)), an authorized representative
of either, or the attorney for ((a local air pollution control)) an
authority upon request of the control officer, shall petition the
superior court of the county in which ((is located)) the air
contaminant source is located and for which ((such)) the order was
issued for a temporary restraining order requiring the immediate
reduction or discontinuance of emissions from ((such)) the source.
(2) Upon the request of the party to whom a temporary restraining
order requested under this section is directed, the court shall
schedule a hearing ((thereon)) at its earliest convenience, at which
time the court may withdraw the restraining order or grant ((such)) any
temporary injunction as is reasonably necessary to prevent injury to
the public health or safety.

Sec. 203 RCW 70.94.730 and 1971 ex.s. c 194 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
Orders issued to declare any stage of an air pollution episode
avoidance plan under RCW 70.94.715 (as recodified by this act), and to
declare an air pollution emergency, under RCW 70.94.720 (as recodified
by this act), and orders to persons responsible for the operation of an
air contaminant source to reduce or discontinue emissions, according to
RCW 70.94.715 and 70.94.720 (as recodified by this act) shall be
effective immediately and shall not be stayed pending completion of
review.

Sec. 204 RCW 70.94.743 and 2004 c 213 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Consistent with the policy of the state to reduce outdoor
burning, as that term is defined in RCW 70.94.030 (as recodified by
this act), to the greatest extent practical((: (a))), and except as
otherwise provided in this section or section 321 of this act, outdoor
burning shall not be allowed in:
(a) Any area of the state where federal or state ambient air
quality standards are exceeded for pollutants emitted by outdoor
burning((.)); and
(b) ((Outdoor burning shall not be allowed in)) Any urban growth
area, as defined by RCW 36.70A.030, or any city of the state ((having
a population greater than ten thousand people if such cities are
threatened to exceed state or federal air quality standards, and
alternative disposal practices consistent with good solid waste
management are reasonably available or practices eliminating production
of organic refuse are reasonably available. In no event shall such
burning be allowed after December 31, 2000, except that within the
urban growth areas for cities having a population of less than five
thousand people, that are neither within nor contiguous with any
nonattainment or maintenance area designated under the federal clean
air act, in no event shall such burning be allowed after December 31,
2006)).
(((c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section,)) (2)
Outdoor burning may be allowed for the exclusive purpose of managing
storm or flood-related debris. The decision to allow burning shall be
made by the entity with permitting jurisdiction as determined under RCW
70.94.660 or 70.94.755 (as recodified by this act). If outdoor burning
of storm or flood-related debris is allowed in areas subject to (((a)
or (b) of this)) subsection (1) of this section, a permit shall be
required, and a fee may be collected to cover the expenses of
administering and enforcing the permit. All conditions and
restrictions pursuant to RCW 70.94.750(1) and 70.94.775 (as recodified
by this act) apply to outdoor burning allowed under this section.
(((d)(i))) (3)(a) Outdoor burning that is normal, necessary, and
customary to ongoing agricultural activities, and that is consistent
with agricultural burning authorized under RCW 70.94.650 and 70.94.656
(as recodified by this act), is allowed within the urban growth area as
defined in (((b) of this subsection)) RCW 36.70A.030:
(i) If the burning is not conducted during air quality episodes((,
or));
(ii) Where a determination of impaired air quality has been made as
provided in ((RCW 70.94.473,)) section 316 of this act; and
(iii) Where the agricultural activities preceded the designation as
an urban growth area.
(((ii))) (b) Outdoor burning of cultivated orchard trees, whether
or not agricultural crops will be replanted on the land, shall be
allowed as an ongoing agricultural activity under this section if a
local horticultural pest and disease board formed under chapter 15.09
RCW, an extension office agent with Washington State University that
has horticultural experience, or an entomologist employed by the
department of agriculture, has determined in writing that burning is an
appropriate method to prevent or control the spread of horticultural
pests or diseases.
(((2) "Outdoor burning" means the combustion of material of any
type in an open fire or in an outdoor container without providing for
the control of combustion or the control of emissions from the
combustion.
(3))) (4) This section shall not apply to silvicultural burning
used to improve or maintain fire dependent ecosystems for rare plants
or animals within state, federal, and private natural area preserves,
natural resource conservation areas, parks, and other wildlife areas.

Sec. 205 RCW 70.94.745 and 1995 c 206 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It ((shall be)) is the responsibility and duty of the
department, the department of natural resources, ((department of
ecology,)) the department of agriculture, fire districts, and local
((air pollution control)) authorities to establish, through
regulations, ordinances, or policy, a limited burning permit program.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section and section 321 of
this act, the permit program shall apply to residential and land
clearing burning in the ((following areas:
(a) In the nonurban areas of any county with an unincorporated
population of greater than fifty thousand; and
(b) In any city and urban growth area that is not otherwise
prohibited from burning pursuant to RCW 70.94.743)) nonurban areas, as
that term is defined in RCW 70.94.030 (as recodified by this act), of
any county with an unincorporated population of less than fifty
thousand.
(3) ((The permit program shall apply only to land clearing burning
in the nonurban areas of any county with an unincorporated population
of less than fifty thousand.
(4))) The permit program may be limited to a general permit by
rule, or by verbal, written, or electronic approval by the permitting
entity.
(((5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section,)) (4)
Within a county with a population of less than two hundred fifty
thousand, neither a permit nor the payment of a fee ((shall be)) is
required for outdoor burning for the purpose of disposal of tumbleweeds
blown by wind. ((Such)) This burning shall not be conducted during an
air pollution episode or any stage of impaired air quality declared
under RCW ((70.94.714. This subsection (5) shall only apply within
counties with a population less than two hundred fifty thousand))
70.94.715 (as recodified by this act).
(((6))) (5) Burning ((shall be)) is prohibited in an area when an
alternate technology or method of disposing of the organic refuse is
available, reasonably economical, and less harmful to the environment.
It is the policy of this state to foster and encourage development of
alternate methods or technology for disposing of or reducing the amount
of organic refuse.
(((7))) (6) Incidental agricultural burning must be allowed without
applying for any permit and without the payment of any fee if:
(a) The burning is incidental to commercial agricultural
activities;
(b) The operator notifies the local fire department within the area
where the burning is to be conducted;
(c) The burning does not occur during an air pollution episode or
any stage of impaired air quality declared under RCW 70.94.715 (as
recodified by this act); and
(d) Only the following items are burned:
(i) Orchard prunings;
(ii) Organic debris along fence lines or irrigation or drainage
ditches; or
(iii) Organic debris blown by wind.
(((8) As used in this section, "nonurban areas" are unincorporated
areas within a county that is not designated as an urban growth area
under chapter 36.70A RCW.
(9))) (7) Nothing in this section ((shall)) requires fire districts
to enforce air quality requirements related to outdoor burning, unless
the fire district enters into an agreement with the department ((of
ecology)), the department of natural resources, ((a local air pollution
control)) an authority, or other appropriate entity to provide such
enforcement.

Sec. 206 RCW 70.94.750 and 1991 c 199 s 412 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following outdoor fires described in this section may be
burned subject to the provisions of this chapter and also subject to
city ordinances, county resolutions, rules and laws of fire districts
((and laws)), and rules enforced by the department of natural resources
if a permit has been issued by a fire protection agency, county, or
conservation district:
(((1))) (a) Fires consisting of leaves, clippings, prunings, and
other yard and gardening refuse originating on lands immediately
adjacent and in close proximity to a human dwelling and burned on
((such)) the lands by the property owner or his or her designee((.));
(((2))) (b) Fires consisting of residue of a natural character such
as trees, stumps, shrubbery, or other natural vegetation arising from
land clearing projects or agricultural pursuits for pest or disease
control((; provided)). However, the fires described in this subsection
(1)(b) may be prohibited in those areas having a general population
density of one thousand or more persons per square mile.
(2) As provided in section 321 of this act, the permit requirement
of this section does not apply to aircraft crash fire rescue training.

Sec. 207 RCW 70.94.755 and 1997 c 225 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each activated ((air pollution control)) authority, and the
department ((of ecology)) in those areas outside the jurisdictional
boundaries of an activated ((air pollution control)) authority, shall
establish, through regulations, ordinances, or policy, a program
implementing the limited burning policy authorized by RCW 70.94.743
((through)), 70.94.745, 70.94.750, 70.94.760, and 70.94.765 (as
recodified by this act).

Sec. 208 RCW 70.94.760 and 1986 c 100 s 55 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless expressly provided, nothing contained in ((RCW 70.94.740
through 70.94.765)) this chapter is intended to alter or change the
provisions of RCW 70.94.660, 70.94.710 ((through)), 70.94.720,
70.94.725, 70.94.730 (as recodified by this act), and 76.04.205.

Sec. 209 RCW 70.94.765 and 1972 ex.s. c 136 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
Unless expressly provided, nothing in ((RCW 70.94.740 through
70.94.765)) this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting ((a local
air pollution control)) an authority or the department ((of ecology))
in those areas outside the jurisdictional boundaries of an activated
((pollution control)) authority from allowing the burning of outdoor
fires.

Sec. 210 RCW 70.94.775 and 1995 c 362 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in ((RCW 70.94.650(5))) section 321 of this act,
no person shall cause or allow any outdoor fire:
(1) Containing garbage, dead animals, asphalt, petroleum products,
paints, rubber products, plastics, or any substance other than natural
vegetation that normally emits dense smoke or obnoxious odors.
Agricultural heating devices that otherwise meet the requirements of
this chapter shall not be considered outdoor fires under this section;
(2) During a forecast, alert, warning, or emergency condition as
defined in RCW 70.94.715 (as recodified by this act) or impaired air
quality condition as defined in ((RCW 70.94.473)) section 316 of this
act.

Sec. 211 RCW 70.94.780 and 1991 c 199 s 411 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other powers granted to them by law, and
except as provided in section 321 of this act, the fire protection
agency, county, or conservation district issuing burning permits shall
regulate or prohibit outdoor burning as necessary to prevent or abate
the nuisances caused by ((such)) burning.
(2) No fire protection agency, county, or conservation district may
issue a burning permit in an area where the department or local board
has declared any stage of impaired air quality ((per RCW 70.94.473))
under section 316 of this act or any stage of an air pollution episode.
All burning permits issued ((shall be)) are subject to all applicable
fee, permitting, penalty, and enforcement provisions of this chapter.
The permitted burning shall not cause damage to public health or the
environment.
(3) Any entity issuing a permit under this section may charge a fee
at the level necessary to recover the costs of administering and
enforcing the permit program.

Sec. 212 RCW 70.94.785 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 193 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary, and
except RCW 70.94.660 ((through)), 70.94.670, and 70.94.690 (as
recodified by this act), the department ((of ecology)), upon its
approval of any plan (((or part thereof))), or part of a plan, required
or permitted under the federal clean air act, ((shall have)) has the
authority to enforce all regulatory provisions within ((such plan (or
part thereof): PROVIDED, That)) the plan or part of the plan.
However, the departmental enforcement of any ((such)) provision which
is within the power of an activated authority to enforce shall be
initiated only, when with respect to any source, the authority is not
enforcing the provisions and then only after written notice is given
the authority.

Sec. 213 RCW 70.94.800 and 1985 c 456 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that:
(((1))) (a) Acid deposition resulting from commercial, industrial,
or other emissions of sulphur dioxide and nitrogen oxides pose a threat
to the delicate balance of the state's ecological systems, particularly
in alpine lakes that are known to be highly sensitive to acidification;
(((2))) (b) Failure to act promptly and decisively to mitigate or
eliminate this danger may soon result in untold and irreparable damage
to the fish, forest, wildlife, agricultural, water, and recreational
resources of this state;
(((3))) (c) There is a direct correlation between emissions of
sulphur dioxides and nitrogen oxides and increases in acid deposition;
(((4))) (d) Acidification is cumulative; and
(((5))) (e) Once an environment is acidified, it is difficult, if
not impossible, to restore the natural balance.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to provide for
early detection of acidification and the resulting environmental
degradation through continued monitoring of acid deposition levels and
trends, and major source changes, so that the legislature can take any
necessary action to prevent environmental degradation resulting from
acid deposition.

Sec. 214 RCW 70.94.820 and 1987 c 505 s 61 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department ((of ecology)) shall maintain a program of periodic
monitoring of acid rain deposition and lake, stream, and soil
acidification to ensure early detection of acidification and
environmental degradation.

Sec. 215 RCW 70.94.850 and 1984 c 164 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department ((of ecology)) and the local boards may
implement an emission credits banking program. For the purposes of
this section, an emission credits banking program means a program
whereby an air contaminant source which reduces emissions of a given
air contaminant by an amount greater than that required by applicable
law, regulation, or order is granted credit for a given amount, which
credit shall be administered by a credit bank operated by the
appropriate agency.
(2) The amount of the credit shall be determined by the department
or local board with jurisdiction, but it shall be less than the amount
of the emissions reduction.
(3) The credit may be used, traded, sold, or otherwise expended for
purposes established by regulation of state or local agencies
consistent with the provisions of the prevention of significant
deterioration program under RCW ((70.94.860)) 70.94.510(3) (as
recodified by this act), the bubble program under RCW 70.94.155 (as
recodified by this act), and the new source review program under RCW
70.94.152 (as recodified by this act), if there will be no net adverse
impact on air quality.

Sec. 216 RCW 70.94.875 and 1991 c 199 s 313 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department ((of ecology)), in consultation with the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and of the senate, shall:
(1) Continue evaluation of information and research on acid
deposition in the Pacific Northwest region;
(2) Establish critical levels of acid deposition and lake, stream,
and soil acidification; and
(3) Notify the legislature if acid deposition or lake, stream, and
soil acidification reaches the levels established under subsection (2)
of this section.

Sec. 217 RCW 70.94.880 and 1985 c 456 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
In establishing critical levels of acid deposition and lake,
stream, and soil acidification, the department ((of ecology)) shall
consider:
(1) Current acid deposition and lake, stream, and soil
acidification levels;
(2) Changes in acid deposition and lake, stream, and soil
acidification levels;
(3) Effects of acid deposition and lake, stream, and soil
acidification on the environment; and
(4) The need to prevent environmental degradation.

Sec. 218 RCW 70.94.892 and 2004 c 224 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For fossil-fueled electric generation facilities having more
than twenty-five thousand kilowatts station generating capability but
less than three hundred fifty thousand kilowatts station generation
capability, except for fossil-fueled floating thermal electric
generation facilities under the jurisdiction of the energy facility
site evaluation council pursuant to RCW 80.50.010, the department or
authority shall implement a carbon dioxide mitigation program
consistent with the requirements of chapter 80.70 RCW.
(2) For mitigation projects conducted directly by or under the
control of the applicant, the department or ((local air)) authority
shall approve or deny the mitigation plans, as part of its action to
approve or deny an application submitted under RCW 70.94.152 (as
recodified by this act) based upon whether or not the mitigation plan
is consistent with the requirements of chapter 80.70 RCW.
(3) The department or authority may determine, assess, and collect
fees sufficient to cover the costs to review and approve or deny the
carbon dioxide mitigation plan components of an order of approval
issued under RCW 70.94.152 (as recodified by this act). The department
or authority may also collect fees sufficient to cover its additional
costs to monitor conformance with the carbon dioxide mitigation plan
components of the registration and air operating permit programs
authorized in RCW 70.94.151 and 70.94.161 (as recodified by this act).
The department or authority shall track its costs related to review,
approval, and monitoring conformance with carbon dioxide mitigation
plans.

Sec. 219 RCW 70.94.901 and 1967 c 238 s 65 are each amended to
read as follows:
((This 1967 amendatory act shall)) Chapter 238, Laws of 1967 may
not be construed to create in any way nor to enlarge, diminish, or
otherwise affect in any way any private rights in any civil action for
damages. Any determination that there has been a violation of the
provisions of ((this 1967 amendatory act)) chapter 238, Laws of 1967 or
of any ordinance, rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant
((thereto)) to chapter 238, Laws of 1967, shall not create by reason
thereof any presumption or finding of fact or of law for use in any
lawsuit brought by a private citizen.

Sec. 220 RCW 70.94.960 and 1996 c 186 s 517 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may disburse matching grants from funds provided
by the legislature from the air pollution control account, created in
RCW 70.94.015 (as recodified by this act), to:
(a) Units of local government to partially offset the additional
cost of either purchasing "clean fuel" ((and/or)) or operating "clean-fuel vehicles," ((provided that such)) or both, as long as the vehicles
are used for public transit((. Publicly owned school buses are
considered public transit for the purposes of this section. The
department may also disburse grants to));
(b) Vocational-technical institutes for the purpose of establishing
programs to certify clean-fuel vehicle mechanics((. The department may
also distribute grants to)); and
(c) Washington State University for the purpose of furthering the
establishment of clean fuel refueling infrastructure.
(2) Publicly owned school buses are considered public transit for
the purposes of this section.

Sec. 221 RCW 70.94.970 and 1991 c 199 s 602 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Regulated refrigerant means a class I or class II substance
as listed in Title VI of section 602 of the federal clean air act
amendments of November 15, 1990.
(2))) (a) A person who services or repairs or disposes of a motor
vehicle air conditioning system; commercial or industrial air
conditioning, heating, or refrigeration system; or consumer appliance
shall use refrigerant extraction equipment to recover regulated
refrigerant, as that term is defined in RCW 70.94.030 (as recodified by
this act), that would otherwise be released into the atmosphere. This
subsection does not apply to off-road commercial equipment.
(((3))) (b) The willful release of regulated refrigerant from a
source listed in this subsection is prohibited.
(2) No person may sell, offer for sale, or purchase any of the
following:
(a) A regulated refrigerant in a container designed for consumer
recharge of a motor vehicle air conditioning system or consumer
appliance during repair or service. This subsection does not apply to
a regulated refrigerant purchased for the recharge of the air
conditioning system of off-road commercial or agricultural equipment
and sold or offered for sale at an establishment that specializes in
the sale of off-road commercial or agricultural equipment or parts or
service for such equipment; and
(b) Nonessential consumer products that contain chlorofluorocarbons
or other ozone-depleting chemicals, and for which substitutes are
readily available. Products affected under this subsection include,
but are not limited to, party streamers, tire inflators, air horns,
noise makers, and chlorofluorocarbon-containing cleaning sprays
designed for noncommercial or nonindustrial cleaning of electronic or
photographic equipment.
(3)(a) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.
The rules must include, but not be limited to, minimum performance
specifications for refrigerant extraction equipment, as well as
procedures for enforcing this section.
(b) Enforcement provisions adopted by the department under this
section may not include penalties or fines in areas where equipment to
collect or recycle regulated refrigerants is not readily available.
(4) Upon request, the department shall provide information and
assistance to persons interested in collecting, transporting, or
recycling regulated refrigerants.
(((4) The willful release of regulated refrigerant from a source
listed in subsection (2) of this section is prohibited.))

Sec. 222 RCW 70.94.996 and 2004 c 229 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To the extent that funds are appropriated, the department of
transportation shall administer a performance-based grant program for
private employers, public agencies, nonprofit organizations,
developers, and property managers who provide financial incentives for
ride sharing in vehicles carrying two or more persons, for using public
transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized
commuting, including telework, before July 1, 2013, to their own or
other employees.
(2) The amount of the grant will be determined based on the value
to the transportation system of the vehicle trips reduced. The commute
trip reduction ((task force)) board shall develop an award rate giving
priority to applications achieving the greatest reduction in trips and
commute miles per public dollar requested and considering the following
criteria:
(a) The local cost of providing new highway capacity((,));
(b) Congestion levels((,)); and
(c) Geographic distribution.
(3) No private employer, public agency, nonprofit organization,
developer, or property manager is eligible for grants under this
section in excess of one hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year.
(4) The total of grants provided under this section may not exceed
seven hundred fifty thousand dollars in any fiscal year. ((However,
this subsection does not apply during the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium.))
(5) The department of transportation shall report to the department
of revenue by the 15th day of each month the aggregate monetary amount
of grants provided under this section in the prior month and the
identity of the recipients of those grants.
(6) The source of funds for this grant program is the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(7) This section expires January 1, 2014.

Sec. 223 RCW 1.16.030 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided, August 31st shall end the fiscal year
of school districts and December 31st of all other taxing districts.

Sec. 224 RCW 28B.130.010 and 1993 c 447 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Transportation fee" means the fee charged to employees and
students at institutions of higher education for the purposes provided
in RCW 28B.130.020.
(2) "Transportation demand management program" means the set of
strategies adopted by an institution of higher education to reduce the
number of single-occupant vehicles traveling to its campus. These
strategies may include but are not limited to those identified in RCW
70.94.531 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 225 RCW 43.01.225 and 1995 c 215 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby established an account in the state treasury to be
known as the "state vehicle parking account." All parking rental
income resulting from parking fees established by the department of
general administration under RCW 46.08.172 at state-owned or leased
property shall be deposited in the "state vehicle parking account."
Revenue deposited in the "state vehicle parking account" shall be first
applied to pledged purposes. Unpledged parking revenues deposited in
the "state vehicle parking account" may be used to:
(1) Pay costs incurred in the operation, maintenance, regulation,
and enforcement of vehicle parking and parking facilities;
(2) Support either the lease costs ((and/or)) or capital investment
costs, or both, of vehicle parking and parking facilities; and
(3) Support agency commute trip reduction programs under RCW
70.94.521 ((through)), 70.94.527, 70.94.528, 70.94.531, 70.94.534,
70.94.537, 70.94.541, 70.94.544, 70.94.547, and 70.94.551 (as
recodified by this act).

Sec. 226 RCW 43.01.230 and 1995 c 215 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
State agencies may, under the internal revenue code rules, use
public funds to financially assist agency-approved incentives for
alternative commute modes, including but not limited to carpools,
vanpools, purchase of transit and ferry passes, and guaranteed ride
home programs, if the financial assistance is an element of the
agency's commute trip reduction program as required under RCW 70.94.521
((through)), 70.94.527, 70.94.528, 70.94.531, 70.94.534, 70.94.537,
70.94.541, 70.94.544, 70.94.547, and 70.94.551 (as recodified by this
act). This section does not permit any payment for the use of state-owned vehicles for commuter ride sharing.

Sec. 227 RCW 43.01.240 and 1998 c 245 s 46 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is ((hereby)) established an account in the state
treasury to be known as the state agency parking account. All parking
income collected from the fees imposed by state agencies on parking
spaces at state-owned or leased facilities, including the capitol
campus, shall be deposited in the state agency parking account. Only
the office of financial management may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures. No
agency may receive an allotment greater than the amount of revenue
deposited into the state agency parking account.
(2) An agency may, as an element of the agency's commute trip
reduction program to achieve the goals set forth in RCW 70.94.527 (as
recodified by this act), impose parking rental fees at state-owned and
leased properties. These fees will be deposited in the state agency
parking account. Each agency shall establish a committee to advise the
agency director on parking rental fees, taking into account the market
rate of comparable, privately owned rental parking in each region. The
agency shall solicit representation of the employee population
including, but not limited to, management, administrative staff,
production workers, and state employee bargaining units. Funds shall
be used by agencies to: (a) Support the agencies' commute trip
reduction program under RCW 70.94.521 ((through)), 70.94.527,
70.94.528, 70.94.531, 70.94.534, 70.94.537, 70.94.541, 70.94.544,
70.94.547, and 70.94.551 (as recodified by this act); (b) support the
agencies' parking program; or (c) support the lease or ownership costs
for the agencies' parking facilities.
(3) In order to reduce the state's subsidization of employee
parking, after July 1997 agencies shall not enter into leases for
employee parking in excess of building code requirements, except as
authorized by the director of general administration. In situations
where there are fewer parking spaces than employees at a worksite,
parking must be allocated equitably, with no special preference given
to managers.

Sec. 228 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2003 c 393 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, and the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW (as
recodified by this act), or local health departments:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431
(as recodified by this act), 70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and 90.56.330.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211 (as recodified by this act), 70.94.332 (as
recodified by this act), 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070, 90.14.130,
90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410 (as recodified by
this act), and 90.44.180.
(c) Proceedings conducted by the department, or the department's
designee, under RCW 90.03.160 through 90.03.210 or 90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 229 RCW 43.21B.310 and 2004 c 204 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), any order issued by the
department or local air authority pursuant to RCW 70.94.211 (as
recodified by this act), 70.94.332 (as recodified by this act),
70.105.095, 43.27A.190, 86.16.020, 88.46.070, or 90.48.120(2) or any
provision enacted after July 26, 1987, or any permit, certificate, or
license issued by the department may be appealed to the pollution
control hearings board if the appeal is filed with the board and served
on the department or authority within thirty days after the date of
receipt of the order. Except as provided under chapter 70.105D RCW and
RCW 90.03.210(2), this is the exclusive means of appeal of such an
order.
(2) The department or the authority in its discretion may stay the
effectiveness of an order during the pendency of such an appeal.
(3) At any time during the pendency of an appeal of such an order
to the board, the appellant may apply pursuant to RCW 43.21B.320 to the
hearings board for a stay of the order or for the removal thereof.
(4) Any appeal must contain the following in accordance with the
rules of the hearings board:
(a) The appellant's name and address;
(b) The date and docket number of the order, permit, or license
appealed;
(c) A description of the substance of the order, permit, or license
that is the subject of the appeal;
(d) A clear, separate, and concise statement of every error alleged
to have been committed;
(e) A clear and concise statement of facts upon which the requester
relies to sustain his or her statements of error; and
(f) A statement setting forth the relief sought.
(5) Upon failure to comply with any final order of the department,
the attorney general, on request of the department, may bring an action
in the superior court of the county where the violation occurred or the
potential violation is about to occur to obtain such relief as
necessary, including injunctive relief, to insure compliance with the
order. The air authorities may bring similar actions to enforce their
orders.
(6) An appealable decision or order shall be identified as such and
shall contain a conspicuous notice to the recipient that it may be
appealed only by filing an appeal with the hearings board and serving
it on the department within thirty days of the date of receipt.

Sec. 230 RCW 43.21B.300 and 2004 c 204 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431 (as
recodified by this act), 70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600,
90.48.144, 90.56.310, and 90.56.330 shall be imposed by a notice in
writing, either by certified mail with return receipt requested or by
personal service, to the person incurring the penalty from the
department or the local air authority, describing the violation with
reasonable particularity. Within thirty days after the notice is
received, the person incurring the penalty may apply in writing to the
department or the authority for the remission or mitigation of the
penalty. Upon receipt of the application, the department or authority
may remit or mitigate the penalty upon whatever terms the department or
the authority in its discretion deems proper. The department or the
authority may ascertain the facts regarding all such applications in
such reasonable manner and under such rules as it may deem proper and
shall remit or mitigate the penalty only upon a demonstration of
extraordinary circumstances such as the presence of information or
factors not considered in setting the original penalty.
(2) Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the
appeal is filed with the hearings board and served on the department or
authority thirty days after the date of receipt by the person penalized
of the notice imposing the penalty or thirty days after the date of
receipt of the notice of disposition of the application for relief from
penalty.
(3) A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:
(a) Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;
(b) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition on
application for relief from penalty, if such an application is made; or
(c) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the
hearings board if the penalty is appealed.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department
within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney
general, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in the
name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston
county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to
recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the
authority within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the
authority may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior
court of the county of the authority's main office or of any county in
which the violator does business. In these actions, the procedures and
rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil action.
(5) All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury
and credited to the general fund except those penalties imposed
pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, which shall be credited to the reclamation
account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7), RCW 70.94.431 (as recodified
by this act), the disposition of which shall be governed by that
provision, RCW 70.105.080, which shall be credited to the hazardous
waste control and elimination account, created by RCW 70.105.180, and
RCW 90.56.330, which shall be credited to the coastal protection fund
created by RCW 90.48.390.

Sec. 231 RCW 43.21C.0381 and 1995 c 172 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Decisions pertaining to the issuance, renewal, reopening, or
revision of an air operating permit under RCW 70.94.161 (as recodified
by this act) are not subject to the requirements of RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c).

Sec. 232 RCW 43.21K.020 and 1997 c 381 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
An environmental excellence program agreement entered into under
this chapter must achieve more effective or efficient environmental
results than the results that would be otherwise achieved. The basis
for comparison shall be a reasonable estimate of the overall impact of
the participating facility on the environment in the absence of an
environmental excellence program agreement. More effective
environmental results are results that are better overall than those
that would be achieved under the legal requirements superseded or
replaced by the agreement. More efficient environmental results are
results that are achieved at reduced cost but do not decrease the
overall environmental results achieved by the participating facility.
An environmental excellence program agreement may not authorize either
(1) the release of water pollutants that will cause to be exceeded, at
points of compliance in the ambient environment established pursuant to
law, numeric surface water or ground water quality criteria or numeric
sediment quality criteria adopted as rules under chapter 90.48 RCW; or
(2) the emission of any air contaminants that will cause to be exceeded
any air quality standard as defined in RCW 70.94.030(3) (as recodified
by this act); or (3) a decrease in the overall environmental results
achieved by the participating facility compared with results achieved
over a representative period before the date on which the agreement is
proposed by the sponsor. However, an environmental excellence program
agreement may authorize reasonable increases in the release of
pollutants to permit increases in facility production or facility
expansion and modification.

Sec. 233 RCW 43.41.140 and 1993 c 394 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Pursuant to policies and regulations promulgated by the office of
financial management, an elected state officer or delegate or a state
agency director or delegate may permit an employee to commute in a
state-owned or leased vehicle if such travel is on official business,
as determined in accordance with RCW 43.41.130, and is determined to be
economical and advantageous to the state, or as part of a commute trip
reduction program as required by RCW 70.94.551 (as recodified by this
act).

Sec. 234 RCW 43.42.070 and 2003 c 70 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office may coordinate negotiation and implementation of a
written agreement among the project applicant, the office, and
participating permit agencies to recover from the project applicant the
reasonable costs incurred by the office in carrying out the provisions
of RCW 43.42.050(2) and 43.42.060(2) and by participating permit
agencies in carrying out permit processing tasks specified in the
agreement.
(2) The office may coordinate negotiation and implementation of a
written agreement among the project applicant, the office, and
participating permit agencies to recover from the project applicant the
reasonable costs incurred by outside independent consultants selected
by the office and participating permit agencies to perform permit
processing tasks.
(3) Outside independent consultants may only bill for the costs of
performing those permit processing tasks that are specified in a cost-reimbursement agreement under this section. The billing process shall
provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing
cycle that provides for progress payments.
(4) The office shall adopt a policy to coordinate cost-reimbursement agreements with outside independent consultants. Cost-reimbursement agreements coordinated by the office under this section
must be based on competitive bids that are awarded for each agreement
from a prequalified consultant roster.
(5) Independent consultants hired under a cost-reimbursement
agreement shall report directly to the permit agency. The office shall
assure that final decisions are made by the permit agency and not by
the consultant.
(6) The office shall develop procedures for determining,
collecting, and distributing cost reimbursement for carrying out the
provisions of this chapter.
(7) For a cost-reimbursement agreement, the office and
participating permit agencies shall negotiate a work plan and schedule
for reimbursement. Prior to distributing scheduled reimbursement to
the agencies, the office shall verify that the agencies have met the
obligations contained in their work plan.
(8) Prior to commencing negotiations with the project applicant for
a cost-reimbursement agreement, the office shall request work load
analyses from each participating permitting agency. These analyses
shall be available to the public. The work load of a participating
permit agency may only be modified with the concurrence of the agency
and if there is both good cause to do so and no significant impact on
environmental review.
(9) The office shall develop guidance to ensure that, in developing
cost-reimbursement agreements, conflicts of interest are eliminated.
(10) For project permit processes that it coordinates, the office
shall coordinate the negotiation of all cost-reimbursement agreements
executed under RCW 43.21A.690, ((43.30.420)) 43.30.490, 43.70.630,
43.300.080, and 70.94.085 (as recodified by this act). The office and
the permit agencies shall be signatories to the agreements. Each
permit agency shall manage performance of its portion of the agreement.
(11) If a permit agency or the project applicant foresees, at any
time, that it will be unable to meet its obligations under the cost-reimbursement agreement, it shall notify the office and state the
reasons. The office shall notify the participating permit agencies and
the project applicant and, upon agreement of all parties, adjust the
schedule, or, if necessary, coordinate revision of the work plan.

Sec. 235 RCW 46.08.172 and 1995 c 215 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of the department of general administration shall
establish equitable and consistent parking rental fees for the capitol
campus and may, if requested by agencies, establish equitable and
consistent parking rental fees for agencies off the capitol campus, to
be charged to employees, visitors, clients, service providers, and
others, that reflect the legislature's intent to reduce state
subsidization of parking or to meet the commute trip reduction goals
established in RCW 70.94.527 (as recodified by this act). All fees
shall take into account the market rate of comparable privately owned
rental parking, as determined by the director. However, parking rental
fees are not to exceed the local market rate of comparable privately
owned rental parking.
The director may delegate the responsibility for the collection of
parking fees to other agencies of state government when cost-effective.

Sec. 236 RCW 46.68.020 and 2004 c 200 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall forward all fees for certificates of ownership
or other moneys accruing under the provisions of chapter 46.12 RCW to
the state treasurer, together with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit such moneys as follows:
(1) The fees collected under RCW 46.12.040(1) and 46.12.101(6)
shall be credited to the multimodal transportation account in RCW
47.66.070.
(2)(a) Beginning July 27, 2003, and until July 1, 2008, the fees
collected under RCW 46.12.080, 46.12.101(3), 46.12.170, and 46.12.181
shall be credited as follows:
(i) 58.12 percent shall be credited to a segregated subaccount of
the air pollution control account in RCW 70.94.015 (as recodified by
this act);
(ii) 16.60 percent shall be credited to the vessel response account
created in RCW 90.56.335; and
(iii) The remainder shall be credited into the transportation 2003
account (nickel account).
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, and thereafter, the fees collected
under RCW 46.12.080, 46.12.101(3), 46.12.170, and 46.12.181 shall be
credited to the transportation 2003 account (nickel account).
(3) The fees collected under RCW 46.12.040(3) and 46.12.060 shall
be credited to the motor vehicle account.

Sec. 237 RCW 52.12.150 and 2000 c 199 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Without obtaining a permit issued under RCW 70.94.650 (as
recodified by this act), fire protection district fire fighters may set
fire to structures located outside of urban growth areas in counties
that plan under the requirements of RCW 36.70A.040, and outside of any
city with a population of ten thousand or more in all other counties,
for instruction in methods of fire fighting, if all of the following
conditions are met:
(1) In consideration of prevailing air patterns, the fire is
unlikely to cause air pollution in areas of sensitivity downwind of the
proposed fire location;
(2) The fire is not located in an area that is declared to be in an
air pollution episode or any stage of an impaired air quality as
defined in RCW 70.94.715 (as recodified by this act) and ((70.94.473))
section 316 of this act;
(3) Nuisance laws are applicable to the fire, including nuisances
related to the unreasonable interference with the enjoyment of life and
property and the depositing of particulate matter or ash on other
property;
(4) Notice of the fire is provided to the owners of property
adjoining the property on which the fire will occur, to other persons
who potentially will be impacted by the fire, and to additional persons
in a broader manner as specifically requested by the local air
pollution control agency or the department of ecology;
(5) Each structure that is proposed to be set on fire must be
identified specifically as a structure to be set on fire. Each other
structure on the same parcel of property that is not proposed to be set
on fire must be identified specifically as a structure not to be set on
fire; and
(6) Before setting a structure on fire, a good-faith inspection is
conducted by the fire agency or fire protection district conducting the
training fire to determine if materials containing asbestos are
present, the inspection is documented in writing and forwarded to the
appropriate local air authority or the department of ecology if there
is no local air authority, and asbestos that is found is removed as
required by state and federal laws.

PART 3
UPDATED PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The air operating permit account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts collected
by or on behalf of the department from permit program sources under RCW
70.94.152(1), 70.94.161, 70.94.162, and 70.94.154(7) (as recodified by
this act) shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the activities described in RCW
70.94.152(1), 70.94.161, 70.94.162, and 70.94.154(7) (as recodified by
this act). Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 The department has the power to require
the addition to or deletion of a county or counties from an existing
authority in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter. No
addition or deletion may be made without the concurrence of any
existing authority involved. Such an action may only be taken after a
public hearing held pursuant to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 When a member of a board has a potential
conflict of interest in an action before the board, the member shall
declare to the board the nature of the potential conflict prior to
participating in the action review. The board shall, if the potential
conflict of interest, in the judgment of a majority of the board, may
prevent the member from a fair and objective review of the case, remove
the member from participation in the action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 (1) Except as provided in subsection (6)
of this section, any person operating or responsible for the operation
of air contaminant sources of any class that is required by the
department or the board of an authority to register and report must
complete the required registration and report information as required
by the department or board.
(2) Reporting required under this section must include location,
size and height of contaminant outlets, processes employed, nature of
the contaminant emission, and other information relevant to air
pollution and available or reasonably capable of being assembled.
(3) The department or board may require that registration under
this section be accompanied by a fee and may determine the amount of
the fee for each class or classes. Any required registration fee shall
be no more than is required to compensate for the costs to the board or
department of:
(a) Initial registration;
(b) Annual or other periodic reports from the source owner
providing information directly related to air pollution registration;
(c) On-site inspections necessary to verify compliance with
registration requirements;
(d) Data storage and retrieval systems necessary for support of the
registration program;
(e) Emission inventory reports and emission reduction credits
computed from information provided by sources pursuant to registration
program requirements;
(f) Staff review, including engineering analysis for accuracy and
currentness, of information provided by sources pursuant to
registration program requirements;
(g) Clerical and other office support provided in direct
furtherance of the registration program; and
(h) Administrative support provided in directly carrying out the
registration program.
(4) All registration program fees collected by the department under
this section shall be deposited in the air pollution control account
created in RCW 70.94.015 (as recodified by this act). All registration
program fees collected by the authorities under this section shall be
deposited in their respective treasuries.
(5) Any registration required under this section with either the
board or the department shall preclude a further registration with any
other board or the department.
(6) If a registration or report has been filed for a grain
warehouse or grain elevator that handles ten million bushels of grain
or less annually, as required under this section, registration,
reporting, or a registration program fee shall not again be required
under this section for the warehouse or elevator unless the capacity of
the warehouse or elevator as listed as part of the license issued for
the facility has been increased since the date the registration or
reporting was last made. If the capacity of the warehouse or elevator
listed as part of the license is increased, any registration or
reporting required for the warehouse or elevator under this section
must be made by the date the warehouse or elevator receives grain from
the first harvest season that occurs after the increase in its capacity
is listed in the license.
(7) This section does not apply to any program permit source under
RCW 70.94.161 (as recodified by this act) after the effective date of
the United States environmental protection agency's approval of the
state operating permit program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 The department shall establish rules
requiring sources or source categories that individually or
collectively contribute the majority of statewide air emissions of each
regulated pollutant to apply reasonable and available control methods,
including, but not limited to, changes in technology, processes, or
other control strategies. The department shall review, and if
necessary, update its rules every five years to ensure consistency with
current reasonable and available control methods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 In no event shall application of "best
available control technology" result in emissions of any pollutants
that will exceed the emissions allowed by any applicable standard under
40 C.F.R. Part 60 and Part 61, as they exist on July 25, 1993, or their
later enactments as adopted by reference by the director by rule.
Emissions from any source utilizing clean fuels, or any other means, to
comply with this section shall not be allowed to increase above levels
that would have been required under the definition of BACT as it
existed prior to enactment of the federal clean air act amendments of
1990.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 (1) When there are necessary requirements
for the attainment of air quality standards and the maintenance of air
quality can be achieved through the use of a control program involving
the bubble concept, as defined in RCW 70.94.030 (as recodified by this
act), a bubble concept program may be authorized by a regulatory order,
orders, or permit issued to the air contaminant source or sources
involved as long as air quality standards are not being exceeded. The
orders or permits issued under this section shall be issued by the
department or the authority with jurisdiction. If the bubble involves
interjurisdictional approval, concurrence in the total program must be
secured from each regulatory entity concerned.
(2) Any order or permit issued under this section shall only be
authorized after the control program involving the bubble concept is
accepted by the United States environmental protection agency as part
of an approved state implementation plan.
(3) Any order or permit issued under this section shall include a
provision restricting the total emissions within the bubble to no more
than would otherwise be allowed in the aggregate for all emitting
processes covered. Individual point source emissions levels from a
specified facility or facilities may be modified provided that the
aggregate limit for the specified sources is not exceeded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 The responsibility for operating permit
fee determination, assessment, and collection under RCW 70.94.162 (as
recodified by this act) is to be shared by the department and delegated
authorities as follows:
(1) Each permitting authority, including the department, acting in
its capacity as a permitting authority, shall develop a fee schedule
and mechanism for collecting fees, consistent with section 309 of this
act, from the permit program sources under its jurisdiction. The fees
collected by each authority must be sufficient to cover the authority's
costs of permit administration and its share of the department's costs
of development and oversight. Each delegated authority shall remit to
the department its share of the department's development and oversight
costs.
(2) Only those authorities to whom the department has delegated the
authority to administer the program pursuant to RCW 70.94.161 and
70.94.510 (as recodified by this act) have the authority to administer
and collect operating permit fees under RCW 70.94.162 (as recodified by
this act). The department shall retain the authority to administer and
collect fees with respect to the sources within the jurisdiction of an
authority until the effective date of program delegation to that
authority.
(3) The department shall allocate its development and oversight
costs among all permitting authorities, including the department, in
proportion to the number of permit program sources under the
jurisdiction of each authority, except that extraordinary costs or
other costs readily attributable to a specific permitting authority may
be assessed to that authority. For purposes of this subsection, all
sources covered by a single general permit shall be treated as one
source.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 (1) The fee schedule developed by each
permitting authority under RCW 70.94.162 (as recodified by this act)
shall fully cover and not exceed both the authority's permit
administration costs, as defined in section 310 of this act, and the
permitting authority's share of statewide program development and
oversight costs, as defined in section 311 of this act.
(2)(a) The department and each delegated authority shall adopt by
rule a general permit fee schedule for sources under their respective
jurisdictions after the department adopts provisions for general permit
issuance.
(b) The permit administration costs of each general permit shall be
allocated equitably among only those sources subject to that general
permit. The share of development and oversight costs attributable to
each general permit shall be determined pursuant to section 308 of this
act.
(3)(a) The department shall, consistent with section 312 of this
act and after an opportunity for public review and comment, adopt rules
that establish a process for development and review of its operating
permit program fee schedule, a methodology for tracking program
revenues and expenditures consistent with section 313 of this act and,
for both the department and the delegated authorities, a system of
fiscal audits, reports, and periodic performance audits consistent with
section 314 of this act.
(b) The fee schedule developed by the department shall allocate
among the sources for whom the department acts as a permitting
authority, other than sources subject to a general permit, those
portions of the department's permit administration costs and the
department's share of the development and oversight costs that the
department does not plan to recover under its general permit fee
schedule or schedules as follows:
(i) The department shall allocate its permit administration costs
and its share of the development and oversight costs not recovered
through general permit fees according to a three-tiered model based
upon:
(A) The number of permit program sources under its jurisdiction;
(B) The complexity of permit program sources under its
jurisdiction; and
(C) The size of permit program sources under its jurisdiction, as
measured by the quantity of each regulated pollutant emitted by the
source.
(ii) Each of the three tiers shall be equally weighted.
(iii) The department may, in addition, allocate activities-based
costs readily attributable to a specific source to that source under
RCW 70.94.152(1) and 70.94.154(7) (as recodified by this act).
(iv) The quantity of each regulated pollutant emitted by a source
shall be determined based on the annual emissions during the most
recent calendar year for which data is available.
(4) Fee structures authorized under this section remain in effect
until the legislature authorizes an alternative structure.
(5) Each authority requesting delegation under RCW 70.94.510 (as
recodified by this act) shall, after opportunity for public review and
comment, publish regulations which establish a process for development
and review of its operating permit program fee schedule, and a
methodology for tracking its revenues and expenditures. These
regulations shall be submitted to the department for review and
approval as part of the authority's delegation request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 (1) As used in section 309 of this act,
the term "permit administration costs" means those costs incurred by
each permitting authority, including the department, in administering
and enforcing the operating permit program with respect to sources
under its jurisdiction.
(2) Costs associated with the following activities are fee eligible
as these activities relate to the operating permit program and to the
sources permitted by a permitting authority, including, where
applicable, sources subject to a general permit:
(a) Preapplication assistance and review of an application and
proposed compliance plan for a permit, permit revision, or renewal;
(b) Source inspections, testing, and other data-gathering
activities necessary for the development of a permit, permit revision,
or renewal;
(c) Acting on an application for a permit, permit revision, or
renewal, including the costs of developing an applicable requirement as
part of the processing of a permit, permit revision, or renewal,
preparing a draft permit and fact sheet, and preparing a final permit,
but excluding the costs of developing BACT, LAER, BART, or RACT
requirements for criteria and toxic air pollutants;
(d) Notifying and soliciting, reviewing, and responding to comment
from the public and contiguous states and tribes, conducting public
hearings regarding the issuance of a draft permit and other costs of
providing information to the public regarding operating permits and the
permit issuance process;
(e) Modeling necessary to establish permit limits or to determine
compliance with permit limits;
(f) Reviewing compliance certifications and emissions reports and
conducting related compilation and reporting activities;
(g) Conducting compliance inspections, complaint investigations,
and other activities necessary to ensure that a source is complying
with permit conditions;
(h) Administrative enforcement activities and penalty assessment,
excluding the costs of proceedings before the pollution control
hearings board and all costs of judicial enforcement;
(i) The share attributable to permitted sources of the development
and maintenance of emissions inventories;
(j) The share attributable to permitted sources of ambient air
quality monitoring and associated recording and reporting activities;
(k) Training for permit administration and enforcement;
(l) Fee determination, assessment, and collection, including the
costs of necessary administrative dispute resolution and penalty
collection;
(m) Required fiscal audits, periodic performance audits, and
reporting activities;
(n) Tracking of time, revenues and expenditures, and accounting
activities;
(o) Administering the permit program including the costs of
clerical support, supervision, and management;
(p) Provision of assistance to small businesses under the
jurisdiction of the permitting authority as required under section 507
of the federal clean air act; and
(q) Other activities required by operating permit regulations
issued by the United States environmental protection agency under the
federal clean air act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 (1) As used in section 309 of this act,
"development and oversight costs" means those costs incurred by the
department in developing and administering the state operating permit
program, and in overseeing the administration of the program by the
delegated local permitting authorities.
(2) Costs associated with the following activities are fee eligible
as these activities relate to the operating permit program:
(a) Review and determinations necessary for delegation of authority
to administer and enforce a permit program to a local air authority
under RCW 70.94.161(2) and 70.94.510 (as recodified by this act);
(b) Conducting fiscal audits and periodic performance audits of
delegated local authorities, and other oversight functions required by
the operating permit program;
(c) Administrative enforcement actions taken by the department on
behalf of a permitting authority, including those actions taken by the
department under RCW 70.94.785 (as recodified by this act), but
excluding the costs of proceedings before the pollution control
hearings board and all costs of judicial enforcement;
(d) Determination and assessment with respect to each permitting
authority of the fees covering its share of the costs of development
and oversight;
(e) Training and assistance for permit program administration and
oversight, including training and assistance regarding technical,
administrative, and data management issues;
(f) Development of generally applicable regulations or guidance
regarding the permit program or its implementation or enforcement;
(g) State codification of federal rules or standards for inclusion
in operating permits;
(h) Preparation of delegation package and other activities
associated with submittal of the state permit program to the United
States environmental protection agency for approval, including ongoing
coordination activities;
(i) General administration and coordination of the state permit
program, related support activities, and other agency indirect costs,
including necessary data management and quality assurance;
(j) Required fiscal audits and periodic performance audits of the
department, and reporting activities;
(k) Tracking of time, revenues and expenditures, and accounting
activities;
(l) Public education and outreach related to the operating permit
program, including the maintenance of a permit register;
(m) The share attributable to permitted sources of compiling and
maintaining emissions inventories;
(n) The share attributable to permitted sources of ambient air
quality monitoring, related technical support, and associated recording
activities;
(o) The share attributable to permitted sources of modeling
activities;
(p) Provision of assistance to small business as required under
section 507 of the federal clean air act as it exists on July 25, 1993,
or its later enactment as adopted by reference by the director by rule;
(q) Provision of services by the department of revenue and the
office of the state attorney general and other state agencies in
support of permit program administration;
(r) A one-time revision to the state implementation plan to make
those administrative changes necessary to ensure coordination of the
state implementation plan and the operating permit program; and
(s) Other activities required by operating permit regulations
issued by the United States environmental protection agency under the
federal clean air act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 The fee schedule development and review
process required from the department under section 309 of this act
shall include the following:
(1) A biennial workload analysis, conducted by the department. In
preparing the workload analysis, the department shall provide an
opportunity for public review and comment. The department shall review
and update its workload analysis during each biennial budget cycle,
taking into account information gathered by tracking previous revenues,
time, and expenditures and other information obtained through fiscal
audits and performance audits;
(2) A biennial budget based upon the resource requirements
identified in the workload analysis for that biennium. In preparing
the budget, the department shall take into account the projected
operating permit account balance at the start of the biennium. The
department shall provide the opportunity for public review and comment
on the proposed budget. The department shall review and update its
budget each biennium;
(3) A fee schedule allocating the department's permit
administration costs and its share of the development and oversight
costs among the department's permit program sources using the
methodology described in RCW 70.94.162 (as recodified by this act);
(4) The opportunity for public review of and comment on the
allocation methodology and fee schedule;
(5) Procedures for administrative resolution of disputes regarding
the source data on which allocation determinations are based, which
shall be designed so that resolution occurs prior to the completion of
the allocation process;
(6) A review and update to the fee schedule annually.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 (1) The methodology for tracking revenues
and expenditures required under section 309 of this act shall include
the following:
(a) A system for tracking revenues and expenditures that provides
the maximum practicable information. At a minimum, revenues from fees
collected under the operating permit program shall be tracked on a
source-specific basis and time and expenditures required to administer
the program shall be tracked on the basis of source categories and
functional categories. Each general permit will be treated as a
separate source category for tracking and accounting purposes;
(b) Use by the department of the information obtained from tracking
revenues, time, and expenditures to modify the workload analysis
required in section 309 of this act.
(2) The information obtained from tracking revenues, time, and
expenditures shall not provide a basis for challenge to the amount of
an individual source's fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314 The system of fiscal audits, reports, and
periodic performance audits required by section 309 of this act shall
include the following:
(1) Annual reports prepared and submitted by the department and the
delegated authorities to, respectively, the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature and the board; and
(2) Fiscal audits and routine performance audits arranged by the
department for periodic intensive performance audits of each permitting
authority and of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 315 The episode avoidance plan required to be
developed by the department under RCW 70.94.715 (as recodified by this
act), shall be established by rule in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW, and shall include, but not be limited to the following:
(1)(a) The designation of episode criteria and stages requiring the
carrying out of preplanned episode avoidance procedures. The stages of
occurrence are: Forecast, alert, warning, and emergency, and all
intermediate stages designated by the department.
(b) "Forecast" means the presence of meteorological conditions that
are conducive to accumulation of air contaminants and is the first
stage of an episode. The department shall not call a forecast episode
prior to the department or an authority calling a first stage impaired
air quality condition as provided by section 316 of this act.
(c) "Alert" means a concentration of air contaminants at levels at
which short-term health effects may occur, and is the second stage of
an episode.
(d) "Warning" means concentrations are continuing to degrade,
contaminant concentrations have reached a level that, if maintained,
can result in damage to health, and additional control actions are
needed and is the third level of an episode.
(e) "Emergency" means the air quality is posing an imminent and
substantial endangerment to public health and is the fourth level of an
episode;
(2) A requirement that persons responsible for the operation of air
contaminant sources prepare and obtain approval from the director of
source emission reduction plans, consistent with good operating
practice and safe operating procedures, for reducing emissions during
designated episode stages;
(3) A provision for the director, the director's authorized
representative, or, if implementation has been delegated, the control
officer to declare and terminate the episode stages described in this
section, up to the warning episode stage, if applicable criteria has
been satisfied. Any declarations made under this subsection constitute
an order for action in accordance with applicable source emission
reduction plans;
(4) A provision for the governor to declare and terminate the
emergency stage and all intermediate stages above the warning episode
stage. Any declaration made under this subsection constitutes an order
in accordance with applicable source emission reduction plans;
(5) Provisions for enforcement by state and local police, personnel
of the department and the department of social and health services, and
personnel of local air pollution control agencies;
(6) Provisions for the reduction or discontinuance of emissions
immediately, consistent with good operating practice and safe operating
procedures, under an air pollution emergency as provided in RCW
70.94.720 (as recodified by this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 316 (1) A first stage of impaired air quality
is determined by the department or an authority when:
(a) Fine particulates are at an ambient level of thirty-five
micrograms per cubic meter measured on a twenty-four-hour average; and
(b) Forecasted meteorological conditions are not expected to allow
levels of fine particulates to decline below thirty-five micrograms per
cubic meter for a period of forty-eight hours or more from the time
that the fine particulates are measured at the trigger level.
(2) A second stage of impaired air quality is determined by the
department or an authority when:
(a) A first stage of impaired air quality has been in force and not
been sufficient to reduce the increasing fine particulate pollution
trend;
(b) Fine particulates are at an ambient level of sixty micrograms
per cubic meter measured on a twenty-four-hour average; and
(c) Forecasted meteorological conditions are not expected to allow
levels of fine particulates to decline below sixty micrograms per cubic
meter for a period of forty-eight hours or more from the time that the
fine particulates are measured at the trigger level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 317 (1) The department shall establish, by
rule under chapter 34.05 RCW:
(a) A statewide emission performance standard for new solid fuel
burning devices; and
(b) A program to:
(i) Determine whether a new solid fuel burning device complies with
the statewide emission performance standards established in this
section; and
(ii) Approve the sale of devices that comply with the statewide
emission performance standards.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding RCW 70.94.457(1) (as recodified by this
act), the department is authorized to adopt, by rule, emission
standards adopted by the United States environmental protection agency
for new wood stoves sold at retail.
(b) For solid fuel burning devices that the United States
environmental protection agency has not established emission standards,
the department may exempt or establish, by rule, statewide standards,
including emission levels and test procedures for the devices and the
emission levels. Test procedures shall be equivalent to emission
levels per pound per hour burned for other new wood stoves and
fireplaces regulated under RCW 70.94.457 (as recodified by this act).
(3) Actions of the department and authorities under this section
shall preempt actions of other state agencies and local governments for
the purposes of controlling air pollution from solid fuel burning
devices, except where authorized by chapter 199, Laws of 1991.
(4) No authority shall adopt any emission standard for new solid
fuel burning devices other than the statewide standard adopted by the
department under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 318 (1) For the sole purpose of a contingency
measure to meet the requirements of section 172(c)(9) of the federal
clean air act, an authority or the department may prohibit the use of
solid fuel burning devices, except fireplaces as defined in RCW
70.94.030 (as recodified by this act), wood stoves meeting the
standards set forth in RCW 70.94.457 (as recodified by this act), or
pellet stoves either certified or issued an exemption by the United
States environmental protection agency in accordance with Title 40,
Part 60 of the code of federal regulations, if the United States
environmental protection agency, in consultation with the department
and the local authority, makes written findings that:
(a) The area has failed to make reasonable further progress or
attain or maintain a national ambient air quality standard; and
(b) Emissions from solid fuel burning devices from a particular
geographic area are a contributing factor to such failure to make
reasonable further progress or attain or maintain a national ambient
air quality standard.
(2) A prohibition issued by an authority or the department under
this section shall not apply to a person in a residence or commercial
establishment that does not have an adequate source of heat without
burning wood.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 319 (1) Emissions from silvicultural burning
in eastern Washington that is conducted for the purpose of restoring
forest health or preventing the additional deterioration of forest
health are exempt from the reduction targets and calculations of RCW
70.94.665 (as recodified by this act) if the following conditions are
met:
(a) The landowner submits a written request to the department
identifying the location of the proposed burning and the nature of the
forest health problem to be corrected. The request shall include a
brief description of alternatives to silvicultural burning and reasons
why the landowner believes the alternatives not to be appropriate.
(b) The department determines that the proposed silvicultural
burning operation:
(i) Is being conducted to restore forest health or prevent
additional deterioration to forest health;
(ii) Meets the requirements of the state smoke management plan to
protect public health, visibility, and the environment; and
(iii) Will not be conducted during an air pollution episode or
during periods of impaired air quality in the vicinity of the proposed
burn.
(c) Upon approval of the request by the department, and before
burning, the landowner is encouraged to notify the public in the
vicinity of the burn of the general location and approximate time of
ignition.
(2) The department may conduct a limited, seasonal ambient air
quality monitoring program to measure the effects of forest health
burning conducted under this section. The monitoring program may be
developed in consultation with the department of natural resources,
private and public forest landowners, academic experts in forest health
issues, and the general public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 320 (1) The department of natural resources
shall encourage more intense utilization in logging and alternative
silviculture practices to reduce the need for burning.
(2) The department of natural resources shall, whenever practical,
encourage landowners to develop and use alternative acceptable disposal
methods subject to the following priorities:
(a) Slash production minimization;
(b) Slash utilization;
(c) Nonburning disposal; and
(d) Silvicultural burning.
(3) Alternative acceptable disposal methods shall be evaluated as
to the relative impact on air, water, and land pollution, public
health, and their financial feasibility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 321 (1) A permit is not required under RCW
70.94.650, 70.94.743, 70.94.745, 70.94.750, or 70.94.780 (as recodified
by this act), from an authority, the department, or any local entity
with delegated permit authority, for aircraft crash rescue fire
training activities meeting the following conditions:
(a) Fire fighters participating in the training fires must be
limited to those who provide fire fighting support to an airport that
is either certified by the federal aviation administration or operated
in support of military or governmental activities;
(b) The fire training may not be conducted during an air pollution
episode or any stage of impaired air quality declared under RCW
70.94.715 (as recodified by this act) for the area where training is to
be conducted;
(c) The number of training fires allowed per year without a permit
shall be the minimum number necessary to meet federal aviation
administration or other federal safety requirements;
(d) The facility shall use current technology and be operated in a
manner that will minimize, to the extent possible, the air contaminants
generated during operation; and
(e) Prior to the commencement of the aircraft fire training, the
organization conducting training shall notify both:
(i) The local fire district or fire department; and
(ii) The authority, department, or local entity delegated
permitting authority under RCW 70.94.654 (as recodified by this act)
having jurisdiction within the area where training is to be conducted.
(2) Written approval from the department or an authority shall be
obtained prior to the initial operation of aircraft crash rescue fire
training. Approval under this subsection shall be granted to fire
training activities meeting the conditions in this section.
(3) Aircraft crash rescue fire training activities conducted in
compliance with this section are not subject to the prohibition, in RCW
70.94.775(1) (as recodified by this act), of outdoor fires containing
petroleum products and are not considered outdoor burning under RCW
70.94.743, 70.94.745, 70.94.750, 70.94.755, 70.94.760, 70.94.765,
70.94.775, and 70.94.780 (as recodified by this act).
(4) To provide for fire fighting instruction in instances not
governed by this section, or other actions to protect public health and
safety, the department or an authority may issue permits that allow
limited burning of prohibited materials listed in RCW 70.94.775(1) (as
recodified by this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 322 Conservation districts and the Washington
State University agricultural extension program, in conjunction with
the department, shall develop public education material for the
agricultural community identifying the health and environmental effects
of agricultural outdoor burning and providing technical assistance in
alternatives to agricultural outdoor burning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 323 (1) An agricultural burning practices and
research task force shall be established under the direction of the
department.
(2) The task force shall be composed of:
(a) A representative from the department who shall serve as chair;
(b) One representative of eastern Washington authorities;
(c) Three representatives of the agricultural community from
different agricultural pursuits;
(d) One representative of the department of agriculture;
(e) Two representatives from universities or colleges knowledgeable
in agricultural issues;
(f) One representative of the public health or medical community;
and
(g) One representative of the conservation districts.
(3) The task force created under this section shall:
(a) Identify best management practices for reducing air contaminant
emissions from agricultural activities and provide the information to
the department and authorities;
(b) Determine the level of fees to be assessed by the permitting
agency pursuant to RCW 70.94.650 (as recodified by this act), based
upon the level necessary to cover the costs of administering and
enforcing the permit programs, to provide funds for research into
alternative methods to reduce emissions from such burning, and to the
extent possible be consistent with fees charged for similar burning
permits in neighboring states. The fee level shall provide, to the
extent possible, for lesser fees for permittees who use best management
practices to minimize air contaminant emissions;
(c) Identify research needs related to minimizing emissions from
agricultural burning and alternatives to agricultural burning;
(d) Make recommendations to the department on priorities for
spending funds provided through this chapter for research into
alternative methods to reduce emissions from agricultural burning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 324 The department shall enforce the air
quality standards and emission standards throughout the state except
where a local authority is enforcing the state regulations or its own
regulations that are more stringent than those of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 325 (1) The board of an activated authority
may consult, upon request, with any person proposing to construct,
install, or otherwise acquire an air contaminant source, device, or
system:
(a) For the control of the source, device, or system;
(b) Concerning the efficacy of the source, device, or system; or
(c) For the air pollution problems that may be related to the
source, device, or system.
(2) Nothing in any consultation provided by an authority shall be
construed to relieve any person from compliance with this chapter,
ordinances, resolutions, rules, and regulations in force pursuant to
this chapter, or any other provision of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 326 Sections 301 through 325 of this act are
each added to the new chapter created in section 401 of this act.

PART 4
CODIFICATION/RECODIFICATION/DECODIFICATION/REPEALED SECTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new chapter is added to Title 70 RCW and
is named "Washington Clean Air Act." The following sections are
codified or recodified under the following subchapters:
(1) "General Provisions" as follows:
RCW 70.94.011;
RCW 70.94.030;
RCW 70.94.331;
RCW 70.94.040;
RCW 70.94.181;
RCW 70.94.035;
RCW 70.94.200;
RCW 70.94.205;
RCW 70.94.335;
RCW 70.94.157;
RCW 70.94.370;
RCW 70.94.420;
RCW 70.94.510;
RCW 70.94.033; and
RCW 70.94.440.
(2) "Accounts and Budgeting" as follows:
RCW 70.94.015;
Section 301 of this act;
RCW 70.94.017;
RCW 70.94.960;
RCW 70.94.630; and
RCW 70.94.544.
(3) "Pollution Control Authorities" as follows:
RCW 70.94.053;
RCW 70.94.081;
RCW 70.94.055;
RCW 70.94.390;
RCW 70.94.400;
Section 302 of this act;
RCW 70.94.069;
RCW 70.94.070;
RCW 70.94.120;
RCW 70.94.100;
RCW 70.94.141;
RCW 70.94.130;
Section 303 of this act;
RCW 70.94.142;
RCW 70.94.091;
RCW 70.94.092;
RCW 70.94.093;
RCW 70.94.094;
RCW 70.94.096;
RCW 70.94.385;
RCW 70.94.097;
RCW 70.94.380;
RCW 70.94.230;
RCW 70.94.170;
RCW 70.94.085;
RCW 70.94.240;
Section 325 of this act;
RCW 70.94.600;
RCW 70.94.405;
RCW 70.94.410;
RCW 70.94.262; and
RCW 70.94.260.
(4) "Air Contaminant Sources" as follows:
RCW 70.94.395;
RCW 70.94.151;
Section 304 of this act;
RCW 70.94.152;
RCW 70.94.153;
RCW 70.94.154;
Section 305 of this act;
Section 306 of this act;
RCW 70.94.155;
Section 307 of this act;
RCW 70.94.161;
RCW 70.94.162;
Section 308 of this act;
Section 309 of this act;
Section 310 of this act;
Section 311 of this act;
Section 312 of this act;
Section 313 of this act;
Section 314 of this act;
RCW 70.94.163;
RCW 70.94.850; and
RCW 70.94.892.
(5) "Air Pollution Episodes and Stages" as follows:
RCW 70.94.710;
RCW 70.94.715;
Section 315 of this act;
RCW 70.94.720;
RCW 70.94.725;
RCW 70.94.730; and
Section 316 of this act.
(6) "Solid Fuel Burning Devices" as follows:
RCW 70.94.450;
Section 317 of this act;
RCW 70.94.455;
RCW 70.94.457;
RCW 70.94.470;
Section 318 of this act;
RCW 70.94.460;
RCW 70.94.473;
RCW 70.94.477;
RCW 70.94.475;
RCW 70.94.041;
RCW 70.94.483; and
RCW 70.94.480.
(7) "Outdoor Burning" as follows:
RCW 70.94.650;
RCW 70.94.656;
RCW 70.94.660;
RCW 70.94.670;
RCW 70.94.690;
RCW 70.94.700;
RCW 70.94.665;
Section 319 of this act;
Section 320 of this act;
RCW 70.94.745;
RCW 70.94.755;
RCW 70.94.743;
RCW 70.94.780;
RCW 70.94.750;
RCW 70.94.765;
RCW 70.94.775;
RCW 70.94.651;
RCW 70.94.654;
Section 321 of this act;
Section 322 of this act; and
Section 323 of this act.
(8) "Acid Disposition" as follows:
RCW 70.94.800;
RCW 70.94.820;
RCW 70.94.875; and
RCW 70.94.880.
(9) "Transportation Sector" as follows:
RCW 70.94.521;
RCW 70.94.037;
RCW 70.94.527;
RCW 70.94.528;
RCW 70.94.531;
RCW 70.94.534;
RCW 70.94.537;
RCW 70.94.541;
RCW 70.94.547;
RCW 70.94.551;
RCW 70.94.555;
RCW 70.94.996;
RCW 70.94.165; and
RCW 70.94.970.
(10) "Administration, Enforcement, and Penalties" as follows:
RCW 70.94.350;
Section 324 of this act;
RCW 70.94.425;
RCW 70.94.430;
RCW 70.94.431;
RCW 70.94.435;
RCW 70.94.785;
RCW 70.94.211;
RCW 70.94.332; and
RCW 70.94.422.
(11) "Miscellaneous Provisions" as follows:
RCW 70.94.610;
RCW 70.94.620;
RCW 70.94.640;
RCW 70.94.645;
RCW 70.94.760; and
RCW 70.94.901.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 The following sections are each
decodified:
RCW 70.94.025;
RCW 70.94.445;
RCW 70.94.902;
RCW 70.94.904;
RCW 70.94.905;
RCW 70.94.906;
RCW 70.94.911; and
RCW 70.94.950.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 70.94.860 (Department of ecology may accept delegation of
programs) and 1991 c 199 s 312 & 1984 c 164 s 2;
(2) RCW 70.94.057 (Multicounty authority may be formed by
contiguous counties -- Name) and 1967 c 238 s 6;
(3) RCW 70.94.068 (Merger of active and inactive authorities to
form multicounty or regional authority -- Procedure) and 1969 ex.s. c 168
s 3 & 1967 c 238 s 11;
(4) RCW 70.94.095 (Assessed valuation of taxable property,
certification by county assessors) and 1969 ex.s. c 168 s 11 & 1967 c
238 s 19;
(5) RCW 70.94.110 (City selection committees) and 2006 c 227 s 2,
1967 c 238 s 22, 1963 c 27 s 1, & 1957 c 232 s 11;
(6) RCW 70.94.143 (Federal aid) and 1987 c 109 s 36, 1969 ex.s. c
168 s 18, & 1967 c 238 s 27;
(7) RCW 70.94.221 (Order final unless appealed to pollution control
hearings board) and 1970 ex.s. c 62 s 58, 1969 ex.s. c 168 s 25, & 1967
c 238 s 35;
(8) RCW 70.94.231 (Air pollution control authority -- Dissolution of
prior districts -- Continuation of rules and regulations until
superseded) and 1991 c 199 s 708, 1969 ex.s. c 168 s 29, & 1967 c 238
s 39;
(9) RCW 70.94.453 (Wood stoves -- Definitions) and 1987 c 405 s 2;
(10) RCW 70.94.463 (Sale of unapproved wood stoves -- Penalty) and
1987 c 405 s 8;
(11) RCW 70.94.467 (Sale of unapproved wood stoves -- Application of
law to advertising media) and 1987 c 405 s 12;
(12) RCW 70.94.805 (Definitions) and 1985 c 456 s 2 & 1984 c 277 s
2;
(13) RCW 70.94.524 (Transportation demand management -- Definitions)
and 2006 c 329 s 1 & 1991 c 202 s 11;
(14) RCW 70.94.980 (Refrigerants -- Unlawful acts) and 1991 c 199 s
603; and
(15) RCW 70.94.990 (Refrigerants -- Rules -- Enforcement provisions,
limitations) and 1991 c 199 s 604.

PART 5
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---