BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 8.04.070 and 1988 c 202 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time and place appointed for hearing the petition, or to
which the hearing may have been adjourned, if the court has
satisfactory proof that all parties interested in the lands, real
estate, premises or other property described in the petition have been
duly served with the notice, and is further satisfied by competent
proof that the contemplated use for which the lands, real estate,
premises, or other property are sought to be appropriated is really
necessary for the public use of the state, it shall make and enter an
order, to be recorded in the minutes of the court, and which order
shall be final unless appellate review thereof is sought within five
days after entry thereof, adjudicating that the contemplated use for
which the lands, real estate, premises or other property are sought to
be appropriated is really a public use of the state.
(2) Private property shall be taken by the state only for public
use and no greater interest shall be taken than is necessary to
accomplish the public use. "Public use" means only the actual
possession, occupation, and use of the property by the general public
or by the state; or the use of land for the creation or functioning of
public utilities or common carriers such as railroads, utilities, or
toll roads. The taking of private property by the state for economic
development does not constitute public use.

Sec. 2 RCW 8.08.020 and 1949 c 79 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
((Any condemnation, appropriation or disposition intended in RCW
8.08.010 through 8.08.080 shall be deemed and held to be for a county
purpose and public use within the meaning of RCW 8.08.010 through
8.08.080 when it is directly or indirectly, approximately or remotely
for the general benefit or welfare of the county or of the inhabitants
thereof.))
Private property shall be taken by the county only for public use
and no greater interest shall be taken than is necessary to accomplish
the public use. "Public use" means only the actual possession,
occupation, and use of the property by the general public or by the
county; or the use of land for the creation or functioning of public
utilities or common carriers such as railroads, utilities, or toll
roads. The taking of private property by the county for economic
development does not constitute public use.

Sec. 3 RCW 8.12.030 and 1915 c 154 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every city and town and each unclassified city and town within
the state of Washington, is hereby authorized and empowered to condemn
land and property, including state, county and school lands and
property for streets, avenues, alleys, highways, bridges, approaches,
culverts, drains, ditches, public squares, public markets, city and
town halls, jails and other public buildings, and for the opening and
widening, widening and extending, altering and straightening of any
street, avenue, alley or highway, and to damage any land or other
property for any such purpose or for the purpose of making changes in
the grade of any street, avenue, alley or highway, or for the
construction of slopes or retaining walls for cuts and fills upon real
property abutting on any street, avenue, alley or highway now ordered
to be, or such as shall hereafter be ordered to be opened, extended,
altered, straightened or graded, or for the purpose of draining swamps,
marshes, tidelands, tide flats or ponds, or filling the same, within
the limits of such city, and to condemn land or property, or to damage
the same, either within or without the limits of such city for public
parks, drives and boulevards, hospitals, pesthouses, drains and sewers,
garbage crematories and destructors and dumping grounds for the
destruction, deposit or burial of dead animals, manure, dung, rubbish,
and other offal, and for aqueducts, reservoirs, pumping stations and
other structures for conveying into and through such city a supply of
fresh water, and for the purpose of protecting such supply of fresh
water from pollution, and to condemn land and other property and damage
the same for such and for any other public use after just compensation
having been first made or paid into court for the owner in the manner
prescribed by this chapter.
(2) Private property shall be taken by the city, town, or other
municipality, only for public use and no greater interest shall be
taken than is necessary to accomplish the public use. "Public use"
means only the actual possession, occupation, and use of the property
by the city, town, or other municipality; or the use of land for the
creation or functioning of public utilities or common carriers such as
railroads, utilities, or toll roads. The taking of private property by
the city, town, or other municipality for economic development does not
constitute public use.

Sec. 4 RCW 8.20.070 and 1927 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) At the time and place appointed for hearing said petition, or
to which the same may have been adjourned, if the court or judge
thereof shall have satisfactory proof that all parties interested in
the land, real estate, premises, or other property described in said
petition, have been duly served with said notice as above prescribed,
and shall be further satisfied by competent proof that the contemplated
use for which the land, real estate, premises or other property sought
to be appropriated is really a public use, or is for a private use for
a private way of necessity, and that the public interest requires the
prosecution of such enterprise, or the private use is for a private way
of necessity, and that the land, real estate, premises or other
property sought to be appropriated are required and necessary for the
purposes of such enterprise, the court or judge thereof may make an
order, to be recorded in the minutes of said court, directing that a
jury be summoned, or called, in the manner provided by law, to
ascertain the compensation which shall be made for the land, real
estate, premises or other property sought to be appropriated, unless a
jury be waived as in other civil cases in courts of record, in the
manner prescribed by law.
(2) Private property shall be taken by the corporate or
governmental entity only for public use and no greater interest shall
be taken than is necessary to accomplish the public use. "Public use"
means only the actual possession, occupation, and use of the property
by the corporate or governmental entity; or the use of land for the
creation or functioning of public utilities or common carriers such as
railroads, utilities, or toll roads. The taking of private property by
the corporate or governmental entity for economic development does not
constitute public use.

Sec. 5 RCW 8.25.010 and 1965 ex.s. c 125 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In all actions for the condemnation of property, or any interest
therein, at least thirty days prior to the date set for trial of such
action the condemnor shall serve on each condemnee who has made an
appearance in the action:
(1) A written statement showing the amount of total just
compensation to be paid in the event of settlement ((on each condemnee
who has made an appearance in the action)); and
(2) A written statement documenting the condemnor's consideration
of and reasons for rejecting alternatives to the condemnation sought or
to the nature or extent of the condemnation sought, including but not
limited to any reasonable alternative suggested in writing by a
condemnee at least sixty days prior to the date set for trial.

Sec. 6 RCW 8.25.020 and 1999 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
There shall be paid by the condemnor in respect of each parcel of
real property acquired by eminent domain or by consent under threat
thereof, in addition to the fair market value of the property, a sum
equal to the various expenditures actually and reasonably incurred by
those with an interest or interests in said parcel in the process of
evaluating the condemnor's offer to buy the same, ((but not to exceed
a total of seven hundred fifty dollars)) such expenditures to include,
but not be limited to, reasonable fees of appraisers, attorneys,
architects, engineers, or others reasonably retained by the condemnee.
In the case of multiple interests in a parcel, the division of such sum
shall be determined by the court or by agreement of the parties. To
the extent that payment of any such expenditures is not made under
other provisions of this chapter or under other law, the condemnor
shall pay for expenditures as required by this section regardless of
whether a trial of the condemnation action is held and regardless of
the outcome of any trial that is held.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 It is the intent of this title, and the
provisions of this title shall be so construed, that the powers of
eminent domain shall be exercised solely for public use, except private
ways of necessity, and for drains, flumes, or ditches on or across the
lands of others for agricultural, domestic, or sanitary purposes
consistent with Article I, section 16 of the state Constitution. The
power of eminent domain may be exercised only for a stated public use
and all grants and exercise of the power of eminent domain shall be
strictly construed. Public use shall not be equated with public
purpose, public interest, or public benefit, such as promoting economic
development, creating jobs, improving the tax base, or enhancing tax
revenues by building, expanding, or upgrading private retail,
commercial, industrial, or residential establishments. The legislature
intends that economic development as contemplated by the United States
supreme court decision in Kelo v. City of New London, 545 U.S. 469
(2005) is not and shall not be construed as public use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Upon a final order adjudicating eminent
domain proceedings, the land, real estate, premises, or other property
described in the appropriating petition shall not be used for any use,
whether public or private, in whole or in part, other than the
contemplated and actual public use described in the final order of
condemnation. The contemplated and actual public use described in the
final order of condemnation shall be the sole use permitted.
Incidental private uses are prohibited.
(2) A final order of condemnation shall be voidable if a person
with interest in land that has been condemned files a petition to void
the order of condemnation and shows: (a) That the land, real estate,
premises, or other property described in the appropriating petition was
never physically and substantially put to the contemplated and actual
public use described in the final order of condemnation and that more
than ten years has passed since the date of the final order of
condemnation, or (b) that the land, real estate, premises, or other
property described in the appropriating petition was put to any use
inconsistent with the contemplated and actual public use described in
the final order of condemnation after the date of the final order of
condemnation.
(3) Any person who prevails in an action to void, in whole, a final
order of condemnation under this section appropriating lands, real
estate, premises, or other property described in the appropriating
petition shall pay back the amount of compensation received in the
eminent domain proceedings with interest at the market rate. Any
person who prevails in an action to void, in part, a final order of
condemnation under this section appropriating land, real estate,
premises, or other property described in the appropriating petition
shall pay back an amount of the compensation received in the eminent
domain proceedings with interest at the market rate with said amount to
be ascertained and determined by the court. Upon payment of said
compensation with interest to the court, that interest in the
appropriated land, real estate, premises, or other property which is
voided in the final order of condemnation shall be transferred back to
the person whose interest was appropriated.
(4) Any person who prevails in an action to void, in whole or in
part, a final order of condemnation under this section shall be
entitled to reasonable attorney fees and costs.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (1) through (4) of
this section, if any land, real estate, premises, or other property
ceases to be used for the contemplated and actual public use described
in a final order of condemnation, the previous owner of the land, real
estate, premises, or other property, or a beneficiary of the previous
owner, has the first right to reacquire the land, real estate,
premises, or other property for the amount of the compensation received
in the eminent domain proceedings with interest at the market rate, or
the fair market value, whichever is less, before the land, real estate,
premises, or other property may otherwise be sold or transferred. Upon
petition to the court and payment of said compensation with interest,
or fair market value, to the court, that interest in the appropriated
land, real estate, premises, or other property which has ceased to be
used shall be transferred upon order of the court back to the previous
owner, or beneficiary of the previous owner, who has exercised the
right to reacquire the land, real estate, premises, or other property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 7 and 8 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 8 RCW.

--- END ---