BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In State v. Pillatos, 150 P.3d 1130 (2007),
the Washington supreme court held that the changes made to the
sentencing reform act concerning exceptional sentences in chapter 68,
Laws of 2005 do not apply to cases where the trials had already begun
or guilty pleas had already been entered prior to the effective date of
the act on April 15, 2005. The legislature intends that the superior
courts shall have the authority to impanel juries to find aggravating
circumstances in all cases that come before the courts for trial or
sentencing, regardless of the date of the original trial or sentencing.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.537 and 2005 c 68 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At any time prior to trial or entry of the guilty plea if
substantial rights of the defendant are not prejudiced, the state may
give notice that it is seeking a sentence above the standard sentencing
range. The notice shall state aggravating circumstances upon which the
requested sentence will be based.
(2) In any case where a new trial or new sentencing hearing is
required, the superior court shall have the authority to impanel a jury
to consider any aggravating circumstances, as alleged by the state and
listed in RCW 9.94A.535(3) (a) through (y), at either the new trial or,
if no new trial is necessary, at the new sentencing hearing.
(3) The facts supporting aggravating circumstances shall be proved
to a jury beyond a reasonable doubt. The jury's verdict on the
aggravating factor must be unanimous, and by special interrogatory. If
a jury is waived, proof shall be to the court beyond a reasonable
doubt, unless the defendant stipulates to the aggravating facts.
(((3))) (4) Evidence regarding any facts supporting aggravating
circumstances under RCW 9.94A.535(3) (a) through (y) shall be presented
to the jury during the trial of the alleged crime, unless the jury has
been impaneled solely for resentencing, or unless the state alleges the
aggravating circumstances listed in RCW 9.94A.535(3) (e)(iv), (h)(i),
(o), or (t). If one of these aggravating circumstances is alleged, the
trial court may conduct a separate proceeding if the evidence
supporting the aggravating fact is not part of the res geste of the
charged crime, if the evidence is not otherwise admissible in trial of
the charged crime, and if the court finds that the probative value of
the evidence to the aggravated fact is substantially outweighed by its
prejudicial effect on the jury's ability to determine guilt or
innocence for the underlying crime.
(((4))) (5) If the superior court conducts a separate proceeding to
determine the existence of aggravating circumstances listed in RCW
9.94A.535(3) (e)(iv), (h)(i), (o), or (t), the proceeding shall
immediately follow the trial on the underlying conviction, if possible.
If any person who served on the jury is unable to continue, the court
shall substitute an alternate juror.
(((5))) (6) If the jury finds, unanimously and beyond a reasonable
doubt, one or more of the facts alleged by the state in support of an
aggravated sentence, the court may sentence the offender pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.535 to a term of confinement up to the maximum allowed under
RCW 9A.20.021 for the underlying conviction if it finds, considering
the purposes of this chapter, that the facts found are substantial and
compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---