BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the marine
waters of Hood Canal are unique in their fragility, vulnerability, and
high demand for extra care in their management. In recognition of this
fragile condition, the legislature has designated Hood Canal as the
state's first aquatic rehabilitation zone, allowing its unique
challenges and features to be addressed individually.
(2) The legislature further finds that courts have interpreted
treaties entered into between the United States and the Indian tribes
indigenous to the Hood Canal area to reserve one-half of the available
fish and shellfish to nontribal members.
(3) It is the intent of this act for the state of Washington, as
the governmental entity responsible for the half of the fishery
resources available to nontribal members, to use the one-half of the
fishery reserved to its nontribal residents for the conservation and
rehabilitation of the overall marine ecosystem of aquatic
rehabilitation zone one.
(4) This act does not represent an intent on the part of the state
to choose not to use its share of the affected fisheries, to waste
harvestable fish or shellfish, or to surrender the reserved and
dedicated state share to other comanagers of the resource. Conversely,
this act signifies the intent of the state to put to use its dedicated
share of the affected fisheries in a manner that best protects,
conserves, and rehabilitates the waters and ecosystem of aquatic
rehabilitation zone one. Without using its share of the resource in
this manner, the legislature finds that the overall health of aquatic
rehabilitation zone one will continue to decline, eventually resulting
in the extinction of any future commercially viable fisheries.
(5) It is the intent of the legislature for the department of fish
and wildlife, the office of the governor, and the office of the
attorney general to vigorously defend and protect the right of the
state to use the dedicated share of the fishery reserved to it by
treaties for the conservation, protection, and rehabilitation of
aquatic rehabilitation zone one, and to not see its chosen use of the
resource surrendered to consumptive harvest of other fishery
comanagers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.65 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Until otherwise directed by the legislature, the department and
the department of natural resources are prohibited from entering or
reentering into any management agreements with another state agency or
other governmental entity for aquatic rehabilitation zone one, as
established in RCW 90.88.010, that would, in the subtidal areas of
aquatic rehabilitation zone one south of a line projected from Brown
Point in Jefferson county and a location in Kitsap county due east
across Hood Canal from Brown Point, allow for the commercial harvest of
any naturally occurring geoduck below the mean low tide line.
(2) The department and the department of natural resources are
prohibited from entering or reentering into any management agreements
with another state agency or other governmental entity for aquatic
rehabilitation zone one, as established in RCW 90.88.010, that would,
in the area of aquatic rehabilitation zone one north of a line
projected from Brown Point in Jefferson county and a location in Kitsap
county due east across Hood Canal from Brown Point and south of a line
projected from Tala Point in Jefferson county to Foulweather Bluff in
Kitsap county, allow for the commercial harvest of naturally occurring
geoduck below the mean low tide line in an amount greater than seventy
percent of the maximum allowable harvest level by count for geoduck
tracts in that area.
(3) Any geoducks located in the areas of aquatic rehabilitation
zone one referenced in this section that are not used by the state for
a consumptive use must be managed and used by the state for both the
conservation of the geoduck resource in aquatic rehabilitation zone one
and the conservation and rehabilitation of the overall marine ecosystem
of aquatic rehabilitation zone one.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.135.220 and 2005 c 155 s 709 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall designate the areas of state-owned aquatic
lands that are available for geoduck harvesting by licensed geoduck
harvesters in accordance with chapter ((79.90)) 79.135 RCW. However,
the department may not designate any aquatic lands available for the
commercial harvest of naturally occurring geoduck in the subtidal areas
of aquatic rehabilitation zone one, as established in RCW 90.88.010,
south of a line projected from Brown Point in Jefferson county and a
location in Kitsap county due east across Hood Canal from Brown Point.
(2) Any geoducks located in the area of aquatic rehabilitation zone
one referenced in this section must be managed and used by the state
for both the conservation of the geoduck resource in aquatic
rehabilitation zone one and the conservation and rehabilitation of the
overall marine ecosystem of aquatic rehabilitation zone one.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.135.230 and 2005 c 155 s 718 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as conditioned in section 2 of this act, the department
may enter into agreements with the department of fish and wildlife for
the development of an intensive management plan for geoducks, including
the development and operation of a geoduck hatchery.
(2) Any management plan or agreement developed by the department
and the department of fish and wildlife may not use either the
individual counts of geoduck or the cumulative geoduck biomass found in
aquatic rehabilitation zone one, as established in RCW 90.88.010, as
part of a larger management plan for the Puget Sound. The geoducks
located in aquatic rehabilitation zone one must be managed as a
resource discreet from the geoducks located in other portions of the
Puget Sound.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In adopting rules and establishing seasons applicable to
aquatic rehabilitation zone one, as established in RCW 90.88.010, the
commission shall ensure that:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, there shall be no
permissible commercial harvest of any aquatic species located in the
subtidal waters of aquatic rehabilitation zone one; and
(b) There shall be no permissible recreational harvest of any
species of groundfish.
(2) The limitations on commercial fishing established in this
section do not apply to hatchery-raised chum salmon.
(3) The fish that are prohibited from being harvested for a
consumptive use must be managed and used by the commission for both the
conservation of the fish species for which the fish belongs and the
conservation and rehabilitation of the overall marine ecosystem of
aquatic rehabilitation zone one.

--- END ---