BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the importance of
establishing permanency in the lives of children who have been found to
be dependent. In some cases, parents choose to not contact their
children, or indicate an unwillingness to care for their children, for
years while the child is in a dependency. Though the state is able to
file a termination petition on these parents, the state often chooses
to wait to determine the outcome of the other parent before filing a
termination petition. The state finds that it is not in the best
interest of the child to delay action on a parent who has not indicated
any desire to maintain contact with his or her child.
The state should file the petition for termination to allow a court
to review the case and decide the appropriate course of action. This
may encourage the parent to step forward and contact the child or
indicate a willingness to become involved in the child's life. This
will begin the process of connecting the child to the parent possibly
years sooner than would otherwise be the case. However, if the parent
truly does not wish to be involved in the life of the child, the court
should have the opportunity to terminate the parental rights of that
parent and move the case toward permanency.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.180 and 2001 c 332 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A petition seeking termination of a parent and child
relationship may be filed in juvenile court by any party to the
dependency proceedings concerning that child. Such petition shall
conform to the requirements of RCW 13.34.040, shall be served upon the
parties as provided in RCW 13.34.070(8), and shall allege all of the
following unless subsection (2) ((or)), (3), or (4) of this section
applies:
(a) That the child has been found to be a dependent child;
(b) That the court has entered a dispositional order pursuant to
RCW 13.34.130;
(c) That the child has been removed or will, at the time of the
hearing, have been removed from the custody of the parent for a period
of at least six months pursuant to a finding of dependency;
(d) That the services ordered under RCW 13.34.136 have been
expressly and understandably offered or provided and all necessary
services, reasonably available, capable of correcting the parental
deficiencies within the foreseeable future have been expressly and
understandably offered or provided;
(e) That there is little likelihood that conditions will be
remedied so that the child can be returned to the parent in the near
future. A parent's failure to substantially improve parental
deficiencies within twelve months following entry of the dispositional
order shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption that there is little
likelihood that conditions will be remedied so that the child can be
returned to the parent in the near future. The presumption shall not
arise unless the petitioner makes a showing that all necessary services
reasonably capable of correcting the parental deficiencies within the
foreseeable future have been clearly offered or provided. In
determining whether the conditions will be remedied the court may
consider, but is not limited to, the following factors:
(i) Use of intoxicating or controlled substances so as to render
the parent incapable of providing proper care for the child for
extended periods of time or for periods of time that present a risk of
imminent harm to the child, and documented unwillingness of the parent
to receive and complete treatment or documented multiple failed
treatment attempts; or
(ii) Psychological incapacity or mental deficiency of the parent
that is so severe and chronic as to render the parent incapable of
providing proper care for the child for extended periods of time or for
periods of time that present a risk of imminent harm to the child, and
documented unwillingness of the parent to receive and complete
treatment or documentation that there is no treatment that can render
the parent capable of providing proper care for the child in the near
future; and
(f) That continuation of the parent and child relationship clearly
diminishes the child's prospects for early integration into a stable
and permanent home.
(2) In lieu of the allegations in subsection (1) of this section,
the petition may allege that the child was found under such
circumstances that the whereabouts of the child's parent are unknown
and no person has acknowledged paternity or maternity and requested
custody of the child within two months after the child was found.
(3) In lieu of the allegations in subsection (1) of this section,
the petition may allege that eighteen months have elapsed since the
child was removed from the home and the parent of the child has
indicated an unwillingness to care for the child or has failed to have
contact with the child.
(4) In lieu of the allegations in subsection (1)(b) through (f) of
this section, the petition may allege that the parent has been
convicted of:
(a) Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree, or
homicide by abuse as defined in chapter 9A.32 RCW against another child
of the parent;
(b) Manslaughter in the first degree or manslaughter in the second
degree, as defined in chapter 9A.32 RCW against another child of the
parent;
(c) Attempting, conspiring, or soliciting another to commit one or
more of the crimes listed in (a) or (b) of this subsection; or
(d) Assault in the first or second degree, as defined in chapter
9A.36 RCW, against the surviving child or another child of the parent.
(((4))) (5) Notice of rights shall be served upon the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian with the petition and shall be in
substantially the following form:

"NOTICE

A petition for termination of parental rights has been filed
against you. You have important legal rights and you must take
steps to protect your interests. This petition could result in
permanent loss of your parental rights.

1. You have the right to a fact-finding hearing before
a judge.

2. You have the right to have a lawyer represent you at
the hearing. A lawyer can look at the files in your case, talk
to the department of social and health services and other
agencies, tell you about the law, help you understand your
rights, and help you at hearings. If you cannot afford a
lawyer, the court will appoint one to represent you. To get a
court-appointed lawyer you must contact: (explain local
procedure) .

3. At the hearing, you have the right to speak on your
own behalf, to introduce evidence, to examine witnesses, and to
receive a decision based solely on the evidence presented to
the judge.

You should be present at this hearing.

You may call (insert agency) for more information
about your child. The agency's name and telephone number are
(insert name and telephone number) ."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall file a petition seeking termination of a
parent and child relationship when eighteen months have elapsed since
a child was removed from the home and the parent of the child has
indicated an unwillingness to care for the child or has failed to have
contact with the child.

--- END ---