BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.060 and 2005 c 423 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) ((Except as provided in RCW 36.70A.1701,)) Each county that
is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each city
within such county, shall adopt development regulations on or before
September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest,
and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
Regulations adopted under this subsection may not prohibit uses legally
existing on any parcel prior to their initial adoption and ((shall
remain in effect until the county or city adopts development
regulations pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040)) may not require modification
of or limit agricultural activities occurring on agricultural lands.
Such regulations shall assure that the use of lands adjacent to
agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands shall not interfere
with the continued use, in the accustomed manner and in accordance with
best management practices, of these designated lands for the production
of food, agricultural products, or timber, or for the extraction of
minerals.
(b) Counties and cities shall require that all plats, short plats,
development permits, and building permits issued for development
activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands designated as
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a
notice that the subject property is within or near designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands on which a
variety of commercial activities may occur that are not compatible with
residential development for certain periods of limited duration. The
notice for mineral resource lands shall also inform that an application
might be made for mining-related activities, including mining,
extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and
recycling of minerals.
(c) "Agricultural activities" as used in this section has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 90.58.065(2).
(2) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that
protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW
36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the
counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on
or before March 1, 1992.
(3) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.
(4) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban growth
areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land or
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.

--- END ---