BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.760 and 1993 c 2 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A labor organization may not use agency shop fees paid by an
individual who is not a member of the organization to make
contributions or expenditures to influence an election or to operate a
political committee, unless affirmatively authorized by the individual.
(2) A labor organization does not use agency shop fees when it uses
its general treasury funds to make such contributions or expenditures
if it has sufficient revenues from sources other than agency shop fees
in its general treasury to fund such contributions or expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---