BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND INTENT. The legislature finds
that promoting equity among school districts is an important principle
of any school funding system. The legislature finds that the current
system of salary "grandfathering" for certificated instructional staff
creates inequities among school districts and places certain districts
at a disadvantage in recruiting and retaining highly qualified
instructional staff. Accordingly, the legislature intends to eliminate
the gap between grandfathered and nongrandfathered salary districts on
certificated instructional salaries over the next four years. As a
result, by school year 2011-12, it is the intent of the legislature
that all districts receive the same base salary allocations for
certificated instructional staff.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
POLICY FOR EQUALIZATION OF K-12 SALARY ALLOCATIONS BY 2011-12
SCHOOL YEAR. (1) It is the intent of the legislature that, beginning
with the appropriations for the 2011-12 school year, all state salary
allocations to school districts for certificated instructional staff
use the same base salary schedule. When this result is achieved, base
salaries for certificated instructional staff shall be equal for all
districts on a per-staff unit basis, but will continue to be adjusted
by a staff mix factor.
(2) The legislature intends to reach this goal by two means:
Providing additional appropriations for the purpose of salary
equalization, and by pro rata reduction of all or part of the cost-of-living increases provided pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205 to districts that
receive grandfathered salary allocations for certificated instructional
staff. However, any such reductions to districts' allocations for
cost-of-living adjustments shall not cause a reduction in the total
amount appropriated by the legislature to school districts for purposes
of the cost-of-living adjustments under RCW 28A.400.205. Instead, any
amounts withheld shall be appropriated to districts whose salary
allocations require upward adjustment under the equalization
requirements of section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
TEACHER SALARY EQUALIZATION. (1)(a) By the end of the 2007-2009
biennium, the legislature shall reduce by one-half the number of
districts that receive salary allocations for certificated
instructional staff in excess of the statewide base salary allocation
schedule established pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, as compared to the
number of districts receiving such excess allocations as reflected in
the LEAP 12E schedule for the 2005-2007 biennium.
(b) By the end of the 2009-2011 biennium, the legislature shall
eliminate the practice of providing salary allocations for certificated
instructional staff in excess of the statewide base salary allocation
schedule established pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, such that beginning
with the 2011-12 school year, all school districts shall receive salary
allocations based on the same statewide base salary allocation
schedule.
(2) The legislature shall reach the goals established in subsection
(1) of this section by either or both of the following means:
(a) Providing additional appropriations for certificated
instructional staff salaries in excess of the allocations provided
under chapter 28A.150 RCW;
(b) Adjusting the cost-of-living increase allocations under RCW
28A.400.205 for certificated instructional staff in districts that have
historically received salary allocations in excess of the statewide
salary schedule.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.400.205 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
REVISIONS TO INITIATIVE MEASURE NO. 732 COLA. (1) School district
employees shall be provided an annual salary cost-of-living increase in
accordance with this section.
(a) The cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying the
rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base used in state funding formulas for teachers and
other school district employees. Beginning with the 2001-02 school
year, and for each subsequent school year, except for the 2003-04 and
2004-05 school years, each school district shall be provided a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to grant this cost-of-living increase.
(b) A school district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
compensation policies. No later than the end of the school year, each
school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) Any funded cost-of-living increase shall be included in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for school
employees in subsequent years, except as provided in subsection (3) of
this section. For teachers and other certificated instructional staff,
the rate of the annual cost-of-living increase funded for certificated
instructional staff shall be applied to the base salary used with the
statewide salary allocation schedule established under RCW 28A.150.410
and to any other salary models used to recognize school district
personnel costs.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any school year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.
(3)(a) For districts that have historically received salary
allocations for certificated instructional staff in excess of the
statewide salary schedule included in the omnibus appropriations act
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the legislature may adjust the cost-of-living adjustment otherwise required under this section in order to
meet the salary allocation equalization goals in sections 2 and 3 of
this act.
(b) The total amount appropriated by the legislature for cost-of-living adjustments under subsection (1) of this section may not be
reduced by any adjustments under (a) of this subsection. Any amounts
withheld from districts as a result of adjustments under (a) of this
subsection shall be appropriated by the legislature to school districts
for salary equalization under sections 2 and 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---