BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 INTENT. The state of Washington has a
large and growing need for electrical energy. The state of Washington
possesses a great potential for the generation of electrical or
mechanical power and useful heat energy through the process of
cogeneration. It is the purpose and intent of the legislature to
promote the growth of cogeneration in the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, the
following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Certificate" means a cogeneration tax credit certificate
granted by the department.
(2) "Cogeneration" means a system that uses the same energy source
for the simultaneous or sequential generation of electricity and steam
or other forms of useful thermal energy, including heating and cooling
applications.
(3) "Cogeneration facility" means any machinery, equipment,
structure, process, or property, or any part thereof, installed or
acquired for the primary purpose of high-efficiency cogeneration with
an efficiency level above seventy percent by a person or corporation
other than an electric utility.
(4) "Cost" means only the cost of a cogeneration facility which is
in addition to the cost that the applicant otherwise would incur to
meet the applicant's demands for useful heat. "Cost" does not include
expenditures which are offset by cost savings, including but not
limited to savings resulting from early retirement of existing
equipment.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(6) "Electric utility" means any person, corporation, or
governmental subdivision authorized and operating under the
Constitution and laws of the state of Washington which is primarily
engaged in the generation or sale of electric energy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 ADMINISTRATION. (1) No certificate
including a supplement thereto may be issued for a cogeneration
facility with a generating capacity of more than one hundred megawatts.
(2) The department shall keep a running tabulation of the total
cogeneration facility credits claimed.
(3) The total amount of credits claimed shall not exceed one
hundred million dollars.
(4) The department may adopt any rules under chapter 34.05 RCW
necessary for the administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 TAX CREDIT. When a cogeneration facility
is operational and a certificate pertaining thereto has been issued, a
credit may be claimed against taxes imposed under chapter 82.04 RCW, if
the due date for payment of the taxes is after the effective date of
the certificate. However, the date on which the facility is
operational may not be more than four years after the date of issuance
of the certificate. The amount of the credit shall be three percent of
the cost of a facility covered by the certificate for each year the
certificate remains in force. The credits shall be cumulative and shall
be subject only to the following limitations:
(1) The tax credit shall apply to capital costs only and shall not
apply to operating costs.
(2) A person, firm, corporation, or organization which acquires a
cogeneration facility shall be entitled to the credit only to the
extent that it has previously not been taken. Under no circumstances
may a credit be taken more than once against any cost or portion
thereof of a cogeneration facility. An operator of a cogeneration
facility shall be entitled to the credit if the operator is operating
the cogeneration facility for an electric utility that is not eligible
to receive the credit.
(3) No credit exceeding fifty percent of the taxes payable under
chapter 82.04 RCW shall be allowed in any reporting period.
(4) The total cumulative amount of the credits allowed for any
cogeneration facility constructed before June 30, 2007, covered by a
certificate may not exceed fifty percent of the cost of the
cogeneration facility or five million dollars, whichever is less.
(5) The total cumulative amount of the credits allowed for any
cogeneration facility constructed after June 30, 2007, covered by a
certificate may not exceed fifty percent of the cost of the
cogeneration facility or seven million five hundred thousand dollars,
whichever is less.
(6) State credits may not become available until one year after
final cost verification by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 CERTIFICATE ISSUANCE. The department
shall send a certificate or supplement, when issued, by certified mail
to the applicant. Notice of the department's refusal to issue a
certificate or supplement shall likewise be sent to the applicant by
certified mail.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 CERTIFICATE REVOCATION. (1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall revoke
any certificate issued under this chapter if it finds that any of the
following have occurred with respect to the certificate:
(a) The certificate was obtained by fraud or deliberate
misrepresentation;
(b) The certificate was obtained through the use of inaccurate data
but without any intention to commit fraud or misrepresentation;
(c) The facility was constructed or operated in violation of any
provision of this chapter or provision imposed by the department as a
condition of certification; or
(d) The cogeneration facility is no longer capable of being
operated for the primary purpose of cogeneration.
(2) If the department finds that there are few inaccuracies under
subsection (1)(b) of this section and that cumulatively they are
insignificant in terms of the cost or operation of the facility or that
the inaccurate data is not attributable to carelessness or negligence
and its inclusion was reasonable under the circumstances, then the
department may provide for the continuance of the certificate and
whatever modification it considers in the public interest.
(3) Any person, firm, corporation, or organization that obtains a
certificate revoked under this section shall be liable for the total
amount of money saved by claiming the credits provided under this
chapter. The total amount of the credits shall be collected as
delinquent business and occupation taxes. Interest shall accrue on the
amounts of the credits and exemptions from the date the taxes were
otherwise due.
(4) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall provide technical assistance to the department in carrying out
its responsibilities under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid,
the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 Sections 101 through 108 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---