BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.737 and 2005 c 435 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an offender violates any condition or requirement of
community custody, the department may transfer the offender to a more
restrictive confinement status to serve up to the remaining portion of
the sentence, less credit for any period actually spent in community
custody or in detention awaiting disposition of an alleged violation
and subject to the limitations of subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) For a sex offender sentenced to a term of community custody
under RCW 9.94A.670 who violates any condition of community custody,
the department may impose a sanction of ((up to sixty days')) total
confinement ((in a local correctional facility)) for a period of time
up to the offender's remaining term of community custody for each
violation. If the department imposes a sanction, the department shall
submit within seventy-two hours a report to the court and the
prosecuting attorney outlining the violation or violations and the
sanctions imposed.
(b) For a sex offender sentenced to a term of community custody
under RCW 9.94A.710 who violates any condition of community custody
after having completed his or her maximum term of total confinement,
including time served on community custody in lieu of earned release,
the department may impose a sanction of ((up to sixty days in a local
correctional facility)) total confinement for a period of time up to
the offender's remaining term of community custody for each violation.
(c) For an offender sentenced to a term of community custody under
RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650, or 9.94A.715, or under RCW 9.94A.545,
for a crime committed on or after July 1, 2000, who violates any
condition of community custody after having completed his or her
maximum term of total confinement, including time served on community
custody in lieu of earned release, the department may impose a sanction
of ((up to sixty days in)) total confinement for a period of time up to
the offender's remaining term of community custody for each violation.
The department may impose sanctions such as work release, home
detention with electronic monitoring, work crew, community restitution,
inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling
sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any
other sanctions available in the community.
(d) For an offender sentenced to a term of community placement
under RCW 9.94A.705 who violates any condition of community placement
after having completed his or her maximum term of total confinement,
including time served on community custody in lieu of earned release,
the department may impose a sanction of ((up to sixty days in)) total
confinement for a period of time up to the offender's remaining term of
community placement for each violation. The department may impose
sanctions such as work release, home detention with electronic
monitoring, work crew, community restitution, inpatient treatment,
daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling sessions,
supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any other
sanctions available in the community.
(3) If an offender is accused of violating any condition or
requirement of community custody, he or she is entitled to a hearing
before the department prior to the imposition of sanctions. The
hearing shall be considered as offender disciplinary proceedings and
shall not be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The department shall
develop hearing procedures and a structure of graduated sanctions.
(4) The hearing procedures required under subsection (3) of this
section shall be developed by rule and include the following:
(a) Hearing officers shall report through a chain of command
separate from that of community corrections officers;
(b) The department shall provide the offender with written notice
of the violation, the evidence relied upon, and the reasons the
particular sanction was imposed. The notice shall include a statement
of the rights specified in this subsection, and the offender's right to
file a personal restraint petition under court rules after the final
decision of the department;
(c) The hearing shall be held unless waived by the offender, and
shall be electronically recorded. For offenders not in total
confinement, the hearing shall be held within fifteen working days, but
not less than twenty-four hours, after notice of the violation. For
offenders in total confinement, the hearing shall be held within five
working days, but not less than twenty-four hours, after notice of the
violation;
(d) The offender shall have the right to: (i) Be present at the
hearing; (ii) have the assistance of a person qualified to assist the
offender in the hearing, appointed by the hearing officer if the
offender has a language or communications barrier; (iii) testify or
remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary evidence;
and (v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and
(e) The sanction shall take effect if affirmed by the hearing
officer. Within seven days after the hearing officer's decision, the
offender may appeal the decision to a panel of three reviewing officers
designated by the secretary or by the secretary's designee. The
sanction shall be reversed or modified if a majority of the panel finds
that the sanction was not reasonably related to any of the following:
(i) The crime of conviction; (ii) the violation committed; (iii) the
offender's risk of reoffending; or (iv) the safety of the community.
(5) For purposes of this section, no finding of a violation of
conditions may be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(6) The department shall work with the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs to establish and operate an electronic
monitoring program for low-risk offenders who violate the terms of
their community custody. Between January 1, 2006, and December 31,
2006, the department shall endeavor to place at least one hundred low-risk community custody violators on the electronic monitoring program
per day if there are at least that many low-risk offenders who qualify
for the electronic monitoring program.
(7) Local governments, their subdivisions and employees, the
department and its employees, and the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs and its employees shall be immune from civil
liability for damages arising from incidents involving low-risk
offenders who are placed on electronic monitoring unless it is shown
that an employee acted with gross negligence or bad faith.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.631 and 1984 c 209 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
If an offender violates any condition or requirement of a sentence,
a community corrections officer may arrest or cause the arrest of the
offender without a warrant, pending a determination by the court. ((If
there is reasonable cause to believe that an offender has violated a
condition or requirement of the sentence,)) An offender may be required
to submit to a search and seizure of the offender's person, residence,
automobile, or other personal property. A community corrections
officer may also arrest an offender for any crime committed in his or
her presence. The facts and circumstances of the conduct of the
offender shall be reported by the community corrections officer, with
recommendations, to the court.
If a community corrections officer arrests or causes the arrest of
an offender under this section, the offender shall be confined and
detained in the county jail of the county in which the offender was
taken into custody, and the sheriff of that county shall receive and
keep in the county jail, where room is available, all prisoners
delivered to the jail by the community corrections officer, and such
offenders shall not be released from custody on bail or personal
recognizance, except upon approval of the court, pursuant to a written
order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall perform random, unannounced inspections of the
residence of every offender serving a term of community custody. The
purpose and scope of the search shall be to determine whether the
offender is complying with the terms of his or her community custody.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall develop a performance review whenever an
offender serving a term of community custody is convicted of a new
crime to determine whether the department contributed to the
circumstances that allowed the crime to occur. Beginning January 1,
2008, the department shall compile and submit copies of the reviews
developed during the previous calendar year to the governor and the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning January 1, 2008, the department shall submit an
annual report to the governor and the legislature containing:
(a) The number of offenders supervised by the department during the
previous calendar year;
(b) The number and custody levels of offenders who violated one or
more conditions of their community custody during the previous calendar
year; and
(c) The number and custody levels of offenders who were convicted,
during the previous calendar year, of new offenses that were committed
while the offenders were on community custody.
(2) The department shall perform a study to determine whether it
has the capacity to adequately supervise all offenders who are serving
a term of community custody. The department shall report the results
of this study along with a plan to efficiently and effectively improve
its supervision capacity to the governor and the legislature by January
1, 2008. For purposes of this subsection, "adequately supervise" means
to supervise in a manner that minimizes the number of community custody
violations and new crimes committed by offenders under supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may not release any offenders on community
custody until July 1, 2008. The prohibition in this subsection applies
regardless of whether the community custody is the result of earned
release time or is part of the offender's sentence.
(2) In no case shall the department hold an offender in total
confinement under this section longer than his or her total term of
confinement plus any term of community custody that is part of his or
her sentence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 3 of this act apply to
any offender under the supervision of the department of corrections on
or after the effective date of this act.

--- END ---