BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The federal government requires Washington health care facilities
to be certified in order to receive federal health care program
reimbursement. The department receives funding from the federal
government to perform the certifications and recertifications of these
health care facilities. When the federal government does not provide
sufficient funding to cover all certifications and recertifications,
the secretary may assess fees on certification and recertification
applicants to fund the certifications and recertifications.

--- END ---