BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.190.010 and 1996 c 132 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Administrative costs" means the costs associated with
procurement; payroll processing; personnel functions; management;
maintenance and operation of space and property; data processing and
computer services; accounting; budgeting; auditing; indirect costs; and
organizational planning, consultation, coordination, and training.
(2) "Assessment" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.70.010.
(3) "At-risk" children are children who engage in or are victims of
at-risk behaviors.
(4) "At-risk behaviors" means violent delinquent acts, teen
substance abuse, teen pregnancy and male parentage, teen suicide
attempts, dropping out of school, child abuse or neglect, and domestic
violence.
(5) "Community public health and safety networks" or "networks"
means the organizations authorized under RCW 70.190.060.
(6) "Comprehensive plan" means a two-year plan that examines
available resources and unmet needs for a county or multicounty area,
barriers that limit the effective use of resources, and a plan to
address these issues that is broadly supported by local residents.
(7) "Participating state agencies" means the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the department of social and
health services, the department of health, the employment security
department, the department of community, trade, and economic
development, and such other departments as may be specifically
designated by the governor.
(8) "Family policy council" or "council" means the superintendent
of public instruction, the secretary of social and health services, the
secretary of health, the commissioner of the employment security
department, ((and)) the director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development, and the director of the department of early
learning or their designees, one legislator from each caucus of the
senate and house of representatives, and one representative of the
governor.
(9) "Fiduciary interest" means (a) the right to compensation from
a health, educational, social service, or justice system organization
that receives public funds, or (b) budgetary or policy-making authority
for an organization listed in (a) of this subsection. A person who
acts solely in an advisory capacity and receives no compensation from
a health, educational, social service, or justice system organization,
and who has no budgetary or policy-making authority is deemed to have
no fiduciary interest in the organization.
(10) "Outcome" or "outcome based" means defined and measurable
outcomes used to evaluate progress in reducing the rate of at-risk
children and youth through reducing risk factors and increasing
protective factors.
(11) "Matching funds" means an amount no less than twenty-five
percent of the amount budgeted for a network. The network's matching
funds may be in-kind goods and services. Funding sources allowable for
match include appropriate federal or local levy funds, private
charitable funding, and other charitable giving. Basic education funds
shall not be used as a match. State general funds shall not be used as
a match for violence reduction and drug enforcement account funds
created under RCW 69.50.520.
(12) "Policy development" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
43.70.010.
(13) "Protective factors" means those factors determined by the
department of health to be empirically associated with behaviors that
contribute to socially acceptable and healthy nonviolent behaviors.
Protective factors include promulgation, identification, and acceptance
of community norms regarding appropriate behaviors in the area of
delinquency, early sexual activity, alcohol and substance abuse,
educational opportunities, employment opportunities, and absence of
crime.
(14) "Risk factors" means those factors determined by the
department of health to be empirically associated with at-risk
behaviors that contribute to violence.

--- END ---