BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.215 and 1997 c 429 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in subsection (7) of this section,
a county shall adopt, in consultation with its cities, county-wide
planning policies to establish a review and evaluation program. This
program shall be in addition to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110,
36.70A.130, and 36.70A.210. In developing and implementing the review
and evaluation program required by this section, the county and its
cities shall consider information from other appropriate jurisdictions
and sources. The purpose of the review and evaluation program shall be
to:
(a) Determine whether a county and its cities are achieving urban
densities within urban growth areas by comparing growth and development
assumptions, targets, and objectives contained in the county-wide
planning policies and the county and city comprehensive plans with
actual growth and development that has occurred in the county and its
cities; and
(b) Identify reasonable measures, other than adjusting urban growth
areas, that will be taken to comply with the requirements of this
chapter.
(2) The review and evaluation program shall:
(a) Encompass land uses and activities both within and outside of
urban growth areas and provide for annual collection of data on urban
and rural land uses, development, critical areas, and capital
facilities to the extent necessary to determine the quantity and type
of land suitable for development, both for residential and employment-based activities;
(b) Provide for evaluation of the data collected under (a) of this
subsection every five years as provided in subsection (3) of this
section. The first evaluation shall be completed not later than
September 1, 2002. The county and its cities may establish in the
county-wide planning policies indicators, benchmarks, and other similar
criteria to use in conducting the evaluation;
(c) Provide for methods to resolve disputes among jurisdictions
relating to the county-wide planning policies required by this section
and procedures to resolve inconsistencies in collection and analysis of
data; and
(d) Provide for the amendment of the county-wide policies and
county and city comprehensive plans as needed to remedy an
inconsistency identified through the evaluation required by this
section, or to bring these policies into compliance with the
requirements of this chapter.
(3) At a minimum, the evaluation component of the program required
by subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) Determine whether there is sufficient suitable land to
accommodate the county-wide population projection established for the
county pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 and the subsequent population
allocations within the county and between the county and its cities and
the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110;
(b) Determine the actual density of housing that has been
constructed and the actual amount of land developed for commercial and
industrial uses within the urban growth area since the adoption of a
comprehensive plan under this chapter or since the last periodic
evaluation as required by subsection (1) of this section; and
(c) Based on the actual density of development as determined under
(b) of this subsection, review commercial, industrial, and housing
needs by type and density range to determine the amount of land needed
for commercial, industrial, and housing for the remaining portion of
the twenty-year planning period used in the most recently adopted
comprehensive plan.
(4) If the evaluation required by subsection (3) of this section
demonstrates an inconsistency between what has occurred since the
adoption of the county-wide planning policies and the county and city
comprehensive plans and development regulations and what was envisioned
in those policies and plans and the planning goals and the requirements
of this chapter, as the inconsistency relates to the evaluation factors
specified in subsection (3) of this section, the county and its cities
shall adopt and implement measures that are reasonably likely to
increase consistency during the subsequent five-year period. If
necessary, a county, in consultation with its cities as required by RCW
36.70A.210, shall adopt amendments to county-wide planning policies to
increase consistency. The county and its cities shall annually monitor
the measures adopted under this subsection to determine their effect
and may revise or rescind them as appropriate.
(5)(a) ((Not later than July 1, 1998,)) The department, on or
before each December 31st, shall prepare a list of methods used by
counties and cities ((in carrying out the types of activities required
by)) to comply with the requirements of this section. The department,
on or before each March 1st, shall provide this information and
appropriate technical assistance to counties and cities required to or
choosing to comply with the provisions of this section.
(b) ((By December 31, 2007,)) The department, on or before December
31, 2008, and every five years thereafter, shall submit to the
appropriate committees of the ((legislature a report)) house of
representatives and the senate an assessment evaluation analyzing the
effectiveness of the ((activities described in)) requirements of this
section in achieving the goals envisioned by the county-wide planning
policies and the comprehensive plans and development regulations of the
counties and cities. The assessment evaluations required of the
department under this subsection (5)(b) must include recommendations
for legislation the department deems necessary to increase the
effectiveness of the requirements of this section in achieving the
goals envisioned by county-wide planning policies and the comprehensive
plans and development regulations of counties and cities.
(6) From funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose,
the department shall provide grants to counties, cities, and regional
planning organizations required under subsection (7) of this section to
conduct the review and perform the evaluation required by this section.
(7) The provisions of this section shall apply to counties, and the
cities within those counties, that were greater than one hundred fifty
thousand in population in 1995 as determined by office of financial
management population estimates and that are located west of the crest
of the Cascade mountain range. Any other county planning under RCW
36.70A.040 may carry out the review, evaluation, and amendment programs
and procedures as provided in this section.

--- END ---