BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
A performance-based compensation pilot project for staff in public
schools is established under this section for up to five school
districts.
(1) School districts may apply to participate in the pilot project
by submitting a proposal to the superintendent of public instruction,
signed by the school district board of directors and the exclusive
bargaining representatives for certificated instructional staff and
classified staff of the district, that contains the following:
(a) The goals and objectives of the project and how success will be
measured;
(b) A description of the process by which the district and the
exclusive bargaining representatives will complete a performance-based
compensation agreement;
(c) Commitment by all parties of time during the planning year for
the joint development of the agreement and development of the
performance evaluation, salary schedule, and professional development
components of the agreement;
(d) The extent to which learning improvement days will be used to
support the project;
(e) The extent to which supplemental contracts and resources for
additional time, additional responsibilities, or incentives will be
incorporated into and aligned with the project; and
(f) Other information that indicates a willingness, readiness, and
capacity by all parties to design and implement a high-quality
performance-based compensation pilot project.
(2) Applications shall be submitted to the superintendent of public
instruction by November 1, 2007. The superintendent may approve up to
five applications and shall provide notice of approvals no later than
January 31, 2008.
(3) Districts selected to participate in the pilot project, in
collaboration with their exclusive bargaining representatives, shall
develop the components of performance-based compensation agreements
during the remainder of the 2007-08 school year. At a minimum,
agreements must, as applicable:
(a) Describe how certificated instructional staff can achieve
career advancement and additional compensation, including how the
school district will provide career advancement options that allow
staff who provide direct instruction to retain primary roles in student
instruction;
(b) Restructure the traditional salary schedule from one based on
years of experience, educational degrees, and credits of continuing
education to a new salary schedule that bases a significant proportion
of any compensation increase on staff performance, measured using
schoolwide student achievement gains on the Washington assessment of
student learning and other objective student assessments, other
indicators of student achievement, and an objective performance
evaluation system;
(c) Provide for ongoing school and classroom-based professional
development activities that are designed to improve instructional
skills, aligned with the school improvement plan, based on identified
student learning needs and goals, and provided by trained mentor
teachers and coaches;
(d) Ensure that the compensation of any staff shall not decrease as
a result of implementing the agreement;
(e) Include components of performance-based compensation for
classified school staff; and
(f) Estimate the costs to implement the agreement.
(4) The objective performance evaluation system under this section
must include individual evaluations that are conducted by the building
principal or other district staff and other evaluations using multiple
criteria that are conducted by a jointly selected and trained
evaluation team using a standards-based evaluation instrument and
process.
(5) Performance-based compensation agreements shall be implemented
districtwide, but may include components that are unique to individual
schools within the district.
(6) Districts selected to participate in the pilot project must
submit their performance-based compensation agreements to the
superintendent of public instruction for approval by July 15, 2008.
The office shall review the agreements to ensure the components
required under this section are clearly detailed in the agreements and
that the agreements are in compliance with applicable state laws. The
office may approve only agreements that are legally binding on the
school district and the exclusive bargaining representatives beginning
with the 2008-09 school year.
(7) Beginning with the 2008-09 school year and ending with the
2012-13 school year, school districts with performance-based
compensation agreements approved under this section shall receive one
hundred fifteen dollars per full-time equivalent student, which shall
be used in combination with the amounts allocated under the statewide
salary allocation schedule and the omnibus appropriations act for staff
salaries to pay for the performance-based compensation agreements.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction may develop guidelines
for the operation of the performance-based compensation pilot projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall conduct an evaluation of the performance-based
compensation pilot projects established under section 1 of this act,
including an examination of:
(a) Student academic progress as measured by the Washington
assessment of student learning and other measures, compared to similar
students and schools in school districts not participating in the
projects;
(b) Quality of professional development activities conducted under
the projects;
(c) Impact on recruitment and retention of staff; and
(d) Teacher, principal, and parent satisfaction with the projects
and the results.
(2) School districts participating in the pilot projects shall
assist the institute with the evaluation, including but not limited to
distributing surveys, conducting interviews, and providing data.
(3) The institute shall report its findings to the legislature by
December 1, 2012.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2002 c 353 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter,
allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section.
(2)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be
less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and
(b) Except as authorized under a performance-based compensation
agreement approved under section 1 of this act, salaries for
certificated instructional staff with a masters degree shall not be
less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a masters
degree and zero years of service;
(3)(a) Except as authorized under a performance-based compensation
agreement approved under section 1 of this act, the actual average
salary paid to certificated instructional staff shall not exceed the
district's average certificated instructional staff salary used for the
state basic education allocations for that school year as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410.
(b) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional
staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
For purposes of this section, fringe benefits shall not include payment
for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer
contributions for old age survivors insurance, workers' compensation,
unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits under the Washington
state retirement system; or employer contributions for health benefits
in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.
(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary
and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic
education program.
(4) Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may
exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by
separate contract for additional time, additional responsibilities, or
incentives. Supplemental contracts under this subsection may be
incorporated into a performance-based compensation agreement approved
under section 1 of this act. Supplemental contracts shall not cause
the state to incur any present or future funding obligation.
Supplemental contracts shall be subject to the collective bargaining
provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240,
shall not exceed one year, and if not renewed shall not constitute
adverse change in accordance with RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380.
No district may enter into a supplemental contract under this
subsection for the provision of services which are a part of the basic
education program required by Article IX, section 3 of the state
Constitution.
(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply
with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.400.205 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) School district employees shall be provided an annual salary
cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
(a) The cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying the
rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base used in state funding formulas for teachers and
other school district employees. Beginning with the 2001-02 school
year, and for each subsequent school year, except for the 2003-04 and
2004-05 school years, each school district shall be provided a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to grant this cost-of-living increase.
(b) A school district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
compensation policies. No later than the end of the school year, each
school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) Any funded cost-of-living increase shall be included in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for school
employees in subsequent years. For teachers and other certificated
instructional staff, the rate of the annual cost-of-living increase
funded for certificated instructional staff shall be applied to the
base salary used with the statewide salary allocation schedule
established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary models used
to recognize school district personnel costs. For school districts
with a performance-based compensation agreement approved under section
1 of this act, the annual cost-of-living increase shall be applied only
to the base salary used with the statewide salary allocation schedule.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any school year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.59.935 and 1990 c 33 s 571 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to grant employers or
employees the right to reach agreements regarding salary or
compensation increases in excess of those authorized in accordance with
RCW 28A.150.410 and 28A.400.200, and, if applicable, a performance-based compensation agreement approved under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act expires September 1, 2013.

--- END ---