BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
USE STATE PURCHASING TO IMPROVE HEALTH CARE QUALITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The health care authority and the department
of social and health services shall, by September 1, 2007, develop a
five-year plan to change reimbursement within state purchased health
care programs to:
(1) Reward quality health outcomes rather than simply paying for
the receipt of particular services or procedures;
(2) Pay for care that reflects patient preference and is of proven
value;
(3) Require the use of evidence-based standards of care where
available;
(4) Tie provider rate increases to measurable improvements in
access to quality care;
(5) Direct enrollees to quality care systems;
(6) Better support primary care and provide a medical home to all
enrollees through reimbursement policies that create incentives for
providers to enter and remain in primary care practice and that address
disparities in payment between specialty procedures and primary care
services; and
(7) Pay for e-mail consultations, telemedicine, and telehealth
where doing so reduces the overall cost of care.
The plan shall identify any existing barriers and opportunities to
support implementation, including needed changes to state or federal
law and be submitted to the governor and the legislature upon
completion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The health care authority shall implement a pilot for shared
decision making for common medical decisions. The authority shall
select or create not more than two patient decision aids in
collaboration with the state agency medical directors group. Criteria
for selection of the patient decision aids shall include common medical
decisions which have no more than five treatment options, and where
there exists sound evidence about medical effectiveness.
(2) The authority shall seek up to two contracts with provider
organizations or health carriers to pilot the use of patient decision
aids. These contracts shall require an evaluation of the resulting
outcomes of utilizing the patient decision aids. The authority shall
provide a report to the governor and the legislature on the pilot
results by June 30, 2009.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Patient decision aid" means: (i) High quality, up-to-date
information about the condition, including risk and benefits of
available options and, if appropriate, a discussion of the limits of
scientific knowledge about outcomes; (ii) values clarification to help
patients sort out their values and preferences; and (iii) guidance or
coaching in deliberation, designed to improve the patient's involvement
in the decision process; and
(b) "Shared decision making" means a process in which the physician
discloses to the patient the risks and benefits associated with all
treatment alternatives, including no treatment, that a reasonable
person in the patient's situation could consider significant in
selecting a particular path of medical care. The patient then shares
with the physician all relevant personal information that might make
one treatment or side effect more or less desirable than others.

PREVENTION AND MANAGEMENT OF CHRONIC ILLNESS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services, in collaboration
with the department of health, shall:
(a) Design and implement medical homes for its aged, blind, and
disabled clients in conjunction with chronic care management programs
to improve health outcomes, access, and cost-effectiveness. Programs
must be evidence based, facilitating the use of information technology
to improve quality of care, must acknowledge the role of primary care
providers and include financial and other supports to enable these
providers to effectively carry out their role in chronic care
management, and must improve coordination of primary, acute, and long-term care for those clients with multiple chronic conditions. The
department shall consider expansion of existing medical home and
chronic care management programs and build on the Washington state
collaborative initiative. The department shall use best practices in
identifying those clients best served under a chronic care management
model using predictive modeling through claims or other health risk
information; and
(b) Evaluate the effectiveness of the intensive chronic care
management pilot project that manages the needs of long-term care
clients with multiple chronic conditions and the department's chronic
care management program to determine if the models support medical home
infrastructure and improved client outcomes.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Medical home" means a site of care that provides comprehensive
preventive and coordinated care centered on the patient needs and
assures high quality, accessible, and efficient care.
(b) "Chronic care management" means the department's program that
provides care management and coordination activities for medical
assistance clients determined to be at risk for high medical costs.
"Chronic care management" provides education and training and/or
coordination that assist program participants in improving self-management skills to improve health outcomes and reduce medical costs
by educating clients to better utilize services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall conduct a program of training and
technical assistance regarding care of people with chronic conditions
for providers of primary care. The program shall emphasize evidence-based high quality preventive and chronic disease care. The department
may designate one or more chronic conditions to be the subject of the
program.
(2) The training and technical assistance program shall include the
following elements:
(a) Clinical information systems and sharing and organization of
patient data;
(b) Decision support to promote evidence-based care;
(c) Clinical delivery system design;
(d) Support for patients managing their own conditions; and
(e) Identification and use of community resources that are
available in the community for patients and their families.
(3) In selecting primary care providers to participate in the
program, the department shall consider the number and type of patients
with chronic conditions the provider serves, and the provider's
participation in the medicaid and medicare programs.

COST AND QUALITY INFORMATION FOR CONSUMERS AND PROVIDERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state quality forum is established within the
authority. The forum shall collaborate with the Puget Sound health
alliance and other local organizations and shall:
(1) Collect and disseminate research regarding health care quality,
evidence-based medicine, and patient safety to promote best practices,
in collaboration with the technology assessment program and the
prescription drug program;
(2) Coordinate the collection of health care quality data among
state health care purchasing agencies;
(3) Adopt a set of measures to evaluate and compare health care
cost and quality and provider performance;
(4) Identify and disseminate information regarding variations in
clinical practice patterns across the state; and
(5) Produce an annual quality report detailing clinical practice
patterns identified to purchasers, providers, insurers, and policy
makers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrator shall design and pilot a consumer-centric
health information infrastructure and the first health record banks
that will facilitate the secure exchange of health information when and
where needed and shall:
(a) Complete the plan of initial implementation, including but not
limited to determining the technical infrastructure for health record
banks and the account locator service, setting criteria and standards
for health record banks, and determining oversight of health record
banks;
(b) Implement the first health record banks in pilot sites as
funding allows;
(c) Involve health care consumers in meaningful ways in the design,
implementation, oversight, and dissemination of information on the
health record bank system; and
(d) Promote adoption of electronic medical records and health
information exchange through continuation of the Washington health
information collaborative, and by working with private payors and other
organizations in restructuring reimbursement to provide incentives for
providers to adopt electronic medical records in their practices.
(2) The administrator may establish an advisory board, a
stakeholder committee, and subcommittees to assist in carrying out the
duties under this section. The administrator may reappoint health
information infrastructure advisory board members to assure continuity
and shall appoint any additional representatives that may be required
for their expertise and experience.
(a) The administrator shall appoint the chair of the advisory
board, chairs, and cochairs of the stakeholder committee, if formed;
(b) Meetings of the board, stakeholder committee, and any advisory
group are subject to chapter 42.30 RCW, the open public meetings act,
including RCW 42.30.110(1)(l), which authorizes an executive session
during a regular or special meeting to consider proprietary or
confidential nonpublished information; and
(c) The members of the board, stakeholder committee, and any
advisory group:
(i) Shall agree to the terms and conditions imposed by the
administrator regarding conflicts of interest as a condition of
appointment;
(ii) Are immune from civil liability for any official acts
performed in good faith as members of the board, stakeholder committee,
or any advisory group.
(3) Members of the board may be compensated in accordance with a
personal services contract to be executed after appointment and before
commencement of activities related to the work of the board. Members
of the stakeholder committee shall not receive compensation but shall
be reimbursed under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The administrator may work with public and private entities to
develop and encourage the use of personal health records which are
portable, interoperable, secure, and respectful of patients' privacy.
(5) The administrator may enter into contracts to issue,
distribute, and administer grants that are necessary or proper to carry
out this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.70.110 and 2006 c 72 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining
a license. After June 30, 1995, municipal corporations providing
emergency medical care and transportation services pursuant to chapter
18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees, provided that such other
emergency services shall only be charged for their pro rata share of
the cost of licensure and inspection, if appropriate. The secretary
may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the secretary, the fees
would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when
the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.
(2) Except as provided in ((RCW 18.79.202, until June 30, 2013, and
except for the cost of regulating retired volunteer medical workers in
accordance with RCW 18.130.360)) subsection (3) of this section, fees
charged shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the
department for the licensure of the activity or class of activities and
may include costs of necessary inspection.
(3) License fees shall include amounts in addition to the cost of
licensure activities in the following circumstances:
(a) For registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, support of a central nursing resource center
as provided in RCW 18.79.202, until June 30, 2013;
(b) For all health care providers licensed under RCW 18.130.040,
the cost of regulatory activities for retired volunteer medical worker
licensees as provided in RCW 18.130.360; and
(c) For physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, physician
assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, osteopathic physicians
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, osteopathic physicians' assistants
licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, naturopaths licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW, podiatrists licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, chiropractors
licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW, registered nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW,
optometrists licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW, mental health counselors
licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, massage therapists licensed under
chapter 18.108 RCW, clinical social workers licensed under chapter
18.225 RCW, and acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW, the
license fees shall include the cost to the department of contracting
with the University of Washington to allow online access to selected
vital clinical resources negotiated and maintained for the exclusive
use of the licensed health professionals included in this subsection by
the University of Washington health sciences library.
(4) Department of health advisory committees may review fees
established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the
appropriateness of the level of such fees.

REDUCING UNNECESSARY EMERGENCY ROOM USE
Sec. 8 RCW 41.05.220 and 1998 c 245 s 38 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) State general funds appropriated to the department of health
for the purposes of funding community health centers to provide primary
health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity
health care services shall be transferred to the state health care
authority. Any related administrative funds expended by the department
of health for this purpose shall also be transferred to the health care
authority. The health care authority shall exclusively expend these
funds through contracts with community health centers to provide
primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and
maternity health care services. The administrator of the health care
authority shall establish requirements necessary to assure community
health centers provide quality health care services that are
appropriate and effective and are delivered in a cost-efficient manner.
The administrator shall further assure that community health centers
have appropriate referral arrangements for acute care and medical
specialty services not provided by the community health centers.
(2) The authority, in consultation with the department of health,
shall work with community and migrant health clinics and other
providers of care to underserved populations, to ensure that the number
of people of color and underserved people receiving access to managed
care is expanded in proportion to need, based upon demographic data.
(3) In contracting with community health centers to provide primary
health and dental services, migrant health services, and maternity
health care services under subsection (1) of this section the authority
shall give priority to those community health centers working with
local hospitals to successfully reduce unnecessary emergency room use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The Washington state health care authority
and the department of social and health services shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2007, on recent trends in unnecessary
emergency room use by enrollees in state purchased health care
programs, and then partner with community organizations and local
health care providers to design a demonstration pilot to reduce such
unnecessary visits.

REDUCE HEALTH CARE ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 By September 1, 2007, the insurance
commissioner shall provide a report to the governor and the legislature
that identifies the key contributors to health care administrative
costs and evaluates opportunities to reduce them, including suggested
changes to state law. The report shall be completed in collaboration
with health care providers, carriers, state health purchasing agencies,
the Washington healthcare forum, and other interested parties.

COVERAGE FOR DEPENDENTS TO AGE TWENTY-FIVE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any plan offered to public employees under this chapter must
offer each public employee the option of covering any unmarried
dependent of the employee under the age of twenty-five regardless of
whether the dependent is enrolled in an educational institution.
(2) Any employee choosing under subsection (1) of this section to
cover a dependent who is: (a) Age twenty through twenty-three and not
a registered student at an accredited secondary school, college,
university, vocational school, or school of nursing; or (b) age twenty-four, shall be required to pay the full cost of such coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Any disability insurance contract that provides coverage for a
subscriber's dependent must offer the option of covering any unmarried
dependent under the age of twenty-five regardless of whether the
dependent is enrolled in an educational institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any group disability insurance contract or blanket disability
insurance contract that provides coverage for a participating member's
dependent must offer each participating member the option of covering
any unmarried dependent under the age of twenty-five regardless of
whether the dependent is enrolled in an educational institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any individual health care service plan contract that provides
coverage for a subscriber's dependent must offer the option of covering
any unmarried dependent under the age of twenty-five regardless of
whether the dependent is enrolled in an educational institution.
(2) Any group health care service plan contract that provides
coverage for a participating member's dependent must offer each
participating member the option of covering any unmarried dependent
under the age of twenty-five regardless of whether the dependent is
enrolled in an educational institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any individual health maintenance agreement that provides
coverage for a subscriber's dependent must offer the option of covering
any unmarried dependent under the age of twenty-five regardless of
whether the dependent is enrolled in an educational institution.
(2) Any group health maintenance agreement that provides coverage
for a participating member's dependent must offer each participating
member the option of covering any unmarried dependent under the age of
twenty-five regardless of whether the dependent is enrolled in an
educational institution.

SUSTAINABILITY AND ACCESS TO PUBLIC PROGRAMS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The department of social and health
services shall seek necessary federal waivers and state plan amendments
to expand coverage and leverage federal and state resources for the
state's basic health program, for the medical assistance program, as
codified at Title XIX of the federal social security act, and the
state's children's health insurance program, as codified at Title XXI
of the federal social security act. The department shall propose
options including but not limited to:
(a) Offering alternative benefit designs to promote high quality
care, improve health outcomes, and encourage cost-effective treatment
options, including benefit designs that discourage the use of emergency
rooms for nonemergent care, and redirect savings to finance additional
coverage; and
(b) Promoting private health insurance plans and premium subsidies
to purchase employer-sponsored insurance wherever possible, including
federal approval to expand the department's employer-sponsored
insurance premium assistance program to enrollees covered through the
state's children's health insurance program.
(2) The department of social and health services, in collaboration
with the Washington state health care authority, shall ensure that
enrollees are not simultaneously enrolled in the state's basic health
program and the medical assistance program or the state's children's
health insurance program to ensure coverage for the maximum number of
people within available funds. Priority enrollment in the basic health
program shall be given to those who disenrolled from the program in
order to enroll in medicaid, and subsequently became ineligible for
medicaid coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
When the department of social and health services determines that
it is cost-effective to enroll a person eligible for medical assistance
under chapter 74.09 RCW in an employer-sponsored health plan, a carrier
shall permit the enrollment of the person in the health plan for which
he or she is otherwise eligible without regard to any open enrollment
period restrictions.

REINSURANCE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) The office of financial management, in
collaboration with the office of the insurance commissioner, shall
design a state-supported reinsurance program to address the impact of
high cost enrollees in the individual and small group health insurance
markets, and submit implementing legislation and supporting
information, including financing options, to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2007. In designing the program, the office
of financial management shall:
(a) Estimate the quantitative impact on premium savings, premium
stability over time and across groups of enrollees, individual and
employer take-up, number of uninsured, and government costs associated
with a government-funded stop-loss insurance program, including
distinguishing between one-time premium savings and savings in
subsequent years;
(b) Identify all relevant design issues and alternative options for
each issue. Where quantitative impacts cannot be estimated, the office
of financial management shall assess qualitative impacts of design
issues and their options, including potential disincentives for
reducing premiums, achieving premium stability, sustaining/increasing
take-up, decreasing the number of uninsured, and managing government's
stop-loss insurance costs;
(c) Identify market and regulatory changes needed to maximize the
chance of the program achieving its policy goals, including how the
program will relate to other coverage programs and markets;
(d) Address conditions under which overall expenditures could
increase as a result of a government-funded stop-loss program and
options to mitigate those conditions, such as passive versus aggressive
use of disease and care management programs by insurers;
(e) Evaluate, and quantify where possible, the behavioral responses
of insurers to the program including impacts on insurer premiums and
practices for settling legal disputes around large claims; and
(f) Provide alternatives for transitioning from the status quo and,
where applicable, alternatives for phasing in some design elements,
such as threshold or corridor levels, to balance government costs and
premium savings.
(2) Within funds specifically appropriated for this purpose, the
office of financial management may contract with actuaries and other
experts as necessary to meet the requirements of this section.

THE WASHINGTON STATE HEALTH INSURANCE POOL
Sec. 19 RCW 48.41.110 and 2001 c 196 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The pool shall offer one or more care management plans of
coverage. Such plans may, but are not required to, include point of
service features that permit participants to receive in-network
benefits or out-of-network benefits subject to differential cost
shares. ((Covered persons enrolled in the pool on January 1, 2001, may
continue coverage under the pool plan in which they are enrolled on
that date. However,)) The pool may incorporate managed care features
and requirements to participate in chronic care and disease management
and evidence-based protocols into ((such)) existing plans.
(2) The administrator shall prepare a brochure outlining the
benefits and exclusions of ((the)) pool ((policy)) policies in plain
language. After approval by the board, such brochure shall be made
reasonably available to participants or potential participants.
(3) The health insurance ((policy)) policies issued by the pool
shall pay only reasonable amounts for medically necessary eligible
health care services rendered or furnished for the diagnosis or
treatment of covered illnesses, injuries, and conditions ((which are
not otherwise limited or excluded)). Eligible expenses are the
reasonable amounts for the health care services and items for which
benefits are extended under ((the)) a pool policy. ((Such benefits
shall at minimum include, but not be limited to, the following services
or related items))
(4) The pool shall offer at least one policy which at a minimum
includes, but is not limited to, the following services or related
items:
(a) Hospital services, including charges for the most common
semiprivate room, for the most common private room if semiprivate rooms
do not exist in the health care facility, or for the private room if
medically necessary, but limited to a total of one hundred eighty
inpatient days in a calendar year, and limited to thirty days inpatient
care for mental and nervous conditions, or alcohol, drug, or chemical
dependency or abuse per calendar year;
(b) Professional services including surgery for the treatment of
injuries, illnesses, or conditions, other than dental, which are
rendered by a health care provider, or at the direction of a health
care provider, by a staff of registered or licensed practical nurses,
or other health care providers;
(c) The first twenty outpatient professional visits for the
diagnosis or treatment of one or more mental or nervous conditions or
alcohol, drug, or chemical dependency or abuse rendered during a
calendar year by one or more physicians, psychologists, or community
mental health professionals, or, at the direction of a physician, by
other qualified licensed health care practitioners, in the case of
mental or nervous conditions, and rendered by a state certified
chemical dependency program approved under chapter 70.96A RCW, in the
case of alcohol, drug, or chemical dependency or abuse;
(d) Drugs and contraceptive devices requiring a prescription;
(e) Services of a skilled nursing facility, excluding custodial and
convalescent care, for not more than one hundred days in a calendar
year as prescribed by a physician;
(f) Services of a home health agency;
(g) Chemotherapy, radioisotope, radiation, and nuclear medicine
therapy;
(h) Oxygen;
(i) Anesthesia services;
(j) Prostheses, other than dental;
(k) Durable medical equipment which has no personal use in the
absence of the condition for which prescribed;
(l) Diagnostic x-rays and laboratory tests;
(m) Oral surgery limited to the following: Fractures of facial
bones; excisions of mandibular joints, lesions of the mouth, lip, or
tongue, tumors, or cysts excluding treatment for temporomandibular
joints; incision of accessory sinuses, mouth salivary glands or ducts;
dislocations of the jaw; plastic reconstruction or repair of traumatic
injuries occurring while covered under the pool; and excision of
impacted wisdom teeth;
(n) Maternity care services;
(o) Services of a physical therapist and services of a speech
therapist;
(p) Hospice services;
(q) Professional ambulance service to the nearest health care
facility qualified to treat the illness or injury; and
(r) Other medical equipment, services, or supplies required by
physician's orders and medically necessary and consistent with the
diagnosis, treatment, and condition.
(((4))) (5) The pool shall offer at least one policy which closely
adheres to benefits available in the private, individual market.
(6) The board shall design and employ cost containment measures and
requirements such as, but not limited to, care coordination, provider
network limitations, preadmission certification, and concurrent
inpatient review which may make the pool more cost-effective.
(((5))) (7) The pool benefit policy may contain benefit
limitations, exceptions, and cost shares such as copayments,
coinsurance, and deductibles that are consistent with managed care
products, except that differential cost shares may be adopted by the
board for nonnetwork providers under point of service plans. The pool
benefit policy cost shares and limitations must be consistent with
those that are generally included in health plans approved by the
insurance commissioner; however, no limitation, exception, or reduction
may be used that would exclude coverage for any disease, illness, or
injury.
(((6))) (8) The pool may not reject an individual for health plan
coverage based upon preexisting conditions of the individual or deny,
exclude, or otherwise limit coverage for an individual's preexisting
health conditions; except that it shall impose a six-month benefit
waiting period for preexisting conditions for which medical advice was
given, for which a health care provider recommended or provided
treatment, or for which a prudent layperson would have sought advice or
treatment, within six months before the effective date of coverage.
The preexisting condition waiting period shall not apply to prenatal
care services. The pool may not avoid the requirements of this section
through the creation of a new rate classification or the modification
of an existing rate classification. Credit against the waiting period
shall be as provided in subsection (((7))) (9) of this section.
(((7))) (9)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
pool shall credit any preexisting condition waiting period in its plans
for a person who was enrolled at any time during the sixty-three day
period immediately preceding the date of application for the new pool
plan. For the person previously enrolled in a group health benefit
plan, the pool must credit the aggregate of all periods of preceding
coverage not separated by more than sixty-three days toward the waiting
period of the new health plan. For the person previously enrolled in
an individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic health
plan, the pool must credit the period of coverage the person was
continuously covered under the immediately preceding health plan toward
the waiting period of the new health plan. For the purposes of this
subsection, a preceding health plan includes an employer-provided self-funded health plan.
(b) The pool shall waive any preexisting condition waiting period
for a person who is an eligible individual as defined in section
2741(b) of the federal health insurance portability and accountability
act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. 300gg-41(b)).
(((8))) (10) If an application is made for the pool policy as a
result of rejection by a carrier, then the date of application to the
carrier, rather than to the pool, should govern for purposes of
determining preexisting condition credit.
(11) The pool shall contract with organizations that provide care
management that has been demonstrated to be effective and shall require
that enrollees who are eligible for care management services
participate in such programs on a continuous basis as a condition of
receiving pool coverage.

PREVENTION AND HEALTH PROMOTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The Washington state health care authority,
the department of social and health services, the department of labor
and industries, and the department of health shall, by September 1,
2007, develop a five-year plan to integrate disease and accident
prevention and health promotion into state health programs by:
(1) Structuring benefits and reimbursements to promote healthy
choices and disease and accident prevention;
(2) Requiring enrollees in state health programs to complete a
health assessment, and providing appropriate follow up;
(3) Reimbursing for cost-effective prevention activities;
(4) Developing prevention and health promotion contracting
standards for state programs that contract with health carriers; and
(5) Strengthening the state's employee wellness program in
partnership with the state's health and productivity committee.
The plan shall identify any existing barriers and opportunities to
support implementation, including needed changes to state or federal
law, and be submitted to the governor and the legislature upon
completion.

Sec. 21 RCW 41.05.065 and 2006 c 299 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall study all matters connected with the provision
of health care coverage, life insurance, liability insurance,
accidental death and dismemberment insurance, and disability income
insurance or any of, or a combination of, the enumerated types of
insurance for employees and their dependents on the best basis possible
with relation both to the welfare of the employees and to the state.
However, liability insurance shall not be made available to dependents.
(2) The board shall develop employee benefit plans that include
comprehensive health care benefits for all employees. In developing
these plans, the board shall consider the following elements:
(a) Methods of maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to
quality health care;
(b) Development of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment and ensure access to quality care, including but not
limited to prepaid delivery systems and prospective payment methods;
(c) Wellness incentives that focus on proven strategies, such as
smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol
misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and
motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition
education;
(d) Utilization review procedures including, but not limited to a
cost-efficient method for prior authorization of services, hospital
inpatient length of stay review, requirements for use of outpatient
surgeries and second opinions for surgeries, review of invoices or
claims submitted by service providers, and performance audit of
providers;
(e) Effective coordination of benefits;
(f) Minimum standards for insuring entities; and
(g) Minimum scope and content of public employee benefit plans to
be offered to enrollees participating in the employee health benefit
plans. To maintain the comprehensive nature of employee health care
benefits, employee eligibility criteria related to the number of hours
worked and the benefits provided to employees shall be substantially
equivalent to the state employees' health benefits plan and eligibility
criteria in effect on January 1, 1993. Nothing in this subsection
(2)(g) shall prohibit changes or increases in employee point-of-service
payments or employee premium payments for benefits or the
administration of a high deductible health plan in conjunction with a
health savings account.
(3) The board shall design benefits and determine the terms and
conditions of employee and retired employee participation and coverage,
including establishment of eligibility criteria. The same terms and
conditions of participation and coverage, including eligibility
criteria, shall apply to state employees and to school district
employees and educational service district employees.
(4) The board may authorize premium contributions for an employee
and the employee's dependents in a manner that encourages the use of
cost-efficient managed health care systems. During the 2005-2007
fiscal biennium, the board may only authorize premium contributions for
an employee and the employee's dependents that are the same, regardless
of an employee's status as represented or nonrepresented by a
collective bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of
2002. The board shall require participating school district and
educational service district employees to pay at least the same
employee premiums by plan and family size as state employees pay.
(5) The board shall develop a health savings account option for
employees that conform to section 223, Part VII of subchapter B of
chapter 1 of the internal revenue code of 1986. The board shall comply
with all applicable federal standards related to the establishment of
health savings accounts.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the board
shall develop a high deductible health plan to be offered in
conjunction with a health savings account developed under subsection
(5) of this section.
(7) Employees shall choose participation in one of the health care
benefit plans developed by the board and may be permitted to waive
coverage under terms and conditions established by the board.
(8) The board shall review plans proposed by insuring entities that
desire to offer property insurance and/or accident and casualty
insurance to state employees through payroll deduction. The board may
approve any such plan for payroll deduction by insuring entities
holding a valid certificate of authority in the state of Washington and
which the board determines to be in the best interests of employees and
the state. The board shall promulgate rules setting forth criteria by
which it shall evaluate the plans.
(9) Before January 1, 1998, the public employees' benefits board
shall make available one or more fully insured long-term care insurance
plans that comply with the requirements of chapter 48.84 RCW. Such
programs shall be made available to eligible employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees as well as eligible dependents
which, for the purpose of this section, includes the parents of the
employee or retiree and the parents of the spouse of the employee or
retiree. Employees of local governments and employees of political
subdivisions not otherwise enrolled in the public employees' benefits
board sponsored medical programs may enroll under terms and conditions
established by the administrator, if it does not jeopardize the
financial viability of the public employees' benefits board's long-term
care offering.
(a) Participation of eligible employees or retired employees and
retired school employees in any long-term care insurance plan made
available by the public employees' benefits board is voluntary and
shall not be subject to binding arbitration under chapter 41.56 RCW.
Participation is subject to reasonable underwriting guidelines and
eligibility rules established by the public employees' benefits board
and the health care authority.
(b) The employee, retired employee, and retired school employee are
solely responsible for the payment of the premium rates developed by
the health care authority. The health care authority is authorized to
charge a reasonable administrative fee in addition to the premium
charged by the long-term care insurer, which shall include the health
care authority's cost of administration, marketing, and consumer
education materials prepared by the health care authority and the
office of the insurance commissioner.
(c) To the extent administratively possible, the state shall
establish an automatic payroll or pension deduction system for the
payment of the long-term care insurance premiums.
(d) The public employees' benefits board and the health care
authority shall establish a technical advisory committee to provide
advice in the development of the benefit design and establishment of
underwriting guidelines and eligibility rules. The committee shall
also advise the board and authority on effective and cost-effective
ways to market and distribute the long-term care product. The
technical advisory committee shall be comprised, at a minimum, of
representatives of the office of the insurance commissioner, providers
of long-term care services, licensed insurance agents with expertise in
long-term care insurance, employees, retired employees, retired school
employees, and other interested parties determined to be appropriate by
the board.
(e) The health care authority shall offer employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees the option of purchasing long-term care insurance through licensed agents or brokers appointed by the
long-term care insurer. The authority, in consultation with the public
employees' benefits board, shall establish marketing procedures and may
consider all premium components as a part of the contract negotiations
with the long-term care insurer.
(f) In developing the long-term care insurance benefit designs, the
public employees' benefits board shall include an alternative plan of
care benefit, including adult day services, as approved by the office
of the insurance commissioner.
(g) The health care authority, with the cooperation of the office
of the insurance commissioner, shall develop a consumer education
program for the eligible employees, retired employees, and retired
school employees designed to provide education on the potential need
for long-term care, methods of financing long-term care, and the
availability of long-term care insurance products including the
products offered by the board.
(h) By December 1998, the health care authority, in consultation
with the public employees' benefits board, shall submit a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature, including an analysis of the
marketing and distribution of the long-term care insurance provided
under this section.
(10) The health savings account option for employees under
subsection (5) of this section shall be offered to employees during the
open enrollment period in 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Subheadings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 Sections 11 through 15 of this act take
effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---