BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.38.015 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 601 are each
amended to read as follows:
It is declared to be the public policy of this state:
(1) That health planning to promote, maintain, and assure the
health of all citizens in the state, to provide accessible health
services, health manpower, health facilities, and other resources while
controlling excessive increases in costs, and to recognize prevention
as a high priority in health programs, is essential to the health,
safety, and welfare of the people of the state. Health planning should
be responsive to changing health and social needs and conditions.
Involvement in health planning from both consumers and providers
throughout the state should be encouraged;
(2) That the development of health services and resources,
including the construction, modernization, and conversion of health
facilities, should be accomplished in a planned, orderly fashion,
consistent with identified priorities and without unnecessary
duplication or fragmentation. The certificate of need program is a
component of a health planning regulatory process that:
(a) Balances consideration of:
(i) Access to quality care at a reasonable cost for all residents;
(ii) Optimal use of existing health care resources;
(iii) Fostering expenditure control; and
(iv) Avoidance of unnecessary duplication of health care facilities
and services;
(b) Supports improved health care outcomes by:
(i) Basing decisions on the best available evidence and
information; and
(ii) Continuously monitoring compliance;
(c) Is accountable for maintaining the resources necessary for high
quality decisions that are timely and consistent;
(d) Utilizes detailed criteria, standards, and need methodologies,
both general and specific to particular facilities and services, that
are updated regularly and that are complementary to the statewide
health resources strategy; and
(e) Is conducted in a transparent and accountable manner;
(3) That the development and ongoing maintenance of adequate health
care information, statistics and projections of need for health
facilities and services ((is)) are essential to ((effective health
planning and resources development)) supporting the review and
monitoring of specified health care facilities and services regulated
by the certificate of need program;
(4) That the development of ((nonregulatory)) other approaches to
health care ((cost containment should be)) expenditure control are
considered, including the strengthening of ((price)) competition((; and
(5) That health planning should be concerned with public health and
health care financing, access, and quality, recognizing their close
interrelationship and emphasizing cost control of health services,
including cost-effectiveness and cost-benefit analysis)).

Sec. 2 RCW 70.38.025 and 2000 c 175 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
When used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall
have the meanings indicated.
(1) "Affected party" means an interested person who:
(a) Is located or resides in the applicant's health service area;
(b) Testified at a public hearing or submitted written information;
and
(c) Requested in writing to be informed of the department's
decision.
(2) "Board of health" means the state board of health created
pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW.
(((2))) (3) "Capital expenditure" is an expenditure, including a
force account expenditure (i.e., an expenditure for a construction
project undertaken by a nursing home facility as its own contractor)
which, under generally accepted accounting principles, is not properly
chargeable as an expense of operation or maintenance. Where a person
makes an acquisition under lease or comparable arrangement, or through
donation, which would have required review if the acquisition had been
made by purchase, such expenditure shall be deemed a capital
expenditure. Capital expenditures include donations of equipment or
facilities to a nursing home facility which if acquired directly by
such facility would be subject to certificate of need review under the
provisions of this chapter and transfer of equipment or facilities for
less than fair market value if a transfer of the equipment or
facilities at fair market value would be subject to such review. The
cost of any studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings,
specifications, and other activities essential to the acquisition,
improvement, expansion, or replacement of any plant or equipment with
respect to which such expenditure is made shall be included in
determining the amount of the expenditure.
(((3))) (4) "Continuing care retirement community" means an entity
which provides shelter and services under continuing care contracts
with its members and which sponsors or includes a health care facility
or a health service. A "continuing care contract" means a contract to
provide a person, for the duration of that person's life or for a term
in excess of one year, shelter along with nursing, medical, health-related, or personal care services, which is conditioned upon the
transfer of property, the payment of an entrance fee to the provider of
such services, or the payment of periodic charges for the care and
services involved. A continuing care contract is not excluded from
this definition because the contract is mutually terminable or because
shelter and services are not provided at the same location.
(((4))) (5) "Department" means the department of health.
(((5))) (6) "Expenditure minimum" means, for the purposes of the
certificate of need program, one million dollars adjusted by the
department by rule to reflect changes in the United States department
of commerce composite construction cost index; or a lesser amount
required by federal law and established by the department by rule.
(((6))) (7) "Health care facility" means hospices, hospice care
centers, hospitals, psychiatric hospitals, nursing homes, kidney
disease treatment centers, ambulatory surgical facilities, and home
health agencies, and includes such facilities when owned and operated
by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the state and such
other facilities as required by federal law and implementing
regulations, but does not include any health facility or institution
conducted by and for those who rely exclusively upon treatment by
prayer or spiritual means in accordance with the creed or tenets of any
well-recognized church or religious denomination, or any health
facility or institution operated for the exclusive care of members of
a convent as defined in RCW 84.36.800 or rectory, monastery, or other
institution operated for the care of members of the clergy. In
addition, the term does not include any nonprofit hospital: (a) Which
is operated exclusively to provide health care services for children;
(b) which does not charge fees for such services; and (c) if not
contrary to federal law as necessary to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.
(((7))) (8) "Health maintenance organization" means a public or
private organization, organized under the laws of the state, which:
(a) Is a qualified health maintenance organization under Title
XIII, section 1310(d) of the Public Health Services Act; or
(b)(i) Provides or otherwise makes available to enrolled
participants health care services, including at least the following
basic health care services: Usual physician services, hospitalization,
laboratory, X-ray, emergency, and preventive services, and out-of-area
coverage; (ii) is compensated (except for copayments) for the provision
of the basic health care services listed in (b)(i) to enrolled
participants by a payment which is paid on a periodic basis without
regard to the date the health care services are provided and which is
fixed without regard to the frequency, extent, or kind of health
service actually provided; and (iii) provides physicians' services
primarily (A) directly through physicians who are either employees or
partners of such organization, or (B) through arrangements with
individual physicians or one or more groups of physicians (organized on
a group practice or individual practice basis).
(((8))) (9) "Health services" means clinically related (i.e.,
preventive, diagnostic, curative, rehabilitative, or palliative)
services and includes alcoholism, drug abuse, and mental health
services and as defined in federal law.
(((9))) (10) "Health service area" means a geographic region
appropriate for effective health planning which includes a broad range
of health services.
(((10))) (11) "Person" means an individual, a trust or estate, a
partnership, a corporation (including associations, joint stock
companies, and insurance companies), the state, or a political
subdivision or instrumentality of the state, including a municipal
corporation or a hospital district.
(((11))) (12) "Provider" generally means a health care professional
or an organization, institution, or other entity providing health care
but the precise definition for this term shall be established by rule
of the department, consistent with federal law.
(((12))) (13) "Public health" means the level of well-being of the
general population; those actions in a community necessary to preserve,
protect, and promote the health of the people for which government is
responsible; and the governmental system developed to guarantee the
preservation of the health of the people.
(((13))) (14) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.
(((14))) (15) "Tertiary health service" means a specialized service
that meets complicated medical needs of people and requires sufficient
patient volume to optimize provider effectiveness, quality of service,
and improved outcomes of care.
(((15))) (16) "Hospital" means any health care institution which is
required to qualify for a license under RCW 70.41.020(((2))) (4); or as
a psychiatric hospital under chapter 71.12 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.38.095 and 2005 c 274 s 332 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Public accessibility to records shall be accorded by health
systems agencies pursuant to Public Law 93-641 and chapter 42.56 RCW.
A health systems agency shall be considered a "public agency" for the
sole purpose of complying with the public records act, chapter 42.56
RCW.))
The department shall adopt policies for informing affected parties
and the interested public of certificate of need activities through
postal mailings, electronic mailings, or web site notification, as
appropriate to the activity. The policy shall, at a minimum, include
means for providing reasonable notification for distributing
information related to: Applications; the status of the department's
activities related to applications under consideration; determinations
of nonreviewability; findings and decisions of the department; the
status of appeals of findings and decisions of the department; and the
monitoring status of approved projects. The policy shall include a
searchable repository of recent and historical certificate of need
decisions.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.38.115 and 1996 c 178 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Certificates of need shall be issued, denied, suspended, or
revoked by the designee of the secretary in accord with the provisions
of this chapter and rules of the department ((which)) that develop and
publish review criteria and standards and establish review procedures
((and criteria for the certificate of need program)).
(2) Criteria for the review of certificate of need applications,
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section for health
maintenance organizations, shall include but not be limited to
consideration of the following:
(a) The need that the population served or to be served by such
services has for such services based on current utilization data,
evidence related to appropriate utilization, and utilization trends;
(b) The availability of less costly or more effective alternative
methods of providing such services;
(c) The financial feasibility and the probable impact of the
proposal on the cost of and charges for providing health services in
the community to be served, including the impact on the current health
system infrastructure and ability of existing providers to serve the
underinsured and uninsured;
(d) In the case of health services to be provided((,)):
(i) The availability of alternative uses of project resources for
the provision of other health services((,));
(ii) The extent to which such proposed services will be accessible
to all residents of the area to be served((,)); and
(iii) ((the need for and the availability in the community of
services and facilities for osteopathic physicians and surgeons and
allopathic physicians and their patients.)) The ((department shall
consider the application in terms of its)) impact on existing and
proposed institutional and other educational training programs for
((doctors of osteopathic medicine and surgery and medicine)) health
care providers at the student, internship, and residency training
levels;
(e) In the case of a construction project, the costs and methods of
the proposed construction, including the cost and methods of energy
provision, and the probable impact of the ((construction)) project
((reviewed)) (i) on the cost of providing ((health)) services by the
((person proposing such construction project)) applicant and (ii) on
the cost ((and charges to the public)) of providing ((health)) services
by other ((persons)) entities;
(f) The special needs and circumstances of ((osteopathic hospitals,
nonallopathic services and)) children's hospitals;
(g) Improvements or innovations in the financing and delivery of
health services ((which)) that foster cost containment ((and serve to
promote quality assurance and)), improved health outcomes, cost-effectiveness, and promote quality;
(h) ((In the case of)) For proposed health services ((proposed to
be provided)), a comparison of the efficiency and appropriateness of
the use of similar existing services and facilities ((similar to those
proposed));
(i) ((In the case of)) For existing services or facilities, the
quality of care provided by such services or facilities in the past;
(j) In the case of hospitals ((certificate of need applications)),
whether the ((hospital)) applicant meets or exceeds the regional
average level of charity care, as determined by the secretary((; and)),
and whether the applicant has adopted policies in excess of the charity
care and reporting requirement of RCW 70.170.060;
(k) ((In the case of)) For nursing home applications:
(i) The availability of other nursing home beds in the planning
area to be served; and
(ii) The availability of other services in the community to be
served. Data used to determine the availability of other services will
include but not be limited to data provided by the department of social
and health services;
(l) For certificate of need regulated services other than
hospitals, whether the applicant will provide charity care consistent
with a minimal community standard developed by the department with
provider participation for each regulated service;
(m) The availability of appropriate health care providers to
deliver the proposed service; and
(n) Whether the applicant agrees to provide services to medicaid
and medicare enrollees and agrees not to discriminate against medicaid
and medicare enrollees based upon their coverage.
(3) A certificate of need application of a health maintenance
organization or a health care facility which is controlled, directly or
indirectly, by a health maintenance organization, shall be approved by
the department if the department finds:
(a) Approval of such application is required to meet the needs of
the members of the health maintenance organization and of the new
members which such organization can reasonably be expected to enroll;
and
(b) The health maintenance organization is unable to provide,
through services or facilities which can reasonably be expected to be
available to the organization, its health services in a reasonable and
cost-effective manner which is consistent with the basic method of
operation of the organization and which makes such services available
on a long-term basis through physicians and other health professionals
associated with it.
A health care facility, or any part thereof, with respect to which
a certificate of need was issued under this subsection may not be sold
or leased and a controlling interest in such facility or in a lease of
such facility may not be acquired unless the department issues a
certificate of need approving the sale, acquisition, or lease.
(4) ((Until the final expiration of the state health plan as
provided under RCW 70.38.919, the decision of the department on a
certificate of need application shall be consistent with the state
health plan in effect, except in emergency circumstances which pose a
threat to the public health.)) The department ((in making its final
decision)) may issue a conditional certificate of need if it finds that
the project is justified only under specific circumstances. The
conditions shall directly relate to the project being reviewed. The
conditions may be ((released)) eliminated if it can be substantiated
that the conditions are no longer valid and the ((release)) elimination
of such conditions would be consistent with the purposes of this
chapter.
(5) Criteria adopted for review in accordance with subsection (2)
of this section may vary according to the purpose for which the
particular review is being conducted or the type of health service
reviewed.
(6) The department shall specify information to be required for
certificate of need applications. Within fifteen days of receipt of
the application, the department shall request additional information
considered necessary to the application or start the review process.
Applicants may decline to submit requested information through written
notice to the department, in which case review starts on the date of
receipt of the notice. Applications may be denied or limited because
of failure to submit required and necessary information.
(7) Concurrent review is for the purpose of comparative analysis
and evaluation of competing or similar projects in order to determine
which of the projects may best meet identified needs. Categories of
projects subject to concurrent review include at least new health care
facilities, new services, and expansion of existing health care
facilities. The department shall specify time periods for the
submission of applications for certificates of need subject to
concurrent review, which shall not exceed ninety days. Review of
concurrent applications shall start fifteen days after the conclusion
of the time period for submission of applications subject to concurrent
review. Concurrent review periods shall be limited to one hundred
fifty days, except as provided for in rules adopted by the department
authorizing and limiting amendment during the course of the review, or
for an unresolved pivotal issue declared by the department.
(8) Review periods for certificate of need applications other than
those subject to concurrent review shall be limited to ninety days.
Review periods may be extended up to thirty days if needed by a review
agency, and for unresolved pivotal issues the department may extend up
to an additional thirty days. A review may be extended in any case if
the applicant agrees to the extension.
(9) The department or its designee, shall conduct a public hearing
on a certificate of need application if requested unless the review is
expedited or subject to emergency review. The department by rule shall
specify the period of time within which a public hearing must be
requested and requirements related to public notice of the hearing,
procedures, recordkeeping and related matters.
(10)(a) Any applicant ((denied a certificate of need or whose
certificate of need has been suspended or revoked)) or affected party
that disagrees with an action of or a failure to act by the department
with respect to a project regulated by this chapter, including the
denial or suspension or revocation of a certificate of need, has the
right to an adjudicative proceeding. The proceeding is governed by
chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act.
(b) Any health care facility or health maintenance organization
that: (i) Provides services similar to the services provided by the
applicant and under review pursuant to this subsection; (ii) is located
within the applicant's health service area; and (iii) testified or
submitted evidence at a public hearing held pursuant to subsection (9)
of this section, shall be provided an opportunity to present oral or
written testimony and argument in a proceeding under this subsection:
PROVIDED, That the health care facility or health maintenance
organization had, in writing, requested to be informed of the
department's decisions.
(c) If the department desires to settle with the applicant prior to
the conclusion of the adjudicative proceeding, the department shall so
inform the health care facility or health maintenance organization and
afford them an opportunity to comment, in advance, on the proposed
settlement.
(11) An amended certificate of need shall be required for the
following modifications of an approved project:
(a) A new service requiring review under this chapter;
(b) An expansion of a service subject to review beyond that
originally approved;
(c) An increase in bed capacity;
(d) A significant reduction in the scope of a nursing home project
without a commensurate reduction in the cost of the nursing home
project, or a cost increase (as represented in bids on a nursing home
construction project or final cost estimates acceptable to the person
to whom the certificate of need was issued) if the total of such
increases exceeds twelve percent or fifty thousand dollars, whichever
is greater, over the maximum capital expenditure approved. The review
of reductions or cost increases shall be restricted to the continued
conformance of the nursing home project with the review criteria
pertaining to financial feasibility and cost containment.
(12) An application for a certificate of need for a nursing home
capital expenditure which is determined by the department to be
required to eliminate or prevent imminent safety hazards or correct
violations of applicable licensure and accreditation standards shall be
approved.
(13)(a) Replacement of existing nursing home beds in the same
planning area by an existing licensee who has operated the beds for at
least one year shall not require a certificate of need under this
chapter. The licensee shall give written notice of its intent to
replace the existing nursing home beds to the department and shall
provide the department with information as may be required pursuant to
rule. Replacement of the beds by a party other than the licensee is
subject to certificate of need review under this chapter, except as
otherwise permitted by subsection (14) of this section.
(b) When an entire nursing home ceases operation, the licensee or
any other party who has secured an interest in the beds may reserve his
or her interest in the beds for eight years or until a certificate of
need to replace them is issued, whichever occurs first. However, the
nursing home, licensee, or any other party who has secured an interest
in the beds must give notice of its intent to retain the beds to the
department of health no later than thirty days after the effective date
of the facility's closure. Certificate of need review shall be
required for any party who has reserved the nursing home beds except
that the need criteria shall be deemed met when the applicant is the
licensee who had operated the beds for at least one year, who has
operated the beds for at least one year immediately preceding the
reservation of the beds, and who is replacing the beds in the same
planning area.
(14) In the event that a licensee, who has provided the department
with notice of his or her intent to replace nursing home beds under
subsection (13)(a) of this section, engages in unprofessional conduct
or becomes unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety by
reason of mental or physical condition, pursuant to chapter 18.130 RCW,
or dies, the building owner shall be permitted to complete the nursing
home bed replacement project, provided the building owner has secured
an interest in the beds.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.38.125 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 606 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A certificate of need shall be valid for two years. One six-month extension may be made if it can be substantiated that substantial
and continuing progress toward commencement of the project has been
made as defined by regulations to be adopted pursuant to this chapter.
(2) A project for which a certificate of need has been issued shall
be commenced during the validity period for the certificate of need.
(3) The department shall monitor the approved projects to assure
conformance with certificates of need that have been issued. Rules and
regulations adopted shall specify when changes in the project require
reevaluation of the project. The department may require applicants to
submit periodic progress reports on approved projects or other
information as may be necessary to effectuate its monitoring
responsibilities.
(4) The secretary, in the case of a new health facility, shall not
issue any license unless and until a prior certificate of need shall
have been issued by the department for the offering or development of
such new health facility.
(((5) Any person who engages in any undertaking which requires
certificate of need review without first having received from the
department either a certificate of need or an exception granted in
accordance with this chapter shall be liable to the state in an amount
not to exceed one hundred dollars a day for each day of such
unauthorized offering or development. Such amounts of money shall be
recoverable in an action brought by the attorney general on behalf of
the state in the superior court of any county in which the unauthorized
undertaking occurred. Any amounts of money so recovered by the
attorney general shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(6) The department may bring any action to enjoin a violation or
the threatened violation of the provisions of this chapter or any rules
and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, or may bring any
legal proceeding authorized by law, including but not limited to the
special proceedings authorized in Title 7 RCW, in the superior court in
the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur, or in
the superior court of Thurston county.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon completion of a project, the department shall continue to
monitor the operation of the project and the provision of the approved
service for five years to assure that the project complies with the
terms and conditions of the certificate, including the population
served, medicare beneficiaries and medical assistance program clients
served, levels of charity care provided, utilization and volume
standards applicable to tertiary services, special conditions and
representations associated with the approval of the project, and other
items relevant to the project.
(2) The department shall adopt rules, with the participation of
providers, to establish the responsibilities of certificate recipients
to assist the department in regular monitoring of completed projects,
and penalties for failure to assist.
(3) Other agencies having data relevant to the department's
postcompletion monitoring activities shall cooperate with the
department in sharing such information.
(4) The department shall establish a reasonable fee for
postcompletion monitoring activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any case in which the department finds that there has been
a failure or refusal to comply with the requirements of this chapter,
the standards or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, or the terms
and conditions of an approved certificate of need, the department is
authorized to suspend, revoke, or modify a certificate of need for an
approved project or impose other appropriate penalties, including
fines, not to exceed ten thousand dollars per violation, and moratoria
on future certificate of need applications for a specified period of
time, not to exceed two years. The department shall establish
procedures for the notification to the recipient of a certificate of
need of an adverse action against a certificate of need and to provide
the right to an adjudicative proceeding. Upon the issuance of an
adverse action for a violation of this section, the department shall
notify any agency that may have issued a license for the project that
an action has been taken and the nature of the violation. If the
licensing agency determines that the underlying facts constitute a
violation of any licensing provisions, the licensing agency may take
appropriate disciplinary action within its authority.
(2) Any person who engages in any undertaking which requires
certificate of need review without first having received from the
department either a certificate of need or an exception granted in
accordance with this chapter is liable to the state in an amount not to
exceed one hundred dollars a day for each day of such unauthorized
offering or development. Such amounts of money are recoverable in an
action brought by the attorney general on behalf of the state in the
superior court of any county in which the unauthorized undertaking
occurred. Any amounts of money so recovered by the attorney general
shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(3) The department may bring any action to enjoin a violation or
the threatened violation of the provisions of this chapter or any rules
adopted pursuant to this chapter, or may bring any legal proceeding
authorized by law, including but not limited to the special proceedings
authorized in Title 7 RCW, in the superior court in the county in which
such violation occurs or is about to occur, or in the superior court of
Thurston county.
(4) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this act
are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation
of this act is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or
commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.38.135 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 607 are each
amended to read as follows:
The secretary shall have authority to:
(1) Provide when needed temporary or intermittent services of
experts or consultants or organizations thereof, by contract, when such
services are to be performed on a part time or fee-for-service basis;
(2) Make or cause to be made such on-site surveys of health care or
medical facilities as may be necessary for the administration of the
certificate of need program, including any monitoring activities
conducted pursuant to this chapter;
(3) Upon review of recommendations, if any, from the board of
health:
(a) Promulgate rules under which health care facilities providers
doing business within the state shall submit to the department such
data related to health and health care as the department finds
necessary to the performance of its functions under this chapter;
(b) Promulgate rules pertaining to the maintenance and operation of
medical facilities which receive federal assistance under the
provisions of Title XVI;
(c) Promulgate rules in implementation of the provisions of this
chapter, including the establishment of procedures for public hearings
for predecisions and post-decisions on applications for certificate of
need;
(d) Promulgate rules providing circumstances and procedures of
expedited certificate of need review if there has not been a
significant change in existing health facilities of the same type or in
the need for such health facilities and services;
(4) Grant allocated state funds to qualified entities, as defined
by the department, to fund not more than seventy-five percent of the
costs of regional planning activities, excluding costs related to
review of applications for certificates of need, provided for in this
chapter or approved by the department; and
(5) Contract with and provide reasonable reimbursement for
qualified entities to assist in determinations of certificates of need.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The criteria in RCW 70.38.115 apply to any
applications for a certificate of need submitted after the effective
date of this act.

--- END ---