BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A strategic health planning process that is
responsive to changing health and social needs and conditions is
essential to the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the
state. The strategic health planning process must be concerned with
the performance of the health system, encompassing health care
financing, quality, and the availability of information and services
for all residents. The strategic health planning process must ensure
the involvement of both consumers and health care providers in the
health planning process. The outcomes of the strategic health planning
process must be clearly articulated and available for public use and
review.
Such strategic health planning, when informed by relevant data
about the state's health system, shall guide the state in establishing
objectives and strategies to:
(1) Promote, maintain, and assure the health of all citizens in the
state;
(2) Provide accessible health services through the maintenance of
an adequate supply of health facilities and an adequate workforce;
(3) Apply specific quality criteria and population health
indicators;
(4) Recognize prevention as a high priority in health programs;
(5) Address periodic priority issues including disaster planning,
public health threats, and public safety dilemmas;
(6) Coordinate efforts among state agencies including those tasked
with facility, services, and professional provider licensing; state and
federal reimbursement; health service utilization data systems; and
other functions relevant to health planning;
(7) Recognize the close interrelationship of health planning
concerns and emphasize health care expenditure control, including cost-effectiveness and cost-benefit analysis;
(8) Integrate criteria for evidence-based medicine; and
(9) Regularly evaluate the impact of capacity management on health
service expenditures, access, quality, and innovation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the Washington health resource strategy
commission.
(2) "Health care provider" means an individual who holds a license
issued by a disciplining authority identified in RCW 18.130.040 and who
practices his or her profession in a health care facility or provides
a health service.
(3) "Health facility" or "facility" means hospices licensed under
chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, rural
health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric
hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers licensed under
chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers,
ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical facilities, drug and
alcohol treatment facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A RCW, and
home health agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and includes
such facilities if owned and operated by a political subdivision,
including a public hospital district, or instrumentality of the state
and such other facilities as required by federal law and implementing
regulations.
(3) "Health service" or "service" means that service, including
primary care service, offered or provided by health care facilities and
health care providers relating to the prevention, cure, or treatment of
illness, injury, or disease.
(4) "Health service area" means a geographic region appropriate for
effective health planning which includes a broad range of health
services.
(5) "Office" means the office of strategic health resource
coordination.
(6) "Strategy" means the statewide health resources strategy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The office of strategic health resource
coordination is created in the office of the governor. The office
shall serve as a coordinating body for public and private efforts to
improve quality in health care, promote cost-effectiveness in health
care, and plan health facility and health service availability. In
addition, the office shall facilitate access to health care data
collected by public and private organizations as needed to conduct its
planning responsibilities.
(2) The office shall:
(a) Assist the commission with its strategic health planning
responsibilities and the preparation of the strategy;
(b) Develop a computerized system for accessing, analyzing, and
disseminating data relevant to strategic health planning
responsibilities. The office may contract with an organization to
create the computerized system capable of meeting the needs of the
office;
(c) Maintain access to deidentified data collected and stored by
any public and private organizations as necessary to support the
planning responsibilities of the commission, including state-purchased
health care program data, hospital discharge data, and private efforts
to collect utilization and claims-related data. The office is
authorized to enter into any data sharing agreements and contractual
arrangements necessary to obtain data or to distribute data. Among the
sources of deidentified data that the office may access are any
databases established pursuant to the recommendations of the health
information infrastructure advisory board established by chapter 261,
laws of 2005. The office may store limited data sets as necessary to
support its activities. Unless specifically authorized, the office
shall not collect data directly from the records of health care
providers and health care facilities, but shall make use of databases
that have already collected such information;
(d) Conduct research and analysis or arrange for research and
analysis projects to be conducted by public or private organizations to
further the purposes of the commission;
(e) Provide administrative and technical support to the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The health resource strategy commission
is created consisting of nineteen members appointed by the governor.
The commission shall be comprised of members from geographically
diverse regions of the state and shall include:
(a) Two health economists or health planners;
(b) Three representatives of nongovernment health care purchasers;
(c) One representative of the department of health;
(d) One representative of the department of social and health
services;
(e) One representative of the health care authority;
(f) One representative of the office of the insurance commissioner;
(g) Two representatives of acute care facilities;
(h) One representative of long-term care facilities;
(i) One representative of community-based long-term care providers;
(j) One representative of health care providers;
(k) One representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe; and
(l) Four representatives of health care consumers.
(2) Members of the initial commission may be appointed to staggered
terms of one to four years, and thereafter all terms of appointment are
for four years. No member may serve more than two consecutive full
terms. Each member shall hold office until a successor is appointed.
In appointing members, the governor shall make reasonable efforts to
select individuals with experience with health planning or health
economics. Members of the commission shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall be reimbursed for their travel
expenses while on official business in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060. The commission shall elect a chair from its members to
serve for a term of one year or until a successor is elected. Meetings
of the commission shall be at the call of the chair.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The commission shall develop a statewide
health resources strategy. The strategy shall establish statewide
health planning policies and goals related to the availability of
health care facilities and services, quality of care, and cost of care.
The strategy shall identify needs according to geographic regions
suitable for comprehensive health planning as designated by the
commission.
(2) The development of the strategy shall consider the following
general goals and principles:
(a) That the structural limitations of health care financing limit
the effect of free market competition and raise the need for carefully
tailored government planning and regulation to control costs,
utilization, and distribution of health care services and facilities;
(b) That excess capacity of health services and facilities place
considerable economic burden on the public who pay for the construction
and operation of these facilities as patients, health insurance
purchasers, carriers, and taxpayers; and
(c) That the development and ongoing maintenance of current and
accurate health care information and statistics related to cost and
quality of health care, as well as projections of need for health
facilities and services, are essential to effective strategic health
planning.
(3) The strategy shall include:
(a) A health system assessment and objectives component that:
(i) Describes state and regional population demographics, health
status indicators, and trends in health status and health care needs;
and
(ii) Identifies key policy objectives for the state health system
related to access to care, health outcomes, quality, and cost-effectiveness;
(b) A health care facilities and services plan that shall assess
the demand for health care facilities and services to inform state
health planning efforts and direct certificate of need determinations,
for those facilities and services subject to certificate of need as
provided in chapter 70.38 RCW. The plan shall include:
(i) An inventory of each geographic region's existing health care
facilities and services;
(ii) Projections of need for each category of health care facility
and service, including those subject to certificate of need;
(iii) Policies to guide the addition of new or expanded health care
facilities and services to promote the use of quality, evidence-based,
cost-effective health care delivery options, including any
recommendations for criteria, standards, and methods relevant to the
certificate of need review process; and
(iv) An assessment of the availability of health care providers,
public health resources, transportation infrastructure, and other
considerations necessary to support the needed health care facilities
and services in each region;
(c) A health care data resource plan that identifies data elements
necessary to properly conduct planning activities and to review
certificate of need applications, including data related to inpatient
and outpatient utilization and outcomes information, and financial and
utilization information related to charity care, quality, and cost.
The plan shall inventory existing data resources, both public and
private, that store and disclose information relevant to the health
planning process, including information necessary to conduct
certificate of need activities pursuant to chapter 70.38 RCW. The plan
shall identify any deficiencies in the inventory of existing data
resources and the data necessary to conduct comprehensive health
planning activities. The plan may recommend that the office be
authorized to access existing data sources and conduct appropriate
analyses of such data or that other agencies expand their data
collection activities as statutory authority permits. The plan may
identify any computing infrastructure deficiencies that impede the
proper storage, transmission, and analysis of health planning data.
The plan shall provide recommendations for increasing the availability
of data related to health planning to provide greater community
involvement in the health planning process and consistency in data used
for certificate of need applications and determinations;
(d) An assessment of emerging trends in health care delivery and
technology as they relate to access to health care facilities and
services, quality of care, and costs of care. The assessment shall
recommend any changes to the scope of health care facilities and
services covered by the certificate of need program that may be
warranted by these emerging trends. In addition, the assessment may
recommend any changes to criteria used by the department to review
certificate of need applications, as necessary;
(e) A rural health resource plan to assess the availability of
health resources in rural areas of the state, assess the unmet needs of
these communities, and evaluate how federal and state reimbursement
policies can be modified, if necessary, to more efficiently and
effectively meet the health care needs of rural communities. The plan
shall consider the unique health care needs of rural communities, the
adequacy of the rural health workforce, and transportation needs for
accessing appropriate care.
(4) The commission shall submit the final strategy to the governor
by January 1, 2010. Every two years the commission shall submit a
strategy. The health care facilities and services plan as it pertains
to a distinct geographic planning region may be updated by individual
categories on a rotating, biannual schedule.
(5) The commission shall hold at least one public hearing and allow
opportunity to submit written comments prior to the issuance of the
initial strategy or an updated strategy. A public hearing shall be
held prior to issuing a draft of an updated health care facilities and
services plan, and another public hearing shall be held before final
adoption of an updated health care facilities and services plan. Any
hearing related to updating a health care facilities and services plan
for a specific planning region shall be held in that region with
sufficient notice to the public and an opportunity to comment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The commission shall submit the strategy to
the department of health to direct its activities related to the
certificate of need review program under chapter 70.38 RCW. As the
health care facilities and services plan is updated for any specific
geographic planning region, the commission shall submit that plan to
the department of health to direct its activities related to the
certificate of need review program under chapter 70.38 RCW. The
commission shall not issue determinations of the merits of specific
project proposals submitted by applicants for certificates of need.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The office may respond to requests for
data and other information from its computerized system for special
studies and analysis consistent with requirements for confidentiality
of patient, provider, and facility-specific records. The office may
require requestors to pay any or all of the reasonable costs associated
with such requests that might be approved.
(2) Data elements related to the identification of individual
patient's, provider's, and facility's care outcomes are confidential,
are exempt from RCW 42.56.030 through 42.56.570 and 42.17.350 through
42.17.450, and are not subject to discovery by subpoena or admissible
as evidence.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.38.015 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 601 are each
amended to read as follows:
It is declared to be the public policy of this state:
(1) That strategic health planning ((to)) efforts must be supported
by appropriately tailored regulatory activities that can effectuate the
goals and principles of the statewide health resources strategy
developed pursuant to chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 of this
act). The implementation of the strategy can promote, maintain, and
assure the health of all citizens in the state, ((to)) provide
accessible health services, health manpower, health facilities, and
other resources while controlling ((excessive)) increases in costs, and
((to)) recognize prevention as a high priority in health programs((, is
essential to the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the
state. Health planning should be responsive to changing health and
social needs and conditions)). Involvement in health planning from
both consumers and providers throughout the state should be encouraged;
(2) ((That the development of health services and resources,
including the construction, modernization, and conversion of health
facilities, should be accomplished in a planned, orderly fashion,
consistent with identified priorities and without unnecessary
duplication or fragmentation)) That the certificate of need program is
a component of a health planning regulatory process that is consistent
with the statewide health resources strategy and public policy goals
that are clearly articulated and regularly updated;
(3) That the development and maintenance of adequate health care
information, statistics and projections of need for health facilities
and services is essential to effective health planning and resources
development;
(4) That the development of nonregulatory approaches to health care
cost containment should be considered, including the strengthening of
price competition; and
(5) That health planning should be concerned with public health and
health care financing, access, and quality, recognizing their close
interrelationship and emphasizing cost control of health services,
including cost-effectiveness and cost-benefit analysis.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.38.025 and 2000 c 175 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
When used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall
have the meanings indicated.
(1) "Board of health" means the state board of health created
pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW.
(2) "Capital expenditure" is an expenditure, including a force
account expenditure (i.e., an expenditure for a construction project
undertaken by a nursing home facility as its own contractor) which,
under generally accepted accounting principles, is not properly
chargeable as an expense of operation or maintenance. Where a person
makes an acquisition under lease or comparable arrangement, or through
donation, which would have required review if the acquisition had been
made by purchase, such expenditure shall be deemed a capital
expenditure. Capital expenditures include donations of equipment or
facilities to a nursing home facility which if acquired directly by
such facility would be subject to certificate of need review under the
provisions of this chapter and transfer of equipment or facilities for
less than fair market value if a transfer of the equipment or
facilities at fair market value would be subject to such review. The
cost of any studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings,
specifications, and other activities essential to the acquisition,
improvement, expansion, or replacement of any plant or equipment with
respect to which such expenditure is made shall be included in
determining the amount of the expenditure.
(3) "Continuing care retirement community" means an entity which
provides shelter and services under continuing care contracts with its
members and which sponsors or includes a health care facility or a
health service. A "continuing care contract" means a contract to
provide a person, for the duration of that person's life or for a term
in excess of one year, shelter along with nursing, medical, health-related, or personal care services, which is conditioned upon the
transfer of property, the payment of an entrance fee to the provider of
such services, or the payment of periodic charges for the care and
services involved. A continuing care contract is not excluded from
this definition because the contract is mutually terminable or because
shelter and services are not provided at the same location.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(5) "Expenditure minimum" means, for the purposes of the
certificate of need program, one million dollars adjusted by the
department by rule to reflect changes in the United States department
of commerce composite construction cost index; or a lesser amount
required by federal law and established by the department by rule.
(6) "Health care facility" means hospices, hospice care centers,
hospitals, psychiatric hospitals, nursing homes, kidney disease
treatment centers, ambulatory surgical facilities, and home health
agencies, and includes such facilities when owned and operated by a
political subdivision or instrumentality of the state and such other
facilities as required by federal law and implementing regulations, but
does not include any health facility or institution conducted by and
for those who rely exclusively upon treatment by prayer or spiritual
means in accordance with the creed or tenets of any well-recognized
church or religious denomination, or any health facility or institution
operated for the exclusive care of members of a convent as defined in
RCW 84.36.800 or rectory, monastery, or other institution operated for
the care of members of the clergy. In addition, the term does not
include any nonprofit hospital: (a) Which is operated exclusively to
provide health care services for children; (b) which does not charge
fees for such services; and (c) if not contrary to federal law as
necessary to the receipt of federal funds by the state.
(7) "Health maintenance organization" means a public or private
organization, organized under the laws of the state, which:
(a) Is a qualified health maintenance organization under Title
XIII, section 1310(d) of the Public Health Services Act; or
(b)(i) Provides or otherwise makes available to enrolled
participants health care services, including at least the following
basic health care services: Usual physician services, hospitalization,
laboratory, X-ray, emergency, and preventive services, and out-of-area
coverage; (ii) is compensated (except for copayments) for the provision
of the basic health care services listed in (b)(i) to enrolled
participants by a payment which is paid on a periodic basis without
regard to the date the health care services are provided and which is
fixed without regard to the frequency, extent, or kind of health
service actually provided; and (iii) provides physicians' services
primarily (A) directly through physicians who are either employees or
partners of such organization, or (B) through arrangements with
individual physicians or one or more groups of physicians (organized on
a group practice or individual practice basis).
(8) "Health services" means clinically related (i.e., preventive,
diagnostic, curative, rehabilitative, or palliative) services and
includes alcoholism, drug abuse, and mental health services and as
defined in federal law.
(9) "Health service area" means a geographic region appropriate for
effective health planning which includes a broad range of health
services.
(10) "Person" means an individual, a trust or estate, a
partnership, a corporation (including associations, joint stock
companies, and insurance companies), the state, or a political
subdivision or instrumentality of the state, including a municipal
corporation or a hospital district.
(11) "Provider" generally means a health care professional or an
organization, institution, or other entity providing health care but
the precise definition for this term shall be established by rule of
the department, consistent with federal law.
(12) "Public health" means the level of well-being of the general
population; those actions in a community necessary to preserve,
protect, and promote the health of the people for which government is
responsible; and the governmental system developed to guarantee the
preservation of the health of the people.
(13) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(14) "Statewide health resource strategy" or "strategy" means the
statewide health resource strategy developed by the Washington health
resource strategy commission pursuant to chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1
through 7 of this act).
(15) "Tertiary health service" means a specialized service that
meets complicated medical needs of people and requires sufficient
patient volume to optimize provider effectiveness, quality of service,
and improved outcomes of care.
(((15))) (16) "Hospital" means any health care institution which is
required to qualify for a license under RCW 70.41.020(((2))); or as a
psychiatric hospital under chapter 71.12 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 70.38.115 and 1996 c 178 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Certificates of need shall be issued, denied, suspended, or
revoked by the designee of the secretary in accord with the provisions
of this chapter and rules of the department which establish review
procedures and criteria for the certificate of need program.
(2) Criteria for the review of certificate of need applications,
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section for health
maintenance organizations, shall include but not be limited to
consideration of the following:
(a) The need that the population served or to be served by such
services has for such services;
(b) The availability of less costly or more effective alternative
methods of providing such services;
(c) The financial feasibility and the probable impact of the
proposal on the cost of and charges for providing health services in
the community to be served;
(d) In the case of health services to be provided,
(i) the availability of alternative uses of project resources for
the provision of other health services,
(ii) the extent to which such proposed services will be accessible
to all residents of the area to be served, and
(iii) the need for and the availability in the community of
services and facilities for osteopathic physicians and surgeons and
allopathic physicians and their patients. The department shall consider
the application in terms of its impact on existing and proposed
institutional training programs for doctors of osteopathic medicine and
surgery and medicine at the student, internship, and residency training
levels;
(e) In the case of a construction project, the costs and methods of
the proposed construction, including the cost and methods of energy
provision, and the probable impact of the construction project reviewed
(i) on the cost of providing health services by the person proposing
such construction project and (ii) on the cost and charges to the
public of providing health services by other persons;
(f) The special needs and circumstances of osteopathic hospitals,
nonallopathic services and children's hospitals;
(g) Improvements or innovations in the financing and delivery of
health services which foster cost containment and serve to promote
quality assurance and cost-effectiveness;
(h) In the case of health services proposed to be provided, the
efficiency and appropriateness of the use of existing services and
facilities similar to those proposed;
(i) In the case of existing services or facilities, the quality of
care provided by such services or facilities in the past;
(j) In the case of hospital certificate of need applications,
whether the hospital meets or exceeds the regional average level of
charity care, as determined by the secretary; and
(k) In the case of nursing home applications:
(i) The availability of other nursing home beds in the planning
area to be served; and
(ii) The availability of other services in the community to be
served. Data used to determine the availability of other services will
include but not be limited to data provided by the department of social
and health services.
(3) A certificate of need application of a health maintenance
organization or a health care facility which is controlled, directly or
indirectly, by a health maintenance organization, shall be approved by
the department if the department finds:
(a) Approval of such application is required to meet the needs of
the members of the health maintenance organization and of the new
members which such organization can reasonably be expected to enroll;
and
(b) The health maintenance organization is unable to provide,
through services or facilities which can reasonably be expected to be
available to the organization, its health services in a reasonable and
cost-effective manner which is consistent with the basic method of
operation of the organization and which makes such services available
on a long-term basis through physicians and other health professionals
associated with it.
A health care facility, or any part thereof, with respect to which
a certificate of need was issued under this subsection may not be sold
or leased and a controlling interest in such facility or in a lease of
such facility may not be acquired unless the department issues a
certificate of need approving the sale, acquisition, or lease.
(4) ((Until the final expiration of the state health plan as
provided under RCW 70.38.919, the decision of the department on a
certificate of need application shall be consistent with the state
health plan in effect, except in emergency circumstances which pose a
threat to the public health.)) Effective January 1, 2010, for those
facilities and services covered by the certificate of need programs,
certificate of need determinations must be consistent with the
statewide health resources strategy developed pursuant to section 5 of
this act, including any health planning policies and goals identified
in the statewide health resources strategy in effect at the time of
application. The department may waive specific terms of the strategy
if the applicant demonstrates that consistency with those terms will
create an undue burden on the population that a particular project
would serve, or in emergency circumstances which pose a threat to
public health.
(5) The department in making its final decision may issue a
conditional certificate of need if it finds that the project is
justified only under specific circumstances. The conditions shall
directly relate to the project being reviewed. The conditions may be
released if it can be substantiated that the conditions are no longer
valid and the release of such conditions would be consistent with the
purposes of this chapter.
(((5))) (6) Criteria adopted for review in accordance with
subsection (2) of this section may vary according to the purpose for
which the particular review is being conducted or the type of health
service reviewed.
(((6))) (7) The department shall specify information to be required
for certificate of need applications. Within fifteen days of receipt
of the application, the department shall request additional information
considered necessary to the application or start the review process.
Applicants may decline to submit requested information through written
notice to the department, in which case review starts on the date of
receipt of the notice. Applications may be denied or limited because
of failure to submit required and necessary information.
(((7))) (8) Concurrent review is for the purpose of comparative
analysis and evaluation of competing or similar projects in order to
determine which of the projects may best meet identified needs.
Categories of projects subject to concurrent review include at least
new health care facilities, new services, and expansion of existing
health care facilities. The department shall specify time periods for
the submission of applications for certificates of need subject to
concurrent review, which shall not exceed ninety days. Review of
concurrent applications shall start fifteen days after the conclusion
of the time period for submission of applications subject to concurrent
review. Concurrent review periods shall be limited to one hundred
fifty days, except as provided for in rules adopted by the department
authorizing and limiting amendment during the course of the review, or
for an unresolved pivotal issue declared by the department.
(((8))) (9) Review periods for certificate of need applications
other than those subject to concurrent review shall be limited to
ninety days. Review periods may be extended up to thirty days if
needed by a review agency, and for unresolved pivotal issues the
department may extend up to an additional thirty days. A review may be
extended in any case if the applicant agrees to the extension.
(((9))) (10) The department or its designee, shall conduct a public
hearing on a certificate of need application if requested unless the
review is expedited or subject to emergency review. The department by
rule shall specify the period of time within which a public hearing
must be requested and requirements related to public notice of the
hearing, procedures, recordkeeping and related matters.
(((10))) (11)(a) Any applicant denied a certificate of need or
whose certificate of need has been suspended or revoked has the right
to an adjudicative proceeding. The proceeding is governed by chapter
34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act.
(b) Any health care facility or health maintenance organization
that: (i) Provides services similar to the services provided by the
applicant and under review pursuant to this subsection; (ii) is located
within the applicant's health service area; and (iii) testified or
submitted evidence at a public hearing held pursuant to subsection
(((9))) (10) of this section, shall be provided an opportunity to
present oral or written testimony and argument in a proceeding under
this subsection: PROVIDED, That the health care facility or health
maintenance organization had, in writing, requested to be informed of
the department's decisions.
(c) If the department desires to settle with the applicant prior to
the conclusion of the adjudicative proceeding, the department shall so
inform the health care facility or health maintenance organization and
afford them an opportunity to comment, in advance, on the proposed
settlement.
(((11))) (12) An amended certificate of need shall be required for
the following modifications of an approved project:
(a) A new service requiring review under this chapter;
(b) An expansion of a service subject to review beyond that
originally approved;
(c) An increase in bed capacity;
(d) A significant reduction in the scope of a nursing home project
without a commensurate reduction in the cost of the nursing home
project, or a cost increase (as represented in bids on a nursing home
construction project or final cost estimates acceptable to the person
to whom the certificate of need was issued) if the total of such
increases exceeds twelve percent or fifty thousand dollars, whichever
is greater, over the maximum capital expenditure approved. The review
of reductions or cost increases shall be restricted to the continued
conformance of the nursing home project with the review criteria
pertaining to financial feasibility and cost containment.
(((12))) (13) An application for a certificate of need for a
nursing home capital expenditure which is determined by the department
to be required to eliminate or prevent imminent safety hazards or
correct violations of applicable licensure and accreditation standards
shall be approved.
(((13))) (14)(a) Replacement of existing nursing home beds in the
same planning area by an existing licensee who has operated the beds
for at least one year shall not require a certificate of need under
this chapter. The licensee shall give written notice of its intent to
replace the existing nursing home beds to the department and shall
provide the department with information as may be required pursuant to
rule. Replacement of the beds by a party other than the licensee is
subject to certificate of need review under this chapter, except as
otherwise permitted by subsection (((14))) (15) of this section.
(b) When an entire nursing home ceases operation, the licensee or
any other party who has secured an interest in the beds may reserve his
or her interest in the beds for eight years or until a certificate of
need to replace them is issued, whichever occurs first. However, the
nursing home, licensee, or any other party who has secured an interest
in the beds must give notice of its intent to retain the beds to the
department of health no later than thirty days after the effective date
of the facility's closure. Certificate of need review shall be
required for any party who has reserved the nursing home beds except
that the need criteria shall be deemed met when the applicant is the
licensee who had operated the beds for at least one year, who has
operated the beds for at least one year immediately preceding the
reservation of the beds, and who is replacing the beds in the same
planning area.
(((14))) (15) In the event that a licensee, who has provided the
department with notice of his or her intent to replace nursing home
beds under subsection (((13))) (14)(a) of this section, engages in
unprofessional conduct or becomes unable to practice with reasonable
skill and safety by reason of mental or physical condition, pursuant to
chapter 18.130 RCW, or dies, the building owner shall be permitted to
complete the nursing home bed replacement project, provided the
building owner has secured an interest in the beds.

Sec. 11 RCW 70.38.135 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 607 are each
amended to read as follows:
The secretary shall have authority to:
(1) Provide when needed temporary or intermittent services of
experts or consultants or organizations thereof, by contract, when such
services are to be performed on a part time or fee-for-service basis;
(2) Make or cause to be made such on-site surveys of health care or
medical facilities as may be necessary for the administration of the
certificate of need program;
(3) Upon review of recommendations, if any, from the board of
health or the Washington health resource strategy commission:
(a) Promulgate rules under which health care facilities providers
doing business within the state shall submit to the department such
data related to health and health care as the department finds
necessary to the performance of its functions under this chapter;
(b) Promulgate rules pertaining to the maintenance and operation of
medical facilities which receive federal assistance under the
provisions of Title XVI;
(c) Promulgate rules in implementation of the provisions of this
chapter, including the establishment of procedures for public hearings
for predecisions and post-decisions on applications for certificate of
need;
(d) Promulgate rules providing circumstances and procedures of
expedited certificate of need review if there has not been a
significant change in existing health facilities of the same type or in
the need for such health facilities and services;
(4) Grant allocated state funds to qualified entities, as defined
by the department, to fund not more than seventy-five percent of the
costs of regional planning activities, excluding costs related to
review of applications for certificates of need, provided for in this
chapter or approved by the department; and
(5) Contract with and provide reasonable reimbursement for
qualified entities to assist in determinations of certificates of need.

Sec. 12 RCW 70.38.105 and 2004 c 261 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is authorized and directed to implement the
certificate of need program in this state pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter.
(2) There shall be a state certificate of need program which is
administered consistent with the requirements of federal law as
necessary to the receipt of federal funds by the state.
(3) No person shall engage in any undertaking which is subject to
certificate of need review under subsection (4) of this section without
first having received from the department either a certificate of need
or an exception granted in accordance with this chapter.
(4) The following shall be subject to certificate of need review
under this chapter:
(a) The construction, development, or other establishment of a new
health care facility;
(b) The sale, purchase, or lease of part or all of any existing
hospital as defined in RCW 70.38.025;
(c) Any capital expenditure for the construction, renovation, or
alteration of a nursing home which substantially changes the services
of the facility after January 1, 1981, provided that the substantial
changes in services are specified by the department in rule;
(d) Any capital expenditure for the construction, renovation, or
alteration of a nursing home which exceeds the expenditure minimum as
defined by RCW 70.38.025. However, a capital expenditure which is not
subject to certificate of need review under (a), (b), (c), or (e) of
this subsection and which is solely for any one or more of the
following is not subject to certificate of need review:
(i) Communications and parking facilities;
(ii) Mechanical, electrical, ventilation, heating, and air
conditioning systems;
(iii) Energy conservation systems;
(iv) Repairs to, or the correction of, deficiencies in existing
physical plant facilities which are necessary to maintain state
licensure, however, other additional repairs, remodeling, or
replacement projects that are not related to one or more deficiency
citations and are not necessary to maintain state licensure are not
exempt from certificate of need review except as otherwise permitted by
(d)(vi) of this subsection or RCW 70.38.115(((13))) (14);
(v) Acquisition of equipment, including data processing equipment,
which is not or will not be used in the direct provision of health
services;
(vi) Construction or renovation at an existing nursing home which
involves physical plant facilities, including administrative, dining
areas, kitchen, laundry, therapy areas, and support facilities, by an
existing licensee who has operated the beds for at least one year;
(vii) Acquisition of land; and
(viii) Refinancing of existing debt;
(e) A change in bed capacity of a health care facility which
increases the total number of licensed beds or redistributes beds among
acute care, nursing home care, and boarding home care if the bed
redistribution is to be effective for a period in excess of six months,
or a change in bed capacity of a rural health care facility licensed
under RCW 70.175.100 that increases the total number of nursing home
beds or redistributes beds from acute care or boarding home care to
nursing home care if the bed redistribution is to be effective for a
period in excess of six months. A health care facility certified as a
critical access hospital under 42 U.S.C. 1395i-4 may increase its total
number of licensed beds to the total number of beds permitted under 42
U.S.C. 1395i-4 for acute care and may redistribute beds permitted under
42 U.S.C. 1395i-4 among acute care and nursing home care without being
subject to certificate of need review. If there is a nursing home
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW within twenty-seven miles of the
critical access hospital, the critical access hospital is subject to
certificate of need review except for:
(i) Critical access hospitals which had designated beds to provide
nursing home care, in excess of five swing beds, prior to December 31,
2003; or
(ii) Up to five swing beds.
Critical access hospital beds not subject to certificate of need
review under this subsection (4)(e) will not be counted as either acute
care or nursing home care for certificate of need review purposes. If
a health care facility ceases to be certified as a critical access
hospital under 42 U.S.C. 1395i-4, the hospital may revert back to the
type and number of licensed hospital beds as it had when it requested
critical access hospital designation;
(f) Any new tertiary health services which are offered in or
through a health care facility or rural health care facility licensed
under RCW 70.175.100, and which were not offered on a regular basis by,
in, or through such health care facility or rural health care facility
within the twelve-month period prior to the time such services would be
offered;
(g) Any expenditure for the construction, renovation, or alteration
of a nursing home or change in nursing home services in excess of the
expenditure minimum made in preparation for any undertaking under
subsection (4) of this section and any arrangement or commitment made
for financing such undertaking. Expenditures of preparation shall
include expenditures for architectural designs, plans, working
drawings, and specifications. The department may issue certificates of
need permitting predevelopment expenditures, only, without authorizing
any subsequent undertaking with respect to which such predevelopment
expenditures are made; and
(h) Any increase in the number of dialysis stations in a kidney
disease center.
(5) The department is authorized to charge fees for the review of
certificate of need applications and requests for exemptions from
certificate of need review. The fees shall be sufficient to cover the
full cost of review and exemption, which may include the development of
standards, criteria, and policies.
(6) No person may divide a project in order to avoid review
requirements under any of the thresholds specified in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---