BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Chapter 311, Laws of 2006 established
the regional transportation commission to evaluate transportation
governance in the central Puget Sound area within the jurisdiction of
the Puget Sound regional council and develop options for a new regional
transportation governance proposal.
(2) The commission's report to the legislature found that:
(a) The Puget Sound region is experiencing a severe strain on its
transportation system;
(b) The strain on the Puget Sound region is manifested through
several important indicators, especially congestion. Continued
population and transportation demand growth in the region, combined
with a thirty-year history of underfunding transportation in the
region, has created a need and an opportunity to prevent a potential
regional transportation crisis;
(c) A unified regional transportation governance system would
contribute significantly to the prevention of a potential regional
transportation crisis;
(d) Even if all presently identifiable revenue sources are tapped,
there will be inadequate resources available to meet all of the
identified needs in the destination 2030 plan;
(e) The Puget Sound region needs to consider how to gain maximum
efficiencies from all possible resources in order to provide future
mobility, finance new capacity, and manage all transportation capacity
as effectively as possible;
(f) There is no single governmental entity responsible for
prioritizing projects regionally across geography and modes;
(g) Our transit systems, initially developed to provide local
service, now play a large role in regional transportation networks; and
(h) The policy of subregional equity introduces a sense of
fairness, but can produce results inconsistent with prioritizing
regionally.
(3) Based upon these findings, the regional transportation
commission recommended that:
(a) The state legislature create a fifteen-member Puget Sound
regional transportation commission, with nine elected and six appointed
members, that has the authority and responsibility for planning,
prioritizing, and funding all modes of regional transportation for the
four-county area;
(b) The Puget Sound regional transportation commission should be
responsible for land use and transportation planning, prioritizing, and
funding;
(c) The Puget Sound regional transportation commission should have
the authority to generate revenue from tax and transportation user
charges to pay for future transportation projects;
(d) The Puget Sound regional transportation commission should have
the authority to implement regional demand management tools as a way of
reducing demand and increasing revenue;
(e) The Puget Sound regional transportation commission should be
responsible for all state roads within the region, including roads of
statewide significance and roads of regional significance;
(f) The Puget Sound regional transportation commission should have
authority over planning, prioritizing, and financing regional transit
projects, including authority over sound transit and authority to
standardize fares for regional routes, including those provided by
local transit agencies;
(g) The boundary of the Puget Sound regional transportation
commission should include all of King, Snohomish, Pierce, and Kitsap
counties, which is the optimum boundary for all modes of transportation
requiring current and future planning;
(h) The Puget Sound regional transportation commission should not
be required to spend money evenly by mode or across geographical areas,
and thus, should not be required to operate on the basis of strict
subarea or modal equity;
(i) The Puget Sound regional transportation commission should have
broad authority to finance and operate transportation facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that the current
system of regional transportation governance is inadequate to meet
regional and state transportation needs in the twenty-first century and
needs fundamental systemic change. A single authority for planning,
prioritizing, and funding all modes of transportation would be able to
choose the optimal solutions to the region's transportation challenges,
rather than seek problems to solve with predetermined solutions.
Furthermore, the Puget Sound region could speak with a single unified
voice about its transportation needs and more effectively work with its
funding partners to address regional priorities.
(2) The legislature intends to form, effective January 1, 2009, a
new entity as recommended by the regional transportation commission.
(3) The joint transportation committee shall convene a regional
governance task force, composed of legislative members chosen by the
cochairs of the committee. The task force must also include a
representative of the governor. The cochairs of the joint
transportation committee, or their designees, shall be the cochairs of
the regional governance task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The regional governance task force of
the joint transportation committee shall:
(a) Consider the impacts of the new governance structure on other
aspects of state and local law and affected organizations and programs;
and
(b) Develop a statutory framework and draft legislation for
implementing the recommendations of the commission.
(2) The task force may establish legal and technical work groups to
conduct its work. In developing an implementing framework and proposed
legislation, the committee must analyze and review at least the
following issues:
(a) The impact of integrating comprehensive land use planning and
transportation planning within a single organization on the growth
management act;
(b) The legal, financial, and programmatic impacts on the enabling
legislation of existing local authorities;
(c) The stewardship of the state transportation system;
(d) The obstacles to standardized public transportation fares;
(e) Opportunities to increase greater coordination among transit
agencies and to increase transit ridership; and
(f) The necessary steps required to transition existing
organizations into the new structure.
(3) By December 15, 2007, the task force shall submit draft
legislation and any supporting materials to the legislative standing
committees on transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires January 1, 2009.

--- END ---