BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.250 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Covered entity" means: (a) A radio communications service
company, as defined in RCW 80.04.010 and (b) any provider of internet
protocol-enabled voice.
(2) "Customer profile data" means account information and other
nonpublic personal information about a customer stored by a covered
entity.
(3) "Nonpublic personal information" means personally identifiable
information that is not readily available through public sources.
"Nonpublic personal information" may include any of the following
information: (a) A bank account number; (b) a social security number;
(c) a credit or debit card number; (d) a personal identification
number; (e) an automated or electronic signature; (f) unique biometric
data; (g) account passwords or access codes; (h) medical information;
and (i) a unique tag number. "Nonpublic personal information" does not
include publicly available information that a person has a reasonable
basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public from
federal, state, or local government records; widely distributed media;
or disclosures to the general public that are required to be made by
federal, state, or local law. "Nonpublic personal information" shall
include any list, description, or other grouping of consumers, and
publicly available information pertaining to them, that is derived
using any nonpublic personal information other than publicly available
information, but does not include any list, description, or other
grouping of consumers, and publicly available information pertaining to
them, that is derived without using any nonpublic personal information.
(4) "Substantially" means a redesign or upgrade of more than
twenty-five percent of the code or database structures of the billing
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.250 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a covered entity substantially upgrades or replaces their
billing or records management system, the resulting system must be
capable of verifying and recording which person or persons, internal or
external, have had access to customer profile data.
(2) Upon written request by a customer, any covered entity shall
release to the customer all customer profile data pertaining to that
customer, including the identity of any individual or entity, internal
or external, who has had access to the requesting customer's records.
The customer may request a copy of their records once per year free of
charge. The customer may be charged a nominal fee for subsequent
requests. Any customer profile data collected by a covered entity must
be retained and remain accessible to the customer for at least two
years.
(3) After reviewing his or her customer profile data pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section, a customer must be given the
opportunity to:
(a) Contest the accuracy, completeness, timeliness, relevance, or
dissemination of his or her customer profile data;
(b) Correct or amend the information contained in his or her
customer profile data; and
(c) Request that customer profile data be removed or destroyed from
the database, unless removal or destruction of the information would be
contrary to applicable state or federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.250 RCW
to read as follows:
A covered entity must implement adequate security measures to
protect customer profile data and customer records from unauthorized
access, loss, or tampering. These security measures should be
consistent with industry accepted best standards that are commensurate
with the amount and sensitivity of the customer information being
stored on the system.

--- END ---