BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.36.010 and 1986 c 58 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the occurrence of any injury to a worker entitled to
compensation under the provisions of this title, he or she shall
receive proper and necessary medical and surgical services at the hands
of a physician of his or her own choice, if conveniently located, and
proper and necessary hospital care and services during the period of
his or her disability from such injury((, but the same)). The
department for state fund claims shall pay, in accordance with the
department's fee schedule, for any alleged injury for which a worker
files a claim, any initial prescription drugs provided in relation to
that initial visit, without regard to whether the worker's claim for
benefits is allowed. In all accepted claims, treatment shall be
limited in point of duration as follows:
In the case of permanent partial disability, not to extend beyond
the date when compensation shall be awarded him or her, except when the
worker returned to work before permanent partial disability award is
made, in such case not to extend beyond the time when monthly
allowances to him or her shall cease; in case of temporary disability
not to extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to him or her
shall cease: PROVIDED, That after any injured worker has returned to
his or her work his or her medical and surgical treatment may be
continued if, and so long as, such continuation is deemed necessary by
the supervisor of industrial insurance to be necessary to his or her
more complete recovery; in case of a permanent total disability not to
extend beyond the date on which a lump sum settlement is made with him
or her or he or she is placed upon the permanent pension roll:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the supervisor of industrial insurance, solely
in his or her discretion, may authorize continued medical and surgical
treatment for conditions previously accepted by the department when
such medical and surgical treatment is deemed necessary by the
supervisor of industrial insurance to protect such worker's life or
provide for the administration of medical and therapeutic measures
including payment of prescription medications, but not including those
controlled substances currently scheduled by the state board of
pharmacy as Schedule I, II, III, or IV substances under chapter 69.50
RCW, which are necessary to alleviate continuing pain which results
from the industrial injury. In order to authorize such continued
treatment the written order of the supervisor of industrial insurance
issued in advance of the continuation shall be necessary.
The supervisor of industrial insurance, the supervisor's designee,
or a self-insurer, in his or her sole discretion, may authorize
inoculation or other immunological treatment in cases in which a work-related activity has resulted in probable exposure of the worker to a
potential infectious occupational disease. Authorization of such
treatment does not bind the department or self-insurer in any
adjudication of a claim by the same worker or the worker's beneficiary
for an occupational disease.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By December 1, 2009, the department of labor
and industries must report to the senate labor, commerce, research and
development committee and the house of representatives commerce and
labor committee, or successor committees, on the implementation of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---