BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.48.037 and 1991 c 200 s 1102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, with the assistance of the attorney general, is
authorized to bring any appropriate action at law or in equity,
including action for injunctive relief, in the name of the people of
the state of Washington as may be necessary to carry out the provisions
of this chapter or chapter 90.56 RCW.
(2) The department, with the assistance of the attorney general, is
authorized to consider the option of an innovative settlement agreement
in lieu of appeal for all violators of this chapter or chapter 90.56
RCW except in cases of:
(a) Criminal violations;
(b) Cases where the violation is not corrected; or
(c) Violators that have unpaid penalties under this chapter or
chapter 90.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to consider an innovative
settlement agreement in lieu of appeal prepared by violators of this
chapter or chapter 90.56 RCW who choose not to appeal the penalty.
Nothing in this section restricts the department's ability to enter
into innovative settlement agreements after the appeals process has
begun.
(2) An innovative settlement agreement must meet the following
standards:
(a) The request to proceed with an innovative settlement agreement
in lieu of appeal must be made within thirty days after the date of
receipt of the notice imposing the penalty, or thirty days after the
date of receipt of the notice of disposition of the application for
relief from penalty.
(b) The innovative settlement agreement must be agreed upon with
the department within ninety days after beginning the settlement
process.
(i) The ninety-day timeline may be extended to one hundred twenty
days by mutual agreement.
(ii) If the innovative settlement agreement is not agreed upon
within one hundred twenty days, the penalty becomes due and payable.
(3) An innovative settlement agreement must meet the following
standards:
(a) It must be completed within two years;
(b) It cannot be for projects currently required under any federal,
state, or local law or regulation;
(c) It must be within the same watershed where the violation took
place;
(d) It must not directly benefit the violator individually;
(e) The total monetary or in-kind payments must be equal to the
assessed penalty;
(f) Twenty percent of the assessed penalty must be deposited into
the coastal protection fund, created in RCW 90.48.390;
(g) All publicity occurring as a result of this project must cite
the penalty assessed and the resulting innovative settlement agreement;
and
(h) No portion of the penalty money, in-kind contributions, or
project may be tax deductible as a charitable contribution.

--- END ---