BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many high school
students are unaware until they enroll in an institution of higher
education and take college placement tests of what the entry-level
college expectations are for mathematics, reading, writing, and
English. The legislature further finds that an unacceptably high
number of students entering institutions of higher education are
unprepared to do college-level mathematics, reading, or writing, and
require remedial instruction. This remedial instruction imposes
additional costs and burdens on students by increasing the time it
takes for them to reach their educational goals, and increases the
state's costs associated with higher education.
The legislature further finds that while five out of the six public
baccalaureate institutions use the mathematics placement test,
developed by the University of Washington, to determine whether
enrolled students are prepared for college-level mathematics, each
community and technical college uses a different combination of
placement tests. Even if two community or technical colleges use the
same placement tests, they may have different cut scores for
determining eligibility for college-level mathematics and other
courses.
The legislature intends to provide students with more certainty and
predictability regarding their readiness for college-level mathematics,
reading, writing, and English.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2008, the University of Washington, in
consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges,
shall examine, and revise if necessary, the mathematics placement test
to make the test applicable to the college entry expectations in
mathematics for both the four-year and two-year institutions of higher
education.
(2)(a) Each four-year institution of higher education that requires
students to take a standardized test to demonstrate college readiness
in mathematics and each community or technical college shall adopt a
minimum score for each of the mathematics placement test (MPT), the
mathematics portion of scholastic aptitude test (SAT), and the
mathematics portion of the American college test (ACT), and shall allow
students to demonstrate college readiness in mathematics by achieving
a score equal to or greater than the minimum score set by the
institution for any of the tests.
(b) Each four-year institution of higher education that requires
students to take a standardized test to demonstrate college readiness
in writing, reading, or English and each community or technical college
shall adopt a minimum score for both the verbal portion of scholastic
aptitude test (SAT) and the verbal portion of the American college test
(ACT), and shall allow students to demonstrate college readiness in
reading, writing, or English by achieving a score equal to or greater
than the minimum score set by the institution for either of the tests.
(c) Four-year institutions of higher education that require
standardized test scores to demonstrate college readiness and the
community and technical colleges may allow, but shall not require,
students to demonstrate college readiness in mathematics, reading,
writing, or English by other means, including but not limited to scores
on other standardized tests and courses completed in high school or at
other postsecondary institutions.
(3) Each four-year institution of higher education that requires
students to take a standardized test to demonstrate college readiness
in mathematics, reading, writing, or English and each community and
technical college shall publish its minimum required scores on its web
site and shall submit its minimum required scores, and any changes to
the scores, to the higher education coordinating board. Each community
and technical college shall also provide its minimum required scores,
and any changes to the scores, to the state board for community and
technical colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The four-year institutions of higher education shall not provide
precollege level course work in mathematics, reading, writing, or
English, except for English courses for English language learners. The
four-year institutions of higher education shall notify enrolled
students who do not place into college-level course work in
mathematics, reading, writing, or English that they may enroll in
precollege-level course work at a community or technical college or an
independent institution of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in the fall of 2008, school districts shall provide
all high school students enrolled in the district the option of taking
the mathematics placement test (MPT) developed by the University of
Washington and the scholastic aptitude test (SAT) or the American
college test (ACT) once at no cost to the students. Districts shall
encourage, but not require, students to take these tests in their
junior or senior year of high school.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
reimburse each district for the costs incurred by the district in
providing students the opportunity to take the MPT and the SAT or ACT
once. The superintendent of public instruction is encouraged to work
with the test publishers to secure fee waivers for the administration
of the tests.

--- END ---