BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I - COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to the governor with respect to adult family home
providers. Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer of adult family home providers who,
solely for the purposes of collective bargaining, are public employees.
The public employer shall be represented for bargaining purposes by the
governor or the governor's designee.
(2) There shall be collective bargaining, as defined in RCW
41.56.030, between the governor and adult family home providers, except
as follows:
(a) A statewide unit of all adult family home providers is the only
unit appropriate for purposes of collective bargaining under RCW
41.56.060.
(b) The exclusive bargaining representative of adult family home
providers in the unit specified in (a) of this subsection shall be the
representative chosen in an election conducted pursuant to RCW
41.56.070.
Bargaining authorization cards furnished as the showing of interest
in support of any representation petition or motion for intervention
filed under this section shall be exempt from disclosure under chapter
42.56 RCW.
(c) Notwithstanding the definition of "collective bargaining" in
RCW 41.56.030(4), the scope of collective bargaining for adult family
home providers under this section shall be limited solely to: (i)
Economic compensation, such as manner and rate of subsidy and
reimbursement, including tiered reimbursements; (ii) health and welfare
benefits; (iii) professional development and training; (iv) labor-management committees; (v) grievance procedures; and (vi) other
economic matters. Retirement benefits shall not be subject to
collective bargaining. By such obligation neither party shall be
compelled to agree to a proposal or be required to make a concession
unless otherwise provided in this chapter.
(d) In addition to the entities listed in the mediation and
interest arbitration provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and
41.56.480, the provisions apply to the governor or the governor's
designee and the exclusive bargaining representative of adult family
home providers, except that:
(i) In addition to the factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel under RCW 41.56.465, the panel shall
consider the financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement.
(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of
the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, the decision is not
binding on the state.
(e) Adult family home providers do not have the right to strike.
(3) Adult family home providers who are public employees solely for
the purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this
section are not, for that reason, employees of the state for any other
purpose. This section applies only to the governance of the collective
bargaining relationship between the employer and adult family home
providers as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) This section does not create or modify:
(a) The department's authority to establish a plan of care for each
consumer or its core responsibility to manage long-term care services
under chapter 70.128 RCW, including determination of the level of care
that each consumer is eligible to receive. However, at the request of
the exclusive bargaining representative, the governor or the governor's
designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in collective
bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030(4), with the exclusive
bargaining representative over how the department's core responsibility
affects hours of work for adult family home providers. This subsection
shall not be interpreted to require collective bargaining over an
individual consumer's plan of care;
(b) The department's obligation to comply with the federal medicaid
statute and regulations and the terms of any community-based waiver
granted by the federal department of health and human services and to
ensure federal financial participation in the provision of the
services;
(c) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under chapter 70.128 RCW, including
standards of eligibility of consumers and adult family home providers
participating in the programs under chapter 70.128 RCW, and the nature
of services provided. The governor shall not enter into, extend, or
renew any agreement under this chapter that does not expressly reserve
the legislative rights described in this subsection (4)(c);
(d) The residents', parents', or legal guardians' right to choose
and terminate the services of any licensed adult family home provider;
and
(e) RCW 43.43.832, 43.20A.205, or 74.15.130.
(5) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (6) of this
section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed biennial
or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW
43.88.030, a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered
into under this section or for legislation necessary to implement the
agreement.
(6) A request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and
benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into
under this section shall not be submitted by the governor to the
legislature unless the request has been:
(a) Submitted to the director of financial management by October
1st prior to the legislative session at which the requests are to be
considered; and
(b) Certified by the director of financial management as
financially feasible for the state or reflective of a binding decision
of an arbitration panel reached under subsection (2)(d) of this
section.
(7) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submission, any collective bargaining agreement must be
reopened for the sole purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to
implement the agreement.
(8) If, after the compensation and benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.
(9) After the expiration date of any collective bargaining
agreement entered into under this section, all of the terms and
conditions specified in the agreement remain in effect until the
effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from
the expiration date stated in the agreement.
(10) In enacting this section, the legislature intends to provide
state action immunity under federal and state antitrust laws for the
joint activities of adult family home providers and their exclusive
bargaining representative to the extent the activities are authorized
by this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.56.030 and 2006 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body
governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For
the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or
superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective
county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the
legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related
matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district
court or superior court.
(2) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer
except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to
office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative
assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship to
(i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or
(ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court
magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a
district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a
personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner. For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more
than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from
a bargaining unit.
(3) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as
defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or
town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with
a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who
are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned
security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020(5),
by a county with a population of seventy thousand or more, and who are
trained for and charged with the responsibility of controlling and
maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and safeguarding inmates
from other inmates; (c) general authority Washington peace officers as
defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a port district in a county with
a population of one million or more; (d) security forces established
under RCW 43.52.520; (e) fire fighters as that term is defined in RCW
41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district in a county with a
population of one million or more whose duties include crash fire
rescue or other fire fighting duties; (g) employees of fire departments
of public employers who dispatch exclusively either fire or emergency
medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the several classes of
advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, who are
employed by a public employer.
(8) "Institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(9) "Home care quality authority" means the authority under chapter
74.39A RCW.
(10) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.
(11) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state through a
child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW 74.12.340 or
74.08A.340, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any successor
program.
(12) "Family child care provider" means a person who: (a) Provides
regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home of the
provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of less
than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the
parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours;
(b) receives child care subsidies; and (c) is either licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.030 or is exempt from licensing under chapter
74.15 RCW.
(13) "Adult family home provider" means a provider as defined in
RCW 70.128.010 who receives payments from the medicaid and state-funded
long-term care programs.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.56.113 and 2006 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the written authorization of an individual provider
((or)), a family child care provider, or an adult family home provider
within the bargaining unit and after the certification or recognition
of the bargaining unit's exclusive bargaining representative, the state
as payor, but not as the employer, shall, subject to subsection (3) of
this section, deduct from the payments to an individual provider
((or)), a family child care provider, or an adult family home provider
the monthly amount of dues as certified by the secretary of the
exclusive bargaining representative and shall transmit the same to the
treasurer of the exclusive bargaining representative.
(2) If the governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of
a bargaining unit of individual providers ((or)), family child care
providers, or adult family home providers enter into a collective
bargaining agreement that:
(a) Includes a union security provision authorized in RCW
41.56.122, the state as payor, but not as the employer, shall, subject
to subsection (3) of this section, enforce the agreement by deducting
from the payments to bargaining unit members the dues required for
membership in the exclusive bargaining representative, or, for
nonmembers thereof, a fee equivalent to the dues; or
(b) Includes requirements for deductions of payments other than the
deduction under (a) of this subsection, the state, as payor, but not as
the employer, shall, subject to subsection (3) of this section, make
such deductions upon written authorization of the individual provider
((or the)), family child care provider, or adult family home provider.
(3)(a) The initial additional costs to the state in making
deductions from the payments to individual providers ((or)), family
child care providers, and adult family home providers under this
section shall be negotiated, agreed upon in advance, and reimbursed to
the state by the exclusive bargaining representative.
(b) The allocation of ongoing additional costs to the state in
making deductions from the payments to individual providers ((or)),
family child care providers, or adult family home providers under this
section shall be an appropriate subject of collective bargaining
between the exclusive bargaining representative and the governor unless
prohibited by another statute. If no collective bargaining agreement
containing a provision allocating the ongoing additional cost is
entered into between the exclusive bargaining representative and the
governor, or if the legislature does not approve funding for the
collective bargaining agreement as provided in RCW 74.39A.300 ((or)),
41.56.028, or section 1 of this act, as applicable, the ongoing
additional costs to the state in making deductions from the payments to
individual providers ((or)), family child care providers, or adult
family home providers under this section shall be negotiated, agreed
upon in advance, and reimbursed to the state by the exclusive
bargaining representative.
(4) The governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of a
bargaining unit of family child care providers may not enter into a
collective bargaining agreement that contains a union security
provision unless the agreement contains a process, to be administered
by the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit of
family child care providers, for hardship dispensation for license-exempt family child care providers who are also temporary assistance
for needy families recipients or WorkFirst participants.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.04.810 and 2006 c 54 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Individual providers, as defined in RCW 74.39A.240, ((and)) family
child care providers, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, and adult family
home providers, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, are not employees of the
state or any of its political subdivisions and are specifically and
entirely excluded from all provisions of this title, except as provided
in RCW 74.39A.270 ((and)), 41.56.028, and section 1 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.01.047 and 2006 c 54 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 43.01.040 through 43.01.044 do not apply to individual
providers under RCW 74.39A.220 through 74.39A.300 ((or to)), family
child care providers under RCW 41.56.028, or adult family home
providers under section 1 of this act.

PART II - NEGOTIATED RULE MAKING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Solely for the purposes of negotiated rule making pursuant to
RCW 34.05.310(2)(a) and 70.128.040, a statewide unit of all adult
family home licensees is appropriate. As of the effective date of this
section, the exclusive representative of adult family home licensees in
the statewide unit shall be the organization certified by the American
arbitration association as the sole representative after the
association conducts a cross-check comparing authorization cards
against the department of social and health services' records and finds
that majority support for the organization exists. If adult family
home licensees seek to select a different representative thereafter,
the adult family home licensees may request that the American
arbitration association conduct an election and certify the results of
the election.
(2) In enacting this section, the legislature intends to provide
state action immunity under federal and state antitrust laws for the
joint activities of licensees and their exclusive representative to the
extent such activities are authorized by this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.128.010 and 2001 c 319 s 6 and 2001 c 319 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult family home" means a residential home in which a person
or persons provide personal care, special care, room, and board to more
than one but not more than six adults who are not related by blood or
marriage to the person or persons providing the services.
(2) "Provider" means any person who is licensed under this chapter
to operate an adult family home. For the purposes of this section,
"person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, association,
or limited liability company.
(3) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(4) "Resident" means an adult in need of personal or special care
in an adult family home who is not related to the provider.
(5) "Adults" means persons who have attained the age of eighteen
years.
(6) "Home" means an adult family home.
(7) "Imminent danger" means serious physical harm to or death of a
resident has occurred, or there is a serious threat to resident life,
health, or safety.
(8) "Special care" means care beyond personal care as defined by
the department, in rule.
(9) "Capacity" means the maximum number of persons in need of
personal or special care permitted in an adult family home at a given
time. This number shall include related children or adults in the home
and who received special care.
(10) "Resident manager" means a person employed or designated by
the provider to manage the adult family home.
(11) "Adult family home licensee" means a provider as defined in
this section who does not receive payments from the medicaid and state-funded long-term care programs.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.128.040 and 1995 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules and standards with respect to
adult family homes and the operators thereof to be licensed under this
chapter to carry out the purposes and requirements of this chapter.
The rules and standards relating to applicants and operators shall
address the differences between individual providers and providers that
are partnerships, corporations, associations, or companies. The rules
and standards shall also recognize and be appropriate to the different
needs and capacities of the various populations served by adult family
homes such as but not limited to ((the)) persons who are
developmentally disabled ((and the)) or elderly. In developing rules
and standards the department shall recognize the residential family-like nature of adult family homes and not develop rules and standards
which by their complexity serve as an overly restrictive barrier to the
development of the adult family homes in the state. Procedures and
forms established by the department shall be developed so they are easy
to understand and comply with. Paper work requirements shall be
minimal. Easy to understand materials shall be developed for
applicants and providers explaining licensure requirements and
procedures.
(2)(a) In developing the rules and standards, the department shall
consult with all divisions and administrations within the department
serving the various populations living in adult family homes, including
the division of developmental disabilities and the aging and adult
services administration. Involvement by the divisions and
administration shall be for the purposes of assisting the department to
develop rules and standards appropriate to the different needs and
capacities of the various populations served by adult family homes.
During the initial stages of development of proposed rules, the
department shall provide notice of development of the rules to
organizations representing adult family homes and their residents, and
other groups that the department finds appropriate. The notice shall
state the subject of the rules under consideration and solicit written
recommendations regarding their form and content.
(b) In addition, the department shall engage in negotiated rule
making pursuant to RCW 34.05.310(2)(a) with the exclusive
representative of the adult family home licensees selected in
accordance with section 6 of this act and with other affected interests
before adopting requirements that affect adult family home licensees.
(3) Except where provided otherwise, chapter 34.05 RCW shall govern
all department rule-making and adjudicative activities under this
chapter.

PART III - GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---