BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the public's
interest is best served by receiving social and clinical services from
a professional social worker who abides by a professional code of
ethics, is educated in the field of social work, and is deemed by the
completion of requirements of the social work education and/or
licensing requirements to be a social worker.
Social work education provides a unique combination of knowledge,
values, skills, and professional ethics that cannot be obtained through
other educational programs, equipping professional social workers with
the specialized knowledge base necessary for an effective social
services delivery system that cannot be approximated through other
degree programs or on-the-job training.
In addition, many professional social workers practice in settings
that do not require licensure and the professional title of social
worker is misunderstood or undervalued due to use of the title "social
worker" by persons neither trained nor licensed as a professional
social worker.
It is therefore the intent of the legislature to ensure that the
title of "social worker" is defined clearly for mental health consumers
and the clients of public and private agencies.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.225.010 and 2001 c 251 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Advanced social work" means the application of social work
theory and methods including emotional and biopsychosocial assessment,
psychotherapy under the supervision of a licensed independent clinical
social worker, case management, consultation, advocacy, counseling, and
community organization.
(2) "Applicant" means a person who completes the required
application, pays the required fee, is at least eighteen years of age,
and meets any background check requirements and uniform disciplinary
act requirements.
(3) "Committee" means the Washington state mental health
counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers advisory
committee.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(5) "Disciplining authority" means the department.
(6) "Independent clinical social work" means the diagnosis and
treatment of emotional and mental disorders based on knowledge of human
development, the causation and treatment of psychopathology,
psychotherapeutic treatment practices, and social work practice as
defined in advanced social work. Treatment modalities include but are
not limited to diagnosis and treatment of individuals, couples,
families, groups, or organizations.
(7) "Marriage and family therapy" means the diagnosis and treatment
of mental and emotional disorders, whether cognitive, affective, or
behavioral, within the context of relationships, including marriage and
family systems. Marriage and family therapy involves the professional
application of psychotherapeutic and family systems theories and
techniques in the delivery of services to individuals, couples, and
families for the purpose of treating such diagnosed nervous and mental
disorders. The practice of marriage and family therapy means the
rendering of professional marriage and family therapy services to
individuals, couples, and families, singly or in groups, whether such
services are offered directly to the general public or through
organizations, either public or private, for a fee, monetary or
otherwise.
(8) "Mental health counseling" means the application of principles
of human development, learning theory, psychotherapy, group dynamics,
and etiology of mental illness and dysfunctional behavior to
individuals, couples, families, groups, and organizations, for the
purpose of treatment of mental disorders and promoting optimal mental
health and functionality. Mental health counseling also includes, but
is not limited to, the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of mental
and emotional disorders, as well as the application of a wellness model
of mental health.
(9) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(10) "Social worker" means a person who has met one or more of the
following requirements:
(a) Graduation from a bachelor's, master's, or doctorate social
work educational program accredited by the council on social work
education and approved by the secretary based upon nationally
recognized standards; or
(b) Is licensed under RCW 18.225.090 as a licensed advanced social
worker or licensed independent clinical social worker.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.124.020 and 1999 c 176 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington.
(2) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the
director of public safety, or the office of the sheriff.
(3) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a
person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, optometry, pharmacy, physical therapy, chiropractic, nursing,
dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery.
The term "practitioner" includes a nurse's aide and a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner.
(4) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(5) "Social worker" means ((anyone engaged in a professional
capacity during the regular course of employment in encouraging or
promoting the health, welfare, support, or education of patients, or
providing social services to patients, whether in an individual
capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private
organization or institution)) a person who has met one or more of the
following requirements:
(a) Graduation from a bachelor's, master's, or doctorate social
work educational program accredited by the council on social work
education and approved by the secretary based upon nationally
recognized standards; or
(b) Is licensed under RCW 18.225.090 as a licensed advanced social
worker or licensed independent clinical social worker.
(6) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology
under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as
an employee or agent of any public or private organization or
institution.
(7) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter
18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(8) "Abuse or neglect" or "patient abuse or neglect" means the
nonaccidental physical injury or condition, sexual abuse, or negligent
treatment of a state hospital patient under circumstances which
indicate that the patient's health, welfare, or safety is harmed
thereby.
(9) "Negligent treatment" means an act or omission which evinces a
serious disregard of consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a
clear and present danger to the patient's health, welfare, or safety.
(10) "State hospital" means any hospital operated and maintained by
the state for the care of the mentally ill under chapter 72.23 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.225 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To safeguard the people of the state of Washington from the
dangers of unqualified, unethical, and improper practice of social
work, a person must not represent himself or herself as a social worker
without being qualified as a social worker as defined in this chapter.
(2) No public or private agencies or organizations in the state of
Washington shall use the title "social worker" or any form of the title
for volunteer or employment positions or within contracts for services,
documents, manuals, or reference material, effective January 1, 2008,
unless all volunteers or employees in those positions meet the
qualifications of a social worker as defined in this chapter, or were
employed with the title "social worker" on or before the effective date
of this act.

--- END ---