BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.010 and 2006 c 359 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, and
the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license.
(2) For the purpose of considering any application for a license,
or the renewal of a license, the board may cause an inspection of the
premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters in connection
with the construction and operation of the premises. For the purpose
of reviewing any application for a license and for considering the
denial, suspension ((or)), revocation, or renewal or denial thereof, of
any license, the liquor control board may consider any prior criminal
conduct of the applicant including an administrative violation history
record with the board and a criminal history record information check.
The board may submit the criminal history record information check to
the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the
federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search
their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or
individuals who filled out the forms. The board shall require
fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record
information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation.
The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW shall not apply
to such cases. Subject to the provisions of this section, the board
may, in its discretion, grant or ((refuse)) deny the renewal or license
applied for. Denial may be based on, without limitation, the existence
of chronic illegal activity documented in objections submitted pursuant
to subsections (8)(d) and (12) of this section. Authority to approve
an uncontested or unopposed license may be granted by the board to any
staff member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting
such authority shall be adopted by rule. No retail license of any kind
may be issued to:
(a) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not
resided in the state for at least one month prior to receiving a
license, except in cases of licenses issued to dining places on
railroads, boats, or aircraft;
(b) A copartnership, unless all of the members thereof are
qualified to obtain a license, as provided in this section;
(c) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or
agent, unless such manager or agent possesses the same qualifications
required of the licensee;
(d) A corporation or a limited liability company, unless it was
created under the laws of the state of Washington or holds a
certificate of authority to transact business in the state of
Washington.
(3)(a) The board may, in its discretion, subject to the provisions
of RCW 66.08.150, suspend or cancel any license; and all rights of the
licensee to keep or sell liquor thereunder shall be suspended or
terminated, as the case may be.
(b) The board shall immediately suspend the license or certificate
of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the
department of social and health services as a person who is not in
compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet
all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension,
reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the
board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and
health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the
order.
(c) The board may request the appointment of administrative law
judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who shall have power to administer
oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the
production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony,
examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry,
investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under
such rules and regulations as the board may adopt.
(d) Witnesses shall be allowed fees and mileage each way to and
from any such inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the
rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446, as now or hereafter amended. Fees
need not be paid in advance of appearance of witnesses to testify or to
produce books, records, or other legal evidence.
(e) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order
of the board or a subpoena issued by the board, or any of its members,
or administrative law judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify
to any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated,
the judge of the superior court of the county in which the person
resides, on application of any member of the board or administrative
law judge, shall compel obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the
case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said
court or a refusal to testify therein.
(4) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a
license, the licensee shall forthwith deliver up the license to the
board. Where the license has been suspended only, the board shall
return the license to the licensee at the expiration or termination of
the period of suspension. The board shall notify all vendors in the
city or place where the licensee has its premises of the suspension or
cancellation of the license; and no employee may allow or cause any
liquor to be delivered to or for any person at the premises of that
licensee.
(5)(a) At the time of the original issuance of a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license, the board shall prorate the license fee
charged to the new licensee according to the number of calendar
quarters, or portion thereof, remaining until the first renewal of that
license is required.
(b) Unless sooner canceled, every license issued by the board shall
expire at midnight of the thirtieth day of June of the fiscal year for
which it was issued. However, if the board deems it feasible and
desirable to do so, it may establish, by rule pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, a system for staggering the annual renewal dates for any and all
licenses authorized by this chapter. If such a system of staggered
annual renewal dates is established by the board, the license fees
provided by this chapter shall be appropriately prorated during the
first year that the system is in effect.
(6) Every license issued under this section shall be subject to all
conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by rules adopted
by the board. All conditions and restrictions imposed by the board in
the issuance of an individual license shall be listed on the face of
the individual license along with the trade name, address, and
expiration date.
(7) Every licensee shall post and keep posted its license, or
licenses, in a conspicuous place on the premises.
(8)(a) Unless (b) of this subsection applies, before the board
issues a new or renewal license to an applicant it shall give notice of
such application to the chief executive officer of the incorporated
city or town, if the application is for a license within an
incorporated city or town, or to the county legislative authority, if
the application is for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated
cities or towns.
(b) If the application for a special occasion license is for an
event held during a county, district, or area fair as defined by RCW
15.76.120, and the county, district, or area fair is located on
property owned by the county but located within an incorporated city or
town, the county legislative authority shall be the entity notified by
the board under (a) of this subsection. The board shall send a
duplicate notice to the incorporated city or town within which the fair
is located.
(c) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee
selected by it, or the county legislative authority or the official or
employee selected by it, shall have the right to file with the board
within twenty days after date of transmittal of such notice, written
objections against the applicant or against the premises for which the
new or renewal license is asked. The board may extend the time period
for submitting written objections.
(d) The written objections shall include a statement of all facts
upon which such objections are based, and in case written objections
are filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request
and the liquor control board may in its discretion hold a hearing
subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the board
makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal based on the
written objections of an incorporated city or town or county
legislative authority, the applicant may request and the board may in
its discretion hold a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of
Title 34 RCW. If such a hearing is held at the request of the
applicant, liquor control board representatives shall present and
defend the board's initial decision to deny a license or renewal.
(e) Upon the granting of a license under this title the board shall
send written notification to the chief executive officer of the
incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to the
county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the
boundaries of incorporated cities or towns. When the license is for a
special occasion license for an event held during a county, district,
or area fair as defined by RCW 15.76.120, and the county, district, or
area fair is located on county-owned property but located within an
incorporated city or town, the written notification shall be sent to
both the incorporated city or town and the county legislative
authority.
(9)(a) Before the board issues any license to any applicant, it
shall give (i) due consideration to the location of the business to be
conducted under such license with respect to the proximity of churches,
schools, and public institutions and (ii) written notice, with receipt
verification, of the application to public institutions identified by
the board as appropriate to receive such notice, churches, and schools
within five hundred feet of the premises to be licensed. The board
shall issue no beer retailer license for either on-premises or off-premises consumption or wine retailer license for either on-premises or
off-premises consumption or spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license
covering any premises not now licensed, if such premises are within
five hundred feet of the premises of any tax-supported public
elementary or secondary school measured along the most direct route
over or across established public walks, streets, or other public
passageway from the main entrance of the school to the nearest public
entrance of the premises proposed for license, and if, after receipt by
the school of the notice as provided in this subsection, the board
receives written objection, within twenty days after receiving such
notice, from an official representative or representatives of the
school within five hundred feet of said proposed licensed premises,
indicating to the board that there is an objection to the issuance of
such license because of proximity to a school. The board may extend
the time period for submitting objections. For the purpose of this
section, church shall mean a building erected for and used exclusively
for religious worship and schooling or other activity in connection
therewith. For the purpose of this section, public institution shall
mean institutions of higher education, parks, community centers,
libraries, and transit centers.
(b) No liquor license may be issued or reissued by the board to any
motor sports facility or licensee operating within the motor sports
facility unless the motor sports facility enforces a program reasonably
calculated to prevent alcohol or alcoholic beverages not purchased
within the facility from entering the facility and such program is
approved by local law enforcement agencies.
(c) It is the intent under this subsection (9) that a retail
license shall not be issued by the board where doing so would, in the
judgment of the board, adversely affect a private school meeting the
requirements for private schools under Title 28A RCW, which school is
within five hundred feet of the proposed licensee. The board shall
fully consider and give substantial weight to objections filed by
private schools. If a license is issued despite the proximity of a
private school, the board shall state in a letter addressed to the
private school the board's reasons for issuing the license.
(10) The restrictions set forth in subsection (9) of this section
shall not prohibit the board from authorizing the assumption of
existing licenses now located within the restricted area by other
persons or licenses or relocations of existing licensed premises within
the restricted area. In no case may the licensed premises be moved
closer to a church or school than it was before the assumption or
relocation.
(11)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the board, in its
discretion, from issuing a temporary retail or distributor license to
an applicant to operate the retail or distributor premises during the
period the application for the license is pending. The board may
establish a fee for a temporary license by rule.
(b) A temporary license issued by the board under this section
shall be for a period not to exceed sixty days. A temporary license
may be extended at the discretion of the board for additional periods
of sixty days upon payment of an additional fee and upon compliance
with all conditions required in this section.
(c) Refusal by the board to issue or extend a temporary license
shall not entitle the applicant to request a hearing. A temporary
license may be canceled or suspended summarily at any time if the board
determines that good cause for cancellation or suspension exists. RCW
66.08.130 applies to temporary licenses.
(d) Application for a temporary license shall be on such form as
the board shall prescribe. If an application for a temporary license
is withdrawn before issuance or is refused by the board, the fee which
accompanied such application shall be refunded in full.
(12) In determining whether to grant or deny a license or renewal
of any license, the board shall give substantial weight to objections
from an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority based
upon chronic illegal activity associated with the applicant's
operations of the premises proposed to be licensed or the applicant's
operation of any other licensed premises, or the conduct of the
applicant's patrons inside or outside the licensed premises. "Chronic
illegal activity" means (a) a pervasive pattern of activity that
threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the city, town, or
county including, but not limited to, open container violations,
assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other criminal law
violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police reports,
emergency medical response data, calls for service, field data, or
similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city, town, county,
or any other municipal corporation or any state agency; or (b) an
unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW 46.61.502
associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of any licensed
premises as indicated by the reported statements of patrons to the
Washington state patrol.

--- END ---