BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.31.020 and 1998 c 340 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The gain-sharing increase amount shall be the amount of
increase, rounded to the nearest cent, that can be fully funded in
actuarial present value by the amount of extraordinary investment
gains, if any. The amount of extraordinary investment gains shall be
calculated as follows:
(a) One-half of the sum of the value of the net assets held in
trust for pension benefits in the teachers' retirement system plan 1
fund and the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund at the
close of the previous state fiscal year;
(b) Multiplied by the amount which the compound average of
investment returns on those assets over the previous four state fiscal
years exceeds ((ten)) fourteen percent.
(2) The gain-sharing increase amount for July 1998, as provided for
in RCW 41.31.010, is ten cents.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.31A.020 and 2003 c 294 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On January 1, 2004, and on January 1st of even-numbered years
thereafter, the member account of a person meeting the requirements of
this section shall be credited by the extraordinary investment gain
amount.
(2) The following persons, if hired prior to July 1, 2007, shall be
eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Any member of the teachers' retirement system plan 3, the
Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3, or the public
employees' retirement system plan 3 who earned service credit during
the twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st immediately
preceding the distribution and had a balance of at least one thousand
dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution; or
(b) Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.875,
41.35.680, or 41.40.820; or
(c) Any person who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and
who:
(i) Completed ten service credit years; or
(ii) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
months after attaining age fifty-four; or
(d) Any teacher who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and
who has completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan
2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817; or
(e) Any classified employee who is a retiree pursuant to RCW
41.34.020(8) and who has completed five service credit years by
September 1, 2000, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510;
or
(f) Any public employee who is a retiree pursuant to RCW
41.34.020(8) and who has completed five service credit years by March
1, 2002, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.40.795; or
(g) Any person who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars
in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution and who:
(i) Completed ten service credit years; or
(ii) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
months after attaining age fifty-four; or
(h) Any teacher who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars
in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution and who has completed five service credit
years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under
RCW 41.32.817; or
(i) Any classified employee who had a balance of at least one
thousand dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year
immediately preceding the distribution and who has completed five
service credit years by September 1, 2000, and who transferred to plan
3 under RCW 41.35.510; or
(j) Any public employee who had a balance of at least one thousand
dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution and who has completed five service credit
years by March 1, 2002, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW
41.40.795.
(3) The extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated as
follows:
(a) One-half of the sum of the value of the net assets held in
trust for pension benefits in the teachers' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 fund, the Washington school employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 fund, and the public employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 fund at the close of the previous state fiscal
year not including the amount attributable to member accounts;
(b)(i) Through January 1, 2008, multiplied by the amount which the
compound average of investment returns on those assets over the
previous four state fiscal years exceeds ten percent;
(ii) On and after January 2, 2008, multiplied by the amount which
the compound average of investment returns on those assets over the
previous four state fiscal years exceeds fourteen percent;
(c) Multiplied by the proportion of:
(i) The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous
year of all persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1)
of this section; to
(ii) The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous
year of:
(A) All persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1)
of this section;
(B) Any person who earned service credit in the teachers'
retirement system plan 2, the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2, or the public employees' retirement system plan 2 during
the twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st immediately
preceding the distribution;
(C) Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.765,
41.35.420, or 41.40.630; and
(D) Any person with five or more years of service in the teachers'
retirement system plan 2, the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2, or the public employees' retirement system plan 2;
(d) Divided proportionally among persons eligible for the benefit
provided in subsection (1) of this section on the basis of their
service credit total on August 31st of the previous year.
(4) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to receive this distribution not granted prior to that time.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.32.835 and 1995 c 239 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All teachers who first become employed by an employer in an
eligible position on or after ((July 1, 1996, shall be members of plan
3)) the effective date of this section, shall have a period of ninety
days to make an irrevocable choice to become a member of plan 2 or plan
3. At the end of ninety days, if the member has not made a choice to
become a member of plan 2, he or she becomes a member of plan 3.
(2) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become
a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default under
subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the
department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon
becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service
credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and
all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the
member's plan 3 defined contribution account.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.35.610 and 1998 c 341 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All classified employees who first become employed by an
employer in an eligible position on or after ((September 1, 2000, shall
be members of plan 3)) the effective date of this section, shall have
a period of ninety days to make an irrevocable choice to become a
member of plan 2 or plan 3. At the end of ninety days, if the member
has not made a choice to become a member of plan 2, he or she becomes
a member of plan 3.
(2) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become
a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default under
subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the
department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon
becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service
credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and
all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the
member's plan 3 defined contribution account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The rates established in this section shall be collected in
addition to the rates established pursuant to RCW 41.45.062,
41.45.0621, and 41.45.070.
(2) Beginning September 1, 2007, a 1.25 percent contribution is
established as part of the basic state and employer contribution rate
for the teachers' retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of
amortizing the unfunded accrued actuarial liability in the teachers'
retirement system plan 1.
(3) Beginning September 1, 2007, a 0.67 percent contribution is
established as part of the basic state and employer contribution rate
for the school employees' retirement system, to be used for the sole
purpose of amortizing the unfunded accrued actuarial liability in the
public employees' retirement system plan 1.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2007, a 0.67 percent contribution is
established as part of the basic state and employer contribution rate
for the public employees' retirement system and the public safety
employees' retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of
amortizing the unfunded accrued actuarial liability in the public
employees' retirement system plan 1.
(5) The contribution rates in this section shall be collected
through June 30, 2011, for the public employees' retirement system and
the public safety employees' retirement system, through August 31,
2011, for the school employees' retirement system, and through August
31, 2010, for the teachers' retirement system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 41.31A.030 and 41.31A.040 are
decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Sections 2 and 5 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2007.
(2) Section 1 of this act takes effect January 2, 2008.

--- END ---