BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.63A.460 and 1993 c 280 s 76 are each amended to
read as follows:
Beginning on July 1, ((1991)) 2007, the department ((of community,
trade, and economic development)) shall ((be responsible for
performing)) perform all the consumer complaint and related functions
of the state administrative agency that are required for purposes of
complying with the regulations established by the federal department of
housing and urban development for manufactured housing, including the
preparation and submission of the state administrative plan.
The department ((of community, trade, and economic development))
may enter into state or local interagency agreements to coordinate site
inspection activities with record monitoring and complaint handling.
The interagency agreement may also provide for the reimbursement for
cost of work that an agency performs. The department may include other
related areas in any interagency agreements which are necessary for the
efficient provision of services.
The department of ((labor and industries)) community, trade, and
economic development shall transfer all records, files, books, and
documents necessary for the department ((of community, trade, and
economic development)) to assume these new functions.
The directors of community, trade, and economic development and
((the department)) of labor and industries shall immediately take such
steps as are necessary to ensure that ((chapter 176, Laws of 1990))
this act is implemented on ((June 7, 1990)) July 1, 2007.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.63A.465 and 1995 c 399 s 74 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director ((of the department of community, trade, and economic
development)) shall enforce manufactured housing safety and
construction standards adopted by the secretary of housing and urban
development under the national manufactured housing construction and
safety standards act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C. Secs. 5401-5426). Furthermore, the director may make agreements with the United
States government, state agencies, or private inspection organizations
to implement the development and enforcement of applicable provisions
of this chapter and the national manufactured housing construction and
safety standards act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C. Secs. 5401-5426)
regarding the state administrative agency program.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.63B.010 and 1998 c 124 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Authorized representative" means an employee of a state
agency, city, or county acting on behalf of the department.
(2) "Certified manufactured home installer" means a person who is
in the business of installing mobile or manufactured homes and who has
been issued a certificate by the department as provided in this
chapter.
(3) "Department" means the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) labor and industries.
(4) "Director" means the director of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) labor and industries.
(5) "Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling built in
accordance with the department of housing and urban development
manufactured home construction and safety standards act, which is a
national, preemptive building code.
(6) "Mobile or manufactured home installation" means all on-site
work necessary for the installation of a manufactured home, including:
(a) Construction of the foundation system;
(b) Installation of the support piers and earthquake resistant
bracing system;
(c) Required connection to foundation system and support piers;
(d) Skirting;
(e) Connections to the on-site water and sewer systems that are
necessary for the normal operation of the home; and
(f) Extension of the pressure relief valve for the water heater.
(7) "Manufactured home standards" means the manufactured home
construction and safety standards as promulgated by the United States
department of housing and urban development (HUD).
(8) "Mobile home" means a factory-built dwelling built prior to
June 15, 1976, to standards other than the HUD code, and acceptable
under applicable state codes in effect at the time of construction or
introduction of the home into the state. Mobile homes have not been
built since introduction of the HUD manufactured home construction and
safety standards act.
(9) "Training course" means the education program administered by
the department, or the education course administered by an approved
educational provider, as a prerequisite to taking the examination for
certification.
(10) "Approved educational provider" means an organization approved
by the department to provide education and training of manufactured
home installers and local inspectors.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.63B.150 and 1994 c 284 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
((All violations designated as an infraction shall be adjudicated
in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW.)) If a party desires to contest a notice of infraction and civil
penalty issued under this chapter, the party must file a notice of
appeal with the department within twenty days of the department mailing
the notice of civil penalty. An administrative law judge of the office
of administrative hearings shall hear and determine the appeal. Appeal
proceedings must be conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW. An appeal of
the administrative law judge's determination or order must be to the
superior court. The superior court's decision is subject only to
discretionary review under the rules of appellate procedure.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.63B.170 and 1994 c 284 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed an infraction under this
chapter shall be assessed a monetary penalty of one thousand dollars.
(2) The administrative law judge may waive, reduce, or suspend the
monetary penalty imposed for the infraction.
(3) Monetary penalties collected under this chapter shall be
((remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW)) deposited into the
manufactured home installation training account created in RCW
43.63B.080 (as recodified by this act) for the purposes specified in
this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.22.431 and 2001 c 335 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director of the department of labor and industries may enforce
manufactured home safety and construction standards adopted by the
secretary of housing and urban development under the national
manufactured home construction and safety standards act of 1974 (800
Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C. Secs. 5401-5426). Furthermore, the director may
make agreements with the United States government and private
inspection organizations to implement the development and enforcement
of applicable provisions of this chapter and the national manufactured
home construction and safety standards act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42
U.S.C. Secs. 5401-5426). Any fees or contract moneys collected under
these agreements shall be deposited into the manufactured housing
account created in RCW 59.22.070.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.22.495 and 1995 c 399 s 69 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning on July 1, ((1991)) 2007, the department ((of community,
trade, and economic development)) of labor and industries shall ((be
responsible for performing)) perform all the consumer complaint and
related functions of the state administrative agency that are required
for purposes of complying with the regulations established by the
federal department of housing and urban development for manufactured
housing, including the preparation and submission of the state
administrative plan.
The department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) of
labor and industries may enter into state or local interagency
agreements to coordinate site inspection activities with record
monitoring and complaint handling. The interagency agreement may also
provide for the reimbursement for cost of work that an agency performs.
The department may include other related areas in any interagency
agreements which are necessary for the efficient provision of services.
The directors of the department of community, trade, and economic
development and the department of labor and industries shall
immediately take such steps as are necessary to ensure that ((chapter
176, Laws of 1990)) this act is implemented on ((June 7, 1990)) July 1,
2007.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.70.136 and 1994 c 284 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may mediate disputes that arise regarding any
warranty required in chapter 46.70 RCW pertaining to the purchase or
installation of a manufactured home. The department may charge
reasonable fees for this service and shall deposit the moneys collected
in accordance with RCW 43.63B.080 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 9 RCW 59.22.050 and 1991 c 327 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to provide general assistance to mobile home resident
organizations, park owners, and landlords and tenants, the department
shall establish an office of mobile home affairs which will serve as
the coordinating office within state government for matters relating to
mobile homes or manufactured housing.
This office will provide an ombudsman service to mobile home park
owners and mobile home tenants with respect to problems and disputes
between park owners and park residents and to provide technical
assistance to resident organizations or persons in the process of
forming a resident organization pursuant to chapter 59.22 RCW. The
office will keep records of its activities in this area.
(2) ((The office shall perform all the consumer complaint and
related functions of the state administrative agency that are required
for purposes of complying with the regulations established by the
federal department of housing and urban development for manufactured
housing, including the preparation and submission of the state
administrative plan.
(3))) The office shall administer the mobile home relocation
assistance program established in chapter 59.21 RCW, including
verifying the eligibility of tenants for relocation assistance.

Sec. 10 RCW 59.22.070 and 1995 c 399 s 156 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created in the custody of the state treasurer a special
account known as the ((mobile home affairs)) manufactured housing
account.
Disbursements from this special account shall be as follows:
(1) For the two-year period beginning July 1, 1988, forty thousand
dollars, or so much thereof as may be necessary for costs incurred in
registering landlords and collecting fees, and thereafter five thousand
dollars per year for that purpose.
(2) All remaining amounts shall be remitted to the department for
the purpose of implementing RCW 59.22.050 ((and 59.22.060)), except
those funds needed to implement the state administrative agency
function and manufactured home installation training and certification
program under chapter 43.-- RCW (as created in section 12 of this act),
as well as all appropriated and nonappropriated funds related to
department of labor and industries functions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the department of community, trade, and economic development pertaining
to mobile and manufactured home installation are transferred to the
department of labor and industries.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
community, trade, and economic development pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of
the department of labor and industries. All cabinets, furniture,
office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed
by the department of community, trade, and economic development in
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
made available to the department of labor and industries. All funds,
credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions,
and duties transferred shall be assigned to the department of labor and
industries.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of community, trade,
and economic development for carrying out the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the department of labor and industries.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of community, trade, and
economic development engaged in performing the powers, functions, and
duties transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the
department of labor and industries. All employees classified under
chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the
department of labor and industries to perform their usual duties upon
the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any
action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws
and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
community, trade, and economic development pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by
the department of labor and industries. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
department of labor and industries.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of community, trade, and economic development shall not
affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of
this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The following sections are each recodified
as a new chapter in Title 43 RCW: RCW 43.63B.005, 43.63B.010,
43.63B.020, 43.63B.030, 43.63B.035, 43.63B.040, 43.63B.050, 43.63B.060,
43.63B.070, 43.63B.080, 43.63B.090, 43.63B.100, 43.63B.110, 43.63B.120,
43.63B.130, 43.63B.140, 43.63B.150, 43.63B.160, 43.63B.170, 43.63B.800,
43.63B.900, 43.63B.901, 43.63A.460, 43.63A.465, and 46.70.136.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 2 of this act expires if the
contingency in RCW 43.63A.490 occurs.

--- END ---