BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.16.090 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 89 are each amended to
read as follows:
((All records whatsoever of the board showing purchases by any
individual of liquor shall be deemed confidential, and, except subject
to audit by the state auditor, shall not be permitted to be inspected
by any person whatsoever, except by employees of the board to the
extent permitted by the regulations; and no member of the board and no
employee whatsoever shall give out any information concerning such
records and neither such records nor any information relative thereto
which shall make known the name of any individual purchaser shall be
competent to be admitted as evidence in any court or courts except in
prosecutions for illegal possession of and/or sale of liquor. Any
person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.))
(1) All records detailing purchases by any individual from the
board shall be deemed confidential except:
(a) When subject to audit by the state auditor; and
(b) When inspected by an employee of the board as permitted by
board regulations.
(2) The sales data information of retail licensees who purchase
distilled spirits from the board, including contract liquor stores,
shall be provided to the national alcohol beverage control association
and may be used by the association's members for commercial purposes.
(3) RCW 42.56.070(9) does not apply to sales data information
provided to the national alcohol beverage control association under
subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---