BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "oral health services" means
necessary outpatient and inpatient services provided to treat oral
health disorders covered by the diagnostic categories listed in the
most current version of the current dental terminology, published by
the American dental association, on the effective date of this section,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the insurance
commissioner by rule, consistent with the purposes of this act, but
limited to the following categories and services: Restorative
treatment, exams, radiographs, preventive services, tobacco cessation,
restorations, crowns, endodontics, periodontics, removable
prosthodontics, relines, repair of partial or complete dentures, tissue
conditioning, cast partial dentures, denture rebase procedures,
maxillofacial prosthetics, oral surgery, orthodontia, and anesthesia.
(2) All group disability insurance contracts and blanket disability
insurance contracts providing health benefit plans that provide
coverage for medical and surgical services shall provide, for all
health benefit plans established or renewed on or after January 1,
2008, for groups of more than one and less than fifty employees,
coverage for:
(a) Oral health services. The copayment or coinsurance for oral
health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance for
medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison; and
(b) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "oral health services" means
necessary outpatient and inpatient services provided to treat oral
health disorders covered by the diagnostic categories listed in the
most current version of the current dental terminology, published by
the American dental association, on the effective date of this section,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the insurance
commissioner by rule, consistent with the purposes of this act, but
limited to the following categories and services: Restorative
treatment, exams, radiographs, preventive services, tobacco cessation,
restorations, crowns, endodontics, periodontics, removable
prosthodontics, relines, repair of partial or complete dentures, tissue
conditioning, cast partial dentures, denture rebase procedures,
maxillofacial prosthetics, oral surgery, orthodontia, and anesthesia.
(2) All health care service contracts providing health benefit
plans that provide coverage for medical and surgical services shall
provide, for all health benefit plans established or renewed on or
after January 1, 2008, for groups of more than one and less than fifty
employees, coverage for:
(a) Oral health services. The copayment or coinsurance for oral
health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance for
medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison; and
(b) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "oral health services" means
necessary outpatient and inpatient services provided to treat oral
health disorders covered by the diagnostic categories listed in the
most current version of the current dental terminology, published by
the American dental association, on the effective date of this section,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the insurance
commissioner by rule, consistent with the purposes of this act, but
limited to the following categories and services: Restorative
treatment, exams, radiographs, preventive services, tobacco cessation,
restorations, crowns, endodontics, periodontics, removable
prosthodontics, relines, repair of partial or complete dentures, tissue
conditioning, cast partial dentures, denture rebase procedures,
maxillofacial prosthetics, oral surgery, orthodontia, and anesthesia.
(2) All health benefit plans providing health benefit plans that
provide coverage for medical and surgical services shall provide, for
all health benefit plans established or renewed on or after January 1,
2008, for groups of more than one and less than fifty employees,
coverage for:
(a) Oral health services. The copayment or coinsurance for oral
health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance for
medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison; and
(b) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.

--- END ---