BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.41 RCW
to read as follows:
A pharmacist may not interchange an antiepileptic drug or
formulation of an antiepileptic drug, brand name or generic, for the
treatment of seizures without prior notification of and the consent for
such interchange from the prescribing physician and patient, or
patient's parent, legal guardian, or spouse.

--- END ---