BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in many parts of
the state the cost of housing has increased substantially and many
public school teachers, particularly new teachers starting their
teaching careers, have difficulty finding housing that is affordable
for them. Classified school employees may also have a difficult time
finding housing that is located in the school district. The
legislature intends to allow school districts the option of renovating
existing surplus school district buildings to convert those buildings
into rental housing that is affordable for full-time employees,
particularly teachers, of the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.335
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Any school district board of directors is authorized to
renovate or convert existing surplus building or buildings owned by the
district into rental housing for full-time certificated instructional
staff employed by the district and other eligible persons, as provided
in subsection (3) of this section. Districts may use capital project
funds or general funds for the purposes of this section.
(2) School district boards of directors may contract with one or
more nonprofit or for-profit organizations to renovate, maintain, and
manage the rental housing owned by the district under this section. In
planning, renovating, and managing rental housing owned by the
district, districts are encouraged to collaborate with community-based
nonprofit organizations that have housing development and management
experience.
(3) A school district that offers rental housing under this section
shall develop a fair and objective selection process for approving
tenants for available housing. If demand for the rental housing
exceeds the supply of housing offered by the district, the district may
base its approval process on factors including, but not limited to,
applicants' total household income and the number of years of
employment with the district. Priority for rental housing shall be
given to the following eligible persons in the following order:
(a) Full-time certificated instructional staff employed by the
district;
(b) Full-time classified school employees employed by the district;
(c) Full-time certificated instructional staff employed by a
district other than the district that owns the housing; and
(d) Full-time classified school employees employed by a district
other than the district that owns the housing.
(4) The school district board of directors shall establish the
rental amount for each housing unit offered for rent by the district.
However, in no instance may the rental amount be greater than the fair
market rental value of the unit.
(5) Any district that provides housing under this section shall
annually report to the superintendent of public instruction and the
department of community, trade, and economic development regarding use
of the district's housing program. The information in the report shall
include the percentage of housing units rented to district certificated
and classified employees, the vacancy rate of the district-owned
housing, and other information requested by the superintendent of
public instruction or the department of community, trade, and economic
development. The department of community, trade, and economic
development shall develop performance measures that school districts
must include as part of their annual reports under this subsection.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2002 c 353 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter,
allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section.
(2)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be
less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and
(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a masters
degree shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
masters degree and zero years of service;
(3)(a) The actual average salary paid to certificated instructional
staff shall not exceed the district's average certificated
instructional staff salary used for the state basic education
allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410.
(b) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional
staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
For purposes of this section, fringe benefits shall not include payment
for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer
contributions for old age survivors insurance, workers' compensation,
unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits under the Washington
state retirement system; rental of district-owned housing as provided
in section 2 of this act; or employer contributions for health benefits
in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.
(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary
and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic
education program.
(4) Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may
exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by
separate contract for additional time, additional responsibilities, or
incentives. Supplemental contracts shall not cause the state to incur
any present or future funding obligation. Supplemental contracts shall
be subject to the collective bargaining provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW
and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed one year, and
if not renewed shall not constitute adverse change in accordance with
RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No district may enter into a
supplemental contract under this subsection for the provision of
services which are a part of the basic education program required by
Article IX, section 3 of the state Constitution.
(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply
with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.400.270 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 11 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.
(1) "School district employee benefit plan" means the overall plan
used by the district for distributing fringe benefit subsidies to
employees, including the method of determining employee coverage and
the amount of employer contributions, as well as the characteristics of
benefit providers and the specific benefits or coverage offered. It
shall not include coverage offered to district employees for which
there is no contribution from public funds.
(2) "Fringe benefit" does not include liability coverage, old-age
survivors' insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation,
retirement benefits under the Washington state retirement system,
rental of district-owned housing as provided in section 2 of this act,
or payment for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW
28A.400.210.
(3) "Basic benefits" are determined through local bargaining and
are limited to medical, dental, vision, group term life, and group
long-term disability insurance coverage.
(4) "Benefit providers" include insurers, third party claims
administrators, direct providers of employee fringe benefits, health
maintenance organizations, health care service contractors, and the
Washington state health care authority or any plan offered by the
authority.
(5) "Group term life insurance coverage" means term life insurance
coverage provided for, at a minimum, all full-time employees in a
bargaining unit or all full-time nonbargaining group employees.
(6) "Group long-term disability insurance coverage" means long-term
disability insurance coverage provided for, at a minimum, all full-time
employees in a bargaining unit or all full-time nonbargaining group
employees.

--- END ---