BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Affiliated business" means a business that is a member of a
group of two or more businesses with a common owner or owners, either
corporate or noncorporate, when more than fifty percent of the voting
stock or ownership of each member business is directly or indirectly
owned by the common owner or owners or by one or more of the member
businesses.
(b) "Another state" includes (i) a state of the United States other
than Washington, or any political subdivision of such other state, (ii)
the District of Columbia, and (iii) any foreign country or political
subdivision thereof.
(c) "Gas" means all hydrocarbons produced that are not defined as
oil, including all liquid hydrocarbons extracted at a gas processing
plant.
(d) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Imposed on or measured by the gross volume of business, in
terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the determination of
which the deductions allowed would not constitute an income tax or
value added tax; and
(ii) Not separately stated from the sales price under law or
custom.
(e) "Oil" means crude petroleum oil and other hydrocarbons,
regardless of API gravity, which are produced in liquid form, including
the liquid hydrocarbons sometimes known as distillate or condensate,
which are recovered by separation from gas other than at a gas
processing plant.
(f) "Petroleum business" means a person engaged in any of the
following activities: Exploration, production, refining,
manufacturing, processing, transportation, and marketing of oil and gas
or any petroleum product.
(g) "Petroleum business tax" means a tax imposed under this
section, or a similar gross receipts tax paid to another state, but
does not include any other tax imposed under this chapter or any tax
claimed as a credit under RCW 82.04.440.
(h) "Petroleum product" means any commodity, product, or feedstock
derived from oil or gas, including petrochemicals.
(i) "Petroleum refining" means refining crude petroleum into
refined petroleum by fractionation, straight distillation of crude oil,
cracking, or similar methods.
(j) "Previously taxed petroleum product" means a petroleum product
for which a petroleum business tax has been previously paid by the
taxpayer or another person with respect to manufacturing or selling the
product. "Previously taxed petroleum product" does not include a
product that has been modified or blended so as to constitute a
materially different or new product since the tax was previously paid.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing petroleum products, an additional tax is imposed with
respect to such business equal to the value of the product
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of three percent.
(3) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales, at retail or wholesale, an additional tax is imposed with
respect to such business equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
petroleum products multiplied by the rate of three percent.
(4) The taxes imposed under this section are in addition to all
other taxes imposed under this chapter or other law.
(5) The taxes imposed under this section do not apply to a business
during a taxable year, if neither the business nor any affiliated
business operated a petroleum refinery or refineries with a combined
total operable atmospheric crude oil distillation capacity in excess of
ten thousand barrels per calendar year, within or outside this state,
within the five preceding taxable years.
(6) The taxes imposed under this section do not apply to a
previously taxed petroleum product.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) This act takes effect on the first day
of the first calendar month that is both more than ninety days later
than any date of a high gasoline price and later than September 30,
2007.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Date of a high gasoline price" means any date upon which the
gasoline price exceeds one dollar and seventy-five cents per gallon.
(b) "Gasoline price" means the weekly retail price for gasoline,
all grades, for the west coast less California, as published by the
federal energy information administration or its successor agency.

--- END ---