BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.04.080 and 2006 c 132 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prosecutions for criminal offenses shall not be commenced after
the periods prescribed in this section.
(a) The following offenses may be prosecuted at any time after
their commission:
(i) Murder;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Arson if a death results;
(iv) Vehicular homicide;
(v) Vehicular assault if a death results;
(vi) Hit-and-run injury-accident if a death results (RCW
46.52.020(4));
(vii) Any sex offense committed against a child under the age of
eighteen.
(b) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than ten
years after their commission:
(i) Any felony committed by a public officer if the commission is
in connection with the duties of his or her office or constitutes a
breach of his or her public duty or a violation of the oath of office;
(ii) Arson if no death results; or
(iii) Violations of RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 if the rape is
reported to a law enforcement agency within one year of its
commission((; except that if the victim is under fourteen years of age
when the rape is committed and the rape is reported to a law
enforcement agency within one year of its commission, the violation may
be prosecuted up to three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday
or up to ten years after the rape's commission, whichever is later. If
a violation of RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 is not reported within one
year, the rape may not be prosecuted: (A) More than three years after
its commission if the violation was committed against a victim fourteen
years of age or older; or (B) more than three years after the victim's
eighteenth birthday or more than seven years after the rape's
commission, whichever is later, if the violation was committed against
a victim under fourteen years of age)).
(c) Violations of the following statutes shall not be prosecuted
more than ((three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or more
than)) seven years after their commission, whichever is later: RCW
((9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.070, 9A.44.080,))
9A.44.100(1)(b)((,)) or 9A.64.020, if the victim is over eighteen years
of age at the time of the crime.
(d) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than six
years after their commission: Violations of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080.
(e) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than five
years after their commission: Any class C felony under chapter 74.09,
82.36, or 82.38 RCW.
(f) Bigamy shall not be prosecuted more than three years after the
time specified in RCW 9A.64.010.
(g) A violation of RCW 9A.56.030 must not be prosecuted more than
three years after the discovery of the offense when the victim is a tax
exempt corporation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3).
(h) No other felony may be prosecuted more than three years after
its commission; except that in a prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115, if
the person who was viewed, photographed, or filmed did not realize at
the time that he or she was being viewed, photographed, or filmed, the
prosecution must be commenced within two years of the time the person
who was viewed or in the photograph or film first learns that he or she
was viewed, photographed, or filmed.
(i) No gross misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than two years
after its commission.
(j) No misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than one year after its
commission.
(2) The periods of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this
section do not run during any time when the person charged is not
usually and publicly resident within this state.
(3) In any prosecution for a sex offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, unless the victim is a child under the age of eighteen, the
periods of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section run
from the date of commission or one year from the date on which the
identity of the suspect is conclusively established by deoxyribonucleic
acid testing, whichever is later.
(4) If, before the end of a period of limitation prescribed in
subsection (1) of this section, an indictment has been found or a
complaint or an information has been filed, and the indictment,
complaint, or information is set aside, then the period of limitation
is extended by a period equal to the length of time from the finding or
filing to the setting aside.

--- END ---