BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Minority and women-owned businesses are an
integral part of our community and economy. Their economic successes
benefit our state. In addition, our state agencies benefit by working
with a diverse pool of private contractors. Increasing the current
pool of participating contractors with the state also benefits the
citizens of our state by increasing competition and promoting quality.
While state law prohibits awarding contracts based on race, ethnicity,
or gender, there are many opportunities to increase utilization of
historically underused businesses. The office of minority and women's
business enterprises has been tasked with increasing the participation
of these historically underused businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct a comprehensive study that examines the office
of minority and women's business enterprises. Specifically, the study
shall include:
(a) What policies, procedures, or programs have been established by
the office of minority and women's businesses and other state agencies
to implement Initiative Measure No. 200 and Governor Directive 98-01?
(i) Does the state communicate bid opportunities to historically
underused businesses?
(ii) Does the state communicate a list of certified minority or
women-owned business enterprises to agencies and the agencies'
procurement officers?
(iii) What kind of outreach and recruitment efforts have been
implemented?
(b) How does the role of the office of minority and women's
business enterprises and its interaction with state agencies prior to
the passage of Initiative Measure No. 200 compare to its role and
interaction after the initiative became law?
(c) Analyze the trends in certification and hiring of minority and
women-owned businesses by state and local agencies from 1997 to the
present.
(i) In terms of contract amounts, what percentage of mandatory
contracts have been awarded to minority and women's business
enterprises?
(ii) What amount of state contract dollars are awarded through
mandatory contracts versus convenience contracts?
(iii) Are state agency purchasers training to reach out to minority
and women's business enterprises for bidding opportunities?
(iv) For contracts under RCW 43.19.1906, how are agencies tracking
and reporting these contracts? What is the participation of minority
and women-owned business in bidding and in contract awards?
(d) To what extent have the office of minority and women's business
enterprises programs contributed to the certification of minority and
women's business enterprises? Are there efficiencies to allowing
nongovernmental organizations to oversee certification instead of the
office of minority and women's business enterprises?
(e) What practices do other governmental organizations use for
outreach and recruitment of minority and women-owned business
enterprises?
(f) Evaluate the participation of agencies in the governor's
supplier diversity directive.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall submit
the final report to the legislature by December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---