BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.48.070 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the first degree if
he or she knowingly and maliciously:
(a) Causes physical damage to the property of another in an amount
exceeding ((one)) two thousand five hundred dollars;
(b) Causes an interruption or impairment of service rendered to the
public by physically damaging or tampering with an emergency vehicle or
property of the state, a political subdivision thereof, or a public
utility or mode of public transportation, power, or communication; or
(c) Causes an impairment of the safety, efficiency, or operation of
an aircraft by physically damaging or tampering with the aircraft or
aircraft equipment, fuel, lubricant, or parts.
(2) Malicious mischief in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.48.080 and 1994 c 261 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the second degree
if he or she knowingly and maliciously:
(a) Causes physical damage to the property of another in an amount
exceeding ((two)) five hundred ((fifty)) dollars; or
(b) Creates a substantial risk of interruption or impairment of
service rendered to the public, by physically damaging or tampering
with an emergency vehicle or property of the state, a political
subdivision thereof, or a public utility or mode of public
transportation, power, or communication.
(2) Malicious mischief in the second degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.48.090 and 2003 c 53 s 71 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the third degree if
he or she:
(a) Knowingly and maliciously causes physical damage to the
property of another, under circumstances not amounting to malicious
mischief in the first or second degree; or
(b) Writes, paints, or draws any inscription, figure, or mark of
any type on any public or private building or other structure or any
real or personal property owned by any other person unless the person
has obtained the express permission of the owner or operator of the
property, under circumstances not amounting to malicious mischief in
the first or second degree.
(2)(a) Malicious mischief in the third degree under subsection
(1)(a) of this section is a gross misdemeanor if the damage to the
property is in an amount exceeding ((fifty)) one hundred dollars.
(b) Malicious mischief in the third degree under subsection (1)(a)
of this section is a misdemeanor if the damage to the property is
((fifty)) one hundred dollars or less.
(c) Malicious mischief in the third degree under subsection (1)(b)
of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---