BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
ensure that the highway infrastructure meets the growing needs of the
state's citizens and maintains pace with inflation. It is also the
intent of the legislature to keep improving highway safety and
improving the movement of persons and freight on the state's highways.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning on July 1, 2009, and each July 1st thereafter, the fuel
tax rate as computed under RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel shall be indexed utilizing the implicit price deflator
published by the federal bureau of economic analysis. The fuel tax
rate for the preceding year in which the fuel tax rate was calculated
is multiplied by the index, and the result is added to the preceding
year's fuel tax rate, which is then rounded up to the next half cent.
The resulting fuel tax rate may not be lower than the fuel tax rate
enacted in the immediately preceding year. The difference between
thirty-seven and one-half cents per gallon and the new tax rate
computed each July 1st shall be deposited monthly into the highway
project account created in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.38 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning on July 1, 2009, and each July 1st thereafter, the fuel
tax rate as computed under RCW 82.38.030 on each gallon of special fuel
shall be indexed utilizing the implicit price deflator published by the
federal bureau of economic analysis. The fuel tax rate for the
preceding year in which the fuel tax rate was calculated is multiplied
by the index, and the result is added to the preceding year's fuel tax
rate, which is then rounded up to the next half cent. The resulting
fuel tax rate may not be lower than the fuel tax rate enacted in the
immediately preceding year. The difference between thirty-seven and
one-half cents per gallon and the new tax rate computed each July 1st
shall be deposited monthly into the highway project account created in
section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The highway project account is created in the state treasury. Fuel
tax indexing amounts directed for deposit into the account under
sections 2 and 3 of this act must be deposited into the account. Money
in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures
from the account may only be used for projects or improvements
identified as 2003 nickel projects, 2005 transportation partnership
projects, or regional transportation investment district projects in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act, including any principal
and interest on bonds authorized for the projects or improvements.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.84.092 and 2006 c 337 s 11, 2006 c 311 s 23, 2006
c 171 s 10, 2006 c 56 s 10, and 2006 c 6 s 8 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the Columbia river basin water supply development
account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization
account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense
account, the developmental disabilities community trust account, the
drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance
administrative account, the drinking water assistance repayment
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account,
the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account,
the election account, the emergency reserve fund, the energy freedom
account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the
federal forest revolving account, the freight mobility investment
account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the highway project
account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice
assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land
account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser commission
account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource
management cost account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site
closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the
state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---