BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.01.011 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature hereby recognizes the following imperative needs
within the state: To create a statewide transportation development
plan which identifies present status and sets goals for the future; to
coordinate transportation modes; to promote and protect land use
programs required in local, state and federal law; to coordinate
transportation with the economic development of the state; to supply a
broad framework in which regional, metropolitan, and local
transportation needs can be related; to facilitate the supply of
federal and state aid to those areas which will most benefit the state
as a whole; to provide for public involvement in the transportation
planning and development process; to administer programs within the
jurisdiction of this title relating to the safety of the state's
transportation systems; and to coordinate and implement national
transportation policy with the state transportation planning program.
The legislature finds and declares that placing all elements of
transportation in a single department is fully consistent with and
shall in no way impair the use of moneys in the motor vehicle fund
exclusively for highway purposes.
Through this chapter, a unified department of transportation is
created. To the jurisdiction of this department will be transferred
the present powers, duties, and functions of the department of
highways, the highway commission, the toll bridge authority, the
aeronautics commission, and the canal commission, and the
transportation related powers, duties, and functions of the planning
and community affairs agency. The powers, duties, and functions of the
department of transportation must be performed in a manner consistent
with the policy goals set forth in RCW 47.01.012.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.01.012 and 2002 c 5 s 101 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals
for the planning, operation, performance of, and investment in, the
state's transportation system. The policy goals ((shall consist of,
but not be limited to,)) established under this section are deemed
consistent with the ((following)) benchmark categories((,)) adopted by
the state's blue ribbon commission on transportation on November 30,
2000. ((In addition to improving safety,)) Public investments in
transportation shall support achievement of these ((and other
priority)) policy goals:
((No interstate highways, state routes, and local arterials shall
be in poor condition; no bridges shall be structurally deficient, and
safety retrofits shall be performed on those state bridges at the
highest seismic risk levels; traffic congestion on urban state highways
shall be significantly reduced and be no worse than the national mean;
delay per driver shall be significantly reduced and no worse than the
national mean; per capita vehicle miles traveled shall be maintained at
2000 levels; the nonauto share of commuter trips shall be increased in
urban areas; administrative costs as a percentage of transportation
spending shall achieve the most efficient quartile nationally; and the
state's public transit agencies shall achieve the median cost per
vehicle revenue hour of peer transit agencies, adjusting for the
regional cost-of-living.))
(a) Preservation: To maintain, preserve, and extend the life and
utility of prior investments in transportation systems and services;
(b) Safety: To provide for and improve the safety and security of
transportation customers and the transportation system;
(c) Mobility: To improve the predictable movement of goods and
people throughout Washington state;
(d) Environment: To enhance Washington's quality of life through
transportation investments that promote energy conservation, enhance
healthy communities, and protect the environment;
(e) Stewardship: To be effective managers of the transportation
system.
(2) These policy goals shall be the basis for establishment of
detailed and measurable performance benchmarks.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that the transportation
commission establish performance measures to ensure transportation
system performance at local, regional, and state government levels, and
the transportation commission should work with appropriate government
entities to accomplish this.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.06.020 and 1993 c 446 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The specific role of the department in transportation planning
shall be: (1) Ongoing coordination and development of statewide
transportation policies that guide all Washington transportation
providers; (2) ongoing development of a statewide multimodal
transportation plan that includes both state-owned and state-interest
facilities and services; (3) coordinating the state high-capacity
transportation planning and regional transportation planning programs;
((and)) (4) conducting special transportation planning studies that
impact state transportation facilities or relate to transportation
facilities and services of statewide significance; and (5) implementing
the duties established in section 4 of this act. Specific requirements
for each of these state transportation planning components are
described in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
To support the achievement of the policy goals described in RCW
47.01.012, the department shall:
(1) Maintain an inventory and analysis of the condition of
structures and corridors;
(2) Develop long-term financing plans that sustainably support
ongoing maintenance and preservation of the transportation system;
(3) Accommodate and balance the safety and convenience of all users
of the transportation system, including pedestrians, bicyclists,
transit users, freight, and motor vehicle drivers, in all types of
transportation and development projects and through all phases of a
project so that even the most vulnerable persons, such as children,
senior citizens, and persons with disabilities, can travel safely
within the public right-of-way;
(4) Seek a reduction in the per capita vehicle miles traveled;
(5) In an effort to reduce emissions that contribute to global
warming, assess each project's estimated total carbon emissions
calculated over the full projected life cycle of the project;
(6) Include in each project analysis a list of alternative
approaches that would result in lesser carbon emissions including, but
not limited to, transit operations, transit capital investments, demand
management tools, and nonmotorized mode accommodations;
(7) Utilize, to the greatest extent possible, efficiency tools,
including high-occupancy vehicle and high-occupancy toll lanes,
corridor-specific and systemwide pricing strategies, active traffic
management, commute trip reduction, and other demand management tools;
(8) Promote integrated multimodal planning, incorporating a variety
of modal approaches to achieve the greatest efficiencies in movement of
goods and people in a specific corridor or project;
(9) Evaluate and prioritize projects based upon:
(a) Projects that provide the most consistent and efficient
movement of goods and people through the transportation system;
(b) Those structures and corridors in most urgent need of
retrofitting or rehabilitation; and
(c) Those projects that have a lower carbon emission output and
encourage a reduction in vehicle miles traveled.

--- END ---