BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.34.405 and 1985 c 354 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A minor receiving treatment under the provisions of this
chapter and responsible others shall be liable for the costs of
treatment, care, and transportation to the extent of available
resources and ability to pay. However, the parent of a minor is not
liable for payment of inpatient or outpatient mental health treatment
unless the parent has joined in the consent to the treatment.
(2) The secretary shall establish rules to implement this section
and to define income, resources, and exemptions to determine the
responsible person's or persons' ability to pay.

--- END ---