BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.020 and 1985 c 366 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter unless the context indicates otherwise:
(1) "Public agency" means:
(a) Any state board, commission, committee, department, educational
institution, or other state agency which is created by or pursuant to
statute, other than courts and the legislature;
(b) Any county, city, school district, special purpose district, or
other municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state of
Washington;
(c) Any subagency of a public agency which is created by or
pursuant to statute, ordinance, or other legislative act, including but
not limited to planning commissions, library or park boards,
commissions, and agencies;
(d) Any policy group whose membership includes representatives of
publicly owned utilities formed by or pursuant to the laws of this
state when meeting together as or on behalf of participants who have
contracted for the output of generating plants being planned or built
by an operating agency.
(2) "Governing body" means the multimember board, commission,
committee, council, or other policy or rule-making body of a public
agency, or any committee thereof when the committee acts on behalf of
the governing body, conducts hearings, or takes testimony or public
comment.
(3) "Action" means the transaction of the official business of a
public agency by a governing body including but not limited to receipt
of public testimony, deliberations, discussions, considerations,
reviews, evaluations, and final actions. "Final action" means a
collective positive or negative decision, or an actual vote by a
majority of the members of a governing body when sitting as a body or
entity, upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance.
(4) "Meeting" means ((meetings at which action is taken)) a
gathering of a majority of the members of a governing body where they
convene in person, by telephone, or by electronic means to hear,
deliberate, or take action on the business or affairs of the agency or
body. Electronic or telephone meetings are subject to the notice
requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.30 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person who has been elected to serve as a member of a governing
body is subject to the requirements of this chapter from the time of
election.

--- END ---