BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds and declares that:
(a) The social and economic well-being of the state is dependent
upon healthy and productive employees;
(b) Surveys and studies have documented that between sixteen
percent and twenty-one percent of employees directly experience health-endangering workplace bullying, abuse, and harassment, and that this
behavior is four times more prevalent than sexual harassment alone;
(c) Surveys and studies have documented that abusive work
environments can have serious effects on targeted employees, including
feelings of shame and humiliation, stress, loss of sleep, severe
anxiety, depression, posttraumatic stress disorder, reduced immunity to
infection, stress-related gastrointestinal disorders, hypertension, and
pathophysiologic changes that increase the risk of cardiovascular
diseases;
(d) Surveys and studies have documented that abusive work
environments can have serious consequences for employers, including
reduced employee productivity and morale, higher turnover and
absenteeism rates, and significant increases in medical and workers'
compensation claims;
(e) Unless mistreated employees have been subjected to abusive
treatment at work for unlawful discriminatory reasons, they are
unlikely to have legal recourse to redress such treatment;
(f) Legal protection from abusive work environments should not be
limited to behavior grounded in protected class status such as is
provided under employment discrimination statutes; and
(g) Existing workers' compensation plans and common law tort
actions are inadequate to discourage this behavior or provide adequate
redress to employees who have been harmed by abusive work environments.
(2) For these reasons, the legislature intends:
(a) To provide legal redress for state employees who have been
harmed, psychologically, physically, or economically, by being
deliberately subjected to abusive work environments; and
(b) To provide legal incentives for the state, as an employer, to
prevent and respond to mistreatment of state employees at work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Abusive conduct" is conduct of an employer or employee in the
workplace, with malice, that a reasonable person would find hostile,
offensive, and unrelated to an employer's legitimate business
interests. In considering whether abusive conduct is present, a trier
of fact should weigh the severity, nature, and frequency of the
conduct. Abusive conduct may include, but is not limited to, repeated
infliction of verbal abuse such as the use of derogatory remarks,
insults, and epithets; verbal or physical conduct that a reasonable
person would find threatening, intimidating, or humiliating; or the
gratuitous sabotage or undermining of a person's work performance. A
single act normally will not constitute abusive conduct, unless
especially severe and egregious.
(2) "Abusive work environment" is a workplace where an employee is
subjected to abusive conduct that is so severe that it causes physical
or psychological harm to the employee.
(3) "Conduct" is all forms of behavior, including acts and
omissions of acts.
(4) "Constructive discharge" is abusive conduct (a) which causes
the employee to resign, (b) where, prior to resigning, the employee
brings to the employer's attention the existence of the abusive
conduct, and (c) the employer fails to take reasonable steps to
eliminate the abusive conduct.
(5) "Employee" means an employee of the state of Washington.
(6) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(7) "Malice" is the desire to see another person suffer
psychological, physical, or economic harm, without legitimate cause or
justification. Malice may be inferred from the presence of factors
such as outward expressions of hostility, harmful conduct inconsistent
with an employer's legitimate business interests, a continuation of
harmful, illegitimate conduct after the complainant requests that it
cease or demonstrates outward signs of emotional or physical distress
in the face of the conduct, or attempts to exploit the complainant's
known psychological or physical vulnerability.
(8) "Negative employment decision" is a termination, constructive
discharge, demotion, unfavorable reassignment, refusal to promote, or
disciplinary action.
(9) "Physical harm" is the material impairment of a person's
physical health or bodily integrity, as documented by a competent
physician or supported by competent expert evidence at trial.
(10) "Psychological harm" is the material impairment of a person's
mental health, as documented by a competent psychologist, psychiatrist,
or psychotherapist, or supported by competent expert evidence at trial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) It is an unlawful employment practice
under this chapter:
(a) To subject an employee to an abusive work environment; or
(b) To retaliate in any manner against an employee because he or
she has opposed any unlawful employment practice under this chapter, or
because he or she has made a charge, testified, assisted, or
participated in any manner in an investigation or proceeding under this
chapter including, but not limited to, internal proceedings,
arbitration and mediation proceedings, and legal actions.
(2) It is an affirmative defense to an action for an abusive work
environment that:
(a) The employer exercised reasonable care to prevent and promptly
correct the abusive conduct and the aggrieved employee unreasonably
failed to take advantage of appropriate preventive or corrective
opportunities provided by the employer. This defense is not available
when the abusive conduct culminates in a negative employment decision.
(b) The complaint is grounded primarily upon a negative employment
decision made consistent with an employer's legitimate business
interests, such as a termination or demotion based on an employee's
poor performance, or the complaint is grounded primarily upon an
employer's reasonable investigation of potentially illegal or unethical
activity.
(3) An employer is vicariously liable for an unlawful employment
practice in violation of this chapter committed by its employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Where an employer has been found to have
committed an unlawful employment practice under this chapter, the court
may enjoin the employer from engaging in the unlawful employment
practice and may order any other relief that is deemed appropriate
including, but not limited to, reinstatement, removal of the offending
party from the complainant's work environment, back pay, front pay,
medical expenses, compensation for emotional distress, and attorneys'
fees.
(2) Where an employer has been found to have committed an unlawful
employment practice under this chapter that did not result in a
negative employment decision, the employer's liability for damages for
emotional distress may not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars. This
subsection does not apply to individually named coemployee defendants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 An aggrieved person may file a civil action
alleging an unfair employment practice under this chapter only after
exhausting all administrative remedies. Such action must be commenced
no later than one year after all administrative remedies are exhausted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) From July 1, 2008, to June 30, 2010,
this chapter applies only to state agencies with at least one hundred
full-time equivalent employees.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2010, this chapter applies to all state
agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

--- END ---