BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Lead hazards associated with lead wheel weights represent a
preventable environmental health problem. Lead wheel weights fall off
of vehicle wheels along Washington's roadways and people are exposed to
fragments and dust generated when lead wheel weights are abraded and
pulverized by traffic. Lead wheel weights that come to be located on
and alongside roadways can contribute to soil, surface, and groundwater
contamination, and pose a hazard to downstream aquatic life.
(2) Lead negatively affects every system of the body. It is
harmful to individuals of all ages and is especially harmful to
children, fetuses, and adults of childbearing age. The effects of lead
on a child's cognitive, behavioral, and developmental abilities may
necessitate large expenditures of public funds for health care and
special education. The irreversible damage to children and subsequent
expenditures could be avoided if exposure to lead is reduced.
(3) There are no federal regulatory controls governing the use of
lead wheel weights. The legislature recognizes the state's need to
protect the public from exposure to lead hazards.
(4) This chapter is intended to work in concert with the
persistent, bioaccumulative toxins rule, chapter 173-333 WAC,
administered by the department. The rule describes a requirement for
the department, in consultation with the department of health, to
develop a multiyear schedule for the preparation of chemical action
plans. The department anticipates completion of a chemical action plan
for lead by June 2008. While the formal process for the chemical
action plan moves forward, the legislature believes it is prudent to
act in an accelerated manner on known and readily available
opportunities to reduce the environmental health impacts of lead.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Environmentally preferred wheel weights" means wheel weights
used for the purpose of balancing motor vehicle wheels that are listed
by the department as approved alternatives for lead wheel weights and
that have less of an impact on human health and the environment.
(3) "Lead wheel weight" means any externally affixed or attached
wheel weight for the purpose of balancing motor vehicle wheels and
composed of greater than 0.1 percent lead by weight.
(4) "Person" includes any individual, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture.
(5) "Vehicle" means any motor vehicle registered in Washington with
a wheel diameter less than 19.5 inches or a gross vehicle weight of
14,000 pounds or less.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall establish an
advisory committee, in consultation with the department of health, the
traffic safety commission, and the department of general
administration, to identify and make readily available to tire
distributors, wholesalers, retailers, and auto manufacturers, by
January 1, 2009, an approved list of environmentally preferred
alternatives to lead wheel weights that are available for purchase.
(2) The approved list of environmentally preferred alternatives to
lead wheel weights must be updated by the department every two years
starting July 1, 2009.
(3) If an alternative is removed from the approved list of
environmentally preferred alternatives, the tire distributors,
retailers, and auto manufacturers will have two years to use existing
stock and to phase in other listed alternatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Use of environmentally preferred alternative
wheel weights is required at the time of the first tire replacement or
the first tire balancing after:
(1) January 1, 2010, for all state-owned vehicles;
(2) January 1, 2011, for all used vehicles registered in Washington
state; and
(3) January 1, 2012, for all new vehicles registered in Washington
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Lead wheel weights removed and collected by
tire retailers and distributors shall be recycled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Enforcement of this chapter shall rely
on notification and information exchange between the department and
tire distributors, wholesalers, retailers, and auto manufacturers. The
department shall achieve compliance with this chapter using the
following enforcement sequence:
(a) At least ninety days prior to the implementation dates for
vehicles identified in section 4 of this act, the department shall
prepare and distribute information to persons in the tire and wheel
weight manufacturing, distribution, wholesale, retail, and auto
manufacturing industries, to the maximum extent practicable, to assist
them in identifying environmentally preferred alternative products for
lead wheel weights.
(b) The department shall issue a warning letter to a person in the
tire distribution, wholesale, retail, auto manufacturing, or associated
industries that violates the requirements of this chapter.
(c) The department shall offer information or other appropriate
assistance to the person in (b) of this subsection. If, after one
year, compliance is not achieved, penalties may be assessed under
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Failure of a person that installs wheel weights to comply with
this chapter is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed five
hundred dollars for each violation in the case of a first offense.
Persons who are repeat violators are liable for a civil penalty not to
exceed one thousand dollars for each repeat offense. Penalties
collected under this section shall be deposited in the state toxics
control account created in RCW 70.105D.070. The owner of a vehicle is
not liable for failing to comply with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department may adopt rules to fully
implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---