BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A qualified elector in the state who is not registered to vote
is allowed to vote at the polls in a primary, special, or general
election if the person registers at the polls under this section.
(2) In order to register to vote at a precinct under this section,
the person must:
(a) Be a resident of the precinct;
(b) Be otherwise legally qualified to vote under this title;
(c) Not have previously registered to vote under this title; and
(d) Not have already voted in the election.
(3) Before being allowed to vote, the precinct election officer
shall require the person to do the following:
(a) Complete a voter registration form as provided in this chapter;
(b) Sign an oath described in subsection (5) of this section;
(c) Provide proof of residence under rules established by the
secretary of state;
(d) Provide proof of identification under rules established by the
secretary of state, which shall include, but not be limited to (i) a
Washington state driver's license, (ii) a Washington state
identification card, (iii) an official identification card issued by
the United States, (iv) a company identification card, (v) a student
identification card from a higher education institution, (vi) a credit
card, (vii) a library card, (viii) a real estate tax bill or receipt,
(ix) a residential lease, (x) a current utility bill that shows the
name and address of the registrant, or (xi) military discharge papers.
(4) A person who is unable to present the documentation required
under subsection (3)(c) or (d) of this section shall be issued a
provisional ballot.
(5) The secretary of state shall prescribe an oath required by
subsection (3)(b) of this section. The oath must include a statement
that the person has not already voted at the election for which the
person is registering to vote.
(6) A person who registers to vote under this section may not be
challenged on the grounds that the person's registration does not
appear in an official list of eligible voters.
(7) The county auditor or registration assistant shall register a
person registering to vote under this section in the manner provided in
this chapter.
(8) If a voter registration application submitted pursuant to this
section is incomplete under this section or RCW 29A.08.110, or cannot
be matched by the secretary of state pursuant to RCW 29A.08.107, and
the deficiency or discrepancy has not been resolved prior to
certification of the election, the ballot submitted by the applicant
shall not be counted.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.08.140 and 2006 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The registration files of all precincts shall be closed against
transfers for thirty days immediately preceding every primary, special
election, and general election to be held in such precincts.
The county auditor shall give notice of the closing of the precinct
files for transfer and notice of the special registration and voting
procedures provided by RCW 29A.08.145 and section 1 of this act by one
publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at
least five days before the closing of the precinct files.
No person may vote at any primary, special election, or general
election in a precinct polling place unless he or she has registered to
vote at least thirty days before that primary or election and appears
on the official statewide voter registration list or has registered to
vote under section 1 of this act. If a person, otherwise qualified to
vote in the state, county, and precinct in which he or she applies for
registration, does not register at least thirty days before any
primary, special election, or general election, he or she may register
and vote by absentee ballot for that primary or election under RCW
29A.08.145 or may register and vote on the day of the election under
section 1 of this act.

--- END ---