BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax imposed and collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW,
less any credits allowed under chapter 82.14 RCW, on initial
construction of a street, place, road highway, easement, right-of-way,
bridge, tunnel, or trestle in which eighty percent of the cost of the
project must be recovered through tolls, shall be transferred to the
tolling account of the project and used to lower the overall cost of
the project and thereby the corresponding tolls.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.46.060 and 2002 c 114 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person, including the department of transportation and any
private entity or entities, may apply for deferral of taxes on the site
preparation for, the construction of, the acquisition of any related
machinery and equipment which will become a part of, and the rental of
equipment for use in the state route number 16 corridor improvements
project under this chapter. Application shall be made to the
department of revenue in a form and manner prescribed by the department
of revenue. The application shall contain information regarding
estimated or actual costs, time schedules for completion and operation,
and other information required by the department of revenue. The
department of revenue shall approve the application within sixty days
if it meets the requirements of this section.
(2) The department of revenue shall issue a sales and use tax
deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under
chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on the project.
(3) The department of transportation or a private entity granted a
tax deferral under this section shall begin paying the deferred taxes
in the fifth year after the date certified by the department of revenue
as the date on which the project is operationally complete. The first
payment is due on December 31st of the fifth calendar year after such
certified date, with subsequent annual payments due on December 31st of
the following nine years. Each payment shall equal ten percent of the
deferred tax. The project is operationally complete under this section
when the collection of tolls is commenced for the state route number 16
improvements covered by the deferral.
(4) The department of revenue may authorize an accelerated
repayment schedule upon request of the department of transportation or
a private entity granted a deferral under this section.
(5) Interest shall not be charged on any taxes deferred under this
section for the period of deferral, although all other penalties and
interest applicable to delinquent excise taxes may be assessed and
imposed for delinquent payments under this section. The debt for
deferred taxes is not extinguished by insolvency or other failure of
the private entity. Transfer of ownership does not terminate the
deferral.
(6) Applications and any other information received by the
department of revenue under this section are not confidential and are
subject to disclosure. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration
of this section.
(7) Taxes due under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW on the site
preparation for, the construction of, the acquisition of any related
machinery and equipment that will become a part of, and the rental of
equipment for use in the state route number 16 corridor improvements
for which a deferral has been granted need not be repaid.

--- END ---