BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) One of the primary purposes of this section is to enable
injured participants to return to their regular occupation, business,
or profession, or to engage in any occupation or perform any work for
compensation or profit. To this end, the state board shall utilize the
services of individuals and organizations, public or private, whose
experience, training, and interests in vocational rehabilitation and
retraining qualify them to lend expert assistance to the state board in
such programs of vocational rehabilitation as may be reasonable to make
the participant return to his or her regular occupation, business, or
profession, or to engage in any occupation or perform any work for
compensation or profit consistent with his or her physical and mental
status. After evaluation and recommendation by such individuals or
organizations and prior to final evaluation of the participant's
permanent disability, if in the sole opinion of the state board,
whether or not medical treatment has been concluded, vocational
rehabilitation is both necessary and likely to enable the injured
participant to return to his or her regular occupation, business, or
profession, or to engage in any occupation or perform any work for
compensation or profit, the state board may, in its sole discretion,
pay the cost as provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(2) When, in the sole discretion of the state board, vocational
rehabilitation is both necessary and likely to make the participant
return to his or her regular occupation, business, or profession, or to
engage in any occupation or perform any work for compensation or
profit, then the following order of priorities shall be used:
(a) Return to the previous job with the same employer;
(b) Modification of the previous job with the same employer
including transitional return to work;
(c) A new job with the same employer in keeping with any
limitations or restrictions;
(d) Modification of a new job with the same employer including
transitional return to work;
(e) Modification of the previous job with a new employer;
(f) A new job with a new employer or self-employment based upon
transferable skills;
(g) Modification of a new job with a new employer;
(h) A new job with a new employer or self-employment involving
on-the-job training;
(i) Short-term retraining and job placement.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, costs for
vocational rehabilitation benefits allowed by the state board under
subsection (1) of this section may include the cost of books, tuition,
fees, supplies, equipment, transportation, child or dependent care, and
other necessary expenses in an amount not to exceed four thousand
dollars. This amount must be used within fifty-two weeks of the
determination that vocational rehabilitation is permitted under this
section.
(b) The expenses allowed under (a) of this subsection may include
training fees for on-the-job training and the cost of furnishing tools
and other equipment necessary for self-employment or reemployment.
However, compensation or payment of retraining with job placement
expenses under (a) of this subsection may not be authorized for a
period of more than fifty-two weeks, except that such period may, in
the sole discretion of the state board, after its review, be extended
for an additional fifty-two weeks or portion thereof by written order
of the state board. However, under no circumstances shall the total
amount of benefit paid under this section exceed four thousand dollars.
(4) In addition to the vocational rehabilitation expenditures
provided for under subsection (3) of this section, an additional five
thousand dollars may, upon authorization of the state board, be
expended for: (a) Accommodations for an injured participant that are
medically necessary for participation in an approved retraining plan;
and (b) accommodations necessary to perform the essential functions of
an occupation in which an injured participant is seeking employment,
consistent with the retraining plan or the recommendations of a
vocational evaluation. The injured participant's attending physician
or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner must verify the
necessity of the modifications or accommodations. The total
expenditures authorized in this subsection shall not exceed five
thousand dollars.
(5) The state board shall follow the established criteria set forth
by the department of labor and industries to monitor the quality and
effectiveness of rehabilitation services provided by the individuals
and organizations used under subsection (1) of this section. The
state board shall make referrals for vocational rehabilitation services
based on these performance criteria.
(6) The state board may engage, where feasible and cost-effective,
in a cooperative program with the state employment security department
to provide job placement services under this section.
(7) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the vocational
benefits provided for in this section are available to participants who
have claims currently pending as of the effective date of this section
or whose injury occurred on or after January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---