BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.315.195 and 2006 c 263 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A proposed change in school district organization by transfer
of territory from one school district to another may be initiated by a
petition in writing presented to the educational service district
superintendent((:
(a))) signed by at least fifty percent plus one of the active
registered voters residing in the territory proposed to be
transferred((; or
(b) Signed by a majority of the members of the board of directors
of one of the districts affected by a proposed transfer of territory)).
(2) The petition shall state the name and number of each district
affected, describe the boundaries of the territory proposed to be
transferred, and state the reasons for desiring the change and the
number of children of school age, if any, residing in the territory.
(3) The educational service district superintendent shall not
complete any transfer of territory under this section that involves ten
percent or more of the common school student population of the entire
district from which the transfer is proposed, unless the educational
service district superintendent has first called and held a special
election of the voters of the entire school district from which the
transfer of territory is proposed. The purpose of the election is to
afford those voters an opportunity to approve or reject the proposed
transfer. A simple majority shall determine approval or rejection.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction may establish rules
limiting the frequency of petitions that may be filed pertaining to
territory included in whole or in part in a previous petition.
(5) Upon receipt of the petition, the educational service district
superintendent shall notify in writing the affected districts that:
(a) ((Each school district board of directors, whether or not
initiating a proposed transfer of territory, is required to enter into
negotiations with the affected district or districts;
(b) In the case of a citizen-initiated petition, the affected
districts)) Each school district board of directors must negotiate on
the entire proposed transfer of territory;
(((c))) (b) The districts have ninety calendar days in which to
agree to the proposed transfer of territory;
(((d))) (c) The districts may request and shall be granted by the
educational service district superintendent one thirty-day extension to
try to reach agreement; and
(((e))) (d) Any district involved in the negotiations may at any
time during the ninety-day period notify the educational service
district superintendent in writing that agreement will not be possible.
(6) If the negotiating school boards cannot come to agreement about
the proposed transfer of territory, the educational service district
superintendent, if requested by the affected districts, shall appoint
a mediator. The mediator has thirty days to work with the affected
school districts to see if an agreement can be reached on the proposed
transfer of territory.
(7) ((If the affected school districts cannot come to agreement
about the proposed transfer of territory, and the districts do not
request the services of a mediator or the mediator was unable to bring
the districts to agreement, either district may file with the
educational service district superintendent a written request for a
hearing by the regional committee.
(8))) If the affected school districts cannot come to agreement
about the proposed transfer of territory ((initiated by citizen
petition)), and the districts do not request the services of a mediator
or the mediator was unable to bring the districts to agreement, the
district in which the citizens who filed the petition reside shall file
with the educational service district superintendent a written request
for a hearing by the regional committee, unless a majority of the
citizen petitioners request otherwise.
(((9))) (8) Upon receipt of a notice under subsection (7) ((or
(8))) of this section, the educational service district superintendent
shall notify the chair of the regional committee in writing within ten
days.
(((10))) (9) Costs incurred by school districts under this section
shall be reimbursed by the state from such funds as are appropriated
for this purpose.

--- END ---