BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that:
(a) A significant number of this state's population have some form
of chronic kidney disease, including persons with seriously reduced
kidney function that may progress to end stage renal disease, requiring
kidney dialysis or the receipt of a kidney by transplant;
(b) End stage renal disease is usually the result of years of
chronic kidney disease caused by diabetes, high blood pressure, or a
family history of chronic kidney disease as the primary contributing
factors;
(c) The treatment of chronic kidney disease is a significant
expense, and the early diagnosis and effective treatment of chronic
kidney disease can prolong lives and delay the high cost of treatment,
including dialysis or transplantation, or both; and
(d) There are existing, cost-effective laboratory test calculations
that can assist in the early diagnosis of chronic kidney disease.
The legislature, therefore, finds that a systematic study of
chronic kidney disease and its impacts will benefit the public health
and welfare of the state.
(2)(a) A joint legislative task force on chronic kidney disease is
established, with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives jointly shall appoint the following members:
(A) Three members who are physicians licensed to practice in this
state, one each representing specialties in nephrology, pathology, and
primary care;
(B) One member who is a registered nurse practicing in the renal
field;
(C) One member representing a private renal care provider;
(D) One member representing a nonprofit kidney center;
(E) One member representing insurance carriers;
(F) One member representing hospitals or clinical laboratories;
(G) One member representing patients or a nongovernmental
organization active in chronic kidney disease advocacy.
(iv) The governor shall appoint one member representing the health
care authority.
(b) The department of health shall cooperate with the task force
and provide information as the cochairs may reasonably request.
(c) The task force shall choose its cochairs from among its
legislative membership.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Study and make recommendations on all aspects of chronic kidney
disease, including its complications and how the disease affects this
state's population;
(b) Develop a plan to educate the public and health care
professionals about the advantages and methods of early screening,
diagnosis, and treatment of chronic kidney disease and its
complications based on the kidney disease outcomes quality initiative
clinical practice guidelines for chronic kidney disease or other
medically recognized clinical practice guidelines;
(c) Develop a plan to educate health care professionals and people
with chronic kidney disease about early renal replacement therapy,
including in-center dialysis, home hemodialysis, home peritoneal
dialysis, as well as access options and transplantation, prior to the
onset of end stage renal disease when kidney function is declining; and
(d) Make recommendations on the implementation of a cost-effective
plan for early screening, diagnosis, and treatment for persons at risk
of chronic kidney disease.
(4) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by the
senate committee services and the house of representatives office of
program research.
(5) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.
(7) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2007.
(8) This section expires January 1, 2008.

--- END ---