BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35A.12.180 and 1994 c 223 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
At any time not within three months previous to a municipal general
election, the council of a noncharter code city organized under this
chapter may divide the city into wards or change the boundaries of
existing wards. The qualified electors or the council of a noncharter
code city located east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range that
has an estimated population greater than eighty thousand but less than
one hundred eighty thousand and is intersected by Interstate 90 may
divide the city into wards or change the boundaries of existing wards
at any time not within three months previous to a municipal general
election. No change in the boundaries of wards shall affect the term
of any councilmember, and councilmembers shall serve out their terms in
the wards of their residences at the time of their elections:
PROVIDED, That if this results in one ward being represented by more
councilmembers than the number to which it is entitled those having the
shortest unexpired terms shall be assigned by the council to wards
where there is a vacancy, and the councilmembers so assigned shall be
deemed to be residents of the wards to which they are assigned for
purposes of those positions being vacant. The representation of each
ward in the city council shall be in proportion to the population as
nearly as is practicable.
Wards shall be redrawn as provided in chapter ((29.70)) 29A.76 RCW.
Wards shall be used as follows: (1) Only a resident of the ward may be
a candidate for, or hold office as, a councilmember of the ward; and
(2) only voters of the ward may vote at a primary to nominate
candidates for a councilmember of the ward. Voters of the entire city
may vote at the general election to elect a councilmember of a ward,
unless the city had prior to January 1, 1994, limited the voting in the
general election for any or all council positions to only voters
residing within the ward associated with the council positions. If a
city had so limited the voting in the general election to only voters
residing within the ward, then the city shall be authorized to continue
to do so.

--- END ---