BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, an
eligible person is allowed a credit against the tax due under this
chapter. The credit is based on qualified employment positions in
eligible call centers located within the state of Washington.
(2) The credit under this section is one thousand dollars for each
qualified employment position created after the effective date of this
act. A credit is earned if the employment position is filled for at
least a year. A person may not take a credit for an employment
position until the credit is earned. An additional credit is earned
for each additional year the position is filled, up to four years.
(3) The credit under this section may be used against taxes due
under this chapter and a credit earned during one calendar year may be
carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent
calendar year. A person is not eligible to receive a credit under this
section if the person is receiving a tax preference under any other
provision of law for the same employment position. No refunds may be
granted for credits under this section.
(4) To qualify for the credit under this section:
(a) All employees working at the eligible call center must be
working legally within the United States and at least seventy-five
percent of the employees working within the eligible call center
directly provide product support or product information services;
(b) The person may not encourage or discourage unionization;
(c) At least ninety percent of the employees of the eligible person
and any person that has a controlling interest in the eligible person,
must work within the United States; and
(d) Health care benefits must be available to all employees working
at the eligible call center through the person receiving the credit.
(5) A person may not take a cumulative amount of credit under this
section in excess of five hundred thousand dollars.
(6)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources, the
legislature needs information to evaluate whether the stated goals of
legislation were achieved. A person taking a credit under this section
shall make an annual survey to the department as provided in section 2
of this act.
(b) The goal of the tax credit authorized under this section is to
encourage the creation, expansion, and retention of family wage jobs in
call centers.
(7) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Eligible call center" means a single facility or work space
that meets all of the following requirements:
(i) The facility or work space is primarily used to provide product
support or product information services through telephonic, electronic
mail, or any other widely accepted means of communication; and
(ii) The facility or work space is at least five thousand square
feet.
(b) "Eligible person" means a person that maintains at least twenty
qualified employment positions at an eligible call center every
calendar year in which credit is taken under this section.
(c)(i) "Encourage or discourage unionization" means attempting to
influence the decision of the person's employees in this state
regarding whether to support or oppose an employee organization that
represents or seeks to represent those employees for the purpose of
collective bargaining, or become a member of an employee organization.
(ii) "Encourage or discourage unionization" does not mean:
(A) Addressing a grievance or negotiating or administering a
collective bargaining agreement;
(B) Allowing an employee organization or its representatives access
to the employer's facilities or property;
(C) Performing an activity required by federal or state law or by
a collective bargaining agreement; or
(D) Negotiating, entering into, or carrying out a voluntary
recognition agreement with an employee organization.
(d) "Qualified employee" means an employee that has graduated from
an institution of higher education located within the state of
Washington.
(e) "Qualified employment position" means a position that pays at
least one hundred twenty percent of the minimum wage required under RCW
49.46.020(4) to a qualified employee and the position requires the
qualified employee to average at least thirty-five hours per week on an
annualized basis.
(8) This section expires January 1, 2012. A credit may be claimed
under this section on or after January 1, 2012, for any credit earned
during a reporting period ending before January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each person claiming a tax preference that requires a survey
under this section must report information to the department by filing
a complete annual survey. The survey is due by March 31st of the year
following any calendar year in which the tax preference is taken. The
department may extend the due date for timely filing of annual surveys
under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey must
include the amount of the tax preference taken. The survey must also
include the following information for employment positions in
Washington:
(a) The number of total employment positions;
(b) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(c) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(d) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(2) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of, or determine eligibility for, the tax
preference, to be submitted at the same time as the survey.
(3) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax preference taken, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW
82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax preference taken is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330. If the
amount of the tax preference taken as reported on the survey is
different than the amount actually taken or otherwise allowed by the
department based on the taxpayer's excise tax returns or other
information known to the department, the amount actually taken or
allowed may be disclosed.
(4) If a person fails to submit an annual survey under this section
by the due date of the report or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the
department shall declare the amount of the tax preference taken for the
previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable. The
department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the amounts due
under this section. The interest must be assessed at the rate provided
for delinquent taxes under this chapter, retroactively to the date the
credit was claimed, and must accrue until the taxes for which the
credit was claimed are repaid. This information is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330.
(5) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "tax preference" has the
meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and includes only the tax
preferences requiring a survey under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.32.590 and 2006 c 354 s 17, 2006 c 300 s 10, 2006
c 177 s 8, 2006 c 112 s 7, and 2006 c 84 s 7 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey or annual report under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.5351,
82.32.650, 82.32.635, 82.32.640, 82.32.630, 82.32.610, section 2 of
this act, or 82.74.040 by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall extend the
time for filing the survey or report. Such extension shall be for a
period of thirty days from the date the department issues its written
notification to the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under
this section. The department may grant additional extensions as it
deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey or annual report by the due date was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department
shall be guided by rules adopted by the department for the waiver or
cancellation of penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of
any tax was due to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.32.600 and 2006 c 354 s 16, 2006 c 300 s 11, 2006
c 178 s 9, 2006 c 177 s 9, and 2006 c 84 s 8 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file annual surveys or annual reports under
RCW 82.04.4452 ((or)), 82.32.5351, or section 2 of this act must
electronically file with the department all surveys, reports, returns,
and any other forms or information the department requires in an
electronic format as provided or approved by the department. As used
in this section, "returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW
82.32.050.
(2) Any survey, report, return, or any other form or information
required to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of
this section is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect August 1, 2007.

--- END ---