BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.70.010 and 2004 c 224 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" has the meaning provided in RCW 80.50.020 and
includes an applicant for a permit for a fossil-fueled thermal electric
generation facility subject to RCW 70.94.152 and 80.70.020(1) (b) or
(d).
(2) "Authority" means any air pollution control agency whose
jurisdictional boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of one or
more counties.
(3) "Baseload generation" means electricity generation from a
fossil-fueled power plant that is designed and intended to provide
electricity at an annualized plant capacity factor of at least sixty
percent.
(4) "Carbon credit" means a verified reduction in carbon dioxide or
carbon dioxide equivalents that is registered with a state, national,
or international trading authority or exchange that has been recognized
by the council.
(((4))) (5) "Carbon dioxide equivalents" means a metric measure
used to compare the emissions from various greenhouse gases based upon
their global warming potential.
(((5))) (6) "Cogeneration credit" means the carbon dioxide
emissions that the council, department, or authority, as appropriate,
estimates would be produced on an annual basis by a stand-alone
industrial and commercial facility equivalent in operating
characteristics and output to the industrial or commercial heating or
cooling process component of the cogeneration plant.
(((6))) (7) "Cogeneration plant" means a fossil-fueled thermal
power plant in which the heat or steam is also used for industrial or
commercial heating or cooling purposes and that meets federal energy
regulatory commission standards for qualifying facilities under the
public utility regulatory policies act of 1978.
(((7))) (8) "Commercial operation" means the date that the first
electricity produced by a facility is delivered for commercial sale to
the power grid.
(((8))) (9) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation
commission.
(10) "Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council
created by RCW 80.50.030.
(((9))) (11) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(((10))) (12) "Fossil fuel" means natural gas, petroleum, coal, or
any form of solid, liquid, or gaseous fuel derived from such material
to produce heat for the generation of electricity.
(((11))) (13) "Load-serving utility" means every consumer-owned and
investor-owned utility serving electricity to end use customers in the
state.
(14) "Long-term financial commitment" means: (a) A new ownership
investment in baseload generation; or (b) a new or renewed contract
with a term of five or more years, which includes procurement of
baseload generation.
(15) "Mitigation plan" means a proposal that includes the process
or means to achieve carbon dioxide mitigation through use of mitigation
projects or carbon credits.
(((12))) (16) "Mitigation project" means one or more of the
following:
(a) Projects or actions that are implemented by the certificate
holder or order of approval holder, directly or through its agent, or
by an independent qualified organization to mitigate the emission of
carbon dioxide produced by the fossil-fueled thermal electric
generation facility. This term includes but is not limited to the use
of, energy efficiency measures, clean and efficient transportation
measures, qualified alternative energy resources, demand side
management of electricity consumption, and carbon sequestration
programs;
(b) Direct application of combined heat and power (cogeneration);
(c) Verified carbon credits traded on a recognized trading
authority or exchange; or
(d) Enforceable and permanent reductions in carbon dioxide or
carbon dioxide equivalents through process change, equipment shutdown,
or other activities under the control of the applicant and approved as
part of a carbon dioxide mitigation plan.
(((13))) (17) "Order of approval" means an order issued under RCW
70.94.152 with respect to a fossil-fueled thermal electric generation
facility subject to RCW 80.70.020(1) (b) or (d).
(((14))) (18) "Permanent" means that emission reductions used to
offset emission increases are assured for the life of the corresponding
increase, whether unlimited or limited in duration.
(((15))) (19) "Qualified alternative energy resource" has the same
meaning as in RCW 19.29A.090.
(((16))) (20) "Station generating capability" means the maximum
load a generator can sustain over a given period of time without
exceeding design limits, and measured using maximum continuous electric
generation capacity, less net auxiliary load, at average ambient
temperature and barometric pressure.
(((17))) (21) "Total carbon dioxide emissions" means:
(a) For a fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facility
described under RCW 80.70.020(1) (a) and (b), the amount of carbon
dioxide emitted over a thirty-year period based on the manufacturer's
or designer's guaranteed total net station generating capability, new
equipment heat rate, an assumed sixty percent capacity factor for
facilities under the council's jurisdiction or sixty percent of the
operational limitations on facilities subject to an order of approval,
and taking into account any enforceable limitations on operational
hours or fuel types and use; ((and))
(b) For a fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facility
described under RCW 80.70.020(1) (c) and (d), the amount of carbon
dioxide emitted over a thirty-year period based on the proposed
increase in the amount of electrical output of the facility that
exceeds the station generation capability of the facility prior to the
applicant applying for certification or an order of approval pursuant
to RCW 80.70.020(1) (c) and (d), new equipment heat rate, an assumed
sixty percent capacity factor for facilities under the council's
jurisdiction or sixty percent of the operational limitations on
facilities subject to an order of approval, and taking into account any
enforceable limitations on operational hours or fuel types and use; and
(c) For a load-serving utility, the amount of carbon dioxide
emitted by a fossil-fueled thermal electric power plant over the
duration of a long-term financial commitment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 80.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Any load-serving utility that enters into a long-term
financial commitment for baseload generation located outside the
borders of the state shall provide mitigation for twenty percent of the
total carbon dioxide emissions produced by the fossil-fueled thermal
electric power plant or plants over the period of the commitment.
(b) The load-serving utility shall develop a carbon dioxide
mitigation plan detailing how the utility plans to mitigate carbon
dioxide emissions under this section.
(2) The load-serving utility shall choose one or a combination of
the following carbon dioxide mitigation options to mitigate for twenty
percent of the total carbon dioxide emission:
(a) Payment to a third party to provide mitigation;
(b) Direct purchase of permanent carbon credits as specified under
RCW 80.70.030; or
(c) Investment in load-serving utility-controlled carbon dioxide
mitigation projects, including combined heat and power (cogeneration).
(3) If the load-serving utility chooses to pay a third party to
provide the mitigation, the mitigation rate shall be one dollar and
sixty cents per metric ton of carbon dioxide to be mitigated. For a
cogeneration plant, the monetary amount is based on the difference
between twenty percent of the total carbon dioxide emissions and the
cogeneration credit.
(a) The council may by rule adjust the rate per ton biennially as
long as any increase or decrease does not exceed fifty percent of the
current rate.
(b) In adjusting the mitigation rate the council shall consider,
but is not limited to, the current market price of a ton of carbon
dioxide. The council's adjusted mitigation rate must be consistent
with RCW 80.50.010(3).
(4) The load-serving utility may choose to make to the third party
a lump sum payment or partial payment over a period of five years.
(a) Under the lump sum payment option, the payment amount is
determined by multiplying the total carbon dioxide emissions by the
twenty percent mitigation requirement under subsection (1)(a) of this
section and by the per ton mitigation rate established under subsection
(3) of this section.
(b) No later than one hundred twenty days after the start of the
long-term financial commitment, the load-serving utility shall make a
one-time payment to the independent qualified organization for the
amount determined under subsection (3) of this section.
(c) As an alternative to a one-time payment, the load-serving
utility may make a partial payment of twenty percent of the amount
determined under subsection (3) of this section no later than one
hundred twenty days after entering into a long-term financial
commitment and a payment in the same amount or as adjusted according to
subsection (3)(a) of this section, on the anniversary date of the
initial payment in each of the following four years. With the initial
payment, the load-serving utility shall provide a letter of credit or
other comparable security acceptable to the council or the department
for the remaining eighty percent mitigation payment amount including
possible changes to the rate per metric ton made by the council by rule
under subsection (3)(a) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 80.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The carbon dioxide mitigation option that provides for direct
investment must be implemented through mitigation projects conducted
directly by, or under the control of, the load-serving utility.
(2)(a) For investor-owned utilities, mitigation projects must be
approved by the commission.
(b) For consumer-owned utilities, mitigation projects must be
approved by the governing board.
(c) Direct investment mitigation projects must be approved if the
mitigation projects provide a reasonable certainty that the performance
requirements of the mitigation projects will be achieved and the
mitigation projects were implemented after July 1, 2004.
(d) No load-serving utility is required to make direct investments
that would exceed the cost of making a lump sum payment to a third
party had the load-serving utility chosen that option under this
chapter.
(3) Mitigation projects must be fully in place within a reasonable
time after the start of the long-term financial commitment. Failure to
implement an approved mitigation plan is subject to enforcement under
chapter 80.50 or 70.94 RCW.
(4) The load-serving utility may not use more than twenty percent
of the total funds for the selection, monitoring, and evaluation of
mitigation projects and the management and enforcement of contracts.
(5)(a) For facilities under the jurisdiction of the commission, the
implementation of a carbon dioxide mitigation project, other than a
purchase of carbon dioxide equivalent emission reduction credits, must
be monitored by the commission.
(b) For facilities under the jurisdiction of a governing board, the
implementation of a carbon dioxide mitigation project, other than a
purchase of carbon dioxide equivalent emission reduction credits, must
be monitored by the governing board.
(6) Upon promulgation of federal requirements for carbon dioxide
mitigation for fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facilities,
those requirements may be deemed by the commission or governing boards
to be equivalent and a replacement for the requirements of this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 80.70.070 and 2004 c 224 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission, council, department, and authority shall adopt
rules to carry out this chapter.

--- END ---