BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.032 and 1995 c 239 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any teacher, as defined under RCW 41.32.010, who is first
employed by a public school on or after June 7, 1984, shall become a
member of the retirement system if otherwise eligible.
(2) Any person who either before June 7, 1984, has established
service credit under chapter 41.40 RCW while employed in an educational
staff associate position and who is employed in such a position on or
after June 7, 1984, or who is at least age fifty-five, has established
service credit under the plan 1 provisions of chapter 41.40 RCW, and
who is employed in a position as an educational staff associate
position after July 1, 2007, has the following options:
(a) To remain a member of the public employees' retirement system
notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 41.32.240 or 41.32.780; or
(b) To irrevocably elect to join the retirement system under this
chapter and to receive service credit for previous periods of
employment in any position included under RCW 41.32.010. This service
credit and corresponding employee contribution shall be computed as
though the person had then been a member of the retirement system under
this chapter. All employee contributions credited to a member under
chapter 41.40 RCW for service now to be credited to the retirement
system under this chapter shall be transferred to the system and the
member shall not receive any credit nor enjoy any rights under chapter
41.40 RCW for those periods of service. The member shall pay any
difference between the employee contributions made under chapter 41.40
RCW and transferred under this subsection and what would have been
required under this chapter, including interest as set by the director.
The member shall be given until July 1, 1989, to make the irrevocable
election permitted under this section. The election shall be made by
submitting written notification as required by the department
requesting credit under this section and by remitting any necessary
proof of service or payments within the time set by the department.
Any person, not employed as an educational staff associate on June
7, 1984, may, before June 30 of the fifth school year after that
person's return to employment as a teacher, request and establish
membership and credit under this subsection.

--- END ---