BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.608 and 1975 c 62 s 46 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All motorcycles are entitled to full use of a lane and no motor
vehicle shall be driven in such a manner as to deprive any motorcycle
of the full use of a lane. This subsection shall not apply to
motorcycles operated two abreast in a single lane.
(2) The operator of a motorcycle shall not overtake and pass in the
same lane occupied by the vehicle being overtaken, except as permitted
in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) No person shall operate a motorcycle between lanes of traffic
or between adjacent lines or rows of vehicles, unless (a) the average
speed of traffic at any time is substantially slower than the posted
speed limit for the roadway, (b) there are two or more lanes of traffic
for vehicles proceeding in the same direction at that time, and (c) a
reasonable and prudent operator of a motorcycle would consider it safe
to operate a motorcycle no more than ten miles per hour over the
average speed of traffic at that time between the lanes of traffic.
As used in this subsection, "substantially slower" means a speed
that is half or less than half of the posted speed limit.
(4) Motorcycles shall not be operated more than two abreast in a
single lane.
(5) The restrictions imposed by subsections (2) and (3) of this
section shall not apply to police officers in the performance of their
official duties.

--- END ---