BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the goal of
Washington's education reform is for all students to meet rigorous
academic standards so that they are prepared for success in college,
work, and life. The knowledge and skills needed for high school
graduates to be successful in today's technology-driven workplace are
no less than the knowledge and skills students need to complete entry-level college coursework, particularly in English and mathematics. A
clear target is needed for students, parents, and educators as to the
purpose and expectations of today's high school diploma.
(2) The legislature further finds that some students will take
longer to meet the state's standards for high school graduation. Older
students who are not on track to graduate with their peers should be
provided an appropriate learning environment. The continued education
of these students remains the paramount duty of the state of Washington
until these students turn twenty-one or achieve a meaningful high
school diploma.
(3) Therefore the legislature intends to redefine the purpose and
expectations of the high school diploma and provide extended learning
opportunities through college and career readiness centers, funded
under the basic education act, for students not on track to graduate
from high school with their peers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section and section 3 of this act,
"eligible student" means a student who is over age sixteen but less
than age twenty-one as of September 1st of the academic year the
student enrolls in the school district.
(2) School districts that enroll eligible students shall enter into
contracts with one or more community or technical colleges to deliver
courses or programs through college and career readiness centers as
provided under section 3 of this act to enable the students to obtain
a meaningful high school diploma. School districts shall report
eligible students who are attending college and career readiness
centers as district enrollment.
(3) An eligible student shall have the option to attend a college
or career readiness center or remain enrolled in a high school or other
school district program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In accordance with this section, each community or technical
college shall make available courses or a program of study designed to
enable eligible students over the age of sixteen but under the age of
twenty-one to complete their high school education and obtain a
meaningful high school diploma.
(2) Colleges shall enter into contracts with local school districts
to deliver the courses or programs under this section at college and
career readiness centers operated by the college at locations other
than the high school campus. Colleges shall be reimbursed for each
enrolled eligible student as provided in the contract.
(3) Courses or programs at college and career readiness centers
shall be available during the day, in the evenings, on weekends, and
during the summer months. The college shall attempt to accommodate
students who are working while they are attending the programs. The
instruction and curriculum offered shall be age-appropriate for the
adult learner.
(4) The high school diploma for an eligible student enrolled in a
college and career readiness center shall be issued by the local school
district based on the student's completion of all state and local
graduation requirements.
(5) Colleges shall not require eligible students enrolled in a
college and career readiness center to pay tuition or services and
activities fees, however this waiver of tuition and services and
activities fees shall be in effect only for those courses that lead to
a high school diploma.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.15.520 and 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the community colleges may:
(1) Waive all or a portion of tuition fees and services and
activities fees for:
(a) Students ((nineteen)) twenty-one years of age or older who are
eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW
28B.15.012 through 28B.15.015 and who enroll in a course of study or
program which will enable them to finish their high school education
and obtain a high school diploma or certificate; and
(b) Children of any law enforcement officer or firefighter who lost
his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while
employed by any public law enforcement agency or full time or volunteer
fire department in this state: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive
the waiver only if they begin their course of study at a community
college within ten years of their graduation from high school;
(2) Waive all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees
differential for:
(a) Nonresident students enrolled in a community college course of
study or program which will enable them to finish their high school
education and obtain a high school diploma or certificate but who are
not eligible for the program offered under section 3 of this act. The
waiver shall be in effect only for those courses which lead to a high
school diploma or certificate; and
(b) Up to forty percent of the students enrolled in the regional
education program for deaf students, subject to federal funding of such
program.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2006 c 161 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(3) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2009-10, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2008-09 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
under RCW 28C.04.610.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
under section 3 of this act for the purpose of obtaining a high school
diploma.
(8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the University
of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases beginning
in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to assist needy
low and middle income resident law students.
(((8))) (9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09,
institutions of higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten
percent of all revenues received as a result of graduate academic
school tuition increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through
academic year 2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident
graduate academic students.

--- END ---