BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.14.010 and 2002 c 146 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Campus facilities master plan" means the area that is defined
by the University of Washington as necessary for the future growth and
development of its campus facilities for branch campuses authorized
under RCW 28B.45.020.
(2) "City" means either (a) a city or town with a population of at
least thirty thousand or (b) the largest city or town, if there is no
city or town with a population of at least thirty thousand, located in
a county planning under the growth management act.
(((2))) (3) "Governing authority" means the local legislative
authority of a city having jurisdiction over the property for which an
exemption may be applied for under this chapter.
(((3))) (4) "Growth management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.
(((4))) (5) "Multiple-unit housing" means a building having four or
more dwelling units not designed or used as transient accommodations
and not including hotels and motels. Multifamily units may result from
new construction or rehabilitated or conversion of vacant,
underutilized, or substandard buildings to multifamily housing.
(((5))) (6) "Owner" means the property owner of record.
(((6))) (7) "Permanent residential occupancy" means multiunit
housing that provides either rental or owner occupancy on a
nontransient basis. This includes owner-occupied or rental
accommodation that is leased for a period of at least one month. This
excludes hotels and motels that predominately offer rental
accommodation on a daily or weekly basis.
(((7))) (8) "Rehabilitation improvements" means modifications to
existing structures, that are vacant for twelve months or longer, that
are made to achieve a condition of substantial compliance with existing
building codes or modification to existing occupied structures which
increase the number of multifamily housing units.
(((8))) (9) "Residential targeted area" means an area within an
urban center that has been designated by the governing authority as a
residential targeted area in accordance with this chapter. With
respect to designations after the effective date of this section,
"residential targeted area" may not include a campus facilities master
plan.
(((9))) (10) "Substantial compliance" means compliance with local
building or housing code requirements that are typically required for
rehabilitation as opposed to new construction.
(((10))) (11) "Urban center" means a compact identifiable district
where urban residents may obtain a variety of products and services.
An urban center must contain:
(a) Several existing or previous, or both, business establishments
that may include but are not limited to shops, offices, banks,
restaurants, governmental agencies;
(b) Adequate public facilities including streets, sidewalks,
lighting, transit, domestic water, and sanitary sewer systems; and
(c) A mixture of uses and activities that may include housing,
recreation, and cultural activities in association with either
commercial or office, or both, use.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.14.060 and 1995 c 375 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The duly authorized administrative official or committee of the
city may approve the application if it finds that:
(((1))) (a) A minimum of four new units are being constructed or in
the case of occupied rehabilitation or conversion a minimum of four
additional multifamily units are being developed;
(((2))) (b) The proposed project is or will be, at the time of
completion, in conformance with all local plans and regulations that
apply at the time the application is approved;
(((3))) (c) The owner has complied with all standards and
guidelines adopted by the city under this chapter; and
(((4))) (d) The site is located in a residential targeted area of
an urban center that has been designated by the governing authority in
accordance with procedures and guidelines indicated in RCW 84.14.040.
(2) An application may not be approved after the effective date of
this act if any part of the proposed project site is within a campus
facilities master plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---