BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Independent testing in the United States and the European Union
has determined that some cosmetic products contain substances known or
suspected to cause cancer and reproductive toxicity that can harm
mothers, fetuses, and nursing children;
(2) Neither federal nor state law requires premarket safety
testing, review, or approval of cosmetic products. According to the
federal food and drug administration, the regulatory requirements
governing the sale of cosmetics are not as stringent as those that
apply to other regulated products;
(3) Under the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. Sec.
301, cosmetics and their ingredients are not required to be approved
before they are sold to the public, and the federal food and drug
administration does not have the authority to require manufacturers to
file health and safety data on cosmetic ingredients or to order a
recall of a dangerous cosmetic product;
(4) Under the state's uniform Washington food, drugs, and cosmetics
act, no state agency has authority to identify, review, or regulate
ingredients in cosmetic products that may cause chronic health effects,
such as cancer and reproductive toxicity, unless the product is
considered adulterated or misbranded;
(5) Cosmetic products are most heavily used by women of
childbearing age, increasing the likelihood of exposing mothers,
fetuses, and nursing children to substances that can cause cancer and
reproductive toxicity;
(6) Beauty care workers, including cosmetologists and manicurists,
are most exposed to the potentially harmful effects of carcinogens and
reproductive toxins in cosmetics. Cosmetologists and manicurists are
dominated by women and minorities, particularly from Southeast Asia;
(7) Federal law exempts chemicals used as fragrances or flavoring
from being identified as ingredients on the labels of cosmetic
products. Laboratory analyses of cosmetic products sold in various
states have found products that contain substances known to or likely
to cause cancer or reproductive toxicity and not identified as an
ingredient on the product's label. The law also does not require any
ingredient labeling on cosmetic products sold for commercial use,
thereby denying any information on ingredients to beauty care workers;
(8) Alternatives to substances that cause cancer or reproductive
toxicity are readily available for use in cosmetic products. A number
of manufacturers, including both small domestic producers and large
multinational corporations, have eliminated substances that cause
cancer or reproductive toxicity from their products;
(9) Given the presence of substances in cosmetic products that
cause cancer and reproductive toxicity, the heavy use of these products
by women of childbearing age, the significant exposure to these
products in occupational settings such as nail and beauty salons, the
adverse impacts of these substances on human health, the inadequate
information about the presence of these substances in products or the
extent of their impacts, and the availability of alternatives to the
use of these substances, it is in the interest of the people of
Washington to take steps to ensure that cosmetic products sold and used
in the state can be used safely.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Chemical identified as causing cancer or reproductive
toxicity" means a chemical identified by the department of ecology as
developmental or reproductive toxicant or by the department of health
as any of the following:
(a) A substance listed as known or reasonably anticipated to be a
human carcinogen in a national toxicology report on carcinogens;
(b) A substance given an overall carcinogenicity evaluation of
Group 1, Group 2A, or Group 2B by the international agency for research
on cancer;
(c) A substance identified as a Group A, Group B1, or Group B2
carcinogen, or as a known or likely carcinogen by the United States
environmental protection agency; or
(d) A substance identified as having some or clear evidence of
adverse developmental, male reproductive, or female reproductive
toxicity effects in a report by an expert panel of the national
toxicology program's center for the evaluation of risks to human
reproduction.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Incidental ingredient" means:
(a) Substances that have no technical or functional effect in the
cosmetic but are present by reason of having been incorporated into the
cosmetic as an ingredient of another cosmetic ingredient; or
(b) Processing aids, which are as follows:
(i) Substances that are added to a cosmetic during the processing
of such cosmetic but are removed from the cosmetic in accordance with
good manufacturing practices before it is packaged in its finished
form;
(ii) Substances that are added to a cosmetic during processing for
their technical or functional effect in the processing, are converted
to substances the same as constituents of declared ingredients, and do
not significantly increase the concentration of those constituents; or
(iii) Substances that are added to a cosmetic during the processing
of such cosmetic for their technical and functional effect in the
processing but are present in the finished cosmetic at insignificant
levels and do not have any technical or functional effect in that
cosmetic.
(4) "Ingredient" means any single chemical entity or mixture used
as a component in the manufacture of a cosmetic product. It does not
include incidental ingredients that are present in a cosmetic at
insignificant levels and that have no technical or functional effect in
the cosmetic.
(5) "Manufacturer" means any person or entity whose name appears on
the label of a cosmetic product.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Beginning January 1, 2009, the
manufacturer of any cosmetic product subject to regulation by the
federal food and drug administration that is sold in this state shall,
on a schedule and in electronic or other format, as determined by the
department, provide the department with a complete and accurate list of
its cosmetic products that, as of the date of submission, are sold in
the state and that contain any ingredient that is a chemical identified
as causing cancer or reproductive toxicity, including but not limited
to any chemical that:
(a) Is contained in the product for purposes of fragrance or
flavoring; or
(b) Is identified by the phrase "and other ingredients" and
determined to be a trade secret under federal law. Any ingredient
identified pursuant to this subsection shall be considered to be a
trade secret and shall be treated by the department in a manner
consistent with the requirements of Part 20 and Part 720, Title 21,
C.F.R. Any ingredients considered to be a trade secret are exempt from
the public disclosure required by chapter 42.56 RCW.
(2) Any information submitted under subsection (1) of this section
shall identify each chemical both by name and chemical abstract service
number and shall specify the product or products in which the chemical
is contained.
(3) If an ingredient identified under subsection (1) of this
section subsequently is removed from the product in which it was
contained, is removed from the list of chemicals known to cause cancer
or reproductive toxicity, or is no longer a chemical identified as
causing cancer or reproductive toxicity by the department, the
manufacturer of the product containing the ingredient shall submit the
new information to the department. Upon receipt of new information,
the department, after verifying the accuracy of that information, shall
revise the manufacturer's information on record with the department to
reflect the new information. The manufacturer shall not be under
obligation to submit subsequent information on the presence of the
ingredient in the product unless subsequent changes require submittal
of the information.
(4) This section does not apply to any manufacturer of cosmetic
products with annual aggregate sales of cosmetic products, both within
and outside of this state, of less than one million dollars based on
the manufacturer's most recent tax year filing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) To determine potential health effects of
exposure to ingredients in cosmetics sold in the state, the department
may conduct an investigation of one or more cosmetic products that
contain chemicals identified as causing cancer or reproductive toxicity
or other ingredients of concern to the department as follows:
(a) An investigation conducted under this section may include, but
is not limited to, a review of available health effects data and
studies, worksite health hazard evaluations, epidemiological studies to
determine the health effects of exposures to chemicals in various
subpopulations, and exposure assessments to determine total exposures
to individuals in various settings.
(b) If an investigation is conducted under this section, the
manufacturer of any product subject to the investigation may submit
relevant health effects data and studies to the department.
(c) To further the purposes of an investigation under this section,
the department may require manufacturers of products subject to an
investigation to submit to the department relevant health effects data
and studies available to the manufacturer and other available
information as requested by the department, including, but not limited
to, the concentration of the chemical in the product, the amount by
volume or weight of the product that comprises the average daily
application or use, and sales and use data necessary to determine where
the product is used in the occupational setting. The department shall
establish reasonable deadlines for the submittal of information
required. Failure by a manufacturer to submit the information in
compliance with the department's requirements constitutes a violation
of this section and is subject to enforcement under RCW 69.04.060 and
69.04.070.
(2)(a) If the department determines pursuant to an investigation
that an ingredient in a cosmetic product is potentially toxic at the
concentrations present in the product or under the conditions used, the
department shall immediately refer the results of its investigation to
the department of labor and industries.
(b) Within one hundred eighty days after referral under (a) of this
subsection, the department of labor and industries shall, pursuant to
RCW 49.17.050, develop a standard to protect the health of an employee
who has regular exposure to the hazard for the period of his or her
working life, unless the department of labor and industries
affirmatively determines, in a written finding made to the department
within ninety days after referral, that a standard is not necessary to
protect the health of such an employee. The finding shall identify the
reasons for determining the standard is not necessary and the factual
basis for the finding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The cosmetic ingredient review panel is a nongovernmental body
established and funded by the cosmetics industry to review the safety
of cosmetic ingredients;
(b) According to a 2005 analysis by the environmental working
group, ninety-seven cosmetic products violate the cosmetic ingredient
review panel's own safe use recommendations to manufacturers by
containing an ingredient that the cosmetic ingredient review panel has
found is not safe for the specific use indicated on the product's
label; and
(c) Federal regulations require every ingredient in a cosmetic
product and every finished cosmetic product to be adequately
substantiated for safety prior to marketing, and state that any
ingredient or product whose safety has not been adequately
substantiated prior to marketing is misbranded unless it displays a
warning statement declaring, "The safety of this product has not been
determined."
(2) The department may, as early as feasible within existing
resources, determine whether the products identified in subsection
(1)(b) of this section have been adequately substantiated for safety
pursuant to Sec. 740.10, Title 21, C.F.R. For any product adequately
substantiated for safety, the department shall determine if the product
contains any ingredient that the cosmetic ingredient review panel has
found is not safe for the specific use indicated on the product's
label. If the department finds that a product has been adequately
substantiated for safety despite containing an ingredient that the
cosmetic ingredient review panel has found is not safe for the specific
use indicated on the product's label, the department shall refer its
findings to the attorney general and the federal food and drug
administration for possible enforcement action pursuant to RCW
69.04.060 and 69.040.070 and the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act,
21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.

Sec. 6 RCW 69.04.060 and 2003 c 53 s 314 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who violates any provision of RCW 69.04.040 or chapter
69.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 and 8 of this act) is guilty of a
misdemeanor and shall on conviction thereof be subject to the following
penalties:
(1) A fine of not more than two hundred dollars; or
(2) If the violation is committed after a conviction of such person
under this section has become final, imprisonment for not more than
thirty days, or a fine of not more than five hundred dollars, or both
such imprisonment and fine.

Sec. 7 RCW 69.04.070 and 2003 c 53 s 315 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 69.04.060, a person who
violates RCW 69.04.040 or chapter 69.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 and
8 of this act) with intent to defraud or mislead is guilty of a
misdemeanor and the penalty shall be imprisonment for not more than
ninety days, or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or both
such imprisonment and fine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington safe cosmetics act of 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 5 and 8 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.

--- END ---