BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature finds that
Washington consumers have a right to accurate, accessible information
that will assist them in making educated food purchases. The
legislature finds that consumers have an interest in knowing the
benefits and potential risks to their health from the products they
consume. The legislature finds that consumers value knowing when and
where food has been packaged and when technologies such as irradiation
and modified atmosphere packaging have been applied to the foods that
are offered for retail sale. The legislature therefore intends to
increase the disclosure of food information to consumers by enhancing
existing requirements governing the labeling of certain perishable food
products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Food irradiation" means the process of exposing food to
ionizing radiation in order to disinfest, sanitize, sterilize, or
preserve it.
(2) "Labeling" means all labels and other written, printed, or
graphic matter (a) upon any article or any of its containers or
wrappers, or (b) accompanying such an article.
(3) "Modified atmosphere packaging," "reduced-oxygen packaging,"
"low oxygen packaging," "gas flushing packaging," or "vacuum packaging"
means controlling the oxygen content in a package to a level below that
normally found in the surrounding atmosphere in order to prolong the
shelf life of the food within the package.
(4) "Package" means the immediate container or wrapping in which
any food is contained for consumption, use, or storage by consumers,
and also means any outer container or wrapping used in the retail
display of such a product to consumers.
(5) "Perishable food product" means meats, poultry, or fish
intended for human consumption that are packaged other than at the time
and point of retail sale, which have a high risk of spoilage within a
period of thirty days and are determined by the director of the
department of agriculture by rule to be perishable. For purposes of
this chapter, "perishable food product" does not include dairy
products, fruits, or vegetables.
(6) "Retail" means selling, offering for sale, or distributing food
for dispensing or sale directly to the consumer.
(7) "Shelf life" means the length of time during which a packaged
food product will retain its safe consumption quality if stored under
proper temperature conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 IRRADIATED FOOD DISCLOSURE. No person may
sell at retail any perishable food product that has been irradiated
without having the package in which it is sold include a label clearly
discernible to a consumer at the point of sale disclosing that the
product has been treated with radiation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 MODIFIED ATMOSPHERE PACKAGING WITH CARBON
MONOXIDE DISCLOSURE. No person may sell at retail any perishable food
product that was packed in modified atmosphere packaging with carbon
monoxide without having the package in which it is sold include a label
clearly discernible to a consumer at the point of sale disclosing
carbon monoxide was used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 CIVIL PENALTY. Whenever the director of the
department of agriculture finds that a person has committed a violation
of this chapter, the director may impose upon and collect from the
violator a civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars per
violation per day. Each violation is a separate and distinct offense.
Imposition of the civil penalty is subject to a hearing under chapter
34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RULE-MAKING AUTHORITY. The director of the
department of agriculture shall, in consultation with the secretary of
the department of health, establish by rule uniform standards for the
perishable food product labeling required under this chapter, and may
establish other rules as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are not
any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 7 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.

--- END ---