BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the quality of
Washington state's K-12 essential academic learning standards in
mathematics matters enormously. The legislature further finds that
Washington's statewide mathematic standards are important, not only
because they provide goalposts for teaching and learning across all of
Washington's public schools but also they determine the content and
emphasis of tests used to measure student achievement, influence the
selection of textbooks and other curriculum materials, and form the
core of teacher education programs.
The current Washington essential academic learning standards in
mathematics are the result of a collaboration of many Washington
educators, parents, business leaders, and citizens from communities in
every corner of the state. However, the standards were developed more
than a decade ago. The recent results of two international studies,
the program for student international assessment (PISA) and the trends
in international mathematics and science study (TIMSS) make it evident
that a vast number of United States' students, including Washington
state students, are unable to perform even simple arithmetic
calculations. This has disastrous implications for any effort to train
American students in the higher-level mathematics skills needed to
succeed in today's jobs. Forty-nine percent of 2003 Washington high
school graduates who enrolled in two-year colleges needed a remedial
mathematics class.
The legislature further finds that current essential academic
learning requirements in mathematics should be reviewed by experts with
a thorough understanding of mathematics, including university
professors from mathematics and science departments and individuals
from the employer community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2007, the state board of education shall establish
an independent mathematics review committee. Mathematics competency
must be a prerequisite for inclusion on the committee.
(2) The committee shall be comprised of:
(a) Two persons who are exemplary mathematicians or scientists in
academia;
(b) Four persons who are mathematicians or scientists from
industry;
(c) Two parents; and
(d) Four persons who are mathematics or science educators.
(3) By July 1, 2009, the committee shall review the current
essential academic learning requirements in mathematics and make
recommendations regarding changes of these mathematics standards to the
legislature, the governor, the state board of education, and the office
of the superintendent of public instruction. The review shall include,
but is not limited to the following:
(a) Reviewing the standards for clarity, rigor, content, reason,
and any negative qualities;
(b) Articulating grade level expectations over the grades as a
sequence of expectations and performances that build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline;
(c) Using the international benchmarking system of the trends in
international mathematics and science study (TIMSS) and/or the program
for international student assessment (PISA); and
(d) Reviewing other states and nations that have proven and high-quality mathematics standards, including California and Singapore.
(4) By July 1, 2008, the committee shall review mathematics
curriculum and materials, including textbooks, and create a menu of
curricula to guide districts in textbook adoptions to ensure textbook
and curricula alignment with the essential academic learning
requirements in mathematics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---