BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.129 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(b) "Facility" means a nursing home that is licensed under chapter
18.51 RCW, a boarding home licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, or an
adult family home licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW.
(c) "Electronic monitoring" means the recording or transmission of
a series of photographs, a motion picture film, a videotape, a series
of digital images, or any other recording or transmission of images,
whether or not it includes an audio component, but does not include
images captured by a still camera.
(d) "Resident" means an individual receiving services in a
facility, or, if the person is incompetent, that resident's attorney in
fact, guardian, or other legal representative acting within the scope
of his or her authority.
(2) A resident has the right to install and use an electronic
monitoring device in the resident's room, provided that:
(a) The resident has obtained consent in writing from any roommate
who shares the room as sleeping quarters;
(b) The resident has provided written notice to the facility on a
form developed by the department under subsection (6) of this section
of the resident's intent to install the monitoring device;
(c) The resident pays for all installation and maintenance costs of
the electronic monitoring;
(d) The resident complies with any other conditions imposed by
rules adopted by the department; and
(e) The electronic monitoring conforms to any limitation placed on
the monitoring as the condition of the consent given by a roommate and
conforms to the requirements outlined in subsection (6) of this
section.
(3) A facility shall:
(a) At the time of a new resident's admission or, for current
residents, within six months of the effective date of this act, provide
the resident with the form required under subsection (6) of this
section notifying the resident of the option to authorize or refuse to
consent to electronic monitoring in the resident's room;
(b) Maintain the signed and dated form on file at the facility;
(c) Provide reasonable physical accommodation for the installation
and use of the electronic monitoring device, including providing a
reasonably secure place to mount the device and access to power
sources;
(d) Permit a resident to install electronic monitoring when in
compliance with this act;
(e) Post a notice at the main entrance to the facility stating in
large, easy-to-read type that the rooms of some residents may be
monitored electronically by or on behalf of the residents; and
(f) Post a notice outside of the room of any resident who has
requested authorization to install electronic monitoring under
subsection (2) of this section. The notice shall state that the room
may be monitored electronically.
(4) A facility shall not refuse to admit an individual to residency
or remove a resident because of the resident's request to install
electronic monitoring or because electronic monitoring is being
conducted by or on behalf of a resident in compliance with this act.
(5) If a roommate objects to monitoring, a facility may move the
resident who requested monitoring to a different room in order to
accommodate the request.
(6) The department shall develop a form for use by a resident to
notify a facility of the resident's intent to install a device capable
of electronic monitoring. The form must state:
(a) That a resident is entitled to install and use an electronic
monitoring device consistent with this section;
(b) That the resident should contact the department if the facility
refuses to permit the monitoring or if the facility fails to make
reasonable physical accommodations necessary for installation and use
of the electronic monitoring device;
(c) The basic procedures that must be followed to install and use
electronic monitoring in compliance with this section, including the
requirement of obtaining written consent from other residents who share
the room; and
(d) That a roommate authorizing monitoring may condition consent to
include but not be limited to the following: Placing restrictions on
the direction in which the camera may face, prohibiting the use of
audio recording, or requiring obstruction of the device under specific
circumstances as required to protect the dignity of the roommate.
(7) The placement and use of an electronic monitoring device in the
room of a resident under authority of this section may not be covert.
Placement and use of an electronic monitoring device is covert if the
placement and use of the device is not open and obvious and the
resident has not notified the facility of the use and installation of
the device.
(8) Subject to applicable rules of evidence and procedure, a tape
or recording created in compliance with the provisions of this act may
be admitted into evidence in a civil or criminal court action or
administrative proceeding.
(9) Nothing in this section authorizes an individual to install or
use electronic monitoring in a manner that is not consistent with or
violates chapter 9.73 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.51.009 and 1994 c 214 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 70.129.007, 70.129.105, section 1 of this act, and 70.129.150
through 70.129.170 apply to this chapter and persons regulated under
this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.20.180 and 1994 c 214 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 70.129.005 through 70.129.030, 70.129.040(1), section 1 of this
act, and 70.129.050 through 70.129.170 apply to this chapter and
persons regulated under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.128.125 and 1994 c 214 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
RCW 70.129.005 through 70.129.030, 70.129.040(1), section 1 of this
act, and 70.129.050 through 70.129.170 apply to this chapter and
persons regulated under this chapter.

--- END ---