BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a strong
interest in the prompt resolution of disputes between practitioners
with medical staff membership and hospitals regarding privileges and
membership disputes. The legislature finds that the use of arbitration
can expedite resolution of those disputes after the hospital governing
authority has made a decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
Hospital governing authorities may require that disputes regarding
admitting privileges or membership be resolved by arbitration after the
governing authority has made its final decision. The hospital may
require the practitioner to pay up to one-half of the costs of the
arbitrator and may require that the prevailing party pay the attorneys'
fees of the other party only where the arbitrator finds the appeal was
frivolous.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 71.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Hospital governing authorities may require that disputes regarding
admitting privileges or membership be resolved by arbitration after the
governing authority has made its final decision. The hospital may
require the practitioner to pay up to one-half of the costs of the
arbitrator and may require that the prevailing party pay the attorneys'
fees of the other party only where the arbitrator finds the appeal was
frivolous.

--- END ---