BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.02567 and 2004 c 152 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment used directly in generating electricity at a
low carbon generation facility or at a facility using fuel cells, wind,
sun, or landfill gas as the principal source of power, or to sales of
or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to
installing such machinery and equipment, but only if the purchaser
develops with such machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable
of generating not less than two hundred watts of electricity and
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02567:
(a) "Landfill gas" means biomass fuel of the type qualified for
federal tax credits under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 collected from a landfill.
"Landfill" means a landfill as defined under RCW 70.95.030;
(b) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities that are integral and necessary to the
generation of electricity at a low carbon generation facility or at a
facility using fuel cells, wind, sun, or landfill gas as the principal
source of power;
(c) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (i) Hand-powered
tools; (ii) property with a useful life of less than one year; (iii)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (iv) replacement parts that do not increase
productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of
machinery and equipment; (v) buildings; or (vi) building fixtures that
are not integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that
are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building;
(d) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity (i) at a low carbon generation facility, (ii) with fuel
cells, or (iii) by wind energy, solar energy, or landfill gas power if
it provides any part of the process that generates electrical energy or
captures the energy of the wind, sun, or landfill gas, converts that
energy to electricity, and stores, transforms, or transmits that
electricity for entry into or operation in parallel with electric
transmission and distribution systems;
(e) "Fuel cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates
electricity by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence
of a catalyst;
(f) "Low carbon generation facility" means (i) a cogeneration
facility as defined in RCW 80.04.010 or (ii) an electricity generation
facility that emits less than 0.8 pounds of carbon dioxide per kilowatt
hour of electricity generated.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2009.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.02567 and 2004 c 152 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply with respect to
machinery and equipment used directly in generating not less than two
hundred watts of electricity at a low carbon generation facility or at
a facility using fuel cells, wind, sun, or landfill gas as the
principal source of power, or to the use of labor and services rendered
in respect to installing such machinery and equipment.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this section.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2009.

--- END ---