BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.12.260 and 1998 c 121 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each commissioner of a port district shall receive seventy
dollars per day or portion thereof spent (a) in actual attendance at
official meetings of the port district commission, or (b) in
performance of other service in behalf of the district. The total per
diem compensation of a port commissioner shall not exceed six thousand
seven hundred twenty dollars in a year, or eight thousand four hundred
dollars in any year for a port district with gross operating income of
twenty-five million or more in the preceding calendar year.
(2) Port commissioners shall receive additional compensation as
follows: (a) Each commissioner of a port district with gross operating
revenues of twenty-five million dollars or more in the preceding
calendar year shall receive a salary of five hundred dollars per month;
and (b) each commissioner of a port district with gross operating
revenues of from one million dollars to less than twenty-five million
dollars in the preceding calendar year shall receive a salary of two
hundred dollars per month.
(3) In lieu of the compensation specified in this section, a port
commission may set compensation to be paid to commissioners. A port
commission may, at its option, authorize the Washington citizen's
commission on salaries for elected officials to fix the salaries paid
to commissioners.
(4) For any commissioner who has not elected to become a member of
public employees retirement system before May 1, 1975, the compensation
provided pursuant to this section shall not be considered salary for
purposes of the provisions of any retirement system created pursuant to
the general laws of this state nor shall attendance at such meetings or
other service on behalf of the district constitute service as defined
in RCW 41.40.010(9): PROVIDED, That in the case of a port district
when commissioners are receiving compensation and contributing to the
public employees retirement system, these benefits shall continue in
full force and effect notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 53.12.260
and 53.12.265.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.03.300 and 1986 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby declares it to be the policy of this state
to base salaries of elected state officials and port district
commissioners on realistic standards in order that such officials may
be paid according to the duties of their offices and so that citizens
of the highest quality may be attracted to public service. It is the
purpose of RCW 43.03.300 through 43.03.310 to effectuate this policy by
creating a citizens' commission to establish proper salaries for such
officials, thus removing political considerations in fixing the
appropriateness of the amount of such salaries.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.03.310 and 1998 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials
shall study the relationship of salaries to the duties of members of
the legislature, all elected officials of the executive branch of state
government, port district commissioners as authorized under RCW
53.12.260, and all judges of the supreme court, court of appeals,
superior courts, and district courts, and shall fix the salary for each
respective position.
(2) Except as provided otherwise in RCW 43.03.305 and this section,
the commission shall be solely responsible for its own organization,
operation, and action and shall enjoy the fullest cooperation of all
state officials, departments, and agencies.
(3) Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for
their services, but shall be eligible to receive a subsistence
allowance and travel expenses pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The members of the commission shall elect a chair from among
their number. The commission shall set a schedule of salaries by an
affirmative vote of not less than nine members of the commission.
(5) The commission shall file its initial schedule of salaries for
the elected officials with the secretary of state no later than the
first Monday in June, 1987, and shall file a schedule biennially
thereafter. Each such schedule shall be filed in legislative bill
form, shall be assigned a chapter number and published with the session
laws of the legislature, and shall be codified by the statute law
committee. The signature of the chair of the commission shall be
affixed to each schedule submitted to the secretary of state. The
chair shall certify that the schedule has been adopted in accordance
with the provisions of state law and with the rules, if any, of the
commission. Such schedules shall become effective ninety days after
the filing thereof, except as provided in Article XXVIII, section 1 of
the state Constitution. State laws regarding referendum petitions
shall apply to such schedules to the extent consistent with Article
XXVIII, section 1 of the state Constitution.
(6) Before the filing of any salary schedule, the commission shall
first develop a proposed salary schedule and then hold no fewer than
four regular meetings as defined by chapter 42.30 RCW to take public
testimony on the proposed schedule within the four months immediately
preceding the filing. At the last public hearing that is held as a
regular meeting on the proposed schedule, the commission shall adopt
the salary schedule as originally proposed or as amended at that
meeting that will be filed with the secretary of state.
(7) All meetings, actions, hearings, and business of the commission
shall be subject in full to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30
RCW.
(8) Salaries of the officials referred to in subsection (1) of this
section that are in effect on January 12, 1987, shall continue until
modified by the commission under this section.

--- END ---