BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
regular property tax levy for each taxing district other than the state
may be set at the amount which would be allowed otherwise under this
chapter if the regular property tax levy for the district for taxes due
in prior years beginning with 1986 had been set at the full amount
allowed under this chapter including any levy authorized under RCW
52.16.160 that would have been imposed but for the limitation in RCW
52.18.065, applicable upon imposition of the benefit charge under
chapter 52.18 RCW.
(2) A port district with an assessed value of over one hundred
billion dollars may not set its property tax levy in an amount that
exceeds one hundred five percent of the prior year's levy.
(3) The purpose of this section is to remove the incentive for a
taxing district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum level permitted
under this chapter, and to protect the future levy capacity of a taxing
district that reduces its tax levy below the level that it otherwise
could impose under this chapter, by removing the adverse consequences
to future levy capacities resulting from such levy reductions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2008 and thereafter.

--- END ---