BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.12.010 and 2002 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The powers of the port district shall be exercised through
a port commission consisting of three or, when permitted or required by
this title, five members. Every port district ((that is not
coextensive with a county having a population of five hundred thousand
or more)) shall be divided into the same number of commissioner
districts as there are commissioner positions, each having
approximately equal population, unless provided otherwise under
subsection (2) of this section. Where a port district with three
commissioner positions is coextensive with the boundaries of a county
that has a population of less than five hundred thousand and the county
has three county legislative authority districts, the port commissioner
districts shall be the county legislative authority districts. In
other instances where a port district is divided into commissioner
districts, the port commission shall divide the port district into
commissioner districts unless the commissioner districts have been
described pursuant to RCW 53.04.031. The commissioner districts shall
be altered as provided in chapter 53.16 RCW.
(b) Commissioner districts subject to the provisions of (a) of this
subsection shall ((be used as follows)) meet the following
requirements: (((a))) (i) Only a registered voter who resides in a
commissioner district may be a candidate for, or hold office as, a
commissioner of the commissioner district; and (((b))) (ii) only the
voters of a commissioner district may vote at a primary to nominate
candidates for a commissioner of the commissioner district. Voters of
the entire port district may vote at a general election to elect a
person as a commissioner of the commissioner district.
(2)(a) In port districts with five commissioners, two of the
commissioner districts may include the entire port district if approved
by the voters of the district either at the time of formation or at a
subsequent port district election at which the issue is proposed
pursuant to a resolution adopted by the board of commissioners and
delivered to the county auditor.
(b) In a port district with five commissioners, where two of the
commissioner districts include the entire port district, the port
district may be divided into five commissioner districts if proposed
pursuant to a resolution adopted by the board of commissioners or
pursuant to a petition by the voters and approved by the voters of the
district at the next general or special election occurring sixty or
more days after the adoption of the resolution. A petition proposing
such an increase must be submitted to the county auditor of the county
in which the port district is located and signed by voters of the port
district at least equal in number to ten percent of the number of
voters in the port district who voted at the last general election.
Upon approval by the voters, the commissioner district boundaries
shall be redrawn into five districts within one hundred twenty days and
submitted to the county auditor pursuant to RCW 53.16.015. The new
commissioner districts shall be numbered one through five and the three
incumbent commissioners representing the three former districts shall
represent commissioner districts one through three. The two at large
incumbent commissioners shall represent commissioner districts four and
five. If, as a result of redrawing the district boundaries more than
one of the incumbent commissioners resides in one of the new
commissioner districts, the commissioners who reside in the same
commissioner district shall determine by lot which of the numbered
commissioner districts they shall represent for the remainder of their
respective terms.

Sec. 2 RCW 53.12.021 and 1994 c 223 s 82 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any ((less than county-wide)) port district that uses commissioner
districts may cease using commissioner districts as provided in this
section.
A ballot proposition authorizing the elimination of commissioner
districts shall be submitted to the voters of a ((less than county-wide)) port district that is divided into commissioner districts if (1)
a petition is submitted to the port commission proposing that the port
district cease using commissioner districts, that is signed by
registered voters of the port district equal in number to at least ten
percent of the number of voters who voted at the last district general
election; or (2) the port commissioners adopt a resolution proposing
that the port district cease using commissioner districts. The port
commission shall transfer the petition or resolution immediately to the
county auditor who shall, when a petition is submitted, review the
signatures and certify its sufficiency. A ballot proposition
authorizing the elimination of commissioner districts shall be
submitted at the next district general election occurring sixty or more
days after a petition with sufficient signatures was submitted. If the
ballot proposition authorizing the port district to cease using
commissioner districts is approved by a simple majority vote, the port
district shall cease using commissioner districts at all subsequent
elections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 53.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every port district with a population of one million or more
shall have five commissioners, shall be divided into five commissioner
districts of approximately equal population, and shall be subject to
the requirements of RCW 53.12.010(1)(b), except as otherwise provided
in this chapter.
(2) If a port district with a population of one million or more on
or after the effective date of this act is not in compliance with the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the port commissioners
who are holding office in that port district shall:
(a) Retain their positions for the remainder of their terms and
until their successors are elected and qualified; and
(b) Assume office in accordance with RCW 29A.20.040.
(3) The port commissioners shall divide the port district into five
commissioner districts prior to the first day of June in the year in
which the next regular election for commissioner shall be held. The
new commissioner districts shall be numbered one through five and shall
be represented by the incumbent commissioners. If, as a result of
drawing the district boundaries more than one of the incumbent
commissioners resides in one of the new commissioner districts, the
commissioners who reside in the same commissioner district shall
determine by lot which of the commissioner districts they shall
represent for the remainder of their respective terms.
(4) If additional commissioners must be elected to increase the
number of commissioners to five, the procedures of RCW 53.12.130 shall
be followed.

--- END ---