BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.08.170 and 2002 c 362 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The)) (1) Subject to the conditions stated in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section, a port commission shall have authority to create
and fill positions, to fix wages, salaries and bonds thereof, to pay
costs and assessments involved in securing or arranging to secure
employees, and to establish such benefits for employees, including
holiday pay, vacations or vacation pay, retirement and pension
benefits, medical, surgical or hospital care, life, accident, or health
disability insurance, and similar benefits, already established by
other employers of similar employees, as the port commissioner shall by
resolution provide: PROVIDED, That any district providing insurance
benefits for its employees in any manner whatsoever may provide health
and accident insurance, life insurance with coverage not to exceed that
provided district employees, and business related travel, liability,
and errors and omissions insurance, for its commissioners, which
insurance shall not be considered to be compensation.
Subject to chapter 48.62 RCW, the port commission shall have
authority to provide or pay such benefits directly, or to provide for
such benefits by the purchase of insurance policies or entering into
contracts with and compensating any person, firm, agency or
organization furnishing such benefits, or by making contributions to
vacation plans or funds, or health and welfare plans and funds, or
pension plans or funds, or similar plans or funds, already established
by other employers of similar employees and in which the port district
is permitted to participate for particular classifications of its
employees by the trustees or other persons responsible for the
administration of such established plans or funds: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That no port district employee shall be allowed to apply for admission
to or be accepted as a member of the state employees' retirement system
after January 1, 1965, if admission to such system would result in
coverage under both a private pension system and the state employees'
retirement system, it being the purpose of this proviso that port
districts shall not at the same time contribute for any employee to
both a private pension or retirement plan and to the state employees'
retirement system. The port commission shall have authority by
resolution to utilize and compensate agents for the purpose of paying,
in the name and by the check of such agent or agents or otherwise,
wages, salaries and other benefits to employees, or particular
classifications thereof, and for the purpose of withholding payroll
taxes and paying over tax moneys so withheld to appropriate government
agencies, on a combined basis with the wages, salaries, benefits, or
taxes of other employers or otherwise; to enter into such contracts and
arrangements with and to transfer by warrant such funds from time to
time to any such agent or agents so appointed as are necessary to
accomplish such salary, wage, benefit, or tax payments as though the
port district were a private employer, notwithstanding any other
provision of the law to the contrary. The funds of a port district
transferred to such an agent or agents for the payment of wages or
salaries of its employees in the name or by the check of such agent or
agents shall be subject to garnishment with respect to salaries or
wages so paid, notwithstanding any provision of the law relating to
municipal corporations to the contrary.
Notwithstanding any provision in this section, the governing body
of a port district may enter into an agreement in writing with one or
more of its officers or employees or a group of such officers and
employees, authorizing deductions from the officer's or employee's
salary or wages of the amount of any premium specified in writing by
the officer or employee, for contribution to any private pension plan,
without loss of eligibility for membership in the state employees'
retirement system, and may agree to remit that amount to the management
of such private pension plan. However, no port district funds shall be
contributed or paid to such private plan. When such authorized
deductions are certified by the port commission to the port district's
auditor, the auditor shall draw and issue a proper warrant or warrants,
or check or checks if that method of payment is authorized by statute,
directly to and in favor of the person, firm, corporation, or
organization named in the authorization, for the total amount
authorized to be deducted from the payroll, together with a list
identifying the officers and employees for whom the payment is made.
Nothing in this section may be invoked to invalidate any private
pension plan or any public or private contributions or payments
thereto, or exclude members of any such private pension plan from
membership in the state employees' retirement system, if such private
plan was in operation on December 31, 2001.
(2) Prior to providing any existing or prospective employee with a
salary or other compensation that equals or exceeds that of the
governor of the state of Washington, a port commission must comply with
the conditions provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) If the circumstances in subsection (2) of this section apply,
a port commission must comply with the following conditions:
(a) The public must be provided with at least three months' advance
notice of any such action through means reasonably calculated to
provide actual notice of, and access to, detailed information regarding
the compensation being offered and the circumstances leading to such an
offer. At minimum, such notice shall include:
(i) The issuance by the port commission of official, written public
notice to all local and regional newspapers of general circulation
within the port district, and to local and regional television and
radio stations broadcasting into the port district;
(ii) The publication of a legal notice in each local or regional
newspaper of general circulation within the port district. Such notice
must be reasonably calculated to provide actual notice of, and access
to, detailed information regarding the compensation being offered and
the circumstances leading to the compensation offered, as well as
notice of the public meetings required to be held under (b) of this
subsection; and
(iii) The conspicuous posting on the port district's official
internet web site of detailed information regarding the compensation
being offered, the circumstances leading to the compensation offered,
and the notice of public meetings required under (b) of this
subsection;
(b) The holding of at least three public meetings of the port
commission regarding the compensation offer, during which members of
the public must be given a reasonable opportunity to be heard. The
port commission must provide the public with at least three weeks'
advance notice of each meeting in accordance with the requirements of
this subsection (3). Such notice must include detailed information
regarding the compensation being offered and the circumstances leading
to such an offer. The meeting notice must also include the date, time,
and location of all such meetings;
(c) Any additional procedural and public notice requirements set
forth in chapter 42.30 RCW and Title 53 RCW shall also apply to port
commission decisions subject to subsection (2) of this section to the
extent such requirements are not inconsistent with the requirements of
this subsection (3); and
(d) The port commission must provide a written report to the
appropriate committees of the senate and the house of representatives
no later than December 31st of the year in which the compensation was
first offered or provided. The report to the legislature must include
the following:
(i) A complete, detailed description of both the compensation being
offered or provided to the current or prospective employee and the
circumstances leading to the offer or provision of such compensation;
(ii) A description of the criteria used in evaluating
qualifications and experience of the current or prospective employee
and in determining the appropriate compensation for the employee's
services;
(iii) A comprehensive explanation of why the compensation is
warranted; and
(iv) A description of the performance measures that have been, or
will be, utilized in evaluating the performance of the current or
prospective employee.
(4) At such time as a port commission receives either formal or
constructive notice of the intended retirement or resignation of a port
employee, the port commission is prohibited from taking any action to
increase the value of the compensation provided to that employee.
(5) For the purposes of subsections (2) through (4) of this
section, "compensation" shall be broadly construed to mean wages,
salaries, vacations or vacation pay, retirement and pension benefits,
medical and other health or insurance-related benefits, and any other
benefit offered or provided to the current or prospective port
employee.

--- END ---