BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Social security account number" means the number issued by the
federal social security administration and any number derived from the
number. "Social security account number" does not include any number
that has been encrypted.
(2) "Person" means an individual, a firm, a partnership, an
association, a corporation, or other entity. "Person" does not include
the state or any political subdivision of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) No person may do any of the following:
(a) Intentionally communicate to the general public or otherwise
make available to the general public in any manner an individual's
social security account number. This does not apply to an individual
intentionally communicating to the general public or otherwise making
available to the general public his or her social security account
number;
(b) Print an individual's social security account number on any
card or tag required for the individual to access products, services,
or benefits provided by the person;
(c) Require an individual to transmit his or her social security
account number over the internet, unless the connection is secure or
the social security account number is encrypted;
(d) Require an individual to use his or her social security
account number to access an internet web site, unless a password or
unique personal identification number or other authentication device
is also required to access the internet web site; and
(e) Print an individual's social security account number on any
materials that are mailed to the individual, unless state or federal
law requires the social security account number to be on the document
to be mailed. However, social security account numbers may be included
in applications and forms sent by mail, including documents sent as
part of an application or enrollment process, or to establish, amend,
or terminate an account, contract, or policy, or to confirm the
accuracy of the social security account number. A social security
account number that is permitted to be mailed under this section may
not be printed, in whole or part, on a postcard or other mailer not
requiring an envelope, or visible on the envelope or without the
envelope having been opened.
(2) This section does not prevent the collection, use, or release
of a social security account number as required by state or federal
law, the use of a social security account number for internal
verification, fraud investigation, or administrative purposes, or for
any business function specifically authorized by 15 U.S.C. Sec. 6802.
(3) Any person having possession of the social security account
number of any individual shall, to the extent that the number is
maintained for the conduct of business or trade, take reasonable
measures to:
(a) Ensure that no officer or employee has access to the number for
any purpose other than for a legitimate or necessary purpose related to
the conduct of the business or trade; and
(b) Provide safeguards necessary or appropriate to preclude
unauthorized access to the social security account number and to
protect the confidentiality of the number.
(4) Compliance with the requirements of chapter 19.215 RCW may
demonstrate a good faith effort to comply with the provisions of
subsection (3) of this section that apply to the disposal of social
security account numbers.
(5) Any waiver of the provisions of this section is contrary to
public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1)(a) Violations of this chapter are
punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars for each
violation and not more than one hundred thousand dollars for multiple
violations resulting from a single act or incident. This does not
apply to fines under (b) of this subsection.
(b) If a person has been fined under (a) of this subsection, any
subsequent violation is punishable by a fine of not more than one
thousand dollars for each violation and not more than one hundred
thousand dollars for multiple violations resulting from a single act or
incident.
(2) The attorney general may bring an action to enforce compliance
with this chapter.
(3) The remedies and penalties in this section are in addition to
any other penalties and remedies available to any person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---