BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature finds that reduction or removal of benzene
in groundwater and drinking water is crucial for the protection of
human health and safety and to protect Washington's environment.
Benzene is formed from both natural processes and human activities.
Benzene is a component in gasoline, diesel fuel, and aviation fuel. As
a known carcinogen classified by the environmental protection agency,
benzene is linked to leukemia, especially in children, as well as other
health issues, such as susceptibility to infection, anemia, chromosomal
damage, excessive bleeding, and developmental problems in children.
The United States environmental protection agency has proposed a rule
on the control of hazardous air pollutants from mobile sources, as
published in the federal register on March 29, 2006, (71 C.F.R. Sec.
15803 (2006)), that the national average of benzene content of gasoline
would be limited to .62 percent by volume.
(b) The legislature further finds that one source of harmful
benzene levels in Washington groundwater is gasoline spills or leaks
from underground storage tanks, landfills, or gasoline pipelines.
Groundwater that is contaminated with benzene may contaminate the
public drinking water supply or otherwise be consumed by humans. Human
health may be adversely affected by consumption of contaminated
drinking water. Therefore, reduction or removal of sources of benzene
in groundwater and drinking water is crucial to the public health and
safety of Washington residents.
(2)(a)(i) For purposes of this section, "motor fuel" means
gasoline, diesel fuel, or any other inflammable gas or liquid, by
whatever name the gasoline, diesel fuel, gas, or liquid may be known or
sold, the primary use of which is as fuel for the propulsion of motor
vehicles or motorized vessels.
(ii) "Groundwaters" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
90.44.035.
(b) No person shall import into Washington, or sell, dispense, or
offer for sale in Washington, any motor fuel that contains greater
than .62 percent by volume of benzene, if that motor fuel may spill or
leak into any groundwaters or surface waters in Washington.
(3) Nothing contained in this section is intended to control or
prohibit any characteristic or component of a fuel or fuel additive in
a motor vehicle or motor vehicle engine for purposes of motor vehicle
emission control.

--- END ---