BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the continuing
number of assaults in state hospitals have made conditions for both
patients and staff unacceptable. The legislature further finds that
appropriate nurse staffing levels will result in improved patient and
staff safety and a reduction in the number of workplace injuries.
Therefore, to improve safety conditions in the state hospitals, the
legislature intends that minimum patient assignment limits and nurse
staffing ratios and other safety measures be implemented as an urgent
public policy priority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this section and sections 1 and 3 through 7 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Intensity" means the level of patient needs in terms of
nursing care as determined by a registered nurse providing direct
patient care, taking into account at least the following factors:
(a) The severity and urgency of the patient's condition;
(b) The complexity of either planning or providing, or both, the
care required by the patient;
(c) Scheduled or anticipated procedures or events, including those
that necessitate increased frequency of assessment or intervention;
(d) Age and cognitive and functional ability of the patient,
including ability to perform self-care activities;
(e) The availability of patient social supports including
institutional, family, or community support;
(f) The level of patient adherence or ability to comply with
patient care;
(g) Patient and family educational needs, including assessment of
learning capabilities of patient and family;
(h) Intactness of family unit, the availability of family to
provide either emotional support or functional support, or both, and
the ability of the family to participate in patient decision-making
processes;
(i) The communication skills of the patient; and
(j) Other needs identified by the patient and by the registered
nurse.
(2) "Nursing personnel" means registered nurses, licensed practical
nurses, and unlicensed assistive nursing personnel providing direct
patient care.
(3) "Patient" means the same as defined in RCW 72.23.010.
(4) "Patient assignment limits" means the maximum number of
patients that a hospital may assign to a registered nurse at any one
time.
(5) "Patient care unit" means any unit or area of a state hospital
that provides patient care.
(6) "Staffing committee" means the advisory committee on nurse
staffing established by a state hospital under section 3 of this act.
(7) "Staffing ratio" means the ratio of nursing personnel to the
actual number of patients within a patient care unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By September 1, 2007, each state hospital
must establish an advisory committee on nurse staffing. The staffing
committee consists of nine members, at least five of whom must be
registered nurses who provide direct patient care. The staffing
committee shall:
(1) Recommend patient assignment limits to be adopted by the
department under section 4 of this act;
(2) Recommend classifications of patient care units and appropriate
staffing ratios to be adopted by the department under section 4 of this
act;
(3) Make recommendations to the state hospital and the safety
committee regarding safe equipment and personal alarm system policies;
and
(4) Make other recommendations regarding the development and
implementation of hospital staffing plans that the staffing committee
deems necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) By January 1, 2008, the department must
establish, after considering the recommendations of the staffing
committee:
(a) Patient assignment limits by nurse classification. Patient
assignment limits apply to individual registered nurse assignments, and
may not be construed as establishing average assignments for a hospital
or patient care unit. The limits apply at all times that a registered
nurse is on duty, including times when other nurses are away from the
unit, on a break, or otherwise not providing direct patient care; and
(b) A staffing ratio for each patient care unit at a state
hospital. In developing the staff ratios, the department must classify
patient care units by staffing need according to the intensity of the
patients needing the most intensive care within the unit. For those
units with the highest level of staffing need, the staffing ratio must
be at least 1.2 to 1. However, patients requiring one-on-one direct
patient care must be given constant monitoring, and at no time may a
nurse monitor more than one patient needing one-on-one care. In
establishing staffing ratios, the department must consider the number
of staff necessary to ensure that there is adequate response time to
personal alarms.
(2) The staffing ratio represents the maximum number of patients
that may be assigned to any nursing personnel at any one time in that
unit. "Assigned" means that the nurse has responsibility for the
provision of care to a particular patient within his or her scope of
practice. In implementing the staffing ratio:
(a) The staff ratio may not be used in a manner that averages the
number of patients and the total number of nursing personnel on the
unit during any one shift or over any period of time;
(b) Only licensed nurses who are providing direct patient care, are
present in the unit, are awake and on duty, and have the necessary
qualifications determined by the staffing committee to provide the
necessary nursing services for clients admitted for care may be
included in the ratios; and
(c) The staffing ratio may not include nursing personnel who are
engaged in activities other than direct patient care, including being
on meal breaks or other statutorily mandated work breaks, on leave for
vacation, sickness, or injury, or who are covering other patient units.
(3) Regardless of the minimum staffing ratio, the facility must
employ professional and other staff on all shifts in the number and
with the qualifications to provide the necessary services for those
patients admitted for care including, but not limited to, food service,
maintenance, and janitorial services.
(4) The department must post the staffing ratios in each patient
care unit and update the posting each time any changes are made in
staffing ratios. At least once every quarter, the department must
publish on its web site the staffing ratios for each patient care unit
of each state hospital. The publication must include the number of
patients within each unit, the specific classification of each patient,
and the specific titles of direct care staff assigned to such unit.
The publication must also include a comparison of the current staffing
ratios to the previous quarter's staffing ratios.
(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent a state
hospital from raising the staffing levels due to the staffing need in
each patient unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Each state hospital must ensure that all
nursing personnel are equipped with a properly functioning personal
alarm at all times that the employee is on duty.
(2) Each state hospital must establish, after considering the
recommendations of the staffing and safety committees:
(a) The frequency with which the personal alarms must be tested to
ensure that the alarms: (i) Are in proper working order; and (ii)
transmit signals from all areas of the patient care unit; and
(b) A minimum response time within which a staff member with
accident-incident training shall respond to an activated alarm.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Each state hospital must provide staff
with protective safety equipment. The state hospital must determine:
(a) The types of equipment needed;
(b) The proper locations to store the equipment;
(c) The quantities of equipment necessary to ensure that all staff
are equipped with or have easy access to personal protective equipment;
and
(d) Policies on the effective use of the equipment.
(2) All direct care workforce must receive training on the use of
the equipment, which shall:
(a) Take place during an employee's regularly scheduled work hours;
and
(b) Include instruction on how and when to use the equipment.
(3) Each state hospital must examine the types of equipment and
furniture that are frequently used by patients in assaults on other
patients, staff, or self. The state hospital must examine alternatives
that may include, but are not limited to:
(a) The purchase of new equipment and furniture that does not have
the same potential to inflict injury; and
(b) Securing equipment and furniture so that it may not be used to
inflict injury.
(4) The state hospital must consider the recommendations of the
staffing and safety committees in fulfilling its obligations under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Each member of the state hospital safety
committee shall receive accident-incident training. The safety
committee shall determine the number of additional nursing personnel
who must have accident-incident training in order to ensure that the
staff can adequately respond to incidents involving patient or staff
safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department of social and health services
shall adopt rules necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 72.23 RCW.

--- END ---