BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.05.010 and 2002 c 219 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a court of limited jurisdiction a person charged with a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor may petition the court to be
considered for a deferred prosecution program. The petition shall be
filed with the court at least seven days before the date set for trial
but, upon a written motion and affidavit establishing good cause for
the delay and failure to comply with this section, the court may waive
this requirement subject to the defendant's reimbursement to the court
of the witness fees and expenses due for subpoenaed witnesses who have
appeared on the date set for trial.
(2) A person charged with a traffic infraction, misdemeanor, or
gross misdemeanor under Title 46 RCW shall not be eligible for a
deferred prosecution program unless the court makes specific findings
pursuant to RCW 10.05.020. Such person shall not be eligible for a
deferred prosecution program more than once. Separate offenses
committed more than seven days apart may not be consolidated in a
single program.
(3) A person charged with a misdemeanor or a gross misdemeanor that
would be considered domestic violence under RCW 10.99.020 or with a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.42 RCW shall not be
eligible for a deferred prosecution program unless the court makes
specific findings pursuant to RCW 10.05.020. Such person shall not be
eligible for a deferred prosecution program more than once.
(4) This section is not intended to limit the prosecuting
attorney's ability to negotiate alternative dispositions.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.05.020 and 2002 c 219 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this section,
the petitioner shall allege under oath in the petition that the
wrongful conduct charged is the result of or caused by alcoholism, drug
addiction, or mental problems for which the person is in need of
treatment and unless treated the probability of future recurrence is
great, along with a statement that the person agrees to pay the cost of
a diagnosis and treatment of the alleged problem or problems if
financially able to do so. The petition shall also contain a case
history and written assessment prepared by an approved alcoholism
treatment program as designated in chapter 70.96A RCW if the petition
alleges alcoholism, an approved drug program as designated in chapter
71.24 RCW if the petition alleges drug addiction, or by an approved
mental health center if the petition alleges a mental problem.
(2) In the case of a petitioner charged with a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor under chapter 9A.42 RCW, the petitioner shall allege under
oath in the petition that the petitioner is the natural or adoptive
parent of the alleged victim; that the wrongful conduct charged is the
result of parenting problems for which the petitioner is in need of
services; that the petitioner is in need of child welfare services
under chapter 74.13 RCW to improve his or her parenting skills in order
to better provide his or her child or children with the basic
necessities of life; that the petitioner wants to correct his or her
conduct to reduce the likelihood of harm to his or her minor children;
that in the absence of child welfare services the petitioner may be
unable to reduce the likelihood of harm to his or her minor children;
and that the petitioner has cooperated with the department of social
and health services to develop a plan to receive appropriate child
welfare services; along with a statement that the person agrees to pay
the cost of the services if he or she is financially able to do so.
The petition shall also contain a case history and a written service
plan from the department of social and health services.
(3)(a) In the case of a petitioner charged with a misdemeanor or
gross misdemeanor that would be considered domestic violence under RCW
10.99.020, the petitioner shall allege under oath in the petition that
the petitioner is the family or household member of the alleged victim;
that the petitioner is in need of domestic violence perpetrator
treatment under RCW 26.50.150; that the petitioner wants to correct his
or her conduct to reduce the likelihood of harm to his or her family or
household members; and that unless treated, the probability of future
recurrence is great. The petition shall contain a statement that the
petitioner agrees to pay the cost of diagnosis and treatment if the
petitioner is financially able. The petition shall also contain a case
history and written assessment prepared by an approved domestic
violence perpetrator treatment program provider under chapter 26.50
RCW.
(b) In lieu of alleging that the petitioner is in need of domestic
violence perpetrator treatment under RCW 26.50.150, the petitioner
shall allege that the petitioner is in need of counseling or other
appropriate services if:
(i) The case history and written assessment indicate that the
petitioner is not the primary perpetrator of domestic violence in the
relationship based on the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or
threats creating fear of physical injury or the history of domestic
violence between the persons involved; or
(ii) The victim is a family or household member who is not a
spouse, former spouse, person who has a child in common with the
petitioner whether or not he or she has been married or lived together
with the petitioner, person sixteen years of age or older who is
presently residing together or who has resided together with the
petitioner in the past and who has or has had a dating relationship
with the petitioner, or person sixteen years of age or older who has or
has had a dating relationship with the petitioner.
(4) Before entry of an order deferring prosecution, a petitioner
shall be advised of his or her rights as an accused and execute, as a
condition of receiving treatment, a statement that contains: (a) An
acknowledgment of his or her rights; (b) an acknowledgment and waiver
of the right to testify, the right to a speedy trial, the right to call
witnesses to testify, the right to present evidence in his or her
defense, and the right to a jury trial; (c) a stipulation to the
admissibility and sufficiency of the facts contained in the written
police report; and (d) an acknowledgment that the statement will be
entered and used to support a finding of guilty if the court finds
cause to revoke the order granting deferred prosecution. The
petitioner shall also be advised that he or she may, if he or she
proceeds to trial and is found guilty, be allowed to seek suspension of
some or all of the fines and incarceration that may be ordered upon the
condition that he or she seek treatment and, further, that he or she
may seek treatment from public and private agencies at any time without
regard to whether or not he or she is found guilty of the offense
charged. He or she shall also be advised that the court will not
accept a petition for deferred prosecution from a person who sincerely
believes that he or she is innocent of the charges or sincerely
believes that he or she does not, in fact, suffer from alcoholism, drug
addiction, or mental problems, or is in need of domestic violence
perpetrator treatment, or counseling or other services, or in the case
of a petitioner charged under chapter 9A.42 RCW, sincerely believes
that he or she does not need child welfare services.
(((4))) (5) Before entering an order deferring prosecution, the
court shall make specific findings that: (a) The petitioner has
stipulated to the admissibility and sufficiency of the facts as
contained in the written police report; (b) the petitioner has
acknowledged the admissibility of the stipulated facts in any criminal
hearing on the underlying offense or offenses held subsequent to
revocation of the order granting deferred prosecution; (c) the
petitioner has acknowledged and waived the right to testify, the right
to a speedy trial, the right to call witnesses to testify, the right to
present evidence in his or her defense, and the right to a jury trial;
and (d) the petitioner's statements were made knowingly and
voluntarily. Such findings shall be included in the order granting
deferred prosecution.

Sec. 3 RCW 10.05.030 and 2002 c 219 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The arraigning judge upon consideration of the petition and with
the concurrence of the prosecuting attorney may continue the
arraignment and refer such person for a diagnostic investigation and
evaluation to an approved alcoholism treatment program as designated in
chapter 70.96A RCW, if the petition alleges an alcohol problem, an
approved drug treatment center as designated in chapter 71.24 RCW, if
the petition alleges a drug problem, to an approved mental health
center, if the petition alleges a mental problem, ((or)) the department
of social and health services if the petition is brought under RCW
10.05.020(2), or to an approved domestic violence perpetrator treatment
program provider under chapter 26.50 RCW, or counseling or other
services, if the petition alleges problems with domestic violence.

--- END ---