BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.70.240 and 2001 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
The moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:
(1) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery
tickets or shares;
(2) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account
created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260;
(3) For purposes of making deposits into the education construction
fund and student achievement fund created in RCW 43.135.045. For the
transition period from July 1, 2001, until and including June 30, 2002,
fifty percent of the moneys not otherwise obligated under this section
shall be placed in the student achievement fund and fifty percent of
these moneys shall be placed in the education construction fund. On
and after July 1, 2002, until June 30, 2004, seventy-five percent of
these moneys shall be placed in the student achievement fund and
twenty-five percent shall be placed in the education construction fund.
On and after July 1, 2004, all deposits not otherwise obligated under
this section shall be placed in the education construction fund.
Moneys in the state lottery account deposited in the education
construction fund and the student achievement fund are included in
"general state revenues" under RCW 39.42.070;
(4) For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the
principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to
construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including
reasonably necessary preconstruction costs. Three million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during calendar year 1996.
During subsequent years, such distributions shall equal the prior
year's distributions increased by four percent. Distributions under
this subsection shall cease to be distributed to a county for the
purposes of paying principal and interest for a baseball stadium when
the bonds issued for the construction of the baseball stadium are
retired, but not more than twenty years after the tax under RCW
82.14.0485 is first imposed;
(5) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account,
created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW
43.99N.070, six million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent years,
such distribution shall equal the prior year's distributions increased
by four percent. No distribution may be made under this subsection
after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of the
bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this
subsection shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than
December 31, 2020;
(6) For distribution to the school art program restoration account
created in section 2 of this act. The distributions in subsection (4)
of this section, upon the earlier of retirement of the baseball stadium
bonds or twenty years after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first
imposed, shall be distributed for the purposes of and subject to the
conditions of sections 2 and 3 of this act;
(7) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and
(((7))) (8) For the payment of agent compensation.
The office of financial management shall require the allotment of
all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes
in the allotments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The school art program restoration account is created in the
state treasury. The purpose of the account is to establish a
depository for state and other funds made available to restore art
programs in public schools in accordance with section 3 of this act.
(2) The executive director of the Washington state arts commission
shall deposit in the account all appropriations to the commission and
nonstate moneys received by the commission for restoration of art
programs in public schools.
(3) Only the executive director of the Washington state arts
commission or the executive director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2012-13 school year, the Washington state
arts commission, in consultation with the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, shall establish an annual competitive grant
process to restore art programs in public schools.
(2) To the maximum extent possible, the competitive grant amounts
awarded will reflect the distribution of the lottery revenues generated
from RCW 67.70.240(6).
(3) Cities, counties, art organizations, and school districts may
apply to the Washington state arts commission, but the application
process shall encourage collaboration among the various entities in
order to maximize the efficiency and effectiveness of the restored
programs.
(4) To the maximum extent possible, the grants awarded shall be
administered using existing local city and county art organizations.

--- END ---