BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 63.29.170 and 2004 c 168 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person holding property presumed abandoned and subject to
custody as unclaimed property under this chapter shall report to the
department concerning the property as provided in this section.
(2) The report must be verified and must include:
(a) Except with respect to travelers checks and money orders, the
name, if known, and last known address, if any, of each person
appearing from the records of the holder to be the owner of property
with a value of more than fifty dollars presumed abandoned under this
chapter;
(b) In the case of unclaimed funds of more than fifty dollars held
or owing under any life or endowment insurance policy or annuity
contract, the full name and last known address of the insured or
annuitant and of the beneficiary according to the records of the
insurance company holding or owing the funds;
(c) In the case of the contents of a safe deposit box or other
safekeeping repository or in the case of other tangible property, a
description of the property and the place where it is held and where it
may be inspected by the department, and any amounts owing to the
holder;
(d) The nature and identifying number, if any, or description of
the property and the amount appearing from the records to be due, but
items with a value of fifty dollars or less each may be reported in the
aggregate;
(e) The date the property became payable, demandable, or
returnable, and the date of the last transaction with the apparent
owner with respect to the property; and
(f) Other information the department prescribes by rule as
necessary for the administration of this chapter.
(3) If the person holding property presumed abandoned and subject
to custody as unclaimed property is a successor to other persons who
previously held the property for the apparent owner or the holder has
changed his or her name while holding the property, the holder shall
file with the report all known names and addresses of each previous
holder of the property.
(4) The report must be filed before November 1st of each year and
shall include, except as provided in RCW 63.29.140(3), all property
presumed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property under
this chapter that is in the holder's possession as of the preceding
June 30th. On written request by any person required to file a report,
the department may postpone the reporting date.
(5)(a) After May 1st, but before August 1st, of each year in which
a report is required by this section, the holder in possession of
property that will be presumed abandoned as of June 30th and subject to
custody as unclaimed property under this chapter shall send written
notice to the apparent owner at the last known address informing him or
her that the holder is in possession of property subject to this
chapter if:
(((a))) (i) The holder has in its records an address for the
apparent owner which the holder's records do not disclose to be
inaccurate;
(((b))) (ii) The claim of the apparent owner is not barred by the
statute of limitations; and
(((c))) (iii) The property has a value of more than seventy-five
dollars.
(b) The written notice to an apparent owner of property that will
be presumed abandoned as of June 30th as required in (a) of this
subsection must include the date by which the apparent owner may claim
the property from the holder in possession. The date by which the
apparent owner may claim the property from the holder must be at least
sixty calendar days from the date of the written notice required in (a)
of this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 63.29.190 and 2005 c 502 s 4, 2005 c 367 s 3, and 2005
c 285 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of
this section, a person who is required to file a report under RCW
63.29.170 shall pay or deliver to the department all abandoned property
required to be reported at the time of filing the report.
(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, after
sending written notice to an apparent owner of property as provided in
RCW 63.29.170, a person who is required to pay or deliver to the
department abandoned property as provided in (a) of this subsection,
shall hold the property for at least sixty days before paying or
delivering the property to the department.
(ii) The holding period described in (b)(i) of this subsection must
not extend the deadline for filing reports and paying or delivering all
abandoned property required to be reported as provided in RCW
63.29.170(4) and (a) of this subsection.
(2)(a) Counties, cities, towns, and other municipal and quasi-municipal corporations that hold funds representing warrants canceled
pursuant to RCW 36.22.100 and 39.56.040, uncashed checks, and property
tax overpayments or refunds may retain the funds until the owner
notifies them and establishes ownership as provided in RCW 63.29.135.
Counties, cities, towns, or other municipal or quasi-municipal
corporations shall provide to the department a report of property it is
holding pursuant to this section. The report shall identify the
property and owner in the manner provided in RCW 63.29.170 and the
department shall publish the information as provided in RCW 63.29.180.
(b)(i) A public transportation authority that holds funds
representing value on abandoned fare cards may retain the funds until
the owner notifies the authority and establishes ownership as provided
in RCW 63.29.135.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (2)(b), "public
transportation authority" means a municipality, as defined in RCW
35.58.272, a regional transit authority authorized by chapter 81.112
RCW, a public mass transportation system authorized by chapter 47.60
RCW, or a city transportation authority authorized by chapter 35.95A
RCW.
(3) The contents of a safe deposit box or other safekeeping
repository presumed abandoned under RCW 63.29.160 and reported under
RCW 63.29.170 shall be paid or delivered to the department within six
months after the final date for filing the report required by RCW
63.29.170.
If the owner establishes the right to receive the abandoned
property to the satisfaction of the holder before the property has been
delivered or it appears that for some other reason the presumption of
abandonment is erroneous, the holder need not pay or deliver the
property to the department, and the property will no longer be presumed
abandoned. In that case, the holder shall file with the department a
verified written explanation of the proof of claim or of the error in
the presumption of abandonment.
(4) The holder of an interest under RCW 63.29.100 shall deliver a
duplicate certificate or other evidence of ownership if the holder does
not issue certificates of ownership to the department. Upon delivery
of a duplicate certificate to the department, the holder and any
transfer agent, registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of
a holder in executing or delivering the duplicate certificate is
relieved of all liability of every kind in accordance with RCW
63.29.200 to every person, including any person acquiring the original
certificate or the duplicate of the certificate issued to the
department, for any losses or damages resulting to any person by the
issuance and delivery to the department of the duplicate certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---