BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who is employed by the department of licensing in any
position that provides, grants, or allows access to personal
identifying information of another person who is a resident of this
state must successfully pass a criminal background check before being
placed in or continuing placement in such a position.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "personal identifying
information" means an individual's: (a) Social security number; (b)
driver's license number; (c) bank account number; (d) credit or debit
card number; (e) personal identification number; (f) automated or
electronic signature; (g) unique biometric data; (h) account passwords;
or (i) any other piece of information that can be used to access an
individual's financial accounts or to obtain goods or services.

--- END ---