BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person who conducts research and development spending
for autism during the year in which the credit is claimed.
(2) The credit is equal to the greater of the amount of qualified
research and development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of
amounts received by a person other than a public educational or
research institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified
research and development multiplied by 1.50 percent.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, shall be claimed against taxes due for
the same calendar year in which the qualified research and development
expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any credit assigned
to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for each calendar
year shall not exceed the lesser of two million dollars or the amount
of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year.
(5) For any person claiming the credit, including any credit
assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose
research and development spending during the calendar year fails to
meet the qualifications of this section or who is otherwise ineligible,
the department shall declare the taxes against which the credit was
claimed to be immediately due and payable. The department shall assess
interest, but not penalties, on the taxes against which the credit was
claimed. Interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the
date the credit was claimed, and shall accrue until the taxes against
which the credit was claimed are repaid. Any credit assigned to a
person under subsection (3) of this section that is disallowed as a
result of this section may be claimed by the person who performed the
qualified research and development subject to the limitations set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Autism" means a developmental disability significantly
affecting verbal and nonverbal communication and social interaction,
generally evident before age three, that adversely affects educational
performance. Other characteristics often associated with autism are
engagement in repetitive activities and stereotyped movements,
resistance to environmental change or change in daily routines, and
unusual responses to sensory experiences.
(b) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development nor does the
term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(c) "Qualified research and development" means research and
development performed in this state in the field of autism.
(d) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution to
conduct qualified research and development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2007.

--- END ---