BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington state is the home of large forward deploying
military units and bases. These include Fort Lewis, McChord Air Force
Base, Whidbey Island Naval Air Station, Naval Station Everett, Naval
Station Bangor, and Naval Station Bremerton. Additionally, Washington
National Guard Stryker Brigade has been one of the most involved
forward deploying national guard units in the country, suffering
significant numbers of killed and wounded in recent conflicts.
(2) The United States and Washington state are experiencing
increasing numbers of residents who are returning from combat
operations and military service with significant impairment. These men
and women who have been injured in defense of our country should be
entitled to every reasonable benefit that our state can provide.
(3) The federal government has established a service disabled
veteran certification program with a three percent target for all
federal contracting, as has the state of California.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.60A.010 and 2006 c 343 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter the following words and phrases shall have
the following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Department" means the department of veterans affairs.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of veterans
affairs.
(3) "Committee" means the veterans affairs advisory committee.
(4) "Board" means the veterans innovations program board.
(5) "Goals" means overall agency goals, expressed as a percentage
of dollar volume, for participation by businesses owned by veterans
with disabilities.
(6) "Goods and services" includes professional services and all
other goods and services.
(7) "Procurement" means the purchase, lease, or rental of any goods
or services.
(8) "Public works" means all work, construction, highway and ferry
construction, alteration, repair, or improvement other than ordinary
maintenance, which a state agency or educational institution is
authorized or required by law to undertake.
(9) "State agency" includes the state of Washington and all
agencies, departments, offices, divisions, boards, commissions, and
correctional and other types of institutions.
(10) "Veteran with a disability" means a veteran as defined in RCW
41.04.007 who has at least a ten percent service-connected disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop a procedure for certifying
businesses owned by veterans with disabilities and maintain a list of
businesses owned by veterans with disabilities on the department's
public web site. To be certified by the department, the business must
meet all the following requirements:
(a) It is a sole proprietorship at least fifty-one percent owned by
one or more veterans with disabilities or, in the case of a publicly
owned business, at least fifty-one percent of its stock is owned by one
or more veterans with disabilities; a subsidiary that is wholly owned
by a parent corporation, but only if at least fifty-one percent of the
voting stock of the parent corporation is owned by one or more veterans
with disabilities; or a joint venture in which at least fifty-one
percent of the joint venture's management, control, and earnings are
held by one or more veterans with disabilities;
(b) The management and control of the daily business operations are
by one or more veterans with disabilities. The veterans with
disabilities who exercise management and control are not required to be
the same veterans with disabilities as the owners of the business;
(c) It is a sole proprietorship, corporation, or partnership with
its home office located in the United States, which is not a branch or
subsidiary of a foreign corporation, foreign firm, or other foreign-based business.
(2) The department shall develop an outreach program for businesses
owned by veterans with disabilities.
(3) The department shall collaborate with and may assist agencies
in implementing outreach to businesses owned by veterans with
disabilities.
(4) The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this
act. The rules shall include instructions to agencies regarding what
specific information they must report to the department.
(5) The department shall report to the legislature by December 1,
2009, and December 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter outlining
the progress made in implementing this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) State agencies are encouraged to award three percent of all
procurement contracts that are exempt from competitive bidding
requirements under RCW 43.19.1906(2) to businesses owned by veterans
with disabilities certified by the department under section 3 of this
act.
(2) State agencies shall:
(a) Perform outreach to businesses owned by veterans with
disabilities in collaboration with the department to increase
opportunities for businesses owned by veterans with disabilities to
sell goods and services to the state;
(b) Keep a record of all contracts awarded to businesses owned by
veterans with disabilities as required by the department;
(c) Require that any contractor with one million dollars or more in
state contracts develop and submit to the agency a plan to hire
veterans with disabilities; and
(d) Report by December 1, 2009, and December 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter to the department on the progress made in
implementing this section as directed by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of general administration shall identify in the
department's vendor registry all vendors that are businesses owned by
veterans with disabilities as certified by the department of veterans
affairs under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.19.536 and 1983 c 120 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All contracts entered into and purchases made, including
leasing or renting, under this chapter on or after September 1, 1983,
are subject to the requirements established under chapter 39.19 RCW.
(2) All contracts entered into and purchases made, including
leasing or renting, under this chapter on or after the effective date
of this act, are subject to the requirements established under sections
3 and 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
All contracts entered into and purchases made, including leasing or
renting, under this chapter on or after the effective date of this act,
are subject to the requirements established under sections 3 and 4 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
All contracts entered into and purchases made, including leasing or
renting, under this chapter on or after the effective date of this act,
are subject to the requirements established under sections 3 and 4 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 39.29 RCW
to read as follows:
All contracts entered into and purchases made, including leasing or
renting, under this chapter on or after the effective date of this act,
are subject to the requirements established under sections 3 and 4 of
this act.

Sec. 10 RCW 39.80.040 and 1981 c 61 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the procurement of architectural and engineering services, the
agency shall encourage firms engaged in the lawful practice of their
profession to submit annually a statement of qualifications and
performance data. The agency shall evaluate current statements of
qualifications and performance data on file with the agency, together
with those that may be submitted by other firms regarding the proposed
project, and shall conduct discussions with one or more firms regarding
anticipated concepts and the relative utility of alternative methods of
approach for furnishing the required services and then shall select
therefrom, based upon criteria established by the agency, the firm
deemed to be the most highly qualified to provide the services required
for the proposed project. Such agency procedures and guidelines shall
include a plan to insure that minority and women-owned firms and
businesses owned by veterans with disabilities are afforded the maximum
practicable opportunity to compete for and obtain public contracts for
services. The level of participation by minority and women-owned firms
and businesses owned by veterans with disabilities shall be consistent
with their general availability within the professional communities
involved.

Sec. 11 RCW 47.28.030 and 1999 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A state highway shall be constructed, altered, repaired, or
improved, and improvements located on property acquired for right of
way purposes may be repaired or renovated pending the use of such right
of way for highway purposes, by contract or state forces. The work or
portions thereof may be done by state forces when the estimated costs
thereof ((is [are])) are less than fifty thousand dollars and effective
July 1, 2005, sixty thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That when delay of
performance of such work would jeopardize a state highway or constitute
a danger to the traveling public, the work may be done by state forces
when the estimated cost thereof is less than eighty thousand dollars
and effective July 1, 2005, one hundred thousand dollars. When the
department of transportation determines to do the work by state forces,
it shall enter a statement upon its records to that effect, stating the
reasons therefor. To enable a larger number of small businesses,
businesses owned by veterans with disabilities, and minority((,)) and
women contractors to effectively compete for department of
transportation contracts, the department may adopt rules providing for
bids and award of contracts for the performance of work, or furnishing
equipment, materials, supplies, or operating services whenever any work
is to be performed and the engineer's estimate indicates the cost of
the work would not exceed eighty thousand dollars and effective July 1,
2005, one hundred thousand dollars. The rules adopted under this
section:
(1) Shall provide for competitive bids to the extent that
competitive sources are available except when delay of performance
would jeopardize life or property or inconvenience the traveling
public; and
(2) Need not require the furnishing of a bid deposit nor a
performance bond, but if a performance bond is not required then
progress payments to the contractor may be required to be made based on
submittal of paid invoices to substantiate proof that disbursements
have been made to laborers, materialmen, mechanics, and subcontractors
from the previous partial payment; and
(3) May establish prequalification standards and procedures as an
alternative to those set forth in RCW 47.28.070, but the
prequalification standards and procedures under RCW 47.28.070 shall
always be sufficient.
The department of transportation shall comply with such goals and
rules as may be adopted by the office of minority and women's business
enterprises to implement chapter 39.19 RCW with respect to contracts
entered into under this chapter. The department may adopt such rules
as may be necessary to comply with the rules adopted by the office of
minority and women's business enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is not intended to create a cause
of action or entitlement in an individual or class of individuals.

--- END ---