BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The special safety corridor account is created in the motor
vehicle fund. All receipts from taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020 and
82.12.020 on materials, labor, equipment, contracts, and components
used for constructing any state transportation project authorized by
the legislature must be deposited into the account, except for those
amounts that are in excess of seventy million dollars each fiscal year.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used for special safety corridor
projects. Special safety corridor projects are projects that may
require bond financing to complete construction and safety
improvements. The following criteria shall be used in determining
which special safety corridor projects have the highest priority:
(a) Fatal accident experience;
(b) Historic underfunding of safety improvements;
(c) Ability to leverage additional nonstate revenue sources;
(d) Contribute to the economic development of the corridor; and
(e) Provide additional capacity to move people and goods safely.
(2) The following projects, listed in order of priority, are
eligible for special safety corridor account funding:
(a) State route number 2 beginning near the junction with state
route number 9 at milepost 5 to the King county line at Stevens Pass
near milepost 64;
(b) State route number 97 beginning at milepost 0 to milepost 63;
and
(c) State route number 20 beginning near Sedro Woolley at milepost
64 to near Newport at milepost 436.
Moneys deposited in the special safety corridor account in the
motor vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the
proceeds of which are used to finance special safety corridor projects
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---