BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.68.090 and 2005 c 314 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle
fund from the motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be
first expended for purposes enumerated in (a) and (b) of this
subsection. The remaining net tax amount shall be distributed monthly
by the state treasurer in accordance with subsections (2) through (7)
of this section.
(a) For payment of refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special
fuel tax that has been paid and is refundable as provided by law;
(b) For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to
appropriations for the administrative expenses of the offices of state
treasurer, state auditor, and the department of licensing of the state
of Washington in the administration of the motor vehicle fuel tax and
the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed monthly.
(2) All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(1) and 82.38.030(1) shall be distributed as set forth in (a)
through (j) of this section.
(a) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
44.387 percent to be expended for highway purposes of the state as
defined in RCW 46.68.130;
(b) For distribution to the special category C account, hereby
created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent to
be expended for special category C projects. Special category C
projects are category C projects that, due to high cost only, will
require bond financing to complete construction.
The following criteria, listed in order of priority, shall be used
in determining which special category C projects have the highest
priority:
(i) Accident experience;
(ii) Fatal accident experience;
(iii) Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable
speeds without undue congestion; and
(iv) Continuity of development of the highway transportation
network.
Moneys deposited in the special category C account in the motor
vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the
proceeds of which are used to finance special category C projects under
this subsection (2)(b);
(c) For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;
(d) For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction
account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent;
(e) For distribution to the urban arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;
(f) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and expended
in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;
(g) For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW
46.68.110;
(h) For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an
amount equal to 19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there shall be
distributed from time to time, as directed by the department of
transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out the
provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to
the county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW
47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed
monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW
46.68.120;
(i) For distribution to the county arterial preservation account,
hereby created in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565
percent. These funds shall be distributed by the county road
administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the
number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each
county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the structural,
safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road
administration board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies
to implement this program and to assure that a pavement management
system is used;
(j) For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended in
accordance with RCW 36.79.020;
(k) For distribution to the special safety corridor account, hereby
created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 4.3478 percent to
be expended for special safety corridor projects. Special safety
corridor projects are projects that may require bond financing to
complete construction and safety improvements.
The following criteria shall be used in determining which special
safety corridor projects have the highest priority:
(i) Fatal accident experience;
(ii) Historic underfunding of safety improvements;
(iii) Ability to leverage additional nonstate revenue sources;
(iv) Contribute to the economic development of the corridor; and
(v) Provide additional capacity to move people and goods safely.
The following projects, listed in order of priority, are eligible
for special safety corridor account funding:
(A) State route number 2 beginning near the junction with state
route number 9 at milepost 5 to the King county line at Stevens Pass
near milepost 64;
(B) State route number 97 beginning at milepost 0 to milepost 63;
and
(C) State route number 20 beginning near Sedro Woolley at milepost
64 to near Newport at milepost 436.
Moneys deposited in the special safety corridor account in the
motor vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the
proceeds of which are used to finance special safety corridor projects
under this subsection (2)(k).
(3) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(2)
and 82.38.030(2) shall be distributed to the transportation 2003
account (nickel account).
(4) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(3)
and 82.38.030(3) shall be distributed as follows:
(a) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to the incorporated cities
and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;
(b) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to counties of the state in
accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and
(c) The remainder shall be distributed to the transportation
partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.
(5) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(4)
and 82.38.030(4) shall be distributed as follows:
(a) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to the incorporated cities
and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;
(b) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to counties of the state in
accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and
(c) The remainder shall be distributed to the transportation
partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.
(6) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025 (5)
and (6) and 82.38.030 (5) and (6) shall be distributed to the
transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.
(7) Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so
as to violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway
construction bond issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and
whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid from any excise
taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---