BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A joint select task force on public
infrastructure is established, with members as provided in this
subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint two members from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(b) The task force shall choose its chair from among its
legislative membership. The legislator shall convene the initial
meeting of the task force.
(2) The task force shall review the following issues:
(a) The roles of the state, local governments, and private entities
in developing and funding large, regional community projects, including
sports facilities and multipurpose arenas; and
(b) The role of the state in providing capital moneys, tax
incentives, and operating funds for the maintenance and improvements of
the large, regional community facilities.
(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(4) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007.
(7) This section expires January 1, 2008.

--- END ---