BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.38 RCW
to read as follows:
In determining the need for nursing home beds on a statewide basis
and a planning area specific basis, the department shall calculate the
need for nursing home beds based on the bed-to-population ratio of
forty beds per one thousand persons age seventy and older.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---