BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in
addition to the vehicle license fees required under RCW 46.16.0621,
there shall be paid and collected at the time of initial or renewal
registration for each motor vehicle an additional fee of five dollars.
The fee shall be deposited in the state parks renewal and stewardship
account established in RCW 79A.05.215 to be used for the operation and
maintenance of state parks.
(2) A person who registers a vehicle under this section may, at the
time of initial or renewal registration, certify that the person does
not intend to use the vehicle to visit state parks. If a person
certifies that he or she does not intend to use the vehicle to visit
state parks, the department shall not collect the additional fee in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) This section applies to registrations due or to become due on
or after August 1, 2007.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.215 and 1995 c 211 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state parks renewal and stewardship account is created in the
state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all
receipts from user fees, concessions, leases, the optional motor
vehicle license fees under section 1 of this act, and other state park-based activities shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used for operating state parks, developing and
renovating park facilities, undertaking deferred maintenance, enhancing
park stewardship, and other state park purposes. Expenditures from the
account may be made only after appropriation by the legislature.

--- END ---