BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The energy facility site evaluation
council shall review the status of pipeline utility corridor capacity
and distribution for petroleum in the southwest region of the state.
In conducting this study, the council shall, at a minimum, review the
following:
(a) Whether pipeline utility corridor constraints exist, and if so,
to what extent;
(b) Whether there is adequate pipeline utility corridor capacity in
the state to meet existing demand; and
(c) Whether the current pipeline utility corridor system is
expected to meet projected demand growth in the southwest region of the
state.
(2) The council may also examine pipeline utility corridor capacity
and distribution in other areas of the state to the extent that it has
an impact on supply to southwest Washington.
(3) The council shall submit its findings to the legislature by
December 1, 2007.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2008.

--- END ---