BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a person is placed under arrest for a sex offense under
chapter 9A.44 RCW by which force or threat of force the perpetrator
compels the victim to engage in sexual activity, the victim, or parent
or guardian of the victim, of the sexual assault may request the
defendant to undergo HIV testing prior to conviction not later than
forty-eight hours after the date on which the information is presented.
Local health departments authorized under this chapter shall conduct or
cause to be conducted HIV testing under this section.
(2) The results of testing under this section shall be disclosed to
the victim, or parent or guardian of the victim, and the defendant, as
soon as practicable.
(3) A defendant required to submit to testing under this section
shall also undergo follow-up tests for HIV as may be medically
appropriate, and the results shall be made available in accordance with
subsection (2) of this section as soon as practicable after each test.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.24.105 and 1997 c 345 s 2 and 1997 c 196 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) No person may disclose or be compelled to disclose the identity
of any person who has investigated, considered, or requested a test or
treatment for a sexually transmitted disease, except as authorized by
this chapter.
(2) No person may disclose or be compelled to disclose the identity
of any person upon whom an HIV antibody test is performed, or the
results of such a test, nor may the result of a test for any other
sexually transmitted disease when it is positive be disclosed. This
protection against disclosure of test subject, diagnosis, or treatment
also applies to any information relating to diagnosis of or treatment
for HIV infection and for any other confirmed sexually transmitted
disease. The following persons, however, may receive such information:
(a) The subject of the test or the subject's legal representative
for health care decisions in accordance with RCW 7.70.065, with the
exception of such a representative of a minor child over fourteen years
of age and otherwise competent;
(b) Any person who secures a specific release of test results or
information relating to HIV or confirmed diagnosis of or treatment for
any other sexually transmitted disease executed by the subject or the
subject's legal representative for health care decisions in accordance
with RCW 7.70.065, with the exception of such a representative of a
minor child over fourteen years of age and otherwise competent;
(c) The state public health officer, a local public health officer,
or the centers for disease control of the United States public health
service in accordance with reporting requirements for a diagnosed case
of a sexually transmitted disease;
(d) A health facility or health care provider that procures,
processes, distributes, or uses: (i) A human body part, tissue, or
blood from a deceased person with respect to medical information
regarding that person; (ii) semen, including that provided prior to
March 23, 1988, for the purpose of artificial insemination; or (iii)
blood specimens;
(e) Any state or local public health officer conducting an
investigation pursuant to RCW 70.24.024, provided that such record was
obtained by means of court ordered HIV testing pursuant to RCW
70.24.340 or 70.24.024;
(f) A person allowed access to the record by a court order granted
after application showing good cause therefor. In assessing good
cause, the court shall weigh the public interest and the need for
disclosure against the injury to the patient, to the physician-patient
relationship, and to the treatment services. Upon the granting of the
order, the court, in determining the extent to which any disclosure of
all or any part of the record of any such test is necessary, shall
impose appropriate safeguards against unauthorized disclosure. An
order authorizing disclosure shall: (i) Limit disclosure to those
parts of the patient's record deemed essential to fulfill the objective
for which the order was granted; (ii) limit disclosure to those persons
whose need for information is the basis for the order; and (iii)
include any other appropriate measures to keep disclosure to a minimum
for the protection of the patient, the physician-patient relationship,
and the treatment services, including but not limited to the written
statement set forth in subsection (5) of this section;
(g) ((Local law enforcement agencies to the extent provided in RCW
70.24.034;
(h))) Persons who, because of their behavioral interaction with the
infected individual, have been placed at risk for acquisition of a
sexually transmitted disease, as provided in RCW 70.24.022, if the
health officer or authorized representative believes that the exposed
person was unaware that a risk of disease exposure existed and that the
disclosure of the identity of the infected person is necessary;
(((i))) (h) A law enforcement officer, firefighter, health care
provider, health care facility staff person, department of correction's
staff person, jail staff person, or other persons as defined by the
board in rule pursuant to RCW 70.24.340(4), who has requested a test of
a person whose bodily fluids he or she has been substantially exposed
to, pursuant to RCW 70.24.340(4), if a state or local public health
officer performs the test;
(((j))) (i) Claims management personnel employed by or associated
with an insurer, health care service contractor, health maintenance
organization, self-funded health plan, state-administered health care
claims payer, or any other payer of health care claims where such
disclosure is to be used solely for the prompt and accurate evaluation
and payment of medical or related claims. Information released under
this subsection shall be confidential and shall not be released or
available to persons who are not involved in handling or determining
medical claims payment; and
(((k))) (j) A department of social and health services worker, a
child placing agency worker, or a guardian ad litem who is responsible
for making or reviewing placement or case-planning decisions or
recommendations to the court regarding a child, who is less than
fourteen years of age, has a sexually transmitted disease, and is in
the custody of the department of social and health services or a
licensed child placing agency; this information may also be received by
a person responsible for providing residential care for such a child
when the department of social and health services or a licensed child
placing agency determines that it is necessary for the provision of
child care services.
(3) No person to whom the results of a test for a sexually
transmitted disease have been disclosed pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section may disclose the test results to another person except as
authorized by that subsection.
(4) The release of sexually transmitted disease information
regarding an offender or detained person, except as provided in
subsection (2)(e) of this section, shall be governed as follows:
(a) The sexually transmitted disease status of a department of
corrections offender who has had a mandatory test conducted pursuant to
RCW 70.24.340(1), 70.24.360, or 70.24.370 shall be made available by
department of corrections health care providers and local public health
officers to the department of corrections health care administrator or
infection control coordinator of the facility in which the offender is
housed. The information made available to the health care
administrator or the infection control coordinator under this
subsection (4)(a) shall be used only for disease prevention or control
and for protection of the safety and security of the staff, offenders,
and the public. The information may be submitted to transporting
officers and receiving facilities, including facilities that are not
under the department of corrections' jurisdiction according to the
provisions of (d) and (e) of this subsection.
(b) The sexually transmitted disease status of a person detained in
a jail who has had a mandatary test conducted pursuant to RCW
70.24.340(1), 70.24.360, or 70.24.370 shall be made available by the
local public health officer to a jail health care administrator or
infection control coordinator. The information made available to a
health care administrator under this subsection (4)(b) shall be used
only for disease prevention or control and for protection of the safety
and security of the staff, offenders, detainees, and the public. The
information may be submitted to transporting officers and receiving
facilities according to the provisions of (d) and (e) of this
subsection.
(c) Information regarding the sexually transmitted disease status
of an offender or detained person is confidential and may be disclosed
by a correctional health care administrator or infection control
coordinator or local jail health care administrator or infection
control coordinator only as necessary for disease prevention or control
and for protection of the safety and security of the staff, offenders,
and the public. Unauthorized disclosure of this information to any
person may result in disciplinary action, in addition to the penalties
prescribed in RCW 70.24.080 or any other penalties as may be prescribed
by law.
(d) Notwithstanding the limitations on disclosure contained in (a),
(b), and (c) of this subsection, whenever any member of a jail staff or
department of corrections staff has been substantially exposed to the
bodily fluids of an offender or detained person, then the results of
any tests conducted pursuant to RCW 70.24.340(1), 70.24.360, or
70.24.370, shall be immediately disclosed to the staff person in
accordance with the Washington Administrative Code rules governing
employees' occupational exposure to bloodborne pathogens. Disclosure
must be accompanied by appropriate counseling for the staff member,
including information regarding follow-up testing and treatment.
Disclosure shall also include notice that subsequent disclosure of the
information in violation of this chapter or use of the information to
harass or discriminate against the offender or detainee may result in
disciplinary action, in addition to the penalties prescribed in RCW
70.24.080, and imposition of other penalties prescribed by law.
(e) The staff member shall also be informed whether the offender or
detained person had any other communicable disease, as defined in RCW
72.09.251(3), when the staff person was substantially exposed to the
offender's or detainee's bodily fluids.
(f) The test results of voluntary and anonymous HIV testing or HIV-related condition may not be disclosed to a staff person except as
provided in subsection (2)(((i))) (h) of this section and RCW
70.24.340(4). A health care administrator or infection control
coordinator may provide the staff member with information about how to
obtain the offender's or detainee's test results under subsection
(2)(((i))) (h) of this section and RCW 70.24.340(4).
(5) Whenever disclosure is made pursuant to this section, except
for subsections (2)(a) and (6) of this section, it shall be accompanied
by a statement in writing which includes the following or substantially
similar language: "This information has been disclosed to you from
records whose confidentiality is protected by state law. State law
prohibits you from making any further disclosure of it without the
specific written consent of the person to whom it pertains, or as
otherwise permitted by state law. A general authorization for the
release of medical or other information is NOT sufficient for this
purpose." An oral disclosure shall be accompanied or followed by such
a notice within ten days.
(6) The requirements of this section shall not apply to the
customary methods utilized for the exchange of medical information
among health care providers in order to provide health care services to
the patient, nor shall they apply within health care facilities where
there is a need for access to confidential medical information to
fulfill professional duties.
(7) Upon request of the victim, disclosure of test results under
this section to victims of sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW
shall be made if the result is negative or positive. The county
prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim of the right to such
disclosure. Such disclosure shall be accompanied by appropriate
counseling, including information regarding follow-up testing.

--- END ---