BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.430 and 1993 c 384 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may sell any new motor vehicle as specified in this
title, nor may any new motor vehicle as specified in this title be
registered unless such vehicle is equipped with safety glazing material
of a type that meets or exceeds federal standards, or if there are
none, standards approved by the Washington state patrol. The foregoing
provisions apply to all passenger-type motor vehicles, including
passenger buses and school buses, but in respect to trucks, including
truck tractors, the requirements as to safety glazing material apply to
all glazing material used in doors, windows, and windshields in the
drivers' compartments of such vehicles except as provided by subsection
(4) of this section.
(2) The term "safety glazing materials" means glazing materials so
constructed, treated, or combined with other materials as to reduce
substantially, in comparison with ordinary sheet glass or plate glass,
the likelihood of injury to persons by objects from exterior sources or
by these safety glazing materials when they may be cracked or broken.
(3) The director of licensing shall not register any motor vehicle
which is subject to the provisions of this section unless it is
equipped with an approved type of safety glazing material, and he or
she shall suspend the registration of any motor vehicle so subject to
this section which the director finds is not so equipped until it is
made to conform to the requirements of this section.
(4) No person may sell or offer for sale, nor may any person
operate a motor vehicle registered in this state which is equipped
with, any camper manufactured after May 23, 1969, unless such camper is
equipped with safety glazing material of a type conforming to rules
adopted by the state patrol wherever glazing materials are used in
outside windows and doors.
(5) No film sunscreening or coloring material that reduces light
transmittance to any degree may be applied to the surface of the safety
glazing material in a motor vehicle unless it meets the following
standards ((for such material)):
(a)(i) The maximum level of film sunscreening material to be
applied to any window, except the windshield, shall have a total
reflectance of thirty-five percent or less, plus or minus three
percent, and a light transmission of thirty-five percent or more, plus
or minus three percent((, when measured against clear glass
resulting)). For film sunscreening material applied before the
effective date of this act using AS-2 glazing, the material may result
in a minimum of twenty-four percent light transmission ((on AS-2
glazing where)) when measured against clear glass, as long as the
vehicle is equipped with outside rearview mirrors on both the right and
left. Installation of more than a single sheet of film sunscreening
material to any window is prohibited. The same maximum levels of film
sunscreen material may be applied to windows to the immediate right and
left of the driver on limousines and passenger buses used to transport
persons for compensation and vehicles identified by the manufacturer as
multi-use, multipurpose, or other similar designation. All windows to
the rear of the driver on such vehicles may have film sunscreening
material applied that has less than thirty-five percent light
transmittance, if the light reflectance is thirty-five percent or less
and the vehicle is equipped with outside rearview mirrors on both the
right and left.
(ii) A person or business tinting windows for profit who tints
windows within restricted areas of the glazing system shall supply a
sticker to be affixed to the driver's door post, in the area adjacent
to the manufacturer's identification tag. Installation of this sticker
certifies that the glazing application meets this chapter's standards
for light transmission, reflectance, and placement requirements.
Stickers must be no smaller than three-quarters of an inch by one and
one-half inches, and no larger than two inches by two and one-half
inches. The stickers must be of sufficient quality to endure exposure
to harsh climate conditions. The business name and state tax
identification number of the installer must be clearly visible on the
sticker. It is a misdemeanor for a person or business tinting windows
for profit to install film sunscreening or coloring material in
violation of this section as of the effective date of this act.
(b) A greater degree of light reduction is permitted on all windows
and the top six inches of windshields of a vehicle operated by or
carrying as a passenger a person who possesses a written verification
from a licensed physician that the operator or passenger must be
protected from exposure to sunlight for physical or medical reasons.
(c) Windshield application. A greater degree of light reduction is
permitted on the top six-inch area of a vehicle's windshield. Clear
film sunscreening material that reduces or eliminates ultraviolet light
may be applied to windshields.
(d) When film sunscreening material is applied to any window except
the windshield, outside mirrors on both the left and right sides shall
be located so as to reflect to the driver a view of the roadway,
through each mirror, a distance of at least two hundred feet to the
rear of the vehicle.
(e) The following types of film sunscreening material are not
permitted:
(i) Mirror finish products;
(ii) Red, gold, yellow, or black material; or
(iii) Film sunscreening material that is in liquid preapplication
form and brushed or sprayed on.
Nothing in this section prohibits the use of shaded or heat-absorbing safety glazing material in which the shading or heat-absorbing characteristics have been applied at the time of manufacture
of the safety glazing material and which meet federal standards and the
standards of the state patrol for such safety glazing materials.
(6) It is a traffic infraction for any person to operate a vehicle
for use on the public highways of this state, if the vehicle is
equipped with film sunscreening or coloring material in violation of
this section.
(((7) Owners of vehicles with film sunscreening material applied to
windows to the rear of the driver, prior to June 7, 1990, must comply
with the requirements of this section and RCW 46.37.435 by July 1,
1993.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 46.37.435 (Sunscreening, unlawful
installation, penalty) and 1990 c 95 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---