BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.50.105 and 1987 c 331 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
Reports and records of autopsies or post mortems shall be
confidential, except that the following persons may examine and obtain
copies of any such report or record: The personal representative of
the decedent as defined in RCW 11.02.005, any family member, the
attending physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner, the
prosecuting attorney or law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction,
public health officials, or to the department of labor and industries
in cases in which it has an interest under RCW 68.50.103.
The coroner, the medical examiner, or the attending physician or
advanced registered nurse practitioner shall, upon request, meet with
the family of the decedent to discuss the findings of the autopsy or
post mortem. For the purposes of this section, the term "family" means
the surviving spouse, or any child, parent, grandparent, grandchild,
brother, or sister of the decedent, or any person who was guardian of
the decedent at the time of death.

--- END ---