BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The sum of one hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, as a pilot
project to contract with a statewide procurement technical assistance
program based in Snohomish county to expand procurement technical
assistance services.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall report to the legislature on the results of the pilot project.
The report shall include the number of businesses served, contracts
written, monetary value of contracts, and a plan for sustainable and
ongoing funding. The department shall report to the appropriate
legislative committees by January 1, 2008.

--- END ---