BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the goal of
preserving Washington's agricultural lands is shared by citizens
throughout the state. The legislature recognizes that efforts to
achieve a balance between the productive use of these resource lands
and associated regulatory requirements have proven difficult, but that
good faith efforts to seek solutions have yielded successes. The
legislature believes that this willingness to find and pursue common
ground will enable Washingtonians to enjoy the benefits of a successful
agricultural economy and a healthy environment, while also preventing
the unnecessary conversion of valuable agricultural lands.
(2) The legislature, therefore, intends this act, the temporary
delays it establishes for amending or adopting provisions of certain
critical area ordinances and implementing regulations, and the duties
and requirements it prescribes for the William D. Ruckelshaus Center,
to be expressions of progress in resolving, harmonizing, and advancing
commonly held environmental protection and agricultural viability
goals.
(3) The legislature fully expects the duties and requirements it is
prescribing for the Ruckelshaus Center to be successful. If, however,
the efforts of the center do not result in a consensus of how to best
address the conflicts between agricultural activities and certain
regulatory requirements as they apply to agricultural activities, the
legislature intends, upon the expiration of the delay, to require
jurisdictions that have delayed amending or adopting certain regulatory
measures to promptly complete all regulatory amendments or adoptions
necessary to comply with the growth management act.
(4) The legislature does not intend this act to reduce or otherwise
diminish existing critical area ordinances and implementing regulations
that protect critical areas that apply to agricultural activities
during the deferral period established in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Until July 1, 2009, counties and cities must defer amending or
adopting critical area ordinances and implementing regulations under
RCW 36.70A.060(2) as they specifically apply to agricultural
activities. Nothing in this section:
(a) Nullifies critical area ordinances and implementing regulations
adopted by a county or city prior to January 1, 2007, to comply with
RCW 36.70A.060(2);
(b) Limits or otherwise modifies the obligations of a county or
city to comply with the requirements of this chapter pertaining to
critical areas not associated with agricultural activities; or
(c) Limits the ability of a county or city to employ voluntary
measures or programs to protect or enhance critical areas associated
with agricultural activities.
(2) Counties and cities that defer amending or adopting critical
area ordinances and implementing regulations under subsection (1) of
this section must review and revise these ordinances and regulations as
they specifically apply to agricultural activities to comply with the
requirements of this chapter by July 1, 2010.
(3) For purposes of this section and sections 3, 4, and 6 of this
act, "agricultural activities" means agricultural uses and practices
currently existing or legally allowed including, but not limited to:
Producing, breeding, or increasing agricultural products; rotating and
changing agricultural crops; allowing land used for agricultural
activities to lie fallow in which it is plowed and tilled but left
unseeded; allowing land used for agricultural activities to lie dormant
as a result of adverse agricultural market conditions; allowing land
used for agricultural activities to lie dormant because the land is
enrolled in a local, state, or federal conservation program, or the
land is subject to a conservation easement; conducting agricultural
operations; maintaining, repairing, and replacing agricultural
equipment; maintaining, repairing, and replacing agricultural
facilities, when the replacement facility is no closer to a critical
area than the original facility; and maintaining agricultural lands
under production or cultivation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this act limits or otherwise modifies the authority of
a county or city to:
(1) Comply with an order from a growth management hearings board or
a court;
(2) Implement a settlement in compliance with the requirements of
this chapter; or
(3) Attempt to settle issues raised in litigation challenging
critical area ordinances and implementing regulations under RCW
36.70A.060(2) as they specifically apply to agricultural activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose, the William D. Ruckelshaus
Center must conduct an examination of the conflicts between
agricultural activities and critical area ordinances and implementing
regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW to protect critical areas.
The examination required by this section must commence by July 1, 2007.
(2) In fulfilling the requirements of this section, the center
must: (a) Work and consult with willing participants including, but
not limited to, agricultural, environmental, tribal, and local
government interests; and (b) involve and apprise legislators and
legislative staff of its efforts.
(3) The examination conducted by the center must be completed in
two distinct phases in accordance with the following:
(a) In the first phase, the center must conduct fact-finding and
stakeholder discussions with stakeholders identified in subsection (2)
of this section. These discussions must identify stakeholder concerns,
desired outcomes, opportunities, and barriers. The fact-finding must
identify existing regulatory, management, and scientific information
related to agricultural activities and critical areas including, but
not limited to: (i) Critical area ordinances and implementing
regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW to protect critical areas;
(ii) acreage enrolled in the conservation reserve enhancement program;
(iii) acreage protected by conservation easements; (iv) buffer widths;
(v) requirements of federally approved salmon recovery plans; (vi) the
impacts of agricultural activities on Puget Sound recovery efforts; and
(vii) compliance with water quality requirements. The center must
issue a report of its fact-finding efforts and stakeholder discussions
to the governor and the appropriate committees of the house of
representatives and the senate by December 1, 2007; and
(b) In the second phase, the center must facilitate discussions
between the stakeholders identified in subsection (2) of this section
to identify policy and financial options or opportunities to address
the issues identified by stakeholders in the first phase of the
center's examination efforts. In particular, the center must examine
innovative solutions including, but not limited to, outcome-based
approaches that incorporate, to the maximum extent practicable,
voluntary programs or approaches. The center must work to achieve
consensus among participating stakeholders on identified issues and to
develop a coalition of diverse stakeholders that can be used to support
agreed upon changes or new approaches to protecting critical areas
during the 2009 legislative session.
(4) The center must issue a final report of findings and
legislative recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September
1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 4 of this act, referencing this act and section 4 of this act
by bill or chapter number and section number, is not provided by June
30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act applies retroactively to any
critical area ordinance and implementing regulation under RCW
36.70A.060(2) as they specifically apply to agricultural activities
amended or adopted by a county or city on or after January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act expires July 1, 2010.

--- END ---