BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the goals of the
state's growth management act rightfully include both protection of the
environment and the maintenance and enhancement of natural resource-based industries, including timber, agriculture, and fisheries. The
legislature acknowledges the importance of local governments adopting
development regulations that protect critical areas on agricultural
lands. The legislature also acknowledges the efforts of landowners and
operators who develop and implement farm plans governing agricultural
activities on agricultural lands. The legislature finds that there
have been and continue to be a considerable number of legal challenges
brought before the growth management hearings boards and the courts
concerning regulations protecting critical areas and their application
to agricultural lands. The legislature therefore finds it necessary to
initiate short and longer-term actions to identify, consider, reduce,
and resolve issues causing conflicts between agricultural activities
occurring on agricultural lands and development regulations that
protect critical areas.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.030 and 2005 c 423 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new
comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land
use plan.
(2) "Agricultural activities" means agricultural uses and practices
including, but not limited to: Producing, breeding, or increasing
agricultural products; rotating and changing agricultural crops;
allowing land used for agricultural activities to lie fallow in which
it is plowed and tilled but left unseeded; allowing land used for
agricultural activities to lie dormant as a result of adverse
agricultural market conditions; allowing land used for agricultural
activities to lie dormant because the land is enrolled in a local,
state, or federal conservation program, or the land is subject to a
conservation easement; conducting agricultural operations; maintaining,
repairing, and replacing agricultural equipment; maintaining,
repairing, and replacing agricultural facilities, when the replacement
facility is no closer to the shoreline than the original facility; and
maintaining agricultural lands under production or cultivation.
(3) "Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the
commercial production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural,
dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay,
straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax
imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish in upland
hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.
(((3))) (4) "City" means any city or town, including a code city.
(((4))) (5) "Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or
"plan" means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the
governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this
chapter.
(((5))) (6) "Critical areas" include the following areas and
ecosystems: (a) Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect
on aquifers used for potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat
conservation areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and (e) geologically
hazardous areas.
(((6))) (7) "Department" means the department of community, trade,
and economic development.
(((7))) (8) "Development regulations" or "regulation" means the
controls placed on development or land use activities by a county or
city, including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas
ordinances, shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit
development ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan
ordinances together with any amendments thereto. A development
regulation does not include a decision to approve a project permit
application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the decision may
be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body of
the county or city.
(((8))) (9) "Farm plan" means a plan prepared by a conservation
district in cooperation with a landowner or operator for the purpose of
conserving, monitoring, or enhancing renewable natural resources. Farm
plans include, but are not limited to, site-specific provisions
pertaining to:
(a) Developing and prioritizing conservation objectives;
(b) Taking an inventory of soil, water, vegetation, livestock, and
wildlife;
(c) Implementing conservation measures, including technical
assistance provided by the district;
(d) Developing and implementing livestock nutrient management
measures;
(e) Developing and implementing plans pursuant to business and
financial objectives; and
(f) Recording, or records of, decisions.
(10) "Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees
for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be
economically and practically managed for such production, including
Christmas trees subject to the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100
through 84.33.140, and that has long-term commercial significance. In
determining whether forest land is primarily devoted to growing trees
for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be
economically and practically managed for such production, the following
factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban,
suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for
timber production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and
services conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.
(((9))) (11) "Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that
because of their susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or
other geological events, are not suited to the siting of commercial,
residential, or industrial development consistent with public health or
safety concerns.
(((10))) (12) "Long-term commercial significance" includes the
growing capacity, productivity, and soil composition of the land for
long-term commercial production, in consideration with the land's
proximity to population areas, and the possibility of more intense
uses of the land.
(((11))) (13) "Mediation" means a process in which a mediator
facilitates communication and negotiation between parties to assist
them in reaching a voluntary agreement regarding their dispute.
(14) "Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic
substances.
(((12))) (15) "Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways,
sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic
water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational
facilities, and schools.
(((13))) (16) "Public services" include fire protection and
suppression, law enforcement, public health, education, recreation,
environmental protection, and other governmental services.
(((14))) (17) "Recreational land" means land so designated under
RCW 36.70A.1701 and that, immediately prior to this designation, was
designated as agricultural land of long-term commercial significance
under RCW 36.70A.170. Recreational land must have playing fields and
supporting facilities existing before July 1, 2004, for sports played
on grass playing fields.
(((15))) (18) "Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use
and development established by a county in the rural element of its
comprehensive plan:
(a) In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation
predominate over the built environment;
(b) That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based
economies, and opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;
(c) That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in
rural areas and communities;
(d) That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and
for fish and wildlife habitat;
(e) That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development;
(f) That generally do not require the extension of urban
governmental services; and
(g) That are consistent with the protection of natural surface
water flows and ground water and surface water recharge and discharge
areas.
(((16))) (19) "Rural development" refers to development outside the
urban growth area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral
resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural
development can consist of a variety of uses and residential densities,
including clustered residential development, at levels that are
consistent with the preservation of rural character and the
requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to
agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural
areas.
(((17))) (20) "Rural governmental services" or "rural services"
include those public services and public facilities historically and
typically delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and
may include domestic water systems, fire and police protection
services, transportation and public transit services, and other public
utilities associated with rural development and normally not associated
with urban areas. Rural services do not include storm or sanitary
sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).
(((18))) (21) "Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive
use of land for the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable
surfaces to such a degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of
land for the production of food, other agricultural products, or fiber,
or the extraction of mineral resources, rural uses, rural development,
and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A
pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW
36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over
wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental
services. "Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban
growth located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area
with urban growth on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.
(((19))) (22) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by
a county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.
(((20))) (23) "Urban governmental services" or "urban services"
include those public services and public facilities at an intensity
historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including
storm and sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street
cleaning services, fire and police protection services, public transit
services, and other public utilities associated with urban areas and
normally not associated with rural areas.
(((21))) (24) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are
inundated or saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency
and duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances
do support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in
saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes,
bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial
wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland sites, including, but
not limited to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined swales,
canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm
ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1,
1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the construction
of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial
wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.060 and 2005 c 423 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 36.70A.1701, each county that is
required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each city within
such county, shall adopt development regulations on or before September
1, 1991, to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest, and
mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations
adopted under this subsection may not prohibit uses legally existing on
any parcel prior to their adoption and shall remain in effect until the
county or city adopts development regulations pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure that the use of lands
adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands shall not
interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed manner and in
accordance with best management practices, of these designated lands
for the production of food, agricultural products, or timber, or for
the extraction of minerals.
(b) Counties and cities shall require that all plats, short plats,
development permits, and building permits issued for development
activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands designated as
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a
notice that the subject property is within or near designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands on which a
variety of commercial activities may occur that are not compatible with
residential development for certain periods of limited duration. The
notice for mineral resource lands shall also inform that an application
might be made for mining-related activities, including mining,
extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and
recycling of minerals.
(2) Except as provided in section 5 of this act, each county and
city shall adopt development regulations that protect critical areas
that are required to be designated under RCW 36.70A.170. For counties
and cities that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
such development regulations shall be adopted on or before September 1,
1991. For the remainder of the counties and cities, such development
regulations shall be adopted on or before March 1, 1992.
(3) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.
(4) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban growth
areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land or
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.280 and 2003 c 332 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A growth management hearings board shall hear and determine
only those petitions alleging either:
(a) That a state agency, county, or city planning under this
chapter is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter,
chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption of shoreline master
programs or amendments thereto, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to
plans, development regulations, or amendments, adopted under RCW
36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW. A board, however, may only hear and
determine a petition related to agricultural activities occurring on
agricultural lands under this subsection if the parties have
participated in mediation services provided by the department under RCW
36.70A.190; or
(b) That the twenty-year growth management planning population
projections adopted by the office of financial management pursuant to
RCW 43.62.035 should be adjusted.
(2) Petitions alleging noncompliance with development regulations
that protect critical areas as they relate to agricultural activities
occurring on agricultural land are subject to section 5 of this act.
(3) A petition may be filed only by: (a) The state, or a county or
city that plans under this chapter; (b) a person who has participated
orally or in writing before the county or city regarding the matter on
which a review is being requested; (c) a person who is certified by the
governor within sixty days of filing the request with the board; or (d)
a person qualified pursuant to RCW 34.05.530.
(((3))) (4) For purposes of this section "person" means any
individual, partnership, corporation, association, state agency,
governmental subdivision or unit thereof, or public or private
organization or entity of any character.
(((4))) (5) To establish participation standing under subsection
(((2))) (3)(b) of this section, a person must show that his or her
participation before the county or city was reasonably related to the
person's issue as presented to the board.
(((5))) (6) When considering a possible adjustment to a growth
management planning population projection prepared by the office of
financial management, a board shall consider the implications of any
such adjustment to the population forecast for the entire state.
The rationale for any adjustment that is adopted by a board must be
documented and filed with the office of financial management within ten
working days after adoption.
If adjusted by a board, a county growth management planning
population projection shall only be used for the planning purposes set
forth in this chapter and shall be known as a "board adjusted
population projection". None of these changes shall affect the
official state and county population forecasts prepared by the office
of financial management, which shall continue to be used for state
budget and planning purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Development regulations adopted under RCW 36.70A.060(2) may not
prohibit or otherwise limit agricultural activities occurring on
agricultural lands if:
(a) The agricultural activities occurring on agricultural land are
consistent with a farm plan for the parcels on which the agricultural
activities are occurring;
(b) The applicable farm plan has been filed with and approved by
the county in which the agricultural land is located;
(c) The applicable farm plan provides a level of protection to
critical areas that is at least equal to the level of protection the
jurisdiction otherwise requires through its development regulations
under RCW 36.70A.060(2) for critical areas located on agricultural
lands; and
(d) The landowner or operator waives the exemption from public
disclosure provided under RCW 42.56.270(17) for the applicable farm
plan.
(2) With regard to a petition under RCW 36.70A.280 alleging
noncompliance with development regulations that protect critical areas
as they relate to agricultural activities occurring on agricultural
lands:
(a) A board may not hear or determine such a petition if the
agricultural activities occurring on agricultural lands are in
compliance with the requirements in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) A board may only hear and determine such a petition:
(i) If the agricultural activities occurring on agricultural lands
are not in compliance with the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section; and
(ii) The parties have participated in mediation services provided
by the department under RCW 36.70A.190.
(3) As used in this section, "agricultural land" means those
specific land areas on which agricultural activities are conducted.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.70A.190 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a program of technical and
financial assistance and incentives to counties and cities to encourage
and facilitate the adoption and implementation of comprehensive plans
and development regulations throughout the state.
(2) The department shall develop a priority list and establish
funding levels for planning and technical assistance grants both for
counties and cities that plan under RCW 36.70A.040. Priority for
assistance shall be based on a county's or city's population growth
rates, commercial and industrial development rates, the existence and
quality of a comprehensive plan and development regulations, and other
relevant factors.
(3) The department shall develop and administer a grant program to
provide direct financial assistance to counties and cities for the
preparation of comprehensive plans under this chapter. The department
may establish provisions for county and city matching funds to conduct
activities under this subsection. Grants may be expended for any
purpose directly related to the preparation of a county or city
comprehensive plan as the county or city and the department may agree,
including, without limitation, the conducting of surveys, inventories
and other data gathering and management activities, the retention of
planning consultants, contracts with regional councils for planning and
related services, and other related purposes.
(4) The department shall establish a program of technical
assistance:
(a) Utilizing department staff, the staff of other state agencies,
and the technical resources of counties and cities to help in the
development of comprehensive plans required under this chapter. The
technical assistance may include, but not be limited to, model land use
ordinances, regional education and training programs, and information
for local and regional inventories; and
(b) Adopting by rule procedural criteria to assist counties and
cities in adopting comprehensive plans and development regulations that
meet the goals and requirements of this chapter. These criteria shall
reflect regional and local variations and the diversity that exists
among different counties and cities that plan under this chapter.
(5) The department shall provide mediation services to resolve
disputes between: (a) Counties and cities regarding, among other
things, coordination of regional issues and designation of urban growth
areas; (b) counties, cities, and other persons regarding the
application of development regulations that protect critical areas to
agricultural activities occurring on agricultural lands; and (c)
counties, cities, and other persons regarding alleged noncompliance
with requirements of the statutes named in RCW 36.70A.280(1)(a) that
relate to agricultural activities occurring on agricultural lands.
(6) The department shall provide planning grants to enhance citizen
participation under RCW 36.70A.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1)(a) A joint legislative task force on
development regulations and agricultural lands is established, with
members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint two members from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(b) The office of financial management and the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall each maintain a
liaison representative who shall be a nonvoting member. Each agency
shall cooperate with the task force and provide such information as the
cochairs may reasonably request.
(c) The task force shall choose its cochairs from among its
members.
(2) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(3) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(4) Staff support shall be provided by the senate committee
services and the house of representatives office of program research.
(5) The task force may contract with additional persons who have
specific technical expertise if such expertise is necessary to carry
out the work of the task force. Such a contract may be entered into
only if an appropriation is specifically provided for this purpose.
(6)(a) Beginning July 1, 2007, the task force shall work with the
Ruckelshaus center to design and carry out a process to identify issues
that cause conflicts between agricultural activities occurring on
agricultural land and development regulations that protect critical
areas. Such issues may include, but are not limited to, an assessment
of:
(i) The degree to which local critical areas ordinances limit or
modify currently existing agricultural activities on agricultural land;
(ii) Issues that have driven the legal challenges that have come
before the growth management hearings boards and the courts;
(iii) Performance-based methods for reaching environmental goals of
critical areas ordinances while allowing agricultural activities on
agricultural land to continue;
(iv) Technical assistance available to local governments in
resolving land use disputes involving agricultural activities on
agricultural land; and
(v) Recommendations for statutory changes to help resolve disputes.
(b) The task force and the center shall involve stakeholders from
diverse perspectives in the process, including but not limited to
representatives of counties, cities, the agriculture industry, the
environmental community, Native American tribes, and state agencies.
(c) By January 1, 2008, the task force shall submit a progress
report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature identifying issues, initial recommendations, and a plan for
the work remaining.
(d) By October 1, 2008, the task force and the center shall report
to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature its
findings and recommendations for resolving or reducing these conflicts,
including statutory changes for consideration during the 2009
legislative session.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2009.

--- END ---