BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The sentencing reform act of 1981 took effect in 1984 to make
the criminal justice system accountable to the public by developing a
system for the sentencing of felony offenders that structured, but did
not eliminate, discretionary decisions affecting sentences and insured
that the punishment for criminal behavior was proportionate to the
seriousness of the offense and the offender's criminal history;
promoted respect for the law by providing punishment that was just and
commensurate with the punishment imposed upon others committing similar
offenses; protected the public; offered the offender an opportunity to
improve himself or herself; made frugal use of the state's and local
government's resources; and reduced the risk of reoffense by offenders
in the community.
(2) The sentencing reform act has been amended approximately two
hundred times since its enactment, increasing the complexity and
difficulty of applying the sentencing reform act with each successive
change, causing increased litigation over each amendment, producing
large amounts of complicated case law necessitated by the need to
interpret and harmonize the many amendments to the sentencing reform
act, and creating uncertainty each year about what sentence and other
consequences an offender will face for any crime.
(3) An evaluation of the sentencing reform act would necessarily
include an evaluation of the sentencing guidelines commission, the
agency charged with administering the sentencing reform act, and
therefore preclude the commission from evaluating itself.
(4) There is a growing sense of the need to determine how to best
make use of specialty therapeutic courts such as drug courts or mental
health courts and other criminal justice system alternatives, such as
deferrals and diversions, used to address criminal behavior at the
beginning rather than upon reentry to the criminal justice system.
(5) There is always value in looking at the systems of other
states, conducting research on smart sentencing and evidence-based
treatment programs, and hearing the viewpoints of out-of-state experts.
(6) There is a growing crisis in the need to provide adequate
prison and local jail space at great cost to the public.
(7) There is a further need to balance the need for supervision of
offenders by the department of corrections, the costs of that
supervision, and the liability for not supervising.
(8) The tension between holding offenders accountable and the
increasing pressure to grant earlier release times is jeopardizing
truth in sentencing.
(9) There needs to be a complete review of sentencing and its
effect on law enforcement, jails, corrections, and state and local
fiscal resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall study the sentencing reform act. The study shall:
(a) Evaluate the sentencing reform act in light of its intended
purposes as set forth in RCW 9.94A.010;
(b) Compare the sentencing reform act to other systems of
sentencing adult offenders in the United States; and
(c) Recommend a design for a more ideal and stably maintained
criminal justice system.
(2) When performing the study required by this section, the
Washington state institute for public policy shall consult with the
following:
(a) Prosecutors;
(b) Judges;
(c) The legislature;
(d) Victim advocate groups;
(e) Defense attorneys;
(f) The department of corrections;
(g) Law enforcement;
(h) Local government;
(i) The sentencing guidelines commission; and
(j) Any other persons or groups deemed appropriate by the
Washington state institute for public policy.
(3) The Washington state institute for public policy shall report
its findings to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2008.

--- END ---