BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The sea grant program at the University of Washington shall,
consistent with this section, commission a series of scientific
research studies that examines the possible effects, including the
cumulative effects, of the current prevalent geoduck aquaculture
techniques and practices on the natural environment in and around Puget
Sound, including the Strait of Juan de Fuca. The sea grant program
shall use funding provided from the geoduck aquaculture research
account created in section 2 of this act to review existing literature,
directly perform research identified as needed, or to enter into and
manage contracts with scientific organizations or institutions to
accomplish these results.
(2) Prior to entering into a contract with a scientific
organization or institution, the sea grant program must:
(a) Analyze, through peer review, the credibility of the proposed
party to the contract, including whether the party has credible
experience and knowledge and has access to the facilities necessary to
fully execute the research required by the contract; and
(b) Require that all proposed parties to a contract fully disclose
any past, present, or planned future personal or professional
connections with the shellfish industry or public interest groups.
(3) All research commissioned under this section must be subjected
to a rigorous peer review process prior to being accepted and reported
by the sea grant program.
(4) In prioritizing and directing research under this section, the
sea grant program shall meet with the department of ecology at least
annually and rely on guidance submitted by the department of ecology.
The department of ecology shall convene the shellfish aquaculture
regulatory committee created in section 4 of this act as necessary to
serve as an oversight committee to formulate the guidance provided to
the sea grant program. The objective of the oversight committee, and
the resulting guidance provided to the sea grant program, is to ensure
that the research required under this section satisfies the planning,
permitting, and data management needs of the state, to assist in the
prioritization of research given limited funding, and to help identify
any research that is beneficial to complete other than what is listed
in subsection (5) of this section.
(5) To satisfy the minimum requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, the sea grant program shall review all scientific research
that is existing or in progress that examines the possible effect of
currently prevalent shellfish practices, including geoduck practices,
on the natural environment, and prioritize and conduct new studies as
needed, to measure and assess the following:
(a) The environmental effects of structures commonly used in the
aquaculture industry to protect juvenile geoducks from predation;
(b) The environmental effects of commercial harvesting of geoducks
from intertidal geoduck beds, focusing on current prevalent harvesting
techniques, including a review of the recovery rates for benthic
communities after harvest;
(c) The extent to which geoducks in standard aquaculture tracts
alter the ecological characteristics of overlying waters while the
tracts are submerged, including impacts on species diversity, and the
abundance of other benthic organisms;
(d) Baseline information regarding naturally existing parasites and
diseases in wild and cultured geoducks, including whether and to what
extent commercial intertidal geoduck aquaculture practices impact the
baseline;
(e) Genetic interactions between cultured and wild geoduck,
including measurements of differences between cultured geoducks and
wild geoducks in terms of genetics and reproductive status; and
(f) The impact of the use of sterile triploid geoducks and whether
triploid animals diminish the genetic interactions between wild and
cultured geoducks.
(6) If adequate funding is not made available for the completion of
all research required under this section, the sea grant program shall
consult with the shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee, via the
department of ecology, to prioritize which of the enumerated research
projects have the greatest cost/benefit ratio in terms of providing
information important for regulatory decisions; however, the study
identified in subsection (5)(b) of this section shall receive top
priority unless the sea grant program determines that an adequate study
addressing the issues identified in subsection (5)(b) of this section
has already been completed or is within six months of completion. The
prioritization process may include the addition of any new studies that
may be appropriate in addition to, or in place of, studies listed in
this section.
(7) When appropriate, all research commissioned under this section
must address localized and cumulative effects of geoduck aquaculture.
(8) The sea grant program and the University of Washington are
prohibited from retaining greater than fifteen percent of any funding
provided to implement this section for administrative overhead or other
deductions not directly associated with conducting the research
required by this section.
(9) Individual commissioned contracts under this section may
address single or multiple components listed for study under this
section.
(10) All research commissioned under this section must be completed
and the results reported to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2013. In addition, the sea grant program
shall provide the appropriate committees of the legislature with annual
reports updating the status and progress of the ongoing studies that
are completed in advance of the 2013 deadline.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The geoduck aquaculture research account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from any legislative
appropriations directed to the account must be deposited in the
account. Expenditures from the account may only be used by the sea
grant program for the geoduck research projects identified by section
1 of this act. Only the president of the University of Washington or
the president's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.135.100 and 1984 c 221 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If state-owned aquatic lands are used for aquaculture
production or harvesting, rents and fees shall be established through
competitive bidding or negotiation.
(2) The department is prohibited from offering leases that would
permit the intertidal commercial aquaculture of geoducks on more than
twenty-five acres of state-owned aquatic lands a year until December 1,
2014. Any intertidal leases entered into by the department for geoduck
aquaculture must be conditioned in such a way that the department can
engage in monitoring of the environmental impacts of the lease's
execution, without unreasonably diminishing the economic viability of
the lease, and that the lease tracts are eligible to be made part of
the studies conducted under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The shellfish aquaculture regulatory
committee is established to, consistent with this section, serve as an
advisory body to the department of ecology on regulatory processes and
approvals for all current and new shellfish aquaculture activities, and
the activities conducted pursuant to RCW 90.58.060, as the activities
relate to shellfish. The shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee is
advisory in nature, and no vote or action of the committee may overrule
existing statutes, regulations, or local ordinances.
(2) The shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee shall develop
recommendations as to:
(a) A regulatory system or permit process for all current and new
shellfish aquaculture projects and activities that integrates all
applicable existing local, state, and federal regulations and is
efficient both for the regulators and the regulated; and
(b) Appropriate guidelines for geoduck aquaculture operations to be
included in shoreline master programs under section 5 of this act.
(3)(a) The members of the shellfish aquaculture regulatory
committee shall be appointed by the director of the department of
ecology as follows:
(i) Two representatives of county government, one from a county
located on the Puget Sound, and one from a county located on the
Pacific Ocean;
(ii) Two individuals who are professionally engaged in the
commercial aquaculture of shellfish, one who owns or operates an
aquatic farm in Puget Sound, and one who owns or operates an aquatic
farm in state waters other than the Puget Sound;
(iii) Two representatives of organizations representing the
environmental community;
(iv) Two individuals who own shoreline property, one of which does
not have a commercial geoduck operation on his or her property and one
of which who does have a commercial geoduck operation on his or her
property; and
(v) One representative each from the following state agencies: The
department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of agriculture, and the department of natural resources.
(b) In addition to the other participants listed in this
subsection, the governor shall invite the full participation of two
tribal governments, at least one of which is located within the
drainage of the Puget Sound.
(4) The department of ecology shall provide administrative and
clerical assistance to the shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee
and all agencies listed in subsection (3) of this section shall provide
technical assistance.
(5) Nonagency members of the shellfish aquaculture regulatory
committee will not be compensated, but are entitled to be reimbursed
for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) Any participation by a Native American tribe on the shellfish
aquaculture regulatory committee shall not, under any circumstances, be
viewed as an admission by the tribe that any of its activities, or
those of its members, are subject to any of the statutes, regulations,
ordinances, standards, or permit systems reviewed, considered, or
proposed by the committee.
(7) The shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee is authorized to
form technical advisory panels as needed and appoint to them members
not on the shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee.
(8) The department of ecology shall report the recommendations and
findings of the shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007, with a
further report, if necessary, by December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department of ecology shall develop,
by rule, guidelines for the appropriate siting and operation of geoduck
aquaculture operations to be included in any master program under this
section. The guidelines adopted under this section must be prepared
with the advice of the shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee
created in section 4 of this act, which shall serve as the advisory
committee for the development of the guidelines.
(2) The guidelines required under this section must be filed for
public review and comment no later than six months after the delivery
of the final report by the shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee
created in section 4 of this act.
(3) The department of ecology shall update the guidelines required
under this section, as necessary, after the completion of the geoduck
research by the sea grant program at the University of Washington
required under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---