BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Bond" includes a bid bond, payment bond, or performance bond.
(2) "Director" means the director of the office of minority and
women's business enterprises.
(3) "Disadvantaged contractor" means a business that is: (a)
Registered as a contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed as a
contractor under chapter 19.28 RCW; and (b) designated by the director
as a disadvantaged contractor in accordance with section 2 of this act.
(4) "Fund" means the disadvantaged contractor bonding program fund
created in section 5 of this act.
(5) "Office" means the office of minority and women's business
enterprises.
(6) "Qualified disadvantaged contractor" means a disadvantaged
contractor that is participating in the contractor assistance program
established in section 3 of this act.
(7) "Qualified small business contractor" means a small business
contractor that is participating in the contractor assistance program
established in section 3 of this act.
(8) "Small business contractor" means a business that: (a) Is
registered as a contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed as a
contractor under chapter 19.28 RCW; and (b) does not exceed the size
limitations for construction and electrical contractors as set forth in
the current table of North American industry classification system
(NAICS) codes and corresponding industry size standards.
(9) "Surety company" means a company authorized by the insurance
commissioner to issue bonds as surety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DISADVANTAGED CONTRACTORS. The director
shall determine whether a business that is registered as a contractor
under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed as a contractor under chapter 19.28
RCW is a disadvantaged contractor, and shall adopt rules establishing
the criteria and procedures for making this determination. The
business owner or owners shall be required to show both social and
economic disadvantage based on the following:
(1) The relative financial resources of the business as well as the
personal wealth of the owner or owners of the business;
(2) Social disadvantage based on any of the following:
(a) Color, ethnic origin, gender, or physical disability;
(b) Location in an area of high unemployment or a qualified census
tract; or
(c) Other factors not common to other small businesses; and
(3) Economic disadvantage based on business size thresholds and
eligibility criteria developed in rule that are designed to stimulate
economic development through contract awards to businesses located in
qualified census tracts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 CONTRACTOR ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. The director
shall contract with nonprofit organizations to provide technical
assistance to disadvantaged and small business contractors to become
more competitive by developing or improving their business operations
skills. During the 2007-2009 biennium, the director shall enter into
two contracts to provide technical assistance to disadvantaged and
small business contractors, with one contract for contractors located
west of the crest of the Cascade mountains, and the other for
contractors located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains. Up to
fifty percent of the contractors that receive technical assistance may
be small business contractors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 BOND GUARANTEE PROGRAM. (1) The director
may guarantee bonds executed by sureties for qualified disadvantaged
contractors or qualified small business contractors as principals on
contracts that are estimated to cost five hundred thousand dollars or
less and that are with the state, any political subdivision, or any
person as the obligee. The director, as guarantor, may exercise all
the rights and powers of a company authorized by the insurance
commissioner to guarantee bonds under Title 48 RCW but otherwise is not
subject to any laws related to a guaranty company under Title 48 RCW or
to any rules of the insurance commissioner. Up to fifty percent of the
guarantees may be for bonds executed by sureties for small business
contractors.
(2) The director shall adopt rules establishing procedures for
submission, review, and approval of applications for bond guarantees
under this section.
(3) In accordance with rules adopted pursuant to this section, the
director may guarantee up to ninety percent of the loss incurred and
paid by sureties on bonds guaranteed under subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) The penal sum amounts of all outstanding guarantees made by the
director under this section shall not exceed three times the amount of
moneys in the fund.
(5) The director may approve one application per fiscal year from
each surety bond company for bond guarantees in an amount requested to
support one fiscal year of that company's activity under this section.
A surety bond company that applies for a bond guarantee under this
subsection, whether or not the guarantee is approved, is not restricted
from also applying for individual bond guarantees under subsection (1)
of this section.
(6) By December 1, 2008, the director shall submit a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the status and results of
the bond guarantee program, including the number and dollar amount of
claims against the state arising from bonds guaranteed under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 FUND. (1) The contractor assistance and
bond guarantee program fund is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the fund. The fund and all disbursements from the
fund are subject to the allotment procedure under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Nothing in
section 4 of this act grants or pledges to any obligee or other person
any state moneys other than the moneys in the fund.
(2) For the 2007-09 biennium, two million two hundred thousand
dollars in receipts from the fines and penalties assessed by the office
of the insurance commissioner under Title 48 RCW shall be deposited
into the fund. Of that amount, up to two hundred thousand dollars may
be expended from the fund only for the contractor assistance program
created in section 3 of this act, and up to two million dollars may be
expended from the fund only for claims against the state arising
against a bond of the contractor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.01 RCW
to read as follows:
RECEIPTS FROM FINES AND PENALTIES. Except as otherwise provided in
this title, for the 2007-09 biennium, the first two million two hundred
thousand dollars in receipts from fines and penalties assessed by the
office of the insurance commissioner under Title 48 RCW shall be
deposited in the fund created in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 EXPIRATION DATE. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act expire July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 5 of this
act are each added to chapter 39.19 RCW.

--- END ---