BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of sections 2 and 3 of this act and RCW 43.88.090,
"new program" means any funding that is for the support of a newly
created agency, for services not previously supported by the state, or
for services to a population or other entity not previously served by
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On July 1st of each calendar year, the state auditor shall
publish a draft list on its web site of all new programs funded by any
appropriation or allotment of state funds during the previous fiscal
year. The state auditor shall provide written notice of publication to
the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and senate
and to the office of financial management.
(2) The list must include:
(a) The name of the program;
(b) A brief description of the program and the expected result;
(c) The name of the agencies receiving the funding; and
(d) The amount appropriated.
(3) After publication of the draft list of new programs, the
legislature and the office of financial management have fifteen days to
provide comment to the state auditor's office.
(4) Thirty days after publication of the draft list, the state
auditor shall publish a final list of new programs on its web site.
The state auditor shall provide written notice of final publication to
the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and senate
and to the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Three years after any new program, as defined in section 1 of
this act, the state auditor shall conduct a fiscal and performance
audit of each new program.
(2) The audit must:
(a) Identify the original objective of the new program;
(b) Identify the data collected by the program and the performance
measures;
(c) Assess how effective the program was at meeting the objective;
(d) Determine how efficiently resources were used; and
(e) Suggest changes to the program to increase effectiveness and
efficiency, including alternative approaches or termination.
(3) The state auditor shall provide a final copy of the audit to
the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and senate
and to the office of financial management by December 31st of the
calendar year for that audit period.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.88.090 and 2005 c 386 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of developing budget proposals to the legislature,
the governor shall have the power, and it shall be the governor's duty,
to require from proper agency officials such detailed estimates and
other information in such form and at such times as the governor shall
direct. The governor shall communicate statewide priorities to
agencies for use in developing biennial budget recommendations for
their agency and shall seek public involvement and input on these
priorities. The estimates for the legislature and the judiciary shall
be transmitted to the governor and shall be included in the budget
without revision. The estimates for state pension contributions shall
be based on the rates provided in chapter 41.45 RCW. Copies of all
such estimates shall be transmitted to the standing committees on ways
and means of the house and senate at the same time as they are filed
with the governor and the office of financial management.
The estimates shall include statements or tables which indicate, by
agency, the state funds which are required for the receipt of federal
matching revenues. The budget document must also include a listing of
all new programs funded in the previous two years. For each new
program, the list must include: Program name, program objective, a
brief description, performance measures, current annual funding levels
by agency, and the funding level proposed in the governor's biennial
budget request. The list must include all new programs funded in the
previous two years even if the governor does not propose to fund those
programs in the ensuing biennium. The estimates shall be revised as
necessary to reflect legislative enactments and adopted appropriations
and shall be included with the initial biennial allotment submitted
under RCW 43.88.110. The estimates must reflect that the agency
considered any alternatives to reduce costs or improve service delivery
identified in the findings of a performance audit of the agency by the
joint legislative audit and review committee. Nothing in this
subsection requires performance audit findings to be published as part
of the budget.
(2) Each state agency shall define its mission and establish
measurable goals for achieving desirable results for those who receive
its services and the taxpayers who pay for those services. Each agency
shall also develop clear strategies and timelines to achieve its goals.
This section does not require an agency to develop a new mission or
goals in place of identifiable missions or goals that meet the intent
of this section. The mission and goals of each agency must conform to
statutory direction and limitations.
(3) For the purpose of assessing activity performance, each state
agency shall establish quality and productivity objectives for each
major activity in its budget. The objectives must be consistent with
the missions and goals developed under this section. The objectives
must be expressed to the extent practicable in outcome-based,
objective, and measurable form unless an exception to adopt a different
standard is granted by the office of financial management and approved
by the legislative committee on performance review. Objectives must
specifically address the statutory purpose or intent of the program or
activity and focus on data that measure whether the agency is achieving
or making progress toward the purpose of the activity and toward
statewide priorities. The office of financial management shall provide
necessary professional and technical assistance to assist state
agencies in the development of strategic plans that include the mission
of the agency and its programs, measurable goals, strategies, and
performance measurement systems.
(4) Each state agency shall adopt procedures for and perform
continuous self-assessment of each activity, using the mission, goals,
objectives, and measurements required under subsections (2) and (3) of
this section. The assessment of the activity must also include an
evaluation of major information technology systems or projects that may
assist the agency in achieving or making progress toward the activity
purpose and statewide priorities. The evaluation of proposed major
information technology systems or projects shall be in accordance with
the standards and policies established by the information services
board. Agencies' progress toward the mission, goals, objectives, and
measurements required by subsections (2) and (3) of this section is
subject to review as set forth in this subsection.
(a) The office of financial management shall regularly conduct
reviews of selected activities to analyze whether the objectives and
measurements submitted by agencies demonstrate progress toward
statewide results.
(b) The office of financial management shall consult with the
higher education coordinating board and the state board for community
and technical colleges in those reviews that involve institutions of
higher education.
(c) The goal is for all major activities to receive at least one
review each year.
(d) The office of financial management shall consult with the
information services board when conducting reviews of major information
technology systems in use by state agencies. The goal is that reviews
of these information technology systems occur periodically.
(5) It is the policy of the legislature that each agency's budget
recommendations must be directly linked to the agency's stated mission
and program, quality, and productivity goals and objectives.
Consistent with this policy, agency budget proposals must include
integration of performance measures that allow objective determination
of an activity's success in achieving its goals. When a review under
subsection (4) of this section or other analysis determines that the
agency's objectives demonstrate that the agency is making insufficient
progress toward the goals of any particular program or is otherwise
underachieving or inefficient, the agency's budget request shall
contain proposals to remedy or improve the selected programs. The
office of financial management shall develop a plan to merge the budget
development process with agency performance assessment procedures. The
plan must include a schedule to integrate agency strategic plans and
performance measures into agency budget requests and the governor's
budget proposal over three fiscal biennia. The plan must identify
those agencies that will implement the revised budget process in the
1997-1999 biennium, the 1999-2001 biennium, and the 2001-2003 biennium.
In consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, the office of
financial management shall recommend statutory and procedural
modifications to the state's budget, accounting, and reporting systems
to facilitate the performance assessment procedures and the merger of
those procedures with the state budget process. The plan and
recommended statutory and procedural modifications must be submitted to
the legislative fiscal committees by September 30, 1996.
(6) In reviewing agency budget requests in order to prepare the
governor's biennial budget request, the office of financial management
shall consider the extent to which the agency's activities demonstrate
progress toward the statewide budgeting priorities, along with any
specific review conducted under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) In the year of the gubernatorial election, the governor shall
invite the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee to attend
all hearings provided in RCW 43.88.100; and the governor shall furnish
the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee with such
information as will enable the governor-elect or the governor-elect's
designee to gain an understanding of the state's budget requirements.
The governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee may ask such
questions during the hearings and require such information as the
governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee deems necessary and may
make recommendations in connection with any item of the budget which,
with the governor-elect's reasons therefor, shall be presented to the
legislature in writing with the budget document. Copies of all such
estimates and other required information shall also be submitted to the
standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate.

--- END ---