BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70C RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant for a land use permit or approval who proceeds with
construction after the permit or approval has been challenged under RCW
36.70C.040, but before a court has made a decision under RCW
36.70C.140, does so at the applicant's own risk. A court is not
required to apply the common law doctrine of balancing the equities if
doing so would reward a land use applicant for proceeding under an
unlawful land use decision.

--- END ---