BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.93.150 and 1994 c 216 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, upon review of any proposed action, ((shall take such of
the following actions as it deems necessary to best carry out the
intent of this chapter)) may:
(1) Approve the proposal as submitted.
(2) Subject to RCW 35.02.170 and the requirements of this chapter,
modify the proposal by adjusting boundaries to add or delete territory.
((However,))
(a) A board may not modify a proposal for annexation of territory
to a city by adding an amount of territory that constitutes ten percent
or more of the total area within the proposal before the board.
(b) Any proposal for annexation of territory to a town shall be
subject to RCW 35.21.010 and the board ((shall)) may not add additional
territory, the amount of which is greater than that included in the
original proposal.
(c) Any modifications ((shall not interfere with)) do not affect
the authority of a city, town, or special purpose district to require
or not require preannexation agreements, covenants, or petitions.
(d) A board ((shall)) may not modify the proposed incorporation of
a city with an estimated population of seven thousand five hundred or
more by removing territory from the proposal, or adding territory to
the proposal, that constitutes ten percent or more of the total area
included within the proposal before the board. However, a board shall
remove territory in the proposed incorporation that is located outside
of an urban growth area or is annexed by a city or town, and may remove
territory in the proposed incorporation if a petition or resolution
proposing the annexation is filed or adopted that has priority over the
proposed incorporation, before the area is established that is subject
to this ten percent restriction on removing or adding territory.
(e) A board ((shall)) may not modify the proposed incorporation of
a city with a population of seven thousand five hundred or more to
reduce the territory in such a manner as to reduce the population below
seven thousand five hundred.
(3) Determine a division of assets and liabilities between two or
more governmental units where relevant.
(4) Determine whether, or the extent to which, functions of a
special purpose district are to be assumed by an incorporated city or
town, metropolitan municipal corporation, or another existing special
purpose district.
(5) Disapprove the proposal except that the board ((shall)) may not
have jurisdiction: (a)(i) To disapprove the dissolution or
disincorporation of a special purpose district ((which)) that is not
providing services, but ((shall)) (ii) does have jurisdiction over the
determination of a division of the assets and liabilities of a
dissolved or disincorporated special purpose district; (b) over the
division of assets and liabilities of a special purpose district that
is dissolved or disincorporated pursuant to chapter 36.96 RCW; nor (c)
to disapprove the incorporation of a city with an estimated population
of seven thousand five hundred or more, but the board may recommend
against the proposed incorporation of a city with such an estimated
population.
Unless the board disapproves a proposal, it shall be presented
under the appropriate statute for approval of a public body and, if
required, a vote of the people. A proposal that has been modified
shall be presented under the appropriate statute for approval of a
public body and if required, a vote of the people. If a proposal,
other than that for a city, town, or special purpose district
annexation, after modification does not contain enough signatures of
persons within the modified area, as are required by law, then the
initiating party, parties or governmental unit has thirty days after
the modification decision to secure enough signatures to satisfy the
legal requirement. If the signatures cannot be secured then the
proposal may be submitted to a vote of the people, as required by law.
The addition or deletion of property by the board ((shall)) does
not invalidate a petition ((which)) that had previously satisfied the
sufficiency of signature provisions of RCW 35.13.130 or 35A.14.120.
When the board, after due proceedings held, disapproves a proposed
action, ((such)) the proposed action ((shall be)) is unavailable, the
proposing agency ((shall be)) is without power to initiate the same or
substantially the same as determined by the board, and any succeeding
acts intended to or tending to effectuate that action ((shall be)) are
void, but such an action may be reinitiated after a period of twelve
months from date of disapproval and ((shall again be)) is then subject
to the same consideration.
The board ((shall)) may not modify or deny a proposed action unless
there is evidence on the record to support a conclusion that the action
is inconsistent with one or more of the objectives under RCW 36.93.180.
Every such determination to modify or deny a proposed action shall be
made in writing pursuant to a motion, and shall be supported by
appropriate written findings and conclusions, based on the record.

--- END ---