BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
To renew a vehicle license an applicant must provide proof of being
insured under a motor vehicle liability policy with liability limits of
at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090, a self-insurance
certificate as provided in RCW 46.29.630, or proof of coverage under a
liability bond of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the motor vehicle liability insurance policy, self-
insurance certificate, or liability bond required under section 1 of
this act is not renewed or is canceled, whether the nonrenewal or
cancellation is initiated by the insured, the insurance company, or the
bonding company, the registered owner of the vehicle or vehicles shall
immediately notify the department. Failure to provide notice of
nonrenewal or cancellation of a self-insurance certificate or liability
bond under this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(2) Whenever a motor vehicle liability insurance policy is not
renewed or is canceled, the insurance company that provided the policy
shall immediately notify the department.
(3) Upon learning of or receiving notice that a registered owner no
longer carries a liability insurance policy, self-insurance
certificate, or liability bond, the department shall immediately notify
the registered owner of the vehicle or vehicles formerly covered under
the policy, certificate, or bond, that the registration for the vehicle
or vehicles will be canceled within thirty days from the date of the
notice unless the person in whose name the registration appears
furnishes proof to the department within that time that replacement
insurance has been obtained, or that the requirements of some other
method of proof of financial responsibility allowed under RCW 46.30.020
have been met. If that proof is not supplied within the thirty-day
period, the department shall immediately cancel the registration.
(4) The department shall not refund any part of a vehicle
registration fee if a vehicle registration is canceled under this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.30.020 and 2003 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No person may operate a motor vehicle subject to
registration under chapter 46.16 RCW in this state unless the person is
insured under a motor vehicle liability policy with liability limits of
at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090, is self-insured as
provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a certificate of deposit in
conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a liability bond of at
least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. Written proof of
financial responsibility for motor vehicle operation must be provided
on the request of a law enforcement officer in the format specified
under RCW 46.30.030.
(b) A person who drives a motor vehicle that is required to be
registered in another state that requires drivers and owners of
vehicles in that state to maintain insurance or financial
responsibility shall, when requested by a law enforcement officer,
provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance as is
required by the laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.
(c) When asked to do so by a law enforcement officer, failure to
display an insurance identification card as specified under RCW
46.30.030 creates a presumption that the person does not have motor
vehicle insurance.
(d)(i) Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance is a
traffic infraction and is subject to penalties as set by the supreme
court under RCW 46.63.110 or community restitution.
(ii) If a driver fails to provide proof of financial responsibility
or motor vehicle insurance when requested by a law enforcement officer,
the law enforcement officer may issue a notice of traffic infraction
and shall impound the vehicle if the person cited is also a registered
owner of the vehicle. If the vehicle is impounded, a registered owner
of the vehicle must: Pay any and all costs associated with
impoundment, including costs for towing, removal, and storage of the
vehicle; pay any other fees and fines incurred; and provide proof of
financial responsibility or motor vehicle insurance before the vehicle
can be redeemed.
(2) If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this
section appears in person before the court or a violations bureau and
provides written evidence that at the time the person was cited, he or
she was in compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of
subsection (1) of this section, the citation shall be dismissed and the
court or violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of
twenty-five dollars at the time of dismissal. In lieu of personal
appearance, a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this
section may, before the date scheduled for the person's appearance
before the court or violations bureau, submit by mail to the court or
violations bureau written evidence that at the time the person was
cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in which case the
citation shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court or
violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of twenty-five
dollars at the time of dismissal.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not govern:
(a) The operation of a motor vehicle registered under RCW
46.16.305(1), governed by RCW 46.16.020, or registered with the
Washington utilities and transportation commission as common or
contract carriers; or
(b) The operation of a motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a
motor-driven cycle as defined in RCW 46.04.332, or a moped as defined
in RCW 46.04.304.
(4) RCW 46.29.490 shall not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle
liability policies required by this chapter but only those certified
for the purposes stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---