BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of social and health services
and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
jointly confer and consult with appropriate entities, develop
recommendations, and report back to the legislature by October 1, 2007,
regarding a policy and process to ensure that children who are eligible
for special education services under chapter 28A.155 RCW do not
experience a gap in receiving services when transitioning out of infant
and toddler early intervention programs upon reaching the age of three
years.

--- END ---