BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.83 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may contact the parent or guardian of an infant who
fails a newborn hearing screening for the purpose of assisting the
parent or guardian in obtaining a comprehensive hearing assessment for
the child. Contacts with parents and guardians under this section
shall be consistent with procedures established pursuant to RCW
70.83.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that the department of
health plans to undertake a survey of selected parents and guardians
of infants who have failed a newborn hearing screening for the purpose
of gathering more information about comprehensive hearing assessments
for these newborns. The department shall, upon completion of its
survey, provide a brief report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature regarding its findings.

--- END ---