BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington state
benefits from having a dynamic technology-based economy founded on and
sustained by world-class innovations in such areas as software,
telecommunications, aerospace, biotechnology, medical instrumentation,
energy, and the environment. To assist in the growth of technological
innovations, the state has established state-supported institutions,
such as the Washington technology center and the Spokane
intercollegiate research and technology institute, to foster the
acceleration and growth of new products and technologies in the state.
Additionally, to promote life sciences research and enhance the
competitive position of the state, the legislature created the life
sciences discovery fund.
Also, the legislature finds that due to the fragmentation of state
technology efforts and resources and the lack of a technology strategic
vision and central coordinating body, the state is hindered in
advancing innovation throughout the state. In addition, state
technology entities vary significantly in their administrative overhead
costs and vary in the methods used to calculate these costs.
The legislature intends to improve interactions among state
technology entities to: Advance and ensure appropriate coordination
and collaboration; eliminate duplication of services; set the direction
for current and future technology efforts through a strategic planning
process and work plan; and establish performance metrics and a prudent
administrative overhead rate of no more than thirty-two percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For the purposes of this chapter:
"State technology entities" means:
(1) The life sciences discovery fund authority;
(2) The Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute;
(3) The Washington technology center;
(4) State agencies, boards, institutions, and commissions
determined by the governor to have a technology mission;
(5) Any future technology-based state entity the legislature may
establish or the governor may determine to be a technology-based state
entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By June 1st of each year with an
awareness of the state budget timetable, the governor shall issue a
report on the vision for technology development in Washington. The
governor shall submit the report to the legislature and to state
technology entities. The report must include, but not be limited to:
(a) A statewide technology strategy, including goals to achieve the
governor's vision for technology development in Washington;
(b) A work plan to implement the governor's statewide technology
strategy that details how state technology entities shall collaborate
and coordinate with each other; and
(c) An analysis identifying the most important public policy
challenges faced in achieving the vision for technology development in
Washington.
(2) In preparation for the report on the vision for technology
development in Washington, the governor shall consult with state
technology entities to gather input into the governor's vision for
technology development in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The boards of state technology entities
shall meet at least once a year with an awareness of the state budget
timetable to discuss and coordinate (a) activities related to the
implementation of the work plan to carry out the governor's statewide
technology strategy and (b) other matters related to technology
research, technology transfer, and technology commercialization. The
boards of state technology entities shall jointly hold at least one
meeting in conjunction with a state technology entity board of
directors or trustees meeting to maximize efficient use of
organizational resources.
(2) State technology entities shall develop an annual work plan to:
(a) Ensure collaboration and coordination among state technology
entities for current and future technology research, transfer, and
commercialization efforts;
(b) Identify and eliminate duplication of services;
(c) Assist the governor in developing a report on the vision for
technology development in Washington; and
(d) Implement the governor's vision into their oversight of the
various state technology entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) By November 30, 2007, the office of
financial management shall develop and provide to the legislature:
(a) Recommendations to provide a single fiscal agent under one
budget category for state technology entities;
(b) Recommendations to adjust the administrative overhead rate
charged by these state technology entities to no more than thirty-two
percent; and
(c) A work plan to implement a single fiscal agent for the state
technology entities listed under this section and an administrative
overhead rate of no more than thirty-two percent for these same
entities.
(2) By August 1, 2008, the executive directors of the state
technology entities shall develop jointly a budget for the governor to
consider and recommend to the legislature. The joint budget shall
consider recommendations made by the office of financial management for
state technology entities and other boards, institutions, or
commissions as determined under subsection (1)(a) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---