BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, the motor
vehicle's key code and, if applicable, immobilizer or access code, and
its successor technology and terminology;
(b) "Motor vehicle" means every motor vehicle, except motorcycles
and motor-driven cycles, designed for carrying ten passengers or less
and used for the transportation of persons;
(c) "Registered locksmith" means a locksmith licensed and bonded in
Washington state that has registered with a motor vehicle manufacturer,
and has been issued a registry number and security password by the
manufacturer;
(d) "Registered owner" means the person whose lawful right of
possession of a motor vehicle has most recently been recorded with the
department of licensing. "Registered owner" includes a lessee of the
motor vehicle when the lessee's name appears on the motor vehicle
registration.
(2)(a) A motor vehicle manufacturer of a new motor vehicle sold or
leased in this state after December 31, 2008, shall provide the
registered owner of the motor vehicle, through a registered locksmith,
information necessary to permit the production of a replacement key or
other functionally similar device by the registered locksmith that
allows the registered owner of the motor vehicle to enter, start, and
operate the motor vehicle. This information must be made available at
all times to registered owners of motor vehicles by telephone or
electronically.
(b) When the registered owner of the motor vehicle or the
registered owner's family member requests a registered locksmith to
produce a replacement key or other functionally similar device that
allows the motor vehicle to be entered, started, and operated, and
information is needed from the motor vehicle manufacturer to produce
the requested key or other functionally similar device, the registered
locksmith shall visually verify:
(i) The identity of the requesting party through that party's
driver's license;
(ii) That the registration of the motor vehicle matches the
requesting party's identity and address, or the last name and address
if the requesting party is a family member of the registered owner; and
(iii) That the vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle
matches the vehicle identification number on the registration.
If the registered locksmith verifies these requirements, the
registered locksmith shall sign and file an affidavit that he or she
has visually verified the information and proceed to access the needed
information from the motor vehicle manufacturer.
(c) After completing the requested service, the registered
locksmith shall give any key code information obtained from the motor
vehicle manufacturer to the registered owner, or if applicable, the
registered owner's family member, and shall destroy all information
accessed from the motor vehicle manufacturer in the registered
locksmith's possession. Except in cases of fraud or misappropriation,
a registered locksmith who follows the requirements of this section
does not incur liability for theft of the motor vehicle related to the
locksmith's production of a replacement key or functionally similar
device that allows the motor vehicle to be entered, started, and
operated.
(d) When a motor vehicle manufacturer receives a request from a
registered locksmith for information to enable the locksmith to produce
a replacement key or other functionally similar device that allows the
motor vehicle to be entered, started, and operated, and the request was
originally made by the motor vehicle's registered owner or the
registered owner's family member, the manufacturer shall: Require the
registered locksmith to confirm the locksmith's registration with the
manufacturer's registry; provide the security password issued by the
manufacturer; and comply with any other reasonable authentication
procedure. The motor vehicle manufacturer shall also require the
registered locksmith to confirm the visual identity of the registered
owner or registered owner's family member and the motor vehicle
verifications as described under (b) of this subsection. If the
registered locksmith verifies these requirements along with the vehicle
identification number and model number, the motor vehicle manufacturer
shall provide the registered locksmith, for the motor vehicle
identified by the vehicle identification number and model number, the
information necessary to enable the production of a replacement key or
other functionally similar device that allows the motor vehicle to be
entered, started, and operated.
(e) A motor vehicle manufacturer subject to this section shall
retain and make the information described in (b) of this subsection
available for at least twenty-five years from the date of manufacture
of the motor vehicle.
(f) A motor vehicle manufacturer that follows the requirements of
this section does not incur liability for theft of the vehicle related
to furnishing the information to a registered locksmith for the
production of a replacement key or functionally similar device that
allows the motor vehicle to be entered, started, and operated.
(3) Until January 1, 2013:
(a) This section applies to a motor vehicle line of a motor vehicle
manufacturer that is exempt under (b) of this subsection, if after
January 1, 2009, the motor vehicle line provides for the production of,
by any person other than the motor vehicle manufacturer, a replacement
key or other functionally similar device that allows the motor vehicle
to be entered, started, and operated.
(b) This section does not apply to a motor vehicle line of a motor
vehicle manufacturer that on January 1, 2007, did not provide for the
production of a replacement key or other functionally similar device
that allows the motor vehicle to be entered, started, and operated,
only by the motor vehicle manufacturer, provided that the vehicle
manufacturer operates a telephone or electronic request line at all
times, and upon a request of the registered owner or family member of
the registered owner of the motor vehicle, a replacement key or other
functionally similar device that allows the motor vehicle to be
entered, started, and operated, is furnished to the registered owner at
a reasonable cost within one day of the request or via the next
overnight delivery.
(c) This section does not apply to a motor vehicle line of a motor
vehicle manufacturer that sold between two thousand five hundred and
five thousand motor vehicles of that line in the prior calendar year in
the state.
(4) This section does not apply to a motor vehicle manufacturer
that sold fewer than two thousand five hundred motor vehicles in the
prior calendar year in the state.
(5) The duties imposed on a motor vehicle manufacturer under this
section may be performed either by the manufacturer or the
manufacturer's agent through a contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---