BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Due to concerns about maintaining freedom of religious
expression, religious organizations shall not be restricted from
hosting temporary encampments for the homeless. A temporary encampment
may be subject to reasonable compliance requirements related to public
health and safety. Fines may only be levied in cases in which the
religious organization has clearly endangered the public health or
safety of the community due to the presence of the temporary
encampment.
(2) Any applicable permit fees for temporary encampments may not
exceed five hundred dollars.
(3) Counties, cities, and towns must respond to temporary
encampment permit applications submitted on behalf of religious
organizations within sixty days.
(4) No county, city, or town shall set less than ninety days as the
maximum duration for temporary encampments.

--- END ---