BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington's agricultural forest products industry is a vital
component of Washington's economy and has a direct relationship to the
economic health and welfare of workers, rural communities, and
businesses.
(2) Central to the viability of the forest products industry is a
stable workforce of skilled, experienced log haulers available to
transport wood from Washington's forests.
(3) Stability of this workforce is endangered when inadequate wage
compensation rates for log haulers induce haulers to shortchange safety
through inadequate equipment maintenance, inadequate investment in new
equipment, and violation of hours of service limitations in order to
take home a living wage.
(4) The safety of citizens using the public highways is endangered
when log haulers are induced to compromise safety in order to take home
a living wage.
(5) Many log haulers serving Washington's forest industry own and
operate a single vehicle, such that their wage compensation from forest
landowners compensates for both their personal services and the costs
to maintain and operate their log-hauling equipment.
(6) The costs of maintaining log-hauling equipment in safe
operating condition are increased by the necessity of operating such
equipment on nonpaved roadways in forest areas.
(7) Based on patterns and configurations of forest landownership,
the hauling of forest products is performed by numerous truckers who
are economically dependent on a small group of large commercial forest
landowners.
(8) An imbalance of market power exists when one forest landowner
owns, possesses, or acquires economic control over more than one
hundred thousand acres of forest in a labor market area.
(9) The inequity of power in determining compensation and the lack
of opportunity to join together in bargaining over compensation
prevents the log-hauling labor market from operating in a manner
suitable for the public interest of Washington citizens and results in
inadequate compensation for log haulers.
(10) It is in the public interest to ensure a reasonable minimum
rate of compensation for log haulers to ensure that log haulers earn a
reasonable living wage without compromising the safety of their
vehicles or the safety of their operation.
(11) The legislature therefore enacts this chapter to create a
process whereby the department of labor and industries is to oversee a
system to ensure adequate wage rates of compensation for log haulers in
order to ensure that the public welfare of the state of Washington is
protected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cooperative association" includes a nonprofit membership-based
entity, such as a cooperative, association, or union, whose purpose is
to promote the interests of those engaged in the agricultural
activities of hauling logs through participation in the compensation-
setting process and is registered as such with the state of Washington
and represents at least fifty haulers in a labor market area.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Economic control" means the legal right, whether through
ownership, contract, or otherwise to make or influence decisions
regarding the harvest of trees and disposition in general of logs on
subject land.
(4) "Forest land" means agricultural forest land used primarily for
the growth of trees to be harvested for commercial use.
(5) "Forest landowner" means:
(a) A person, corporation, limited partnership, government,
municipality, or any form of business organization registered with the
state of Washington that owns directly, or through affiliated persons,
or possesses economic control over, more than one hundred thousand
acres of forest land in a labor market area; or
(b) An agent or subsidiary of a person described in (a) of this
subsection if that agent or subsidiary is involved in contracting or
negotiating contracts or other arrangements, written or oral, with
forest products haulers.
(6) "Forest products hauler" means a person having a place of
business in this state who is engaged in the agricultural activity of
hauling harvested trees from forest land in the state to a point of
delivery within the state under a contract or subcontract, directly or
indirectly, for a forest landowner.
(7) "Labor market area" means those counties in one of two forest
excise tax hauling areas set forth by the Washington state department
of revenue for the purposes of applying the forest excise tax as
follows:
(a) Those counties located in hauling areas 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, and 10
are in one labor market; and
(b) Those counties located in hauling areas 6 and 7 are in a second
labor market area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department will establish
compensation rates for log haulers from forest lands in the state of
Washington to a point of delivery within the state of Washington when
petitioned to do so by either landowners or qualified cooperative
associations or labor unions.
(2) In approving compensation rates with respect to any given
commercial forest landowner, the department must consider the following
criteria:
(a) Prevailing wage rates for log truck drivers in the same labor
market area;
(b) Prevailing wages for similar types of hauling in the same labor
market area;
(c) The log hauler's costs, including but not limited to, overhead,
fuel, health insurance, other insurance, pensions, or other retirement
costs;
(d) Environmental and highway laws and rules;
(e) The impact of the award on the competitive position of the
landowner in the labor market area or competing market areas;
(f) The amount of hauling conducted on private roads and the amount
of hauling conducted on public roads including travel time from the
hauling site to the delivery site and the conditions of the road;
(g) The cost to comply with all applicable safety regulations
including, but not limited to, regulations for safety equipment and
regulations for maintenance of vehicles;
(h) The number of hours normally worked each day and each week by
log-hauling drivers; and
(i) Limitations imposed by statute or rule on the number of hours
per day and per week that a log hauler may drive or work.
(3)(a) Request for compensation rates may be submitted to the
department for review and approval in one of the two following ways:
(i) Joint petitions may be submitted by corporate forest landowners
and cooperative associations who may meet and agree on a common rate of
compensation request; or
(ii) Individual petitions may be submitted by forest landowners or
cooperative associations. In order to reduce costs, the department
shall adopt a compensation rate from among the petitioners which best
reflect the criteria set forth in this subsection. If, in the opinion
of the department, none of the petition-proposed compensation rates is
in the best interest of the state of Washington, the department may set
a different compensation rate based on the criteria in subsection (2)
of this section.
(b) State agency commercial forest landowners may use a
compensation rate that is the average of: (i) Joint petitions for the
past twelve months; or (ii) file its own joint petition with a hauling
cooperative.
(4) All submissions to the department for review and approval of
compensation rates shall be accompanied by the following information:
(a) The identity of the corporate forest landowner, agent, or
contractor who owns or possesses economic control over the land on
which the wage compensation rates are to apply and the geographic area
in which the rates are to apply;
(b) The submissions may take into consideration alternative pay
systems such as pay per mile, pay per weight, percentage of truck
revenue, and pay per hour;
(c) A summary of relevant meetings and minutes;
(d) Information required to be considered by the department as set
forth in subsection (2) of this section; and
(e) Other information relevant to the factors needed for the
department to make its decision, and as otherwise requested by the
commission.
(5) When the department receives a compensation rate petition, it
must notify all persons who have requested to be notified of any
submissions. These persons have thirty days to comment on the
submission, and the department must review these comments in approving
compensation rates. The department must reject any submission that
resulted from a negotiation or arbitration that was not conducted at
arm's length.
(6) The department shall approve a petition only upon finding that
the compensation rates requested are adequate to assure the vehicle
driver a living wage without compromising the safe maintenance and
operation of the vehicle on the public highways of the state of
Washington.
(7) Once rates of compensation have been approved by the
department, the rates shall remain in effect for that corporate
landowner for one calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A forest landowner violates this chapter if
that forest landowner:
(1) Pays rates for hauling services that result in wage levels
below those established by the department; or
(2) Discriminates against any person or organization for initiating
or participating in a compensation rate determination proceeding under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This chapter does not prohibit the
negotiation and execution of a contract between a forest landowner and
an individual forest products hauler that provides for the payment of
compensation rates higher than those determined under this chapter, as
long as no commission's approved rates applicable to the service or
area being provided exist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This chapter is intended to displace
existing market forces based on a legislative finding that such forces
are insufficient to permit the affected market to function normally to
ensure the safety and stability of this industry and the safety of the
general public. Activities carried out under this chapter do not
constitute a conspiracy, or a combination in restraint of trade or an
illegal monopoly, nor are they carried out for the purposes of
lessening competition or fixing prices arbitrarily, as long as the
activities are carried out for the purpose of preparing, initiating, or
participating in a compensation rate determination process under this
chapter. A contract or agreement entered into under negotiations
between a forest landowner and a cooperative group of forest products
haulers is not an unlawful restraint in trade or part of a conspiracy
or combination to accomplish an improper or illegal purpose or act, as
long as the resulting compensation rate is approved by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---