BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall obtain the concurrence from the department of
natural resources, and from the county or city having land use
jurisdiction, before approving or renewing a permit under this chapter
for dock reconstruction and other activities associated with gravel
barging, where the activities will be located within an aquatic reserve
established by administrative order of the commissioner of public
lands.
This section applies to any permit application pending on or after
January 1, 2007, and to any renewal of a permit on or after January 1,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---