BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.52.100 and 1994 c 223 s 74 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of forming a cemetery district, a petition
designating the boundaries of the proposed district by metes and bounds
or describing the lands to be included in the proposed district by
government townships, ranges and legal subdivisions, signed by not less
than ((fifteen)) ten percent of the registered voters who reside within
the boundaries of the proposed district, setting forth the object of
the formation of such district and stating that the establishment
thereof will be conducive to the public welfare and convenience, shall
be filed with the county auditor of the county within which the
proposed district is located, accompanied by an obligation signed by
two or more petitioners agreeing to pay the cost of publishing the
notice hereinafter provided for. The county auditor shall, within
thirty days from the date of filing of such petition, examine the
signatures and certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency thereof.
The name of any person who signed a petition shall not be withdrawn
from the petition after it has been filed with the county auditor. If
the petition is found to contain a sufficient number of valid
signatures, the county auditor shall transmit it, with a certificate of
sufficiency attached, to the county legislative authority, which shall
thereupon, by resolution entered upon its minutes, receive the same and
fix a day and hour when it will publicly hear the petition.

Sec. 2 RCW 68.52.170 and 1947 c 6 s 9 are each amended to read as
follows:
The returns of such election shall be canvassed at the court house
on the Monday next following the day of the election, but the canvass
may be adjourned from time to time if necessary to await the receipt of
election returns which may be unavoidably delayed. The canvassing
officials, upon conclusion of the canvass, shall forthwith certify the
results thereof in writing to the board of county commissioners. If
upon examination of the certificate of the canvassing officials it is
found that ((two-thirds)) three-fifths of all the votes cast at said
election were in favor of the formation of the cemetery district, the
board of county commissioners shall, by resolution entered upon its
minutes, declare such territory duly organized as a cemetery district
under the name theretofore designated and shall declare the three
candidates receiving the highest number of votes for cemetery
commissioners, the duly elected first cemetery commissioners of the
district. The clerk of the board of county commissioners shall certify
a copy of the resolution and cause it to be filed for record in the
offices of the county auditor and the county assessor of the county.
The certified copy shall be entitled to record without payment of a
recording fee. If the certificate of the canvassing officials shows
that the proposition to organize the proposed cemetery district failed
to receive ((two-thirds)) three-fifths of the votes cast at said
election, the board of county commissioners shall enter a minute to
that effect and all proceedings theretofore had shall become null and
void.

--- END ---