BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the impact of
children's histories of abuse and neglect and aspects of their foster
care experiences significantly impact the postpermanency needs of
adopted children. The number of children being adopted from the foster
care system has increased over the last decade. Policy changes also
have resulted in an increased number of children who are eligible for
adoption but who have not yet been adopted. The legislature also finds
that adoption disruption occurs at a rate of approximately ten to
sixteen percent of adoptions. Risk of adoptions being terminated is
greatest within the first years of the adoption and for adoptions
involving older children. Risk factors associated with adoption
disruption and termination include a variety of child-related factors
and parent-related factors. The legislature intends to establish a
pilot program of well-coordinated and comprehensive postadoption and
postpermanency services to children and families in order to reduce
adoption disruptions and terminations and to increase the number of
potential adoptive families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department of social and health services shall
establish a postadoption services pilot program to provide community-based and coordinated postadoption supports. The pilot program shall
be designed to gather data regarding the effectiveness of the
coordination and delivery of services in achieving the intent of this
act.
(2) The department shall contract with community-based
organizations in two or more pilot sites in the state to deliver a
combination of intensive and less intensive services to children who
have been adopted out of the foster care system and their adoptive
families. Intensive services include, but are not limited to: Child
assessment and assistance with behavior management; advocacy and case
management; parent-to-parent mentoring and support; planned respite;
recreational enrichment; problem solving; and crisis response. Less
intensive services include, but are not limited to: Parent education
classes; and information and referral.
(3) Services to be coordinated through each pilot site include
interventions and supports to prevent disruption of adoptive
placements, improve parent-child relationships, and strengthen family
functioning, including but not limited to the following:
(a) Mental health services, such as appropriate periodic
assessments and review of previous diagnoses, and appropriate
therapeutic interventions and skills for children and caregivers;
(b) Support services, such as support groups, family resource
specialists, and planned respite care.
(4) By January 2, 2008, the department shall provide the
legislature with a progress report on implementation, including the
location of pilot sites. Annually, through January 2011, the
department shall brief the legislature on the operation of the pilot
program, including the data regarding the effectiveness of the
coordination and delivery of services in reducing adoption disruptions
and terminations and increasing the number of potential adoptive
families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires January 1, 2012.

--- END ---