BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
ensure vibrant initiative and referendum participation by guarding
privacy and assuring that all valid signatures are attributed to
initiatives and referenda as part of the review process.
Washington's laws and Constitution ensure that a voter's decision
on who they vote for or against and what measures he or she votes for
or against is not publicly revealed. Such a violation of privacy may
subject voters to potential harassment, retaliation, and intimidation.
Similar chilling of constitutional rights will be avoided by extending
privacy protection to those engaged in the right to peacefully petition
their government by initiative and referendum.
It is also the intent of the legislature to ensure that valid voter
signatures on initiative and referendum petitions count and will not be
rejected by the secretary of state. If a voter signs an initiative or
referendum petition and his or her petition signature matches the
signature on their voter registration, then the signature must be
accepted by the secretary of state. Valid voter signatures must count,
invalid ones should not, and scrutiny to assure this result is
preferred to actions and regulations which might chill the exercise of
the right to petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
Initiative and referendum petitions and the names and addresses of
citizens contained on them that are submitted to the secretary of state
are not public records under chapter 42.56 RCW and shall not be made
public beyond the observers as specified in RCW 29A.72.230.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.72.110 and 2005 c 239 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Petitions for proposing measures for submission to the legislature
at its next regular session must be substantially in the following
form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

INITIATIVE PETITION FOR SUBMISSION TO THE LEGISLATURE

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully direct that this petition and the proposed
measure known as Initiative Measure No. . . . . and entitled (here set
forth the established ballot title of the measure), a full, true, and
correct copy of which is printed on the reverse side of this petition,
be transmitted to the legislature of the State of Washington at its
next ensuing regular session, and we respectfully petition the
legislature to enact said proposed measure into law; and each of us for
himself or herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I am
a legal voter of the State of Washington in the city (or town) and
county written after my name, my residence address is correctly stated,
((and)) I have knowingly signed this petition only once, and I have
voluntarily signed this petition without any compensation or promise of
compensation.
((The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct.)) I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.
-- END OF WARNING -- (the line "-- END OF WARNING --" does not need to
appear on the petition)

The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.72.120 and 2005 c 239 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Petitions for proposing measures for submission to the people for
their approval or rejection at the next ensuing general election must
be substantially in the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

INITIATIVE PETITION FOR SUBMISSION TO THE PEOPLE

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully direct that the proposed measure known as
Initiative Measure No. . . . ., entitled (here insert the established
ballot title of the measure), a full, true and correct copy of which is
printed on the reverse side of this petition, be submitted to the legal
voters of the State of Washington for their approval or rejection at
the general election to be held on the . . . . . day of November,
(year); and each of us for himself or herself says: I have personally
signed this petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington, in
the city (or town) and county written after my name, my residence
address is correctly stated, ((and)) I have knowingly signed this
petition only once, and I have voluntarily signed this petition without
any compensation or promise of compensation.
((The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct.)) I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.
-- END OF WARNING -- (the line "-- END OF WARNING --" does not need to
appear on the petition)

The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.72.130 and 2005 c 239 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Petitions ordering that acts or parts of acts passed by the
legislature be referred to the people at the next ensuing general
election, or special election ordered by the legislature, must be
substantially in the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

PETITION FOR REFERENDUM

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully order and direct that Referendum Measure No.
. . . . ., filed to revoke a (or part or parts of a) bill that (concise
statement required by RCW 29A.36.071) and that was passed by the
. . . . . . legislature of the State of Washington at the last regular
(special) session of said legislature, shall be referred to the people
of the state for their approval or rejection at the regular (special)
election to be held on the . . . . day of November, (year); and each of
us for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this
petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington, in the city
(or town) and county written after my name, my residence address is
correctly stated, ((and)) I have knowingly signed this petition only
once, and that I have voluntarily signed this petition without any
compensation or promise of compensation.
((The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct.)) I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.
-- END OF WARNING -- (the line "-- END OF WARNING --" does not need to
appear on the petition)

The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.72.170 and 2003 c 111 s 1818 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state may refuse to file any initiative or
referendum petition being submitted upon any of the following grounds:
(1) That the petition does not contain the information required by
RCW 29A.72.110, 29A.72.120, or 29A.72.130.
(2) That the petition clearly bears insufficient signatures.
(3) That the time within which the petition may be filed has
expired.
In case of such refusal, the secretary of state shall endorse on
the petition the word "submitted" and the date, and retain the petition
pending appeal.
If none of the grounds for refusal exists, the secretary of state
must accept and file the petition.
Concerning individual voter signatures on an initiative or
referendum petition, the secretary of state shall not reject a valid
voter signature if the requirements in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of
this section are fulfilled. If the voter's signature matches the
signature on the voter's registration card, the signature must be
accepted.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.72.230 and 2003 c 111 s 1823 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the filing of an initiative or referendum petition, the
secretary of state shall proceed to verify and canvass the names of the
legal voters on the petition((.)) subject to the following:
(1) The verification and canvass of signatures on the petition may
be observed by persons representing the advocates and opponents of the
proposed measure so long as they make no record of the names,
addresses, or other information on the petitions or related records
during the verification process except upon the order of the superior
court of Thurston county. The secretary of state may limit the number
of observers to not less than two on each side, if in his or her
opinion, a greater number would cause undue delay or disruption of the
verification process. Any such limitation shall apply equally to both
sides.
(2) The secretary of state may use any statistical sampling
techniques for this verification and canvass which have been adopted by
rule as provided by chapter 34.05 RCW. No petition will be rejected on
the basis of any statistical method employed, and no petition will be
accepted on the basis of any statistical method employed if such method
indicates that the petition contains fewer than the requisite number of
signatures of legal voters. If the secretary of state finds the same
name signed to more than one petition, he or she shall reject all but
the first such valid signature.
(3) The secretary of state may use a more thorough review technique
adopted by rule as provided by chapter 34.05 RCW and applied uniformly
when proponents are unable to file an affidavit affirming that no
signatures were collected by any individuals with a financial interest
in the proposed policy change, whether those financial interests were
resulting from their employment with assigned duties including
facilitating the collection of signatures, their membership in a labor
organization seeking the financial interests of any employee group
affected by the proposed policy change, their employment by a firm with
a financial interest in the proposed policy change, their employment by
a public entity affected by the proposed policy change, or their past
or expected receipt of funds or services as a result of the proposed
policy change. The wrongful filing of an affidavit of no financial
interest is a class C felony and subject to enforcement by the attorney
general.
(4) For an initiative to the legislature, the secretary of state
shall transmit a certified copy of the proposed measure to the
legislature at the opening of its session and, as soon as the
signatures on the petition have been verified and canvassed, the
secretary of state shall send to the legislature a certificate of the
facts relating to the filing, verification, and canvass of the
petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 3, 4, and 5 of this act take effect
January 1, 2008. The remaining sections of this act are necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and take effect immediately.

--- END ---