BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature finds that low-income working families often encounter significant barriers as they
strive to achieve financial self-sufficiency. Their challenges include
acquiring employment that pays enough to cover the costs of daily
living, accumulating funds for the down payment on a home, and setting
aside money for the children's education or for the parents'
retirement. The legislature also finds that the United States has a
negative savings rate, one in five American households owes more than
it owns, and in the event of a job loss, one in four households cannot
support itself at the poverty line for three months. Asset-poor
families do not have enough cash reserves or equity in their homes or
businesses to meet basic needs through a period of joblessness, health
emergency, divorce, or other unexpected financial hardship.
Compounding these problems, credit reports about low-income working
families tend to contain negative information, so that when used by
prospective employers, the reports can prevent the job seeker from
obtaining employment. Research shows that savings and ownership of
assets is possible for low-income wage earners and that they would
benefit from a variety of tools that allow them to better control and
increase their financial resources. The legislature therefore finds
that the state, together with local communities, must adopt policies
and provide services to help low-income working families achieve
prosperity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout sections 1 through 6 of this act unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Asset" or "asset building" means investment or savings for an
investment in a family home, higher education, small business, or other
long-term asset that will assist low-income families to attain greater
self-sufficiency.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 WASHINGTON ASSET BUILDING COALITION. (1)
There is created the Washington asset building coalition, whose mission
is to provide statewide leadership on initiatives that foster financial
self-sufficiency and economic security for low-income working families.
The Washington asset building coalition shall work with the department,
local asset building coalitions, and other public and private sector
partners to:
(a) Create a range of private and public prosperity products;
(b) Develop and promote public and private lending policies that
encourage asset building;
(c) Market savings, smart borrowing, and federal tax credit
programs;
(d) Expand financial literacy opportunities and outcomes;
(e) Enhance protections from predatory lending, fraud, and consumer
scams; and
(f) Identify and promote other approaches that will help low-income
working families reach self-sufficiency by building and managing their
assets.
(2) For the 2007-2009 biennium, the department shall work with the
Washington asset building coalition and other partners to design,
implement, and fund a statewide public education and outreach campaign.
The department shall use state funds to attract matching investments by
other public and private sector organizations. The campaign shall
feature marketing, self-help tools, and local services, including
activities such as:
(a) Creation of a web site with financial information, savings and
investment calculators, credit repair links, and other self-help tools;
(b) Call-in assistance and referrals through a universal telephone
number that provides a directory to local services;
(c) Public service announcements and other educational outreach
through media outlets, WorkFirst agencies, mailing inserts, and print
and electronic materials designed to reach target groups such as
seniors, the military, foster youth, former offenders, WorkFirst
participants, limited English speakers, and other high need groups.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 COMMUNITY ASSET BUILDING COALITIONS. (1)
Community-based asset building coalitions involve collaboration among
local social service, faith-based, governmental, job training, and
health care agencies and the private sector, including financial
institutions. They are important partners to the department and the
statewide coalition because they deliver direct services to low-income
working families.
(2) The department shall expand and strengthen community-based
asset building coalitions by providing them with technical assistance
and grants. The department shall establish a process to offer
technical assistance and grants to local communities interested in
initiating or expanding asset building coalitions and services. The
department shall conduct an application process and select at least
twelve sites by October 31, 2007. The application must:
(a) Identify the local lead agency;
(b) Describe how the lead agency will work with community partners,
including local government and the private sector, to implement program
activities. The application must specifically identify the community
partners with whom the lead agency will collaborate, the role of each
partner, and their experience and accomplishments to date, if any, with
asset building and financial literacy programs;
(c) Identify areas of potential need based upon input from the
community partners, including: Financial literacy; assistance with
federal income tax preparation and the use of tax credits; the use of
individual development accounts; homeownership and micro-enterprise
promotion and services; and other asset-building strategies;
(d) Identify the community resources that might support training
for the implementation of the selected best practices chosen to address
the needs identified by the community; and
(e) Identify any local funds and in-kind resources that will be
contributed to complement the state's funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 TAX CREDIT MARKETING. To the extent funding
is appropriated, the department shall establish a program to create an
outreach campaign to increase the number of eligible low-income working
families who claim the federal earned income tax credit and the federal
child and dependent care tax credit. The department may work
collaboratively with other state agencies, private and nonprofit
agencies, local communities, and others with expertise that might
assist the department in implementing the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 ACCOUNTABILITY. The department shall report
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008,
and annually thereafter, on the status of the asset building and
financial self-sufficiency programs created under this act. The report
shall include the status of program implementation, the outcomes
achieved to date, any barriers that have arisen to carrying out the
programs, and recommendations for additional services, tools, and
practices that would increase the effectiveness of state and local
asset building and financial literacy programs.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.182.020 and 1993 c 476 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
LIMITING CREDIT REPORT USAGE FOR EMPLOYMENT. (1) A consumer
reporting agency may furnish a consumer report only under the following
circumstances:
(a) In response to the order of a court having jurisdiction to
issue the order;
(b) In accordance with the written instructions of the consumer to
whom it relates; or
(c) To a person that the agency has reason to believe:
(i) Intends to use the information in connection with a credit
transaction involving the consumer on whom the information is to be
furnished and involving the extension of credit to, or review or
collection of an account of, the consumer;
(ii) Intends to use the information for employment purposes;
(iii) Intends to use the information in connection with the
underwriting of insurance involving the consumer;
(iv) Intends to use the information in connection with a
determination of the consumer's eligibility for a license or other
benefit granted by a governmental instrumentality required by law to
consider an applicant's financial responsibility or status; or
(v) Otherwise has a legitimate business need for the information in
connection with a business transaction involving the consumer.
(2)(a) A person may not procure a consumer report, or cause a
consumer report to be procured, for employment purposes with respect to
any consumer who is not an employee at the time the report is procured
or caused to be procured unless the contents of the consumer report are
substantially job related and the reasons for the use of the consumer
report are disclosed to the consumer in writing, and:
(i) A clear and conspicuous disclosure has been made in writing to
the consumer before the report is procured or caused to be procured
that a consumer report may be obtained for purposes of considering the
consumer for employment. The disclosure may be contained in a written
statement contained in employment application materials; or
(ii) The consumer authorizes the procurement of the report.
(b) A person may not procure a consumer report, or cause a consumer
report to be procured, for employment purposes with respect to any
employee unless the employee has received, at any time after the person
became an employee, written notice that consumer reports may be used
for employment purposes. A written statement that consumer reports may
be used for employment purposes that is contained in employee
guidelines or manuals available to employees or included in written
materials provided to employees constitutes written notice for purposes
of this subsection. This subsection does not apply with respect to a
consumer report of an employee who the employer has reasonable cause to
believe has engaged in specific activity that constitutes a violation
of law.
(c) In using a consumer report for employment purposes, before
taking any adverse action based in whole or part on the report, a
person shall provide to the consumer to whom the report relates: (i)
The name, address, and telephone number of the consumer reporting
agency providing the report; (ii) a description of the consumer's
rights under this chapter pertaining to consumer reports obtained for
employment purposes; and (iii) a reasonable opportunity to respond to
any information in the report that is disputed by the consumer. This
subsection applies to job applicants and current employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES TO ENCOURAGE ASSET
BUILDING. The department of social and health services shall encourage
recipients of temporary assistance for needy families to learn about
asset building and participate in programs to assist low-income persons
in developing personal assets. The department of social and health
services shall provide its regional offices, recipients of temporary
assistance for needy families, and any contractors providing job
search, training, or placement services notification of programs
available in the state for financial literacy, individual development
accounts, assistance with federal income tax information and the
availability of tax credits, and other resources to assist with asset
building.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The family prosperity account is created in
the state treasury. All receipts from any federal, state, and private
funds must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be
used only for supporting initiatives that foster financial self-sufficiency and economic security for low-income working families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 REPEALERS. The following acts or parts of
acts are each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.63A.765 (Pilot programs for asset accumulation) and 2006
c 91 s 2; and
(2) RCW 43.63A.767 (Outreach campaign -- Eligibility for federal
earned income tax credit) and 2006 c 91 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 6 and 11 of this act are
each added to chapter 43.63A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---