BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
department of social and health services is the largest agency in state
government and that it provides some of the most essential public
services to the most vulnerable segments of society; that it
distributes significant amounts of federal and state dollars and
administers numerous federal and state programs; that successfully
managing these dollars and services is a task of great complexity; and
the fiscal performance of an agency necessarily both dictates and
reflects overall policy.
(2) In order for the legislature to deliberate the fiscal
performance processes of the department of social and health services,
and allow the public the opportunity to comment, there is created in
the legislature a joint committee for audit review of the department of
social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The executive committee of the joint
committee for audit review of the department of social and health
services shall consist of the chairs and ranking members of the house
of representatives appropriations committee, the senate ways and means
committee, and the chairs and ranking members of the relevant house of
representatives and senate health services committees, or successor
committees. The chairs of the house of representatives appropriations
committee and the senate ways and means committee shall serve as
cochairs. All members of the house of representatives appropriations
committee, the senate ways and means committee, and the house of
representatives and senate health services committees are eligible for
membership in the joint committee, and shall serve when appointed by
the executive committee. The executive committee shall adopt rules and
procedures for its operations.
(2) The joint committee for audit review of the department of
social and health services shall meet at least once each interim,
within at least four months of the commencement of the legislative
session, to hold a public hearing on the state auditor's annual audit
of the department of social and health services and the audit
resolution report by the office of financial management.
(3) Membership of the joint committee may vary depending on the
scope of the state auditor's annual audit.
(4) The joint committee for audit review may make recommendations
for action on audit findings, or recommend further fiscal or
performance audits to the state auditor or the joint legislative audit
review committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The members of the joint committee for
audit review of the department of social and health services will
receive allowances while attending meetings of the committee or
subcommittee and while engaged in other authorized business of the
committee as provided in RCW 44.04.120. Subject to RCW 44.04.260, all
expenses incurred by the committee must be paid upon voucher forms as
provided by the office of financial management and signed by the
cochairs of the joint committee, or their authorized designees, and the
authority of the chair or vice-chair to sign vouchers continues until
their successors are selected. Vouchers may be drawn upon funds
appropriated for the expenses of the committee.
(2) The expenses of the committee must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Committee expenditures are
subject to approval by the house of representatives executive rules
committee and the senate facilities and operations committee, or their
successor committees.
(3) Staff support for the joint committee for audit review of the
department of social and health services must be provided by the house
or representatives office of program research and the senate committee
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

--- END ---