BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The director of the department of financial
institutions shall study the merits of implementing a real-time
database that allows licensees to verify if a consumer has an
outstanding small loan. The director shall study the cost of a
database, study the impact of a database upon the privacy of small loan
customers, conduct surveys to determine concerns of small loan
customers with having their borrowing habits monitored, and evaluate
the effectiveness of a database in limiting the possibility of an
excessive number of contemporaneous loans. The director must provide
the findings of this study to the committees of the legislature that
address financial regulation no later than November 30, 2007. The
director may include recommendations based upon the study.

--- END ---