BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.720 and 2003 c 379 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.501, all offenders sentenced
to terms involving community supervision, community restitution,
community placement, or community custody shall be under the
supervision of the department and shall follow explicitly the
instructions and conditions of the department. The department may
require an offender to perform affirmative acts it deems appropriate to
monitor compliance with the conditions of the sentence imposed. The
department may only supervise the offender's compliance with payment of
legal financial obligations during any period in which the department
is authorized to supervise the offender in the community under RCW
9.94A.501.
(b) The instructions shall include, at a minimum, reporting as
directed to a community corrections officer, remaining within
prescribed geographical boundaries, notifying the community corrections
officer of any change in the offender's address or employment, and
paying the supervision fee assessment.
(c) For offenders sentenced to terms involving community custody
for crimes committed on or after June 6, 1996, the department may
include, in addition to the instructions in (b) of this subsection, any
appropriate conditions of supervision, including but not limited to,
prohibiting the offender from having contact with any other specified
individuals or specific class of individuals.
(d) For offenders sentenced to terms of community custody for
crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department may impose
conditions as specified in RCW 9.94A.715.
The conditions authorized under (c) of this subsection may be
imposed by the department prior to or during an offender's community
custody term. If a violation of conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.710 occurs during community custody,
it shall be deemed a violation of community placement for the purposes
of RCW 9.94A.740 and shall authorize the department to transfer an
offender to a more restrictive confinement status as provided in RCW
9.94A.737. At any time prior to the completion of an offender's term
of community custody, the department may recommend to the court that
any or all of the conditions imposed by the court or the department
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.710 or 9.94A.715 be continued beyond the
expiration of the offender's term of community custody as authorized in
RCW 9.94A.715 (3) or (5).
The department may require offenders to pay for special services
rendered on or after July 25, 1993, including electronic monitoring,
day reporting, and telephone reporting, dependent upon the offender's
ability to pay. The department may pay for these services for
offenders who are not able to pay.
(2) No offender sentenced to terms involving community supervision,
community restitution, community custody, or community placement under
the supervision of the department may own, use, or possess firearms or
ammunition. Offenders who own, use, or are found to be in actual or
constructive possession of firearms or ammunition shall be subject to
the violation process and sanctions under RCW 9.94A.634, 9.94A.737, and
9.94A.740. "Constructive possession" as used in this subsection means
the power and intent to control the firearm or ammunition. "Firearm"
as used in this subsection has the same definition as in RCW 9.41.010.
(3)(a) Community corrections officers may collaborate with law
enforcement officers to monitor offenders under the supervision of the
department.
(b) A community corrections officer who is assigned by the
department to partner with law enforcement as permitted under (a) of
this subsection, and is participating in a patrol with a law
enforcement officer, is not liable for civil damages arising from an
act or omission which occurs when the community corrections officer
provides assistance to a law enforcement officer during the course of
the patrol, so long as the community corrections officer was acting at
the request of the law enforcement officer, unless the act or omission
constitutes gross negligence.

--- END ---