BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.102.010 and 2003 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that businesses in Washington are concerned
about the potential for multiple taxation that arises due to the
various city business and occupation taxes and are concerned about the
lack of uniformity among city jurisdictions. The current system has a
negative impact on Washington's business climate. The legislature
further finds that local business and occupation tax revenue provides
a sizable portion of city revenue that is used for essential services.
The legislature recognizes that local government services contribute to
a healthy business climate.
The legislature intends to provide for a more uniform system of
city business and occupation taxes that eliminates multiple taxation,
while allowing for some continued local control and flexibility to
cities. Therefore, the legislature further finds that a uniform system
for the collection and administration of local business and occupation
taxes and public utility taxes is necessary.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.102.020 and 2003 c 79 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Chapter 79, Laws of 2003 does not apply)) (1) This chapter
applies to municipal business and occupation taxes and public utility
taxes. Public utility taxes include, but are not limited to taxes on
any service that historically or traditionally has been taxed as a
utility business for municipal tax purposes, such as:
(((1))) (a) A light and power business or a natural gas
distribution business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010;
(((2))) (b) A telephone business, as defined in RCW 82.04.065;
(((3))) (c) Cable television services;
(((4))) (d) Sewer or water services;
(((5))) (e) Drainage services;
(((6))) (f) Solid waste services; or
(((7))) (g) Steam services.
(2) For the purposes of administration and collection under this
chapter, municipal business and occupation and public utility tax
classifications are to be uniform to the extent determined by the
department with the state business and occupation and public utility
tax classifications. Such classifications are to be determined by the
department in consultation with the cities and the association of
Washington businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.102 RCW
to read as follows:
All business and occupation taxes and public utility taxes imposed
by a city are to be collected and administered by the department of
revenue as provided in this chapter and in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.102 RCW
to read as follows:
All of the provisions contained in chapter 82.32 RCW shall have
full force and application with respect to taxes imposed under the
provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.32.010 and 1998 c 304 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall apply with respect to the
taxes imposed under chapters 82.04 through 82.14 RCW, under RCW
82.14B.030(3), under chapters 82.16 through 82.29A RCW of this title,
under chapter 84.33 RCW, under chapter 35.102 RCW, and under other
titles, chapters, and sections in such manner and to such extent as
indicated in each such title, chapter, or section.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.32.300 and 1997 c 420 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administration of this and chapters 82.04 through 82.27 RCW of
this title and chapter 35.102 RCW is vested in the department of
revenue which shall prescribe forms and rules of procedure for the
determination of the taxable status of any person, for the making of
returns and for the ascertainment, assessment and collection of taxes
and penalties imposed thereunder.
The department of revenue shall make and publish rules and
regulations, not inconsistent therewith, necessary to enforce
provisions of this chapter and chapters 82.02 through 82.23B ((and)),
82.27, and 35.102 RCW, and the liquor control board shall make and
publish rules necessary to enforce chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW, which
shall have the same force and effect as if specifically included
therein, unless declared invalid by the judgment of a court of record
not appealed from.
The department may employ such clerks, specialists, and other
assistants as are necessary. Salaries and compensation of such
employees shall be fixed by the department and shall be charged to the
proper appropriation for the department.
The department shall exercise general supervision of the collection
of taxes and, in the discharge of such duty, may institute and
prosecute such suits or proceedings in the courts as may be necessary
and proper.

Sec. 7 RCW 35.102.030 and 2003 c 79 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in ((this section apply throughout chapter 79, Laws
of 2003, unless)) chapters 82.04, 82.16, and 82.32 RCW apply throughout
this chapter, unless the terms are defined otherwise in this section or
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) (("Business" has the same meaning as given in chapter 82.04
RCW.
(2))) "City" means a city, town, or code city.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Business and occupation tax" or "gross receipts tax" means a
tax imposed on or measured by the value of products, the gross income
of the business, or the gross proceeds of sales, as the case may be,
and that is the legal liability of the business.
(4) (("Value of products" has the same meaning as given in chapter
82.04 RCW.
(5) "Gross income of the business" has the same meaning as given in
chapter 82.04 RCW.
(6) "Gross proceeds of sales" has the same meaning as given in
chapter 82.04 RCW.)) "Public utility tax" means a tax imposed on the
gross income of a utility business or the gross proceeds of sales of a
utility business by a city for municipal tax purposes.

Sec. 8 RCW 35.102.040 and 2006 c 301 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The cities, working through the association of Washington
cities, shall form a model ordinance development committee made up of
a representative sampling of cities that as of July 27, 2003, impose a
business and occupation tax. This committee shall work through the
association of Washington cities to adopt a model ordinance on
municipal gross receipts business and occupation tax. The model
ordinance and subsequent amendments shall be adopted using a process
that includes opportunity for substantial input from business
stakeholders and other members of the public. Input shall be solicited
from statewide business associations and from local chambers of
commerce and downtown business associations in cities that levy a
business and occupation tax.
(b) The municipal research council shall contract to post the model
ordinance on an internet web site and to make paper copies available
for inspection upon request. The department of revenue and the
department of licensing shall post copies of or links to the model
ordinance on their internet web sites. Additionally, a city that
imposes a business and occupation tax or public utility tax must make
copies of its ordinance available for inspection and copying as
provided in chapter 42.56 RCW.
(c) The definitions and tax classifications in the model ordinance
may not be amended more frequently than once every four years, however
the model ordinance may be amended at any time to comply with changes
in state law. Any amendment to a mandatory provision of the model
ordinance must be adopted with the same effective date by all cities.
The model ordinance must be amended to include provisions relating to
the department's administration and collection of municipal business
and occupation taxes and public utility taxes under this chapter.
(2) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax or public
utility tax must adopt the mandatory provisions of the model ordinance.
The following provisions are mandatory:
(a) A system of credits that meets the requirements of RCW
35.102.060 and a form for such use;
(b) A ((uniform, minimum small business tax threshold of at least
the equivalent of twenty thousand dollars in gross income annually. A
city may elect to deviate from this requirement by creating a higher
threshold or exemption but it shall not deviate lower than the level
required in this subsection. If a city has a small business threshold
or exemption in excess of that provided in this subsection as of
January 1, 2003, and chooses to deviate below the threshold or
exemption level that was in place as of January 1, 2003, the city must
notify all businesses licensed to do business within the city at least
one hundred twenty days prior to the potential implementation of a
lower threshold or exemption amount)) true gross receipts tax, as
determined by the department;
(c) Tax reporting frequencies that meet the requirements of RCW
35.102.070;
(d) Penalty and interest provisions that meet the requirements of
RCW 35.102.080 and 35.102.090;
(e) Claim periods that meet the requirements of RCW 35.102.100;
(f) Refund provisions that meet the requirements of RCW 35.102.110;
and
(g) Definitions, which at a minimum, must include the definitions
enumerated in RCW 35.102.030 and 35.102.120, and chapters 82.04 and
82.16 RCW. ((The definitions in chapter 82.04 RCW shall be used as the
baseline for all definitions in the model ordinance, and any deviation
in the model ordinance from these definitions must be described by a
comment in the model ordinance.))
(3) ((Except for the deduction required by RCW 35.102.160 and the
system of credits developed to address multiple taxation under
subsection (2)(a) of this section, a city may adopt its own provisions
for tax exemptions, tax credits, and tax deductions.
(4) Any city that adopts an ordinance that deviates from the
nonmandatory provisions of the model ordinance shall make a description
of such differences available to the public, in written and electronic
form)) The administration and collection of municipal business and
occupation and public utility taxes is to be uniform to the extent
provided by the department.
(4) A city may not adopt a minimum small business tax threshold.
(5) It is the intent of this chapter that any municipal business
and occupation taxes and local public utility taxes adopted pursuant to
this chapter are subject to the authority of the department of revenue
for the administration and collection of such taxes. However, the tax
rates imposed shall be determined by the cities, subject to any
existing limitations provided otherwise in statute or the state
Constitution.
(6) The rule-making powers of the department of revenue contained
in RCW 82.08.060 and 82.32.300 shall be applicable to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 35.102 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall develop and implement a process for the
collection and administration of municipal business and occupation
taxes and public utility taxes in accordance with this chapter. In
developing and implementing such a process, the department shall, among
the other requirements of this chapter:
(1) Determine when payments of business and occupation taxes or
public utility taxes imposed by cities, along with reports and returns
for such taxes on forms prescribed by the department, are due to the
department;
(2) Have authority to make administrative rulings and
interpretations, enter into legal action, appeal decisions, or
adjudicate, on behalf of the cities which impose taxes subject to this
chapter;
(3) Establish reporting thresholds in consultation with the cities
and the association of Washington businesses;
(4) Develop mechanisms, under RCW 35.102.1301, to allow the
provisions of this chapter to be applied in a revenue neutral manner;
and
(5) Provide that the initial collection and administration process
by the department for any city that adopts a municipal business and
occupation tax or public utility tax for the first time must begin on:
(a) January 1st in the year following the adoption of the tax, if the
tax was adopted by the city between the months of January and June; or
(b) July 1st in the year following the adoption of the tax, if the tax
was adopted by the city between the months of July and December.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
Any appeal made of a tax payment imposed by a city under this
chapter must be made to superior court as provided under RCW 82.32.180
or to the board of tax appeals under chapter 82.03 RCW.

Sec. 11 RCW 35.102.060 and 2003 c 79 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((A city)) For cities that impose((s)) a business and
occupation tax or public utility tax, the department shall provide for
a system of credits to avoid multiple taxation ((as follows)), which
includes but is not limited to the following:
(a) Persons who engage in business activities that are within the
purview of more than one classification of the tax shall be taxable
under each applicable classification.
(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, if
imposition of the tax would place an undue burden upon interstate
commerce or violate constitutional requirements, a taxpayer shall be
allowed a credit only to the extent necessary to preserve the validity
of the tax.
(c) Persons taxable under the retailing or wholesaling
classification with respect to selling products in a city shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any eligible gross receipts
taxes paid by the person (i) with respect to the manufacturing of the
products sold in the city, and (ii) with respect to the extracting of
the products, or the ingredients used in the products, sold in the
city. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax liability
arising with respect to the sale of those products.
(d) Persons taxable under the manufacturing classification with
respect to manufacturing products in a city shall be allowed a credit
against that tax for any eligible gross receipts tax paid by the person
with respect to extracting the ingredients of the products manufactured
in the city and with respect to manufacturing the products other than
in the city. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising with respect to the manufacturing of those products.
(e) Persons taxable under the retailing or wholesaling
classification with respect to selling products in a city shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any eligible gross receipts
taxes paid by the person with respect to the printing, or the printing
and publishing, of the products sold within the city. The amount of
the credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising with respect to
the sale of those products.
(2) The model ordinance shall be drafted to address the issue of
multiple taxation for those tax classifications that are in addition to
those enumerated in subsection (1)(c) through (e) of this section. The
objective of any such provisions shall be to eliminate multiple
taxation of the same income by two or more cities.

Sec. 12 RCW 35.102.070 and 2003 c 79 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A city that imposes a business and occupation tax or public utility
tax shall allow reporting and payment of tax ((on a monthly, quarterly,
or annual basis. The frequency for any particular person may be
assigned at the discretion of the city, except that monthly reporting
may be assigned only if it can be demonstrated that the taxpayer is
remitting excise tax to the state on a monthly basis. For persons
assigned a monthly frequency, payment is due within the same time
period provided for monthly taxpayers under RCW 82.32.045. For persons
assigned a quarterly or annual frequency, payment is due within the
same time period as provided for quarterly or annual frequency under
RCW 82.32.045)) in accordance with the reporting requirements developed
by the department, under section 9 of this act, pursuant to chapter
82.32 RCW.

Sec. 13 RCW 35.102.080 and 2003 c 79 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax shall
compute interest charged a taxpayer on an underpaid tax or penalty in
accordance with RCW 82.32.050.
(2) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax shall compute
interest paid on refunds or credits of amounts paid or other recovery
allowed a taxpayer in accordance with RCW 82.32.060.)) The department
shall compute interest charged a taxpayer on an underpaid tax or
penalty for the department's administration and collection of the
underpaid tax or penalty in accordance with RCW 82.32.050.

Sec. 14 RCW 35.102.090 and 2003 c 79 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((A city that imposes a business and occupation tax shall provide
for the imposition of penalties in accordance with chapter 82.32 RCW.))
Penalties imposed by the department for the administration and
collection of any underpaid municipal business and occupation tax or
public utility tax, must be in accordance with chapter 82.32 RCW.

Sec. 15 RCW 35.102.120 and 2003 c 79 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the definitions in RCW 35.102.030, the following
terms and phrases must be defined in the model ordinance under RCW
35.102.040, ((and)) as provided by the department. Such definitions
shall include any specific requirements as noted in this subsection and
be uniform, to the extent determined by the department, to any
definitions provided for the state business and occupation tax or state
public utility tax by the department:
(a) Eligible gross receipts tax.
(b) Extracting.
(c) Manufacturing. Software development may not be defined as a
manufacturing activity.
(d) Retailing.
(e) Retail sale.
(f) Services. The term "services" excludes retail or wholesale
services.
(g) Wholesale sale.
(h) Wholesaling.
(i) To manufacture.
(j) Commercial and industrial use.
(k) Engaging in business.
(l) Person.
(2) Any tax classifications in addition to those enumerated in
subsection (1) of this section that are included in the model ordinance
must be uniform among all cities.

Sec. 16 RCW 35.102.130 and 2003 c 79 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
A city that imposes a business and occupation tax or public utility
tax shall provide for the allocation and apportionment of a person's
gross income, other than persons subject to the provisions of chapter
82.14A RCW, as follows:
(1) Gross income derived from all activities other than those taxed
as service or royalties shall be allocated to the location where the
activity takes place.
(a) In the case of sales of tangible personal property, the
activity takes place where delivery to the buyer occurs.
(b) If a business activity allocated under this subsection (1)
takes place in more than one city and all cities impose a gross
receipts tax or public utility tax on the same activity, a credit shall
be allowed as provided in RCW 35.102.060; if not all of the cities
impose a gross receipts tax or public utility tax on the same activity,
the affected cities shall allow another credit or allocation system as
they and the taxpayer agree.
(2) Gross income derived as royalties from the granting of
intangible rights shall be allocated to the commercial domicile of the
taxpayer.
(3) Gross income derived from activities taxed as services shall be
apportioned to a city by multiplying apportionable income by a
fraction, the numerator of which is the payroll factor plus the
service-income factor and the denominator of which is two.
(a) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the
total amount paid in the city during the tax period by the taxpayer for
compensation and the denominator of which is the total compensation
paid everywhere during the tax period. Compensation is paid in the
city if:
(i) The individual is primarily assigned within the city;
(ii) The individual is not primarily assigned to any place of
business for the tax period and the employee performs fifty percent or
more of his or her service for the tax period in the city; or
(iii) The individual is not primarily assigned to any place of
business for the tax period, the individual does not perform fifty
percent or more of his or her service in any city(([,])), and the
employee resides in the city.
(b) The service income factor is a fraction, the numerator of which
is the total service income of the taxpayer in the city during the tax
period, and the denominator of which is the total service income of the
taxpayer everywhere during the tax period. Service income is in the
city if:
(i) The customer location is in the city; or
(ii) The income-producing activity is performed in more than one
location and a greater proportion of the service-income-producing
activity is performed in the city than in any other location, based on
costs of performance, and the taxpayer is not taxable at the customer
location; or
(iii) The service-income-producing activity is performed within the
city, and the taxpayer is not taxable in the customer location.
(c) If the allocation and apportionment provisions of this
subsection do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's
business activity in the city or cities in which the taxpayer does
business, the taxpayer may petition for or the tax administrators may
jointly require, in respect to all or any part of the taxpayer's
business activity, that one of the following methods be used jointly by
the cities to allocate or apportion gross income, if reasonable:
(i) Separate accounting;
(ii) The use of a single factor;
(iii) The inclusion of one or more additional factors that will
fairly represent the taxpayer's business activity in the city; or
(iv) The employment of any other method to effectuate an equitable
allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer's income.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Apportionable income" means the gross income of the business
taxable under the service classifications of a city's gross receipts
tax, including income received from activities outside the city if the
income would be taxable under the service classification if received
from activities within the city, less any exemptions or deductions
available.
(b) "Compensation" means wages, salaries, commissions, and any
other form of remuneration paid to individuals for personal services
that are or would be included in the individual's gross income under
the federal internal revenue code.
(c) "Individual" means any individual who, under the usual common
law rules applicable in determining the employer-employee relationship,
has the status of an employee of that taxpayer.
(d) "Customer location" means the city or unincorporated area of a
county where the majority of the contacts between the taxpayer and the
customer take place.
(e) "Primarily assigned" means the business location of the
taxpayer where the individual performs his or her duties.
(f) "Service-taxable income" or "service income" means gross income
of the business subject to tax under either the service or royalty
classification.
(g) "Tax period" means the calendar year during which tax liability
is accrued. If taxes are reported by a taxpayer on a basis more
frequent than once per year, taxpayers shall calculate the factors for
the previous calendar year for reporting in the current calendar year
and correct the reporting for the previous year when the factors are
calculated for that year, but not later than the end of the first
quarter of the following year.
(h) "Taxable in the customer location" means either that a taxpayer
is subject to a gross receipts tax in the customer location for the
privilege of doing business, or that the government where the customer
is located has the authority to subject the taxpayer to gross receipts
tax regardless of whether, in fact, the government does so.

Sec. 17 RCW 35.102.140 and 2003 c 79 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Cities imposing business and occupation taxes or public utility
taxes must comply with all requirements of RCW 35.102.020 through
35.102.130 by December 31, ((2004)) 2007. A city that has not complied
with the requirements of RCW 35.102.020 through 35.102.130 by December
31, ((2004)) 2007, may not impose a tax that is imposed by a city on
the privilege of engaging in business activities. Cities imposing
business and occupation taxes or public utility taxes after December
31, ((2004)) 2007, must comply with RCW 35.102.020 through 35.102.130.

Sec. 18 RCW 35.102.160 and 2006 c 301 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((A city that imposes its business and occupation tax on
professional employer services performed by a professional employer
organization, regardless of the tax classification applicable to such
services,)) The department shall provide a deduction identical to the
deduction in RCW 82.04.540(2) for the business and occupation tax on
professional employer services performed by a professional employer.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "professional employer
organization" and "professional employer services" have the same
meanings as in RCW 82.04.540.

Sec. 19 RCW 35.102.1301 and 2003 c 79 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department ((of revenue)) shall conduct a study of the net
fiscal impacts of this chapter ((79, Laws of 2003)), with particular
emphasis on the revenue impacts of the apportionment and allocation
method contained in RCW 35.102.130 and any revenue impact resulting
from the increased uniformity and consistency provided through the
model ordinance. In conducting the study, the department shall use,
and regularly consult with, a committee composed of an equal
representation from interested business representatives and from a
representative sampling of cities imposing business and occupation
taxes. The department shall report the final results of the study to
the governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature by November
30, 2005. In addition, the department shall provide progress reports
to the governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature on
November 30, 2003, and November 30, 2004. As part of its report, the
department shall examine and recommend options to address any adverse
revenue impacts to local jurisdictions.
(2) The department shall conduct a study of the net fiscal impacts
of this act, with particular emphasis on the revenue impacts of
developing uniform classifications for public utility taxes collected
under this chapter and the standardization of reporting thresholds. In
conducting the study, the department shall consult with the cities and
association of Washington businesses. The department shall report the
final results of the study to the fiscal committees of the legislature
by November 30, 2007. Such report must include the department's
recommendations to address any adverse revenue impacts to local
jurisdictions.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "net fiscal impacts" means
accounting for the potential of both positive and negative fiscal
impacts on local jurisdictions that may result from chapter 79, Laws of
2003.
(((3))) (4) It is the intent of the legislature through this study
to provide accurate fiscal impact analysis and recommended options to
alleviate revenue impacts from chapter 79, Laws of 2003 so as to allow
local jurisdictions to anticipate and appropriately address any
potential adverse revenue impacts from chapter 79, Laws of 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
Cities, shall contract, prior to the effective date of this section
for the administration and collection to the state department of
revenue, which shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. The
remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter that is
collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited by the state
department of revenue in the municipal business and occupation and
public utility tax account hereby created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the municipal business and occupation and public utility tax
account may be spent only for distribution to cities imposing a
municipal business and occupation tax or public utility tax. All
administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.04, and 82.32 RCW, as
they now exist or may hereafter be amended, shall, insofar as they are
applicable to state business and occupation or public utility taxes, be
applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter. Except as
provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of investments of balances in
the municipal business and occupation and public utility tax account
shall be credited to the municipal business and occupation and public
utility tax account and distributed to the cities monthly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this
section, a municipal business and occupation tax or public utility tax
change shall take effect (a) no sooner than seventy-five days after the
department receives notice of the change and (b) only on the first day
of January, April, July, or October.
(2) In the case of a municipal business and occupation tax or
public utility tax that is a credit against the state business and
occupation tax or state public utility tax, a municipal business and
occupation tax or public utility tax change shall take effect (a) no
sooner than thirty days after the department receives notice of the
change and (b) only on the first day of a month.
(3)(a) A municipal business and occupation tax or public utility
tax rate increase imposed on services applies to the first billing
period starting on or after the effective date of the increase.
(b) A municipal business and occupation tax or public utility tax
rate decrease imposed on services applies to bills rendered on or after
the effective date of the decrease.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "services" means the
performance of business activities subject to either a municipal
business and occupation tax or public utility tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
Monthly the state treasurer shall make distributions from the
municipal business and occupation tax or public utility tax account to
the counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities
districts, and transportation benefit districts the amount of tax
collected on behalf of each taxing authority, less the deduction
provided for in RCW 82.14.050. The state treasurer shall make the
distribution under this section without appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
It is the intent of this chapter that any definitions or
classifications for taxes adopted pursuant to this chapter be identical
to the definitions and classifications for state business and
occupation taxes or public utility taxes in chapters 82.16 and 82.04
RCW, unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, and with other
municipal business and occupation taxes and public utility taxes
adopted pursuant to this chapter. The department shall, as soon as
practicable, and with the assistance of the appropriate associations of
county prosecutors and city attorneys, draft a model resolution and
ordinance for administration and collection of municipal business and
occupation and public utility taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
The taxes provided by this chapter may be deposited by any taxpayer
prior to the due date thereof with the treasurer or other legal
depository for the benefit of the funds to which they belong to be
credited against any future tax or assessment that may be levied or
become due from the taxpayer. However, the taxpayer may with the
concurrence of the legislative authority designate a particular fund of
such county or city against which such prepayment of tax or assessment
is made. Such prepayment of taxes or assessments shall not be
considered to be a debt for the purpose of the limitation of
indebtedness imposed by law on a city.
By agreement made pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW, cities may utilize
tax revenues received under the authority of this chapter for any
purpose within their power or powers, privileges or authority exercised
or capable of exercise by the cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
When permitted by resolution or ordinance, any tax authorized by
this chapter may be paid prior to the taxable event to which it may be
attributable. Such prepayment shall be made by deposit with the
treasurer or other legal depository for the benefit of the funds to
which they belong. They shall be credited by any county or city
against any future tax that may become due from a taxpayer. However,
the taxpayer with the concurrence of the legislative authority may
designate a particular fund of the city against which such prepayment
of tax is made. Prepayment of taxes under this section shall not
relieve any taxpayer from remitting the full amount of any tax imposed
under the authority of this chapter upon the occurrence of the taxable
event.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
A person with three or more cities to which such person is required
to report municipal business and occupation or public utility taxes,
must electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and
other information that the department requires in an electronic format
as provided or as approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this section, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 This act applies to taxes levied in 2008
and collected in 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 Section 16 of this act takes effect January
1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 Except for section 16 of this act, this act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---