BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95L.020 and 2006 c 223 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1994, a person may not sell or distribute for
sale a laundry detergent that contains 0.5 percent or more phosphorus
by weight.
(2)(a) After July 1, 1994, and until the dates specified in (b) of
this subsection, a person may not sell or distribute for sale a
dishwashing detergent that contains 8.7 percent or more ((phosphorous
[phosphorus])) phosphorus by weight.
(b) A person may not sell or distribute for sale a dishwashing
detergent that contains 0.5 percent or more phosphorus by weight:
(i) Commencing July 1, 2008, in counties located east of the crest
of the Cascade mountains with populations, as determined by office of
financial management population estimates((:
(A) Greater than one hundred eighty thousand and less than two
hundred twenty thousand; and
(B))), greater than three hundred ninety thousand and less than six
hundred ((fifty)) thousand;
(ii) Commencing July 1, 2010, throughout the state.
(3) This section does not apply to the sale or distribution of
detergents for commercial and industrial uses.

--- END ---