BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
PUBLIC FACILITIES DISTRICT AMENDMENTS
Sec. 101 RCW 36.100.010 and 2002 c 218 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((A)) One or more public facilities districts may be created in
any county and shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the county.
(2) A public facilities district shall be created upon adoption of
a resolution providing for the creation of such a district by the
county legislative authority in which the proposed district is located.
The scope and authority of the public facilities district may be
defined and limited by the resolution providing for the creation of the
public facilities district.
(3) A public facilities district is a municipal corporation, an
independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article VII,
section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the
meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.
(4) No taxes authorized under this chapter may be assessed or
levied unless a majority of the voters of the public facilities
district has approved such tax at a general or special election. A
single ballot proposition may both validate the imposition of the sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.048 and the excise tax under RCW
36.100.040.
(5) A public facilities district shall constitute a body corporate
and shall possess all the usual powers of a corporation for public
purposes as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter be
specifically conferred by statute, including, but not limited to, the
authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into
contracts, and to sue and be sued.
(6) A public facilities district may enter into contracts with a
county for the purpose of exercising any powers of a community renewal
agency under chapter 35.81 RCW.
(7) The county legislative authority or the city council may
transfer property to the public facilities district created under this
chapter. No property that is encumbered with debt or that is in need
of major capital renovation may be transferred to the district without
the agreement of the district and revenues adequate to retire the
existing indebtedness.

Sec. 102 RCW 36.100.030 and 2003 c 376 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A public facilities district is authorized to acquire,
construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, lease, and
operate (a) sports facilities, entertainment facilities, convention
facilities, or regional centers as defined in RCW 35.57.020, and (b)
for districts formed after January 1, 2000, recreational facilities
other than ski areas, together with contiguous parking facilities. The
taxes that are provided for in this chapter may only be imposed for
these purposes.
(2) A public facilities district may enter into agreements under
chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint provision and operation of such
facilities and may enter into contracts under chapter 39.34 RCW where
any party to the contract provides and operates such facilities for the
other party or parties to the contract.
(3) Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit
service system, a public facilities district may contract with a public
or private entity, including a prospective tenant of a proposed or
existing facility, for the site acquisition, development, design,
construction, lease, operation, or management of its public facilities,
including without limitation:
(a) For the provision of design and other professional services,
including with respect to the site evaluation and selection, design
options, required environmental studies, other required studies, and
necessary permitting;
(b) To control development of the facility, including determining
bidding specifications and requirements, procurement procedures, and
all other aspects of development, select and engage an architect or
architects, other design professionals, and a contractor or contractors
for design and construction;
(c) For a master lease whereby the public or private entity becomes
the sole master tenant of the facility.
(4) A public facilities district is authorized to use the
supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures set forth
in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the design, construction,
reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any of its public facilities.
(5) A public facilities district may: (a) Impose charges and fees
for the use of its facilities((,)); (b) structure the financing of the
facility in consultation with the county in which the public facilities
district is located; (c) incur debt from any source on an interim basis
to finance the cost of public facilities district operations, which
debt may be repaid out of bond proceeds or other sources; and ((may))
(d) accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations.

PART II
FINANCING
Sec. 201 RCW 82.14.0485 and 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 101 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes
authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall not exceed 0.017 percent of the selling price in the case of a
sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.
(3) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the
purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds issued
by a county to construct a baseball stadium, a regional center as
defined in RCW 35.57.020, and for other purposes described in this act.
(4) ((No tax may be collected under this section before January 1,
1996, and no tax may be collected under this section unless the taxes
under RCW 82.14.360 are being collected.)) The tax imposed in this
section shall expire when the bonds issued for the construction of the
baseball stadium are retired, but not more than twenty years after the
tax is first collected, unless extended pursuant to subsection (6) of
this section.
(5) As used in this section, "baseball stadium" means a baseball
stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or canopy, together
with associated parking facilities, constructed in the largest city in
a county with a population of one million or more.
(6) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more that has created a public facilities district to
develop a regional center as defined in RCW 35.57.020 and that has
imposed a tax pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may extend
such tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. Until the date
that is the earlier of the date the bonds issued for the construction
of a baseball stadium are retired or twenty years after the date the
tax imposed in this section is first collected, moneys collected under
this section shall only be used for the purpose of paying the principal
and interest payments on bonds issued by a county to construct a
baseball stadium. After the date that is the earlier of the date the
bonds issued for the construction of a baseball stadium are retired or
twenty years after the date the tax imposed in this section is first
collected, money collected under this section shall be used for the
purposes set forth in section 301 of this act.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.14.0494 and 1997 c 220 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county that has created a public
stadium authority to develop a stadium and exhibition center under RCW
36.102.050 may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with this
chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the county. The rate of tax shall be 0.016 percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used
in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.
(3) ((Before the issuance of bonds in RCW 43.99N.020, all revenues
collected on behalf of the county under this section shall be
transferred to the public stadium authority.)) After bonds are issued
under RCW 43.99N.020, all revenues collected on behalf of the county
under this section shall be deposited in the stadium and exhibition
center account under RCW 43.99N.060, until the date that is the earlier
of the date the bonds issued for the construction of a stadium and
exhibition center are retired or twenty-three years after the date the
tax in this section is first imposed.
(4) The definitions in RCW 36.102.010 apply to this section.
(5) This section expires on the earliest of the following dates,
unless extended pursuant to subsection (6) of this section:
(a) December 31, 1999, if the conditions for issuance of bonds
under RCW 43.99N.020 have not been met before that date;
(b) The date on which all bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 have
been retired; or
(c) Twenty-three years after the date the tax under this section is
first imposed.
(6) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more that has created a public facilities district to
develop a regional center as defined in RCW 35.57.020 and that has
imposed a tax pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may extend
such tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. Until the date
that is the earlier of the date the bonds issued for the construction
of a stadium and exhibition center are retired or twenty-three years
after the date the tax in this section is first imposed, all revenues
collected on behalf of the county under this section shall be deposited
in the stadium and exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060.
After the date that is the earlier of the date the bonds issued for the
construction of a stadium and exhibition center are retired or
twenty-three years after the date the tax in this section is first
imposed, money collected under this section shall be used for the
purposes set forth in section 301 of this act.

Sec. 203 RCW 82.14.360 and 2000 c 103 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a special stadium sales and use tax upon the
retail sale or use within the county by restaurants, taverns, and bars
of food and beverages that are taxable by the state under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of the tax shall not exceed five-tenths
of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax. The tax imposed
under this subsection is in addition to any other taxes authorized by
law and shall not be credited against any other tax imposed upon the
same taxable event. As used in this section, "restaurant" does not
include grocery stores, mini-markets, or convenience stores.
(2) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a special stadium sales and use tax upon
retail car rentals within the county that are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of the tax shall not
exceed two percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or
rental value of the vehicle in the case of a use tax. The tax imposed
under this subsection is in addition to any other taxes authorized by
law and shall not be credited against any other tax imposed upon the
same taxable event.
(3) Until the date that is the earlier of the date on which bonds
issued for the construction of a baseball stadium are retired or twenty
years after the taxes in this section are first collected, the revenue
from the taxes imposed under this section shall be used for the purpose
of principal and interest payments on bonds, issued by the county, to
acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and
operate a baseball stadium. Revenues from the taxes authorized in this
section may be used for design and other preconstruction costs of the
baseball stadium until bonds are issued for the baseball stadium. The
county shall issue bonds, in an amount determined to be necessary by
the public facilities district, for the district to acquire, construct,
own, and equip the baseball stadium. The county shall have no
obligation to issue bonds in an amount greater than that which would be
supported by the tax revenues under this section, RCW 82.14.0485, and
36.38.010(4) (a) and (b).
(4) Until the date that is the earlier of the date on which bonds
issued for the construction of a baseball stadium are retired or twenty
years after the taxes in this section are first collected, if the
revenue from the taxes imposed under this section exceeds the amount
needed for such principal and interest payments in any year, the excess
shall be used solely:
(a) For early retirement of the bonds issued for the baseball
stadium; and
(b) If the revenue from the taxes imposed under this section
exceeds the amount needed for the purposes in (a) of this subsection in
any year, the excess shall be placed in a contingency fund which may
only be used to pay unanticipated capital costs on the baseball
stadium, excluding any cost overruns on initial construction.
(((4))) (5) The taxes authorized under this section shall not be
collected after June 30, 1997, unless the county executive has
certified to the department of revenue that a professional major league
baseball team has made a binding and legally enforceable contractual
commitment to:
(a) Play at least ninety percent of its home games in the stadium
for a period of time not shorter than the term of the bonds issued to
finance the initial construction of the stadium;
(b) Contribute forty-five million dollars toward the reasonably
necessary preconstruction costs including, but not limited to
architectural, engineering, environmental, and legal services, and the
cost of construction of the stadium, or to any associated public
purpose separate from bond-financed property, including without
limitation land acquisition, parking facilities, equipment,
infrastructure, or other similar costs associated with the project,
which contribution shall be made during a term not to exceed the term
of the bonds issued to finance the initial construction of the stadium.
If all or part of the contribution is made after the date of issuance
of the bonds, the team shall contribute an additional amount equal to
the accruing interest on the deferred portion of the contribution,
calculated at the interest rate on the bonds maturing in the year in
which the deferred contribution is made. No part of the contribution
may be made without the consent of the county until a public facilities
district is created under chapter 36.100 RCW to acquire, construct,
own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate a baseball
stadium. To the extent possible, contributions shall be structured in
a manner that would allow for the issuance of bonds to construct the
stadium that are exempt from federal income taxes; and
(c) Share a portion of the profits generated by the baseball team
from the operation of the professional franchise for a period of time
equal to the term of the bonds issued to finance the initial
construction of the stadium, after offsetting any losses incurred by
the baseball team after ((the effective date of chapter 14, Laws of
1995 1st sp. sess)) June 14, 1995. Such profits and the portion to be
shared shall be defined by agreement between the public facilities
district and the baseball team. The shared profits shall be used to
retire the bonds issued to finance the initial construction of the
stadium. If the bonds are retired before the expiration of their term,
the shared profits shall be paid to the public facilities district.
(((5))) (6) If the legislative authority of a county that has
imposed a tax pursuant to either subsection (1) or (2) of this section
has created a public facilities district to develop a regional center
as defined in RCW 35.57.020, after the earlier of the date the bonds
issued for the construction of a baseball stadium are retired or twenty
years after the taxes in this section are first collected, through and
until December 31, 2015, money collected under subsections (1) and (2)
of this section shall be used for the purposes set forth in section 301
of this act.
(7) No tax may be collected under this section before January 1,
1996. Before collecting the taxes under this section or issuing bonds
for a baseball stadium, the county shall create a public facilities
district under chapter 36.100 RCW to acquire, construct, own, remodel,
maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate a baseball stadium.
(((6))) (8) The county shall assemble such real property as the
district determines to be necessary as a site for the baseball stadium.
Property which is necessary for this purpose that is owned by the
county on October 17, 1995, shall be contributed to the district, and
property which is necessary for this purpose that is acquired by the
county on or after October 17, 1995, shall be conveyed to the district.
(((7))) (9) The proceeds of any bonds issued for ((the)) a baseball
stadium shall be provided to the public facilities district that owns
the baseball stadium.
(((8))) (10) As used in this section, "baseball stadium" means
"baseball stadium" as defined in RCW 82.14.0485.
(((9))) (11) The taxes imposed under this section shall expire
((when)) on the later of the following dates:
(a) The earlier of the date on which the bonds issued for the
construction of the baseball stadium are retired, but not later than
twenty years after the taxes are first collected; or
(b) If bonds are issued pursuant to section 302 of this act,
December 31, 2015.

Sec. 204 RCW 67.28.180 and 2002 c 178 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions set forth in subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, the legislative body of any county or any city, is
authorized to levy and collect a special excise tax of not to exceed
two percent on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging
that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW.
(2) Any levy authorized by this section shall be subject to the
following:
(a) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this
section shall contain, in addition to all other provisions required to
conform to this chapter, a provision allowing a credit against the
county tax for the full amount of any city tax imposed pursuant to this
section upon the same taxable event.
(b) In the event that any county has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, either pledged the tax
revenues for payment of principal and interest on city revenue or
general obligation bonds authorized and issued pursuant to RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and issued revenue or
general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150
through 67.28.160, such county shall be exempt from the provisions of
(a) of this subsection, to the extent that the tax revenues are pledged
for payment of principal and interest on bonds issued at any time
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160:
PROVIDED, That so much of such pledged tax revenues, together with any
investment earnings thereon, not immediately necessary for actual
payment of principal and interest on such bonds may be used: (i) In
any county with a population of one million or more, for repayment
either of limited tax levy general obligation bonds or of any county
fund or account from which a loan was made, the proceeds from the bonds
or loan being used to pay for constructing, installing, improving, and
equipping stadium capital improvement projects, and to pay for any
engineering, planning, financial, legal and professional services
incident to the development of such stadium capital improvement
projects, regardless of the date the debt for such capital improvement
projects was or may be incurred; (ii) in any county with a population
of one million or more, for repayment or refinancing of bonded
indebtedness incurred prior to January 1, 1997, for any purpose
authorized by this section or relating to stadium repairs or
rehabilitation, including but not limited to the cost of settling legal
claims, reimbursing operating funds, interest payments on short-term
loans, and any other purpose for which such debt has been incurred if
the county has created a public stadium authority to develop a stadium
and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.030; or (iii) in other counties,
for county-owned facilities for agricultural promotion. A county is
exempt under this subsection in respect to city revenue or general
obligation bonds issued after April 1, 1991, only if such bonds mature
before January 1, 2013.
As used in this subsection (2)(b), "capital improvement projects"
may include, but not be limited to a stadium restaurant facility,
restroom facilities, artificial turf system, seating facilities,
parking facilities and scoreboard and information system adjacent to or
within a county owned stadium, together with equipment, utilities,
accessories and appurtenances necessary thereto. The stadium
restaurant authorized by this subsection (2)(b) shall be operated by a
private concessionaire under a contract with the county.
(c)(i) No city within a county exempt under subsection (2)(b) of
this section may levy the tax authorized by this section so long as
said county is so exempt.
(ii) If bonds have been issued under RCW 43.99N.020 and any
necessary property transfers have been made under RCW 36.102.100, no
city within a county with a population of one million or more may levy
the tax authorized by this section before January 1, 2021. If any
bonds described in section 302 of this act have been issued, no city
within a county with a population of one million or more may levy the
tax authorized by this section.
(iii) However, in the event that any city in a county described in
(i) or (ii) of this subsection (2)(c) has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, authorized and issued
revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160, such city may levy the tax so long as the
tax revenues are pledged for payment of principal and interest on bonds
issued at any time pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through
67.28.160.
(3) Any levy authorized by this section by a county that has levied
the tax authorized by this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975,
either pledged the tax revenues for payment of principal and interest
on city revenue or general obligation bonds authorized and issued
pursuant to RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and
issued revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions
of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 shall be subject to the following:
(a) Taxes collected under this section in any calendar year before
2013 in excess of five million three hundred thousand dollars shall
only be used as follows:
(i) Seventy-five percent from January 1, 1992, through December 31,
2000, and seventy percent from January 1, 2001, through December 31,
2012, for art museums, cultural museums, heritage museums, heritage and
preservation programs, the arts, and the performing arts. Moneys spent
under this subsection (3)(a)(i) shall be used for the purposes of this
subsection (3)(a)(i) in all parts of the county.
(ii) Twenty-five percent from January 1, 1992, through December 31,
2000, and thirty percent from January 1, 2001, through December 31,
2012, for the following purposes and in a manner reflecting the
following order of priority: Stadium purposes as authorized under
subsection (2)(b) of this section; acquisition of open space lands;
youth sports activities; and tourism promotion. If all or part of the
debt on the stadium is refinanced, all revenues under this subsection
(3)(a)(ii) shall be used to retire the debt.
(b) From January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2015, in a county
with a population of one million or more, all revenues under this
section shall be used to retire the debt on the stadium, or deposited
in the stadium and exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060 after
the debt on the stadium is retired.
(c) From January 1, 2016, through December 31, 2020, in a county
with a population of one million or more, all revenues under this
section shall be deposited in the stadium and exhibition center account
under RCW 43.99N.060.
(d) From January 1, 2021, until all bonds described in section 302
of this act are retired, all revenues collected under this section by
a county shall be used for the following purposes:
(i) Fifty percent of the revenues shall be used for the purposes
set forth in section 301 of this act; and
(ii) Fifty percent of the revenues shall be used by the county to
fund cultural activities and facilities in all parts of the county.
(e) At least seventy percent of moneys spent under (a)(i) of this
subsection for the period January 1, 1992, through December 31, 2000,
shall be used only for the purchase, design, construction, and
remodeling of performing arts, visual arts, heritage, and cultural
facilities, and for the purchase of fixed assets that will benefit art,
heritage, and cultural organizations. For purposes of this subsection,
fixed assets are tangible objects such as machinery and other equipment
intended to be held or used for ten years or more. Moneys received
under this subsection (3)(((d))) (e) may be used for payment of
principal and interest on bonds issued for capital projects.
Qualifying organizations receiving moneys under this subsection
(3)(((d))) (e) must be financially stable and have at least the
following:
(i) A legally constituted and working board of directors;
(ii) A record of artistic, heritage, or cultural accomplishments;
(iii) Been in existence and operating for at least two years;
(iv) Demonstrated ability to maintain net current liabilities at
less than thirty percent of general operating expenses;
(v) Demonstrated ability to sustain operational capacity subsequent
to completion of projects or purchase of machinery and equipment; and
(vi) Evidence that there has been independent financial review of
the organization.
(((e))) (f) At least forty percent of the revenues distributed
pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection for the period January 1, 2001,
through December 31, 2012, shall be deposited in an account and shall
be used to establish an endowment. ((Principal in the account shall
remain permanent and irreducible)) On the effective date of this
section, the endowment account shall be converted to a reserve account.
The principal of the account and earnings from investments of balances
in the account may only be used for the purposes of (a)(i) of this
subsection.
(((f))) (g) School districts and schools shall not receive revenues
distributed pursuant to (a)(i) or (d) of this subsection.
(((g))) (h) Moneys distributed to art museums, cultural museums,
heritage museums, heritage and preservation programs, the arts, and the
performing arts, and moneys distributed for tourism promotion shall be
in addition to and may not be used to replace or supplant any other
funding by the legislative body of the county.
(((h))) (i) As used in this section, "tourism promotion" includes
activities intended to attract visitors for overnight stays, arts,
heritage, and cultural events, and recreational, professional, and
amateur sports events. Moneys allocated to tourism promotion in a
class AA county shall be allocated to nonprofit organizations formed
for the express purpose of tourism promotion in the county. Such
organizations shall use moneys from the taxes to promote events in all
parts of the class AA county.
(((i))) (j) No taxes collected under this section may be used for
the operation or maintenance of a public stadium that is financed
directly or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged.
Expenditures for operation or maintenance include all expenditures
other than expenditures that directly result in new fixed assets or
that directly increase the capacity, life span, or operating economy of
existing fixed assets.
(((j))) (k) No ad valorem property taxes may be used for debt
service on bonds issued for a public stadium that is financed by bonds
to which the tax is pledged, unless the taxes collected under this
section are or are projected to be insufficient to meet debt service
requirements on such bonds.
(((k))) (l) If a substantial part of the operation and management
of a public stadium that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds to
which the tax is pledged is performed by a nonpublic entity or if a
public stadium is sold that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds
to which the tax is pledged, any bonds to which the tax is pledged
shall be retired. This subsection (3)(((k))) (l) does not apply in
respect to a public stadium under chapter 36.102 RCW transferred to,
owned by, or constructed by a public facilities district under chapter
36.100 RCW ((or)), a stadium and exhibition center, or a regional
center as defined in RCW 35.57.020 which is acquired, developed,
constructed, owned, leased, or operated by a public facilities district
pursuant to RCW 36.100.030.
(((l))) (m) The county shall not lease a public stadium that is
financed directly or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged
to, or authorize the use of the public stadium by, a professional major
league sports franchise unless the sports franchise gives the right of
first refusal to purchase the sports franchise, upon its sale, to local
government. This subsection (3)(((l))) (m) does not apply to contracts
in existence on April 1, 1986, or to the lease or use of a regional
center as defined in RCW 35.57.020 which is acquired, developed,
constructed, owned, leased, or operated by a public facilities district
pursuant to RCW 36.100.030.
If a court of competent jurisdiction declares any provision of this
subsection (3) invalid, then that invalid provision shall be null and
void and the remainder of this section is not affected.

Sec. 205 RCW 82.14.049 and 1997 c 220 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislative authority of any county may impose a sales and use
tax, in addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030, upon retail
car rentals within the county that are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax shall be one percent of
the selling price in the case of a sales tax or rental value of the
vehicle in the case of a use tax. Proceeds of the tax ((shall not be
used to subsidize any professional sports team and)) shall be used
solely for the following purposes:
(1) Acquiring, constructing, maintaining, or operating public
sports stadium facilities or regional centers, as defined in RCW
35.57.020;
(2) Engineering, planning, financial, legal, or professional
services incidental to public sports stadium facilities or regional
centers, as defined in RCW 35.57.020;
(3) Youth or amateur sport activities or facilities; ((or))
(4) Debt or refinancing debt issued for the purposes of subsection
(1) of this section; or
(5) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more that has created a public facilities district to
develop a regional center as defined in RCW 35.57.020 and has imposed
a tax pursuant to this section may extend such tax, such that,
following retirement of bonded indebtedness incurred prior to January
1, 1997, or refinancing of such bonded indebtedness, for any purpose
authorized by RCW 67.28.180 or relating to stadium repairs or
rehabilitation, including but not limited to the cost of settling legal
claims, reimbursing operating funds, interest payments on short-term
loans, and any other purpose for which such debt has been incurred,
proceeds of the tax shall be used for the purposes set forth in section
301 of this act.
At least seventy-five percent of the tax imposed under this section
shall be used for the purposes of subsections (1), (2), ((and)) (4),
and (5) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
Site acquisition, development, designing, constructing, furnishing,
and equipping of a regional center as defined in RCW 35.57.020 which is
acquired, developed, constructed, owned, leased, or operated by a
public facilities district pursuant to RCW 36.100.030 is exempt from
state and local excise, sales, and use taxes otherwise due, including
under chapters 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 82.45 RCW.

Sec. 207 RCW 82.29A.130 and 2005 c 514 s 601 and 2005 c 170 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following leasehold interests shall be exempt from taxes
imposed pursuant to RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040:
(1) All leasehold interests constituting a part of the operating
properties of any public utility which is assessed and taxed as a
public utility pursuant to chapter 84.12 RCW.
(2) All leasehold interests in facilities owned or used by a
school, college or university which leasehold provides housing for
students and which is otherwise exempt from taxation under provisions
of RCW 84.36.010 and 84.36.050.
(3) All leasehold interests of subsidized housing where the fee
ownership of such property is vested in the government of the United
States, or the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof
but only if income qualification exists for such housing.
(4) All leasehold interests used for fair purposes of a nonprofit
fair association that sponsors or conducts a fair or fairs which
receive support from revenues collected pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and
allocated by the director of the department of agriculture where the
fee ownership of such property is vested in the government of the
United States, the state of Washington or any of its political
subdivisions: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall not apply to the
leasehold interest of any sublessee of such nonprofit fair association
if such leasehold interest would be taxable if it were the primary
lease.
(5) All leasehold interests in any property of any public entity
used as a residence by an employee of that public entity who is
required as a condition of employment to live in the publicly owned
property.
(6) All leasehold interests held by enrolled Indians of lands owned
or held by any Indian or Indian tribe where the fee ownership of such
property is vested in or held in trust by the United States and which
are not subleased to other than to a lessee which would qualify
pursuant to this chapter, RCW 84.36.451 and 84.40.175.
(7) All leasehold interests in any real property of any Indian or
Indian tribe, band, or community that is held in trust by the United
States or is subject to a restriction against alienation imposed by the
United States: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall apply only where it
is determined that contract rent paid is greater than or equal to
ninety percent of fair market rental, to be determined by the
department of revenue using the same criteria used to establish taxable
rent in RCW 82.29A.020(2)(b).
(8) All leasehold interests for which annual taxable rent is less
than two hundred fifty dollars per year. For purposes of this
subsection leasehold interests held by the same lessee in contiguous
properties owned by the same lessor shall be deemed a single leasehold
interest.
(9) All leasehold interests which give use or possession of the
leased property for a continuous period of less than thirty days:
PROVIDED, That for purposes of this subsection, successive leases or
lease renewals giving substantially continuous use of possession of the
same property to the same lessee shall be deemed a single leasehold
interest: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no leasehold interest shall be deemed
to give use or possession for a period of less than thirty days solely
by virtue of the reservation by the public lessor of the right to use
the property or to allow third parties to use the property on an
occasional, temporary basis.
(10) All leasehold interests under month-to-month leases in
residential units rented for residential purposes of the lessee pending
destruction or removal for the purpose of constructing a public highway
or building.
(11) All leasehold interests in any publicly owned real or personal
property to the extent such leasehold interests arises solely by virtue
of a contract for public improvements or work executed under the public
works statutes of this state or of the United States between the public
owner of the property and a contractor.
(12) All leasehold interests that give use or possession of state
adult correctional facilities for the purposes of operating
correctional industries under RCW 72.09.100.
(13) All leasehold interests used to provide organized and
supervised recreational activities for ((disabled)) persons with
disabilities of all ages in a camp facility and for public recreational
purposes by a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation that
would be exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.030(1) if it owned
the property. If the publicly owned property is used for any taxable
purpose, the leasehold excise taxes set forth in RCW 82.29A.030 and
82.29A.040 shall be imposed and shall be apportioned accordingly.
(14) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a baseball stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or
canopy that is in a county with a population of over one million, that
has a seating capacity of over forty thousand, and that is constructed
on or after January 1, 1995. "Public or entertainment areas" include
ticket sales areas, ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking
areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality and stadium club
areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other public or
entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas,
control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas,
museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage
areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites,
the playing field, and any other areas to which the public has access
or which are used for the production of the entertainment event or
other public usage, and any other personal property used for these
purposes. "Public or entertainment areas" does not include locker
rooms or private offices exclusively used by the lessee.
(15) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a stadium and exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, that
is constructed on or after January 1, 1998. For the purposes of this
subsection, "public or entertainment areas" has the same meaning as in
subsection (14) of this section, and includes exhibition areas.
(16) All leasehold interests in public facilities districts, as
provided in chapter 36.100 or 35.57 RCW.
(17) All leasehold interests in property that is: (a) Owned by a
municipal corporation; (b) listed on any federal or state register of
historical sites; and (c) wholly contained within a designated national
historic reserve under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 461.
(18) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of an amphitheater if a private entity is responsible for one hundred
percent of the cost of constructing the amphitheater which is not
reimbursed by the public owner, both the public owner and the private
lessee sponsor events at the facility on a regular basis, the lessee is
responsible under the lease or agreement to operate and maintain the
facility, and the amphitheater has a seating capacity of over seventeen
thousand reserved and general admission seats and is in a county with
a population of over three hundred fifty thousand, but less than four
hundred twenty-five thousand. For the purposes of this subsection,
"public or entertainment areas" include box offices or other ticket
sales areas, entrance gates, ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses,
parking areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality areas,
kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other public or
entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas,
control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas,
museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage
areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas including
lawn seating areas and suites, stages, and any other areas to which the
public has access or which are used for the production of the
entertainment event or other public usage, and any other personal
property used for these purposes. "Public or entertainment areas" does
not include office areas used predominately by the lessee.
(19) All leasehold interests in a regional center as defined in RCW
35.57.020 which is acquired, developed, constructed, owned, leased, or
operated by a public facilities district pursuant to RCW 36.100.030,
that is completed on or after January 1, 2008.

PART III
USE OF FUNDS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 35.57
RCW to read as follows:
"Regional center tax revenues" means the revenue sources identified
in RCW 82.14.0485, 82.14.0494, 82.14.360, 67.28.180, and 82.14.049.
Regional center tax revenues shall only be used for the following
purposes in the following order of priority:
(1) To fund arts and cultural activities and facilities in all
parts of the county out of regional center tax revenues collected for
the calendar years between January 1, 2013, and December 31, 2020, in
an annual amount as determined by the county in which the revenue
sources are collected;
(2) To fund the following costs associated with public facilities
within the county:
(a) The costs of modernization, improvements, renovations, or
replacement of major public sports gathering and public facilities
located within the county;
(b) The costs of issuance, and scheduled principal and interest, of
any bonds issued the proceeds of which are used to pay the costs
described in subsection (1) of this section, or any other bonds used to
refinance such bonds; and
(c) The costs of operation of any public authority which owns and
operates such facilities.
(3) The excess of such regional center tax revenues after
application of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, shall be paid
to and held by the treasurer of the county in which the revenue sources
are collected, to be held in a segregated fund created by such county
to be called the "regional center account." Upon satisfaction of any
conditions precedent to the site acquisition, development, design,
construction, furnishing, or equipping of a regional center as defined
in RCW 35.57.020 that are imposed by the legislative authority of the
county, which creates a public facilities district to develop such a
regional center, regional center tax revenues collected in any calendar
year after application of subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
together with all funds then held in the regional center account, shall
be transferred to the public facilities district or retained by the
county, and used in accordance with section 302 of this act to pay for
the costs and expenses described in subsection (4) of this section;
(4) Funding from all sources may be used to pay for any and all of
the following costs and expenses:
(a) The costs of formation and operation of the public facilities
district until such costs can be paid by rent or other income from a
regional center or other sources;
(b) Direct and indirect costs and expenses of site acquisition,
development, design, construction, furnishing, and equipping of a
regional center;
(c) The costs of issuance and maintenance of the bonds described in
section 302 of this act, including any capitalized interest, and
scheduled principal and interest payments, and the costs of any other
bonds used to refinance such bonds described in section 302 of this
act;
(d) The cost of repayment of any debt incurred by a county, city,
or public facilities district to finance any costs and expenses
described in (a) through (c) of this subsection;
(e) The cost of reimbursement of a county, city, or public
facilities district for its expenditures to pay any costs and expenses
in (a) through (c) of this subsection; and
(f) The costs of satisfying any contractual obligations of a
county, city, or public facilities district to pay any costs and
expenses in (a) through (c) of this subsection; and
(5) The excess of such regional center tax revenues after
application of subsections (1) and (3) of this section, and after
application of section 303 of this act, in any year shall be used for
the early retirement of the bonds described in section 302 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 35.57
RCW to read as follows:
A county with a population of one million or more that has created
a public facilities district to develop a regional center as defined in
RCW 35.57.020, a city in which such a regional center is or is proposed
to be located, or a public facilities district that is created by the
county to develop such a regional center, are each authorized to issue
general obligation bonds or revenue bonds, for a term of up to twenty-five years, for the purposes described in section 301(4) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 35.57
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds by the county
authorized in section 302 of this act shall be paid to and held by the
treasurer of the county in the regional center account described in
section 301(3) of this act. Only the treasurer of the county or the
treasurer's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. At
the direction of the treasurer of the county or the treasurer's
designee, funds from the regional center account shall be transferred
to the public facilities district created in RCW 36.100.010 as required
by the public facilities district.
(2) After bonds are issued by the county under section 302 of this
act, all moneys in the regional center account shall be used
exclusively for the following purposes in the following priority:
(a) On or before June 30th of each year, the treasurer of the
county shall accumulate in the regional center account an amount at
least equal to the amount required in the next succeeding twelve months
for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds issued by the
county under section 302 of this act;
(b) An additional reserve amount not in excess of the expected
average annual principal and interest requirements of bonds issued by
the county under section 302 of this act shall be accumulated and
maintained in the account, subject to withdrawal by the county
treasurer at any time if necessary to meet the requirements of (a) of
this subsection, and, following any withdrawal, reaccumulated from the
first tax revenues and other amounts deposited in the account after
meeting the requirements of (a) of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A new section is added to chapter 35.57
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The "major facilities account" shall be a dedicated fund
created by a county with a population of one million or more that has
created one or more public facilities districts or public stadium
authorities for the purpose of funding:
(a) The costs of modernization, improvements, renovations, or
replacement of major public sports gathering and public facilities
located within the county;
(b) The costs of issuance, and scheduled principal and interest, of
any bonds issued the proceeds of which are used to pay the costs
described in subsection (1) of this section, or any other bonds used to
refinance such bonds; and
(c) The costs of operation of any public authority which owns and
operates such facilities.
(2) The application, allocation, and use of any funds in the major
facilities account shall be in the discretion of the county.

PART IV
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 The provisions of this act shall be
liberally construed to effect the policies and purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---