BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.680 and 2002 c 175 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Alternatives to total confinement are available for offenders with
sentences of one year or less. These alternatives include the
following sentence conditions that the court may order as substitutes
for total confinement:
(1) One day of partial confinement may be substituted for one day
of total confinement;
(2) In addition, for offenders convicted of nonviolent offenses
only, eight hours of community restitution may be substituted for one
day of total confinement, with a maximum conversion limit of two
hundred forty hours or thirty days. Community restitution hours must
be completed within the period of community supervision or a time
period specified by the court, which shall not exceed twenty-four
months, pursuant to a schedule determined by the department; and
(3) For offenders convicted of nonviolent and nonsex offenses, the
court may credit time served by the offender before the sentencing in
an available county supervised community option and may authorize
county jails to convert jail confinement to an available county
supervised community option, may authorize the time spent in the
community option to be reduced by earned release credit consistent with
local correctional facility standards, and may require the offender to
perform affirmative conduct pursuant to RCW 9.94A.607.
For sentences of nonviolent offenders for one year or less, the
court shall consider and give priority to available alternatives to
total confinement and shall state its reasons in writing on the
judgment and sentence form if the alternatives are not used.

--- END ---