BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.280 and 1999 c 167 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to carry onto, or to possess on,
public or private elementary or secondary school premises, school-provided transportation, or areas of facilities while being used
exclusively by public or private schools:
(a) Any firearm;
(b) Any ((other dangerous weapon as defined in RCW 9.41.250)) live
ammunition, an ammunition magazine, or a device for suppressing the
noise of any firearm;
(c) Any device commonly known as "nun-chu-ka sticks", consisting of
two or more lengths of wood, metal, plastic, or similar substance
connected with wire, rope, or other means;
(d) Any device, commonly known as "throwing stars", which are
multi-pointed, metal objects designed to embed upon impact from any
aspect; ((or))
(e) Any air gun, including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to
propel a BB, pellet, or other projectile by the discharge of compressed
air, carbon dioxide, or other gas;
(f) A blackjack, slung shot, sand club, billy club, or metal
knuckles;
(g) Any stun gun or other object, instrument, or device which, when
applied to a person or animal, is designed to administer an
incapacitating electric shock, charge, or impulse, including but not
limited to, a projectile stun gun, which projects wired probes attached
to the device that emit an electrical charge;
(h) Any explosive or any weapon containing poisonous or injurious
gases; or
(i) Any dirk, dagger, spring blade knife, knife having a blade
longer than three inches, razor with an unguarded blade, knife having
a blade which is automatically released by a spring mechanism or other
mechanical device, or knife having a blade which opens, or falls, or is
ejected into position by the force of gravity, or by an outward,
downward, or centrifugal thrust or movement.
(2) It is unlawful for a person on public or private elementary or
secondary school premises, school-provided transportation, or areas of
facilities while being used exclusively by public or private schools,
to possess and use, attempt to use, threaten to use, or intend to use,
any object, implement, or instrument that has the capacity to inflict
death or substantial bodily harm when the use, attempt, threat, or
intent is of a nature likely to inflict such death or harm. Objects,
implements, and instruments subject to this subsection include but are
not limited to:
(a) Any knife not described in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) A leather punch, ice pick, or screwdriver;
(c) Any metal baton, pipe, bar, or other tool; or
(d) Any item not described in subsection (1) of this section
containing poisonous or injurious gas, liquid, or other substance.
(3) A multistakeholder advisory committee to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction that addresses elements of school
safety is encouraged to develop a model policy and guidance for school
building administrators, school staff, school security personnel, and
members of threat assessment committees regarding procedures that
should be followed to document evidence of a person's use, attempt to
use, threat to use, or intent to use a dangerous weapon on school
grounds.
(((2))) (4) Any ((such)) person violating subsection (1) or (2) of
this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor, except as provided in
(a) of this subsection.
(a) Any person violating subsection (1)(a) of this section is
guilty of a class C felony, except that a student who was otherwise
legally in possession of an unloaded firearm secured within a locked
vehicle, and who possessed the firearm with no intent to use it or
threaten to use it, or intent to cause or threaten to cause alarm with
it, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(b) In addition, if any person is convicted of a violation of
subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person shall have his or her
concealed pistol license, if any, revoked for a period of three years.
Anyone convicted under this subsection is prohibited from applying for
a concealed pistol license for a period of three years. The court
shall send notice of the revocation to the department of licensing, and
the city, town, or county which issued the license.
(c) Any violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section by
elementary or secondary school students constitutes grounds for
expulsion from the state's public schools in accordance with RCW
28A.600.420. Any other violation by elementary or secondary school
students may constitute grounds for expulsion from the state's public
schools in accordance with RCW 28A.600.010. Within one business day of
any allegation or indication of a violation, an appropriate school
authority shall promptly notify law enforcement and the student's
parent or guardian regarding ((any)) the allegation or indication of
such violation. Law enforcement shall forward this notification to the
prosecuting attorney.
(d) Upon the arrest of a person ((at least twelve years of age
and)) not more than twenty-one years of age for violating subsection
(1)(a) of this section, the person shall be detained or confined in a
juvenile or adult facility for up to seventy-two hours. If the person
is under the age of twelve, the person may only be detained under home
detention or electronic monitoring. The person shall not be released
within the seventy-two hours until after the person has been examined
and evaluated by the ((county-))designated mental health professional
unless the court in its discretion releases the person ((sooner after
a determination regarding probable cause or on probation bond or bail))
to the custody of a parent or guardian.
Within twenty-four hours of the arrest, the arresting law
enforcement agency shall refer the person to the ((county-))designated
mental health professional for examination and evaluation under chapter
71.05 or 71.34 RCW and inform a parent or guardian of the person of the
arrest, detention, and examination. The ((county-))designated mental
health professional shall examine and evaluate the person subject to
the provisions of chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW. The examination shall
occur at the facility in which the person is detained or confined. If
((the)) a person under twelve years of age has been released ((on
probation, bond, or bail)) prior to the required examination, the
examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.
The ((county-))designated mental health professional may determine
whether to refer the person to the ((county-))designated chemical
dependency specialist for examination and evaluation in accordance with
chapter 70.96A RCW. The ((county-))designated chemical dependency
specialist shall examine the person subject to the provisions of
chapter 70.96A RCW. The examination shall occur at the facility in
which the person is detained or confined. If ((the)) a person under
twelve years of age has been released ((on probation, bond, or bail))
prior to the required examination, the examination shall occur wherever
is appropriate.
Upon completion of any examination by the ((county-))designated
mental health professional or the ((county-))designated chemical
dependency specialist, the results of the examination shall be sent to
the court, and the court shall consider those results in making any
determination about the person.
The ((county-))designated mental health professional and
((county-))designated chemical dependency specialist shall, to the
extent permitted by law, notify a parent or guardian of the person that
an examination and evaluation has taken place and the results of the
examination. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the delivery of
additional, appropriate mental health examinations to the person while
the person is detained or confined.
If the ((county-))designated mental health professional determines
it is appropriate, the ((county-))designated mental health professional
may refer the person to the local regional support network for follow-up services or the department of social and health services or other
community providers for other services to the family and individual.
If the person examined is determined by the designated mental health
professional to be ineligible for detention or services relative to the
provisions of chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW, the person should be referred
to a multidisciplinary threat or risk assessment committee, where
available, for determination of the person's risk for continued
violence and the development of a safety plan for the person and any
known targets or victims. The threat or risk assessment committee is
typically comprised of representatives from school districts, local law
enforcement, local juvenile justice agencies, mental health, risk
management organizations, local family services organizations, and
school safety or security professionals.
(((3))) (5) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Any student or employee of a private military academy when on
the property of the academy;
(b) Any person engaged in military, law enforcement, or school
district security activities;
(c) Any person who is involved in a convention, showing,
demonstration, lecture, or firearms safety course authorized by school
authorities in which the firearms of collectors or instructors are
handled or displayed;
(d) Any person while the person is participating in a firearms or
air gun competition approved by the school or school district;
(e) Any person in possession of a pistol who has been issued a
license under RCW 9.41.070, or is exempt from the licensing requirement
by RCW 9.41.060, while picking up or dropping off a student;
(f) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age legally in
possession of a firearm or ((dangerous)) other weapon specified in
subsection (1) of this section that is secured within an attended
vehicle or concealed from view within a locked unattended vehicle while
conducting legitimate business at the school;
(g) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age who is in lawful
possession of an unloaded firearm, secured in a vehicle while
conducting legitimate business at the school; ((or))
(h) Any law enforcement officer of the federal, state, or local
government agency; or
(i) Any person legally in possession of a weapon specified in
subsection (1) of this section for an activity or class authorized to
be conducted on the school premises, school-provided transportation, or
areas of facilities while being used exclusively by the school, where
the weapon has been brought to the school premises with express prior
permission to be used in the approved activity or class, or has been
provided specifically for the activity or class.
(((4))) (6) Subsections (1)(c) and (d) of this section do not apply
to any person who possesses nun-chu-ka sticks, throwing stars, or other
dangerous weapons to be used in martial arts classes authorized to be
conducted on the school premises.
(((5))) (7) Except as provided in subsection (((3))) (5)(b), (c),
(((f),)) and (h) of this section, firearms are not permitted in a
public or private school building.
(((6))) (8) "GUN-FREE ZONE" signs shall be posted around school
facilities giving warning of the prohibition of the possession of
firearms on school grounds.

--- END ---