BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
By August 1st, November 1st, February 1st, and May 1st of every
year, the department of transportation shall notify the state treasurer
in writing of the amount of state sales and use tax paid under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW by the Washington state ferries on the purchase of
fuel for the preceding calendar quarter. By September 1st, December
1st, March 1st, and June 1st of every year, the state treasurer shall
transfer an amount equal to the amount indicated by the department in
their notification to the treasurer into the passenger ferry account
created in RCW 47.60.645.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The indication of the amount of fuel taxes
paid by the Washington state ferries in section 1 of this act applies
to all calendar quarters beginning on or after April 1, 2007.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.57A.220 and 2006 c 332 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A public transportation benefit area seeking grant funding as
described in RCW 47.01.350 for a passenger-only ferry route between
Kingston and Seattle shall first receive approval from the governor
after submitting a complete business plan to the governor and the
legislature by November 1, ((2006)) 2007. The business plan must, at
a minimum, include hours of operation, vessel needs, labor needs,
proposed routes, passenger terminal facilities, passenger rates,
anticipated federal and local funding, coordination with the Washington
state ferry system, coordination with existing transit providers, long-term operation and maintenance needs, and a long-term financial plan.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.01.350 and 2006 c 332 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of transportation shall establish a ferry grant
program subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose. The purpose of the grant program is to provide
operating or capital grants for ferry systems as provided in chapters
36.54 and 36.57A RCW to operate passenger-only ferry service.
(2) In providing grants under this section, the department may
enter into multiple year contracts with the stipulation that future
year allocations are subject to the availability of funding as provided
by legislative appropriation.
(((3) Priority shall be given to grant applications that provide
continuity of existing passenger-only service and the provision of
local or federal matching funds.))

Sec. 5 RCW 47.60.662 and 2006 c 332 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state ferry system shall collaborate with new and
potential passenger-only ferry service providers, as described in ((RCW
36.54.110(5))) chapters 36.54 and 36.57A RCW, for terminal operations
at its existing terminal facilities.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.08.0255 and 2005 c 443 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
motor vehicle and special fuel if:
(a) The fuel is purchased for the purpose of public transportation
and the purchaser is entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW
82.36.275 or 82.38.080(3); or
(b) The fuel is purchased by a private, nonprofit transportation
provider certified under chapter 81.66 RCW and the purchaser is
entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW 82.36.285 or
82.38.080(1)(h); or
(c) The fuel is purchased by a public transportation benefit area
created under chapter 36.57A RCW or a county-owned ferry or county
ferry district created under chapter 36.54 RCW for use in passenger-only ferry vessels; or
(d) The fuel is taxable under chapter 82.36 or 82.38 RCW.
(2) Any person who has paid the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 on the
sale of special fuel delivered in this state shall be entitled to a
credit or refund of such tax with respect to fuel subsequently
established to have been actually transported and used outside this
state by persons engaged in interstate commerce. The tax shall be
claimed as a credit or refunded through the tax reports required under
RCW 82.38.150.

Sec. 7 2006 c 332 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
By October 31, 2006, the department of transportation shall have an
independent appraisal of the market value of the Washington state
ferries Snohomish and Chinook and present it to the transportation
committees of the legislature and the governor by November 1, 2006.
The department of transportation shall sell or otherwise dispose of the
Washington state ferries Snohomish and Chinook for market value and
deposit the proceeds of the sales into the passenger ferry account
created in RCW 47.60.645 ((as soon as practicable upon approval by the
governor of the business plan described in RCW 36.54.110(5))) by June
30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---