BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall provide an opportunity for owners of
vehicles registered under RCW 46.16.0621 and vehicles licensed under
RCW 46.16.070 with a declared gross weight of ten thousand pounds or
less, to make a voluntary donation of five dollars at the time of
initial or renewal registration. The donation must be deposited in the
state parks renewal and stewardship account established in RCW
79A.05.215 to be used for the operation and maintenance of state parks.
(2) This section applies to registrations due or to become due on
or after January 1, 2008.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.215 and 1995 c 211 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state parks renewal and stewardship account is created in the
state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all
receipts from user fees, concessions, leases, donations collected under
section 1 of this act, and other state park-based activities shall be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
for operating state parks, developing and renovating park facilities,
undertaking deferred maintenance, enhancing park stewardship, and other
state park purposes. Expenditures from the account may be made only
after appropriation by the legislature.

--- END ---