BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.20.050 and 2006 c 13 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
January 4, 2004:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual shall not be considered to have left work
voluntarily without good cause when:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was because of the illness or disability of the
claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a member of the
claimant's immediate family if the claimant took all reasonable
precautions, in accordance with any regulations that the commissioner
may prescribe, to protect his or her employment status by having
promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence and by
having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment: PROVIDED, That these precautions need not have been taken
when they would have been a futile act, including those instances when
the futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system;
(iii) He or she has left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that is due to an employer-initiated mandatory transfer that
is outside the existing labor market area if the claimant remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move; or
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110.
(c) In determining under this subsection whether an individual has
left work voluntarily without good cause, the commissioner shall only
consider work-connected factors such as the degree of risk involved to
the individual's health, safety, and morals, the individual's physical
fitness for the work, the individual's ability to perform the work, and
such other work connected factors as the commissioner may deem
pertinent, including state and national emergencies. Good cause shall
not be established for voluntarily leaving work because of its distance
from an individual's residence where the distance was known to the
individual at the time he or she accepted the employment and where, in
the judgment of the department, the distance is customarily traveled by
workers in the individual's job classification and labor market, nor
because of any other significant work factor which was generally known
and present at the time he or she accepted employment, unless the
related circumstances have so changed as to amount to a substantial
involuntary deterioration of the work factor or unless the commissioner
determines that other related circumstances would work an unreasonable
hardship on the individual were he or she required to continue in the
employment.
(d) Subsection (1)(a) and (c) of this section shall not apply to an
individual whose marital status or domestic responsibilities cause him
or her to leave employment. Such an individual shall not be eligible
for unemployment insurance benefits beginning with the first day of the
calendar week in which he or she left work and thereafter for seven
calendar weeks and until he or she has requalified, either by obtaining
bona fide work in employment covered by this title and earning wages in
that employment equal to seven times his or her weekly benefit amount
or by reporting in person to the department during ten different
calendar weeks and certifying on each occasion that he or she is ready,
able, and willing to immediately accept any suitable work which may be
offered, is actively seeking work pursuant to customary trade
practices, and is utilizing such employment counseling and placement
services as are available through the department. This subsection does
not apply to individuals covered by (b)(ii) or (iii) of this
subsection.
(2) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual is not disqualified from benefits under (a) of
this subsection when:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was necessary because of the illness or
disability of the claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a
member of the claimant's immediate family if:
(A) The claimant pursued all reasonable alternatives to preserve
his or her employment status by requesting a leave of absence, by
having promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence,
and by having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment. These alternatives need not be pursued, however, when they
would have been a futile act, including those instances when the
futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system; and
(B) The claimant terminated his or her employment status, and is
not entitled to be reinstated to the same position or a comparable or
similar position;
(iii)(A) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
July 2, 2006, he or she: (I) Left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that, due to a mandatory military transfer: (1) Is outside
the existing labor market area; and (2) is in Washington or another
state that, pursuant to statute, does not consider such an individual
to have left work voluntarily without good cause; and (II) remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move;
(B) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
July 2, 2006, he or she: (I) Left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that, due to a mandatory military transfer, is outside the
existing labor market area; and (II) remained employed as long as was
reasonable prior to the move;
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;
(v) The individual's usual compensation was reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vi) The individual's usual hours were reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vii) The individual's worksite changed, such change caused a
material increase in distance or difficulty of travel, and, after the
change, the commute was greater than is customary for workers in the
individual's job classification and labor market;
(viii) The individual's worksite safety deteriorated, the
individual reported such safety deterioration to the employer, and the
employer failed to correct the hazards within a reasonable period of
time;
(ix) The individual left work because of illegal activities in the
individual's worksite, the individual reported such activities to the
employer, and the employer failed to end such activities within a
reasonable period of time; ((or))
(x) The individual's usual work was changed to work that violates
the individual's religious convictions or sincere moral beliefs; or
(xi) The individual left work because:
(A) The employer was not in compliance with chapter 49.46 RCW. If
the employer is not subject to chapter 49.46 RCW, the employer was
paying less than the state minimum wage; or
(B) The employer allowed smoking in the workplace in which the
employee worked.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.29.021 and 2006 c 13 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to benefits charged to the experience
rating accounts of employers for claims that have an effective date on
or after January 4, 2004.
(2)(a) An experience rating account shall be established and
maintained for each employer, except employers as described in RCW
50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments in
lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers as described
in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments
in lieu of contributions, based on existing records of the employment
security department.
(b) Benefits paid to an eligible individual shall be charged to the
experience rating accounts of each of such individual's employers
during the individual's base year in the same ratio that the wages paid
by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to the
wages paid by all employers to that individual during that base year,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c) When the eligible individual's separating employer is a covered
contribution paying base year employer, benefits paid to the eligible
individual shall be charged to the experience rating account of only
the individual's separating employer if the individual qualifies for
benefits under:
(i) RCW 50.20.050(2)(b)(i), as applicable, and became unemployed
after having worked and earned wages in the bona fide work; or
(ii) RCW 50.20.050(2)(b)(v) through (((x))) (xi).
(3) The legislature finds that certain benefit payments, in whole
or in part, should not be charged to the experience rating accounts of
employers except those employers described in RCW 50.44.010 and
50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of
contributions, taxable local government employers described in RCW
50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments in
lieu of contributions, as follows:
(a) Benefits paid to any individual later determined to be
ineligible shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer.
(b) Benefits paid to an individual filing under the provisions of
chapter 50.06 RCW shall not be charged to the experience rating account
of any contribution paying employer only if:
(i) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after receiving
crime victims' compensation for a disability resulting from a nonwork-related occurrence; or
(ii) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(2).
(c) Benefits paid which represent the state's share of benefits
payable as extended benefits defined under RCW 50.22.010(6) shall not
be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(d) In the case of individuals who requalify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050 or 50.20.060, benefits based on wage credits earned prior to
the disqualifying separation shall not be charged to the experience
rating account of the contribution paying employer from whom that
separation took place.
(e) Individuals who qualify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050(2)(b)(iv), as applicable, shall not have their benefits
charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(f) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after the
first Sunday following April 22, 2005, benefits paid that exceed the
benefits that would have been paid if the weekly benefit amount for the
claim had been determined as one percent of the total wages paid in the
individual's base year shall not be charged to the experience rating
account of any contribution paying employer.
(4)(a) A contribution paying base year employer, not otherwise
eligible for relief of charges for benefits under this section, may
receive such relief if the benefit charges result from payment to an
individual who:
(i) Last left the employ of such employer voluntarily for reasons
not attributable to the employer;
(ii) Was discharged for misconduct or gross misconduct connected
with his or her work not a result of inability to meet the minimum job
requirements;
(iii) Is unemployed as a result of closure or severe curtailment of
operation at the employer's plant, building, worksite, or other
facility. This closure must be for reasons directly attributable to a
catastrophic occurrence such as fire, flood, or other natural disaster;
or
(iv) Continues to be employed on a regularly scheduled permanent
part-time basis by a base year employer and who at some time during the
base year was concurrently employed and subsequently separated from at
least one other base year employer. Benefit charge relief ceases when
the employment relationship between the employer requesting relief and
the claimant is terminated. This subsection does not apply to shared
work employers under chapter 50.60 RCW.
(b) The employer requesting relief of charges under this subsection
must request relief in writing within thirty days following mailing to
the last known address of the notification of the valid initial
determination of such claim, stating the date and reason for the
separation or the circumstances of continued employment. The
commissioner, upon investigation of the request, shall determine
whether relief should be granted.

--- END ---