BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the public policy of the state to
assist in making affordable housing available throughout the state.
The legislature recognizes that despite ongoing efforts there is still
a lack of affordable housing in many areas. The legislature also
recognizes that some local governments have imposed development
requirements on affordable housing developments that are not generally
imposed on other housing developments. The intent of this legislature
is to prohibit discrimination against affordable housing developments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affordable housing development" means a housing development in
which at least twenty-five percent of the dwelling units within the
development are set aside for or are occupied by low-income households
at a sales price or rent amount that is considered affordable by a
federal, state, or local government housing program.
(2) "Dwelling unit" means that part of a housing development that
is used as a home, residence, or place to sleep by one person or two or
more persons maintaining a common household.
(3) "Housing development" means a proposed or existing structure
that is used as a home, residence, or place to sleep by one or more
persons including, but not limited to, single-family residences,
manufactured homes, multifamily housing, group homes, and foster care
facilities.
(4) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is less than
eighty percent of the median family income, adjusted for household
size, for the county where the affordable housing development is
located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A city, county, or other local
governmental entity or agency may not adopt, impose, or enforce
requirements on an affordable housing development that are different
than the requirements imposed on housing developments generally.
(2) This section does not prohibit any city, county, or other local
governmental entity or agency from extending preferential treatment to
affordable housing developments intended for occupancy by homeless
persons, farmworkers, or low-income households. Preferential treatment
may include, but is not limited to: A reduction or waiver of fees or
changes in applicable requirements including, without limitation,
architectural requirements, site development requirements, property
line requirements, building setback requirements, or vehicle parking
requirements; or other treatment that reduces or is likely to reduce
the development or operating costs of an affordable housing
development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 2 and 3 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---