BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The duties of the state treasurer to receive
and disburse public money, account for public money as provided by law,
manage the investment of state funds, oversee state borrowings, and
carry out other duties as prescribed by the Constitution and statute,
are all responsibilities that are fundamentally nonpartisan in nature.
Accordingly, the office of state treasurer should be nonpartisan.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.24.181 and 2006 c 344 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Filings for a nonpartisan office (other than judge of the supreme
court, state treasurer, or superintendent of public instruction) shall
be reopened for a period of three normal business days, such three-day
period to be fixed by the election officer with whom such declarations
of candidacy are filed and notice thereof given by notifying press,
radio, and television in the county and by such other means as may now
or hereafter be provided by law, when:
(1) A void in candidacy for such nonpartisan office occurs on or
after the eleventh Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the eleventh
Tuesday before an election; or
(2) A ((nominee)) candidate for judge of the superior court
eligible after a contested primary for a certificate of election by
Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies or
is disqualified within the ten-day period immediately following the
last day allotted for a candidate to withdraw; or
(3) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office on or after the
eleventh Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the eleventh Tuesday
before an election leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an
election for which filings have not been held.
The candidate receiving a plurality of the votes cast for that
office in the general election shall be deemed elected.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.24.191 and 2006 c 344 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
A scheduled election shall be lapsed, the office deemed stricken
from the ballot, no purported write-in votes counted, and no candidate
certified as elected, when:
(1) In an election for ((judge of the supreme court or
superintendent of public instruction)) a statewide nonpartisan office,
a void in candidacy occurs on or after the eleventh Tuesday prior to a
primary, public filings and the primary being an indispensable phase of
the election process for such offices;
(2) Except as otherwise specified in RCW 29A.24.181, a nominee for
judge of the superior court entitled to a certificate of election
pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state
Constitution dies or is disqualified on or after the eleventh Tuesday
prior to a primary;
(3) In other elections for nonpartisan office a void in candidacy
occurs or a vacancy occurs involving an unexpired term to be filled on
or after the eleventh Tuesday prior to an election.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.36.121 and 2004 c 271 s 129 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The positions or offices on a primary consolidated ballot
shall be arranged in substantially the following order: United States
senator; United States representative; governor; lieutenant governor;
secretary of state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney general;
commissioner of public lands; superintendent of public instruction;
insurance commissioner; state senator; state representative; county
officers; justices of the supreme court; judges of the court of
appeals; judges of the superior court; and judges of the district
court. For all other jurisdictions on the primary consolidated ballot,
the offices in each jurisdiction shall be grouped together and be in
the order of the position numbers assigned to those offices, if any.
(b)(i) The positions or offices on a primary party ballot must be
arranged in substantially the following order: United States senator;
United States representative; governor; lieutenant governor; secretary
of state; ((state treasurer;)) state auditor; attorney general;
commissioner of public lands; insurance commissioner; state senator;
state representative; and partisan county officers. For all other
jurisdictions on the primary party ballot, the offices in each
jurisdiction must be grouped together and be in the order of the
position numbers assigned to those offices, if any.
(ii) The positions or offices on a primary nonpartisan ballot must
be arranged in substantially the following order: State treasurer;
superintendent of public instruction; justices of the supreme court;
judges of the court of appeals; judges of the superior court; and
judges of the district court. For all other jurisdictions on the
primary nonpartisan ballot, the offices in each jurisdiction must be
grouped together and be in the order of the position numbers assigned
to those offices, if any.
(2) The order of the positions or offices on an election ballot
shall be substantially the same as on a primary consolidated ballot
except that state ballot issues must be placed before all offices. The
offices of president and vice president of the United States shall
precede all other offices on a presidential election ballot. The
positions on a ballot to be assigned to ballot measures regarding local
units of government shall be established by the secretary of state by
rule.
(3) The political party or independent candidacy of each candidate
for partisan office shall be indicated next to the name of the
candidate on the primary and election ballot. A candidate shall file
a written notice with the filing officer within three business days
after the close of the filing period designating the political party to
be indicated next to the candidate's name on the ballot if either: (a)
The candidate has been nominated by two or more minor political parties
or independent conventions; or (b) the candidate has both filed a
declaration of candidacy declaring an affiliation with a major
political party and been nominated by a minor political party or
independent convention. If no written notice is filed the filing
officer shall give effect to the party designation shown upon the first
document filed. A candidate may be deemed nominated by a minor party
or independent convention only if all documentation required by chapter
29A.20 RCW has been timely filed.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.36.171 and 2004 c 271 s 170 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 29A.36.180 and in subsection (2) of
this section, on the ballot at the general election for a nonpartisan
office for which a primary was held, only the names of the candidate
who received the greatest number of votes and the candidate who
received the next greatest number of votes for that office shall appear
under the title of that office, and the names shall appear in that
order. If a primary was conducted, no candidate's name may be printed
on the subsequent general election ballot unless he or she receives at
least one percent of the total votes cast for that office at the
preceding primary. On the ballot at the general election for any other
nonpartisan office for which no primary was held, the names of the
candidates shall be listed in the order determined under RCW
29A.36.131.
(2) On the ballot at the general election for the office of justice
of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the
superior court, judge of the district court, state treasurer, or state
superintendent of public instruction, if a candidate in a contested
primary receives a majority of all the votes cast for that office or
position, only the name of that candidate may be printed under the
title of the office for that position.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.52.111 and 2004 c 271 s 173 are each amended to
read as follows:
Candidates for the following offices shall be nominated at partisan
primaries held pursuant to the provisions of this chapter:
(1) Congressional offices;
(2) All state offices except: (a) Judicial offices ((and)); (b)
the office of superintendent of public instruction; and (c) the state
treasurer;
(3) All county offices except (a) judicial offices and (b) those
offices where a county home rule charter provides otherwise.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.52.231 and 2004 c 271 s 174 are each amended to
read as follows:
The offices of state treasurer, superintendent of public
instruction, justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of
appeals, judge of the superior court, and judge of the district court
shall be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be nominated and
elected as such.
All city, town, and special purpose district elective offices shall
be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be nominated and
elected as such.

--- END ---