BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.73.020 and 2006 c 311 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county or city may establish a
transportation benefit district within the county or city area or
within the area specified in subsection (2) of this section, for the
purpose of acquiring, constructing, improving, providing, and funding
a transportation improvement within the district that is consistent
with any existing state, regional, and local transportation plans and
necessitated by existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion levels.
The transportation improvements shall be owned by the county of
jurisdiction if located in an unincorporated area, by the city of
jurisdiction if located in an incorporated area, or by the state in
cases where the transportation improvement is or becomes a state
highway. However, if deemed appropriate by the governing body of the
transportation benefit district, a transportation improvement may be
owned by a participating port district or transit district, unless
otherwise prohibited by law. Transportation improvements shall be
administered and maintained as other public streets, roads, highways,
and transportation improvements. To the extent practicable, the
district shall consider the following criteria when selecting
transportation improvements:
(a) Reduced risk of transportation facility failure and improved
safety;
(b) Improved travel time;
(c) Improved air quality;
(d) Increases in daily and peak period trip capacity;
(e) Improved modal connectivity;
(f) Improved freight mobility;
(g) Cost-effectiveness of the investment;
(h) Optimal performance of the system through time; and
(i) Other criteria, as adopted by the governing body.
(2) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, the district may
include area within more than one county, city, port district, county
transportation authority, or public transportation benefit area, if the
legislative authority of each participating jurisdiction has agreed to
the inclusion as provided in an interlocal agreement adopted pursuant
to chapter 39.34 RCW. However, the boundaries of the district need not
include all territory within the boundaries of the participating
jurisdictions comprising the district.
(3) The members of the legislative authority proposing to establish
the district, acting ex officio and independently, shall constitute the
governing body of the district: PROVIDED, That where a district
includes area within more than one jurisdiction under subsection (2) of
this section, the district shall be governed under an interlocal
agreement adopted pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW. However, the
governing body shall be composed of at least five members including at
least one elected official from the legislative authority of each
participating jurisdiction.
(4) The treasurer of the jurisdiction proposing to establish the
district shall act as the ex officio treasurer of the district, unless
an interlocal agreement states otherwise.
(5) The electors of the district shall all be registered voters
residing within the district.
(6) Prior to December 1, ((2007)) 2009, the authority under this
section, regarding the establishment of or the participation in a
district, shall not apply to:
(a) Counties with a population greater than one million five
hundred thousand persons and any adjoining counties with a population
greater than five hundred thousand persons;
(b) Cities with any area within the counties under (a) of this
subsection; and
(c) Other jurisdictions with any area within the counties under (a)
of this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.120.030 and 2006 c 311 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Regional transportation investment district planning committees are
advisory entities that are created, convened, and empowered as follows:
(1) A county with a population over one million five hundred
thousand persons and any adjoining counties with a population over five
hundred thousand persons may create a regional transportation
investment district and shall convene a regional transportation
investment district planning committee.
(a) The boundaries of the district should include at least the
contiguous areas within the regional transit authority serving the
counties. The boundaries must be proposed by the planning committee
and approved by the county legislative authorities by ordinance before
or in conjunction with approval of a regional transportation investment
plan. Boundaries must follow complete parcels of land. However, any
portion of a county that is located on a peninsula shall be exempt from
a regional transportation investment district in which more than one
county is included if (i) the portion of the county located on the
peninsula is connected to the other portion of the county by a bridge
improved under chapter 47.46 RCW, and (ii) the county has a national
park and a population of more than five hundred thousand persons, but
less than one million five hundred thousand persons.
(b) After voters within the district boundaries have approved a
plan under RCW 36.120.070, elections to add areas to the district
boundaries may be called by a resolution of the board, after
consultation with the regional transportation planning organization and
affected transit agencies and with the concurrence of the legislative
authority of the city or town if the area is incorporated or with the
concurrence of the county legislative authority if the area is
unincorporated. The election may include a single ballot measure
providing annexation to the district, approval of the plan, and
approval of revenue sources necessary to finance the plan. The
electorate are the voters voting within the proposed area to be
annexed. A simple majority of the persons voting on the single ballot
measure is required for approval of the measure.
(2) The members of the legislative authorities participating in
planning under this chapter shall serve as the district planning
committee. Members of the planning committee receive no compensation,
but may be reimbursed for travel and incidental expenses as the
planning committee deems appropriate.
The secretary of transportation, or the appropriate regional
administrator of the department, as named by the secretary, shall serve
on the committee as a nonvoting member.
(3) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee may be entitled to state funding, as appropriated by the
legislature, for start-up funding to pay for salaries, expenses,
overhead, supplies, and similar expenses ordinarily and necessarily
incurred in selecting transportation projects and funding for those
transportation projects under this chapter. Upon creation of a
regional transportation investment district, the district shall within
one year reimburse the state for any sums advanced for these start-up
costs from the state.
(4) The planning committee shall conduct its affairs and formulate
a regional transportation investment plan as provided under RCW
36.120.040, except that it shall elect an executive board of seven
members to discharge the duties of the planning committee and formulate
a regional transportation investment plan, subject to the approval of
the full committee.
(5) At its first meeting, a regional transportation investment
district planning committee may elect officers and provide for the
adoption of rules and other operating procedures.
(6) Governance of and decisions by a regional transportation
investment district planning committee must be by a sixty-percent
weighted majority vote of the total membership.
(7) The planning committee may dissolve itself at any time by a
two-thirds weighted majority vote of the total membership of the
planning committee.
(8) If a multicounty regional transportation investment district is
not formed by December 1, ((2007)) 2009, through approval by the voters
voting on a regional transportation investment plan, then the authority
under this chapter to create a district, and to fund and construct
transportation projects, shall be available to each of the eligible
counties described in subsection (1) of this section on an individual
and independent basis.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.120.070 and 2006 c 311 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning no sooner than the 2007 general election, two or more
contiguous county legislative authorities, or a single county
legislative authority as provided under RCW 36.120.030(8), upon receipt
of the regional transportation investment plan under RCW 36.120.040,
may submit to the voters of the proposed district a single ballot
((measure)) proposition that approves formation of the district,
approves the regional transportation investment plan, and approves the
revenue sources necessary to finance the plan. For a county to
participate in the plan, the county legislative authority shall, within
ninety days after receiving the plan, adopt an ordinance indicating the
county's participation. The planning committee may draft the ballot
((measure)) proposition on behalf of the county legislative
authorities, and the county legislative authorities may give notice as
required by law for ballot ((measures)) propositions, and perform other
duties as required to submit the ((measure)) proposition to the voters
of the proposed district for their approval or rejection. Counties may
negotiate interlocal agreements necessary to implement the plan. The
electorate will be the voters voting within the boundaries of the
proposed district. A simple majority of the total persons voting on
the single ballot ((measure)) proposition is required for approval.
(2) In conjunction with RCW 81.112.030(10), at the 2007 general
election the participating counties shall submit a regional
transportation investment plan on the same ballot along with a
proposition to support additional implementation phases of the
authority's system and financing plan developed under chapter 81.112
RCW. The plan shall not be considered approved unless voters also
approve the proposition to support additional implementation phases of
the authority's system and financing plan.
(3) If the joint November 2007 ballot proposition established under
subsection (2) of this section is not approved by the voters, the
participating counties shall, beginning at the November 2009 general
election, submit to the voters a regional transportation investment
plan as part of a single ballot proposition that includes, in
conjunction with RCW 81.112.030(10), a plan to support an authority's
system and financing plan, or additional implementation phases of the
system and financing plan, developed under chapter 81.112 RCW. The
regional transportation investment plan shall not be considered
approved unless both a majority of the persons voting on the
proposition residing within the proposed district vote in favor of the
proposition and a majority of the persons voting on the proposition
residing within the regional transit authority vote in favor of the
proposition.

Sec. 4 RCW 81.112.030 and 2006 c 311 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Two or more contiguous counties each having a population of four
hundred thousand persons or more may establish a regional transit
authority to develop and operate a high capacity transportation system
as defined in chapter 81.104 RCW.
The authority shall be formed in the following manner:
(1) The joint regional policy committee created pursuant to RCW
81.104.040 shall adopt a system and financing plan, including the
definition of the service area. This action shall be completed by
September 1, 1992, contingent upon satisfactory completion of the
planning process defined in RCW 81.104.100. The final system plan
shall be adopted no later than June 30, 1993. In addition to the
requirements of RCW 81.104.100, the plan for the proposed system shall
provide explicitly for a minimum portion of new tax revenues to be
allocated to local transit agencies for interim express services. Upon
adoption the joint regional policy committee shall immediately transmit
the plan to the county legislative authorities within the adopted
service area.
(2) The legislative authorities of the counties within the service
area shall decide by resolution whether to participate in the
authority. This action shall be completed within forty-five days
following receipt of the adopted plan or by August 13, 1993, whichever
comes first.
(3) Each county that chooses to participate in the authority shall
appoint its board members as set forth in RCW 81.112.040 and shall
submit its list of members to the secretary of the Washington state
department of transportation. These actions must be completed within
thirty days following each county's decision to participate in the
authority.
(4) The secretary shall call the first meeting of the authority, to
be held within thirty days following receipt of the appointments. At
its first meeting, the authority shall elect officers and provide for
the adoption of rules and other operating procedures.
(5) The authority is formally constituted at its first meeting and
the board shall begin taking steps toward implementation of the system
and financing plan adopted by the joint regional policy committee. If
the joint regional policy committee fails to adopt a plan by June 30,
1993, the authority shall proceed to do so based on the work completed
by that date by the joint regional policy committee. Upon formation of
the authority, the joint regional policy committee shall cease to
exist. The authority may make minor modifications to the plan as
deemed necessary and shall at a minimum review local transit agencies'
plans to ensure feeder service/high capacity transit service
integration, ensure fare integration, and ensure avoidance of parallel
competitive services. The authority shall also conduct a minimum
thirty-day public comment period.
(6) If the authority determines that major modifications to the
plan are necessary before the initial ballot proposition is submitted
to the voters, the authority may make those modifications with a
favorable vote of two-thirds of the entire membership. Any such
modification shall be subject to the review process set forth in RCW
81.104.110. The modified plan shall be transmitted to the legislative
authorities of the participating counties. The legislative authorities
shall have forty-five days following receipt to act by motion or
ordinance to confirm or rescind their continued participation in the
authority.
(7) If any county opts to not participate in the authority, but two
or more contiguous counties do choose to continue to participate, the
authority's board shall be revised accordingly. The authority shall,
within forty-five days, redefine the system and financing plan to
reflect elimination of one or more counties, and submit the redefined
plan to the legislative authorities of the remaining counties for their
decision as to whether to continue to participate. This action shall
be completed within forty-five days following receipt of the redefined
plan.
(8) The authority shall place on the ballot within two years of the
authority's formation, a single ballot proposition to authorize the
imposition of taxes to support the implementation of an appropriate
phase of the plan within its service area. In addition to the system
plan requirements contained in RCW 81.104.100(2)(d), the system plan
approved by the authority's board before the submittal of a proposition
to the voters shall contain an equity element which:
(a) Identifies revenues anticipated to be generated by corridor and
by county within the authority's boundaries;
(b) Identifies the phasing of construction and operation of high
capacity system facilities, services, and benefits in each corridor.
Phasing decisions should give priority to jurisdictions which have
adopted transit-supportive land use plans; and
(c) Identifies the degree to which revenues generated within each
county will benefit the residents of that county, and identifies when
such benefits will accrue.
A simple majority of those voting within the boundaries of the
authority is required for approval. If the vote is affirmative, the
authority shall begin implementation of the projects identified in the
proposition. However, the authority may not submit any authorizing
proposition for voter-approved taxes prior to July 1, 1993; nor may the
authority issue bonds or form any local improvement district prior to
July 1, 1993.
(9) If the vote on a proposition fails, the board may redefine the
proposition, make changes to the authority boundaries, and make
corresponding changes to the composition of the board. If the
composition of the board is changed, the participating counties shall
revise the membership of the board accordingly. The board may then
submit the revised proposition or a different proposition to the
voters. No single proposition may be submitted to the voters more than
twice. Beginning no sooner than the 2007 general election, the
authority may place additional propositions on the ballot to impose
taxes to support additional phases of plan implementation.
(10) ((In conjunction with RCW 36.120.070,)) At the 2007 general
election the authority shall submit a proposition to support additional
implementation phases of the authority's system and financing plan ((on
the same ballot along with a regional transportation investment plan
developed under chapter 36.120 RCW. The proposition shall not be
considered approved unless voters also approve the regional
transportation investment plan)) as part of a single ballot proposition
that includes a plan to support a regional transportation investment
plan developed under chapter 36.120 RCW. The authority's system and
financing plan shall not be considered approved unless both a majority
of the persons voting on the proposition residing within the authority
vote in favor of the proposition and a majority of the persons voting
on the proposition residing within the proposed regional transportation
investment district vote in favor of the proposition.
(11) If the joint November 2007 ballot proposition established in
subsection (10) of this section is not approved by the voters, the
authority shall, beginning at the November 2009 general election,
submit to the voters a proposition to support additional implementation
phases of the authority's system and financing plan as part of a single
ballot proposition that includes a plan to support a regional
transportation investment plan developed under chapter 36.120 RCW. The
authority's system and financing plan shall not be considered approved
unless both a majority of the persons voting on the proposition
residing within the authority vote in favor of the proposition and a
majority of the persons voting on the proposition residing within the
proposed regional transportation investment district vote in favor of
the proposition.
(12) Additional phases of plan implementation may include a
transportation subarea equity element which (a) identifies the combined
authority and regional transportation investment district revenues
anticipated to be generated by corridor and by county within the
authority's boundaries, and (b) identifies the degree to which the
combined authority and regional transportation investment district
revenues generated within each county will benefit the residents of
that county, and identifies when such benefits will accrue. For
purposes of the transportation subarea equity principle established
under this subsection, the authority may use the five subareas within
the authority's boundaries as identified in the authority's system plan
adopted in May 1996.
(((12))) (13) If the authority is unable to achieve a positive vote
on a joint ballot proposition ((within two years from the date of the
first election on a proposition)) in either the November 2007 or
November 2009 general election, the board may, by resolution,
reconstitute the authority as a single-county body beginning no sooner
than January 1, 2010. With a two-thirds vote of the entire membership
of the voting members, the board may also dissolve the authority.

--- END ---