BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.39A.290 and 2002 c 3 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee will conduct
a performance review of the authority ((every two years)) and submit
the review to the legislature and the governor. The first review will
be submitted before December 1, 2006, and the second review shall be
submitted before December 1, 2009.
(2) The first performance review will include an evaluation of the
health, welfare, and satisfaction with services provided of the
consumers receiving long-term in-home care services from individual
providers under chapter 3, Laws of 2002, including the degree to which
all required services have been delivered, the degree to which
consumers receiving services from individual providers have ultimately
required additional or more intensive services, such as home health
care, or have been placed in other residential settings or nursing
homes, the promptness of response to consumer complaints, and any other
issue the committee deems relevant.
(3) The first performance review will provide an explanation of the
full cost of individual provider services, including the administrative
costs of the authority, unemployment compensation, social security and
medicare payroll taxes paid by the department, and area agency on aging
home care oversight costs.
(4) The first performance review will make recommendations to the
legislature and the governor for any amendments to chapter 3, Laws of
2002 that will further ensure the well-being of consumers and
prospective consumers under chapter 3, Laws of 2002, and the most
efficient means of delivering required services. In addition, the
first performance review will include findings and recommendations
regarding the appropriateness of the authority's assumption of
responsibility for verification of hours worked by individual
providers, payment of individual providers, and other duties.
(5) The second performance review will assess the services provided
by the home care quality authority to meet its statutory duties, and
address any other questions required by the legislature.

--- END ---