BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2005 c 276 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governor shall establish a joint legislative and executive
task force on long-term care financing and chronic care management.
The joint task force consists of eight members, as follows: The
secretary of the department of social and health services; the
secretary of the department of health; the administrator of the health
care authority; a representative from the governor's office; two
members of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, one of
whom shall be a member of the majority caucus and one of whom shall be
a member of the minority caucus; and two members of the house of
representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, one of whom shall be a member of the majority caucus
and one of whom shall be a member of the minority caucus.
(2) The joint task force shall elect a member of the joint task
force to serve as chair of the joint task force.
(3) Consistent with funds appropriated specifically for this
purpose, the joint task force shall contract for professional services.
State agencies, the senate, and the house of representatives may
provide staff support upon request of the joint task force.
(4) The joint task force shall create advisory committees to assist
the joint task force in its work. The task force shall actively
consult with and solicit recommendations from the advisory committee or
committees regarding issues under consideration by the task force.
(5) Joint task force members may be reimbursed for travel expenses
as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW
as appropriate. Advisory committee members, if appointed, may not
receive compensation or reimbursement for travel or expenses.
(6) The joint task force shall review public and private mechanisms
for financing long-term care and make recommendations related to:
(a) The composition of a long-term care system that is adequate to
meet the needs of persons of all ages with functional limitations,
including appropriate services to be offered in the continuum of care
ranging from services to support persons residing at home through
residential care. This shall be accomplished by first determining
capacity in each level of care in the long-term care continuum and
assessing the impact, by geographic region, of increasing or decreasing
capacity in each level of care;
(b) Efficient payment models that will effectively sustain public
funding of long-term care and maximize the use of financial resources
to directly meet the needs of persons of all ages with functional
limitations;
(c) State laws and regulations that should be revised and/or
eliminated in order to reduce or contain long-term care costs to
individuals and the state;
(d) The feasibility of private options for realistically enabling
individuals to pay for long-term care and the most effective tools for
implementing these options. The assessment of options should include
but not be limited to: (i) Adequacy of personal savings and pensions;
(ii) availability of family care, including incentives and supports for
families to provide care or pay for care; (iii) creative
community-based strategies or partnerships for funding quality
long-term care; (iv) enhanced health insurance options; (v) long-term
care insurance options, including incentives to purchase long-term care
insurance through individual or group-based products; (vi) life
insurance annuities; and (vii) reverse mortgage and other products that
draw on home equity; and
(e) Options that will support long-term care needs of rural
communities.
(7) The joint task force shall recommend chronic care management
and disability prevention interventions that will reduce health care
and long-term care costs to individuals and the state, improve the
health of individuals over their life span, and encourage patient
self-management of chronic care needs.
(8)(a) The joint task force shall establish a home and community
long-term care workforce development workgroup.
(b) The workgroup shall consist of:
(i) The chair of the joint task force;
(ii) The executive director of the home care quality authority;
(iii) The assistant secretary of the department of social and
health services for aging and disability services;
(iv) A representative of the department of labor and industries
with personal knowledge of and expertise in apprenticeship programs, to
be designated by the director of the department;
(v) A representative of the office of financial management with
personal knowledge of and expertise in the fields of long-term care or
workforce development, to be designated by the director of the office;
(vi) A representative of a labor or employee organization
representing at least twenty thousand home and community-based
long-term care workers, to be designated by the principal officer of
the labor or employee organization, the governor, and the cochairs of
the workgroup;
(vii) A representative of a not-for-profit provider of home and
community-based long-term care services providing at least one million
hours of long-term care services annually, to be designated by the
governor and the cochairs of the workgroup;
(viii) A representative of a for-profit provider of home and
community-based long-term care services providing at least five hundred
thousand hours of long-term care services annually, to be designated by
the governor and the cochairs of the workgroup;
(ix) A representative of adult family home providers, to be
designated by the governor and the cochairs of the workgroup;
(x) A representative of boarding homes, to be designated by the
governor and the cochairs of the workgroup;
(xi) A representative of an organization representing the interests
of home and community-based long-term care consumers, to be designated
by the governor and the cochairs of the workgroup;
(xii) A person with expertise in long-term care or workforce
development issues to be named jointly by the speaker of the house of
representatives and the majority leader of the senate;
(xiii) A person representing a public policy organization
specializing in long-term care workforce issues, to be designated by
the governor and the cochairs of the workgroup;
(xiv) A representative from the Washington long-term care ombudsman
office; and
(xv) A representative from the Washington developmental
disabilities council.
(c) The workgroup shall be cochaired by the chair of the joint task
force and the executive director of the home care quality authority.
(d) The workgroup shall evaluate current training requirements for
long-term care workers with respect to the quality of care provided to
vulnerable people across all home and community-based long-term care
settings. The workgroup shall make recommendations relating to the
appropriate number of basic training hours, the content of basic
training curricula, and the development of criteria associated with
certification of new long-term care workers. In doing so, the
workgroup shall examine cited deficiencies of care in various long-term
care settings, and shall evaluate training needs based on medical
versus social models. Any basic training standards recommended by the
workgroup shall: (i) Be applied uniformly to all long-term care
workers; (ii) take into consideration the training standards for
workers providing similar care in nursing homes; (iii) be evidence-based and informed by existing research; (iv) be based on the care
needs of clients; (v) be developed with input from worker
representatives; (vi) be structured in a manner to articulate with
certification and apprenticeship programs; and (vii) be informed by
broader workforce development and long-term care delivery needs.
(9) The joint task force shall incorporate a process designed to
facilitate an open dialog with the public on findings and
recommendations.
(((9))) (10) With respect to subsections (6) and (7) of this
section, the joint task force shall: (a) Report its initial findings
to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2006; (b) report its recommendations to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2007; and (c)
submit a final report to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature by ((June)) December 30, 2007.
(11) With respect to subsection (8) of this section, the workgroup
shall report its findings and recommendations to the joint task force,
the governor, and appropriate legislative committees by December 1,
2007. The joint task force shall include the workgroup's findings and
recommendations in the joint task force's final report required under
subsection (10) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.39A.009 and 2004 c 142 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult family home" means a home licensed under chapter 70.128
RCW.
(2) "Adult residential care" means services provided by a boarding
home that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a contract
with the department under RCW 74.39A.020 to provide personal care
services.
(3) "Assisted living services" means services provided by a
boarding home that has a contract with the department under RCW
74.39A.010 to provide personal care services, intermittent nursing
services, and medication administration services, and the resident is
housed in a private apartment-like unit.
(4) "Boarding home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.20
RCW.
(5) "Cost-effective care" means care provided in a setting of an
individual's choice that is necessary to promote the most appropriate
level of physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being consistent with
client choice, in an environment that is appropriate to the care and
safety needs of the individual, and such care cannot be provided at a
lower cost in any other setting. But this in no way precludes an
individual from choosing a different residential setting to achieve his
or her desired quality of life.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Enhanced adult residential care" means services provided by a
boarding home that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a
contract with the department under RCW 74.39A.010 to provide personal
care services, intermittent nursing services, and medication
administration services.
(8) "Functionally disabled person" or "person who is functionally
disabled" is synonymous with chronic functionally disabled and means a
person who because of a recognized chronic physical or mental condition
or disease, including chemical dependency, is impaired to the extent of
being dependent upon others for direct care, support, supervision, or
monitoring to perform activities of daily living. "Activities of daily
living", in this context, means self-care abilities related to personal
care such as bathing, eating, using the toilet, dressing, and transfer.
Instrumental activities of daily living may also be used to assess a
person's functional abilities as they are related to the mental
capacity to perform activities in the home and the community such as
cooking, shopping, house cleaning, doing laundry, working, and managing
personal finances.
(9) "Home and community services" means adult family homes, in-home
services, and other services administered or provided by contract by
the department directly or through contract with area agencies on aging
or similar services provided by facilities and agencies licensed by the
department.
(10) "Long-term care" is synonymous with chronic care and means
care and supports delivered indefinitely, intermittently, or over a
sustained time to persons of any age disabled by chronic mental or
physical illness, disease, chemical dependency, or a medical condition
that is permanent, not reversible or curable, or is long-lasting and
severely limits their mental or physical capacity for self-care. The
use of this definition is not intended to expand the scope of services,
care, or assistance by any individuals, groups, residential care
settings, or professions unless otherwise expressed by law.
(11)(a) "Long-term care workers" includes all persons who are long-term care workers for the elderly or persons with disabilities,
including but not limited to individual providers of home care
services, direct care employees of home care agencies, providers of
home care services to persons with developmental disabilities under
Title 71 RCW, all direct care workers in state-licensed boarding homes,
assisted living facilities, and adult family homes, respite care
providers, community residential service providers, and any other
direct care worker providing home or community-based services to the
elderly or persons with functional disabilities or developmental
disabilities.
(b) "Long-term care workers" do not include persons employed in
nursing homes subject to chapter 18.51 RCW, hospitals or other acute
care settings, hospice agencies subject to chapter 70.127 RCW, adult
day care centers, and adult day health care centers.
(12) "Nursing home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.51
RCW.
(((12))) (13) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services.
(((13))) (14) "Training partnership" means a joint partnership or
trust established and maintained jointly by the office of the governor
and the exclusive bargaining representative of individual providers
under RCW 74.39A.270 to provide training, peer mentoring, and
examinations required under this chapter, and educational, career
development, or other services to individual providers.
(15) "Tribally licensed boarding home" means a boarding home
licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe which home provides
services similar to boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
PEER MENTORING. Long-term care workers shall be offered on-the-job
training or peer mentorship for at least one hour per week in the first
ninety days of work from a long-term care worker who has completed at
least twelve hours of mentor training and is mentoring no more than ten
other workers at any given time. This requirement applies to long-term
care workers who begin work on or after January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
CONTINUING EDUCATION. Long-term care workers shall complete twelve
hours of continuing education training in advanced training topics each
year. This requirement applies beginning on January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
ADVANCED TRAINING. The department shall offer, directly or through
contract, training opportunities sufficient for a long-term care worker
to accumulate sixty-five hours of training within a reasonable time
period. For individual providers represented by an exclusive
bargaining representative under RCW 74.39A.270, the training
opportunities shall be offered through a contract with the training
partnership established under section 6 of this act. Training topics
shall include, but are not limited to: Client rights; personal care;
mental illness; dementia; developmental disabilities; depression;
medication assistance; advanced communication skills; positive client
behavior support; developing or improving client-centered activities;
dealing with wandering or aggressive client behaviors; medical
conditions; nurse delegation core training; peer mentor training; and
advocacy for quality care training. The department may not require
long-term care workers to obtain the training described in this
section. This requirement to offer advanced training applies beginning
January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
TRAINING PARTNERSHIP. Beginning January 1, 2010, for individual
providers represented by an exclusive bargaining representative under
RCW 74.39A.270, all training and peer mentoring required under this
chapter shall be provided by a training partnership. Contributions to
the partnership pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement
negotiated under this chapter shall be made beginning July 1, 2009.
The training partnership shall provide reports as required by the
department verifying that all individual providers have complied with
all training requirements. The exclusive bargaining representative
shall designate the training partnership.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.39A.270 and 2006 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING--CIRCUMSTANCES IN WHICH INDIVIDUAL PROVIDERS
ARE CONSIDERED PUBLIC EMPLOYEES--EXCEPTIONS. (1) Solely for the
purposes of collective bargaining and as expressly limited under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the governor is the public
employer, as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW, of individual providers,
who, solely for the purposes of collective bargaining, are public
employees as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW. To accommodate the role of
the state as payor for the community-based services provided under this
chapter and to ensure coordination with state employee collective
bargaining under chapter 41.80 RCW and the coordination necessary to
implement RCW 74.39A.300, the public employer shall be represented for
bargaining purposes by the governor or the governor's designee
appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW. The governor or governor's designee
shall periodically consult with the authority during the collective
bargaining process to allow the authority to communicate issues
relating to the long-term in-home care services received by consumers.
The governor or the governor's designee shall consult the authority on
all issues for which the exclusive bargaining representative requests
to engage in collective bargaining under subsections (6) and (7) of
this section. The authority shall work with the developmental
disabilities council, the governor's committee on disability issues and
employment, the state council on aging, and other consumer advocacy
organizations to obtain informed input from consumers on their
interests, including impacts on consumer choice, for all issues
proposed for collective bargaining under subsections (6) and (7) of
this section.
(2) Chapter 41.56 RCW governs the collective bargaining
relationship between the governor and individual providers, except as
otherwise expressly provided in this chapter and except as follows:
(a) The only unit appropriate for the purpose of collective
bargaining under RCW 41.56.060 is a statewide unit of all individual
providers;
(b) The showing of interest required to request an election under
RCW 41.56.060 is ten percent of the unit, and any intervener seeking to
appear on the ballot must make the same showing of interest;
(c) The mediation and interest arbitration provisions of RCW
41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and 41.56.480 apply, except that:
(i) With respect to commencement of negotiations between the
governor and the bargaining representative of individual providers,
negotiations shall be commenced by May 1st of any year prior to the
year in which an existing collective bargaining agreement expires;
(ii) With respect to factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel, the panel shall consider the financial
ability of the state to pay for the compensation and fringe benefit
provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; and
(iii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit
provisions of the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, is not
binding on the authority or the state;
(d) Individual providers do not have the right to strike; and
(e) Individual providers who are related to, or family members of,
consumers or prospective consumers are not, for that reason, exempt
from this chapter or chapter 41.56 RCW.
(3) Individual providers who are public employees solely for the
purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this section
are not, for that reason, employees of the state, its political
subdivisions, or an area agency on aging for any purpose. Chapter
41.56 RCW applies only to the governance of the collective bargaining
relationship between the employer and individual providers as provided
in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Consumers and prospective consumers retain the right to select,
hire, supervise the work of, and terminate any individual provider
providing services to them. Consumers may elect to receive long-term
in-home care services from individual providers who are not referred to
them by the authority.
(5) In implementing and administering this chapter, neither the
authority nor any of its contractors may reduce or increase the hours
of service for any consumer below or above the amount determined to be
necessary under any assessment prepared by the department or an area
agency on aging.
(6) Except as expressly limited in this section and RCW 74.39A.300,
the wages, hours, and working conditions of individual providers are
determined solely through collective bargaining as provided in this
chapter. No agency or department of the state may establish policies
or rules governing the wages or hours of individual providers.
However, this subsection does not modify:
(a) The department's authority to establish a plan of care for each
consumer or its core responsibility to manage long-term in-home care
services under this chapter, including determination of the level of
care that each consumer is eligible to receive. However, at the
request of the exclusive bargaining representative, the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in
collective bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030(4), with the
exclusive bargaining representative over how the department's core
responsibility affects hours of work for individual providers. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to require collective bargaining
over an individual consumer's plan of care;
(b) The department's authority to terminate its contracts with
individual providers who are not adequately meeting the needs of a
particular consumer, or to deny a contract under RCW 74.39A.095(8);
(c) The consumer's right to assign hours to one or more individual
providers selected by the consumer within the maximum hours determined
by his or her plan of care;
(d) The consumer's right to select, hire, terminate, supervise the
work of, and determine the conditions of employment for each individual
provider providing services to the consumer under this chapter;
(e) The department's obligation to comply with the federal medicaid
statute and regulations and the terms of any community-based waiver
granted by the federal department of health and human services and to
ensure federal financial participation in the provision of the
services; and
(f) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under this title, including standards of
eligibility of consumers and individual providers participating in the
programs under this title, and the nature of services provided. The
governor shall not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under
this chapter that does not expressly reserve the legislative rights
described in this subsection (6)(f).
(7) At the request of the exclusive bargaining representative, the
governor or the governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW
shall engage in collective bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030(4),
with the exclusive bargaining representative over employer
contributions to the training partnership for the costs of: (a)
Meeting all training and peer mentoring required under this chapter;
and (b) other training intended to promote the career development of
individual providers.
(8)(a) The state, the department, the authority, the area agencies
on aging, or their contractors under this chapter may not be held
vicariously or jointly liable for the action or inaction of any
individual provider or prospective individual provider, whether or not
that individual provider or prospective individual provider was
included on the authority's referral registry or referred to a consumer
or prospective consumer. The existence of a collective bargaining
agreement, the placement of an individual provider on the referral
registry, or the development or approval of a plan of care for a
consumer who chooses to use the services of an individual provider and
the provision of case management services to that consumer, by the
department or an area agency on aging, does not constitute a special
relationship with the consumer.
(b) The members of the board are immune from any liability
resulting from implementation of this chapter.
(((8))) (9) Nothing in this section affects the state's
responsibility with respect to unemployment insurance for individual
providers. However, individual providers are not to be considered, as
a result of the state assuming this responsibility, employees of the
state.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.39A.310 and 2006 c 9 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
CONTRACT FOR INDIVIDUAL HOME CARE SERVICE PROVIDERS--COST OF
INCREASE IN WAGES AND BENEFITS FUNDED--FORMULA. (1) The department
shall create a formula that converts the cost of the increase in wages
and benefits negotiated and funded in the contract for individual
providers of home care services pursuant to RCW 74.39A.270 and
74.39A.300, into a per-hour amount, excluding those benefits defined in
subsection (2) of this section. That per-hour amount shall be added to
the statewide home care agency vendor rate and shall be used
exclusively for improving the wages and benefits of home care agency
workers who provide direct care. The formula shall account for:
(a) All types of wages, benefits, and compensation negotiated and
funded each biennium, including but not limited to:
(i) Regular wages;
(ii) Benefit pay, such as vacation, sick, and holiday pay;
(iii) Taxes on wages/benefit pay; ((and))
(iv) Mileage; and
(v) Contributions to a training partnership; and
(b) The increase in the average cost of worker's compensation for
home care agencies and application of the increases identified in (a)
of this subsection to all hours required to be paid, including travel
time, of direct service workers under the wage and hour laws and
associated employer taxes.
(2) The contribution rate for health care benefits, including but
not limited to medical, dental, and vision benefits, for eligible
agency home care workers shall be paid by the department to home care
agencies at the same rate as negotiated and funded in the collective
bargaining agreement for individual providers of home care services.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.88A.085 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 712 are each amended
to read as follows:
NURSING ASSISTANTS--CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS. (1) After January
1, 1990, the secretary shall issue a certificate to any applicant who
demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction that the following
requirements have been met:
(a) Completion of an approved training program or successful
completion of alternate training meeting established criteria approved
by the commission; and
(b) Successful completion of a competency evaluation.
(2) The secretary may permit all or a portion of the training hours
earned under chapter 74.39A RCW to be applied toward certification
under this section.
(3) In addition, applicants shall be subject to the grounds for
denial of certification under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 REPEALER. RCW 74.39A.190 (Community long-term care training and education steering committee) and 2002 c 233 s
4 & 2000 c 121 s 8 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 LIBERAL CONSTRUCTION. The provisions of
this act are to be liberally construed to effectuate the intent,
policies, and purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 EMERGENCY CLAUSE. Section 1 of this act is
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 7 and 8 of this
act take effect March 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are
not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 SHORT TITLE. This act may be known and
cited as the establishing quality in long-term care services act.

--- END ---