BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within urban growth areas designated under RCW 36.70A.110,
decisions pertaining to the following activities are exempt from this
chapter: (a) Construction of or location of any residential structures
of ten or fewer dwelling units; (b) division of land into nine or fewer
lots or parcels; and (c) any landfill or excavation of five hundred
cubic yards throughout the total lifetime of the fill or excavation.
(2) The legislative authority of a county or city that is planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 may raise the exemption levels specified in
subsection (1)(a) of this section by ordinance or resolution within
urban growth areas to a maximum of twenty or fewer dwelling units.

--- END ---