BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.22.060 and 1987 c 212 s 1901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A party prior to entering into a release, covenant not to sue,
covenant not to enforce judgment, or similar agreement with a claimant
shall give five days' written notice of such intent to all other
parties and the court. The court may for good cause authorize a
shorter notice period. The notice shall contain a copy of the proposed
agreement. A hearing shall be held on the issue of the reasonableness
of the amount to be paid with all parties afforded an opportunity to
present evidence. A determination by the court that the amount to be
paid is reasonable must be secured. If an agreement was entered into
prior to the filing of the action, a hearing on the issue of the
reasonableness of the amount paid at the time it was entered into may
be held at any time prior to final judgment upon motion of a party.
The burden of proof regarding the reasonableness of the settlement
offer shall be on the party requesting the settlement.
(2) A release, covenant not to sue, covenant not to enforce
judgment, or similar agreement entered into by a claimant and a person
liable discharges that person from all liability for contribution, but
it does not discharge any other persons liable upon the same claim
unless it so provides. However, the claim of the releasing person
against other persons is reduced by the amount paid pursuant to the
agreement unless the amount paid was unreasonable at the time of the
agreement in which case the claim shall be reduced by an amount
determined by the court to be reasonable.
(((3) A determination that the amount paid for a release, covenant
not to sue, covenant not to enforce judgment, or similar agreement was
unreasonable shall not affect the validity of the agreement between the
released and releasing persons nor shall any adjustment be made in the
amount paid between the parties to the agreement.))

Sec. 2 RCW 4.22.070 and 1993 c 496 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In all actions involving fault of more than one entity, the
trier of fact shall determine the percentage of the total fault which
is attributable to every entity which caused the claimant's damages
except entities immune from liability to the claimant under Title 51
RCW. The sum of the percentages of the total fault attributed to at-fault entities shall equal one hundred percent. The entities whose
fault shall be determined include the claimant or person suffering
personal injury or incurring property damage, defendants, third-party
defendants, entities released by the claimant, entities with any other
individual defense against the claimant, and entities immune from
liability to the claimant, but shall not include those entities immune
from liability to the claimant under Title 51 RCW. Judgment shall be
entered against each defendant except those who have been released by
the claimant or are immune from liability to the claimant or have
prevailed on any other individual defense against the claimant in an
amount which represents that party's proportionate share of the
claimant's total damages. The liability of each defendant shall be
several only and shall not be joint except:
(a) A party shall be responsible for the fault of another person or
for payment of the proportionate share of another party where both were
acting in concert or when a person was acting as an agent or servant of
the party.
(b) If the trier of fact determines that the claimant or party
suffering bodily injury or incurring property damages was not at fault,
the defendants against whom judgment is entered shall be jointly and
severally liable for the sum of their proportionate shares of the
((claimants [claimant's])) claimant's total damages.
(2) If a defendant is jointly and severally liable under one of the
exceptions listed in subsections (1)(a) or (1)(b) of this section, such
defendant's rights to contribution against another jointly and
severally liable defendant, and the effect of settlement by either such
defendant, shall be determined under RCW 4.22.040, 4.22.050, and
4.22.060.
(3)(a) Nothing in this section affects any cause of action relating
to hazardous wastes or substances or solid waste disposal sites.
(b) Nothing in this section shall affect a cause of action arising
from the tortious interference with contracts or business relations.
(c) Nothing in this section shall affect any cause of action
arising from the manufacture or marketing of a fungible product in a
generic form which contains no clearly identifiable shape, color, or
marking.
(4) If joint and several liability applies under one of the
exceptions listed in subsection (1)(a) or (b) or (3) of this section,
a settlement in the form of a covenant judgment, covenant not to
execute judgment, high-low trial agreement, or similar settlement
agreement shall not operate as a release or prevent judgment from being
entered against the settling defendant unless so stated in the
settlement agreement. A nonsettling defendant who is found jointly and
severally liable with a defendant who settled under a covenant
judgment, covenant not to execute, high-low trial agreement, or similar
settlement agreement shall be entitled to an offset against the total
judgment in an amount found by the judge to be reasonable pursuant to
RCW 4.22.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to all causes of action
that the parties have not settled or in which judgment has not been
entered prior to the effective date of this act.

--- END ---