BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.105.017 and 1992 c 20 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that:
(1) State government use voice, data, and video telecommunications
technologies to:
(a) Transmit and increase access to live, interactive classroom
instruction and training;
(b) Provide for interactive public affairs presentations, including
a public forum for state and local issues;
(c) Facilitate communications and exchange of information among
state and local elected officials and the general public;
(d) Enhance statewide communications within state agencies; and
(e) Through the use of telecommunications, reduce time lost due to
travel to in-state meetings;
(2) Information be shared and administered in a coordinated manner,
except when prevented by agency responsibilities for security, privacy,
or confidentiality;
(3) The primary responsibility for the management and use of
information((, information systems, telecommunications, equipment,
software, and services rests with each agency head)) technology
enterprise services rests with the director of the department of
information services. The director shall consult regularly with each
agency head regarding information technology enterprise services as
defined under RCW 43.105.052(3);
(4) Resources be used in the most efficient manner and services be
shared when cost-effective;
(5) A structure be created to:
(a) Plan and manage telecommunications and computing networks;
(b) Increase agencies' awareness of information sharing
opportunities; and
(c) Assist agencies in implementing such possibilities;
(6) An acquisition process for equipment, proprietary software, and
related services be established that meets the needs of the users,
considers the exchange of information, and promotes fair and open
competition;
(7) To the greatest extent possible, major information technology
projects be implemented on an incremental basis;
(8) The state maximize opportunities to exchange and share data and
information by moving toward implementation of open system architecture
based upon interface standards providing for application and data
portability and interoperability;
(9) To the greatest extent possible, the state recognize any price
performance advantages which may be available in midrange and personal
computing architecture;
(10) The state improve recruitment, retention, and training of
professional staff;
(11) Plans, proposals, and acquisitions for information services be
reviewed from a financial and management perspective as part of the
budget process; and
(12) State government adopt policies and procedures that maximize
the use of existing video telecommunications resources, coordinate and
develop video telecommunications in a manner that is cost-effective and
encourages shared use, and ensure the appropriate use of video
telecommunications to fulfill identified needs.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.105.041 and 2003 c 18 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall have the following powers and duties related to
information services:
(a) To develop standards and procedures governing the acquisition
and disposition of equipment, proprietary software and purchased
services, licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of state
agencies, and confidentiality of computerized data;
(b) ((To purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire, dispose of,
and maintain equipment, proprietary software, and purchased services,
or to delegate to other agencies and institutions of state government,
under appropriate standards, the authority to purchase, lease, rent, or
otherwise acquire, dispose of, and maintain equipment, proprietary
software, and purchased services: PROVIDED, That, agencies and
institutions of state government are expressly prohibited from
acquiring or disposing of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services without such delegation of authority. The
acquisition and disposition of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services is exempt from RCW 43.19.1919 and, as provided in
RCW 43.19.1901, from the provisions of RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.200.
This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to the legislative branch;
(c))) To develop statewide or interagency technical policies,
standards, and procedures;
(((d))) (c) To review and approve standards and common
specifications for new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed
by agencies, public postsecondary education institutions, educational
service districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12
information technology services, and to assure the cost-effective
development and incremental implementation of a statewide video
telecommunications system to serve: Public schools; educational
service districts; vocational-technical institutes; community colleges;
colleges and universities; state and local government; and the general
public through public affairs programming;
(((e))) (d) To provide direction concerning strategic planning
goals and objectives for the state. The board shall seek input from
the legislature and the judiciary;
(((f))) (e) To develop and implement a process for the resolution
of appeals by:
(i) Vendors concerning the conduct of an acquisition process by an
agency or the department; or
(ii) A customer agency concerning the provision of services by the
department or by other state agency providers;
(((g))) (f) To establish policies for the periodic review by the
department of agency performance which may include but are not limited
to analysis of:
(i) Planning, management, control, and use of information services;
(ii) Training and education; and
(iii) Project management;
(((h))) (g) To set its meeting schedules and convene at scheduled
times, or meet at the request of a majority of its members, the chair,
or the director; and
(((i))) (h) To review and approve that portion of the department's
budget requests that provides for support to the board.
(2) Statewide technical standards to promote and facilitate
electronic information sharing and access are an essential component of
acceptable and reliable public access service and complement content-related standards designed to meet those goals. The board shall:
(a) Establish technical standards to facilitate electronic access
to government information and interoperability of information systems,
including wireless communications systems. Local governments are
strongly encouraged to follow the standards established by the board;
and
(b) Require agencies to consider electronic public access needs
when planning new information systems or major upgrades of systems.
In developing these standards, the board is encouraged to include
the state library, state archives, and appropriate representatives of
state and local government.
(3)(a) The board, in consultation with the K-20 board, has the duty
to govern, operate, and oversee the technical design, implementation,
and operation of the K-20 network including, but not limited to, the
following duties: Establishment and implementation of K-20 network
technical policy, including technical standards and conditions of use;
review and approval of network design; procurement of shared network
services and equipment; and resolving user/provider disputes concerning
technical matters. The board shall delegate general operational and
technical oversight to the K-20 network technical steering committee as
appropriate.
(b) The board has the authority to adopt rules under chapter 34.05
RCW to implement the provisions regarding the technical operations and
conditions of use of the K-20 network.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.105.047 and 1999 c 80 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created the department of information services. The
department shall be headed by a director appointed by the governor with
the consent of the senate. The director shall serve at the governor's
pleasure and shall receive such salary as determined by the governor.
The director shall:
(1) Appoint a confidential secretary and such deputy and assistant
directors as needed to administer the department;
(2) Advise the governor and the legislature with respect to matters
affecting information technology management and planning;
(3) Establish levels of delegated authority for state agencies and
institutions of higher education related to the acquisition of
hardware, software, or purchased or personal services relating to
information technology. The acquisition and disposition of equipment,
proprietary software, and purchased services is exempt from RCW
43.19.1919 and, as provided in RCW 43.19.1901, from the provisions of
RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.200. This subsection does not apply to the
legislative branch;
(4) Develop a migration strategy related to the transition of
information technology resources from state agencies to the department
of information services, with a completion date of June 30, 2010. This
strategy will:
(a) Transfer all information technology resources from agencies
with fifty or less full-time equivalents to the department of
information services to include the establishment of services for those
agencies no later than June 30, 2008;
(b) Direct agencies to use information technology enterprise
services provided by the department of information services as directed
in RCW 43.105.052 (3) and (4);
(c) Transfer newly established information technology positions to
the department of information services beginning July 1, 2007 at the
discretion of the director of the department of information services;
(d) Transfer the administrative information technology support
functions of the office of financial management and department of
personnel to the department of information services by June 30, 2009;
and
(e) Report to the governor and legislature on the progress and
timeline for the completion of the migration by December 1, 2007, and
December 1, 2008;
(5) Maintain and fund a strategic planning and policy component
separate from the services component of the department;
(((3))) (6) Appoint, after consulting with the board, the assistant
or deputy director for the planning component;
(((4))) (7) Appoint such professional, technical, and clerical
assistants and employees as may be necessary to perform the duties
imposed by this chapter;
(((5))) (8) Report to the governor and the board any matters
relating to abuses and evasions of this chapter; and
(((6))) (9) Recommend statutory changes to the governor and the
board.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.105.052 and 2000 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall:
(1) Perform all duties and responsibilities the board delegates to
the department, including but not limited to:
(a) The review of agency information technology portfolios and
related requests; and
(b) Implementation of statewide and interagency policies,
standards, and guidelines;
(2) ((Make available)) Provide technical assistance to the governor
and legislature in identifying information technology needs and in
planning to meet those needs through agency portfolios and investments
for information technology;
(3) Provide information technology enterprise services to state
agencies, institutions of higher education, and local governments and
public benefit nonprofit corporations on a full cost-recovery basis.
For the purposes of this section "public benefit nonprofit corporation"
means a public benefit nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW
24.03.005 that is receiving local, state, or federal funds either
directly or through a public agency other than an Indian tribe or
political subdivision of another state. "Information technology
enterprise services" means the acquisition, provisioning, or approval
of hardware, software, and purchased or personal services provided by
the department of information services. These services may include,
but are not limited to:
(a) Telecommunications services for voice, data, and video;
(b) Mainframe computing services;
(c) Support for departmental and microcomputer evaluation,
installation, and use;
(d) Equipment acquisition assistance, including leasing, brokering,
and establishing master contracts;
(e) Facilities management services for information technology
equipment, equipment repair, and maintenance service;
(f) Negotiation with local cable companies and local governments to
provide for connection to local cable services to allow for access to
these public and educational channels in the state;
(g) Office automation services;
(h) System development services; and
(i) Training.
((These services are for discretionary use by customers and
customers may elect other alternatives for service if those
alternatives are more cost-effective or provide better service.
Agencies may be required to use the backbone network portions of the
telecommunications services during an initial start-up period not to
exceed three years;
(3))) Agencies of state government and institutions of higher
education shall use the department of information services information
technology enterprise services when acquiring information technology
services, products, and assets including acquisitions within an
agency's delegated authority.
If an information technology enterprise service is provided by the
department of information services, or an agency has a specific service
requirement to acquire hardware, software, or purchased or personal
services directly, the agency shall submit a request to proceed with
the acquisition to the department of information services for review
and approval. The request shall be evaluated by the department of
information services in consultation with the office of financial
management.
(4) Agencies of state government and institutions of higher
education shall locate all new servers with the department of
information services. Agencies with a service requirement that require
servers to be located outside the department of information services
must first obtain written approval from the department of information
services director. Justifications must be based upon written
justification from the requesting agency citing specific service
requirements for locating servers outside the state's common platform.
(5) Establish rates and fees for services provided by the
department to assure that the services component of the department is
self-supporting. A billing rate plan shall be developed for a two-year
period to coincide with the budgeting process. The rate plan shall be
subject to review at least annually by the customer advisory board.
The rate plan shall show the proposed rates by each cost center and
will show the components of the rate structure as mutually determined
by the department and the customer advisory board. The same rate
structure will apply to all user agencies of each cost center. The
rate plan and any adjustments to rates shall be approved by the office
of financial management. The services component shall not subsidize
the operations of the strategic planning and policy component;
(((4))) (6) With the advice of the information services board and
agencies, develop a state strategic information technology plan and
performance reports as required under RCW 43.105.160;
(((5))) (7) Develop plans for the department's achievement of
statewide goals and objectives set forth in the state strategic
information technology plan required under RCW 43.105.160. These plans
shall address such services as telecommunications, central and
distributed computing, local area networks, office automation, and end
user computing. The department shall seek the advice of the customer
advisory board and the board in the development of these plans;
(((6))) (8) Under direction of the information services board and
in collaboration with the department of personnel, and other agencies
as may be appropriate, develop training plans and coordinate training
programs that are responsive to the needs of agencies;
(((7))) (9) Identify opportunities for the effective use of
information services and coordinate appropriate responses to those
opportunities;
(((8))) (10) Assess agencies' projects, acquisitions, plans,
information technology portfolios, or overall information processing
performance as requested by the board, agencies, the director of
financial management, or the legislature. Agencies may be required to
reimburse the department for agency-requested reviews;
(((9))) (11) Develop planning, budgeting, and expenditure reporting
requirements, in conjunction with the office of financial management,
for agencies to follow;
(((10))) (12) Assist the office of financial management with
budgetary and policy review of agency plans for information services;
(((11))) (13) Provide staff support from the strategic planning and
policy component to the board for:
(a) Meeting preparation, notices, and minutes;
(b) Promulgation of policies, standards, and guidelines adopted by
the board;
(c) Supervision of studies and reports requested by the board;
(d) Conducting reviews and assessments as directed by the board;
(((12))) (14) Be the lead agency in coordinating video
telecommunications services for all state agencies and develop,
pursuant to board policies, standards and common specifications for
leased and purchased telecommunications equipment. The department
shall not evaluate the merits of school curriculum, higher education
course offerings, or other education and training programs proposed for
transmission and/or reception using video telecommunications resources.
Nothing in this section shall abrogate or abridge the legal
responsibilities of licensees of telecommunications facilities as
licensed by the federal communication commission on March 27, 1990; and
(((13))) (15) Perform all other matters and things necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.105.180 and 1999 c 80 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Upon request of the office of financial management,)) The
department shall evaluate agency budget requests for major information
technology ((projects)) proposals identified under RCW 43.105.190,
including those proposed by institutions of higher education and the
superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction with educational
service districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 education
information technology services. The department shall submit
recommendations for funding all or part of such requests to the office
of financial management.
The department((, with the advice and approval of the office of
financial management,)) shall establish criteria, consistent with
portfolio-based information technology management, for the evaluation
of agency budget requests under this section. These budget requests
shall be made in the context of an agency's information technology
portfolio; technology initiatives underlying budget requests are
subject to board review. Criteria shall include, but not be limited
to: Feasibility of the proposed projects, consistency with the state
strategic information technology plan, utilization of enterprise or
common services, consistency with the agency information technology
portfolios, appropriate provision for public electronic access to
information and services, costs, and benefits.

--- END ---