BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some students
with special needs would receive additional benefit from a highly
specialized learning environment that is uniquely tailored for groups
of students with similar needs. For example, a learning environment
designed specifically for students with autistic spectrum disorders
would provide instruction from teachers and other educators specially
trained to address challenges in communication, socialization, and
behavior. The latest research on best practices and the latest and
most appropriate curriculum could be implemented. Parents could be an
integral part of the learning environment and could learn from and
support one another. Therefore, the legislature intends to encourage
the creation of autism education centers to provide a specialized
learning environment tailored to students with autistic spectrum
disorders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Educational service districts, private schools, or nonprofit
organizations may establish autism education centers for the purpose of
providing an appropriate public education in a specially designed
learning environment for students with autistic spectrum disorders. To
qualify as an autism education center under this section, a private
school or nonprofit organization must be an agency approved by the
superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.155.060 to operate
special education programs for students with disabilities.
(2) The parent or guardian of a student with an autistic spectrum
disorder who is eligible to receive services under this chapter may
enroll the student in an autism education center established under this
section.
(3) If the parent or guardian enrolls the student in an autism
education center, the resident school district shall contract with the
center to provide an appropriate educational opportunity and services
for the student.
(4) If applicable, the resident district may apply to the state
special education safety net to access additional resources to serve
the student.
(5) Students enrolled in an autism education center shall not be
counted as part of the resident district's special education enrollment
percent as defined by the omnibus appropriations act.

--- END ---