BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The state building code council shall
form a technical advisory group to research and review policies and
procedures for residential fire sprinklers.
(b) The purpose of the study is to research obstacles and barriers
to the installation of residential fire sprinkler systems.
(2) The technical advisory group must consist of:
(a) Representatives from: A city association, a county
association, the association of building officials, an association of
special purpose water-sewer districts, and a public utility district
association;
(b) A fire chief, a state licensed residential fire sprinkler
contractor, an architect, and a residential builder; and
(c) Any other representative deemed necessary to develop the model
policy.
(3) The state building code council shall report the findings of
the technical advisory group to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by January 15, 2008.

--- END ---