BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.073 and 2003 c 86 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No licensee may engage in the business of making small loans
without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to its license from
the director in accordance with this chapter. An endorsement will be
required for each location where a licensee engages in the business of
making small loans, but a small loan endorsement may authorize a
licensee to make small loans at a location different than the licensed
locations where it cashes or sells checks. A licensee may have more
than one endorsement.
(2) The termination date of a small loan may not exceed the
origination date of that same small loan by less than twenty-four days
or by more than forty-five days, including weekends and holidays,
unless the term of the loan is extended by agreement of both the
borrower and the licensee and no additional fee or interest is charged.
The maximum principal amount of any small loan, or the outstanding
principal balances of all small loans made by a licensee to a single
borrower at any one time, may not exceed seven hundred dollars.
(3) A licensee that has obtained the required small loan
endorsement may charge interest or fees for small loans not to exceed
in the aggregate fifteen percent of the first five hundred dollars of
principal. If the principal exceeds five hundred dollars, a licensee
may charge interest or fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent
of that portion of the principal in excess of five hundred dollars. If
a licensee makes more than one loan to a single borrower, and the
aggregated principal of all loans made to that borrower exceeds five
hundred dollars at any one time, the licensee may charge interest or
fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent on that portion of the
aggregated principal of all loans at any one time that is in excess of
five hundred dollars. The director may determine by rule which fees,
if any, are not subject to the interest or fee limitations described in
this section. It is a violation of this chapter for any licensee to
knowingly loan to a single borrower at any one time, in a single loan
or in the aggregate, more than the maximum principal amount described
in this section.
(4) In connection with making a small loan, a licensee may advance
moneys on the security of a postdated check. The licensee may not
accept any other property, title to property, or other evidence of
ownership of property as collateral for a small loan. The licensee may
accept only one postdated check per loan as security for the loan. A
licensee may permit a borrower to redeem a postdated check with a
payment of cash or the equivalent of cash. A licensee must permit a
borrower to repay the loan in two equal payments with one-half of the
borrowed amount being paid at the halfway point of the loan term. If
the loan term is an odd number of days, the halfway point must include
the extra day. The licensee may disburse the proceeds of a small loan
in cash, in the form of a check, or in the form of the electronic
equivalent of cash or a check.
(5) No person may at any time cash or advance any moneys on a
postdated check or draft in excess of the amount of goods or services
purchased without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to a check
casher or check seller license.

--- END ---