BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The higher education coordinating board
shall assess the higher education needs in Kitsap, Mason, Jefferson,
and Clallam counties and recommend to the legislature solutions to the
higher education needs. Solutions that the board should consider
include, but should not be limited to, establishment of new
baccalaureate institutions, expansion of existing institutions to
include baccalaureate degrees, and colocation of institutions. In
conducting its assessment, the board shall take into account but not be
limited to the following: Population growth, higher education
participation rates, economic demand and workforce needs, and drive and
commute times to existing institutions of higher education.
(2) The board may contract for an assessment of sites to meet
higher education needs in the counties.
(3) In conducting the assessment and siting study, the higher
education coordinating board shall consult with the state board for
community and technical colleges, the workforce education and training
coordinating board, the local business community, and the existing
research and comprehensive institutions.
(4) The board shall assemble a local advisory committee to assist
in the conduct of the assessment and siting study. The committee shall
include: (a) One city official from each city within the four
counties; (b) two members of the house of representatives, appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives; (c) two members of the
senate, appointed by the president of the senate; and (d) eight
education or business leaders from within each of the four counties.
(5) The recommendations to the legislature shall include, but are
not limited to: (a) The type of baccalaureate institution or
institutions to be established; (b) a business and operations plan for
the institution if a new institution is recommended; (c) potential
sites for establishment of an institution; (d) identification of site
acquisition costs; and (e) identification of costs and a process for
completing a master plan for higher education expansion.
(6) The local advisory committee shall receive staff and logistical
support from the board.
(7) Nonlegislative members of the local advisory committee shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(8) The board shall provide an interim report to the legislature
and the governor by January 15, 2008, and a final report by December 1,
2008.

--- END ---