BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.32 RCW
to read as follows:
For each voters' pamphlet prepared for the general election, the
office of financial management shall prepare the following charts:
(1) A pie chart showing the amount of state revenues generated by
major type of tax;
(2) A table comparing the general fund-state revenues with the
general fund-state expenditures by county;
(3) A pie chart showing general fund-state expenditures by major
expenditure category;
(4) A bar chart showing the percent of income paid in federal,
state, and local taxes by income brackets, as follows:
(a) Under twenty thousand dollars;
(b) Between twenty thousand dollars and thirty thousand dollars;
(c) Between thirty thousand dollars and forty thousand dollars;
(d) Between forty thousand dollars and fifty thousand dollars;
(e) Between fifty thousand dollars and sixty thousand dollars;
(f) Between sixty thousand dollars and seventy thousand dollars;
(g) Between seventy thousand dollars and eighty thousand dollars;
(h) Between eighty thousand dollars and one hundred thousand
dollars;
(i) Between one hundred thousand dollars and one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars;
(j) Between one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars and one
hundred fifty thousand dollars;
(k) Between one hundred fifty thousand dollars and one hundred
seventy-five thousand dollars; and
(l) Over one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars.
Each chart must contain a brief description in neutral terms. The
charts must be placed on consecutive pages in the voters' pamphlet.

--- END ---