BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that students benefit
most from great teachers who are well-educated and knowledgeable in the
subjects they teach. As a result, the state's salary schedule provides
annual recognition for those with either a master's degree or a
doctorate. The legislature also finds that the state is requiring
beginning teachers and experienced out-of-state teachers, even those
with master's degrees, to meet new rigorous professional certification
requirements. The certification process requires these teachers to
obtain fifteen quarter credits or more from a college or university
participating in the certification process. There is no limit placed
on the amount colleges and universities may charge for these credits.
The legislature further finds that beginning teachers, who are at the
bottom of the salary schedule, often leave college with varying amounts
of debt. Although these new teachers are the lowest paid in the
system, they are required to take more college courses, often acquiring
more debt, to meet the additional educational requirements placed upon
them by the professional certification process.
The legislature intends to assist these beginning public school
teachers with their educational expenses by having state colleges and
universities waive tuition for those courses required for a master's
degree or professional certification. The legislature further intends
that teachers repay the waived tuition with future service in the
public schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state universities, regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College shall waive tuition and fees for a classroom
teacher who has a contract to teach and is employed in one of the
state's public schools, who is seeking professional teacher
certification under chapter 28A.410 RCW, and who agrees to meet the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section. The amount waived need
not exceed the minimum number of credits required for the recipient to
obtain the degree or certification.
(2) A waiver recipient incurs an obligation to repay the waived
tuition and fees unless he or she teaches: (a) In the public schools
of the state, (b) in a hard to staff subject or a hard to staff school,
as defined by the professional educator standards board, and (c) for at
least five years after the last year in which the teacher receives a
tuition and fee waiver under this section.
(3) The universities and college shall report to the higher
education coordinating board the names of teachers for whom tuition and
fees have been waived and the amount waived for each teacher.
(4) The higher education coordinating board shall:
(a) Adopt rules to implement these requirements;
(b) Provide the universities and college with documents that may be
used to ensure that waiver recipients accept their service or repayment
obligations;
(c) Work with the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to create a system that identifies those teachers eligible
to receive waivers and provides information about the waivers to those
eligible to use them;
(d) Report to the legislative education and fiscal committees by
November of each even-numbered year with the number of waiver
recipients, the total amount waived by each university or college, and
the type of master's degree or certification pursued by waiver
recipients; and
(e) Collect and manage repayments from waiver recipients who do not
meet their teaching obligations. Twenty percent of any repayment
obligation shall be satisfied for each year that the waiver recipient:
(i) Teaches in a public school in the state, and (ii) in a hard to
staff subject or hard to staff school, as defined by the professional
educator standards board. Any repayments shall be deposited into the
account under RCW 28B.102.080. The board may forgive the repayment
obligation of a teacher who dies or is totally disabled before meeting
his or her repayment obligation.
(5) As used in this section, "public school" means an elementary
school, a middle school, a junior high school, or a high school, within
the public school system referred to in Article IX of the state
Constitution.

--- END ---