BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each publisher of college textbooks shall make immediately
available to faculty of institutions of higher education:
(a) The price at which the publisher would make the products
available to the store run by or in a contractual relationship with the
institution of higher education that would offer the products to
students; and
(b) The history of revisions for the products, if any.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Immediately available" means with any marketing materials
presented to a member of the faculty.
(b) "Products" means all versions of a textbook or set of
textbooks, except custom textbooks or special editions of textbooks,
available in the subject area for which a faculty member is teaching a
course, including supplemental items, both when sold together or
separately from a textbook.

--- END ---