BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person may, during the time periods identified by the
commission, lawfully engage in the following activities in rivers and
streams, as designated by the commission, where salmon or steelhead
spawning occur:
(a) Driving motor vehicles on spawning beds;
(b) Using high-powered jet or propeller-driven boats across
spawning beds;
(c) Dragging anchors through spawning beds; and
(d) Similar activities capable of disturbing spawning fish or
damaging or destroying nests of incubating eggs.
(2) A violation of this section is a natural resource infraction
under chapter 7.84 RCW.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules to carry out this section,
including the time periods when the rules are in effect.
(4) The department shall:
(a) Publish rules adopted by the commission under this section in
brochures that are disseminated to persons applying for fishing and
boating licenses. The department must also distribute the brochures
widely to retail outlets that cater to outdoor recreation;
(b) Work cooperatively with the tribal comanagers for all fish
resources in implementing and enforcing the requirements of this
section; and
(c) Report to the legislature concerning the effectiveness of this
section after at least two spawning cycles of salmon and steelhead have
occurred.

--- END ---