BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No interpretive or policy statement issued by the insurance
commissioner after the effective date of this section is effective
unless it complies with the requirements of this section.
(2) The insurance commissioner must file the text of any proposed
interpretive or policy statement for publication in the Washington
State Register.
(3) Any person may file a written objection to a proposed
interpretive or policy statement within forty-five days after the
notice of proposed interpretive or policy statement is published
stating that the insurance commissioner has exceeded his or her
authority or that a rule must be adopted instead of an interpretive or
policy statement. The objection must be filed with the rules
coordinator of the office of the insurance commissioner within
forty-five days after the notice of the proposed interpretive or policy
statement has been published in the Washington State Register. A
person who has filed a written objection to the proposed interpretive
or policy statement may withdraw the objection.
(4) If a person has objected to a proposed interpretive or policy
statement stating that the insurance commissioner has exceeded his or
her authority or that a rule must be adopted instead of an interpretive
or policy statement and not withdrawn the objection, the insurance
commissioner may:
(a) Withdraw the proposed interpretive or policy statement and file
a notice of the withdrawal in the Washington State Register. If the
insurance commissioner withdraws the proposed interpretive or policy
statement, the insurance commissioner may choose to file a revised
notice subject to the same requirements of this section;
(b) Adopt the proposed interpretive or policy statement by rule,
subject to the appropriate requirements of the administrative procedure
act, chapter 34.05 RCW; or
(c) Notify the joint administrative rules review committee of the
objection to the proposed interpretive or policy statement. The
notification must be treated as a request for the joint administrative
rules review committee to review the proposed interpretive or policy
statement.
(5) If no written objections to the proposed interpretive or policy
statement are filed with the insurance commissioner within forty-five
days after the notice of proposed interpretive or policy statement is
published, or if all objections that have been filed are withdrawn by
the persons filing the objections, the insurance commissioner may file
notice issuing the interpretive or policy statement with the Washington
State Register.

Sec. 2 RCW 34.05.230 and 2004 c 31 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An agency is encouraged to advise the public of its current
opinions, approaches, and likely courses of action by means of
interpretive or policy statements. Current interpretive and policy
statements are advisory only. To better inform and involve the public,
an agency is encouraged to convert long-standing interpretive and
policy statements into rules.
(2) A person may petition an agency requesting the conversion of
interpretive and policy statements into rules. Upon submission, the
agency shall notify the joint administrative rules review committee of
the petition. Within sixty days after submission of a petition, the
agency shall either deny the petition in writing, stating its reasons
for the denial, or initiate rule-making proceedings in accordance with
this chapter.
(3) Each agency shall maintain a roster of interested persons,
consisting of persons who have requested in writing to be notified of
all interpretive and policy statements issued by that agency. Each
agency shall update the roster periodically and eliminate persons who
do not indicate a desire to continue on the roster. Whenever an agency
issues an interpretive or policy statement, it shall send a copy of the
statement to each person listed on the roster. The agency may charge
a nominal fee to the interested person for this service.
(4) Whenever an agency issues an interpretive or policy statement,
it shall submit to the code reviser for publication in the Washington
State Register a statement describing the subject matter of the
interpretive or policy statement, and listing the person at the agency
from whom a copy of the interpretive or policy statement may be
obtained.
(5) The insurance commissioner must also comply with the
requirements of section 1 of this act before issuing an interpretive or
policy statement.

Sec. 3 RCW 34.05.630 and 1998 c 21 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All rules required to be filed pursuant to RCW 34.05.380, and
emergency rules adopted pursuant to RCW 34.05.350, are subject to
selective review by the committee.
(2)(a) All agency policy and interpretive statements, guidelines,
and documents that are of general applicability, or their equivalents,
are subject to selective review by the committee to determine whether
or not a statement, guideline, or document that is of general
applicability, or its equivalent, is being used as a rule that has not
been adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of law.
(b) All policy and interpretive statements, guidelines, and
documents from the insurance commissioner that are of general
applicability, or their equivalents, are subject to the requirements of
section 1 of this act.
(3) If the rules review committee finds by a majority vote of its
members: (a) That an existing rule is not within the intent of the
legislature as expressed by the statute which the rule implements, (b)
that the rule has not been adopted in accordance with all applicable
provisions of law, ((or)) (c) that an agency is using a policy or
interpretive statement in place of a rule, or (d) the insurance
commissioner has exceeded his or her authority, the agency affected
shall be notified of such finding and the reasons therefor. Within
thirty days of the receipt of the rules review committee's notice, the
agency shall file notice of a hearing on the rules review committee's
finding with the code reviser and mail notice to all persons who have
made timely request of the agency for advance notice of its rule-making
proceedings as provided in RCW 34.05.320. The agency's notice shall
include the rules review committee's findings and reasons therefor, and
shall be published in the Washington state register in accordance with
the provisions of chapter 34.08 RCW.
(4) The agency shall consider fully all written and oral
submissions regarding (a) whether the rule in question is within the
intent of the legislature as expressed by the statute which the rule
implements, (b) whether the rule was adopted in accordance with all
applicable provisions of law, and (c) whether the agency is using a
policy or interpretive statement, guideline, or document that is of
general applicability, or its equivalent, in place of a rule.

--- END ---