BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the students in
Washington's schools have continuously become more diverse, with a
significant increase in the number of immigrant students arriving in
the state without the ability to proficiently speak or understand
English. These students represent Washington's integral linkage with
the global economy and provide an opportunity to invest in Washington
state's future role in that international economy.
Further, the legislature finds that there is a shortage of
bilingual teachers and, therefore, a shortage of teachers who can speak
to English language learners and their parents in their native
languages and serve as role models. Students served in the state's
bilingual education program increased by two hundred six percent
between 1990 and 2004. However, there has not been a corresponding
increase in the number of trained bilingual educators.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction reports that
only one-fifth of teachers serving the state's eighty-seven thousand
bilingual students have a bilingual teaching endorsement. Research
shows that students learn the English language more quickly when
provided the benefit of trained bilingual teachers.
The legislature recognizes that until students who are English
language learners become proficient in English, test scores on state
assessments will remain low in comparison to students who are native
English speakers.
To address the communications and learning gap of English language
learners, the legislature intends to promote a grow-your-own approach
to developing an adequate supply of bilingual teachers. The most
effective method to develop an adequate supply of bilingual teachers is
to motivate, train, and invest in students in Washington who already
possess the resource of two languages and who are college bound.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A bilingual teacher mentoring and training program is created,
as a pilot project conducted by the Latino/a educational achievement
project (LEAP) in partnership with the superintendent of public
instruction. Participating students will be recruited in their junior
year and assigned a teacher/mentor. Students selected to participate
in the program must be fluent in English and another language,
including but not limited to Spanish. Students fluent in Washington
state trade partner languages shall be given preference in the
selection process. Teachers/mentors shall work with parents and
students using a teacher mentoring and training curriculum that is
developed for the specific purpose of mentoring and training future
bilingual teachers. Pilot programs shall be conducted in eastern and
western Washington, serving fifty students in the 2007-2009 biennium.
The pilot programs shall be chosen from LEAP school district
educational partners through a process designed by LEAP.
(2) The teacher mentoring and training program shall be a two-year
program, with students participating in their junior and senior years
of high school. Students who successfully complete the program shall
qualify for the future teachers conditional scholarship and loan
repayment program as defined in chapter 28B.102 RCW. To qualify, a
student must:
(a) Show satisfactory progress toward high school graduation and be
taking college preparatory classes at the time of entry into the
teacher mentoring and training program;
(b) Graduate with at least a "C" average from a public high school
or an approved private high school under chapter 28A.195 RCW in
Washington;
(c) Have no felony convictions;
(d) Be a Washington resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012;
and
(e) Devote one hundred hours during each of his or her junior and
senior years of high school to teacher mentoring and training program
activities.
(3) For a student attending a two or four-year institution of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the future teacher
scholarship award:
(a) May not exceed the difference between the student's tuition,
fees, books, and materials, less the value of any state grant or
scholarship aid the student receives for tuition, fees, books, and
materials;
(b) May not exceed one hundred eighty quarter credits, or the
semester equivalent; and
(c) Must be used within five years of receipt.
(4) The first conditional scholarships shall be awarded to students
graduating high school in 2009.
(5) The teacher mentoring and training program mentor shall be all
of the following:
(a) An active or retired school district teacher who meets state
guidelines required of teachers to work with students;
(b) Bilingual and have bicultural skills and knowledge;
(c) Knowledgeable of secondary and postsecondary educational
systems, with the ability to advise students on preparing to enter
four-year degree-granting universities; and
(d) The same gender as the students for whom he or she agrees to
mentor.
(6) At minimum, the teacher mentoring and training program mentor
shall:
(a) Serve as a mentor to two students and receive a one thousand
dollar stipend each year;
(b) Devote a minimum of forty hours each year to approved teacher
mentoring and training program activities;
(c) Meet with students weekly for a minimum of fifteen minutes;
(d) Keep a monthly documentation log with the time, date, and
purpose of meetings with students and parents or guardians;
(e) Receive and review student attendance regularly, and share the
information with parents or guardians at least quarterly;
(f) Monitor students' progress toward high school graduation;
(g) Confer with students and their parents or guardians and
counseling staff on college search, application processes, college
preparatory courses, financial aid, and any other college-related
issues;
(h) Assist students in appropriate course selection to ensure
students can eventually meet four-year college entrance requirements;
(i) Guide students on the registration requirements for necessary
tests such as the SAT and ACT; and
(j) Carry out other responsibilities as identified in school
district teacher mentoring and training program implementation plans.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall assist LEAP in
the design and administration of the teacher mentoring and training
program. The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute
funds to program partners and participating teachers. The
superintendent of public instruction shall report to the education and
higher education committees of the legislature on the outcomes of the
pilot program by December 1, 2008.
(8) As used in this section, "Washington state trade partner
language" means any language spoken in a country that imports, exports,
or uses products primarily produced in the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall create the teacher mentoring
and training program. The superintendent, in partnership with LEAP,
shall determine the criteria for the distribution of funds.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction may, in implementing
this section, accept, use, and dispose of contributions of money,
services, and property. All moneys received by the superintendent for
the purposes of this section must be deposited in a depository approved
by the state treasurer. Only the superintendent or a duly authorized
representative thereof may authorize expenditures from this account.
In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the
account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required to permit expenditure of moneys in the
account.
(3) The distribution of funds shall be consistent with any existing
collective bargaining agreements.

--- END ---