BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.38 RCW
to read as follows:
To promote the stability of Washington's cardiac care delivery
system, by July 1, 2008, the department of health shall adopt rules
establishing criteria for the issuance of a certificate of need under
this chapter for the performance of elective percutaneous coronary
interventions at hospitals that do not otherwise provide on-site
cardiac surgery.
Prior to initiating rule making, the department shall contract for
an independent evidence-based review of the circumstances under which
elective percutaneous coronary interventions should be allowed in
Washington at hospitals that do not otherwise provide on-site cardiac
surgery. The review shall address, at a minimum, factors related to
access to care, patient safety, quality outcomes, costs, and the
stability of Washington's cardiac care delivery system and of existing
cardiac care providers. The department shall consider the results of
this review, and any associated recommendations, in adopting these
rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---