BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that inadequately
mitigated noise related to roadway construction projects adversely
affects citizens' quality of life and property value. The legislature
further finds that existing policies and practices fail to adequately
mitigate such noise. The purpose of this chapter is to establish more
stringent standards for noise mitigation as it relates to certain
transportation projects, thereby providing additional protection for
and increased enjoyment of our communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "A-weighted decibel" or "dBA" means the statistically weighted
scale that most closely represents the range of human hearing.
(2) "Abatement" means reduction in degree or intensity.
(3) "Affected community" means every residence, motel, hotel,
school, church, library, hospital, picnic area, recreation area,
playground, and active sports area, that is located fully or partially
within five hundred feet of any road construction project, and also
means the neighborhood in which each such structure is located.
(4) "Decibel" or "dB" means a unit for measuring sound.
(5) "Department" means the department of transportation.
(6) "Existing noise level" means the level of exterior natural and
man-made noises considered to be usually present within a particular
area's acoustic environment absent noises attributed to, or predicted
to be attributed to, construction of any roadway construction project,
measured in A-weighted decibels.
(7) "Impacted community" means one or more structures in an
affected community that has either an existing noise level or a
predicted noise level of 60 dBA or greater.
(8) "Predicted noise level" means the estimated exterior noise
level, based on the worst traffic noise conditions likely to occur on
a regular basis for existing and future conditions, measured in A-weighted decibels.
(9) "Residence" means any single or multiunit dwelling.
(10) "Roadway construction project" or "project" means all highway
and other road projects that involve constructing a new roadway, making
significant changes to the horizontal or vertical alignment of a
roadway, increasing the number of through traffic lanes on an existing
roadway, and retrofitting roadways for noise abatement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 For every roadway construction project, the
department shall, consistent with the federal noise control act of 1972
(86 Stat. 1234; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 4901-4918) and federal noise abatement
standards established in Title 23 U.S.C.:
(1) Analyze and determine the exterior existing noise level of
every affected community;
(2) Analyze and determine the exterior predicted noise level of
every affected community;
(3) If the boundaries of a neighborhood are not clear, define the
boundaries of a neighborhood after consultation with affected community
members; and
(4) If any affected community is an impacted community:
(a) Identify all mitigation alternatives;
(b) Obtain and consider input from members of the affected
communities on mitigation alternatives;
(c) Based on community input, identify the preferred mitigation
alternative and proceed with mitigation efforts if the department
determines that mitigation is both feasible and reasonable under
sections 4 and 5 of this act; and
(d) Document its findings, conclusions, and community input in a
traffic noise report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except for communities that are in
transition from residential to commercial or industrial use, mitigation
is deemed feasible if the department determines that, based on
engineering constraints, the preferred mitigation alternative is able
to be constructed and will provide at least ten impacted community
structures with a 5 dBA or more reduction in noise based on ground
floor activities.
(2) For communities that are in transition from residential to
commercial or industrial use, the department shall establish rules to
define feasibility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department shall establish rules to
define reasonableness, which must include reasonableness allowances on
a per structure basis for design-year traffic sound decibel levels
beginning at 60 dBA. Reasonableness allowances will provide for
allowable:
(1) Noise level increase as a result of the product, measured in A-weighted decibels;
(2) Wall surface area per qualified structure, which must be at
least one thousand square feet; and
(3) Cost per qualified structure.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.107.030 and 1974 ex.s. c 183 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
The department is empowered as follows:
(1) Except for noise mitigation requirements and maximum noise
levels established in chapter 47.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this
act), the department, after consultation with state agencies expressing
an interest therein, shall adopt, by rule, maximum noise levels
permissible in identified environments in order to protect against
adverse affects of noise on the health, safety and welfare of the
people, the value of property, and the quality of environment:
PROVIDED, That in so doing the department shall take also into account
the economic and practical benefits to be derived from the use of
various products in each such environment, whether the source of the
noise or the use of such products in each environment is permanent or
temporary in nature, and the state of technology relative to the
control of noise generated by all such sources of the noise or the
products.
(2) At any time after the adoption of maximum noise levels under
subsection (1) of this section the department shall, in consultation
with state agencies and local governments expressing an interest
therein, adopt rules, consistent with the Federal Noise Control Act of
1972 (86 Stat. 1234; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 4901-4918 and 49 U.S.C. Sec. 1431),
for noise abatement and control in the state designed to achieve
compliance with the noise level adopted in subsection (1) of this
section, including reasonable implementation schedules where
appropriate, to insure that the maximum noise levels are not exceeded
and that application of the best practicable noise control technology
and practice is provided. These rules may include, but shall not be
limited to:
(a) Performance standards setting allowable noise limits for the
operation of products which produce noise;
(b) Use standards regulating, as to time and place, the operation
of individual products which produce noise above specified levels
considering frequency spectrum and duration: PROVIDED, The rules shall
provide for temporarily exceeding those standards for stated purposes;
and
(c) Public information requirements dealing with disclosure of
levels and characteristics of noise produced by products.
(3) The department may, as desirable in the performance of its
duties under this chapter, conduct surveys, studies and public
education programs, and enter into contracts.
(4) The department is authorized to apply for and accept moneys
from the federal government and other sources to assist in the
implementation of this chapter.
(5) The legislature recognizes that the operation of motor vehicles
on public highways as defined in RCW 46.09.020 contributes
significantly to environmental noise levels and directs the department,
in exercising the rule-making authority under the provisions of this
section, to give first priority to the adoption of motor vehicle noise
performance standards.
(6) Noise levels and rules adopted by the department pursuant to
this chapter shall not be effective prior to March 31, 1975.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

--- END ---