BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.005 and 2002 c 1 s 2 are each reenacted to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of
economic analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of
the year before the taxes are payable;
(2) "Limit factor" means:
(a) For taxing districts with a population of less than ten
thousand in the calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred
one percent;
(b) For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized
under RCW 84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor under that section
or one hundred one percent;
(c) For all other districts, the lesser of one hundred one percent
or one hundred percent plus inflation; and
(3) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW
84.04.140.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.0101 and 2002 c 1 s 3 are each reenacted to read
as follows:
Upon a finding of substantial need, the legislative authority of a
taxing district other than the state may provide for the use of a limit
factor under this chapter of one hundred one percent or less unless an
increase greater than this limit is approved by the voters at an
election as provided in RCW 84.55.050. In districts with legislative
authorities of four members or less, two-thirds of the members must
approve an ordinance or resolution under this section. In districts
with more than four members, a majority plus one vote must approve an
ordinance or resolution under this section. The new limit factor shall
be effective for taxes collected in the following year only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW
to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of
economic analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of
the year before the taxes are payable.
(2) "Limit factor" means:
(a) For the state, the lesser of one hundred one percent or one
hundred percent plus inflation;
(b) For all other districts, the greater of one hundred one percent
or one hundred percent plus inflation.
(3) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW
84.04.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 84.55.005 (Definitions) and 2007 c ... s 1 (section 1 of
this act), 2002 c 1 s 2, 1997 c 393 s 20, 1997 c 3 s 201, 1994 c 301 s
49, & 1983 1st ex.s. c 62 s 11; and
(2) RCW 84.55.0101 (Limit factor -- Authorization for taxing district
to use one hundred one percent or less -- Ordinance or resolution) and
2007 c . . . s 2 (section 2 of this act), 2002 c 1 s 3, & 1997 c 3 s
204.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act applies prospectively
for taxes levied for collection in 2008 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply
retroactively to December 6, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act does not affect any existing right
acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended
or repealed in this act or under any rule or order adopted under those
sections, nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under those
sections.

--- END ---