BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Individuals who have been diagnosed with a
traumatic brain injury face many unique challenges. Some individuals
with traumatic brain injury have also been diagnosed with a mental
disorder that requires active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient
hospital level of care. Others who do not need active psychiatric
inpatient care have been placed in state institutions for lack of an
alternative care option. Such unnecessary placement diminishes the
lives of these individuals and prevents their ability to control the
direction of their lives.
Since 2001 the department of social and health services has
maintained an expanded community services program that has provided
community residential mental health and other services for long-term
state hospital residents who can be better cared for in the community.
The legislature finds that many individuals who have been diagnosed
with traumatic brain injury and do not have an accompanying mental
disorder that requires active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient
hospital level of care can be better cared for in these community
settings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.39 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The current expanded community services program is established
as a permanent program in the department of social and health services
aging and disability services administration.
(2) The department shall determine the appropriate individuals who
may participate in the expanded community services program. To the
extent of available funding, the individuals who shall be served by the
program include those that have been diagnosed with traumatic brain
injury and do not have an accompanying mental disorder that requires
active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of care.
(3) The program shall provide enhanced community residential
support services and personal care for people whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, and who no
longer require active psychiatric treatment in an inpatient hospital
setting.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "expanded community services
program" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.97.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 72.23 RCW
to read as follows:
As of January 1, 2008, any admission of new patients who are
individuals who have been diagnosed with traumatic brain injury and do
not have an accompanying mental disorder that requires active
psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of care to a state
hospital shall be limited to a length of time necessary to stabilize
the individual and place him or her in an appropriate community
setting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---