BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The WorkFirst oversight committee is established for the
purpose of monitoring the effectiveness of the WorkFirst program in
promoting personal responsibility among recipients and in helping them
attain long-term self-sufficiency. The committee shall consist of the
following members:
(a) Two members of the Washington state house of representatives,
one from each major caucus, to be appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives;
(b) Two members of the Washington state senate, one from each major
caucus, to be appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) The director of the office of financial management;
(d) The secretary of the department of social and health services;
(e) The commissioner of the employment security department;
(f) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development;
(g) The executive director of the state board for community and
technical colleges; and
(h) The director of the department of early learning.
The members of the committee representing the majority caucus in
the house of representatives and the majority caucus in the senate
shall serve as cochairs of the committee.
(2) The WorkFirst oversight committee shall meet quarterly.
(3) The WorkFirst oversight committee shall receive monthly written
reports on the following measures:
(a) Temporary assistance for needy families work participation
rates;
(b) The number of recipients enrolled in post-temporary assistance
for needy families support programs when such programs are implemented;
(c) The number of recipients in sanction status;
(d) The number of recipients receiving working connections child
care subsidies; and
(e) Temporary assistance for needy families expenditures in each
major activity.
(4) The WorkFirst oversight committee shall receive quarterly
written reports on the following measures:
(a) The number of recipients who exited WorkFirst and entered the
workforce; and
(b) The percentage increase in earning capacity for recipients who
exited WorkFirst and entered the workforce.

--- END ---