BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Every person engaging in the business of making small loans subject
to chapter 31.45 RCW is subject to a tax in addition to the tax under
RCW 82.04.290(2). The amount of the additional tax with respect to
such a business is equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of one percent. All revenue collected under
this section must be deposited into the short-term cash advance loan
program account under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 31.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The short-term cash advance loan program account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the tax imposed
under section 1 of this act must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used for the purchase of
certificates of deposit from participating credit unions under section
3 of this act. Only the state treasurer or the treasurer's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 31.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The short-term cash advance loan program is created. The
state treasurer shall use the moneys collected under section 1 of this
act and deposited under section 2 of this act to purchase certificates
of deposit from participating credit unions. Subject to subsection (2)
of this section, the participating credit unions must use the funds
made available under this subsection to make loans under this section.
(b) To participate under this section, credit unions must apply for
approval to the director of financial institutions on forms provided by
the director. The director shall maintain a list of participating
credit unions and make the list available to the state treasurer. A
participating credit union must provide the department with compliance
reports to remain a participating credit union. The director shall
adopt rules for granting approval and compliance reporting under this
section.
(2) Loans made under this section must comply with the following:
(a) No fees;
(b) Maximum ninety-day term;
(c) No credit check;
(d) Maximum amount of five hundred dollars;
(e) Maximum annual percentage rate of eighteen percent; and
(f) Refinancing is subject to an additional ten percent of the
requested amount in mandatory savings under subsection (3) of this
section.
(3) A participating credit union must deposit ten percent of the
requested loan amount in a savings account in the member's name. The
amount deposited is in addition to the loan amount and is available for
withdrawal when the loan is paid in full. Any interest on the savings
deposit is credited to the member, if the loan is paid in full by the
agreed date. When a member is allowed to refinance a loan made under
this section, an additional ten percent of the loan amount must be
deposited into the member's savings account.
(4) A participating credit union must provide financial counseling
services to its members through internal expertise or contracts with
financial counselors.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2006 c 311 s 21 and 2006 c 120 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, the short-term
cash advance loan program, and the reading achievement account.
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---