BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.19.020 and 1998 c 163 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:

ECONOMIC TABLE

MONTHLY BASIC SUPPORT OBLIGATION

PER CHILD

KEY: A AGE 0-11 B AGE 12-18

COMBINED

MONTHLY ONE TWO

NET CHILD CHILDREN

INCOME FAMILY FAMILY

A B A B

((0

100

200

300 For income less than $600 the obligation is
based upon the resources and living expenses
of each household. Minimum support shall not
be less than $25 per child per month except
when allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

400

500

600 133 164 103 127

700 155 191 120 148

800 177 218 137 170

900 199 246 154 191

1000 220 272 171 211

1100 242 299 188 232

1200 264 326 205 253

1300 285 352 221 274

1400 307 379 238 294

1500 327 404 254 313

1600 347 428 269 333

1700 367 453 285 352

1800 387 478 300 371

1900 407 503 316 390

2000 427 527 331 409

2100 447 552 347 429

2200 467 577 362 448

2300 487 601 378 467

2400 506 626 393 486

2500 526 650 408 505

2600 534 661 416 513

2700 542 670 421 520

2800 549 679 427 527

2900 556 686 431 533

3000 561 693 436 538

3100 566 699 439 543

3200 569 704 442 546

3300 573 708 445 549

3400 574 710 446 551

3500 575 711 447 552

3600 577 712 448 553

3700 578 713 449 554

3800 581 719 452 558

3900 596 736 463 572

4000 609 753 473 584

4100 623 770 484 598

4200 638 788 495 611

4300 651 805 506 625

4400 664 821 516 637

4500 677 836 525 649

4600 689 851 535 661

4700 701 866 545 673

4800 713 882 554 685

4900 726 897 564 697

5000 738 912 574 708

5100 751 928 584 720

5200 763 943 593 732

5300 776 959 602 744

5400 788 974 612 756

5500 800 989 622 768

5600 812 1004 632 779

5700 825 1019 641 791

5800 837 1035 650 803

5900 850 1050 660 815

6000 862 1065 670 827

6100 875 1081 680 839

6200 887 1096 689 851

6300 899 1112 699 863

6400 911 1127 709 875

6500 924 1142 718 887

6600 936 1157 728 899

6700 949 1172 737 911

6800 961 1188 747 923

6900 974 1203 757 935

7000 986 1218 767 946))

For income less than $720 the obligation is
based upon the resources and living expenses
of each household. Minimum support shall not
be less than $35 per child per month except
when allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

720 186 230 144 178

840 217 267 168 207

960 248 305 192 238

1080 279 344 216 267

1200 308 381 239 295

1320 339 419 263 325

1440 370 456 287 354

1560 399 493 309 384

1680 430 531 333 412

1800 458 566 356 438

1920 486 599 377 466

2040 514 634 399 493

2160 542 669 420 519

2280 570 704 442 546

2400 598 738 463 573

2520 626 773 486 601

2640 654 808 507 627

2760 682 841 529 654

2880 708 876 550 680

3000 736 910 571 707

3120 748 925 582 718

3240 759 938 589 728

3360 769 951 598 738

3480 778 960 603 746

3600 785 970 610 753

3720 792 979 615 760

3840 797 986 619 764

3960 802 991 623 769

4080 804 994 624 771

4200 805 995 626 773

4320 808 997 627 774

4440 809 998 629 776

4560 813 1007 633 781

4680 834 1030 648 801

4800 853 1054 662 818

4920 872 1078 678 837

5040 893 1103 693 855

5160 911 1127 708 875

5280 930 1149 722 892

5400 948 1170 735 909

5520 965 1191 749 925

5640 981 1212 763 942

5760 998 1235 776 959

5880 1016 1256 790 976

6000 1033 1277 804 991

6120 1051 1299 818 1008

6240 1068 1320 830 1025

6360 1086 1343 843 1042

6480 1103 1364 857 1058

6600 1120 1385 871 1075

6720 1137 1406 885 1091

6840 1155 1427 897 1107

6960 1172 1449 910 1124

7080 1190 1470 924 1141

7200 1207 1491 938 1158

7320 1225 1513 952 1175

7440 1242 1534 965 1191

7560 1259 1557 979 1208

7680 1275 1578 993 1225

7800 1294 1599 1005 1242

7920 1310 1620 1019 1259

8040 1329 1641 1032 1275

8160 1345 1663 1046 1292

8280 1364 1684 1060 1309

8400 1380 1705 1074 1324

COMBINED

MONTHLY THREE FOUR FIVE

NET CHILDREN CHILDREN CHILDREN

INCOME FAMILY FAMILY FAMILY

A B A B A B

((0

100

200

300 For income less than $600 the obligation is
based upon the resources and living expenses
of each household. Minimum support shall
not be less than $25 per child per month
except when allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

400

500

600 86 106 73 90 63 78

700 100 124 85 105 74 91

800 115 142 97 120 84 104

900 129 159 109 135 95 118

1000 143 177 121 149 105 130

1100 157 194 133 164 116 143

1200 171 211 144 179 126 156

1300 185 228 156 193 136 168

1400 199 246 168 208 147 181

1500 212 262 179 221 156 193

1600 225 278 190 235 166 205

1700 238 294 201 248 175 217

1800 251 310 212 262 185 228

1900 264 326 223 275 194 240

2000 277 342 234 289 204 252

2100 289 358 245 303 213 264

2200 302 374 256 316 223 276

2300 315 390 267 330 233 288

2400 328 406 278 343 242 299

2500 341 421 288 356 251 311

2600 346 428 293 362 256 316

2700 351 435 298 368 259 321

2800 356 440 301 372 262 324

2900 360 445 305 376 266 328

3000 364 449 308 380 268 331

3100 367 453 310 383 270 334

3200 369 457 312 386 272 336

3300 371 459 314 388 273 339

3400 372 460 315 389 274 340

3500 373 461 316 390 275 341

3600 374 462 317 391 276 342

3700 375 463 318 392 277 343

3800 377 466 319 394 278 344

3900 386 477 326 404 284 352

4000 395 488 334 413 291 360

4100 404 500 341 422 298 368

4200 413 511 350 431 305 377

4300 422 522 357 441 311 385

4400 431 532 364 449 317 392

4500 438 542 371 458 323 400

4600 446 552 377 467 329 407

4700 455 562 384 475 335 414

4800 463 572 391 483 341 422

4900 470 581 398 491 347 429

5000 479 592 404 500 353 437

5100 487 602 411 509 359 443

5200 494 611 418 517 365 451

5300 503 621 425 525 371 458

5400 511 632 432 533 377 466

5500 518 641 439 542 383 473

5600 527 651 446 551 389 480

5700 535 661 452 559 395 488

5800 543 671 459 567 401 495

5900 551 681 466 575 407 502

6000 559 691 473 584 413 509

6100 567 701 479 593 418 517

6200 575 710 486 601 424 524

6300 583 721 493 609 430 532

6400 591 731 500 617 436 539

6500 599 740 506 626 442 546

6600 607 750 513 635 448 554

6700 615 761 520 643 454 561

6800 623 770 527 651 460 568

6900 631 780 533 659 466 575

7000 639 790 540 668 472 583))

For income less than $720 the obligation is
based upon the resources and living expenses
of each household. Minimum support shall not
be less than $35 per child per month except
when allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

720 120 148 102 126 88 109

840 140 174 119 147 104 127

960 161 199 136 168 118 146

1080 181 223 153 189 133 165

1200 200 248 169 209 147 182

1320 220 272 186 230 162 200

1440 239 295 202 251 176 218

1560 259 319 218 270 190 235

1680 279 344 235 291 206 253

1800 297 367 251 309 218 270

1920 315 389 266 329 232 287

2040 333 412 281 347 245 304

2160 351 434 297 367 259 319

2280 370 456 312 385 272 336

2400 388 479 328 405 286 353

2520 405 501 343 424 298 370

2640 423 524 358 442 312 386

2760 441 546 374 462 326 403

2880 459 568 389 480 339 419

3000 477 589 403 498 351 435

3120 484 599 410 507 358 442

3240 491 609 417 515 363 449

3360 498 616 421 521 367 454

3480 504 623 427 526 372 459

3600 510 629 431 532 375 463

3720 514 634 434 536 378 468

3840 517 640 437 540 381 470

3960 519 643 440 543 382 475

4080 521 644 441 545 384 476

4200 522 645 442 546 385 477

4320 524 647 444 547 386 479

4440 525 648 445 549 388 480

4560 528 652 447 552 389 482

4680 540 668 456 566 398 493

4800 553 683 468 578 407 504

4920 566 700 477 591 417 515

5040 578 715 490 603 427 528

5160 591 731 500 617 435 539

5280 603 745 510 629 444 549

5400 613 759 519 641 452 560

5520 624 773 528 654 461 570

5640 637 787 538 665 469 580

5760 648 801 547 676 477 591

5880 658 813 557 687 486 601

6000 671 829 566 700 494 612

6120 682 843 575 713 503 620

6240 692 855 585 724 511 631

6360 704 869 595 735 519 641

6480 715 885 605 746 528 652

6600 725 897 615 759 536 662

6720 738 911 624 771 545 672

6840 749 925 633 783 553 683

6960 760 939 643 794 561 693

7080 771 953 652 805 570 703

7200 783 967 662 818 578 713

7320 794 981 671 830 585 724

7440 805 994 680 841 594 734

7560 816 1009 690 853 602 745

7680 827 1023 700 864 610 755

7800 839 1036 708 876 619 764

7920 850 1050 718 889 627 776

8040 861 1065 728 900 636 785

8160 872 1078 738 911 644 795

8280 883 1092 746 923 652 805

8400 895 1106 756 935 661 816

The economic table is presumptive for combined monthly net incomes
up to and including ((five)) six thousand dollars. When combined
monthly net income exceeds ((five)) six thousand dollars, support shall
not be set at an amount lower than the presumptive amount of support
set for combined monthly net incomes of ((five)) six thousand dollars
unless the court finds a reason to deviate below that amount. The
economic table is advisory but not presumptive for combined monthly net
incomes that exceed ((five)) six thousand dollars. When combined
monthly net income exceeds ((seven)) eight thousand four hundred
dollars, the court may set support at an advisory amount of support set
for combined monthly net incomes between ((five)) six thousand and
((seven)) eight thousand four hundred dollars or the court may exceed
the advisory amount of support set for combined monthly net incomes of
((seven)) eight thousand four hundred dollars upon written findings of
fact.

--- END ---