BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that many agencies
and institutions in Washington are directly and indirectly involved in
offering postsecondary education, preparing people for employment, and
assisting business and industry in accessing a skilled workforce. The
legislature also finds that significant amounts of funding are
appropriated to these agencies and institutions for the specific focus
of meeting needs in high-demand areas. Further, the legislature finds
that the agencies and institutions use a variety of different
definitions and criteria for determining what is high demand.
(2) The higher education coordinating board, the state board for
community and technical colleges, the workforce training and education
coordinating board, the council of presidents, the office of financial
management, the employment security department, and the department of
community, trade, and economic development, shall work collaboratively
to prepare recommended legislation that includes a statutory definition
of high demand for use by the legislature and all agencies and
institutions that offer postsecondary education, employment
preparation, and workforce-related services to business and industry.
The recommendations and proposed legislation shall be submitted in a
joint report from all agencies listed in this section to the higher
education committees in the house of representatives and senate by
November 1, 2007.

--- END ---