BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that certain sites or
facilities may negatively impact human health, safety, and the
environment. Exposure to environmental contaminants can negatively
impact a population's health status. Minority and economically
disadvantaged populations are known to have poorer health status than
the overall population and have higher rates of a variety of diseases.
People with lower socioeconomic status are more likely to live in the
most hazardous environments and to work in the most hazardous
occupations. While many complex factors interact to produce health
disparities among minority and low-income populations, environmental
and occupational exposures contribute to poorer health status.
Therefore, reducing the potential for exposure to environmental health
hazards from site-specific facilities is important to protect human
health, safety, and the environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aggregate total" means the total number of each and every
individual facility or condition that is located or exists within a
five-mile radius, added to the total number of each and every other
individual facility or condition that is located or exists within a
five-mile radius, as a sum total.
(2) "Airport" means any area of land or water that is used, or
intended for use, for the landing and takeoff of aircraft, and any
appurtenant areas that are used, or intended for use, for airport
buildings or other airport facilities or right-of-way, together with
all airport buildings and facilities located in those areas, and
including flight paths designated by the federal aviation
administration.
(3) "Area with a five-mile radius" means an area or location with
a five-mile radius. Such an area may also be designated through the
use of already existing data or jurisdictional lines, such as county or
city boundary lines, five-digit zip code areas, or United States census
tracts.
(4) "Container terminal" means a facility where cargo containers
are loaded or unloaded to or from ships or land vehicles for further
transport.
(5) "Drydock or marine maintenance facility" means a location where
a drydock is located or where marine maintenance activities, such as
construction or repair, occur.
(6) "Electrical substation" means a subsidiary station of an
electricity generation, transmission, and distribution system where
voltage is transformed from high to low or the reverse using
transformers.
(7) "Electric transmission line" means any part of a utility
district's system to conduct electric energy from the place of
production to the point of distribution or at an electric power
substation. The lines and related equipment are designed for or
capable of operating at a nominal voltage in excess of one hundred
fifteen thousand volts.
(8) "EPA superfund site" means a site listed on the national
priorities list under the federal comprehensive environmental response,
compensation, and liability act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq., as
amended).
(9) "Facility" means any site or planned action and includes any
site or planned action that requires an environmental impact statement
as set forth in chapter 43.21C RCW or equivalent land use action notice
by local ordinance.
(10) "Free or reduced-price lunches" means lunches served by a
school district that qualify for federal reimbursement as free or
reduced-price lunches under the national school lunch program.
(11) "Fuel farm" means a facility used for the purpose of storing
and distributing fuel or petroleum that holds more than one thousand
gallons.
(12) "Hazardous waste facility" means all contiguous land,
structures, and improvements on the land used for recycling, storing,
treating, incinerating, or disposing of hazardous waste.
(13) "Highway of statewide significance" means an existing or
proposed state route or federal interstate designated as a highway of
statewide significance by the transportation commission, the
department, or the legislature.
(14) "Industrial factory" means a building located in an area zoned
as industrial by local ordinance where goods or products are
manufactured and that contains a smokestack that facilitates the
discharge of combustion vapors, gases, or smoke.
(15) "Intermodal railway facility" means a facility where freight
is transferred from one mode of transport to another, including
transport on railway lines.
(16) "Intermodal solid waste transfer facility" means either a
facility that receives solid waste from refuse collection trucks and
other sources and compacts the waste into intermodal containers or a
facility that loads intermodal containers onto vehicles, such as
trains, trucks, container ships, and railways, for transportation to
another location, or both.
(17) "National priorities list" means a list of hazardous waste
sites at which the United States environmental protection agency
intends to proceed with enforcement or cleanup action.
(18) "Oil pipeline" means all or parts of a pipeline that
transports oil within a storage field, or transports oil from an
interstate pipeline or storage facility to a distribution facility that
has statewide importance.
(19) "Passenger ship terminal facility" means a location providing
berth for a ship or vessel greater than three hundred or more gross
tons or five hundred or more international gross tons carrying
passengers for compensation.
(20) "Personal wireless service facilities" means unstaffed
facilities that are used for the transmission or reception, or both, of
personal wireless services including, but not limited to, antenna
arrays, transmission cables, equipment shelters, and support
structures.
(21) "Rail corridor" means a railway line or lines on which freight
or passenger trains or rail vehicles travel between an origination and
destination point on the railway lines.
(22) "Regional transit system" means a high-capacity transportation
system under the jurisdiction of one or more transit agencies,
including a regional transit authority.
(23) "Sex offender facility" means a residential facility for
persons civilly confined under the provisions of chapter 71.09 RCW and
includes security measures sufficient to protect the community. These
facilities include total confinement facilities, secure community
transition facilities, and any residence used as a court-ordered
placement under RCW 71.09.096. "Total confinement facility" and
"secure community transition facility" have the same meanings as
defined in RCW 71.09.020.
(24) "Transportation night storage facilities" means a facility or
location that is used for overnight storage of an average of fifty
transportation vehicles, including cars or buses, per night, and may be
referred to as a bus barn.
(25) "Tugboat or barge facility" means a location providing berth
for tugboats or barges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) No more than twenty-five of each of the
following facilities or conditions, as an aggregate total, may be
located or exist within an area with a five-mile radius:
(a) Airport;
(b) Fuel farm;
(c) EPA superfund site;
(d) Oil pipeline;
(e) Sex offender facility;
(f) Highway of statewide significance;
(g) Intermodal solid waste transfer facility;
(h) Electric transmission line corridor;
(i) Seaport facility with one or more container terminals with rail
access;
(j) Passenger ship terminal facility;
(k) Nonattainment area for national ambient air quality standards
as established by the environmental protection agency;
(l) Rail corridor;
(m) Transportation night storage facilities;
(n) Industrial factory that consumes more than one thousand
kilowatt-hours of electricity per month and releases emissions into the
air;
(o) Electrical substation;
(p) Intermodal railway facility;
(q) Areas or zones designated by local ordinance for adult
entertainment use;
(r) Public high school as designated by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction;
(s) Hazardous waste facility;
(t) Tugboat or barge facility;
(u) Drydock or marine maintenance facility;
(v) Electrical substation;
(w) Personal wireless service facility;
(x) Regional transit system;
(y) Population density of the city in which the area with a
five-mile radius is located is greater than five thousand residents per
square mile as forecasted by the office of financial management as of
the effective date of this section;
(z) Average income level is less than fifty percent of the median
county income level;
(aa) Birth rate of women who receive medical assistance or medical
care services under chapter 74.09 RCW is greater than the county birth
rate of women who receive medical assistance or medical care services
under chapter 74.09 RCW;
(bb) Greater than one hundred lots zoned as industrial by local
ordinance;
(cc) Greater than thirty percent of the population within a five-mile radius is at one hundred fifty percent of the United States
average poverty rate as determined by the most current United States
census data;
(dd) The number of children that receive free or reduced-price
lunches is greater than the average number of children that receive
free or reduced-price lunches in the county in which the five-mile area
is located; and
(ee) The population density within the five-mile area with regard
to race and Hispanic origin as determined by the most current United
States census data is greater than three times the Washington state
average population density with regard to race and Hispanic origin.
(2) As of the effective date of this section, this chapter does not
apply to any five-mile area with already existing facilities or
conditions that result in noncompliance with subsection (1) of this
section. After the effective date of this section, no additional
facility or condition as listed in subsection (1) of this section may
be added to or located in such a five-mile area with already existing
facilities or conditions in noncompliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---