BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The state board for community and
technical colleges shall conduct an inventory and survey of all campus-based early learning programs and services for the purpose of creating
a coordinated system of course offering and early learning education
opportunities including parenting education and on-campus child care.
The survey shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Early learning and parent education courses;
(b) Parent cooperative classes; and
(c) Identification of early learning opportunities available on
campus, including early childhood education programs and child care
programs.
(2) As a component of the survey, the board shall collect
enrollment numbers and populations, program capacity, number of full-time equivalent employees, funding sources, and other data needed to
accomplish the goals of the survey.
(3) The board shall also consult with the department of early
learning to further establish processes for developing articulation
standards for coursework and training in early childhood development.
(4) The board shall report back to the legislature by December 1,
2007, with recommendations for an integrated, comprehensive system for
strengthening early learning education opportunities and child care
services offered on community college campuses and to parents and
providers in the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires January 1, 2008.

--- END ---