BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.240 and 2006 c 290 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whoever knowingly transmits or receives gambling information by
telephone, telegraph, radio, semaphore, the internet, a
telecommunications transmission system, or similar means, or knowingly
installs or maintains equipment for the transmission or receipt of
gambling information, other than a person described in subsection (2)
of this section, shall be guilty of a class C felony subject to the
penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021. ((However,))
(2) Whoever knowingly transmits or receives gambling information
over the internet or knowingly installs or maintains equipment for the
transmission or receipt of gambling information over the internet, in
his or her primary residence for recreational purposes, is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor subject to the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021.
For purposes of this subsection, "recreational purposes" means solely
for the defendant's own enjoyment and not as part of an enterprise that
derives income from operating an internet web site that transmits or
receives gambling information.
(3) This section shall not apply to such information transmitted or
received or equipment installed or maintained relating to activities
authorized by this chapter or to any act or acts in furtherance thereof
when conducted in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and in
accordance with the rules adopted under this chapter.

--- END ---