BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature, in the
interest of student confidentiality, that school districts minimize the
release of student telephone numbers and other directory information in
the absence of express parental consent. The legislature finds that
the nondisclosure of student telephone numbers and other directory
information reduces the possibility of harassment of students and their
families by organizations that received student information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2007, each school district shall provide
separate written notice to every public high school student and his or
her parent or legal guardian informing the students, parents, and
guardians: (a) Of their right to request, pursuant to 20 U.S.C. Sec.
7908(a)(2), that the student's directory information not be released to
recruiters without the prior written consent of the student's parent or
guardian or the student; (b) that if they do not request that the
student's directory information be withheld from some or all recruiters
by the thirtieth day of the new school year, the school may release the
student's directory information if requested to do so by a recruiter;
and (c) of the obligation of all males between the ages of eighteen and
twenty-five years to register with selective services within thirty
days of their eighteenth birthday and information regarding how to
register.
(2) The school district shall provide the notice required by
subsection (1) of this section in English and in any other languages
the district provides other district-wide written notice to students,
parents, or guardians.
(3) The notice provided under subsection (1) of this section shall
clearly distinguish among categories of recruiters and provide parents,
guardians, and students with the option of requesting that directory
information not be released to a particular category or categories of
recruiters. At a minimum, the categories of recruiters shall be broken
into (a) higher education and vocational education recruiters and
employers and (b) military recruiters. A request that a student's
information not be released to a particular category of recruiters does
not prohibit a school from releasing information to recruiters in any
other category.
(4) The notice required by this section shall be sent to parents or
guardians and students for each new school year. A school district
shall not release directory information to any recruiter, except upon
express written consent from the parent, guardian, or student, after
the last day of the school year or before the forty-fifth day of the
new school year.
(5) A student, parent, or guardian may request at any time that the
student's directory information not be released, and such a request
shall be honored by the school district.
(6) Each school district shall establish procedures for taking
appropriate action when an individual recruiter engages in dishonest,
unscrupulous, or deceptive recruiting practices or violates the school
district's policies regarding recruiters on campus.
(7) Each school district shall adopt policies and practices that
provide equal access among all categories of recruiters by defining the
frequency and location of recruiter contacts with students. The
policies shall also clearly state what are acceptable and unacceptable
recruiter practices on campus.
(8) Each school district shall adopt policies to assure that with
respect to any standardized test that is offered to students by
recruiters release of individually identifiable results or individual
data associated with any student shall be under the sole control of the
student and/or the student's parent or guardian, who may waive the
confidentiality of the results.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and post
on its web site a model notice and request form for withholding
directory information; a model notice identifying selective service
obligations; and model policies that comply with the requirements of
this section. The model notice and request form must provide a brief
explanation of the federal requirement that student directory
information be shared unless the student, parent, or guardian requests
the information be withheld. School districts may adopt the model
notices and request form and model policies or may develop their own
forms, notices, and policies to comply with this section.
(10) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Directory information" has the same meaning as in 20 U.S.C.
Sec. 1232g(a)(5)(A), which states that "the term...relating to a
student includes the following: the student's name, address, telephone
listing, date and place of birth, major field of study, participation
in officially recognized activities and sports, weight and height of
members of athletic teams, dates of attendance, degrees and awards
received, and the most recent previous educational agency or
institution attended by the student."
(b) "Recruiter" means anyone who seeks to solicit a student to
attend or apply to a particular educational or vocational institution
or program, apply for employment with a private or public employer, or
enlist in the military.

--- END ---