BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department of early learning shall establish a
program for community kindergarten grants for the purpose of increasing
access to full-day kindergarten for more children statewide. Beginning
with the 2007-08 school year, agencies licensed under this chapter may
apply to the department of early learning for grant funding to operate
full-day kindergarten programs in communities where full-day
kindergarten is not available to all children through their resident
schools. An agency that receives funding under this section must agree
to and abide by the following conditions:
(1) Providing at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;
(2) Establishing a learning environment that is developmentally
appropriate and promotes creativity;
(3) Demonstrating strong connections and communication with other
early learning providers;
(4) Participating in kindergarten readiness activities with early
learning providers, parents, and local public schools;
(5) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts, health
and physical education, and a language other than English; and
(6) Providing a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of
experiences that assist students in:
(a) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading,
mathematics, and writing;
(b) Developing a variety of communication skills;
(c) Acquiring large and small motor skills; and
(d) Acquiring social and emotional skills, including successful
participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a
group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---