BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.20.145 and 2003 c 65 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state board shall consider the most recent version of the
United States food and drug administration's food code for the purpose
of adopting rules for food service.
(2) The rules for food service must provide an exemption to the
cold-holding temperature standard of forty-one degrees or colder for an
establishment that purchased its equipment prior to May 2, 2005, and
the equipment meets the standards that were in place at the time the
equipment was purchased. Equipment purchased after May 2, 2005, is
exempt if it was purchased to replace a component unit of a cold-holding system, purchased prior to May 2, 2005, that is comprised of
several smaller units.

--- END ---