BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. (1) The legislature recognizes that
although many regions of the state are thriving, there are still
distressed communities throughout rural and urban Washington where
capital investments in economic development and social services
initiatives could create vibrant local business districts and
prosperous neighborhoods. Providing these capital investments is
critical for the economic health of local distressed communities, helps
build strong relationships with the state, and expands life
opportunities for underserved, low-income populations.
(2) The legislature further recognizes that nonprofit corporations
fill an important public purpose in providing health, safety, and
welfare services to our state's residents. Acting through partnerships
with governmental entities, these private sector providers are able to
increase the amount and quality of services available to state
residents, conferring a valuable benefit on the public.
(3) The legislature therefore finds that programs by local
governments, federally recognized Indian tribes, and nonprofit
organizations to help distressed communities and underserved,
low-income populations could be enhanced by creating the community
development fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Access to human services" means resources to help people in
distressed rural or urban communities access services including, but
not limited to, health care, state programs, education, and workforce
development and placement programs.
(2) "Capital project" means a project to construct either new
facilities or make significant, long-term renewal improvements to
existing facilities in order to achieve a program goal. "Capital
project" may include costs of site preparation; preconstruction
activities; acquisition, new construction, or improvement of facilities
and infrastructure; and purchase of built-in or fixed equipment.
"Capital project" does not include costs of land acquisition; planning
activities or feasibility studies; revolving loan funds; lease
payments; facility maintenance; vehicles; moveable or temporary
operating equipment; or consumable supplies, including software that is
not dedicated to the control of a specialized system.
(3) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(5) "Distressed rural or urban area" means (a) a county that has an
unemployment rate which is twenty percent above the state average for
the immediately previous three years; or (b) an area within a county,
which area: (i) Is composed of contiguous census tracts; (ii) has at
least fifty-one percent of its households with incomes at or below
eighty percent of the county's median income, adjusted for household
size; and (iii) has an average unemployment rate for the area, for the
most recent twelve-month period for which data is available, at least
one hundred twenty percent of the average unemployment rate for the
county.
(6) "Infrastructure" means sewer, water, electrical systems, and
those roads or parking lots that are within the footprint of the
project and under site control of the applicant.
(7) "Local government" means cities, towns, counties, or those
special purpose districts whose statutory purposes are directly related
to the purposes of the community development fund.
(8) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization that is tax
exempt, or not required to apply for an exemption, under section
501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as
amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 FUND CREATION AND PURPOSE. Communities,
whether they are formed by cultural identity, geography, or other
characteristics, can grow strong with a long-term vision and the
synergy of crucial investments. The community development fund is
created in the state treasury. Moneys in the fund may be spent only
after appropriation. The fund shall be used to make grants to local
governments, federally recognized Indian tribes, or nonprofit
organizations in distressed rural or urban communities for high
priority capital projects that further one or more of the following
community development objectives:
(1) Support local community development initiatives, particularly
those that (a) encourage small business start-ups or sustainability;
(b) expand employment opportunities for community residents; or (c)
increase the employability of community residents. Examples include
but are not limited to construction of a small business services
facility, site preparation to attract a new business to the area, or
renovation of an existing facility for small business counseling or
workforce education.
(2) Access to human services that enable community residents to
take advantage of the economic opportunities provided in subsection (1)
of this section. Examples include but are not limited to facilities
that offer child care, elder, or respite care; classrooms for financial
literacy workshops; food bank facilities; or infrastructure needed to
complete a low-income housing community.
(3) Educational and recreational opportunities separate from the
public education system. Examples include but are not limited to
facilities that offer academic tutoring, or athletics, arts, or
cultural programming targeted especially to youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 GRANT-MAKING PROCESS AND CRITERIA. The
department shall establish and conduct a competitive process to solicit
and evaluate applications proposing capital projects that correspond to
the community objectives contained in section 3 of this act.
(1) The department shall notify local governments, federally
recognized Indian tribes, and nonprofit organizations of the
availability of moneys through the community development fund.
(2) The department shall issue a request for proposals, and conduct
an application and evaluation process.
(a) The department shall first evaluate whether a proposed project
is located within a distressed rural or urban area as defined in
section 2 of this act. Projects that are located outside of such an
area shall be ineligible for further consideration. The department
shall next evaluate whether a proposed project is designed to meet one
of the three objectives contained in section 3 of this act. Projects
that do not meet any of these objectives shall be ineligible for
further consideration.
(b) The department shall evaluate the remaining eligible proposals
according to the following criteria. Successful applicants must
demonstrate:
(i) A long-term vision for the development of the community, shared
by local residents, businesses, leaders, and partners, that uses the
synergy of enhanced services, infrastructure, and community
improvements;
(ii) That the state's investment is critical in order for the
applicant to accomplish a discrete, usable phase of the project, that
the project is ready to proceed, and will make timely use of the funds;
(iii) That the applicant has the organizational and financial
capacity to fulfill the terms of the grant agreement and to maintain
the project into the future;
(iv) That there is an unmet need for economic development
opportunities, access to human services, and educational or
recreational opportunities separate from the public education system;
(v) That the project will achieve its stated goals including but
not limited to:
(A) Expanding local economic development opportunities, including
increasing the employability of community residents;
(B) Providing residents with needed human services; or
(C) Providing the workforce and youth with needed education,
instruction, or mentoring opportunities; and
(vi) That the project is a community priority as shown through
tangible commitments made by residents, businesses, local leaders, and
partners to developing and carrying out the project, or other evidence
of its importance.
(3) The department may not: (a) Set a monetary limit to funding
requests; (b) require applicants to contribute cash or an in-kind match
to the state funds requested; or (c) require that state funds be the
last to be spent on a project.
(4)(a) The department shall submit to the governor and the
legislature a ranked, prioritized list of recommended projects for
funding in the department's biennial capital budget request. The
projects included on the department's ranked list must have as their
main, but not necessarily sole, objective local community development
as described in section 3(1) of this act. The list must include a
description of each prioritized project, its total cost, the amount of
state funding requested, and the amount recommended for funding. The
total amount of recommended state funding for all projects on the
ranked, prioritized list shall not exceed ten million dollars and shall
include a minimum of five projects.
(b) The department shall also submit to the legislature an unranked
list of the remaining eligible projects for which applications were
received. The list must include a description of each project, its
total cost, and the amount of state funding requested. The appropriate
fiscal committees of the legislature shall use this list to determine,
in the legislature's sole discretion, any additional community
development fund projects that may receive funding in the biennial
capital budget. The total amount of state funding available for all
projects on the unranked list shall not exceed fifteen million dollars.
(c) In addition to the ranked and the unranked lists, the
department shall submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature all application materials it received and all working
papers it developed during its evaluation process.
(5) After the legislature has approved a specific list of projects
in law, the department shall develop and manage appropriate contracts
with the selected applicants; monitor project expenditures and grantee
performance; report project and contract information; and exercise due
diligence and other contract management responsibilities as required.
The department may not sign agreements or otherwise financially
obligate funds under this section until the legislature has approved a
specific list of projects in law.
(6) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the
department shall include provisions which require that capital
improvements must be held by the grantee for a specific period of time
appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities must be used
for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be
out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall
repay to the community development fund the principal amount of the
grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of
Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.
(7) The grant-making process and criteria described in this section
shall be used by the department beginning in 2007-09 to solicit,
evaluate, and recommend projects for funding in the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, and each biennium thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 ACCOUNTABILITY AND REPORTS. (1) The
department shall develop accountability and reporting standards for
grant recipients.
(2) The department shall submit a report each biennium to the
appropriate committees of the legislature, including at a minimum:
(a) A list of projects funded during the current biennium,
including a description of each project, its total cost, the amount of
state funding awarded and expended to date, the project milestones
completed, and the extent to which the project has met its stated
goals;
(b) Recommendations, if any, for policy and programmatic changes to
the community development fund to better achieve program objectives;
and
(c) The ranked list of prioritized projects and amounts proposed
for funding in the subsequent biennium, and the unranked list of the
remaining projects for which applications were received, as submitted
in the department's biennial capital budget request as required in
section 4(4) of this act.
(3) The department shall submit its initial report by January 1,
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are not
any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 6 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---