BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature recognizes that in order to maintain the integrity
of the collective bargaining process, enable rank and file
participation in labor negotiations, and encourage candid,
constructive, efficient, and effective negotiations between public
employers and labor organizations, records from any collective
bargaining, labor negotiations, or grievance or mediation, that would
reveal strategies or positions taken by any employer or labor
organization during the pendency of those proceedings shall be exempt
from disclosure under this chapter. This section shall not disturb any
right afforded to any employer or labor organization under existing
collective bargaining statutes or ordinances.

--- END ---