BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature maintains a strong
commitment to high expectations and high academic achievement for all
students. The legislature finds that Washington schools and students
are making significant progress in improving achievement in reading and
writing. Schools are adapting instruction and providing remediation
for students who need additional assistance. Reading and writing are
being taught across the curriculum. Therefore, the legislature does
not intend to make changes to the Washington assessment of student
learning or high school graduation requirements in reading and writing.
(2) However, students are having difficulty improving their
academic achievement in mathematics and science, particularly as
measured by the high school Washington assessment of student learning.
The legislature finds that corrections are needed in the state's high
school assessment system that will improve alignment between learning
standards, instruction, diagnosis, and assessment of students'
knowledge and skills in high school mathematics and science.
(3) The legislature further finds there is a sense of urgency to
make these corrections. There is not the time or the necessity to
build a new set of standards and assessments from the ground up.
Rather, the state board of education and the superintendent of public
instruction must take advantage of the opportunity to draw on the
experience of other states. There are a number of states that use end-of-course assessments to measure student achievement of mathematics and
science standards in high school.
(4) Therefore, the legislature intends to direct the state board of
education, in collaboration with the superintendent of public
instruction, to select and implement end-of-course assessments in a
timely manner so that they are a reliable and valid measure of
students' knowledge and skills for purposes of high school graduation.
The legislature further intends to revise the high school graduation
requirements to allow these corrections to be fully implemented.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2006 c 115 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045 or section 4 of this act, acquisition of the certificate is
required for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once
objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection
(10) of this section, a student may use the objective alternative
assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully meets the
state standards for that content area if the student has retaken the
Washington assessment of student learning at least once. If the
student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(4) Beginning with the graduating class of ((2010)) 2014, a student
must meet the state standards in science in addition to the other
content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the
Washington assessment of student learning or the objective alternative
assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) ((Beginning in 2006,)) School districts must make available to
students the following options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) ((Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall pilot
opportunities for retaking the high school assessment beginning in the
2004-05 school year. Beginning no later than September 2006,))
Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year shall be
available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process, for students to
demonstrate achievement of the state academic standards. The objective
alternative assessments shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning and be objective in its determination of
student achievement of the state standards. Before any objective
alternative assessments in addition to those authorized in RCW
28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a student to
demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content
area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally
approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(b) A student's score on the mathematics portion of the preliminary
scholastic assessment test (PSAT), the scholastic assessment test
(SAT), or the American college test (ACT) may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the mathematics standards for the
certificate of academic achievement. The state board of education
shall identify the scores students must achieve on the mathematics
portion of the PSAT, SAT, or ACT to meet or exceed the state standard
for mathematics. The state board of education shall identify the first
scores by December 1, 2006, and thereafter may increase but not
decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state
standard for mathematics.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for students as provided in this subsection (12).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year. The plan shall include the courses,
competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the student to meet
state academic standards and stay on track for graduation. ((This
requirement shall be phased in as follows:
(i) Beginning no later than the 2004-05 school year ninth grade
students as described in this subsection (12)(a) shall have a plan.
(ii) Beginning no later than the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter eighth grade students as described in this subsection
(12)(a) shall have a plan.
(iii))) (i) The parent or guardian shall be notified, preferably
through a parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was unsuccessful, strategies to help them improve their student's
skills, and the content of the student's plan.
(((iv))) (ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported
to the student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments
to the plan made as necessary.
(b) ((Beginning with the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter,)) All fifth grade students who were not successful in one
or more of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment
of student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of ((a)) the student ((described in this
subsection (12)(b))) shall be notified, preferably through a parent
conference, of the student's results on the Washington assessment of
student learning, actions the school intends to take to improve the
student's skills in any content area in which the student was
unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them improve their
student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.155.045 and 2004 c 19 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, students served under
this chapter, who are not appropriately assessed by the high school
Washington assessment system as defined in RCW 28A.655.061, even with
accommodations, may earn a certificate of individual achievement. The
certificate may be earned using multiple ways to demonstrate skills and
abilities commensurate with their individual education programs. The
determination of whether the high school assessment system is
appropriate shall be made by the student's individual education program
team. Except as provided in section 4 of this act, for these students,
the certificate of individual achievement is required for graduation
from a public high school, but need not be the only requirement for
graduation. When measures other than the high school assessment system
as defined in RCW 28A.655.061 are used, the measures shall be in
agreement with the appropriate educational opportunity provided for the
student as required by this chapter. The superintendent of public
instruction shall develop the guidelines for determining which students
should not be required to participate in the high school assessment
system and which types of assessments are appropriate to use.
When measures other than the high school assessment system as
defined in RCW 28A.655.061 are used for high school graduation
purposes, the student's high school transcript shall note whether that
student has earned a certificate of individual achievement.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny a student the
right to participation in the high school assessment system as defined
in RCW 28A.655.061, and, upon successfully meeting the high school
standard, receipt of the certificate of academic achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning with the graduating class of 2008 and until the
graduating class of 2012, students may graduate from high school
without earning a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate
of individual achievement if they:
(1) Have not successfully met the mathematics standard on the high
school Washington assessment of student learning, an approved objective
alternative assessment, or an alternate assessment developed for
eligible special education students;
(2) Have successfully met the state standard in the other content
areas required for a certificate under RCW 28A.655.061 or 28A.155.045;
(3) Have met all other state and school district graduation
requirements; and
(4)(a) For the graduating class of 2008, successfully earn one
additional high school mathematics credit after the student's eleventh
grade year designed to increase the individual student's mathematics
proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the mathematics standards
assessed on the high school Washington assessment of student learning;
and
(b) For the remaining graduating classes under this section,
successfully earn two additional mathematics credits after the
student's tenth grade year designed to increase the individual
student's mathematics proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the
mathematics standards assessed on the high school Washington assessment
of student learning.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2005 c 497 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for the content areas of mathematics and science at the
high school level, the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop essential academic learning requirements that identify the
knowledge and skills all public school students need to know and be
able to do based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210,
develop student assessments, and implement the accountability
recommendations and requests regarding assistance, rewards, and
recognition of the state board of education. Assessments for the
content areas of mathematics and science at the high school level shall
be adopted by the state board of education as provided in section 6 of
this act.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four
and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential
academic learning requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the Washington
assessment of student learning and used for state or federal
accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and
identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an
emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content
expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content
expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of
expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven
working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content
expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing
the Washington assessment of student learning.
(3) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to
develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the
content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in
the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if
each student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements
identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall
administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system
((shall)) may include a variety of assessment methods, including
criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the
essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments,
then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5)(((a))) The assessment system shall be designed so that the
results under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to
evaluate instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate
educational support for students who have not mastered the essential
academic learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the
student's educational development.
(((b) Assessments measuring the essential academic learning
requirements in the content area of science shall be available for
mandatory use in middle schools and high schools by the 2003-04 school
year and for mandatory use in elementary schools by the 2004-05 school
year unless the legislature takes action to delay or prevent
implementation of the assessment.))
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall
be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and
easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The state board of education, in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction, shall select statewide end-of-course assessments for high school mathematics and high school science
that measure student achievement of the state mathematics and science
standards. To facilitate ease of scoring and timely return of results,
the assessments shall rely on multiple choice questions. The
assessments shall be able to be administered online. School districts
shall administer the assessments according to a uniform assessment
schedule and guidelines adopted by the superintendent to ensure
appropriate security of the assessment.
(2) The legislature's intent is that students receive instruction
through credited high school courses in the content areas to be
assessed and have their knowledge and skills assessed after they
complete the courses. However, school districts shall be responsible
for designing and implementing the courses. School districts may
provide instruction in the content areas through integrated courses.
(3) The end-of-course assessments in high school mathematics shall
cover algebra I and geometry. The superintendent shall make the
mathematics assessments available to school districts on an optional
basis in the 2008-09 school year. School districts shall implement the
assessments statewide beginning with the 2009-10 school year. The end-of-course assessment in algebra I implemented under this section shall
be the Washington assessment of student learning in mathematics for
purposes of the certificate of academic achievement under RCW
28A.655.061, beginning with the graduating class of 2013. The end-of-course assessment in algebra I and the end-of-course assessment in
geometry implemented under this section shall be the Washington
assessment of student learning in mathematics for purposes of the
certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061, beginning
with the graduating class of 2014.
(4) The end-of-course assessment in high school science shall cover
biology. The superintendent shall make the science assessment
available to school districts on an optional basis in the 2009-10
school year. School districts shall implement the assessment statewide
beginning with the 2010-11 school year. The end-of-course assessment
in biology implemented under this section shall be the Washington
assessment of student learning in science for purposes of the
certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.655.200 and 2006 c 117 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((In the absence of mandatory, statewide, norm-referenced
assessments,)) The legislature intends to permit school districts to
offer norm-referenced assessments, make diagnostic tools available to
school districts, and provide funding for diagnostic assessments to
enhance ((guidance and planning for students and to)) student learning
at all grade levels and provide early intervention before the high
school Washington assessment of student learning.
(2) In addition to the diagnostic assessments provided under
((subsection (5) of)) this section, school districts may, at their own
expense, administer norm-referenced assessments to students.
(3)(( By September 1, 2005, subject to available funds,)) The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall post on its
web site for voluntary use by school districts, a guide of diagnostic
assessments. The assessments in the guide, to the extent possible,
shall include the characteristics listed in subsection (4) of this
section.
(4) Beginning September 1, 2007, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall make diagnostic assessments in reading,
writing, mathematics, and science in elementary and middle school
grades available to school districts ((diagnostic assessments that)).
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall also
provide funding to school districts for administration of diagnostic
assessments to help improve student learning, identify academic
weaknesses, enhance student planning and guidance, and develop targeted
instructional strategies to assist students before the high school
Washington assessment of student learning. To the greatest extent
possible, the assessments shall be:
(a) Aligned to the state's grade level expectations;
(b) Individualized to each student's performance level;
(c) Administered efficiently to provide results either immediately
or within two weeks;
(d) Capable of measuring individual student growth over time and
allowing student progress to be compared to other students across the
country;
(e) Readily available to parents; and
(f) Cost-effective.
(5) ((Beginning with the 2006-07 school year, the superintendent of
public instruction shall reimburse school districts for administration
of diagnostic assessments in grade nine for the purpose of identifying
academic weaknesses, enhancing student planning and guidance, and
developing targeted instructional strategies to assist students before
the high school Washington assessment of student learning.
(6))) The office of the superintendent of public instruction ((is
encouraged to)) shall offer training at statewide and regional staff
development activities ((training opportunities that would assist
practitioners)) in:
(a) The interpretation of diagnostic assessments; and
(b) Application of instructional strategies that will increase
student learning based on diagnostic assessment data.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Beginning in 2007, the state board of
education and the superintendent of public instruction shall report
annually by December 1st to the education committees of the legislature
on the status and progress of implementation of their responsibilities
under this act.
(2)(a) By January 5, 2009, the state board of education shall
submit a finding to the governor and the legislature regarding whether
the implementation timelines established under section 6 of this act
can be feasibly met. The board shall consider the following factors in
making such a finding:
(i) The expected validity and reliability of the end-of-course
assessments for use in making individual student high school graduation
determinations, based on information from independent national
assessment experts;
(ii) Adequate notice to the graduating class of students who will
be required to meet state standards on the end-of-course assessments
for purposes of the certificate of academic achievement; and
(iii) Other possible factors that are supported by clear and
convincing evidence.
(b) If the state board of education finds that one or more of the
timelines cannot be met, the board shall:
(i) State the reasons for the finding, along with the supporting
evidence;
(ii) Recommend a revised timeline or timelines, with specific
dates; and
(iii) Recommend specific actions that must be taken by the board,
the superintendent of public instruction, school districts, the
legislature, or other entities to ensure that a revised timeline can be
met.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If specific funding for purposes of section
4 of this act, referencing section 4 of this act by bill or chapter and
section number, is not provided by June 30, 2007, in the omnibus
operating appropriations act, sections 2, 3, and 4 of this act are null
and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If specific funding for purposes of section
6 of this act, referencing section 6 of this act by bill or chapter and
section number, is not provided by June 30, 2007, in the omnibus
operating appropriations act, sections 5, 6, and 8 of this act are null
and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If specific funding for purposes of section
7 of this act, referencing section 7 of this act by bill or chapter and
section number, is not provided by June 30, 2007, in the omnibus
operating appropriations act, section 7 of this act is null and void.

--- END ---