BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.17 RCW
under the subchapter heading "exchanges" to read as follows:
(1) The department shall, before it transfers land with an active
grazing lease, conduct and make public an analysis that evaluates the
economic impact of the grazing lease on the local economy where the
land is located.
(2) The economic analysis required under this section must consider
both the immediate effects of grazing cessation on the land proposed
for transfer as well as the commutative effect on the local economy
caused by the cessation of grazing on other public lands in the area.
(3) In conducting the economic analysis required by this section,
the department shall assume that the new owner of the land proposed to
be transferred will prohibit grazing within ten years after the
transfer.
(4) The department shall conduct at least one public hearing on
each economic analysis before it is formally approved by the
commissioner. The public hearing must occur in a county where the land
is located and the department must invite the county legislative
authority for a county where the land is located to jointly participate
in the public hearing.
(5) No land transfer with an active grazing lease may be finalized
until the provisions of this section are satisfied.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.204 and 2001 c 253 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the department purchases, transfers for, leases, or
otherwise obtains land with an active grazing lease, it shall:
(a) Reimburse the holder of the grazing lease for the value of any
improvements made by the land by the grazing leaseholder or any
predecessors of the grazing leaseholder;
(b) Allow the grazing leaseholder or his or her designated
successors to continue operations under the conditions of the valid
lease that existed upon assumption of management authority by the
department. Upon the expiration of the grazing lease, and any
successive grazing leases, the department must offer the grazing
leaseholder or his or her designated successors the option of renewing
the grazing lease for the same length and under the same conditions as
the grazing lease in effect at the time the department assumed
management control of the land.
(2)(a) The department ((of fish and wildlife)) shall implement
practices necessary to meet the standards developed under RCW
((79.01.295)) 79.13.610 on agency-owned and managed agricultural and
grazing lands. The standards may be modified on a site-specific basis
as necessary and as determined by the department ((of fish and
wildlife)) to achieve the goals established under RCW ((79.01.295(1)))
79.13.610(1). Existing lessees shall be provided an opportunity to
participate in any site-specific field review. Department agricultural
and grazing leases issued after December 31, 1994, shall be subject to
practices to achieve the standards that meet those developed pursuant
to RCW ((79.01.295)) 79.13.610.
(b) This section shall in no way prevent the department ((of fish
and wildlife)) from managing its lands according to the provisions of
RCW 77.04.012, 77.12.210, or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

--- END ---