BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that many of the
state's hunters are either employed on most nonholiday weekdays or
attend school full time. This situation limits the ability of many to
participate in the hunting opportunities made available by the fish and
wildlife commission on nonholiday weekdays.
(2) The legislature further finds that the legal holidays
recognized by state law provides many of these individuals with
discretionary time that could be used for hunting, if there were legal
seasons corresponding with the holidays. For instance, the hardship of
missing work to participate in a modern firearm deer season scheduled
for the week before Thanksgiving would be alleviated if the season was
moved to the week containing the holiday.
(3) The legislature further finds that the fish and wildlife
commission should try, whenever possible, to make hunting opportunities
available on holiday weekends. Timing hunting seasons with holidays
would, in many cases, take minimal effort, yet would allow the working
men and women of Washington an opportunity to pursue their sport
without having to miss time from their employment.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.150 and 2003 c 385 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall, when practical, establish general and
special hunting seasons, and other hunting opportunities, to coincide
with legal holidays recognized in RCW 1.16.050.
(2) By emergency rule only, and in accordance with criteria
established by the commission, the director may close or shorten a
season for game animals, game birds, or game fish, and after a season
has been closed or shortened, may reopen it and reestablish bag limits
on game animals, game birds, or game fish during that season. The
director shall advise the commission of the adoption of emergency
rules. A copy of an emergency rule, certified as a true copy by the
director or by a person authorized in writing by the director to make
the certification, is admissible in court as prima facie evidence of
the adoption and validity of the rule.
(((2))) (3)(a) If the director finds that game animals have
increased in numbers in an area of the state so that they are damaging
public or private property or over-utilizing their habitat, the
commission may establish a special hunting season and designate the
time, area, and manner of taking and the number and sex of the animals
that may be killed or possessed by a licensed hunter. The director
shall include notice of the special season in the rules establishing
open seasons.
(b) When the department receives six complaints concerning damage
to commercial agricultural and horticultural crop production by
wildlife from the owner or tenant of real property, or from several
owners or tenants in a locale, the commission shall conduct a special
hunt or special hunts or take remedial action to reduce the potential
for the damage, and shall authorize either one or two permits per
hunter. Each complaint must be confirmed by qualified department
staff, or their designee.
(c) The director shall determine by random selection the identity
of hunters who may hunt within the area of the special hunt and shall
determine the conditions and requirements of the selection process.
Within this process, the department must maintain a list of all persons
holding valid wildlife hunting licenses, arranged by county of
residence, who may hunt deer or elk that are causing damage to crops.
The department must update the list annually and utilize the list when
contacting persons to assist in controlling game damage to crops. The
department must make all reasonable efforts to contact individuals
residing within the county where the hunting of deer or elk will occur
before contacting a person who is not a resident of that county. The
department must randomize the names of people on the list in order to
provide a fair distribution of the hunting opportunities. Hunters who
participate in hunts under this section must report any kills to the
department. The department must include a summary of the wildlife
harvested in these hunts in the annual game management reports it makes
available to the public.

--- END ---