BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington
state's quality of life is based on a number of factors, including a
strong economy, affordable housing, and appropriate infrastructure.
The legislature finds that existing funding levels are insufficient to
meet current and future demands for infrastructure, especially
infrastructure that is necessary to accommodate new population growth.
The legislature finds also that the transportation improvement board's
programs provide a mechanism to ensure that infrastructure funding is
directed to projects that are necessary to accommodate growth. The
legislature, therefore, intends to establish requirements pertaining to
funding growth infrastructure projects from the city growth and
planning program, and dedicate funding to the transportation
improvement board for grants to fund qualifying infrastructure programs
that are consistent with these requirements.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.26.282 and 2002 c 189 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
((In any project funded)) (1) A new program is established entitled
the city planning and growth program and shall be administered by the
transportation improvement board((, except for projects in cities
having a population of less than five thousand persons, and in addition
to any other items required to be considered by statute, the board also
shall consider)). The funding for the program shall be provided from
the city planning and growth account established in section 3 of this
act. The board shall develop grant criteria that includes the
following considerations of the land use implications of the project,
such as whether the programs and projects:
(((1))) (a) Support development in and revitalization of existing
downtowns;
(((2))) (b) Implement local comprehensive plans for rural and urban
residential and nonresidential densities;
(((3))) (c) Have land use planning and regulations encouraging
compact development for rural and urban residential and nonresidential
densities; and
(((4))) (d) Promote the use of multimodal transportation.
(2) In the projects funded by the transportation improvement
board's city planning and growth program, the board must consider, in
addition to any other considerations required by law, the following
factors when determining whether to make grants to local governments to
accommodate projected growth:
(a) Whether the project will improve the minimum levels of service
on transportation facilities that will accommodate planned growth. For
the purposes of this subsection, "minimum levels of service" means an
"a" through "d" level of service on an "a" to "f" scale or other
generally accepted transportation measurement scale; or
(b) Whether the project will enable the local government to
implement its comprehensive and capital facilities plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.26 RCW
to read as follows:
The city planning and growth account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Money in the account may be used only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for transportation
improvement board grants identified in the omnibus transportation
appropriations act, including any principal and interest on bonds
authorized for the projects or the improvements.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.84.092 and 2007 c 514 s 3 and 2007 c 356 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the city planning and growth account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the common
school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data
processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account,
the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental
disabilities community trust account, the drinking water assistance
account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the
drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington
University capital projects account, the education construction fund,
the education legacy trust account, the election account, the emergency
reserve fund, the energy freedom account, The Evergreen State College
capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the
freight congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment
account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll
lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public works
assistance account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the regional mobility grant
program account, the resource management cost account, the rural
Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement
and sidewalk account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the
traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.84.092 and 2007 c 514 s 3, 2007 c 484 s 4, and 2007
c 356 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The budget stabilization
account, the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River
channel construction and operation account, the Central Washington
University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal
and reformatory institutions account, the city planning and growth
account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data
processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account,
the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental
disabilities community trust account, the drinking water assistance
account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the
drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington
University capital projects account, the education construction fund,
the education legacy trust account, the election account, the energy
freedom account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account,
the federal forest revolving account, the freight congestion relief
account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility
multimodal account, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway
infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations
account, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges'
retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the
judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax
account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and
use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster
reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the regional mobility grant program account, the
resource management cost account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the
state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund,
the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund,
the Washington fruit express account, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool
account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington
State University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.84.092 and 2007 c 514 s 3, 2007 c 513 s 1, 2007 c
484 s 4, and 2007 c 356 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the city planning and growth account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the common
school construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the
county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use
tax equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the essential rail assistance
account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the
federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
freight congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment
account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing
protective fund, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the high capacity transportation account, the
state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high-occupancy
toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the pilotage account, the public employees' retirement system
plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan
2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving
account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account,
the public transportation systems account, the public works assistance
account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound
ferry operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle
account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource
management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural
Washington loan fund, the safety and education account, the site
closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows
toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account,
the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Section 5 of this act takes effect July
1, 2008.
(2) Section 6 of this act takes effect July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Section 4 of this act expires July 1,
2008.
(2) Section 5 of this act expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---