BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that school
districts request voter approval for two to four year levies based on
their projected levy capacities at the time that the levies are
submitted to the voters. It is the intent of the legislature to permit
school districts with voter-approved maintenance and operation levies
to seek an additional approval from the voters, if subsequently enacted
legislation would permit a higher levy.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.52.053 and 2007 c 129 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and
84.52.043 shall not prevent the levy of taxes by school districts, when
authorized so to do by the voters of such school district in the manner
and for the purposes and number of years allowable under Article VII,
section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state. Elections for such
taxes shall be held in the year in which the levy is made or, in the
case of propositions authorizing two-year through four-year levies for
maintenance and operation support of a school district, authorizing
two-year levies for transportation vehicle funds established in RCW
28A.160.130, or authorizing two-year through six-year levies to support
the construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities,
which includes the purposes of RCW 28A.320.330(2)(f), in the year in
which the first annual levy is made.
(2) Once additional tax levies have been authorized for maintenance
and operation support of a school district for a two-year through four-year period as provided under subsection (1) of this section, no
further additional tax levies for maintenance and operation support of
the district for that period may be authorized, except to provide for
subsequently enacted increases in statutory capacity. For the purpose
of applying the limitation of this subsection, a two-year through six-year levy to support the construction, modernization, or remodeling of
school facilities shall not be deemed to be a tax levy for maintenance
and operation support of a school district.
(3) A special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by
the board of school directors, by giving notice thereof by publication
in the manner provided by law for giving notices of general elections,
at which special election the proposition authorizing such excess levy
shall be submitted in such form as to enable the voters favoring the
proposition to vote "yes" and those opposed thereto to vote "no".

--- END ---