BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.005 and 2002 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Incremental property tax revenue" means the regular property
taxes payable in excess of the amount that would otherwise be payable
using a limit factor of one hundred one percent;
(2) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of
economic analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of
the year before the taxes are payable;
(((2))) (3) "Limit factor" means:
(a) ((For taxing districts with a population of less than ten
thousand in the calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred
one percent;
(b))) For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized
under RCW 84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor under that section
or one hundred ((one)) percent plus inflation; or
(((c))) (b) For all other districts, ((the lesser of one hundred
one percent or)) one hundred percent plus inflation; ((and
(3))) (4) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW
84.04.140; and
(5) "System improvement" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.02.090.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.0101 and 2002 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon a finding of substantial need, the legislative authority
of a taxing district other than the state may provide for the use of a
limit factor under this chapter of one hundred ((one)) percent plus
inflation or less unless an increase greater than this limit is
approved by the voters at an election as provided in RCW 84.55.050. In
districts with legislative authorities of four members or less, two-thirds of the members must approve an ordinance or resolution under
this section. In districts with more than four members, a majority
plus one vote must approve an ordinance or resolution under this
section. The new limit factor shall be effective for taxes collected
in the following year only.
(2) A taxing district, other than the state, shall use incremental
property tax revenue for system improvements before the revenue is used
for any other purpose.
(3) The state shall use incremental property tax revenue for the
support of high growth school districts as provided in section 4 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
Counties, cities, and towns may not impose impact fees authorized
under RCW 82.02.050, except with respect to school facilities, in the
calendar year following the calendar year in which the county, city, or
town adopts a limit factor under RCW 84.55.0101 in excess of one
hundred one percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Incremental property tax revenue authorized by the state under
RCW 84.55.0101 shall be deposited into the high growth school district
mitigation account hereby created in the state treasury. Money in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account must be used in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The department shall conduct a grant process to award funds to
school districts for the construction, modernization, or remodeling of
school facilities in high growth school districts. Grant applications
must be submitted to the department. The application must be in a form
and manner prescribed by the department. The application must include
a description of the capital facility or facilities that will be
constructed, modernized, or remodeled with funds distributed under this
section and the estimated costs of the constructing, modernizing, or
remodeling activity. A distribution to a school district under this
section may not exceed the amount appropriated to the high growth
school district mitigation account for the fiscal year multiplied by
the school district's student enrollment in the school year as a
percentage of total student enrollment for all high growth school
districts for that year that have applied for funding under this
section. A school district must apply every calendar year to receive
funding under this section. The state treasurer shall distribute funds
to qualifying high growth school districts on the last business day of
June and December, as directed by the department in accordance with the
requirements in section 5 of this act.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
section 5 of this act.
(a) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(b) "Growth" means the percentage change from the prior year in
student enrollment.
(c) "High growth school district" means a school district with
growth for the school year at least one hundred fifty percent of the
statewide average growth.
(d) "School year" means the school year that includes the calendar
year in which the state approves a limit factor under RCW 84.55.0101.
(e) "Student enrollment" means annual average full-time equivalent
student enrollment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall direct the state treasurer to give first
priority in distributing funds under section 4 of this act to
qualifying high school districts that are located within taxing
jurisdictions in which the jurisdiction: (1) Imposes impact fees for
the purposes of school facilities, as of January 1, 2007; and (2) has
approved an ordinance or resolution that reduces the impact fees
received by a school district by the amount of any grant funding such
school district receives under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 5 of this act expires three years
after the effective date of this act.

--- END ---