BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.29A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All leasehold interests in property used for the placement of
amateur radio repeaters that are made available for use by, or are used
in support of, a public agency in the event of an emergency or
potential emergency to which the agency is, or may be, a qualified
responder, are exempt from tax under this chapter.
(2) For purposes of this act, "amateur radio repeater" means an
electronic device that receives a weak or low-level amateur radio
signal and retransmits it at a higher level or higher power, so that
the signal can cover longer distances without degradation, and is used
by amateur radio operators possessing a valid license issued by the
federal communications commission.

--- END ---