BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The limitations of RCW 46.44.030, 46.44.034, 46.44.036,
46.44.037, and 46.44.041 do not apply to the movement of public utility
vehicles hauling up to four poles that cannot be dismembered and
operated by a public utility engaged in the repair of public services
or facilities if the tractor and trailer combination, including load,
does not exceed one hundred five feet and when the rear overhang of
load measured from the center of the rear axle does not exceed one-half
of the total length and load of the tractor and trailer.
(2) The department of transportation shall adopt rules for the
patrolling, flagging, lighting, and signing of public utility vehicles
operating under subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---