BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.160.230 (Job development fund program) and 2005 c 425 s
2;
(2) RCW 43.160.240 (Job development fund program--Maximum grants)
and 2005 c 425 s 3;
(3) RCW 44.28.801 (State public infrastructure programs and funds--Inventory -- Report) and 2006 c 371 s 229 & 2005 c 425 s 5; and
(4) 2005 c 425 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---