BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Sections 1 through 4 of this act represent
core components of a comprehensive initiative to improve mathematics
and science education and achievement. The initiative focuses on:
(1) A regional delivery system to provide professional development
and support to schools and school districts through the educational
service districts;
(2) A tiered support system that provides resources, services,
assistance, and intervention for schools and districts, depending on
their levels of need;
(3) Leveraging existing public and private resources and district-initiated activities; and
(4) Accountability through outcome-oriented performance agreements,
contracts, reporting, and data collection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The mathematics and science improvement
initiative shall provide the capacity and resources for educational
service districts, school districts, and schools to conduct a broad
range of activities, depending on the level of need and priority of the
school or district. The focus of the initiative is on building and
enhancing the quality of mathematics and science instruction.
(2) Activities supported by the initiative include, but are not
limited to:
(a) Targeted professional development in content knowledge,
content-specific pedagogy, differentiated instruction, effective
teaching strategies, learning modules, and mathematics and science
standards and curriculum;
(b) Use and analysis of diagnostic assessments and other data on
student achievement to improve instruction;
(c) Curriculum alignment and development or purchase of
supplemental materials;
(d) Integration of technology; and
(e) Mentors and instructional coaches.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Resources for the mathematics and science
improvement initiative shall be provided through educational service
districts to schools and school districts based on a tiered support
system. The legislature's intent is that resources from the
mathematics and science improvement initiative are provided over a
four-year period.
(1) Tier one: Initiative grants. School districts may apply on a
competitive basis to their educational service district for grants to
support activities to improve mathematics and science instruction. A
district may contract with the educational service district for
services, use the grant for district-initiated activities, or both.
Tier one districts must demonstrate how district resources and
resources from public-private partnerships shall be used to leverage
the grant funds. Tier one grant recipients must identify measurable
outcomes from the activities supported by the grant and report results
in a prescribed format, including student achievement data from
designated diagnostic assessments.
(2) Tier two: Improvement agreements. School districts may work
with educational service districts to plan, develop, and implement a
mathematics and science improvement initiative tailored to the needs of
the district. The educational service district and the school district
shall develop a joint agreement that identifies the services and
support to be provided by the educational service district, the
activities to be conducted by the district using improvement agreement
funds, and the expected measurable outcomes from the activities.
Recipients of funds under a tier two improvement agreement must report
results of the activities supported by the agreement in a prescribed
format, including student achievement data from designated diagnostic
assessments.
(3) Tier three: Intensive intervention and support. School
districts and schools with low student performance in mathematics or
science as identified by the superintendent of public instruction under
section 5 of this act are eligible for intensive intervention and
support coordinated by the educational service district. School
districts or individual schools may receive tier three support.
Recipients of funds under tier three support must:
(a) Participate in an audit of the mathematics or science
instructional delivery system, including policies and practices,
curriculum alignment, teacher pedagogy and content knowledge, and
assessment of overall climate and practice compared to best practices;
(b) Develop, with assistance from the educational service district,
a school or district intervention plan that focuses on areas of highest
need and provides intensive professional development in those areas;
(c) Use the services of an intervention team that includes a
trained and experienced facilitator and mathematics or science
instructional coaches to provide job-embedded professional development;
and
(d) Identify measurable outcomes from the activities supported by
the grant and report results in a prescribed format, including student
achievement data from designated diagnostic assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Educational service districts shall
develop and maintain the capacity to provide administrative,
professional development, technical assistance, and intervention
services under the mathematics and science improvement initiative to
support school districts as required under section 3 of this act,
including:
(a) Administering, reviewing, and monitoring grants for tier one
grant recipients and providing contracted services;
(b) Developing, administering, and monitoring tier two improvement
agreements and providing support and services under the terms of the
agreements; and
(c) Coordinating and providing the intensive intervention and
support for tier three schools and districts, including the
instructional audit, intervention plan, and intervention team.
(2) Educational service districts shall also:
(a) Develop public-private partnerships and seek external grants
and funds to leverage the state resources provided to support the
mathematics and science improvement initiative;
(b) Collect, compile, and disseminate data and information about
the activities and outcomes under the initiative, including student
achievement data from designated diagnostic assessments; and
(c) Develop appropriate reporting and monitoring procedures to
ensure accountability for the use of funds distributed to school
districts through the tiered support system and for the achievement of
desired outcomes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In support of the mathematics and science
improvement initiative, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall:
(1) In collaboration with the educational service districts,
develop a methodology for distributing funds appropriated for
activities under the tiered support system among the educational
service districts and among the three tiers of support. The
methodology shall take into account the anticipated demand and need for
services by school districts in each tier and the size of those school
districts. The methodology shall also reflect a higher priority and
greater need for support and resources for schools and districts in
tier three;
(2) Develop guidelines for educational service districts in
administering grants, developing district improvement agreements, and
implementing intensive intervention and support services. The
guidelines shall not require all educational service districts to
follow the same procedures in all circumstances, but shall ensure
general equity for school districts across the state in how the
districts may access resources under the initiative and the activities
and services that are provided by the educational service districts;
(3) Identify the schools and school districts eligible for tier
three intensive intervention and support, based on low student
performance in mathematics and science. Tier three schools and
districts shall not be participating in other state or federal school
improvement assistance programs. To the maximum extent possible, the
identification of and the intensive intervention services provided to
tier three schools and districts shall align with the accountability
plan developed by the state board of education; and
(4) In collaboration with the educational service districts,
develop guidelines and a common reporting format for collecting data
and information about the activities and outcomes under the initiative
and designate one or more common diagnostic assessments for districts
to use in reporting and monitoring student achievement.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.310.350 and 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
The basic core services and cost upon which educational service
districts are budgeted shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(1) Educational service district administration and facilities such
as office space, maintenance and utilities;
(2) Cooperative administrative services such as assistance in
carrying out procedures to abolish sex and race bias in school
programs, fiscal services, grants management services, special
education services and transportation services;
(3) Personnel services such as certification/registration services;
(4) Learning resource services such as audio visual aids;
(5) Cooperative curriculum services such as health promotion and
health education services, in-service training, workshops and
assessment; ((and))
(6) Capacity to provide services to support the mathematics and
science improvement initiative under sections 1 through 5 of this act;
and
(7) Special needs of local education agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 28A.300.350 (Excellence in mathematics
training program) and 1999 c 347 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 28A.415 RCW under the subchapter heading "mathematics
and science improvement initiative."

--- END ---