BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that
meeting the state's future energy needs through conservation efforts,
both large and small, is a priority. Small changes on the part of
Washington consumers, such as switching from conventional, incandescent
light bulbs to more efficient compact fluorescent bulbs, has the
potential to save thousands of kilowatts of electricity each year.
The legislature further finds that compact fluorescent bulbs are
more efficient, last longer, emit less heat, and draw less current than
conventional incandescent bulbs, which make them a safer and more cost-effective option for use in the home. Therefore, it is the intent of
the legislature to encourage its citizens to participate in cost-effective energy conservation by establishing efficiency standards for
incandescent bulbs sold in the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.260.020 and 2006 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Automatic commercial ice cube machine" means a factory-made
assembly, not necessarily shipped in one package, consisting of a
condensing unit and ice-making section operating as an integrated unit
with means for making and harvesting ice cubes. It may also include
integrated components for storing or dispensing ice, or both.
(2) "Ballast" means a device used with an electric discharge lamp
to obtain necessary circuit conditions, such as voltage, current, and
waveform, for starting and operating the lamp.
(3) "Commercial clothes washer" means a soft mount horizontal or
vertical-axis clothes washer that: (a) Has a clothes container
compartment no greater than 3.5 cubic feet in the case of a horizontal-axis product or no greater than 4.0 cubic feet in the case of a
vertical-axis product; and (b) is designed for use by more than one
household, such as in multifamily housing, apartments, or coin
laundries.
(4) "Commercial prerinse spray valve" means a handheld device
designed and marketed for use with commercial dishwashing and
warewashing equipment and that sprays water on dishes, flatware, and
other food service items for the purpose of removing food residue prior
to their cleaning.
(5)(a) "Commercial refrigerators and freezers" means refrigerators,
freezers, or refrigerator-freezers designed for use by commercial or
institutional facilities for the purpose of storing or merchandising
food products, beverages, or ice at specified temperatures that: (i)
Incorporate most components involved in the vapor-compression cycle and
the refrigerated compartment in a single cabinet; and (ii) may be
configured with either solid or transparent doors as a reach-in
cabinet, pass-through cabinet, roll-in cabinet, or roll-through
cabinet.
(b) "Commercial refrigerators and freezers" does not include: (i)
Products with 85 cubic feet or more of internal volume; (ii) walk-in
refrigerators or freezers; (iii) consumer products that are federally
regulated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6291 et seq.; (iv) products
without doors; or (v) freezers specifically designed for ice cream.
(6) "Compensation" means money or any other valuable thing,
regardless of form, received or to be received by a person for services
rendered.
(7) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(8) "High-intensity discharge lamp" means a lamp in which light is
produced by the passage of an electric current through a vapor or gas,
and in which the light-producing arc is stabilized by bulb wall
temperature and the arc tube has a bulb wall loading in excess of three
watts per square centimeter.
(9) "Intermediate base lamp" means a lamp designed to be operated
with an intermediate-based light fixture for residential use.
(10) "Metal halide lamp" means a high-intensity discharge lamp in
which the major portion of the light is produced by radiation of metal
halides and their products of dissociation, possibly in combination
with metallic vapors.
(((10))) (11) "Metal halide lamp fixture" means a light fixture
designed to be operated with a metal halide lamp and a ballast for a
metal halide lamp.
(((11))) (12) "Pass-through cabinet" means a commercial
refrigerator or freezer with hinged or sliding doors on both the front
and rear of the unit.
(((12))) (13) "Probe-start metal halide ballast" means a ballast
used to operate metal halide lamps which does not contain an igniter
and which instead starts lamps by using a third starting electrode
"probe" in the arc tube.
(((13))) (14) "Reach-in cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or
freezer with hinged or sliding doors or lids, but does not include
roll-in or roll-through cabinets or pass-through cabinets.
(((14))) (15)(a) "Roll-in cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator
or freezer with hinged or sliding doors that allow wheeled racks of
product to be rolled into the unit.
(b) "Roll-through cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or
freezer with hinged or sliding doors on two sides of the cabinet that
allow wheeled racks of product to be rolled through the unit.
(((15))) (16)(a) "Single-voltage external AC to DC power supply"
means a device that: (i) Is designed to convert line voltage
alternating current input into lower voltage direct current output;
(ii) is able to convert to only one DC output voltage at a time; (iii)
is sold with, or intended to be used with, a separate end-use product
that constitutes the primary power load; (iv) is contained within a
separate physical enclosure from the end-use product; (v) is connected
to the end-use product via a removable or hard-wired male/female
electrical connection, cable, cord, or other wiring; and (vi) has a
nameplate output power less than or equal to 250 watts.
(b) "Single-voltage external AC to DC power supply" does not
include: (i) Products with batteries or battery packs that physically
attach directly to the power supply unit; (ii) products with a battery
chemistry or type selector switch and indicator light; or (iii)
products with a battery chemistry or type selector switch and a state
of charge meter.
(((16))) (17) "State-regulated incandescent reflector lamp" means
a lamp that is not colored or designed for rough or vibration service
applications, that has an inner reflective coating on the outer bulb to
direct the light, an E26 medium screw base, and a rated voltage or
voltage range that lies at least partially within 115 to 130 volts, and
that falls into one of the following categories:
(a) A bulged reflector or elliptical reflector bulb shape and which
has a diameter which equals or exceeds 2.25 inches;
(b) A reflector, parabolic aluminized reflector, or similar bulb
shape and which has a diameter of 2.25 to 2.75 inches.
(((17))) (18) "Transformer" means a device consisting of two or
more coils of insulated wire and that is designed to transfer
alternating current by electromagnetic induction from one coil to
another to change the original voltage or current value.
(((18))) (19)(a) "Unit heater" means a self-contained, vented fan-type commercial space heater that uses natural gas or propane, and that
is designed to be installed without ducts within a heated space.
(b) "Unit heater" does not include any products covered by federal
standards established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6291 et seq. or any
product that is a direct vent, forced flue heater with a sealed
combustion burner.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.260.030 and 2006 c 194 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter applies to the following types of new products
sold, offered for sale, or installed in the state: (a) Automatic
commercial ice cube machines; (b) commercial clothes washers; (c)
commercial prerinse spray valves; (d) commercial refrigerators and
freezers; (e) metal halide lamp fixtures; (f) single-voltage external
AC to DC power supplies; (g) state-regulated incandescent reflector
lamps; ((and)) (h) unit heaters; and (i) intermediate base lamps. This
chapter applies equally to products whether they are sold, offered for
sale, or installed as a stand-alone product or as a component of
another product.
(2) This chapter does not apply to (a) new products manufactured in
the state and sold outside the state, (b) new products manufactured
outside the state and sold at wholesale inside the state for final
retail sale and installation outside the state, (c) products installed
in mobile manufactured homes at the time of construction, or (d)
products designed expressly for installation and use in recreational
vehicles.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.260.040 and 2006 c 194 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature establishes the following minimum efficiency
standards for the types of new products set forth in RCW 19.260.030.
(1)(a) Automatic commercial ice cube machines must have daily
energy use and daily water use no greater than the applicable values in
the following table:

Equipment type Type of cooling Harvest rate
(lbs. ice/24 hrs.) Maximum
energy use
(kWh/100 lbs.) Maximum condenser
water use
(gallons/100 lbs. ice)

Ice-making head water <500 7.80 - .0055H 200 - .022H

>500<1436 5.58 - .0011H 200 - .022H

>1436 4.0 200 - .022H

Ice-making head air 450 10.26 - .0086H Not applicable

>450 6.89 - .0011H Not applicable

Remote condensing but
not remote compressor air <1000 8.85 - .0038 Not applicable

>1000 5.10 Not applicable

Remote condensing and
remote compressor air <934 8.85 - .0038H Not applicable

>934 5.3 Not applicable

Self-contained models water <200 11.40 - .0190H 191 - .0315H

>200 7.60 191 - .0315H

Self-contained models air <175 18.0 - .0469H Not applicable

>175 9.80 Not applicable

Where H harvest rate in pounds per twenty-four hours which must be reported within 5% of the tested value.
"Maximum water use" applies only to water used for the condenser.

(b) For purposes of this section, automatic commercial ice cube
machines shall be tested in accordance with ARI 810-2003 test method as
published by the air-conditioning and refrigeration institute. Ice-making heads include all automatic commercial ice cube machines that
are not split system ice makers or self-contained models as defined in
ARI 810-2003.
(2) Commercial clothes washers must have a minimum modified energy
factor of 1.26. For the purposes of this section, capacity and
modified energy factor are defined and measured in accordance with the
current federal test method for clothes washers as found at 10 C.F.R.
Sec. 430.23.
(3) Commercial prerinse spray valves must have a flow rate equal to
or less than 1.6 gallons per minute when measured in accordance with
the American society for testing and materials' "Standard Test Method
for Prerinse Spray Valves," ASTM F2324-03.
(4)(a) Commercial refrigerators and freezers must meet the
applicable requirements listed in the following table:

Equipment Type Doors Maximum Daily Energy Consumption (kWh)

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
refrigerators Solid 0.10V+ 2.04

Transparent 0.12V+ 3.34

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
"pulldown" refrigerators Transparent .126V+ 3.51

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
freezers Solid 0.40V+ 1.38

Transparent 0.75V+ 4.10

Reach-in cabinets that are refrigerator-freezers
with an AV of 5.19 or higher
Solid
0.27AV - 0.71

kWh kilowatt hours
V total volume (ft3)
AV adjusted volume [1.63 x freezer volume (ft3)]+ refrigerator volume (ft3)

(b) For purposes of this section, "pulldown" designates products
designed to take a fully stocked refrigerator with beverages at 90
degrees F and cool those beverages to a stable temperature of 38
degrees F within 12 hours or less. Daily energy consumption shall be
measured in accordance with the American national standards
institute/American society of heating, refrigerating and air-conditioning engineers test method 117-2002, except that the back-loading doors of pass-through and roll-through refrigerators and
freezers must remain closed throughout the test, and except that the
controls of all appliances must be adjusted to obtain the following
product temperatures.

Product or compartment type Integrated average product temperature in degrees Fahrenheit

Refrigerator 38+ 2

Freezer 0+ 2

(5) Intermediate base lamps designed to be operated with an
efficiency of 50 or more and with a wattage of 10 watts or less.
(6) Metal halide lamp fixtures designed to be operated with lamps
rated greater than or equal to 150 watts but less than or equal to 500
watts shall not contain a probe-start metal halide lamp ballast.
(((6))) (7)(a) Single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies
shall meet the requirements in the following table:

Nameplate output Minimum Efficiency in Active Mode

< 1 Watt 0.49 * Nameplate Output

> or 1 Watt and < or 49 Watts 0.09 * Ln (Nameplate Output)+ 0.49

> 49 Watts 0.84

Maximum Energy Consumption in No-Load Mode

< 10 Watts 0.5 Watts

> or 10 Watts and < or 250 Watts
0.75 Watts

Where Ln (Nameplate Output) - Natural Logarithm of the nameplate output expressed in Watts

(b) For the purposes of this section, efficiency of single-voltage
external AC to DC power supplies shall be measured in accordance with
the United States environmental protection agency's "Test Method for
Calculating the Energy Efficiency of Single-Voltage External AC to DC
and AC to AC Power Supplies," by Ecos Consulting and Power Electronics
Application Center, dated August 11, 2004.
(((7))) (8)(a) State-regulated incandescent reflector lamps shall
meet the minimum average lamp efficacy requirements for federally
regulated incandescent reflector lamps contained in 42 U.S.C. Sec.
6295(i)(l)(A).
(b) The following types of incandescent lamps are exempt from these
requirements:
(i) Lamps rated at fifty watts or less of the following types: BR
30, ER 30, BR 40, and ER 40;
(ii) Lamps rated at sixty-five watts of the following types: BR
30, BR 40, and ER 40; and
(iii) R 20 lamps of forty-five watts or less.
(((8))) (9) Unit heaters must be equipped with intermittent
ignition devices and must have either power venting or an automatic
flue damper.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.260.050 and 2006 c 194 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No new commercial prerinse spray valve, commercial clothes
washer, commercial refrigerator or freezer, state-regulated
incandescent reflector lamp, or unit heater manufactured on or after
January 1, 2007, may be sold or offered for sale in the state unless
the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency
standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040. No new automatic commercial ice
cube machine, single-voltage external AC to DC power supply, or metal
halide lamp fixtures manufactured on or after January 1, 2008, may be
sold or offered for sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new
product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW
19.260.040.
(b) No new intermediate base lamps manufactured after January 1,
2010, may be sold or offered for sale in this state unless the
efficiency of the new products meets or exceeds the efficiency
standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(2) On or after January 1, 2008, no new commercial prerinse spray
valve, commercial clothes washer, commercial refrigerator or freezer,
single-voltage external AC to DC power supply, state-regulated
incandescent reflector lamp, or unit heater manufactured on or after
January 1, 2007, may be installed for compensation in the state unless
the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency
standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040. On or after January 1, 2009, no
new automatic commercial ice cube machine or metal halide lamp fixtures
manufactured on or after January 1, 2008, may be installed for
compensation in the state unless the efficiency of the new product
meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(3) Standards for metal halide lamp fixtures and state-regulated
incandescent reflector lamps are effective on the dates in subsections
(1) and (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 19.260 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All intermediate base lamps sold in the state intended for
residential use must display the following information on its retail
packaging:
(a) The brightness or light output of the lamp in lumens;
(b) The efficiency of the lamp as a number, which is the light
output divided by the wattage; and
(c) The actual wattage of the lamp.
(2) In satisfying subsection (1)(c) of this section, the packaging
may not display the equivalent wattage that would be consumed if the
lamp were of a different technology.
(3) The following types of lamps are exempt from this section:
(a) Lamps which consume one watt of power or less, such as night-lights and indicator lights;
(b) Lamps of a type which are not intended to be replaced or
purchased by consumers;
(c) Lamps that are designed to provide heat;
(d) Lamps that are designed to withstand severe environmental
conditions, such as oven lights or freezer lights; and
(e) Lamps that produce light that is not in the visible spectrum,
such as ultraviolet lamps intended for disinfection.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.260.070 and 2005 c 298 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The manufacturers of products covered by this chapter must test
samples of their products in accordance with the test procedures under
this chapter or those specified in the state building code.
(2) Manufacturers of new products covered by RCW 19.260.030, except
for single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies, shall certify to
the department that the products are in compliance with this chapter.
This certification must be based on test results unless this chapter
does not specify a test method. The department shall establish rules
governing the certification of these products and may coordinate with
the certification programs of other states and federal agencies with
similar standards.
(3) Manufacturers of new products covered by RCW 19.260.030 shall
identify each product offered for sale or installation in the state as
in compliance with this chapter by means of a mark, label, or tag on
the product and packaging at the time of sale or installation. The
department shall establish rules governing the identification of these
products and packaging, which shall be coordinated to the greatest
practical extent with the labeling programs of other states and federal
agencies with equivalent efficiency standards.
(4) The department may test products covered by RCW 19.260.030. If
products so tested are found not to be in compliance with the minimum
efficiency standards established under RCW 19.260.040, the department
shall: (a) Charge the manufacturer of the product for the cost of
product purchase and testing; and (b) make information available to the
public on products found not to be in compliance with the standards.
(5) The department shall obtain in paper form the test methods
specified in RCW 19.260.040, which shall be available for public use at
the department's energy policy offices.
(6) The department shall investigate complaints received concerning
violations of this chapter. Any manufacturer or distributor who
violates this chapter shall be issued a warning by the director of the
department for any first violation. Repeat violations are subject to
a civil penalty of not more than two hundred fifty dollars a day.
Penalties assessed under this subsection are in addition to costs
assessed under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) The department may adopt rules as necessary to ensure the
proper implementation and enforcement of this chapter.
(8) The proceedings relating to this chapter are governed by the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(9) This section does not apply to the sale or use of intermediate
base lamps.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 19.260 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may investigate complaints received concerning
violations of this act. Any manufacturer or distributor who violates
this act may be issued a warning by the director of the department for
any first violation. Repeat violations may be subject to a civil
penalty of not more than two hundred fifty dollars a day.

--- END ---