BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The office of financial management shall
create and make available to the public a state budget information web
site. All agencies, including those in the legislative and judicial
branches, are directed to cooperate with the office of financial
management in this effort. The purpose of the web site is to make
information about state budgets and state spending available at a
single location even though some of that information may originate from
outside sources, including the legislature, state auditor, judicial
branch, or other entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The budget information web site shall
contain the following information:
(1) For actual expenditures, expenditures by fund, by sub-object,
and by month at the program level of detail;
(2) For planned expenditures, allotments by fund, by object, and by
month at the agency level, except for the department of social and
health services and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, which shall be at the program level;
(3) For performance and financial audits, copies of each audit
issued on or after January 1, 2006, by the joint legislative audit and
review committee, state auditor, federal government, or private entity
auditing a state agency. Such audits must be indexed by agency, except
for the department of social and health services, which must also be
indexed by program, by type of audit, by auditing entity, by report
date, and by the time period the audit covered;
(4) For contracts required to be filed with or approved by the
office of financial management, the contractor name, type of contract,
statement of work, agency, amounts, time period of the contract, any
contract amendments, and other similar information;
(5) For performance and workload measures, actual and budgeted
measures indexed by measure, time period, and by agency, except for the
department of social and health services, which must also be indexed by
program;
(6) For historical financial information, data maintained by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program in the ten-year
historical database, including a summary explanation of how historical
expenditures may differ from actual expenditures;
(7) For budget information, copies of the governor's request
documents, copies of budget proposals adopted by either chamber of the
legislature, as well as legislative budget notes reflecting the enacted
budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In creating the web site, the office of
financial management shall allow users to aggregate data to the highest
level and view data at the lowest level of detail. The web site must
allow users to compare total expenditures to allotments at the
statewide level for an entire biennium. The web site must allow users
to compare total expenditures to allotments by month for each fund, for
each object of expenditure, and for each agency. The web site shall be
made public no later than January 1, 2008. At a minimum, the web site
shall always include information for the current and previous
bienniums.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In creating the web site, the office of
financial management may link to data maintained by other state
entities rather than duplicating the content, provided that such links
are transparent to the user. The office of financial management shall
consult with the administrator of the courts and the appropriate
committees of the legislature in implementing this chapter. Nothing in
this chapter requires or prohibits the office of financial management
from including local government information on the web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---