BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In In the Matter of the Parentage of L.B.,
155 Wn.2d 679 (2005), the Washington supreme court declared that there
is a common law cause of action in Washington to determine parentage.
The court determined that a person who is not the biological or
adoptive parent of a child can be a de facto parent. The court stated
that the legislature has failed to speak on the subject and therefore
the court was not precluded from providing a remedy through the common
law.
The legislature intends to address the issue of de facto parentage.
The legislature did not intend to create a de facto parent. The
legislature, in enacting the statutes involving parentage, adoption,
surrogacy, and other statutes addressing children, intended the
statutes to be the sole method of adjudicating parentage and the
legislature did not intend for there to be additional common law
methods of determining parentage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.26 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter, the statutes addressing adoption, surrogacy, and
other statutory provisions addressing children, shall be the sole
methods of determining parentage and shall preempt any common law cause
of action to determine parentage.

--- END ---