BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.58.020 and 1993 c 379 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the commission, in order to prevent or
minimize interruptions growing out of labor disputes, to assist
employers and employees to settle such disputes through mediation and
fact-finding.
(2) The commission, through the director, may proffer its services
in any labor dispute arising under a collective bargaining statute
administered by the commission, either upon its own motion or upon the
request of one or more of the parties to the dispute, whenever in its
judgment such dispute threatens to cause a substantial disruption to
the public welfare.
(3) If the director is not able to bring the parties to agreement
by mediation within a reasonable time, the director shall seek to
induce the parties to voluntarily seek other means of settling the
dispute without resort to strike or other coercion, including
submission to the employees in the bargaining unit of the employer's
last offer of settlement for approval or rejection in a secret ballot.
The failure or refusal of either party to agree to any procedure
suggested by the director shall not be deemed a violation of any duty
or obligation imposed by this chapter.
(4) Final adjustment by a method agreed upon by the parties is
declared to be the desirable method for settlement of grievance
disputes arising over the application or interpretation of an existing
collective bargaining agreement. The commission is directed to make
its mediation and fact-finding services available in the settlement of
such grievance disputes only as a last resort.
(5) The following are confidential and privileged and not subject
to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW:
(a) Records of mediation communications conducted under the
provisions of chapters 28B.52, 41.56, 41.59, 41.76, and 41.80 RCW.
(b) Evidence furnished as showing of interest in support of any
representation petition or motion for intervention filed under chapters
28B.52, 41.56, 41.59, 41.76, and 41.80 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.64.280 and 2006 c 164 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created the marine employees' commission. The
governor shall appoint the commission with the consent of the senate.
The commission shall consist of three members: One member to be
appointed from labor, one member from industry, and one member from the
public who has significant knowledge of maritime affairs. The public
member shall be chair of the commission. One of the original members
shall be appointed for a term of three years, one for a term of four
years, and one for a term of five years. Their successors shall be
appointed for terms of five years each, except that any person chosen
to fill a vacancy shall be appointed only for the unexpired term of the
member whom he or she succeeds. Commission members are eligible for
reappointment. Any member of the commission may be removed by the
governor, upon notice and hearing, for neglect of duty or malfeasance
in office, but for no other cause. Commission members are not eligible
for state retirement under chapter 41.40 RCW by virtue of their service
on the commission. Members of the commission shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall receive reimbursement for
official travel and other expenses at the same rate and on the same
terms as provided for the transportation commission by RCW 47.01.061.
The payments shall be made from the Puget Sound ferry operations
account.
(2) The commission shall: (a) Adjust all complaints, grievances,
and disputes between labor and management arising out of the operation
of the ferry system as provided in RCW 47.64.150; (b) provide for
impasse mediation as required in RCW 47.64.210; (c) provide salary
surveys as required in RCW 47.64.220; and (d) perform those duties
required in RCW 47.64.300.
(3)(a) In adjudicating all complaints, grievances, and disputes,
the party claiming labor disputes shall, in writing, notify the
commission, which shall make careful inquiry into the cause thereof and
issue an order advising the ferry employee, or the ferry employee
organization representing him or her, and the department of
transportation, as to the decision of the commission.
(b) The parties are entitled to offer evidence relating to disputes
at all hearings conducted by the commission. The orders and awards of
the commission are final and binding upon any ferry employee or
employees or their representative affected thereby and upon the
department.
(c) The commission shall adopt rules of procedure under chapter
34.05 RCW.
(d) The commission has the authority to subpoena any ferry employee
or employees, or their representatives, and any member or
representative of the department, and any witnesses. The commission
may require attendance of witnesses and the production of all pertinent
records at any hearings held by the commission. The subpoenas of the
commission are enforceable by order of any superior court in the state
of Washington for the county within which the proceeding may be
pending. The commission may hire staff as necessary, appoint
consultants, enter into contracts, and conduct studies as reasonably
necessary to carry out this chapter.
(4) Records of mediation communications and evidence furnished as
showing of interest in support of any representation petition or motion
for intervention are confidential and privileged and not subject to
public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

--- END ---