BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall study the feasibility of implementing a state tax
policy disallowing employers from claiming tax preferences if the
employer requires employee participation in employer-to-employee
communications regarding certain political, religious, or labor
organizing positions of the employer. The committee shall provide the
conclusions of its study in the form of a report. The report, in its
analysis of implementing policy to accomplish this objective, shall
address: Constitutional and other legal issues; revenue and other
economic impacts; interaction with collective bargaining agreements;
difficulty of tax administration and enforcement; efforts in other
states to implement similar policy; and types of industries that are
likely to be impacted. The report is due to the fiscal committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2007.

--- END ---