BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.54.110 and 2006 c 332 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county may adopt an ordinance
creating a ferry district in all or a portion of the area of the
county, including the area within the corporate limits of any city or
town within the county. The ordinance may be adopted only after a
public hearing has been held on the creation of a ferry district, and
the county legislative authority makes a finding that it is in the
public interest to create the district.
(2) A ferry district is a municipal corporation, an independent
taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the
state Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of
Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.
(3) A ferry district is a body corporate and possesses all the
usual powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as all other
powers that may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by statute,
including, but not limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff,
and services, to enter into contracts, and to sue and be sued.
(4) The members of the county legislative authority, acting ex
officio and independently, shall compose the governing body of any
ferry district that is created within the county. The voters of a
ferry district must be registered voters residing within the boundaries
of the district.
(5) A county with a population greater than one million persons and
having a boundary on Puget Sound, or a county to the west of Puget
Sound with a population greater than two hundred thirty thousand but
less than three hundred thousand persons, proposing to create a ferry
district to assume a passenger-only ferry route between Vashon and
Seattle, including an expansion of that route to include Southworth,
shall first receive approval from the governor after submitting a
complete business plan to the governor and the legislature by November
1, 2006. The business plan must, at a minimum, include hours of
operation, vessel needs, labor needs, proposed routes, passenger
terminal facilities, passenger rates, anticipated federal and local
funding, coordination with Washington state ferry system, coordination
with existing transit providers, long-term operation and maintenance
needs, and long-term financial plan. The business plan may include
provisions regarding coordination with an appropriate county to
participate in a joint ferry under RCW 36.54.030 through 36.54.070. In
order to be considered for assuming the route, the ferry district shall
ensure that the route will be operated only by the ferry district and
not contracted out to a private entity, all existing labor agreements
will be honored, and operations will begin no later than July 1,
((2007)) 2008. If the route is to be expanded to include serving
Southworth, the ferry district shall enter into an interlocal agreement
with the public transportation benefit area serving the Southworth
ferry terminal within thirty days of beginning Southworth ferry
service. For the purposes of this subsection, Puget Sound is
considered as extending north to Admiralty Inlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 30, 2007.

--- END ---