BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.39A.240 and 2002 c 3 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 74.39A.030 and
74.39A.095 and 74.39A.220 through 74.39A.300, 41.56.026, 70.127.041,
((and)) 74.09.740, and section 3 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the home care quality authority.
(2) "Board" means the board created under RCW 74.39A.230.
(3) "Caregiver" means the same as in RCW 70.128.230.
(4) "Consumer" means a person to whom an individual provider
provides any such services.
(((4))) (5) "Direct care worker" means any caregiver, except the
provider and the resident manager, working in an adult family home.
(6) "Individual provider" means a person, including a personal
aide, who has contracted with the department to provide personal care
or respite care services to functionally disabled persons under the
medicaid personal care, community options program entry system, chore
services program, or respite care program, or to provide respite care
or residential services and support to persons with developmental
disabilities under chapter 71A.12 RCW, or to provide respite care as
defined in RCW 74.13.270, or to provide care as direct care workers in
adult family homes.
(7) "Individual provider direct care worker" means any caregiver
reclassified as an individual provider under section 3 of this act.
(8) "Provider" means the same as in RCW 70.128.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.39A.270 and 2006 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer, as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW, of
individual providers, who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, are public employees as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW. To
accommodate the role of the state as payor for the community-based
services provided under this chapter and to ensure coordination with
state employee collective bargaining under chapter 41.80 RCW and the
coordination necessary to implement RCW 74.39A.300, the public employer
shall be represented for bargaining purposes by the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW. The governor or
governor's designee shall periodically consult with the authority
during the collective bargaining process to allow the authority to
communicate issues relating to the long-term in-home care services
received by consumers. The governor or the governor's designee shall
consult the authority on all issues for which the exclusive bargaining
representative requests to engage in collective bargaining under
subsection (6) of this section. The authority shall work with the
developmental disabilities council, the governor's committee on
disability issues and employment, the state council on aging, and other
consumer advocacy organizations to obtain informed input from consumers
on their interests, including impacts on consumer choice, for all
issues proposed for collective bargaining under subsection (6) of this
section.
(2) Chapter 41.56 RCW governs the collective bargaining
relationship between the governor and individual providers, except as
otherwise expressly provided in this chapter and except as follows:
(a) The only unit appropriate for the purpose of collective
bargaining under RCW 41.56.060 is a statewide unit of all individual
providers;
(b)(i) The showing of interest required to request an election
under RCW 41.56.060 is ten percent of the unit, and any intervener
seeking to appear on the ballot must make the same showing of interest;
(ii) For purposes of an election to become part of the unit, the
showing of interest required to request an election under RCW 41.56.060
is ten percent of direct care workers in adult family homes, and any
intervener seeking to appear on the ballot must make the same showing
of interest. To determine the total number of direct care workers in
adult family homes, the commission shall require providers to provide
lists of direct care workers in adult family homes to the commission
including home addresses, by October 1, 2007;
(c) The mediation and interest arbitration provisions of RCW
41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and 41.56.480 apply, except that:
(i) With respect to commencement of negotiations between the
governor and the bargaining representative of individual providers,
negotiations shall be commenced by May 1st of any year prior to the
year in which an existing collective bargaining agreement expires;
(ii) With respect to factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel, the panel shall consider the financial
ability of the state to pay for the compensation and fringe benefit
provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; and
(iii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit
provisions of the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, is not
binding on the authority or the state;
(d) Individual providers do not have the right to strike; and
(e) Individual providers who are related to, or family members of,
consumers or prospective consumers are not, for that reason, exempt
from this chapter or chapter 41.56 RCW.
(3) Individual providers who are public employees solely for the
purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this section
are not, for that reason, employees of the state, its political
subdivisions, or an area agency on aging for any purpose. Chapter
41.56 RCW applies only to the governance of the collective bargaining
relationship between the employer and individual providers as provided
in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4)(a) Consumers and prospective consumers retain the right to
select, hire, supervise the work of, and terminate any individual
provider providing services to them. Consumers may elect to receive
long-term in-home care services from individual providers who are not
referred to them by the authority.
(b) Adult family home providers retain the right to select, hire,
supervise the work of, and terminate any individual provider direct
care worker.
(5) In implementing and administering this chapter, neither the
authority nor any of its contractors may reduce or increase the hours
of service for any consumer below or above the amount determined to be
necessary under any assessment prepared by the department or an area
agency on aging.
(6) Except as expressly limited in this section ((and)), RCW
74.39A.300, and section 3 of this act, the wages, hours, and working
conditions of individual providers are determined solely through
collective bargaining as provided in this chapter. No agency or
department of the state may establish policies or rules governing the
wages or hours of individual providers. However, this subsection does
not modify:
(a) The department's authority to establish a plan of care for each
consumer or its core responsibility to manage long-term in-home care
services under this chapter, including determination of the level of
care that each consumer is eligible to receive. However, at the
request of the exclusive bargaining representative, the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in
collective bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030(4), with the
exclusive bargaining representative over how the department's core
responsibility affects hours of work for individual providers. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to require collective bargaining
over an individual consumer's plan of care;
(b) The department's authority to terminate its contracts with
individual providers who are not adequately meeting the needs of a
particular consumer, or to deny a contract under RCW 74.39A.095(8);
(c) The consumer's right to assign hours to one or more individual
providers selected by the consumer within the maximum hours determined
by his or her plan of care;
(d) The consumer's right to select, hire, terminate, supervise the
work of, and determine the conditions of employment for each individual
provider providing services to the consumer under this chapter;
(e) The adult family home provider's right to select, hire,
terminate, supervise the work of, and determine the conditions of
employment for each individual provider direct care worker;
(f) The department's obligation to comply with the federal medicaid
statute and regulations and the terms of any community-based waiver
granted by the federal department of health and human services and to
ensure federal financial participation in the provision of the
services; and
(((f))) (g) The legislature's right to make programmatic
modifications to the delivery of state services under this title,
including standards of eligibility of consumers and individual
providers participating in the programs under this title, and the
nature of services provided. The governor shall not enter into,
extend, or renew any agreement under this chapter that does not
expressly reserve the legislative rights described in this subsection
(6)(((f))) (g).
(7)(a) The state, the department, the authority, the area agencies
on aging, or their contractors under this chapter may not be held
vicariously or jointly liable for the action or inaction of any
individual provider or prospective individual provider, whether or not
that individual provider or prospective individual provider was
included on the authority's referral registry or referred to a consumer
or prospective consumer. The existence of a collective bargaining
agreement, the placement of an individual provider on the referral
registry, or the development or approval of a plan of care for a
consumer who chooses to use the services of an individual provider and
the provision of case management services to that consumer, by the
department or an area agency on aging, does not constitute a special
relationship with the consumer.
(b) The members of the board are immune from any liability
resulting from implementation of this chapter.
(8) Nothing in this section affects the state's responsibility with
respect to unemployment insurance for individual providers. However,
individual providers are not to be considered, as a result of the state
assuming this responsibility, employees of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall establish a program to improve quality care
and recruitment and retention of direct care workers in adult family
homes by integrating adult family home caregivers into the individual
provider program, consistent with the following:
(1) For all hours of care provided to medicaid-funded clients, all
direct care workers in adult family homes statewide shall be
reclassified as individual providers.
(2) The department of social and health services shall determine
the number of hours authorized for medicaid clients in adult family
homes, taking into consideration acuity levels as needed. The
department may establish authorized hours according to the ratio of the
number of hours spent caring for medicaid clients verses nonmedicaid
clients in adult family homes.
(3) Direct care workers in adult family homes shall not be
reclassified as individual providers for hours of care provided to
nonmedicaid clients.
(4) Individual provider direct care workers in adult family homes
shall be afforded all the benefits of and be subject to the terms and
conditions of any collective bargaining agreement for individual
providers established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---