BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes it is critically
important for Washingtonians to invest in life science learning centers
in order to move Washington forward and maintain the state's position
as a world leader in the industries dependent on higher levels of life
science research and learning.
The legislature finds that it is critical to support new and
growing sectors of our economy such as the life sciences and lay a
foundation that will help the private sector to succeed. It is
important to stimulate interest in the life science fields, to improve
workers' skills and articulate life science learning with all levels of
public education, the community, and other state agencies that can
connect the learning with economic development.
The legislature further finds that it is critical to provide skills
for the state's citizens in the changing economy by providing learning
opportunities at the community level for more people. Traditional
funding levels should be enhanced, accelerated construction and
operation of life science learning must occur, and knowledge transfer
must be involved.
It is important for Washington, as part of its strategy to fulfill
a life sciences vision to assure Washington's citizens and companies
are uniquely positioned as world leaders in the life sciences, to stir
the minds of our childrens' interest in life sciences. It is also
important to provide first-hand hands-on instruction, and stimulating
community-based learning opportunities that steer young people into the
life sciences employment fields.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to develop and fund
the construction and operation of life science learning centers in
strategic communities in Washington state. These centers, like current
education skill centers, must be community-based and demonstrate
multiple local partnerships, including local public school districts
and community colleges, to assure community connectedness. These
centers must also offer geographic and natural resource uniqueness to
assure that the physical locations of these centers foster educational
opportunities and stimulation. It is also necessary to provide an
articulated education program at life science learning centers that
will include the educational interaction between students of all ages
with each other and with established life science professionals to
assure the transfer of knowledge, the encouragement of younger people
to enter life sciences fields, as well as networking and mentoring.
Special consideration should be given to communities that also have a
four-year public institution of higher education that has an emphasis
on life sciences, natural sciences, or both.
The legislature furthermore declares that life science learning
centers should receive unique and enriched capital and operational
funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the department of community, trade, and economic
development, shall establish a competitive process to solicit proposals
for and prioritize collaborative life science learning center capital
projects for potential funding in the state capital budget. The office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules governing
project eligibility and evaluation criteria.
(2) Application for funding of specific projects may be made to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction by collaborative
partnerships formed to deliver life science educational programs. Such
partnerships must include at least one public school district. Other
partnering entities may include, but are not limited to, local
governments, state natural resource agencies, community colleges,
nonprofit corporations, tribal governments, and other entities, as
determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, with
the advice of leaders in life sciences fields, including but not
limited to representatives from state natural resource agencies,
private business, public community and technical colleges, as well as
public baccalaureate institutions, shall establish and submit a
prioritized list of life science learning center capital projects to
the governor and the legislature in the office of the superintendent of
public instruction's biennial capital budget request beginning with the
2009-2011 biennium, and each biennium thereafter. The list shall
include a description of each project, proposed life science
curriculum, start-up and ongoing operational costs, and the amount of
recommended state capital budget funding. The prioritized list shall
be developed through open and public meetings.
(4) After the legislature has approved a specific list of projects,
the department of community, trade, and economic development shall
develop and manage appropriate contracts with the selected applicants.
The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially
obligate funds under this section until the legislature has approved a
specific list of projects.
(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall include
provisions requiring that capital improvements be held by the grantee
for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant
and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If
the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the
contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The state of Washington shall fund collaborative life science
learning centers using an enhanced education operating formula, similar
to that of skill centers under the public K-12 school system.
Operational funding shall flow through the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to the participating local school districts.
Other participating state natural resource agencies, public community
and technical colleges, and universities are also eligible to receive
operational funding to nurture their active participation. Part of
this funding shall also provide for participation in the administrative
operations of these life science learning centers by community-based
nonprofit partners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of thirteen million two hundred
ninety thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2009, from the state
building construction account to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction for the construction of the Columbia Springs
environmental education center located in Vancouver, Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The sum of eighteen thousand seven hundred
fifty dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction for operational
expenses of the Columbia Springs environmental education center located
in Vancouver, Washington. It is the intent of the legislature that
enhanced operational funding will be made available upon completion of
the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---