BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.45.060 and 2005 c 450 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at
the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the selling
price. An amount equal to six and one-tenth percent of the proceeds of
this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the public works
assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050. An amount equal to one
and six-tenths percent of the proceeds of this tax to the state
treasurer shall be deposited in the city-county assistance account
created in RCW 43.08.290. By April 1st of each fiscal year, an amount
equal to one hundred fifty million dollars and an additional amount
determined under section 2 of this act shall be deposited in the high
growth school district assistance account created in section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The high growth school district assistance account is created
in the state treasury. All receipts from RCW 82.45.060 must be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used solely
for system improvements for school facilities within high growth
districts.
(2) By June 30th of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall
distribute money in the account in the following manner:
(a) Fifty million dollars shall be distributed to each school
district that received impact fees during the 2006-07 school year based
on the amount of impact fees received that year as provided by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(b) An additional amount shall be distributed to each high growth
school district that received impact fees during the 2006-07 school
year equal to twenty-five percent of the impact fees received that year
as provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
and
(c) An additional amount shall be distributed to any high growth
school district that did not receive impact fees in the 2006-07 school
year. The amount is equal to the total number of actual full-time
equivalent students in the school district as of May 1st multiplied by
the product of twenty-five percent and the average statewide impact
fees per actual full-time equivalent students as of May 1st. This
amount shall be based on the amount of impact fees collected in the
preceding calendar year and the number of actual full-time equivalent
students in the current school year as of May 1st.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "High growth" means actual enrollment, as provided by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, on May 1st of the
current school year that is at least ten percent greater than
enrollment on May 1st of the school year three years prior to the
current school year.
(b) "Impact fee" means a fee imposed pursuant to RCW 82.02.050
through 82.02.090 for system improvements for school facilities.
(c) "System improvement" means the same as in RCW 82.02.090.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.02.090 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 48 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
definitions shall apply in RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090:
(1) "Development activity" means any construction or expansion of
a building, structure, or use, any change in use of a building or
structure, or any changes in the use of land, that creates additional
demand and need for public facilities.
(2) "Development approval" means any written authorization from a
county, city, or town which authorizes the commencement of development
activity.
(3) "Impact fee" means a payment of money imposed upon development
as a condition of development approval to pay for public facilities
needed to serve new growth and development, and that is reasonably
related to the new development that creates additional demand and need
for public facilities, that is a proportionate share of the cost of the
public facilities, and that is used for facilities that reasonably
benefit the new development. "Impact fee" does not include a
reasonable permit or application fee.
(4) "Owner" means the owner of record of real property, although
when real property is being purchased under a real estate contract, the
purchaser shall be considered the owner of the real property if the
contract is recorded.
(5) "Proportionate share" means that portion of the cost of public
facility improvements that are reasonably related to the service
demands and needs of new development.
(6) "Project improvements" mean site improvements and facilities
that are planned and designed to provide service for a particular
development project and that are necessary for the use and convenience
of the occupants or users of the project, and are not system
improvements. No improvement or facility included in a capital
facilities plan approved by the governing body of the county, city, or
town shall be considered a project improvement.
(7) "Public facilities" means the following capital facilities
owned or operated by government entities: (a) Public streets and
roads; (b) publicly owned parks, open space, and recreation facilities;
and (c) ((school facilities; and (d))) fire protection facilities in
jurisdictions that are not part of a fire district.
(8) "Service area" means a geographic area defined by a county,
city, town, or intergovernmental agreement in which a defined set of
public facilities provide service to development within the area.
Service areas shall be designated on the basis of sound planning or
engineering principles.
(9) "System improvements" mean public facilities that are included
in the capital facilities plan and are designed to provide service to
service areas within the community at large, in contrast to project
improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
By December 1, 2007, the superintendent of public instruction shall
prepare a report to the appropriate committees of the house of
representatives and senate on the amount of impact fees as defined in
RCW 82.02.090 and mitigation fees pursuant to RCW 43.21C.060 received
by each school district in the 2006-07 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 On or after the effective date of this act,
cities and counties may not impose impact fees for system improvements
for school facilities.

--- END ---