BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.64.110 and 2003 c 334 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any moneys derived from the lease of state forest lands or from the
sale of valuable materials, oils, gases, coal, minerals, or fossils
from those lands, must be distributed as follows:
(1) State forest lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040 or by
exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040:
(a) The expense incurred by the state for administration,
reforestation, and protection, not to exceed twenty-five percent, which
rate of percentage shall be determined by the board, must be returned
to the forest development account in the state general fund.
(b) Any balance remaining must be paid to the county in which the
land is located to be paid, distributed, and prorated, except as
otherwise provided in this section, to the various funds in the same
manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of
payment.
(c) Any balance remaining, paid to a county with a population of
less than sixteen thousand, must first be applied to the reduction of
any indebtedness existing in the current expense fund of the county
during the year of payment.
(d) With regard to moneys remaining under this subsection (1),
within seven working days of receipt of these moneys, the department
shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed to
the counties. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the
counties four times per month, with no more than ten days between each
payment date.
(2) State forest lands acquired through RCW 79.22.010 or by
exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.010, except as provided
in RCW 79.64.120:
(a) Fifty percent shall be placed in the forest development
account.
(b) Fifty percent shall be prorated and distributed to the state
general fund, to be dedicated for the benefit of the public schools,
and the county in which the land is located according to the relative
proportions of tax levies of all taxing districts in the county. The
portion to be distributed to the state general fund shall be based on
the regular school levy rate under RCW 84.52.065 and the levy rate for
any maintenance and operation special school levies. With regard to
the portion to be distributed to the counties, the department shall
certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed within
seven working days of receipt of the money. The state treasurer shall
distribute funds to the counties four times per month, with no more
than ten days between each payment date. The money distributed to the
county must be paid, distributed, and prorated to the various other
funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed
during the year of payment.
(3) A school district may transfer amounts deposited in its debt
service fund pursuant to this section into its capital projects fund as
authorized in RCW 28A.320.330.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.320.330 and 2002 c 275 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
School districts shall establish the following funds in addition to
those provided elsewhere by law:
(1) A general fund for maintenance and operation of the school
district to account for all financial operations of the school district
except those required to be accounted for in another fund.
(2) A capital projects fund shall be established for major capital
purposes. All statutory references to a "building fund" shall mean the
capital projects fund so established. Money to be deposited into the
capital projects fund shall include, but not be limited to, bond
proceeds, proceeds from excess levies authorized by RCW 84.52.053,
state apportionment proceeds as authorized by RCW 28A.150.270, ((and))
earnings from capital projects fund investments as authorized by RCW
28A.320.310 and 28A.320.320, and state forest revenues transferred
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
Money derived from the sale of bonds, including interest earnings
thereof, may only be used for those purposes described in RCW
28A.530.010, except that accrued interest paid for bonds shall be
deposited in the debt service fund.
Money to be deposited into the capital projects fund shall include
but not be limited to rental and lease proceeds as authorized by RCW
28A.335.060, and proceeds from the sale of real property as authorized
by RCW 28A.335.130.
Money legally deposited into the capital projects fund from other
sources may be used for the purposes described in RCW 28A.530.010, and
for the purposes of:
(a) Major renovation, including the replacement of facilities and
systems where periodical repairs are no longer economical. Major
renovation and replacement shall include, but shall not be limited to,
roofing, heating and ventilating systems, floor covering, and
electrical systems.
(b) Renovation and rehabilitation of playfields, athletic fields,
and other district real property.
(c) The conduct of preliminary energy audits and energy audits of
school district buildings. For the purpose of this section:
(i) "Preliminary energy audits" means a determination of the energy
consumption characteristics of a building, including the size, type,
rate of energy consumption, and major energy using systems of the
building.
(ii) "Energy audit" means a survey of a building or complex which
identifies the type, size, energy use level, and major energy using
systems; which determines appropriate energy conservation maintenance
or operating procedures and assesses any need for the acquisition and
installation of energy conservation measures, including solar energy
and renewable resource measures.
(iii) "Energy capital improvement" means the installation, or
modification of the installation, of energy conservation measures in a
building which measures are primarily intended to reduce energy
consumption or allow the use of an alternative energy source.
(d) Those energy capital improvements which are identified as being
cost-effective in the audits authorized by this section.
(e) Purchase or installation of additional major items of equipment
and furniture: PROVIDED, That vehicles shall not be purchased with
capital projects fund money.
(f) Costs associated with implementing technology systems,
facilities, and projects, including acquiring hardware, licensing
software, and on-line applications and training related to the
installation of the foregoing. However, the software or applications
must be an integral part of the district's technology systems,
facilities, or projects.
(3) A debt service fund to provide for tax proceeds, other
revenues, and disbursements as authorized in chapter 39.44 RCW. State
forest land revenues that are deposited in a school district's debt
service fund pursuant to RCW 79.64.110 and that are not pledged for
payment of debt service on school district bonds may be transferred by
the school district into the district's capital projects account.
(4) An associated student body fund as authorized by RCW
28A.325.030.
(5) Advance refunding bond funds and refunded bond funds to provide
for the proceeds and disbursements as authorized in chapter 39.53 RCW.

--- END ---