BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The control and management of the Wellington
Hills property, which was purchased by the state of Washington as a
potential site for the University of Washington Bothell branch campus,
is transferred to the department of general administration. The
department of general administration shall sell the site at fair market
value. Proceeds from the sale must be deposited in the University of
Washington building account. It is the intent of the legislature to
appropriate the proceeds for future expansion of the University of
Washington Bothell/Cascadia Community College colocated campus. The
department of general administration may retain from the proceeds of
the sale an amount sufficient to provide reimbursement for expenses as
approved by the office of financial management.

--- END ---