BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.135.025 and 2005 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state shall not expend from the general fund and related
funds during any fiscal year state moneys in excess of the state
expenditure limit established under this chapter.
(2) Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW
43.135.035 or pursuant to an appropriation under RCW 43.135.045(4)(b),
the state treasurer shall not issue or redeem any check, warrant, or
voucher that will result in a state general fund or related fund
expenditure for any fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure
limit established under this chapter. A violation of this subsection
constitutes a violation of RCW 43.88.290 and shall subject the state
treasurer to the penalties provided in RCW 43.88.300.
(3) The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the
previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit increased by a
percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.
(4) For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, the phrase "the previous fiscal
year's state expenditure limit" means the total state expenditures from
the state general fund and related funds, not including federal funds,
for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, plus the fiscal growth
factor.
(5) A state expenditure limit committee is established for the
purpose of determining and adjusting the state expenditure limit as
provided in this chapter. The members of the state expenditure limit
committee are the director of financial management, the attorney
general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs and ranking
minority members of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations. All actions of
the state expenditure limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter
require an affirmative vote of at least four members.
(6) Each November, the state expenditure limit committee shall
adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding fiscal year based on
actual expenditures and known changes in the fiscal growth factor and
then project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years. If,
by November 30th, the state expenditure limit committee has not adopted
the expenditure limit adjustment and projected expenditure limit as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney general or his
or her designee shall adjust or project the expenditure limit, as
necessary.
(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average growth in state
personal income for the prior ten fiscal years.
(8) "General fund" means the state general fund.
(9) "Related fund" means the health services account, violence
reduction and drug enforcement account, public safety and education
account, water quality account, education legacy trust fund, pension
funding stabilization account, or student achievement fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---