BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Body armor" means any clothing or equipment designed in whole
or in part to minimize the risk of injury from a deadly weapon.
(2) "Criminal homicide" is murder, manslaughter, or criminally
negligent homicide and is committed by a person if, without
justification or excuse, the person intentionally, knowingly,
recklessly, or with criminal negligence causes the death of another
human being.
(3) "Deadly weapon" means any instrument, article, or substance
specifically designed for and presently capable of causing death or
serious physical injury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A person commits the crime of felon in
possession of body armor if the person:
(a) Has been convicted of a felony involving violence under the law
of any state or the United States; and
(b) Knowingly is in possession or control of body armor.
(2) Felon in possession of body armor is a class C felony.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, a person who
has been found to be within the jurisdiction of a juvenile court for
having committed an act that would constitute a felony involving
violence has been convicted of a felony involving violence.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A person who is wearing body armor provided by a peace officer
for the person's safety or protection while the person is being
transported or accompanied by a peace officer; or
(b) A person who has been convicted of only one felony under the
law of this state or any other state, or who has been convicted of only
one felony under the law of the United States, for which the felony did
not involve criminal homicide as defined in section 1 of this act, and
who has been discharged from imprisonment, parole, or probation for the
offense for a period of fifteen years prior to the date of the alleged
violation of subsection (1) of this section.
(5) It is an affirmative defense to a charge of violating
subsection (1) of this section that a protective order or restraining
order has been entered to the benefit of the person. The affirmative
defense created by this subsection is not available if the person
possesses the body armor while committing or attempting to commit a
crime.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person commits the crime of unlawful
possession of body armor if the person, while committing or attempting
to commit a felony or misdemeanor involving violence, knowingly:
(a) Wears body armor; and
(b) Possesses a deadly weapon.
(2) Unlawful possession of body armor is a class B felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 9 RCW.

--- END ---