BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of processing electronic products; as to such persons the amount of the
tax with respect to the business shall, in the case of manufacturers,
be equal to the value of products, including byproducts, manufactured,
or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of
the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
selling, at wholesale or retail, electronic products processed under
(a) of this subsection where the person is subject to the rate in (a)
of this subsection for the processing of the electronic products; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the products multiplied by
the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(2)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources, the
legislature needs information to evaluate whether the stated goals of
legislation were achieved. A person taking the preferential tax rate
under this section shall make an annual survey to the department as
provided in section 2 of this act.
(b) The goal of the preferential tax rate under this section is to
encourage the recycling of electronic products.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Electronic product" has the meaning provided in RCW
70.95N.020.
(b) "Processing electronic products" means disassembling,
dismantling, or shredding electronic products, at a facility owned by
the person, to recover materials contained in the electronic products
and prepare those materials for reclaiming or reuse in new products in
accordance with processing standards established under chapter 70.95N
RCW.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 83.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each person claiming a tax preference that requires a survey
under this section must report information to the department by filing
a complete annual survey. The survey is due by March 31st of the year
following any calendar year in which the tax preference is taken. The
department may extend the due date for timely filing of annual surveys
under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey must
include the amount of the tax preference taken. The survey shall also
include the following information for employment positions in
Washington:
(a) The number of total employment positions;
(b) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(c) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(d) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(2) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of, or determine eligibility for, the tax
preference, to be submitted at the same time as the survey.
(3) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax preference taken, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW
82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax preference taken is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330. If the
amount of the tax preference taken as reported on the survey is
different than the amount actually taken or otherwise allowed by the
department based on the taxpayer's excise tax returns or other
information known to the department, the amount actually taken or
allowed may be disclosed.
(4) If a person fails to submit an annual survey under this section
by the due date of the survey or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the
department shall declare the amount of the tax preference taken for the
previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable. The
department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the amounts due
under this section. The interest must be assessed at the rate provided
for delinquent taxes under this chapter, retroactively to the date the
tax preference was claimed, and must accrue until the taxes for which
the tax preference was claimed are repaid. This information is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330.
(5) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "tax preference" has the
meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and includes only the tax
preferences requiring a survey under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.440 and 2006 c 300 s 8 and 2006 c 84 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities that are subject to tax
under two or more provisions of RCW 82.04.230 through 82.04.298,
inclusive, shall be taxable under each provision applicable to those
activities.
(2) Persons taxable under section 1 of this act, RCW 82.04.2909(2),
82.04.250, 82.04.270, 82.04.294(2), or 82.04.260 (1)(c), (4), (11), or
(12) with respect to selling products in this state, including those
persons who are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, shall be allowed a
credit against those taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with
respect to the manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or
(b) extracting taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so
sold in this state or ingredients of products so sold in this state.
Extracting taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section
may also be taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under
this subsection. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those
products.
(3) Persons taxable as manufacturers under section 1 of this act,
RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260 (1)(b) or (12), including those persons who
are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, shall be allowed a credit against
those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with respect to extracting
the ingredients of the products so manufactured in this state. The
amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising under
this chapter with respect to the manufacturing of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under section 1 of this act, RCW 82.04.230,
82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1), 82.04.294(1), 82.04.2404, or 82.04.260 (1),
(2), (4), (11), or (12), including those persons who are also taxable
under RCW 82.04.261, with respect to extracting or manufacturing
products in this state shall be allowed a credit against those taxes
for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to another state with respect to
the sales of the products so extracted or manufactured in this state,
(ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of
products using ingredients so extracted in this state, or (iii)
manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing activities
completed in another state for products so manufactured in this state.
The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising
under this chapter with respect to the extraction or manufacturing of
those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in section 1 of this act, RCW 82.04.240,
82.04.2404, 82.04.2909(1), 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (11), and (12), and
82.04.294(1); (ii) the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who
are engaged in business as a manufacturer; and (iii) similar gross
receipts taxes paid to other states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes (i)
the tax imposed on extractors in RCW 82.04.230 and 82.04.260(12); (ii)
the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who are engaged in
business as an extractor; and (iii) similar gross receipts taxes paid
to other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect October 1, 2007.

--- END ---