BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A municipal agency shall notify a property owner of a municipal
agency's response to an emergency on property titled in the owner's
name within twenty-four hours of the response by the municipal agency.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Emergency" means an incident that requires a normal police,
coroner, fire, rescue, emergency medical services, or utility response.
(b) "Municipal agency" includes police, coroner, fire, rescue,
emergency medical services, or utility department maintained or
contracted by the municipality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A municipal agency shall notify a property owner of a municipal
agency's response to an emergency on property titled in the owner's
name within twenty-four hours of the response by the municipal agency.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Emergency" means an incident that requires a normal police,
coroner, fire, rescue, emergency medical services, or utility response.
(b) "Municipal agency" includes police, coroner, fire, rescue,
emergency medical services, or utility department maintained or
contracted by the municipality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county agency shall notify a property owner of a county
agency's response to an emergency on property titled in the owner's
name within twenty-four hours of the response by the county agency.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Emergency" means an incident that requires a normal sheriff,
coroner, fire, rescue, emergency medical services, or utility response.
(b) "County agency" includes a sheriff, coroner, fire, rescue,
emergency medical services, or utility department maintained or
contracted by the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state patrol shall notify a property owner of
the Washington state patrol's response to an emergency on property
titled in the owner's name within twenty-four hours of the response by
the Washington state patrol.
(2) For purposes of this section "emergency" means an incident that
requires a normal state patrol, coroner, fire, rescue, emergency
medical services, or utility response.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 52.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A fire protection district shall notify a property owner of a
fire protection district's response to an emergency on property titled
in the owner's name within twenty-four hours of the response by the
fire protection district.
(2) For purposes of this section "emergency" means an incident that
requires a normal sheriff, coroner, fire, rescue, emergency medical
services, or utility response.

--- END ---