BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the capital stock
of facilities owned and leased by state agencies represents a
significant financial investment by the citizens of the state of
Washington. Capital construction projects funded in the state's
capital budget require diligent analysis and approval by the governor
and the legislature. In some cases, long-term leases obligate state
agencies to a larger financial commitment than some capital
construction projects without a comparable level of diligence. State
facility analysis and portfolio management can be strengthened through
greater oversight and support from the office of financial management
and the legislature and with input from stakeholders.
The legislature finds that the state lacks specific policies and
standards on conducting life-cycle cost analysis to determine the
cost-effectiveness of owning or leasing state facilities and lacks
clear guidance on when and how to use it. Further, there is limited
oversight and review of the results of life-cycle cost analyses in the
capital project review process. Unless decision makers are provided a
thorough economic analysis, they cannot identify the most
cost-effective alternative or identify opportunities for improving the
cost-effectiveness of state facility alternatives.
The legislature finds that the statewide accounting system limits
the ability of the office of financial management and the legislature
to analyze agency expenditures that include only leases for land,
buildings, and structures. Additionally, other statewide data systems
that track state-owned and leased facility information are limited,
onerous, and inflexible.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to strengthen the
office of financial management's oversight role in state facility
analysis and decision making. Further, it is the intent of the
legislature to support the office of financial management's and the
department of general administration's need for technical expertise and
data systems to conduct thorough analysis, long-term planning, and
state facility portfolio management by providing adequate resources in
the capital and operating budgets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.82 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of financial management, in consultation with the
appropriate committees of the legislature, shall prepare an
implementation plan to improve the oversight of real estate procurement
and management practices. The plan must identify specific steps that
state government can take to better manage the acquisition, ownership,
lease, and disposition of office and warehouse space so that state
services are delivered in an effective manner. The plan shall be
submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by October 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 39.35B RCW
to read as follows:
The office of financial management shall:
(1) Design and implement a cost-effective life-cycle cost model by
October 1, 2008, based on the work completed by the joint legislative
audit and review committee in January 2007 and in consultation with
legislative fiscal committees;
(2) Deploy the life-cycle cost model for use by state agencies once
completed and tested;
(3) Update the life-cycle cost model periodically in consultation
with legislative fiscal committees;
(4) Establish clear policies, standards, and procedures regarding
the use of life-cycle cost analysis by state agencies including:
(a) When state agencies must use the life-cycle cost analysis,
including the types of proposed capital projects and leased facilities
to which it must be applied;
(b) Procedures state agencies must use to document the results of
required life-cycle cost analyses;
(c) Standards regarding the discount rate and other key model
assumptions; and
(d) A process to document and justify any deviation from the
standard assumptions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.82 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall design and implement
a modified predesign process for any space request to lease, purchase,
or build facilities that involve (a) the housing of new state programs,
(b) a major expansion of existing state programs, or (c) the relocation
of state agency programs. This includes the consolidation of multiple
state agency tenants into one facility. The office of financial
management shall define facilities that meet the criteria described in
(a) and (b) of this subsection.
(2) State agencies shall submit modified predesigns to the office
of financial management and the legislature. Modified predesigns must
include a problem statement, an analysis of alternatives to address
programmatic and space requirements, proposed locations, and a
financial assessment. For proposed projects of twenty thousand gross
square feet or less, the agency may provide a cost-benefit analysis,
rather than a life-cycle cost analysis, as determined by the office of
financial management.
(3) Projects that meet the capital requirements for predesign on
major facility projects with an estimated project cost of five million
dollars or more pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW shall not be required to
prepare a modified predesign.
(4) The office of financial management shall require state agencies
to identify plans for major leased facilities as part of the ten-year
capital budget plan. State agencies shall not enter into new or
renewed leases of more than one million dollars per year unless such
leases have been approved by the office of financial management except
when the need for the lease is due to an unanticipated emergency. The
regular termination date on an existing lease does not constitute an
emergency. The department of general administration shall notify the
office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal
committees if an emergency situation arises.
(5) For project proposals in which there are estimates of
operational savings, the office of financial management shall require
the agency or agencies involved to provide details including but not
limited to fund sources and timelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.82 RCW
to read as follows:
State agencies are prohibited from entering into lease agreements
for privately owned buildings that are in the planning stage of
development or under construction unless there is prior written
approval by the director of the office of financial management.
Approval of such leases shall not be delegated. Lease agreements
described in this section must comply with section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.82 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of financial management shall:
(1) Work with the department of general administration and all
other state agencies to determine the long-term facility needs of state
government; and
(2) Develop and submit a six-year facility plan to the legislature
by January 1st of every odd-numbered year, beginning January 1, 2009,
that includes state agency space requirements and other pertinent data
necessary for cost-effective facility planning. The department of
general administration shall assist with this effort as required by the
office of financial management.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.82.150 and 1997 c 96 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall develop and maintain
an inventory system to account for all owned or leased facilities
utilized by state government. At a minimum, the inventory system must
include the facility owner, location, type, condition, and size of each
facility. In addition, for owned facilities, the inventory system must
include the date and cost of original construction and the cost of any
major remodeling or renovation. The inventory must be updated by June
30th of each year. The office of financial management shall publish a
report summarizing information contained in the inventory system for
each agency by October 1st of each year, beginning in ((1997)) 2010 and
shall submit this report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature.
(2) All agencies, departments, boards, commissions, and
institutions of the state of Washington shall provide to the office of
financial management a complete inventory of owned and leased
facilities by ((May 30, 1994)) September 1, 2010. The inventory must
be updated and submitted to the office of financial management by ((May
30)) September 1st of each subsequent year. The inventories required
under this subsection must be submitted in a standard format prescribed
by the office of financial management.
(3) The office of financial management shall report to the
legislature by September 1, 2008, on recommended improvements to the
inventory system, redevelopment costs, and an implementation schedule
for the redevelopment of the inventory system. The report shall also
make recommendations on other improvements that will improve
accountability and assist in the evaluation of budget requests and
facility management by the governor and the legislature.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "facilities" means buildings
and other structures with walls and a roof. "Facilities" does not mean
roads, bridges, parking areas, utility systems, and other similar
improvements to real property.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.82.010 and 2004 c 277 s 906 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director of general administration, on behalf of the agency
involved and after consultation with the office of financial
management, shall purchase, lease, lease purchase, rent, or otherwise
acquire all real estate, improved or unimproved, as may be required by
elected state officials, institutions, departments, commissions,
boards, and other state agencies, or federal agencies where joint state
and federal activities are undertaken and may grant easements and
transfer, exchange, sell, lease, or sublease all or part of any surplus
real estate for those state agencies which do not otherwise have the
specific authority to dispose of real estate. This section does not
transfer financial liability for the acquired property to the
department of general administration.
(2) Except for real estate occupied by federal agencies, the
director shall determine the location, size, and design of any real
estate or improvements thereon acquired or held pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section. Facilities acquired or held pursuant to this
chapter, and any improvements thereon, shall conform to standards
adopted by the director and approved by the office of financial
management governing facility efficiency unless a specific exemption
from such standards is provided by the director of general
administration. The director of general administration shall report to
the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of
the legislature annually on any exemptions granted pursuant to this
subsection.
(3) The director of general administration may fix the terms and
conditions of each lease entered into under this chapter, except that
no lease shall extend greater than twenty years in duration. The
director of general administration may enter into a long-term lease
greater than ten years in duration upon a determination by the director
of the office of financial management that the long-term lease provides
a more favorable rate than would otherwise be available, it appears to
a substantial certainty that the facility is necessary for use by the
state for the full length of the lease term, and the facility meets the
standards adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The
director of general administration may enter into a long-term lease
greater than ten years in duration if an analysis shows that the life-
cycle cost of leasing the facility is less than the life-cycle cost of
purchasing or constructing a facility in lieu of leasing the facility.
((For the 2003-05 biennium, any lease entered into after April 1, 2004,
with a term of ten years or less shall not contain a nonappropriation
clause.))
(4) Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease for or on
behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as collateral or
security for the payment of securities offered for sale through a
public offering. Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease
for or on behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as
collateral or security for the payment of securities offered for sale
through a private placement without the prior written approval of the
state treasurer. However, this limitation shall not prevent a lessor
from assigning or encumbering its interest in a lease as security for
the repayment of a promissory note provided that the transaction would
otherwise be an exempt transaction under RCW 21.20.320. The state
treasurer shall adopt rules that establish the criteria under which any
such approval may be granted. In establishing such criteria the state
treasurer shall give primary consideration to the protection of the
state's credit rating and the integrity of the state's debt management
program. If it appears to the state treasurer that any lease has been
used or referred to in violation of this subsection or rules adopted
under this subsection, then he or she may recommend that the governor
cause such lease to be terminated. The department of general
administration shall promptly notify the state treasurer whenever it
may appear to the department that any lease has been used or referred
to in violation of this subsection or rules adopted under this
subsection.
(5) It is the policy of the state to encourage the colocation and
consolidation of state services into single or adjacent facilities,
whenever appropriate, to improve public service delivery, minimize
duplication of facilities, increase efficiency of operations, and
promote sound growth management planning.
(6) The director of general administration shall provide
coordinated long-range planning services to identify and evaluate
opportunities for colocating and consolidating state facilities. Upon
the renewal of any lease, the inception of a new lease, or the purchase
of a facility, the director of general administration shall determine
whether an opportunity exists for colocating the agency or agencies in
a single facility with other agencies located in the same geographic
area. If a colocation opportunity exists, the director of general
administration shall consult with the affected state agencies and the
office of financial management to evaluate the impact colocation would
have on the cost and delivery of agency programs, including whether
program delivery would be enhanced due to the centralization of
services. The director of general administration, in consultation with
the office of financial management, shall develop procedures for
implementing colocation and consolidation of state facilities.
(7) The director of general administration is authorized to
purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire improved or unimproved real
estate as owner or lessee and to lease or sublet all or a part of such
real estate to state or federal agencies. The director of general
administration shall charge each using agency its proportionate rental
which shall include an amount sufficient to pay all costs, including,
but not limited to, those for utilities, janitorial and accounting
services, and sufficient to provide for contingencies; which shall not
exceed five percent of the average annual rental, to meet unforeseen
expenses incident to management of the real estate.
(8) If the director of general administration determines that it is
necessary or advisable to undertake any work, construction, alteration,
repair, or improvement on any real estate acquired pursuant to
subsection (1) or (7) of this section, the director shall cause plans
and specifications thereof and an estimate of the cost of such work to
be made and filed in his or her office and the state agency benefiting
thereby is hereby authorized to pay for such work out of any available
funds: PROVIDED, That the cost of executing such work shall not exceed
the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars. Work, construction,
alteration, repair, or improvement in excess of twenty-five thousand
dollars, other than that done by the owner of the property if other
than the state, shall be performed in accordance with the public works
law of this state.
(9) In order to obtain maximum utilization of space, the director
of general administration shall make space utilization studies, and
shall establish standards for use of space by state agencies. Such
studies shall include the identification of opportunities for
colocation and consolidation of state agency office and support
facilities.
(10) The director of general administration may construct new
buildings on, or improve existing facilities, and furnish and equip,
all real estate under his or her management. Prior to the construction
of new buildings or major improvements to existing facilities or
acquisition of facilities using a lease purchase contract, the director
of general administration shall conduct an evaluation of the facility
design and budget using life-cycle cost analysis, value-engineering,
and other techniques to maximize the long-term effectiveness and
efficiency of the facility or improvement.
(11) All conveyances and contracts to purchase, lease, rent,
transfer, exchange, or sell real estate and to grant and accept
easements shall be approved as to form by the attorney general, signed
by the director of general administration or the director's designee,
and recorded with the county auditor of the county in which the
property is located.
(12) The director of general administration may delegate any or all
of the functions specified in this section to any agency upon such
terms and conditions as the director deems advisable. By January 1st
of each year, beginning January 1, 2008, the department shall submit an
annual report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature on all delegated leases.
(13) This section does not apply to the acquisition of real estate
by:
(a) The state college and universities for research or experimental
purposes;
(b) The state liquor control board for liquor stores and
warehouses; and
(c) The department of natural resources, the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of transportation, and the state parks and
recreation commission for purposes other than the leasing of offices,
warehouses, and real estate for similar purposes.
(14) Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary,
the department of general administration may negotiate ground leases
for public lands on which property is to be acquired under a financing
contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW under terms approved by the
state finance committee.
(15) The department of general administration shall report annually
to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature on facility leases executed for all state
agencies for the preceding year, lease terms, and annual lease costs.
The report must include leases executed under section 5 of this act and
subsection (12) of this section.

--- END ---