BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.161 and 2000 c 115 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, upon receipt of a fee of twenty-five dollars,
unless the driver's license is issued for a period other than five
years, in which case the fee shall be five dollars for each year that
the license is issued, which includes the fee for the required
photograph, shall issue to every qualifying applicant a driver's
license. A driver's license issued to a person under the age of
eighteen is an intermediate license, subject to the restrictions
imposed under RCW 46.20.075, until the person reaches the age of
eighteen. The license must include a distinguishing number assigned to
the licensee, the name of record, date of birth, Washington residence
address, photograph, a brief description of the licensee, and either a
facsimile of the signature of the licensee or a space upon which the
licensee shall write his or her usual signature with pen and ink
immediately upon receipt of the license. No license is valid until it
has been so signed by the licensee.
(2) The department, when mailing the driver's license to a first
time applicant, except if the applicant is active military personnel,
must mail the driver's license to a valid Washington address and may
not mail the driver's license to an address outside the state of
Washington. The department may adopt rules to make exceptions to this
requirement when the department has determined that applicants are
residents of the state of Washington but, for valid reasons shown,
require the license to be mailed to a location outside the state. For
the purposes of this subsection, "first time applicant" means a person
applying for a driver's license in the state of Washington for the
first time who has not been previously issued a driver's license by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---