BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is declared to be the policy of this
state that, in order to safeguard the public health, safety, and
welfare, to protect the public from incompetent, unscrupulous,
unauthorized persons and unprofessional conduct, and to ensure the
availability of the highest possible standards of speech-language
pathology services to the communicatively impaired people of this
state, it is necessary to provide regulatory authority over persons
offering speech-language pathology services as speech-language
pathologist assistants.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.35.010 and 2005 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in)) The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter((,)) unless the context clearly requires otherwise((:)).
(1) "Assistive listening device or system" means an amplification
system that is specifically designed to improve the signal to noise
ratio for the listener, reduce interference from noise in the
background, and enhance hearing levels at a distance by picking up
sound from as close to source as possible and sending it directly to
the ear of the listener, excluding hearing instruments as defined in
this chapter.
(2) "Licensed audiologist" means a person who is licensed by the
department to engage in the practice of audiology and meets the
qualifications in this chapter.
(3) "Audiology" means the application of principles, methods, and
procedures related to hearing and the disorders of hearing and to
related language and speech disorders, whether of organic or nonorganic
origin, peripheral or central, that impede the normal process of human
communication including, but not limited to, disorders of auditory
sensitivity, acuity, function, processing, or vestibular function, the
application of aural habilitation, rehabilitation, and appropriate
devices including fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments, and
cerumen management to treat such disorders.
(4) "Board" means the board of hearing and speech.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.
(6) "Establishment" means any permanent site housing a person
engaging in the practice of fitting and dispensing of hearing
instruments by a hearing instrument fitter/dispenser or audiologist;
where the client can have personal contact and counsel during the
firm's business hours; where business is conducted; and the address of
which is given to the state for the purpose of bonding.
(7) "Facility" means any permanent site housing a person engaging
in the practice of speech-language pathology and/or audiology,
excluding the sale, lease, or rental of hearing instruments.
(8) "Fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments" means the sale,
lease, or rental or attempted sale, lease, or rental of hearing
instruments together with the selection and modification of hearing
instruments and the administration of nondiagnostic tests as specified
by RCW 18.35.110 and the use of procedures essential to the performance
of these functions; and includes recommending specific hearing
instrument systems, specific hearing instruments, or specific hearing
instrument characteristics, the taking of impressions for ear molds for
these purposes, the use of nondiagnostic procedures and equipment to
verify the appropriateness of the hearing instrument fitting, and
hearing instrument orientation. The fitting and dispensing of hearing
instruments as defined by this chapter may be equally provided by a
licensed hearing instrument fitter/dispenser or licensed audiologist.
(9) "Good standing" means a licensed hearing instrument
fitter/dispenser, licensed audiologist, or licensed speech-language
pathologist whose license has not been subject to sanctions pursuant to
chapter 18.130 RCW or sanctions by other states, territories, or the
District of Columbia in the last two years.
(10) "Hearing instrument" means any wearable prosthetic instrument
or device designed for or represented as aiding, improving,
compensating for, or correcting defective human hearing and any parts,
attachments, or accessories of such an instrument or device, excluding
batteries and cords, ear molds, and assistive listening devices.
(11) "Hearing instrument fitter/dispenser" means a person who is
licensed to engage in the practice of fitting and dispensing of hearing
instruments and meets the qualifications of this chapter.
(12) "Interim permit holder" means a person who holds the permit
created under RCW 18.35.060 and who practices under the supervision of
a licensed hearing instrument fitter/dispenser, licensed speech-language pathologist, or licensed audiologist.
(13) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(14) "Licensed speech-language pathologist" means a person who is
licensed by the department to engage in the practice of speech-language
pathology and meets the qualifications of this chapter.
(15) "Speech-language pathology" means the application of
principles, methods, and procedures related to the development and
disorders, whether of organic or nonorganic origin, that impede oral,
pharyngeal, or laryngeal sensorimotor competencies and the normal
process of human communication including, but not limited to, disorders
and related disorders of speech, articulation, fluency, voice, verbal
and written language, auditory comprehension, cognition/communication,
and the application of augmentative communication treatment and devices
for treatment of such disorders.
(16) "Speech-language pathologist assistant" means a person who
meets all the requirements of this chapter and who provides speech-
language pathology services under the direction and supervision of a
speech-language pathologist.
(17) "Direct supervision" means on-site, in-view observation and
guidance by a speech-language pathologist while an assigned clinical
activity is performed by a speech-language pathologist assistant.
(18) "Indirect supervision" means those activities other than
direct observation and guidance conducted by a speech-language
pathologist that may include consultation, record review, review, and
evaluation of audio or videotaped sessions.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.35.040 and 2002 c 310 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An applicant for licensure as a hearing instrument
fitter/dispenser must have the following minimum qualifications and
shall pay a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW
43.70.250. An applicant shall be issued a license under the provisions
of this chapter if the applicant:
(((a)))(i)(A) Satisfactorily completes the hearing instrument
fitter/dispenser examination required by this chapter; or
(((ii))) (B) Holds a current, unsuspended, unrevoked license from
another jurisdiction if the standards for licensing in such other
jurisdiction are substantially equivalent to those prevailing in this
state;
(((b))) (ii) Satisfactorily completes a minimum of a two-year
degree program in hearing instrument fitter/dispenser instruction. The
program must be approved by the board; and
(((c))) (iii) Has not committed unprofessional conduct as specified
by the uniform disciplinary act.
(b) The applicant must present proof of qualifications to the board
in the manner and on forms prescribed by the secretary and proof of
completion of a minimum of four clock hours of AIDS education and
training pursuant to rules adopted by the board.
(2)(a) An applicant for licensure as a speech-language pathologist
or audiologist must have the following minimum qualifications:
(((a))) (i) Has not committed unprofessional conduct as specified
by the uniform disciplinary act;
(((b))) (ii) Has a master's degree or the equivalent, or a
doctorate degree or the equivalent, from a program at a board-approved
institution of higher learning, which includes completion of a
supervised clinical practicum experience as defined by rules adopted by
the board; and
(((c))) (iii) Has completed postgraduate professional work
experience approved by the board.
(b) All qualified applicants must satisfactorily complete the
speech-language pathology or audiology examinations required by this
chapter.
(c) The applicant must present proof of qualifications to the board
in the manner and on forms prescribed by the secretary and proof of
completion of a minimum of four clock hours of AIDS education and
training pursuant to rules adopted by the board.
(3) An applicant for licensure as a speech-language pathologist
assistant must have the following minimum qualifications:
(a) An associate of arts or sciences degree, or a certificate of
proficiency, from a speech-language pathologist assistant program from
an institution of higher education that is approved by the board, as is
evidenced by the following:
(i) Transcripts showing forty-five quarter hours or thirty semester
hours of speech-language pathology technical coursework; and
(ii) Transcripts showing forty-five quarter hours or thirty
semester hours of general education credit; or
(b) A bachelor of arts or bachelor of sciences degree, as evidenced
by transcripts, from a speech and hearing language pathology program
from an institution of higher education that is approved by the board.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.35.095 and 2002 c 310 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A hearing instrument fitter/dispenser licensed under this
chapter and not actively practicing may be placed on inactive status by
the department at the written request of the licensee. The board shall
define by rule the conditions for inactive status licensure. In
addition to the requirements of RCW 43.24.086, the licensing fee for a
licensee on inactive status shall be directly related to the costs of
administering an inactive license by the department. A hearing
instrument fitter/dispenser on inactive status may be voluntarily
placed on active status by notifying the department in writing, paying
the remainder of the licensing fee for the licensing year, and
complying with subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Hearing instrument fitter/dispenser inactive licensees applying
for active licensure shall comply with the following: A licensee who
has not fitted or dispensed hearing instruments for more than five
years from the expiration of the licensee's full fee license shall
retake the practical or the written, or both, hearing instrument
fitter/dispenser examinations required under this chapter and other
requirements as determined by the board. Persons who have inactive
status in this state but who are actively licensed and in good standing
in any other state shall not be required to take the hearing instrument
fitter/dispenser practical examination, but must submit an affidavit
attesting to their knowledge of the current Washington Administrative
Code rules and Revised Code of Washington statutes pertaining to the
fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments.
(3) A speech-language pathologist, speech-language pathologist
assistant, or audiologist licensed under this chapter and not actively
practicing either speech-language pathology or audiology may be placed
on inactive status by the department at the written request of the
license holder. The board shall define by rule the conditions for
inactive status licensure. In addition to the requirements of RCW
43.24.086, the fee for a license on inactive status shall be directly
related to the cost of administering an inactive license by the
department. A person on inactive status may be voluntarily placed on
active status by notifying the department in writing, paying the
remainder of the fee for the year, and complying with subsection (4) of
this section.
(4) Speech-language pathologist, speech-language pathologist
assistant, or audiologist inactive license holders applying for active
licensure shall comply with requirements set forth by the board, which
may include completion of continuing competency requirements and taking
an examination.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.35.150 and 2002 c 310 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created hereby the board of hearing and speech to
govern the three separate professions: Hearing instrument
fitting/dispensing, audiology, and speech-language pathology. The
board shall consist of ((ten)) eleven members to be appointed by the
governor.
(2) Members of the board shall be residents of this state. Three
members shall represent the public and shall have an interest in the
rights of consumers of health services, and shall not be or have been
a member of, or married to a member of, another licensing board, a
licensee of a health occupation board, an employee of a health
facility, nor derive his or her primary livelihood from the provision
of health services at any level of responsibility. Two members shall
be hearing instrument fitter/dispensers who are licensed under this
chapter, have at least five years of experience in the practice of
hearing instrument fitting and dispensing, and must be actively engaged
in fitting and dispensing within two years of appointment. Two members
of the board shall be audiologists licensed under this chapter who have
at least five years of experience in the practice of audiology and must
be actively engaged in practice within two years of appointment. Two
members of the board shall be speech-language pathologists licensed
under this chapter who have at least five years of experience in the
practice of speech-language pathology and must be actively engaged in
practice within two years of appointment. One member of the board
shall be a speech-language pathologist assistant licensed under this
chapter who has at least five years of experience as a speech-language
pathologist assistant and must be actively engaged in practice within
two years of appointment. One advisory nonvoting member shall be a
medical physician licensed in the state of Washington.
(3) The term of office of a member is three years. Of the initial
appointments, one hearing instrument fitter/dispenser, one speech-language pathologist, one audiologist, and one consumer shall be
appointed for a term of two years, and one hearing instrument
fitter/dispenser, one speech-language pathologist, one audiologist, and
two consumers shall be appointed for a term of three years.
Thereafter, all appointments shall be made for expired terms. No
member shall be appointed to serve more than two consecutive terms. A
member shall continue to serve until a successor has been appointed.
The governor shall either reappoint the member or appoint a successor
to assume the member's duties at the expiration of his or her
predecessor's term. A vacancy in the office of a member shall be
filled by appointment for the unexpired term.
(4) The chair shall rotate annually among the hearing instrument
fitter/dispensers, speech-language pathologists, speech-language
pathologist assistant, audiologists, and public members serving on the
board. In the absence of the chair, the board shall appoint an interim
chair. In event of a tie vote, the issue shall be brought to a second
vote and the chair shall refrain from voting.
(5) The board shall meet at least once each year, at a place, day
and hour determined by the board, unless otherwise directed by a
majority of board members. The board shall also meet at such other
times and places as are requested by the department or by three members
of the board. A quorum is a majority of the board. A hearing
instrument fitter/dispenser, speech-language pathologist, and
audiologist must be represented. Meetings of the board shall be open
and public, except the board may hold executive sessions to the extent
permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW.
(6) Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) The governor may remove a member of the board for cause at the
recommendation of a majority of the board.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.35.205 and 2002 c 310 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the public health, safety, and welfare
would best be protected by uniform regulation of hearing instrument
fitter/dispensers, speech-language pathologists, speech-language
pathologist assistants, audiologists, and interim permit holders
throughout the state. Therefore, the provisions of this chapter
relating to the licensing of hearing instrument fitter/dispensers,
speech-language pathologists, speech-language pathologist assistants,
and audiologists and regulation of interim permit holders and their
respective establishments or facilities is exclusive. No political
subdivision of the state of Washington within whose jurisdiction a
hearing instrument fitter/dispenser, audiologist, or speech-language
pathologist establishment or facility is located may require any
registrations, bonds, licenses, certificates, or interim permits of the
establishment or facility or its employees or charge any fee for the
same or similar purposes: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall
limit or abridge the authority of any political subdivision to levy and
collect a general and nondiscriminatory license fee levied on all
businesses, or to levy a tax based upon the gross business conducted by
any firm within the political subdivision.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.35.260 and 2002 c 310 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who is not a licensed hearing instrument
fitter/dispenser may not represent himself or herself as being so
licensed and may not use in connection with his or her name the words
"licensed hearing instrument fitter/dispenser," "hearing instrument
specialist," or "hearing aid fitter/dispenser," or a variation,
synonym, word, sign, number, insignia, coinage, or whatever expresses,
employs, or implies these terms, names, or functions of a licensed
hearing instrument fitter/dispenser.
(2) A person who is not a licensed speech-language pathologist may
not represent himself or herself as being so licensed and may not use
in connection with his or her name the words including "licensed
speech-language pathologist" or a variation, synonym, word, sign,
number, insignia, coinage, or whatever expresses, employs, or implies
these terms, names, or functions as a licensed speech-language
pathologist.
(3) A person who is not a licensed speech-language pathologist
assistant may not represent himself or herself as being so licensed and
may not use in connection with his or her name the words including
"licensed speech-language pathologist assistant" or a variation,
synonym, word, sign, number, insignia, coinage, or whatever expresses,
employs, or implies these terms, names, or functions as a licensed
speech-language pathologist assistant.
(4) A person who is not a licensed audiologist may not represent
himself or herself as being so licensed and may not use in connection
with his or her name the words "licensed audiologist" or a variation,
synonym, letter, word, sign, number, insignia, coinage, or whatever
expresses, employs, or implies these terms, names, or functions of a
licensed audiologist.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a person credentialed
in this state under another act from engaging in the practice for which
he or she is credentialed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 An applicant for licensure as a speech-language pathologist assistant may meet the requirements for a license
to practice as a speech-language pathologist assistant if, within one
year of the effective date of this section, he or she submits a
competency checklist to the board of hearing and speech, as defined by
the board by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The code reviser is directed to put the
defined terms in RCW 18.35.010 in alphabetical order.

--- END ---