BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that, since 1997,
public institutions of higher education have developed and maintained
a system of performance measures to monitor progress in improving
graduation efficiency, faculty productivity, student achievement of
degrees and certifications, and other topics. However, the current
performance measurement system is too limited in scope and scale. Only
a few measures reflect the unique role and mission of an institution.
There is little dialogue between state policymakers and institution
leaders regarding the challenges facing our colleges and universities
and the outcomes expected by the public and the state.
(2) The legislature further finds that procedures for operating
budgets, enrollment management, and strategic planning for higher
education are not adequately coordinated. The state and institutions
must jointly discuss and establish clear priorities and acknowledge
potential trade-offs of funding decisions.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to explore a new
relationship between the state and public institutions of higher
education that includes dialogue and negotiation over goals,
priorities, performance, and resources, and also includes explicit
commitments made by each party aimed at achieving agreed-upon outcomes.
The mechanism to implement this relationship is a performance
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 As used in this chapter, a performance
agreement:
(1) Is an agreement reached between the state and the governing
board of an institution of higher education, or in the case of
community or technical colleges the state board for community and
technical colleges, as provided in section 4 of this act and approved
by the legislature as provided in section 7 of this act;
(2) Addresses statewide goals and priorities of the legislature;
(3) Specifies enrollment and resource levels;
(4) Contains goals and commitments from both the institution and
the state;
(5) Includes quantifiable performance measures and benchmarks; and
(6) Reflects the unique role and mission of the institution within
the state's higher education system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The higher education coordinating board,
in consultation with the governor's office and the office of financial
management, shall enter into negotiations with the governing boards of
the state universities, the regional universities, and the state
college, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, to create a performance
agreement with each institution.
(2) The governor's office with assistance from the higher education
coordinating board and the office of financial management shall enter
into negotiations with the state board for community and technical
colleges to create a master performance agreement with the system of
community and technical colleges created under chapter 28B.50 RCW.
(3) In developing an agreement, the negotiating team from an
institution of higher education must involve student and faculty
representatives.
(4) The term of a performance agreement negotiated under this
section is six years, however either party may request that an
agreement be renegotiated and updated on a biennial basis if necessary
to reflect changed circumstances. All performance agreements must
include a process for renegotiation or update.
(5) The institutions of higher education and state board for
community and technical colleges shall report all data necessary to
implement, evaluate, and monitor each performance agreement to the
office of financial management, the legislature, and the higher
education coordinating board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Performance agreements shall contain:
(a) Indicators that measure outcomes concerning cost, quality,
timeliness of student progress toward degrees and certifications, and
articulation between and within the K-12 and higher education systems;
(b) Each institution's share of enrollments and degrees needed to
meet the state's goals and strategic direction;
(c) Indicators that measure the efficiency and effectiveness of
institutional processes; and
(d) Strategies, actions, and results committed to by the
institution in order to achieve statewide goals.
(2) Performance agreements shall also identify the level of
resources necessary to meet the performance objectives, subject to
approval by the legislature under section 7 of this act.
(3) The governor and institutional negotiating teams shall identify
indicators and levels of performance that are clearly linked to the
role, mission, and strategic plan of the institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Performance agreements shall include
grants to the institution, under the terms of the agreement, of
flexibility or waivers from state controls or rules.
(2) The negotiating teams shall identify areas where statutory
change is necessary to grant an institution flexibility or waivers of
state agency rules and submit any legislation necessary to implement a
performance agreement to the higher education committees of the senate
and house of representatives.
(3) The following areas may not be included in a performance
agreement:
(a) Flexibility or waivers of requirements in a collective
bargaining agreement negotiated under chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 41.59,
41.76, or 41.80 RCW;
(b) Flexibility or waivers of administrative rules or processes
governed by chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 41.59, 41.76, or 41.80 RCW;
(c) Rules, processes, duties, rights, and responsibilities of the
academic faculty as contained in the faculty codes of the four-year
institution;
(d) Flexibility or waivers of requirements under chapter 39.12 RCW;
(e) Flexibility or waivers of administrative rules or other
regulations that address health and safety, civil rights, and
nondiscrimination laws that apply to institutions of higher education;
and
(f) State laws covering terms and conditions of employment,
including but not limited to salaries, job security, and health,
retirement, unemployment, or any other employment benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The higher education coordinating board
and the governor's office shall submit completed performance agreements
to the legislature by January 15, 2008, and every six years thereafter.
Following public hearings, the legislature shall have the opportunity,
by concurrent resolution, to approve or reject each performance
agreement as a whole.
(2) If the legislature rejects or fails to act on a submission, the
performance agreement shall be returned to the parties for
renegotiation.
(3) All cost items contained within a performance agreement are
subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Beginning December 2008, the higher
education coordinating board and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall provide annual progress reports to the higher
education committees of the senate and house of representatives on
implementation of the performance agreements and any short-term
outcomes. The overall purpose of the progress reports is to focus
attention on key measures of institutional performance and gain an
improved understanding of the causes of success or lack of success in
making progress in achieving the goals in the agreements.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct
an evaluation and make recommendations regarding changes to the
substance or process of performance agreeing. The evaluation shall be
submitted to the governor and higher education committees of the senate
and house of representatives by January 15, 2014.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.50.090 and 2004 c 275 s 57 are each amended to
read as follows:
The college board shall have general supervision and control over
the state system of community and technical colleges. In addition to
the other powers and duties imposed upon the college board by this
chapter, the college board shall be charged with the following powers,
duties and responsibilities:
(1) Review the budgets prepared by the boards of trustees, prepare
a single budget for the support of the state system of community and
technical colleges and adult education, and submit this budget to the
governor as provided in RCW 43.88.090;
(2) Establish guidelines for the disbursement of funds; and receive
and disburse such funds for adult education and maintenance and
operation and capital support of the college districts in conformance
with the state and district budgets, and in conformance with chapter
43.88 RCW;
(3) Ensure, through the full use of its authority:
(a) That each college district shall offer thoroughly comprehensive
educational, training and service programs to meet the needs of both
the communities and students served by combining high standards of
excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and practical
courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded; and
community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational
nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general,
family, and workforce literacy programs and services. However,
technical colleges, and college districts containing only technical
colleges, shall maintain programs solely for occupational education,
basic skills, and literacy purposes. For as long as a need exists,
technical colleges may continue those programs, activities, and
services they offered during the twelve-month period preceding May 17,
1991;
(b) That each college district shall maintain an open-door policy,
to the end that no student will be denied admission because of the
location of the student's residence or because of the student's
educational background or ability; that, insofar as is practical in the
judgment of the college board, curriculum offerings will be provided to
meet the educational and training needs of the community generally and
the students thereof; and that all students, regardless of their
differing courses of study, will be considered, known and recognized
equally as members of the student body: PROVIDED, That the
administrative officers of a community or technical college may deny
admission to a prospective student or attendance to an enrolled student
if, in their judgment, the student would not be competent to profit
from the curriculum offerings of the college, or would, by his or her
presence or conduct, create a disruptive atmosphere within the college
not consistent with the purposes of the institution. This subsection
(3)(b) shall not apply to competency, conduct, or presence associated
with a disability in a person twenty-one years of age or younger
attending a technical college;
(4) Prepare a comprehensive master plan for the development of
community and technical college education and training in the state;
and assist the office of financial management in the preparation of
enrollment projections to support plans for providing adequate college
facilities in all areas of the state. The master plan shall include
implementation of the vision, goals, priorities, and strategies in the
statewide strategic master plan for higher education under RCW
28B.76.200 based on the community and technical college system's role
and mission. The master plan shall also contain measurable performance
indicators and benchmarks for gauging progress toward achieving the
goals and priorities;
(5) Define and administer criteria and guidelines for the
establishment of new community and technical colleges or campuses
within the existing districts;
(6) Establish criteria and procedures for modifying district
boundary lines consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020
as now or hereafter amended and in accordance therewith make such
changes as it deems advisable;
(7) Establish minimum standards to govern the operation of the
community and technical colleges with respect to:
(a) Qualifications and credentials of instructional and key
administrative personnel, except as otherwise provided in the state
plan for vocational education,
(b) Internal budgeting, accounting, auditing, and financial
procedures as necessary to supplement the general requirements
prescribed pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW,
(c) The content of the curriculums and other educational and
training programs, and the requirement for degrees and certificates
awarded by the colleges,
(d) Standard admission policies,
(e) Eligibility of courses to receive state fund support;
(8) Establish and administer criteria and procedures for all
capital construction including the establishment, installation, and
expansion of facilities within the various college districts;
(9) Encourage innovation in the development of new educational and
training programs and instructional methods; coordinate research
efforts to this end; and disseminate the findings thereof;
(10) Exercise any other powers, duties and responsibilities
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;
(11) Authorize the various community and technical colleges to
offer programs and courses in other districts when it determines that
such action is consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020
as now or hereafter amended;
(12) Notwithstanding any other law or statute regarding the sale of
state property, sell or exchange and convey any or all interest in any
community and technical college real and personal property, except such
property as is received by a college district in accordance with RCW
28B.50.140(8), when it determines that such property is surplus or that
such a sale or exchange is in the best interests of the community and
technical college system;
(13) In order that the treasurer for the state board for community
and technical colleges appointed in accordance with RCW 28B.50.085 may
make vendor payments, the state treasurer will honor warrants drawn by
the state board providing for an initial advance on July 1, 1982, of
the current biennium and on July 1 of each succeeding biennium from the
state general fund in an amount equal to twenty-four percent of the
average monthly allotment for such budgeted biennium expenditures for
the state board for community and technical colleges as certified by
the office of financial management; and at the conclusion of such
initial month and for each succeeding month of any biennium, the state
treasurer will reimburse expenditures incurred and reported monthly by
the state board treasurer in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW:
PROVIDED, That the reimbursement to the state board for actual
expenditures incurred in the final month of each biennium shall be less
the initial advance made in such biennium;
(14) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (12) of this
section, may receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical
college programs and may sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the
same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to
the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income
thereof;
(15) The college board shall have the power of eminent domain;
(16) Provide general supervision over the state's technical
colleges. The president of each technical college shall report
directly to the director of the state board for community and technical
colleges, or the director's designee, until local control is assumed by
a new or existing board of trustees as appropriate, except that a
college president shall have authority over program decisions of his or
her college until the establishment of a board of trustees for that
college. The directors of the vocational-technical institutes on March
1, 1991, shall be designated as the presidents of the new technical
colleges; and
(17) Enter into negotiations to create a master performance
agreement for the system of community and technical colleges as
provided in chapter 28B.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 of this act).

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.76.290 and 1993 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall coordinate educational activities among all
segments of higher education taking into account the educational
programs, facilities, and other resources of both public and
independent two and four-year colleges and universities. The four-year
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall coordinate information and activities with the board. The board
shall have the following additional responsibilities:
(1) Promote interinstitutional cooperation;
(2) Establish minimum admission standards for four-year
institutions, including a requirement that coursework in American sign
language or an American Indian language shall satisfy any requirement
for instruction in a language other than English that the board or the
institutions may establish as a general undergraduate admissions
requirement;
(3) Establish transfer policies;
(4) Adopt rules implementing statutory residency requirements;
(5) Develop and administer reciprocity agreements with bordering
states and the province of British Columbia;
(6) Review and recommend compensation practices and levels for
administrative employees, exempt under chapter ((28B.16)) 41.06 RCW,
and faculty using comparative data from peer institutions;
(7) Monitor higher education activities for compliance with all
relevant state policies for higher education;
(8) Arbitrate disputes between and among four-year institutions or
between and among four-year institutions and community colleges at the
request of one or more of the institutions involved, or at the request
of the governor, or from a resolution adopted by the legislature. The
decision of the board shall be binding on the participants in the
dispute;
(9) Establish and implement a state system for collecting,
analyzing, and distributing information;
(10) Recommend to the governor and the legislature ways to remove
any economic incentives to use off-campus program funds for on-campus
activities; ((and))
(11) Make recommendations to increase minority participation, and
monitor and report on the progress of minority participation in higher
education; and
(12) Enter into negotiations to create performance agreements with
the governing boards of the public four-year institutions as provided
in chapter 28B.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 RCW 28B.76.270 (Accountability monitoring
and reporting system -- Institution biennial plans and performance
targets -- Biennial reports to the legislature) and 2004 c 275 s 11 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---