BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
A credit is allowed against the tax due under this chapter to
employers for the cost of the provision of mental health services
pursuant to the passage of chapter . . . (Engrossed House Bill No. 1460
or Substitute Senate Bill No. 5446), Laws of 2007 to employees. The
credit is equal to the additional cost to the employer attributable to
the coverage of such services within an employer offered health benefit
plan required by chapter . . . (Engrossed House Bill No. 1460 or
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5446), Laws of 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---