BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
state ferry system has an excellent safety record and has commenced a
long-term vessel procurement plan to ensure the replacement of older
and outdated ferry vessels. The legislature further finds that the
current vessel procurement process must move forward with all due
speed, balancing the interests of both the taxpayers and shipyards.
The commencement of construction of new vessels is important not only
for safety reasons, but also to keep skilled marine construction jobs
in the Puget Sound region and to sustain the capacity of the region to
meet the ongoing preservation needs of the ferry system fleet of
vessels.
The legislature further finds that the balancing of interests
described in this section may necessitate the department of
transportation to consider in the department's current new 144--auto
ferries request for proposals a single proposal submitted jointly by
the current best-qualified proposers. The department may, therefore,
consider and accept or reject in the department's discretion such a
single proposal, and the current best-qualified proposers may meet and
confer to discuss matters that are reasonably necessary to determine
whether to submit such a single proposal and to implement a single
final contract if the proposal is accepted by the department.
Discussions may address the terms of any agreement that may be entered
into between the best qualified proposers for purposes of submitting a
single proposal, as well as any agreement that may be entered into with
the department. Discussions may also address cost and price
information and division of work under the request for proposals. The
current best-qualified proposers shall each expressly declare in
writing to the department, their intent, if any, to jointly submit a
single proposal within thirty days of the effective date of this act,
and shall further provide within the thirty-day period information that
may be required by the department including, but not limited to,
information regarding the proposed shipyard organizational structure
and responsibilities of each participant. If at the end of the thirty-day period the proposers have not declared such an intent and provided
the information required by the department, or if the department, in
its discretion, determines that the joint venture, other legal entity,
or organizational structure, or division of responsibilities intended
by the joint proposers are unacceptable and not in the best interests
of the state, the proposers will be deemed as proposing separately to
the request for proposals, and further discussions related to the
request for proposals shall not be allowed between the proposers.
To further facilitate the balancing of interests described in this
section, the department of transportation may, in its discretion, make
revisions to the request for proposals that the department deems
necessary or appropriate to balance such interests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
If at any point there is only a single best-qualified proposer
participating in the competitive design-build procurement process prior
to the submission of bids in phase three, or if there is only a single
responsive and responsible bid submitted in phase three, or if the
current best-qualified proposers elect to jointly submit a single
proposal, the department may negotiate a fair-value contract with the
proposer or joint proposers. The negotiations may consider the scope
of work as well as contract price. The contract price must be
established between the department and the proposer through negotiation
based on detailed cost and price information provided by the proposer,
the department, and other relevant sources in a format as determined by
the department. To achieve efficiencies, the department may negotiate
incentives and economic cost sharing between the state and the
proposer. In addition to the cost incentives, other incentives may be
considered, as determined by the department, to be in the best
interests of the state. Such incentives may include, but are not
limited to, key schedule milestones, technological innovations,
performance efficiencies, constructability, and operational value or
life-cycle cost. The department may issue guidelines, requirements,
and procedures for all negotiations.
If the department conducts negotiations with a single remaining
proposer or joint proposers prior to the submission of bids in phase
three, all negotiations must be completed within forty-five days of the
department's approval of the final technical proposal. If the
department conducts negotiations with a single responsive and
responsible phase three bidder, all negotiations must be completed
within thirty days of submission of the phase three bids.
If the department reaches an agreement with the proposer or joint
proposers, the department shall submit a copy of the contract, the
final negotiated price, and supporting information to the office of
financial management at least ten days prior to execution of the
contract. If the final negotiated price is greater than the
legislature's adopted expenditure plan for vessel construction, the
department may not execute the contract until the legislature reviews
the final proposals and adjusts the expenditure plan accordingly.
If the department is unable within the designated time period to
reach an agreement with the proposer or joint proposers that is fair,
reasonable, and in the department's budget, or if the proposers
initially provide notice of their intent to jointly submit a single
proposal but fail to do so, or if any one of the proposers withdraws
from a jointly submitted single proposal before entering into a
contract with the department, or if both of the current best-qualified
proposers withdraw or otherwise fail to proceed with the request for
proposals process, the department may issue a new request for proposals
or cancel the request for proposals process, to serve the best
interests of the state.
The department may pay an honorarium in a specified amount
determined by the department to a proposer or joint proposers who has
submitted a final, approved technical proposal and with whom the
department has engaged in unsuccessful negotiations. The proposer or
joint proposers shall not receive any other compensation for attempting
to negotiate a contract, except to the extent allowed by the department
in a final contract awarded pursuant to the request for proposal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---