BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Impacted taxpayers may either:
(a) Use the services of a certified service provider at no cost to
themselves for tax reporting periods up to one year after July 1, 2008;
or
(b) Claim a credit against the tax imposed under RCW 82.08.020(1),
which is collected and otherwise required to be remitted by the
taxpayer as a seller and the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.220. The
amount of the credit is equal to the amount of costs incurred by the
taxpayer within one year of July 1, 2008, in order to comply with the
changes in the local sales and use tax sourcing rules implemented under
section 503, chapter 6, Laws of 2007.
(i) The total amount of credit claimed by a taxpayer under this
section may not exceed one thousand dollars.
(ii) No refunds may be granted for the credit. The eligible costs
for which a credit may be claimed include costs for goods, services,
and labor incurred for the purpose of complying with the local sales
tax sourcing rules under chapter 6, Laws of 2007.
(iii) The credit under this section may not be claimed for tax
reporting periods before July 1, 2008. Taxpayers may not claim unused
credit for tax reporting periods after July 1, 2009.
(2) The use of a certified service provider under subsection (1)(a)
of this section must begin within one year after July 1, 2008, but not
before July 1, 2008.
(3) For purposes of this section, "impacted taxpayer" means a
taxpayer that:
(a) On July 1, 2008, is registered with the department and engaged
in making sales of tangible personal property that the taxpayer
delivered to physical locations away from his or her place of business;
and
(b) During the calendar year of 2008:
(i) Has a physical presence in Washington;
(ii) Has gross business income of less than three million dollars,
but equal to or more than five hundred thousand dollars; and
(iii) Has at least ninety-five percent of his or her gross income
from sales subject to sales tax derived from sales of tangible personal
property delivered to local jurisdictions imposing sales tax other than
the one in which the taxpayer has his or her main physical location.
(4) Certified service providers agreeing to provide services to
impacted taxpayers under subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be
compensated for those services by retaining as a fee an amount adopted
by rule by the department. The department may be guided by the
provisions for monetary allowances adopted by the governing board of
the agreement to determine the amount of the fee. The fee must be
reasonable and provide adequate incentive for certified service
providers to provide services to impacted taxpayers. The fee will be
funded solely from state sales taxes.
(5) Taxpayers that use certified service provider services under
subsection (1)(a) of this section, but are not impacted taxpayers are
immediately liable to the department for the amount retained by the
certified service provider as a fee for providing those services to the
taxpayer. All administrative provisions of this chapter applicable to
the collection of taxes apply to amounts due under this subsection. If
any amounts due under this subsection are not paid by the due date of
any notice informing the taxpayer of such liability, the department
shall apply interest, but not penalties, to amounts remaining due.
Interest assessed under this subsection must be at the rate provided
for delinquent excise taxes under this chapter from the day after the
due date until the amount due under this subsection is paid in full.
(6) Taxpayers that claim a credit under subsection (1)(b) of this
section, but are not impacted taxpayers are immediately liable to the
department for the amount of credit claimed. If any amounts due under
this subsection are not paid by the due date of any notice informing
the taxpayer of such liability, the department shall apply interest,
but not penalties, to amounts remaining due. Interest assessed under
this subsection shall be at the rate provided for delinquent excise
taxes under this chapter from the day after the due date until the
amount due under this subsection is paid in full.
(7) No application is necessary for either the use of certified
service providers under subsection (1)(a) of this section or the tax
credit under subsection (1)(b) of this section. The taxpayer must keep
records necessary for the department to determine eligibility under
this section. The department may prescribe rules and procedures
regarding the administration of this section.
(8) An impacted taxpayer using a certified service provider under
subsection (1)(a) of this section or taking a credit under subsection
(1)(b) of this section must file with the department all returns in an
electronic format as provided or approved by the department. As used
in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW
82.32.050.
(a) Any return required to be filed in an electronic format under
this subsection is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format provided or approved by the department.
(b) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
this subsection for good cause shown.
(9) This section expires June 30, 2009.

--- END ---