BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2007 c ... (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5089) s 901
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds and declares that:
(a) Washington state's participation as a member state in the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement benefits the state, all its
local taxing jurisdictions, and its retailing industry, by increasing
state and local revenues, improving the state's business climate, and
standardizing and simplifying the state's tax structure;
(b) Participation in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement is
a matter of statewide concern and is in the best interests of the
state, the general public, and all local jurisdictions that impose a
sales and use tax under applicable law;
(c) Participation in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement
requires the adoption of the agreement's sourcing provisions, which
change the location in which a retail sale of delivered tangible
personal property occurs for local sales tax purposes from the point of
origin to the point of destination;
(d) Changes in the local sales tax sourcing law provisions to
conform with the streamlined sales and use tax agreement will cause
sales tax revenues to shift among local taxing jurisdictions. The
legislature finds that there will be an unintended adverse impact on
local taxing jurisdictions that receive less revenues because local tax
revenues will be redistributed, with revenue increases for some
jurisdictions and reductions for others, due solely to changes in local
sales tax sourcing rules to be implemented under section 503 of this
act and the chapter ... (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5089), Laws of 2007
(this act) amendments to RCW 82.14.020, even though no local taxing
jurisdiction has changed its tax rate or tax base;
(e) The purpose of providing mitigation to such jurisdictions is to
mitigate the unintended revenue redistribution effect of the sourcing
law changes among local governments;
(f) It is in the best interest of the state and all its
subdivisions to mitigate the adverse effects of amending the local
sales tax sourcing provisions to be in conformance with the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement;
(g) Additionally, changes in sourcing laws may have negative
implications for industry sectors such as warehousing and
manufacturing, as well as jurisdictions that house a concentration of
these industries and have made zoning decisions, infrastructure
investments, bonding decisions, and land use policy decisions based on
point of origin sales tax rules in place before the effective date of
this section, and the mitigation provided by sections 901 through 905
of this act is intended to help offset those negative implications; and
(h) It is important that the state of Washington maintain its
supply of industrial land for present and future economic development
activities, and local governments taking advantage of the mitigation
provided by sections 901 through 905 of this act should strive to
maintain the supply of industrial land available for economic
development efforts.
(2) The legislature intends that the streamlined sales and use tax
mitigation and public safety account established in section 902 of this
act ((have the sole objective of)) has three objectives (a) mitigating,
for negatively affected local taxing jurisdictions, the net local sales
tax revenue reductions incurred as a result of section 503 of this act
and the chapter ... (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5089), Laws of 2007
(this act) amendments to RCW 82.14.020; (b) providing additional funds
for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system
plan 2 fund; and (c) funding local government public safety uses.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.... and 2007 c ... (Substitute Senate Bill No.
5089) s 902 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) The streamlined sales and use tax mitigation and public safety
account is created in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall
transfer into the account from the general fund amounts as directed in
section 903 of this act. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the ((purpose of)) purposes of (a) mitigating the negative
fiscal impacts to local taxing jurisdictions as a result of section 503
of this act and the chapter ... (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5089), Laws
of 2007 (this act) amendments to RCW 82.14.020; (b) providing
additional funds for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system plan 2 fund; and (c) funding local government public
safety uses.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2008, the state treasurer, as directed by the
department, shall distribute the funds in the streamlined sales and use
tax mitigation and public safety account to local taxing jurisdictions
in accordance with section 903 of this act.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and RCW 82.14.390 and section 903 of this act.
(a) "Agreement" means the same as in RCW 82.32.020.
(b) "Local taxing jurisdiction" means counties, cities,
transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045, public facilities
districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57 RCW, public transportation
benefit areas under RCW 82.14.440, and regional transit authorities
under chapter 81.112 RCW, that impose a sales and use tax.
(c) "Loss" or "losses" means the local sales and use tax revenue
reduction to a local taxing jurisdiction resulting from the sourcing
provisions in section 502 of this act and the chapter ... (Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5089), Laws of 2007 (this act) amendments to RCW
82.14.020.
(d) "Net loss" or "net losses" means a loss offset by any voluntary
compliance revenue.
(e) "Voluntary compliance revenue" means the local sales tax
revenue gain to each local taxing jurisdiction reported to the
department from persons registering through the central registration
system authorized under the agreement.
(f) "Working day" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.45.180.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.... and 2007 c ... (Substitute Senate Bill No.
5089) s 903 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) In order to mitigate local sales tax revenue net losses as a
result of the sourcing provisions of the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement under this title, the state treasurer shall transfer into the
streamlined sales and use tax mitigation and public safety account from
the general fund the sum of thirty-one million six hundred thousand
dollars on July 1, 2008. On July 1, 2009, and each July 1st
thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer into the streamlined
sales and use tax mitigation and public safety account from the general
fund the sum required to mitigate actual net losses as determined under
this section.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2008, and continuing until the department
determines annual losses under subsection (3) of this section, the
department shall determine the amount of local sales tax net loss each
local taxing jurisdiction experiences as a result of the sourcing
provisions of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement under this
title each calendar quarter. The department shall determine losses by
analyzing and comparing data from tax return information and tax
collections for each local taxing jurisdiction before and after the
effective date of this section on a calendar quarter basis. The
department's analysis may be revised and supplemented in consultation
with the oversight committee as provided in subsection (4) of this
section. To determine net losses, the department shall reduce losses
by the amount of voluntary compliance revenue for the calendar quarter
analyzed. Beginning December 31, 2008, distributions shall be made
quarterly from the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation and public
safety account by the state treasurer, as directed by the department,
to each local taxing jurisdiction, other than public facilities
districts for losses in respect to taxes imposed under the authority of
RCW 82.14.390, in an amount representing its net losses for the
previous calendar quarter. Distributions shall be made on the last
working day of each calendar quarter and shall cease when distributions
under subsection (3) of this section begin.
(3)(a) By December 31, 2009, or such later date the department in
consultation with the oversight committee determines that sufficient
data is available, the department shall determine each local taxing
jurisdiction's annual loss. The department shall determine annual
losses by comparing at least twelve months of data from tax return
information and tax collections for each local taxing jurisdiction
before and after the effective date of this section. The department
shall not be required to determine annual losses on a recurring basis,
but may make any adjustments to annual losses as it deems proper as a
result of the annual reviews provided in (b) of this subsection.
Beginning the calendar quarter in which the department determines
annual losses, and each calendar quarter thereafter, distributions
shall be made from the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation and
public safety account by the state treasurer on the last working day of
the calendar quarter, as directed by the department, to each local
taxing jurisdiction, other than public facilities districts for losses
in respect to taxes imposed under the authority of RCW 82.14.390, in an
amount representing one-fourth of the jurisdiction's annual loss
reduced by voluntary compliance revenue reported during the previous
calendar quarter.
(b) The department's analysis of annual losses shall be reviewed by
December 1st of each year and may be revised and supplemented in
consultation with the oversight committee as provided in subsection (4)
of this section.
(4) The department shall convene an oversight committee to assist
in the determination of losses. The committee shall include one
representative of one city whose revenues are increased, one
representative of one city whose revenues are reduced, one
representative of one county whose revenues are increased, one
representative of one county whose revenues are decreased, one
representative of one transportation authority under RCW 82.14.045
whose revenues are increased, and one representative of one
transportation authority under RCW 82.14.045 whose revenues are
reduced, as a result of section 503 of this act and the chapter ...
(Substitute Senate Bill No. 5089), Laws of 2007 (this act) amendments
to RCW 82.14.020. Beginning July 1, 2008, the oversight committee
shall meet quarterly with the department to review and provide
additional input and direction on the department's analyses of losses.
Local taxing jurisdictions may also present to the oversight committee
additional information to improve the department's analyses of the
jurisdiction's loss. Beginning January 1, 2010, the oversight
committee shall meet at least annually with the department by December
1st.
(5) The rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW do not apply to
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning January 1, 2009, and on the first business day of
every calendar quarter thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer
the lesser of voluntary compliance revenue for the previous calendar
quarter or six million two hundred fifty thousand dollars into the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 fund.
(2)(a) Beginning January 1, 2009, and on the first business day of
every calendar quarter thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer
the lesser of voluntary compliance revenue for the previous calendar
quarter or six million two hundred fifty thousand dollars to local
governments for public safety purposes as set forth under (b) of this
subsection.
(b) The transfer under (a) of this subsection must be apportioned
to result in an equal amount being provided for each law enforcement
officer and firefighter employed by a local government, based on the
total number of law enforcement officers and firefighters employed by
all local governments. For the purpose of this subsection, "local
government" means any city, town, county, district, or other municipal
corporation that employs firefighters or law enforcement officers, as
defined in RCW 41.26.030.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "voluntary compliance
revenue" means the state sales tax revenue gain to the state reported
to the department from persons registering through the central
registration system authorized under the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement in excess of the mitigation amounts provided to local
governments under section 903, chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5089), Laws of 2007.
(4) In the event voluntary compliance revenue is less than twelve
million five hundred thousand dollars, the treasurer shall divide that
amount between the transfers under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.

--- END ---