BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this section and sections 2 and 3 of this act unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Employer" means an employer, as defined in RCW
49.12.005(3)(b), and includes any person acting in the interest of such
an employer.
(2) "Employee" means the same as provided in RCW 49.12.005(4).
(3) "Labor organization" means any organization that exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining or of dealing
with employers concerning grievances, terms or conditions of
employment, or of other mutual aid or protection in connection with
employment.
(4) "Political matters" includes political party affiliation or the
decision to join or not join a lawful, political, social, or community
group or activity, or a labor organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) It is unlawful for an employer to
require its employees to attend an employer-sponsored meeting or to
participate in any communications with the employer if the primary
purpose is to communicate the employer's opinion about religious or
political matters.
(b) This subsection does not:
(i) Apply to communications about religious or political matters
that the employer is required by law to communicate to employees, but
only to the extent of such requirement;
(ii) Prohibit a religious organization from requiring its employees
to attend an employer-sponsored meeting or to participate in any
communications with the employer if the primary purpose is to
communicate the employer's religious beliefs, practices, or tenets;
(iii) Prohibit a political organization from requiring its
employees to attend an employer-sponsored meeting or to participate in
any communications with the employer if the primary purpose is to
communicate the employer's political tenets or purposes; or
(iv) Prohibit an educational institution from requiring student
instructors to attend lectures on political or religious matters that
are part of the regular coursework at such institution.
(2) An employer may not discharge or in any manner discriminate
against, or threaten to discharge or discriminate against, an employee
because the employee, or a person acting on behalf of the employee,
makes a good faith report, orally or in writing, of a violation or a
suspected violation of this section. This subsection does not apply
when the employee knows that such report is false.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An employee aggrieved by a violation of
section 2 of this act may, within ninety days after the date of the
alleged violation, bring a civil action in the superior court for the
county where the violation is alleged to have occurred or where the
employer has its principal office. The court may award a prevailing
employee all appropriate relief, including rehiring or reinstatement of
the employee to the employee's former position with back pay and
without loss of seniority or benefits to which the employee would
otherwise have been eligible if such violation had not occurred. The
court shall award a prevailing employee treble damages, together with
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
(2) This section does not limit an employee's right to bring a
common law cause of action against an employer for wrongful termination
or diminish or impair the rights of a person under a collective
bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 49.44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---