BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.010 and 2003 c 86 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person that files an application for a
license under this chapter, including the applicant's sole proprietor,
owners, directors, officers, partners, members, and controlling
persons.
(2) "Borrower" means a natural person who receives a small loan.
(3) "Business day" means any day that the licensee is open for
business in at least one physical location.
(4) "Check" means the same as defined in RCW 62A.3-104(f) and, for
purposes of conducting the business of making small loans, includes
other electronic forms of payment, including stored value cards,
internet transfers, and automated clearing house transactions.
(5) "Check casher" means an individual, partnership, unincorporated
association, or corporation that, for compensation, engages, in whole
or in part, in the business of cashing checks, drafts, money orders, or
other commercial paper serving the same purpose.
(6) "Check seller" means an individual, partnership, unincorporated
association, or corporation that, for compensation, engages, in whole
or in part, in the business of or selling checks, drafts, money orders,
or other commercial paper serving the same purpose.
(7) "Collateral" means the same as defined in chapter 62A.9A RCW.
(8) "Controlling person" means a person owning or controlling ten
percent or more of the total outstanding shares of the applicant or
licensee, if the applicant or licensee is a corporation, and a member
who owns ten percent or more of a limited liability company or limited
liability partnership.
(9) "Default" means the borrower's failure to repay the small loan
in compliance with the terms contained in the small loan agreement or
note or failure to make payments in compliance with a loan payment
plan.
(10) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(11) "Financial institution" means a commercial bank, savings bank,
savings and loan association, or credit union.
(12) "Licensee" means a check casher or seller licensed by the
director to engage in business in accordance with this chapter. For
purposes of the enforcement powers of this chapter, including the power
to issue cease and desist orders under RCW 31.45.110, "licensee" also
means a check casher or seller who fails to obtain the license required
by this chapter.
(13) "Origination date" means the date upon which the borrower and
the licensee initiate a small loan transaction.
(14) "Outstanding principal balance" of a small loan means any of
the principal amount that has not been paid by the borrower.
(15) "Paid" means that moment in time when the licensee deposits
the borrower's check or accepts cash for the full amount owing on a
valid small loan.
(16) "Person" means an individual, partnership, association,
limited liability company, limited liability partnership, trust,
corporation, and any other legal entity.
(17) "Principal" means the loan proceeds advanced for the benefit
of the borrower in a small loan, excluding any fee or interest charge.
(18) "Rescission" means annulling the loan contract and, with
respect to the small loan contract, returning the borrower and the
licensee to their financial condition prior to the origination date of
the loan.
(19) "Rollover" is any loan made by a licensee to a borrower within
twenty-four hours after the repayment of a previous small loan made by
that licensee to that borrower.
(20) "Small loan" means a loan of up to the maximum amount and for
a period of time up to the maximum term specified in RCW 31.45.073.
(((20))) (21) "Successive loans" means a series of loans made by
the same licensee to the same borrower in such a manner that no more
than three business days separate the termination date of any one loan
and the origination date of any other loan in the series.
(((21))) (22) "Termination date" means the date upon which payment
for the small loan transaction is due or paid to the licensee,
whichever occurs first.
(((22))) (23) "Total of payments" means the principal amount of the
small loan plus all fees or interest charged on the loan.
(((23))) (24) "Trade secret" means the same as defined in RCW
19.108.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 31.45.073 and 2003 c 86 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No licensee may engage in the business of making small loans
without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to its license from
the director in accordance with this chapter. An endorsement will be
required for each location where a licensee engages in the business of
making small loans, but a small loan endorsement may authorize a
licensee to make small loans at a location different than the licensed
locations where it cashes or sells checks. A licensee may have more
than one endorsement.
(2) The termination date of a small loan may not exceed the
origination date of that same small loan by more than forty-five days,
including weekends and holidays, unless the term of the loan is
extended by agreement of both the borrower and the licensee and no
additional fee or interest is charged. The maximum principal amount of
any small loan, or the outstanding principal balances of all small
loans made by a licensee to a single borrower at any one time, may not
exceed seven hundred dollars.
(3) A licensee that has obtained the required small loan
endorsement may charge interest or fees for small loans not to exceed
in the aggregate fifteen percent of the first five hundred dollars of
principal. If the principal exceeds five hundred dollars, a licensee
may charge interest or fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent
of that portion of the principal in excess of five hundred dollars. If
a licensee makes more than one loan to a single borrower, and the
aggregated principal of all loans made to that borrower exceeds five
hundred dollars at any one time, the licensee may charge interest or
fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent on that portion of the
aggregated principal of all loans at any one time that is in excess of
five hundred dollars. The director may determine by rule which fees,
if any, are not subject to the interest or fee limitations described in
this section. It is a violation of this chapter for any licensee to
knowingly loan to a single borrower at any one time, in a single loan
or in the aggregate, more than the maximum principal amount described
in this section.
(4) In connection with making a small loan, a licensee may advance
moneys on the security of a postdated check. The licensee may not
accept any other property, title to property, or other evidence of
ownership of property as collateral for a small loan. The licensee may
accept only one postdated check per loan as security for the loan. A
licensee may permit a borrower to redeem a postdated check with a
payment of cash or the equivalent of cash. The licensee may disburse
the proceeds of a small loan in cash, in the form of a check, or in the
form of the electronic equivalent of cash or a check.
(5) No licensee may make a loan that is a rollover.
(6) No person may at any time cash or advance any moneys on a
postdated check or draft in excess of the amount of goods or services
purchased without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to a check
casher or check seller license.

--- END ---