BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.16.090 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.16.090 are
each amended to read as follows:
(1) No act committed by a person while in a state of voluntary
intoxication shall be deemed less criminal by reason of ((his)) the
person's condition((, but whenever the actual existence of any
particular mental state is a necessary element to constitute a
particular species or degree of crime, the fact of his intoxication may
be taken into consideration in determining such mental state)).
Voluntary intoxication is not a defense to any criminal charge, nor may
the fact of voluntary intoxication be used by a defendant to
demonstrate the lack of any particular mental state that is an element
of a crime charged. Nothing in this section prohibits the prosecution
from introducing evidence of a defendant's intoxication.
(2) This section applies to voluntary intoxication produced by any
agent, including but not limited to alcohol or any drug.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.08.010 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.08.010 are
each amended to read as follows:
(1) Kinds of Culpability Defined.
(a) INTENT. A person acts with intent or intentionally when
((he)):
(i) The person acts with the objective or purpose to accomplish a
result which constitutes a crime; or
(ii) The person is voluntarily intoxicated and acts in a manner
that would be considered intentional if the person were not
intoxicated.
(b) KNOWLEDGE. A person knows or acts knowingly or with knowledge
when:
(i) ((he)) The person is aware of a fact, facts, or circumstances
or result described by a statute defining an offense; ((or))
(ii) ((he)) The person has information which would lead a
reasonable ((man)) person in the same situation to believe that facts
exist which facts are described by a statute defining an offense; or
(iii) The person is voluntarily intoxicated and acts in a manner
that would be considered knowing if the person were not intoxicated.
(c) RECKLESSNESS. A person is reckless or acts recklessly when
((he)):
(i) The person knows of and disregards a substantial risk that a
wrongful act may occur and ((his)) the disregard of such substantial
risk is a gross deviation from conduct that a reasonable ((man)) person
would exercise in the same situation; or
(ii) The person is voluntarily intoxicated and acts in a manner
that would be considered reckless if the person were not intoxicated.
(d) CRIMINAL NEGLIGENCE. A person is criminally negligent or acts
with criminal negligence when ((he)) the person fails to be aware of a
substantial risk that a wrongful act may occur and ((his)) the failure
to be aware of such substantial risk constitutes a gross deviation from
the standard of care that a reasonable ((man)) person would exercise in
the same situation.
(2) Substitutes for Criminal Negligence, Recklessness, and
Knowledge. When a statute provides that criminal negligence suffices
to establish an element of an offense, such element also is established
if a person acts intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly. When
recklessness suffices to establish an element, such element also is
established if a person acts intentionally or knowingly. When acting
knowingly suffices to establish an element, such element also is
established if a person acts intentionally.
(3) Culpability as Determinant of Grade of Offense. When the grade
or degree of an offense depends on whether the offense is committed
intentionally, knowingly, recklessly, or with criminal negligence, its
grade or degree shall be the lowest for which the determinative kind of
culpability is established with respect to any material element of the
offense.
(4) Requirement of Willfulness Satisfied by Acting Knowingly. A
requirement that an offense be committed willfully is satisfied if a
person acts knowingly with respect to the material elements of the
offense, unless a purpose to impose further requirements plainly
appears.

--- END ---