BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the freedom of
expression and the freedom of association are fundamental individual
rights firmly established in the United States and Washington
Constitutions. These freedoms may be compromised when workers are
required to attend employer-sponsored meetings or to participate in any
communications with the employer if the primary purpose is to
communicate the employer's opinion about religious, political, or labor
matters. For these reasons, the legislature intends to take action to
address the issues raised by these activities, and to adopt appropriate
means of protecting these freedoms.

--- END ---