BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.57.010 and 2002 c 363 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislative authority of any town or city located in a
county with a population of less than one million may create a public
facilities district.
(b) The legislative authorities of any contiguous group of towns or
cities located in a county or counties each with a population of less
than one million may enter an agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW for the
creation and joint operation of a public facilities district.
(c) The legislative authority of any town or city, or any
contiguous group of towns or cities, located in a county with a
population of less than one million and the legislative authority of a
contiguous county, or the legislative authority of the county or
counties in which the towns or cities are located, may enter into an
agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW for the creation and joint operation
of a public facilities district.
(d) The legislative authority of a city located in a county with a
population greater than one million may create a public facilities
district, when the city has a total population of less than one hundred
fifteen thousand but greater than eighty thousand and commences
construction of a regional center prior to July 1, 2008.
(2)(a) A public facilities district shall be coextensive with the
boundaries of the city or town or contiguous group of cities or towns
that created the district.
(b) A public facilities district created by an agreement between a
town or city, or a contiguous group of towns or cities, and a
contiguous county or the county in which they are located, shall be
coextensive with the boundaries of the towns or cities, and the
boundaries of the county or counties as to the unincorporated areas of
the county or counties. The boundaries shall not include incorporated
towns or cities that are not parties to the agreement for the creation
and joint operation of the district.
(3)(a) A public facilities district created by a single city or
town shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of five
members selected as follows: (i) Two members appointed by the
legislative authority of the city or town; and (ii) three members
appointed by legislative authority based on recommendations from local
organizations. The members appointed under (a)(i) of this subsection,
shall not be members of the legislative authority of the city or town.
The members appointed under (a)(ii) of this subsection, shall be based
on recommendations received from local organizations that may include,
but are not limited to the local chamber of commerce, local economic
development council, and local labor council. The members shall serve
four-year terms. Of the initial members, one must be appointed for a
one-year term, one must be appointed for a two-year term, one must be
appointed for a three-year term, and the remainder must be appointed
for four-year terms.
(b) A public facilities district created by a contiguous group of
cities and towns shall be governed by a board of directors consisting
of seven members selected as follows: (i) Three members appointed by
the legislative authorities of the cities and towns; and (ii) four
members appointed by the legislative authority based on recommendations
from local organizations. The members appointed under (b)(i) of this
subsection shall not be members of the legislative authorities of the
cities and towns. The members appointed under (b)(ii) of this
subsection, shall be based on recommendations received from local
organizations that include, but are not limited to the local chamber of
commerce, local economic development council, local labor council, and
a neighborhood organization that is directly affected by the location
of the regional center in their area. The members of the board of
directors shall be appointed in accordance with the terms of the
agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint operation of the
district and shall serve four-year terms. Of the initial members, one
must be appointed for a one-year term, one must be appointed for a two-year term, one must be appointed for a three-year term, and the
remainder must be appointed for four-year terms.
(c) A public facilities district created by a town or city, or a
contiguous group of towns or cities, and a contiguous county or the
county or counties in which they are located, shall be governed by a
board of directors consisting of seven members selected as follows:
(i) Three members appointed by the legislative authorities of the
cities, towns, and county; and (ii) four members appointed by the
legislative authority based on recommendations from local
organizations. The members appointed under (c)(i) of this subsection
shall not be members of the legislative authorities of the cities,
towns, or county. The members appointed under (c)(ii) of this
subsection shall be based on recommendations received from local
organizations that include, but are not limited to, the local chamber
of commerce, the local economic development council, the local labor
council, and a neighborhood organization that is directly affected by
the location of the regional center in their area. The members of the
board of directors shall be appointed in accordance with the terms of
the agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint operation of the
district and shall serve four-year terms. Of the initial members, one
must be appointed for a one-year term, one must be appointed for a
two-year term, one must be appointed for a three-year term, and the
remainder must be appointed for four-year terms.
(4) A public facilities district is a municipal corporation, an
independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article VII,
section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the
meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.
(5) A public facilities district shall constitute a body corporate
and shall possess all the usual powers of a corporation for public
purposes as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter be
specifically conferred by statute, including, but not limited to, the
authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into
contracts, and to sue and be sued.
(6) A public facilities district may acquire and transfer real and
personal property by lease, sublease, purchase, or sale. No direct or
collateral attack on any public facilities district purported to be
authorized or created in conformance with this chapter may be commenced
more than thirty days after creation by the city and/or county
legislative authority.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.57.040 and 1999 c 165 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of directors of the public facilities district may
impose the following for the purpose of funding a regional center:
(a) Charges and fees for the use of any of its facilities;
(b) Admission charges under RCW 35.57.100;
(c) Vehicle parking charges under RCW 35.57.110; and
(d) Sales and use taxes authorized under RCW 82.14.048 and
82.14.390. However, the board of directors of a public facilities
district created under RCW 35.57.010(1)(d) may not impose the sales and
use tax authorized in RCW 82.14.390.
(2) The board may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and
donations for the purpose of a regional center. The revenue from the
charges, fees, and taxes imposed under this section shall be used only
for the purposes authorized by this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.100.010 and 2002 c 218 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) A public facilities district may be created in any county
and shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the county.
(b) For the purposes specified in RCW 36.100.030(2), a second
public facilities district may be created in a county with a population
greater than one million. The boundaries of the district shall be
coextensive with boundaries of the county.
(2) A public facilities district shall be created upon adoption of
a resolution providing for the creation of such a district by the
county legislative authority in which the proposed district is located.
(3) A public facilities district is a municipal corporation, an
independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article VII,
section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the
meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.
(4) No taxes authorized under this chapter may be assessed or
levied unless a majority of the voters of the public facilities
district has approved such tax at a general or special election. A
single ballot proposition may both validate the imposition of the sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.048 and the excise tax under RCW
36.100.040.
(5) A public facilities district shall constitute a body corporate
and shall possess all the usual powers of a corporation for public
purposes as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter be
specifically conferred by statute, including, but not limited to, the
authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into
contracts, and to sue and be sued.
(6) A public facilities district may enter into contracts with a
county for the purpose of exercising any powers of a community renewal
agency under chapter 35.81 RCW.
(7) The county legislative authority or the city council may
transfer property to the public facilities district created under this
chapter. No property that is encumbered with debt or that is in need
of major capital renovation may be transferred to the district without
the agreement of the district and revenues adequate to retire the
existing indebtedness.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.100.020 and 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 302 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A public facilities district shall be governed by a board of
directors consisting of five or seven members as provided in this
section. If the largest city in the county has a population that is at
least forty percent of the total county population, the board of
directors of the public facilities district shall consist of five
members selected as follows: (a) Two members appointed by the county
legislative authority to serve for four-year staggered terms; (b) two
members appointed by the city council of the largest city in the county
to serve for four-year staggered terms; and (c) one person to serve for
a four-year term who is selected by the other directors. If the
largest city in the county has a population of less than forty percent
of the total county population or the public facilities district is
created under RCW 36.100.010(1)(b), the county legislative authority
shall establish in the resolution creating the public facilities
district whether the board of directors of the public facilities
district has either five or seven members, and the county legislative
authority shall appoint the members of the board of directors to
reflect the interests of cities and towns in the county, as well as the
unincorporated area of the county. However, if the county has a
population of one million or more, the largest city in the county has
a population of less than forty percent of the total county population,
and the county operates under a county charter, which provides for an
elected county executive, three members shall be appointed by the
governor and the remaining members shall be appointed by the county
executive subject to confirmation by the county legislative authority.
Of the members appointed by the governor, the speaker of the house of
representatives and the majority leader of the senate shall each
recommend to the governor a person to be appointed to the board.
(2) At least one member on the board of directors shall be
representative of the lodging industry in the public facilities
district before the public facilities district imposes the excise tax
under RCW 36.100.040.
(3) Members of the board of directors shall serve four-year terms
of office, except that two of the initial five board members or three
of the initial seven board members shall serve two-year terms of
office.
(4) A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment was made and the person appointed to fill a vacancy shall
serve for the remainder of the unexpired term of the office for the
position to which he or she was appointed.
(5) A director appointed by the governor may be removed from office
by the governor. Any other director may be removed from office by
action of at least two-thirds of the members of the legislative
authority which made the appointment.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.100.030 and 2003 c 376 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public facilities district is authorized to acquire,
construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate
(a) sports facilities, entertainment facilities, convention facilities,
or regional centers as defined in RCW 35.57.020, and (b) for districts
formed after January 1, 2000, recreational facilities other than ski
areas, together with contiguous parking facilities. The taxes that are
provided for in this chapter may only be imposed for these purposes.
(2) A public facilities district created under RCW 36.100.010(1)(b)
is authorized to finance the construction, ownership, remodeling,
maintenance, equipping, reequipping, repair, and operation of a
regional center of a public facilities district created under RCW
35.57.010(1)(d).
(3) A public facilities district may enter into agreements under
chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint provision and operation of such
facilities and may enter into contracts under chapter 39.34 RCW where
any party to the contract provides and operates such facilities for the
other party or parties to the contract.
(((3))) (4) Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil,
or merit service system, a public facilities district may contract with
a public or private entity for the operation or management of its
public facilities.
(((4))) (5) A public facilities district is authorized to use the
supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures set forth
in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the design, construction,
reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any of its public facilities.
(((5))) (6) A public facilities district may impose charges and
fees for the use of its facilities, and may accept and expend or use
gifts, grants, and donations.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.14.390 and 2006 c 298 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
governing body of a public facilities district (a) created before July
31, 2002, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction
of a new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an
existing new regional center, before January 1, 2004((, or)); (b)
created before July 1, 2006, under chapter 35.57 RCW in a county or
counties in which there are no other public facilities districts on
June 7, 2006, and in which the total population in the public
facilities district is greater than ninety thousand that commences
construction of a new regional center before February 1, 2007; (c)
created under the authority of RCW 36.100.010(1)(b); or (d) created
before September 1, 2007, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW in a county
or counties in which there are no other public facilities districts on
the effective date of this section, and in which the total population
in the public facilities district is greater than seventy thousand,
that commences construction of a new regional center before January 1,
2009, may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of
this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law
and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the public facilities district. The rate of tax shall not
exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public facilities
district.
(3) No tax may be collected under this section before August 1,
2000. The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds
issued for the construction of the regional center and related parking
facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years after the
tax is first collected.
(4) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the
purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount
from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three percent of
the amount collected under this section, provided that amounts
generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 35.57
RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 36.100 RCW
shall not constitute a public or private source. For the purpose of
this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited to
cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used for
the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions from
public or private foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector
partners as part of a public and private partnership agreement
negotiated by the public facilities district.
(5)(a) The combined total tax levied under this section shall not
be greater than 0.033 percent. If both a public facilities district
created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public facilities district
created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this section, the
tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57
RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.
(b) A public facilities district under subsection (1)(c) of this
section may not impose a tax greater than 0.0017 percent. The district
may not impose the tax if the county in which the district is located
currently imposes the tax under RCW 82.14.0485.
(6) A public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW
before the effective date of this act is not eligible to impose the tax
under this section if the legislative authority of the county where the
public facilities district is located has imposed a sales and use tax
under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 35.57 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governing board of a public facilities district created
under the authority of RCW 35.57.010(1)(d), may apply for deferral of
taxes on the construction of buildings, site preparation, and the
acquisition of related tangible personal property for a new regional
center. Application shall be made to the department in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The application shall contain
information regarding the location of the regional center, estimated or
actual costs, time schedules for completion and operation, and other
information required by the department. The department shall approve
the application within sixty days if it meets the requirements of this
section.
(2) The department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral
certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 81.104 RCW on the new regional center.
(3) The public facilities district shall begin paying the deferred
taxes in the fifth year after the date certified by the department as
the date on which the regional center is operationally complete. The
first payment is due on December 31st of the fifth calendar year after
such certified date, with subsequent annual payments due on December
31st of the following nine years. Each payment shall equal ten percent
of the deferred tax.
(4) The department may authorize an accelerated repayment schedule
upon request of the public facilities district.
(5) Interest shall not be charged on any taxes deferred under this
section for the period of deferral, although all other penalties and
interest applicable to delinquent excise taxes may be assessed and
imposed for delinquent payments under this section. The debt for
deferred taxes is not extinguished by insolvency or other failure of
the public facilities district.
(6) Applications and any other information received by the
department under this section are not confidential and are subject to
disclosure. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration of this
section.
(7) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(b) "Regional center" means a regional center constructed by a
public facilities district created under the authority of RCW
35.57.010(1)(d), where construction of that regional center commences
before July 1, 2008.

--- END ---