BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the replacement
of the vulnerable state route number 520 corridor is a matter of
urgency for the safety of Washington's traveling public and the needs
of the transportation system in central Puget Sound. The state route
number 520 floating bridge serves as a vital route for vehicles to
cross Lake Washington, and the bridge carries approximately one hundred
fifteen thousand vehicles per day, over three times its design
capacity. Additionally, the state route number 520 corridor
experiences more than seven hours of congestion per day, impacting
other state highways and local roads.
The legislature further finds that starting in 1997, the forty-seven member trans-Lake Washington committee began to identify ways to
improve transportation across or around Lake Washington. The project
for the environmental impact statement process became the state route
number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project in 2000, and the
department has analyzed almost one hundred concepts since that time.
The legislature finds that sufficient work has been performed to
conclude that alternatives other than the four-lane and six-lane
alternatives have been explored and rejected for sound reasons.
The legislature further finds that the state route number 520
floating bridge is subject to damage, closure, or even catastrophic
failure from windstorms and waves. Additionally, the state route
number 520 floating bridge does not meet current seismic standards, and
over the next fifty years there is a twenty percent chance of serious
damage to the structure if an earthquake occurs. Failure of the
floating bridge or the bridge approaches would cause injury or loss of
life and have a substantial impact on the region's economy.
Therefore, it is the conclusion of the legislature that time is of
the essence, and that Washington state cannot wait for a disaster to
make it fully appreciate the urgency of the need to replace this
vulnerable structure. The state must take the necessary steps to move
forward with the state route number 520 bridge replacement project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The needs of the central Puget Sound region and the state are best
served by a state route number 520 project alternative that replaces
the four existing general purpose lanes and adds two lanes of capacity
suitable for transit and other high-occupancy vehicle use. New
pontoons for the floating structure must be designed to accommodate the
installation of a high capacity transit system, such as light rail or
another comparable system. The department must incorporate this policy
into any preferred alternative that may be developed for the project's
environmental assessment documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As soon as practicable after the effective date of this act,
and after consulting with appropriate local jurisdictions, the
department shall hire a mediator to develop consensus-building among
the interested parties to support the policy goals identified in
section 2 of this act through fact-finding, facilitation, and
mediation. In evaluating the project impacts, the mediator shall
consider the concerns of neighborhoods and institutions of higher
education directly impacted by the proposed designs, and shall work
with the appropriate planning staff.
(a) The mediator must have significant professional experience in
(i) working with the impacted communities that surround major
transportation construction projects and (ii) mitigating the
construction impact on those communities.
(b) The mediator position under this section is a nonbinding
advisory position, and this section does not create a legally binding
mediation or arbitration position.
(c) The department shall hire the mediator within existing
appropriations allocated for the state route number 520 bridge
replacement and HOV project.
(2) The mediator must provide monthly updates to the governor and
the joint transportation committee regarding the status of the
consensus-building process. The mediator must provide the governor and
the joint transportation committee with a final recommendation by
October 31, 2007. The recommendation must reflect a balance of
solutions for carrying out the project that can be incorporated into
the legislative direction described in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project
finance plan must include state funding, federal funding, one billion
one million dollars from the regional transportation investment
district, and revenue from tolling. The department must provide a
proposed finance plan to be tied to the estimated cost of the
recommended project solutions, as provided under section 3 of this act,
to the governor and the joint transportation committee by January 1,
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act may be known and cited as the state
route number 520 bridge replacement act.

--- END ---