BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.68.290 and 2006 c 337 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The transportation partnership account is hereby created in the
state treasury. All distributions to the account from RCW 46.68.090
must be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used
only for projects or improvements identified as 2005 transportation
partnership projects or improvements in the omnibus transportation
appropriations act, including any principal and interest on bonds
authorized for the projects or improvements.
(2) The legislature intends to reprioritize allocation of funding
for the following highway improvement and safety projects on state
route number 2:
(a) State route number 204 to milepost 5.02 - $33,280,000;
(b) Milepost 5.02 to Campbell Road (92nd St. Southeast) -$40,950,000;
(c) Campbell Road (92nd St. Southeast) to Monroe - $139,050,000;
(d) State route number 522 interchange to Monroe east of city
limits - $33,640,000;
(e) City of Monroe east of city limits to Fern Bluff Road -$15,230,000;
(f) Fern Bluff Road to city of Sultan west of city limits -$46,080,000;
(g) City of Sultan west of city limits to Fir Road - $55,230,000.
(3) The legislature finds that:
(a) Citizens demand and deserve accountability of transportation-related programs and expenditures. Transportation-related programs
must continuously improve in quality, efficiency, and effectiveness in
order to increase public trust;
(b) Transportation-related agencies that receive tax dollars must
continuously improve the way they operate and deliver services so
citizens receive maximum value for their tax dollars; and
(c) Fair, independent, comprehensive performance audits of
transportation-related agencies overseen by the elected state auditor
are essential to improving the efficiency, economy, and effectiveness
of the state's transportation system.
(((3))) (4) For purposes of chapter 314, Laws of 2005:
(a) "Performance audit" means an objective and systematic
assessment of a state agency or agencies or any of their programs,
functions, or activities by the state auditor or designee in order to
help improve agency efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability.
Performance audits include economy and efficiency audits and program
audits.
(b) "Transportation-related agency" means any state agency, board,
or commission that receives funding primarily for transportation-related purposes. At a minimum, the department of transportation, the
transportation improvement board or its successor entity, the county
road administration board or its successor entity, and the traffic
safety commission are considered transportation-related agencies. The
Washington state patrol and the department of licensing shall not be
considered transportation-related agencies under chapter 314, Laws of
2005.
(((4))) (5) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09
RCW, the state auditor shall establish criteria and protocols for
performance audits. Transportation-related agencies shall be audited
using criteria that include generally accepted government auditing
standards as well as legislative mandates and performance objectives
established by state agencies. Mandates include, but are not limited
to, agency strategies, timelines, program objectives, and mission and
goals as required in RCW 43.88.090.
(((5))) (6) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09
RCW, the state auditor may conduct performance audits for
transportation-related agencies. The state auditor shall contract with
private firms to conduct the performance audits.
(((6))) (7) The audits may include:
(a) Identification of programs and services that can be eliminated,
reduced, consolidated, or enhanced;
(b) Identification of funding sources to the transportation-related
agency, to programs, and to services that can be eliminated, reduced,
consolidated, or enhanced;
(c) Analysis of gaps and overlaps in programs and services and
recommendations for improving, dropping, blending, or separating
functions to correct gaps or overlaps;
(d) Analysis and recommendations for pooling information technology
systems used within the transportation-related agency, and evaluation
of information processing and telecommunications policy, organization,
and management;
(e) Analysis of the roles and functions of the transportation-related agency, its programs, and its services and their compliance
with statutory authority and recommendations for eliminating or
changing those roles and functions and ensuring compliance with
statutory authority;
(f) Recommendations for eliminating or changing statutes, rules,
and policy directives as may be necessary to ensure that the
transportation-related agency carry out reasonably and properly those
functions vested in the agency by statute;
(g) Verification of the reliability and validity of transportation-related agency performance data, self-assessments, and performance
measurement systems as required under RCW 43.88.090;
(h) Identification of potential cost savings in the transportation-related agency, its programs, and its services;
(i) Identification and recognition of best practices;
(j) Evaluation of planning, budgeting, and program evaluation
policies and practices;
(k) Evaluation of personnel systems operation and management;
(l) Evaluation of purchasing operations and management policies and
practices;
(m) Evaluation of organizational structure and staffing levels,
particularly in terms of the ratio of managers and supervisors to
nonmanagement personnel; and
(n) Evaluation of transportation-related project costs, including
but not limited to environmental mitigation, competitive bidding
practices, permitting processes, and capital project management.
(((7))) (8) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09
RCW, the state auditor must provide the preliminary performance audit
reports to the audited state agency for comment. The auditor also may
seek input on the preliminary report from other appropriate officials.
Comments must be received within thirty days after receipt of the
preliminary performance audit report unless a different time period is
approved by the state auditor. The final performance audit report
shall include the objectives, scope, and methodology; the audit
results, including findings and recommendations; the agency's response
and conclusions; and identification of best practices.
(((8))) (9) The state auditor shall provide final performance audit
reports to the citizens of Washington, the governor, the joint
legislative audit and review committee, the appropriate legislative
committees, and other appropriate officials. Final performance audit
reports shall be posted on the internet.
(((9))) (10) The audited transportation-related agency is
responsible for follow-up and corrective action on all performance
audit findings and recommendations. The audited agency's plan for
addressing each audit finding and recommendation shall be included in
the final audit report. The plan shall provide the name of the contact
person responsible for each action, the action planned, and the
anticipated completion date. If the audited agency does not agree with
the audit findings and recommendations or believes action is not
required, then the action plan shall include an explanation and
specific reasons.
The office of financial management shall require periodic progress
reports from the audited agency until all resolution has occurred. The
office of financial management is responsible for achieving audit
resolution. The office of financial management shall annually report
by December 31st the status of performance audit resolution to the
appropriate legislative committees and the state auditor. The
legislature shall consider the performance audit results in connection
with the state budget process.
The auditor may request status reports on specific audits or
findings.
(((10))) (11) For the period from July 1, 2005, until June 30,
2007, the amount of $4,000,000 is appropriated from the transportation
partnership account to the state auditors office for the purposes of
subsections (((2))) (3) through (((9))) (10) of this section.

--- END ---