BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.084 and 2003 c 86 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A licensee and borrower may agree to a payment plan for a small
loan at any time. After four successive loans and ((prior to)) within
thirty days of default upon the last loan, each borrower may convert
their small loan to a payment plan. Each agreement for a loan payment
plan must be in writing and acknowledged by both the borrower and the
licensee. The licensee may charge the borrower((, at the time both
parties enter into the payment plan,)) a one-time fee for the payment
plan in an amount up to the fee or interest on the outstanding
principal of the loan as allowed under RCW 31.45.073(3). The one-time
fee for the payment plan may not be assessed at the time the parties
enter into the agreement; it must be paid in equal installments over
the term of the payment plan. The licensee may not assess any other
fee, interest charge, or other charge on the borrower as a result of
converting the small loan into a payment plan. This payment plan must
provide for the payment of the total of payments due on the small loan
over a period not less than sixty days in three or more payments,
unless the borrower and licensee agree to a shorter payment period.
The borrower may pay the total of payments at any time. The licensee
may not charge any penalty, fee, or charge to the borrower for
prepayment of the loan payment plan by the borrower. Each licensee
shall conspicuously disclose to each borrower in the small loan
agreement or small loan note that the borrower has access to such a
payment plan after four successive loans. A licensee's violation of
such a payment plan constitutes a violation of this chapter.
(2) The licensee may take postdated checks at the initiation of the
payment plan for the payments agreed to under the plan. If any check
accepted by the licensee as payment under the payment plan is
dishonored, the licensee may not charge the borrower any fee for the
dishonored check.
(3) If the borrower defaults on the payment plan, the licensee may
initiate action to collect the total of payments under RCW 31.45.082.
The licensee may charge the borrower a one-time payment plan default
fee of twenty-five dollars.
(4) If the licensee enters into a payment plan with the borrower
through an accredited third party, with certified credit counselors,
that is representing the borrower, the licensee's failure to comply
with the terms of that payment plan constitutes a violation of this
chapter.

--- END ---