BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public safety is
one of the paramount duties of the state and an essential function of
government. The legislature further finds that systemic problems exist
with the department of corrections that must be addressed expeditiously
and unequivocally in order to rebuild public confidence in the state's
ability to best protect them from criminal offenders who have been
released from full incarceration but are still serving their sentences
on community custody. Turnstile justice is not conducive to building
public safety, public confidence in and support for our criminal
justice system as a whole, and the morale of personnel working within
our department of corrections, law enforcement agencies, and
prosecutors' offices. Citizens expect and demand predictability,
proportionality, uniformity, transparency, and justice when dealing
with criminal offenders and due consideration for the severe and
detrimental impact of crime on victims and their families and friends
when dealing with such offenders.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.737 and 2005 c 435 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an offender violates any condition or requirement of
community custody, the department may transfer the offender to a more
restrictive confinement status to serve up to the remaining portion of
the sentence, less credit for any period actually spent in community
custody or in detention awaiting disposition of an alleged violation
and subject to the limitations of subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a)(i) For a sex offender sentenced to a term of community
custody under RCW 9.94A.670 for a crime committed prior to the
effective date of this act who violates any condition of community
custody, the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty days'
confinement in a local correctional facility for each violation. If
the department imposes a sanction, the department shall submit within
seventy-two hours a report to the court and the prosecuting attorney
outlining the violation or violations and the sanctions imposed.
(ii) For a sex offender sentenced to a term of community custody
under RCW 9.94A.670 for a crime committed on or after the effective
date of this act who violates any condition of community custody, the
department may impose, for each violation, a sanction of total
confinement in a local correctional facility for any period of time
that does not exceed the offender's remaining term of community
custody. If the department imposes a sanction, the department shall
submit within seventy-two hours a report to the court and the
prosecuting attorney outlining the violation or violations and the
sanctions imposed.
(b) For a sex offender sentenced to a term of community custody
under RCW 9.94A.710 who violates any condition of community custody
after having completed his or her maximum term of total confinement,
including time served on community custody in lieu of earned release,
the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty days in a local
correctional facility for each violation.
(c)(i) For an offender sentenced to a term of community custody
under RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650, or 9.94A.715, or under RCW
9.94A.545, for a crime committed on or after July 1, 2000, but before
the effective date of this act, who violates any condition of community
custody after having completed his or her maximum term of total
confinement, including time served on community custody in lieu of
earned release, the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty
days in total confinement for each violation. The department may
impose sanctions such as work release, home detention with electronic
monitoring, work crew, community restitution, inpatient treatment,
daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling sessions,
supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any other
sanctions available in the community.
(ii) For an offender sentenced to a term of community custody under
RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650, or 9.94A.715, or under RCW 9.94A.545,
for a crime committed on or after the effective date of this act, who
violates any condition of community custody after having completed his
or her maximum term of total confinement, including time served on
community custody in lieu of earned release, the department may impose,
for each violation, a sanction of total confinement for any period of
time that does not exceed the offender's remaining term of community
custody. The department may impose sanctions such as work release,
home detention with electronic monitoring, work crew, community
restitution, inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational
or counseling sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic
monitoring, or any other sanctions available in the community.
(d) For an offender sentenced to a term of community placement
under RCW 9.94A.705 who violates any condition of community placement
after having completed his or her maximum term of total confinement,
including time served on community custody in lieu of earned release,
the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty days in total
confinement for each violation. The department may impose sanctions
such as work release, home detention with electronic monitoring, work
crew, community restitution, inpatient treatment, daily reporting,
curfew, educational or counseling sessions, supervision enhanced
through electronic monitoring, or any other sanctions available in the
community.
(3) If an offender is accused of violating any condition or
requirement of community custody, he or she is entitled to a hearing
before the department prior to the imposition of sanctions. The
hearing shall be considered as offender disciplinary proceedings and
shall not be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The department shall
develop hearing procedures and a structure of graduated sanctions.
(4) The hearing procedures required under subsection (3) of this
section shall be developed by rule and include the following:
(a) Hearing officers shall report through a chain of command
separate from that of community corrections officers;
(b) The department shall provide the offender with written notice
of the violation, the evidence relied upon, and the reasons the
particular sanction was imposed. The notice shall include a statement
of the rights specified in this subsection, and the offender's right to
file a personal restraint petition under court rules after the final
decision of the department;
(c) The hearing shall be held unless waived by the offender, and
shall be electronically recorded. For offenders not in total
confinement, the hearing shall be held within fifteen working days, but
not less than twenty-four hours, after notice of the violation. For
offenders in total confinement, the hearing shall be held within five
working days, but not less than twenty-four hours, after notice of the
violation;
(d) The offender shall have the right to: (i) Be present at the
hearing; (ii) have the assistance of a person qualified to assist the
offender in the hearing, appointed by the hearing officer if the
offender has a language or communications barrier; (iii) testify or
remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary evidence;
and (v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and
(e) The sanction shall take effect if affirmed by the hearing
officer. Within seven days after the hearing officer's decision, the
offender may appeal the decision to a panel of three reviewing officers
designated by the secretary or by the secretary's designee. The
sanction shall be reversed or modified if a majority of the panel finds
that the sanction was not reasonably related to any of the following:
(i) The crime of conviction; (ii) the violation committed; (iii) the
offender's risk of reoffending; or (iv) the safety of the community.
(5) For purposes of this section, no finding of a violation of
conditions may be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(6) The department shall work with the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs to establish and operate an electronic
monitoring program for low-risk offenders who violate the terms of
their community custody. Between January 1, 2006, and December 31,
2006, the department shall endeavor to place at least one hundred low-risk community custody violators on the electronic monitoring program
per day if there are at least that many low-risk offenders who qualify
for the electronic monitoring program.
(7) Local governments, their subdivisions and employees, the
department and its employees, and the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs and its employees shall be immune from civil
liability for damages arising from incidents involving low-risk
offenders who are placed on electronic monitoring unless it is shown
that an employee acted with gross negligence or bad faith.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.631 and 1984 c 209 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
If an offender violates any condition or requirement of a sentence,
a community corrections officer may arrest or cause the arrest of the
offender without a warrant, pending a determination by the court. If
there is reasonable cause to believe that an offender has violated a
condition or requirement of the sentence, an offender may be required
to submit to a search and seizure of the offender's person, residence,
automobile, or other personal property. An offender may be required to
submit to a search without reasonable cause to believe that he or she
has violated a condition or requirement of the sentence if the search
is a condition of his or her community custody under section 4 of this
act. A community corrections officer may also arrest an offender for
any crime committed in his or her presence. The facts and
circumstances of the conduct of the offender shall be reported by the
community corrections officer, with recommendations, to the court.
If a community corrections officer arrests or causes the arrest of
an offender under this section, the offender shall be confined and
detained in the county jail of the county in which the offender was
taken into custody, and the sheriff of that county shall receive and
keep in the county jail, where room is available, all prisoners
delivered to the jail by the community corrections officer, and such
offenders shall not be released from custody on bail or personal
recognizance, except upon approval of the court, pursuant to a written
order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Offenders in total confinement may be subjected to random,
unannounced inspections without violating the constitutional
requirement that all searches be reasonable;
(b) Offenders on community custody have the same expectation of
privacy as offenders in total confinement; and
(c) Requiring an offender on community custody to submit to random,
unannounced inspections is therefore reasonable under the federal and
state Constitutions.
(2) When a court sentences an offender to a term of community
custody under RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.545, 9.94A.650, or 9.94A.715,
for a crime committed on or after the effective date of this act, the
court shall require the offender, as a condition of community custody,
to submit to random, unannounced inspections of his or her person,
residence, automobile, or other personal property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall inspect the person, residence, automobile,
or other personal property of an offender under its supervision in the
community whenever the department has reasonable cause to believe that
the offender has violated a condition or requirement of his or her
sentence.
(2) The department shall perform random, unannounced inspections of
the person, residence, automobile, or other personal property of every
offender under the department's supervision pursuant to a term of
community custody imposed for a crime committed on or after the
effective date of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2004 c 176 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, the term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned release
time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by
the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency
shall not credit the offender with earned release credits in advance of
the offender actually earning the credits. Any program established
pursuant to this section shall allow an offender to earn early release
credits for presentence incarceration. If an offender is transferred
from a county jail to the department, the administrator of a county
jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time spent
in custody at the facility and the amount of earned release time. An
offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23,
1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good time credits
or earned release time for that portion of his or her sentence that
results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In the
case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex
offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 2003,
or any other offense committed on or after the effective date of this
act, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed ten percent of
the sentence.
(b)(i) In the case of an offender who qualifies under (b)(ii) of
this subsection, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed fifty
percent of the sentence.
(ii) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time under this subsection (1)(b) if he or
she:
(A) Is classified in one of the two lowest risk categories under
(b)(iii) of this subsection;
(B) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
and
(C) Has no prior conviction for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor).
(iii) For purposes of determining an offender's eligibility under
this subsection (1)(b), the department shall perform a risk assessment
of every offender committed to a correctional facility operated by the
department who has no current or prior conviction for a sex offense, a
violent offense, a crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411,
a felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020, a
violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary), a violation of, or
an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.401 by
manufacture or delivery or possession with intent to deliver
methamphetamine, or a violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled
substance to a minor). The department must classify each assessed
offender in one of four risk categories between highest and lowest
risk.
(iv) The department shall recalculate the earned release time and
reschedule the expected release dates for each qualified offender under
this subsection (1)(b).
(v) This subsection (1)(b) applies retroactively to eligible
offenders serving terms of total confinement in a state correctional
facility as of July 1, 2003.
(vi) This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to offenders convicted
of offenses committed on or after ((July 1, 2010)) the effective date
of this act.
(c) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence;
(2)(a) A person convicted of a sex offense or an offense
categorized as a serious violent offense, assault in the second degree,
vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, assault of a child in the second
degree, any crime against persons where it is determined in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed before July 1, 2000, may become
eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the department, for
transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned release time
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(b) A person convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, any
crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or a felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or after July 1, 2000, may
become eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the
department, for transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned
release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(c) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community placement or community
custody terms eligible for release to community custody status in lieu
of earned release shall provide an approved residence and living
arrangement prior to release to the community;
(d) The department may deny transfer to community custody status in
lieu of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
if the department determines an offender's release plan, including
proposed residence location and living arrangements, may violate the
conditions of the sentence or conditions of supervision, place the
offender at risk to violate the conditions of the sentence, place the
offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk to victim safety or
community safety. The department's authority under this section is
independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence or statutory
provision regarding conditions for community custody or community
placement;
(e) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(4)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section;
(3) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(4)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious enough to
require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is physically incapacitated due to age or the medical condition;
and
(iii) Granting the extraordinary medical placement will result in
a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the
monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time;
(5) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(6) No more than the final six months of the sentence may be served
in partial confinement designed to aid the offender in finding work and
reestablishing himself or herself in the community;
(7) The governor may pardon any offender;
(8) The department may release an offender from confinement any
time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section; and
(9) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an offender
sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a
mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not be released
from total confinement before the completion of the listed mandatory
minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless allowed
under RCW 9.94A.540, however persistent offenders are not eligible for
extraordinary medical placement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall develop a performance review whenever an
offender serving a term of community custody is convicted of a new
crime to determine whether the department contributed to the
circumstances that allowed the crime to occur. Beginning January 1,
2008, the department shall compile and submit copies of the reviews
developed during the previous calendar year to the governor and the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning January 1, 2008, the department shall submit an
annual report to the governor and the legislature containing:
(a) The number of offenders supervised by the department during the
previous calendar year;
(b) The number and custody levels of offenders who violated one or
more conditions of their community custody during the previous calendar
year; and
(c) The number and custody levels of offenders who were convicted,
during the previous calendar year, of new offenses that were committed
while the offenders were on community custody.
(2) The department shall perform a study to determine whether it
has the capacity to adequately supervise all offenders who are serving
a term of community custody. The department shall report the results
of this study along with a plan to efficiently and effectively improve
its supervision capacity to the governor and the legislature by January
1, 2008. For purposes of this subsection, "adequately supervise" means
to supervise in a manner that minimizes the number of community custody
violations and new crimes committed by offenders under supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of corrections and its officers, employees,
agents, and volunteers, who supervise offenders in the community, are
not liable for civil damages resulting from any act or omission in the
provision of such supervision, unless the act or omission constitutes
gross negligence. This section does not create any duty and shall not
be construed to create a duty where none exists.
(2) The burden of proof is clear, cogent, and convincing evidence
in any action alleging damages as a result of any act or omission on
the part of the department of corrections and its officers, employees,
agents, and volunteers, in supervising offenders in the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The sum of . . . . . . dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the department of corrections
for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---