BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.84 RCW
to read as follows:
Consistent with Article XVI, section 5 and Article IX, sections 3
and 5 of the state Constitution, it is the intent of the legislature to
clarify state law to permit the permanent common school fund to be
invested in equities when such investment is in the best interest of
the state and the permanent common school fund.
A 1999 opinion of the attorney general concluded that the
constitutional language does not prohibit investment of the permanent
common school fund, as long as the investment is authorized by law and
is consistent with applicable trust principles. This opinion further
reasoned that the constitutional phrase "permanent and irreducible"
bars the legislature from abolishing the fund or expending its
principal for purposes other than those for which the fund was
established, but does not prohibit the legislature from specifying
permissible investments, particularly in light of Article IX, section
5 of the state Constitution, which specifies that only losses resulting
from "defalcation, mismanagement or fraud" constitute state debts to
the permanent common school fund.
The legislature finds that permanent fund common school fund income
as a percentage of total school construction budgets has declined while
school construction budgets have grown, and that other state revenues
have filled the gap between income from state lands and the total
school construction budget. For this reason, the fund may tolerate
higher risk and volatility in favor of growth, and therefore a balance
of long-term growth and current income is in the best interest of the
state and the fund's beneficiaries. The legislature recognizes that by
investing in equities, the value of the permanent fund may fluctuate
over time due to market changes even if no disposition of the fund
principal is made.
It is the intent of the legislature to clarify state law to permit
equity investment of the permanent common school fund even if there is
a decline in the value of the permanent fund due to market changes.
The legislature recognizes that the irreducible portion of the
principal amount in the permanent fund must be held in perpetuity for
the benefit of the fund and future generations, and that only the
earnings from the permanent fund may be appropriated to the common
school construction fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.515.300 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.40.010 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The principal of the common school fund as the same existed on
June 30, 1965, shall remain permanent and irreducible. The said fund
shall consist of the principal amount thereof existing on June 30,
1965, and such additions thereto as may be derived after June 30, 1965,
from the following named sources, to wit: Appropriations and donations
by the state to this fund; donations and bequests by individuals to the
state or public for common schools; the proceeds of lands and other
property which revert to the state by escheat and forfeiture; the
proceeds of all property granted to the state, when the purpose of the
grant is not specified, or is uncertain; funds accumulated in the
treasury of the state for the disbursement of which provision has not
been made by law; the proceeds of the sale of stone, minerals or
property other than timber and other crops from school and state lands,
other than those granted for specific purposes; all moneys received
from persons appropriating stone, minerals or property other than
timber and other crops from school and state lands other than those
granted for specific purposes, and all moneys other than rental,
recovered from persons trespassing on said lands; five percent of the
proceeds of the sale of public lands lying within the state, which
shall be sold by the United States subsequent to the admission of the
state into the Union as approved by section 13 of the act of congress
enabling the admission of the state into the Union; the principal of
all funds arising from the sale of lands and other property which have
been, and hereafter may be, granted to the state for the support of
common schools and such other funds as may be provided by legislative
enactment.
(2) Consistent with Article XVI, section 5 and Article IX, sections
3 and 5 of the state Constitution, the state investment board may
invest the fund as authorized in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.515
RCW to read as follows:
The state investment board may invest the permanent common school
fund in various types of allowable investments in order to achieve a
balance of long-term growth and current income, when consistent with
the best interest of the state and the permanent common school fund,
and in conformance with RCW 43.84.150. The state treasurer shall
calculate the irreducible principal amount of the fund in accordance
with the state Constitution and state law. The irreducible principal
shall not include investment gains on the principal, and the fund may
retain or distribute income and investment earnings in order to achieve
the appropriate balance between growth and income.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.84.170 and 1981 c 3 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever there are surplus moneys available for investment in the
permanent common school fund, the agricultural college permanent fund,
the normal school permanent fund, the scientific school permanent fund,
or the university permanent fund, the state investment board has full
power to invest or reinvest such funds in the manner prescribed by RCW
43.84.150 and section 3 of this act, and not otherwise.

--- END ---