BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of this act is to make additional
revenue available for appropriation for programs that are not
adequately funded in the state budget, such as the following:
(1) $25,000,000 for the department of social and health services
for increases to the general assistance unemployable (GAU) and
temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) programs.
(2) $22,000,000 for the state health care authority for additional
enrollment slots in the state basic health program.
(3) $15,000,000 for the department of social and health services
for nursing home component rate increases.
(4) $14,000,000 for the department of corrections for offender
transitional housing.
(5) $10,000,000 for the department of social and health services to
increase the wages of community mental health care workers.
(6) $7,000,000 for the department of corrections for offender
alcohol and substance abuse programs.
(7) $7,000,000 for the department of corrections for offender
mental health treatment.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.4281 and 2002 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of
tax((:
(a))) amounts derived from investments((;
(b) Amounts derived as dividends or distributions from [the]
capital account by a parent from its subsidiary entities; and
(c) Amounts derived from interest on loans between subsidiary
entities and a parent entity or between subsidiaries of a common parent
entity, but only if the total investment and loan income is less than
five percent of gross receipts of the business annually)).
(2) The following are not deductible under subsection (1)(((a))) of
this section:
(a) Amounts received from loans((, except as provided in subsection
(1)(c) of this section,)) or the extension of credit to another,
revolving credit arrangements, installment sales, the acceptance of
payment over time for goods or services, or any of the foregoing that
have been transferred by the originator of the same to an affiliate of
the transferor; ((or))
(b) Amounts received by a banking, lending, or security business;
or
(c) Amounts received by a corporation.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply only to this section.
(a) "Banking business" means a person engaging in business as a
national or state-chartered bank, a mutual savings bank, a savings and
loan association, a trust company, an alien bank, a foreign bank, a
credit union, a stock savings bank, or a similar entity that is
chartered under Title 30, 31, 32, or 33 RCW, or organized under Title
12 U.S.C.
(b) "Lending business" means a person engaged in the business of
making secured or unsecured loans of money, or extending credit, and
(i) more than one-half of the person's gross income is earned from such
activities and (ii) more than one-half of the person's total
expenditures are incurred in support of such activities.
(c) The terms "loan" and "extension of credit" do not include
ownership of or trading in publicly traded debt instruments, or
substantially equivalent instruments offered in a private placement.
(d) "Security business" means a person, other than an issuer, who
is engaged in the business of effecting transactions in securities as
a broker, dealer, or broker-dealer, as those terms are defined in the
securities act of Washington, chapter 21.20 RCW, or the federal
securities act of 1933. "Security business" does not include any
company excluded from the definition of broker or dealer under the
federal investment company act of 1940 or any entity that is not an
investment company by reason of sections 3(c)(1) and 3(c)(3) through
3(c)(14) thereof.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.4282 and 1994 c 124 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts derived from bona fide (1) initiation fees, (2) dues, (3)
contributions, (4) donations, (5) tuition fees, (6) charges made by a
nonprofit trade or professional organization for attending or occupying
space at a trade show, convention, or educational seminar sponsored by
the nonprofit trade or professional organization, which trade show,
convention, or educational seminar is not open to the general public,
(7) charges made for operation of privately operated kindergartens, and
(8) endowment funds. With respect to initiation fees, the deduction
authorized in this section only applies to the portion of initiation
fees under one thousand dollars per membership. With respect to dues,
the deduction authorized in this section only applies to the portion of
dues under two hundred dollars per member per month. This section
shall not be construed to exempt any person, association, or society
from tax liability upon selling tangible personal property or upon
providing facilities or services for which a special charge is made to
members or others. If dues are in exchange for any significant amount
of goods or services rendered by the recipient thereof to members
without any additional charge to the member, or if the dues are
graduated upon the amount of goods or services rendered, the value of
such goods or services shall not be considered as a deduction under
this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.08.037 and 2004 c 153 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A seller is entitled to a credit or refund for sales taxes
previously paid on bad debts, as that term is used in 26 U.S.C. Sec.
166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003.
(2) For purposes of this section, "bad debts" does not include:
(a) Amounts due on property that remains in the possession of the
seller until the full purchase price is paid;
(b) Expenses incurred in attempting to collect debt; ((and))
(c) Debts sold or assigned by the seller to third parties, where
the third party is without recourse against the seller; and
(d) Repossessed property.
(3) If a credit or refund of sales tax is taken for a bad debt and
the debt is subsequently collected in whole or in part, the tax on the
amount collected must be paid and reported on the return filed for the
period in which the collection is made.
(4) Payments on a previously claimed bad debt are applied first
proportionally to the taxable price of the property or service and the
sales or use tax thereon, and secondly to interest, service charges,
and any other charges.
(5) If the seller uses a certified service provider as defined in
RCW 82.58.010 to administer its sales tax responsibilities, the
certified service provider may claim, on behalf of the seller, the
credit or refund allowed by this section. The certified service
provider must credit or refund the full amount received to the seller.
(6) The department shall allow an allocation of bad debts among
member states to the streamlined sales tax agreement, as defined in RCW
82.58.010(1), if the books and records of the person claiming bad debts
support the allocation.
(7) A person's right to claim a credit or refund under this section
is not assignable. No person other than the original seller in the
transaction that generated the bad debt or, as provided in subsection
(5) of this section, a certified service provider is entitled to claim
a credit or refund under this section. If the original seller in the
transaction that generated the bad debt has sold or assigned the debt
instrument to a third party with recourse, the original seller may
claim a credit or refund under this section only after the debt
instrument is reassigned by the third party to the original seller.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.12.037 and 2004 c 153 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A seller is entitled to a credit or refund for use taxes
previously paid on bad debts, as that term is used in 26 U.S.C. Sec.
166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003.
(2) For purposes of this section, "bad debts" does not include:
(a) Amounts due on property that remains in the possession of the
seller until the full purchase price is paid;
(b) Expenses incurred in attempting to collect debt; ((and))
(c) Debts sold or assigned by the seller to third parties, where
the third party is without recourse against the seller; and
(d) Repossessed property.
(3) If a credit or refund of use tax is taken for a bad debt and
the debt is subsequently collected in whole or in part, the tax on the
amount collected must be paid and reported on the return filed for the
period in which the collection is made.
(4) Payments on a previously claimed bad debt are applied first
proportionally to the taxable price of the property or service and the
sales or use tax thereon, and secondly to interest, service charges,
and any other charges.
(5) If the seller uses a certified service provider as defined in
RCW 82.58.010 to administer its use tax responsibilities, the certified
service provider may claim, on behalf of the seller, the credit or
refund allowed by this section. The certified service provider must
credit or refund the full amount received to the seller.
(6) The department shall allow an allocation of bad debts among
member states to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, as
defined in RCW 82.58.010(1), if the books and records of the person
claiming bad debts support the allocation.
(7) A person's right to claim a credit or refund under this section
is not assignable. No person other than the original seller in the
transaction that generated the bad debt or, as provided in subsection
(5) of this section, a certified service provider is entitled to claim
a credit or refund under this section. If the original seller in the
transaction that generated the bad debt has sold or assigned the debt
instrument to a third party with recourse, the original seller may
claim a credit or refund under this section only after the debt
instrument is reassigned by the third party to the original seller.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 4 and 5 of this act apply to claims
for credit or refund made after June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The legislature intends to supersede the
holding of the supreme court of the state of Washington in Puget Sound
National Bank v. Department of Revenue, 123 Wn.2d 284 (1994).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.04.062 ("Sale at wholesale," "sale at retail" excludes
sale of precious metal bullion and monetized bullion -- Computation of
tax) and 1985 c 471 s 5;
(2) RCW 82.04.315 (Exemptions -- International banking facilities)
and 1982 c 95 s 7;
(3) RCW 82.04.317 (Exemptions -- Motor vehicle sales by manufacturers
at wholesale auctions to dealers) and 1997 c 4 s 1;
(4) RCW 82.04.4292 (Deductions -- Interest on investments or loans
secured by mortgages or deeds of trust) and 1980 c 37 s 12; and
(5) RCW 82.04.44525 (Credit -- New employment for international
service activities in eligible areas -- Designation of census tracts for
eligibility -- Records -- Tax due upon ineligibility -- Interest assessment--Information from employment security department) and 1998 c 313 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---