BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.410 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Costs will be unallowable if they are not documented,
necessary, ordinary, and related to the provision of care services to
authorized patients.
(2) Unallowable costs include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(a) Costs of items or services not covered by the medical care
program. Costs of such items or services will be unallowable even if
they are indirectly reimbursed by the department as the result of an
authorized reduction in patient contribution;
(b) Costs of services and items provided to recipients which are
covered by the department's medical care program but not included in
the medicaid per-resident day payment rate established by the
department under this chapter;
(c) Costs associated with a capital expenditure subject to section
1122 approval (part 100, Title 42 C.F.R.) if the department found it
was not consistent with applicable standards, criteria, or plans. If
the department was not given timely notice of a proposed capital
expenditure, all associated costs will be unallowable up to the date
they are determined to be reimbursable under applicable federal
regulations;
(d) Costs associated with a construction or acquisition project
requiring certificate of need approval, or exemption from the
requirements for certificate of need for the replacement of existing
nursing home beds, pursuant to chapter 70.38 RCW if such approval or
exemption was not obtained;
(e) Interest costs other than those provided by RCW 74.46.290 on
and after January 1, 1985;
(f) Salaries or other compensation of owners, officers, directors,
stockholders, partners, principals, participants, and others associated
with the contractor or its home office, including all board of
directors' fees for any purpose, except reasonable compensation paid
for service related to patient care;
(g) Costs in excess of limits or in violation of principles set
forth in this chapter;
(h) Costs resulting from transactions or the application of
accounting methods which circumvent the principles of the payment
system set forth in this chapter;
(i) Costs applicable to services, facilities, and supplies
furnished by a related organization in excess of the lower of the cost
to the related organization or the price of comparable services,
facilities, or supplies purchased elsewhere;
(j) Bad debts of non-Title XIX recipients. Bad debts of Title XIX
recipients are allowable if the debt is related to covered services, it
arises from the recipient's required contribution toward the cost of
care, the provider can establish that reasonable collection efforts
were made, the debt was actually uncollectible when claimed as
worthless, and sound business judgment established that there was no
likelihood of recovery at any time in the future;
(k) Charity and courtesy allowances;
(l) Cash, assessments, or other contributions, excluding dues, to
charitable organizations, professional organizations, trade
associations, or political parties, and costs incurred to improve
community or public relations;
(m) Vending machine expenses;
(n) Expenses for barber or beautician services not included in
routine care;
(o) Funeral and burial expenses;
(p) Costs of gift shop operations and inventory;
(q) Personal items such as cosmetics, smoking materials, newspapers
and magazines, and clothing, except those used in patient activity
programs;
(r) Fund-raising expenses, except those directly related to the
patient activity program;
(s) Penalties and fines;
(t) Expenses related to telephones, radios, and similar appliances
in patients' private accommodations;
(u) Televisions acquired prior to July 1, 2001;
(v) Federal, state, and other income taxes;
(w) Costs of special care services except where authorized by the
department;
(x) Expenses of an employee benefit not in fact made available to
all employees on an equal or fair basis, for example, key-man insurance
and other insurance or retirement plans;
(y) Expenses of profit-sharing plans;
(z) Expenses related to the purchase and/or use of private or
commercial airplanes which are in excess of what a prudent contractor
would expend for the ordinary and economic provision of such a
transportation need related to patient care;
(aa) Personal expenses and allowances of owners or relatives;
(bb) All expenses of maintaining professional licenses or
membership in professional organizations;
(cc) Costs related to agreements not to compete;
(dd) Amortization of goodwill, lease acquisition, or any other
intangible asset, whether related to resident care or not, and whether
recognized under generally accepted accounting principles or not;
(ee) Expenses related to vehicles which are in excess of what a
prudent contractor would expend for the ordinary and economic provision
of transportation needs related to patient care;
(ff) Legal and consultant fees in connection with a fair hearing
against the department where a decision is rendered in favor of the
department or where otherwise the determination of the department
stands;
(gg) Legal and consultant fees of a contractor or contractors in
connection with a lawsuit against the department;
(hh) Lease acquisition costs, goodwill, the cost of bed rights, or
any other intangible assets;
(ii) All rental or lease costs other than those provided in RCW
74.46.300 on and after January 1, 1985;
(jj) Postsurvey charges incurred by the facility as a result of
subsequent inspections under RCW 18.51.050 which occur beyond the first
postsurvey visit during the certification survey calendar year;
(kk) Compensation paid for any purchased nursing care services,
including registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, and nurse
assistant services, obtained through service contract arrangement in
excess of the amount of compensation paid for such hours of nursing
care service had they been paid at the average hourly wage, including
related taxes and benefits, for in-house nursing care staff of like
classification at the same nursing facility, as reported in the most
recent cost report period;
(ll) For all partial or whole rate periods after July 17, 1984,
costs of land and depreciable assets that cannot be reimbursed under
the Deficit Reduction Act of 1984 and implementing state statutory and
regulatory provisions;
(mm) Costs reported by the contractor for a prior period to the
extent such costs, due to statutory exemption, will not be incurred by
the contractor in the period to be covered by the rate;
(nn) Costs of outside activities, for example, costs allocated to
the use of a vehicle for personal purposes or related to the part of a
facility leased out for office space;
(oo) Travel expenses outside the states of Idaho, Oregon, and
Washington and the province of British Columbia. However, travel to or
from the home or central office of a chain organization operating a
nursing facility is allowed whether inside or outside these areas if
the travel is necessary, ordinary, and related to resident care;
(pp) Moving expenses of employees in the absence of demonstrated,
good-faith effort to recruit within the states of Idaho, Oregon, and
Washington, and the province of British Columbia;
(qq) Depreciation in excess of four thousand dollars per year for
each passenger car or other vehicle primarily used by the
administrator, facility staff, or central office staff;
(rr) Costs for temporary health care personnel from a nursing pool
not registered with the secretary of the department of health;
(ss) Payroll taxes associated with compensation in excess of
allowable compensation of owners, relatives, and administrative
personnel;
(tt) Costs and fees associated with filing a petition for
bankruptcy;
(uu) All advertising or promotional costs, except reasonable costs
of help wanted advertising;
(vv) Outside consultation expenses required to meet department-required minimum data set completion proficiency;
(ww) Interest charges assessed by any department or agency of this
state for failure to make a timely refund of overpayments and interest
expenses incurred for loans obtained to make the refunds;
(xx) All home office or central office costs, whether on or off the
nursing facility premises, and whether allocated or not to specific
services, in excess of the median of those adjusted costs for all
facilities reporting such costs for the most recent report period;
((and))
(yy) Tax expenses that a nursing facility has never incurred; and
(zz) Effective July 1, 2007, and for all future rate setting, any
costs associated with the quality maintenance fee repealed by chapter
241, Laws of 2006.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.431 and 2006 c 258 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations shall be facility-specific and shall have seven components:
Direct care, therapy care, support services, operations, property,
financing allowance, and variable return. The department shall
establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing
facility in this state.
(2) Component rate allocations in therapy care, support services,
variable return, operations, property, and financing allowance for
essential community providers as defined in this chapter shall be based
upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed
beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use. For all
facilities other than essential community providers, effective July 1,
2001, component rate allocations in direct care, therapy care, support
services, variable return, operations, property, and financing
allowance shall continue to be based upon a minimum facility occupancy
of eighty-five percent of licensed beds. For all facilities other than
essential community providers, effective July 1, 2002, the component
rate allocations in operations, property, and financing allowance shall
be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of ninety percent of
licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use. For
all facilities, effective July 1, 2006, the component rate allocation
in direct care shall be based upon actual facility occupancy.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, direct care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2006, direct care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report
data from 2003 will be used for July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
direct care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from
2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, and later direct care component
rate allocations.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1996 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(c) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1999 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(d) Direct care component rate allocations based on ((2003)) 2005
cost report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 2006, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2005, therapy care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report
data from 1999 will continue to be used for July 1, 2005, through June
30, 2007, therapy care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost
report data from 2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, and later therapy
care component rate allocations.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October
1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July
1, 2001, through June 30, 2005, support services component rate
allocations. Adjusted cost report data from 1999 will continue to be
used for July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007, support services
component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from 2005 will
be used for July 1, 2007, and later support services component rate
allocations.
(b) Support services component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, operations component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2006, operations component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data
from 2003 will be used for July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
operations component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from
2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, and later operations component rate
allocations.
(b) Operations component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act. A different economic
trends and conditions adjustment factor or factors may be defined in
the biennial appropriations act for facilities whose operations
component rate is set equal to their adjusted June 30, 2006, rate, as
provided in RCW 74.46.521(4).
(8) For July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, a facility's
property and return on investment component rates shall be the
facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on investment component
rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999,
a facility's property and return on investment component rates shall be
rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.
(9) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(10) Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum
wage of the greater of the state minimum wage or the federal minimum
wage.
(11) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: The need to prorate inflation for
partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing
facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded
new bed capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of
ownership of the nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or
converting beds back into service, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(12) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(13) Effective July 1, 2001, medicaid rates shall continue to be
revised downward in all components, in accordance with department
rules, for facilities converting banked beds to active service under
chapter 70.38 RCW, by using the facility's increased licensed bed
capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting. However,
for facilities other than essential community providers which bank beds
under chapter 70.38 RCW, after May 25, 2001, medicaid rates shall be
revised upward, in accordance with department rules, in direct care,
therapy care, support services, and variable return components only, by
using the facility's decreased licensed bed capacity to recalculate
minimum occupancy for rate setting, but no upward revision shall be
made to operations, property, or financing allowance component rates.
The direct care component rate allocation shall be adjusted, without
using the minimum occupancy assumption, for facilities that convert
banked beds to active service, under chapter 70.38 RCW, beginning on
July 1, 2006.
(14) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of
need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have
a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and
(b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to
be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate
allocation.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.46.506 and 2006 c 258 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The direct care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of nursing care for one resident of a nursing facility for
one day, including direct care supplies. Therapy services and
supplies, which correspond to the therapy care component rate, shall be
excluded. The direct care component rate includes elements of case mix
determined consistent with the principles of this section and other
applicable provisions of this chapter.
(2) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine and
update quarterly for each nursing facility serving medicaid residents
a facility-specific per-resident day direct care component rate
allocation, to be effective on the first day of each calendar quarter.
In determining direct care component rates the department shall
utilize, as specified in this section, minimum data set resident
assessment data for each resident of the facility, as transmitted to,
and if necessary corrected by, the department in the resident
assessment instrument format approved by federal authorities for use in
this state.
(3) The department may question the accuracy of assessment data for
any resident and utilize corrected or substitute information, however
derived, in determining direct care component rates. The department is
authorized to impose civil fines and to take adverse rate actions
against a contractor, as specified by the department in rule, in order
to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data transmission
requirements and to ensure accuracy.
(4) Cost report data used in setting direct care component rate
allocations shall be 1996, 1999, ((and)) 2003, and 2005 for rate
periods as specified in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a).
(5) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall rebase each
nursing facility's direct care component rate allocation as described
in RCW 74.46.431, adjust its direct care component rate allocation for
economic trends and conditions as described in RCW 74.46.431, and
update its medicaid average case mix index, consistent with the
following:
(a) Reduce total direct care costs reported by each nursing
facility for the applicable cost report period specified in RCW
74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments, and to eliminate
reported resident therapy costs and adjustments, in order to derive the
facility's total allowable direct care cost;
(b) Divide each facility's total allowable direct care cost by its
adjusted resident days for the same report period, increased if
necessary to a minimum occupancy of eighty-five percent; that is, the
greater of actual or imputed occupancy at eighty-five percent of
licensed beds, to derive the facility's allowable direct care cost per
resident day. However, effective July 1, 2006, each facility's
allowable direct care costs shall be divided by its adjusted resident
days without application of a minimum occupancy assumption;
(c) Adjust the facility's per resident day direct care cost by the
applicable factor specified in RCW 74.46.431(4) (b), (c), and (d) to
derive its adjusted allowable direct care cost per resident day;
(d) Divide each facility's adjusted allowable direct care cost per
resident day by the facility average case mix index for the applicable
quarters specified by RCW 74.46.501(7)(b) to derive the facility's
allowable direct care cost per case mix unit;
(e) Effective for July 1, 2001, rate setting, divide nursing
facilities into at least two and, if applicable, three peer groups:
Those located in nonurban counties; those located in high labor-cost
counties, if any; and those located in other urban counties;
(f) Array separately the allowable direct care cost per case mix
unit for all facilities in nonurban counties; for all facilities in
high labor-cost counties, if applicable; and for all facilities in
other urban counties, and determine the median allowable direct care
cost per case mix unit for each peer group;
(g) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from October 1,
1998, through June 30, 2000, determine each facility's quarterly direct
care component rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per
case mix unit equal to eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group
median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to
the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group median, and
shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is
between eighty-five and one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group
median established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct
care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost
per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case
mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(h) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from July 1,
2000, through June 30, 2006, determine each facility's quarterly direct
care component rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than ninety percent of the facility's peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to ninety percent of the facility's peer group median, and shall
have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's
assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid
average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred ten percent of the peer group median established under
(f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit equal
to one hundred ten percent of the peer group median, and shall have a
direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's assigned
cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average
case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is
between ninety and one hundred ten percent of the peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct care
component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost per
case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(i)(i) Between October 1, 1998, and June 30, 2000, the department
shall compare each facility's direct care component rate allocation
calculated under (g) of this subsection with the facility's nursing
services component rate in effect on September 30, 1998, less therapy
costs, plus any exceptional care offsets as reported on the cost
report, adjusted for economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW
74.46.431. A facility shall receive the higher of the two rates.
(ii) Between July 1, 2000, and June 30, 2002, the department shall
compare each facility's direct care component rate allocation
calculated under (h) of this subsection with the facility's direct care
component rate in effect on June 30, 2000. A facility shall receive
the higher of the two rates. Between July 1, 2001, and June 30, 2002,
if during any quarter a facility whose rate paid under (h) of this
subsection is greater than either the direct care rate in effect on
June 30, 2000, or than that facility's allowable direct care cost per
case mix unit calculated in (d) of this subsection multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c), the facility shall be paid in that
and each subsequent quarter pursuant to (h) of this subsection and
shall not be entitled to the greater of the two rates.
(iii) Between July 1, 2002, and June 30, 2006, all direct care
component rate allocations shall be as determined under (h) of this
subsection.
(iv) Effective July 1, 2006, for all providers, except vital local
providers as defined in this chapter, all direct care component rate
allocations shall be as determined under (j) of this subsection.
(v) Effective July 1, 2006, for vital local providers, as defined
in this chapter, direct care component rate allocations shall be
determined as follows:
(A) The department shall calculate:
(I) The sum of each facility's July 1((, 2006,)) direct care
component rate allocation calculated under (j) of this subsection and
July 1((, 2006,)) operations component rate calculated under RCW
74.46.521; and
(II) The sum of each facility's June 30, 2006, direct care and
operations component rates, excluding the quality maintenance fee
repealed by chapter 241, Laws of 2006.
(B) If the sum calculated under (i)(v)(A)(I) of this subsection is
less than the sum calculated under (i)(v)(A)(II) of this subsection,
the facility shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal
to the facility's June 30, 2006, direct care component rate allocation.
(C) If the sum calculated under (i)(v)(A)(I) of this subsection is
greater than or equal to the sum calculated under (i)(v)(A)(II) of this
subsection, the facility's direct care component rate shall be
calculated under (j) of this subsection;
(j) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from July 1,
2006, forward, and for all future rate setting, determine each
facility's quarterly direct care component rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred twelve percent of the peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to one hundred twelve percent of the peer group median, and shall
have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's
assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid
average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than or equal to one hundred twelve percent of the peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct care
component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost per
case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c).
(6) The direct care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) Costs related to payments resulting from increases in direct
care component rates, granted under authority of RCW 74.46.508(1) for
a facility's exceptional care residents, shall be offset against the
facility's examined, allowable direct care costs, for each report year
or partial period such increases are paid. Such reductions in
allowable direct care costs shall be for rate setting, settlement, and
other purposes deemed appropriate by the department.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.46.511 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 11 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The therapy care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of medicaid one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified
therapist as defined in this chapter, including therapy supplies and
therapy consultation, for one day for one medicaid resident of a
nursing facility. ((The therapy care component rate allocation for
October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, shall be based on adjusted
therapy costs and days from calendar year 1996. The therapy component
rate allocation for July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2004, shall be based
on adjusted therapy costs and days from calendar year 1999.))
Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine each medicaid
nursing facility's therapy component rate allocation using cost report
data specified in RCW 74.46.431(5)(a). The therapy care component rate
shall be adjusted for economic trends and conditions as specified in
RCW 74.46.431(5)(b), and shall be determined in accordance with this
section.
(2) In rebasing, as provided in RCW 74.46.431(5)(a), the department
shall take from the cost reports of facilities the following reported
information:
(a) Direct one-on-one therapy charges for all residents by payer
including charges for supplies;
(b) The total units or modules of therapy care for all residents by
type of therapy provided, for example, speech or physical. A unit or
module of therapy care is considered to be fifteen minutes of one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified therapist or support personnel; and
(c) Therapy consulting expenses for all residents.
(3) The department shall determine for all residents the total cost
per unit of therapy for each type of therapy by dividing the total
adjusted one-on-one therapy expense for each type by the total units
provided for that therapy type.
(4) The department shall divide medicaid nursing facilities in this
state into two peer groups:
(a) Those facilities located within urban counties; and
(b) Those located within nonurban counties.
The department shall array the facilities in each peer group from
highest to lowest based on their total cost per unit of therapy for
each therapy type. The department shall determine the median total
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type and add ten percent of
median total cost per unit of therapy. The cost per unit of therapy
for each therapy type at a nursing facility shall be the lesser of its
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type or the median total cost
per unit plus ten percent for each therapy type for its peer group.
(5) The department shall calculate each nursing facility's therapy
care component rate allocation as follows:
(a) To determine the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy
type, the allowable cost per unit of therapy for each type of therapy
shall be multiplied by the total therapy units for each type of
therapy;
(b) The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense shall be
calculated taking the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy
type times the medicaid percent of total therapy charges for each
therapy type;
(c) The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense for each
therapy type shall be divided by total adjusted medicaid days to arrive
at the medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each
therapy type;
(d) The medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each
therapy type shall be multiplied by total adjusted patient days for all
residents to calculate the total allowable one-on-one therapy expense.
The lesser of the total allowable therapy consultant expense for the
therapy type or a reasonable percentage of allowable therapy consultant
expense for each therapy type, as established in rule by the
department, shall be added to the total allowable one-on-one therapy
expense to determine the allowable therapy cost for each therapy type;
(e) The allowable therapy cost for each therapy type shall be added
together, the sum of which shall be the total allowable therapy expense
for the nursing facility;
(f) The total allowable therapy expense will be divided by the
greater of adjusted total patient days from the cost report on which
the therapy expenses were reported, or patient days at eighty-five
percent occupancy of licensed beds. The outcome shall be the nursing
facility's therapy care component rate allocation.
(6) The therapy care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) The therapy care component rate shall be suspended for medicaid
residents in qualified nursing facilities designated by the department
who are receiving therapy paid by the department outside the facility
daily rate under RCW 74.46.508(2).

Sec. 5 RCW 74.46.521 and 2006 c 258 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The operations component rate allocation corresponds to the
general operation of a nursing facility for one resident for one day,
including but not limited to management, administration, utilities,
office supplies, accounting and bookkeeping, minor building
maintenance, minor equipment repairs and replacements, and other
supplies and services, exclusive of direct care, therapy care, support
services, property, financing allowance, and variable return.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, beginning
October 1, 1998, the department shall determine each medicaid nursing
facility's operations component rate allocation using cost report data
specified by RCW 74.46.431(7)(a). Effective July 1, 2002, operations
component rates for all facilities except essential community providers
shall be based upon a minimum occupancy of ninety percent of licensed
beds, and no operations component rate shall be revised in response to
beds banked on or after May 25, 2001, under chapter 70.38 RCW.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, to
determine each facility's operations component rate the department
shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted general operations costs per
adjusted resident day, as determined by dividing each facility's total
allowable operations cost by its adjusted resident days for the same
report period, increased if necessary to a minimum occupancy of ninety
percent; that is, the greater of actual or imputed occupancy at ninety
percent of licensed beds, for each facility from facilities' cost
reports from the applicable report year, for facilities located within
urban counties and for those located within nonurban counties and
determine the median adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's operations component rate at the lower of:
(i) The facility's per resident day adjusted operations costs from
the applicable cost report period adjusted if necessary to a minimum
occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds before July 1, 2002,
and ninety percent effective July 1, 2002; or
(ii) The adjusted median per resident day general operations cost
for that facility's peer group, urban counties or nonurban counties;
and
(c) Adjust each facility's operations component rate for economic
trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).
(4)(a) ((Effective July 1, 2006,)) For any facility whose direct
care component rate allocation is set equal to its June 30, 2006,
direct care component rate allocation, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i), the facility's operations component rate allocation
shall also be set equal to the facility's June 30, 2006, operations
component rate allocation, excluding the quality maintenance fee
repealed by chapter 241, Laws of 2006.
(b) The operations component rate allocation for facilities whose
operations component rate is set equal to their June 30, 2006,
operations component rate, shall be adjusted for economic trends and
conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).
(5) The operations component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---