BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that many public
school districts have existing facilities in need of repair and
renovation in order to meet programmatic needs, improve safety, and
meet the needs of an increasing student population. The legislature
also recognizes that many school districts are experiencing high
student enrollment growth beyond current physical capacity, placing a
considerable burden on existing facilities. In addition, there are a
number of school districts that have experienced multiple consecutive
levy failures, making them ineligible for state school construction
assistance. Despite the progress that the legislature has made to
increase school construction funding over the past two biennia, the
need for funding of additional projects continues to outpace available
resources.
It is the intent of the legislature to continue to address the
construction needs in Washington's school districts by projecting
school construction needs over a ten-year period; determining the
appropriate state share of school construction assistance; evaluating
and enhancing the state's distribution formulae for allocating
resources to school districts; establishing a goal to increase the
minimum state match level from twenty percent to fifty percent;
establishing a goal to provide no less than one billion dollars of
funding for school construction; creating new revenue sources to
support school construction; phasing out and replacing impact fee
revenue collected under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.100 for school
facilities; and creating three new funds to target the state's
investment in school construction in key areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) A joint legislative task force on
school construction funding is established, with members as provided in
this subsection.
(i) The joint legislative task force on school construction funding
shall consist of eight members, two members each, one from each major
caucus, from the house of representatives committees on capital budget
and education, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, and two members each, one from each major caucus, from
the senate committees on ways and means and early learning and K-12
education, appointed by the president of the senate.
(ii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives jointly shall appoint two members representing school
districts.
(iii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and
the office of financial management must cooperate with the task force
and must maintain liaison representatives.
(iv) The task force may consult with other interested parties, as
may be appropriate, for technical advice and assistance.
(b) The task force must choose a chair from among its legislative
membership.
(2) The task force must examine the following:
(a) The statutory provisions regarding the funding of school
construction projects;
(b) Eligibility requirements and distribution formulae for the
state's school construction assistance grant program including, but not
limited to the following:
(i) The criteria used to determine a school district's eligibility
to receive state assistance;
(ii) The maximum cost per square foot of construction used to
calculate the amount of state assistance to school districts for school
construction and modernization;
(iii) The amount of instructional space a school district is
eligible to build or remodel with state assistance; and
(iv) The state matching ratio;
(c) The nature and costs of school construction needs anticipated
for the ten-year period ending June 30, 2017;
(d) Flexibility needed in the system to address diverse district
and geographic needs;
(e) Potential revenue sources to increase stability of available
funding sources and provide for anticipated future construction needs,
as well as alternative funding mechanisms for school construction
including, but not limited to funding mechanisms that: (i) Phase out
and replace revenue collected under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.100 for
school facilities; and (ii) encourage cooperative partnerships with
early learning providers, skill centers, community and technical
colleges, or public baccalaureate institutions through the use of a
supermatch concept;
(f) Methods for ensuring that revenue sources examined under this
subsection: (i) Provide revenue to better fund future construction
needs; and (ii) address construction needs unique to high growth areas,
including high growth areas that do not impose impact fees under RCW
82.02.050 through 82.02.100 and that have experienced consecutive
school levy failures.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide progress updates to the task force on the development of the
pilot inventory of school district facility information as provided for
in section . . ., chapter . . ., Laws of 2007 (Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1092) for review and comment by the task force.
(4) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the house
of representatives office of program research and the senate committee
services.
(5) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(7) The task force must report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the senate and the house
of representatives by December 1, 2007.
(8) This section expires December 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.515
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The high growth school district assistance account is created
in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used solely for
new construction, modernization, or replacement of school facilities
within high growth districts that do not receive impact fees for school
facilities pursuant to RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.100, and that have
experienced three or more consecutive bond levy failures.
(2) The school district capital equalization account is created in
the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used solely to
fund the impact of future increases to the minimum level of the state
matching percentage of project costs that will be paid for by the
state.
(3) The high growth school district transition account is created
in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used solely for
system improvements for school facilities within high growth districts
that receive impact fees for school facilities pursuant to RCW
82.02.050 through 82.02.100.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "High growth" means actual enrollment, as provided by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, on May 1st of the
current school year that is at least ten percent greater than
enrollment on May 1st of the school year three years prior to the
current school year.
(b) "Impact fee" means a fee imposed pursuant to RCW 82.02.050
through 82.02.090 for system improvements for school facilities.
(c) "System improvement" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.02.090.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.02.090 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 48 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
definitions shall apply in RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090:
(1) "Development activity" means any construction or expansion of
a building, structure, or use, any change in use of a building or
structure, or any changes in the use of land, that creates additional
demand and need for public facilities.
(2) "Development approval" means any written authorization from a
county, city, or town which authorizes the commencement of development
activity.
(3) "Impact fee" means a payment of money imposed upon development
as a condition of development approval to pay for public facilities
needed to serve new growth and development, and that is reasonably
related to the new development that creates additional demand and need
for public facilities, that is a proportionate share of the cost of the
public facilities, and that is used for facilities that reasonably
benefit the new development. "Impact fee" does not include a
reasonable permit or application fee.
(4) "Owner" means the owner of record of real property, although
when real property is being purchased under a real estate contract, the
purchaser shall be considered the owner of the real property if the
contract is recorded.
(5) "Proportionate share" means that portion of the cost of public
facility improvements that are reasonably related to the service
demands and needs of new development.
(6) "Project improvements" mean site improvements and facilities
that are planned and designed to provide service for a particular
development project and that are necessary for the use and convenience
of the occupants or users of the project, and are not system
improvements. No improvement or facility included in a capital
facilities plan approved by the governing body of the county, city, or
town shall be considered a project improvement.
(7) "Public facilities" means the following capital facilities
owned or operated by government entities: (a) Public streets and
roads; (b) publicly owned parks, open space, and recreation facilities;
and (c) ((school facilities; and (d))) fire protection facilities in
jurisdictions that are not part of a fire district.
(8) "Service area" means a geographic area defined by a county,
city, town, or intergovernmental agreement in which a defined set of
public facilities provide service to development within the area.
Service areas shall be designated on the basis of sound planning or
engineering principles.
(9) "System improvements" mean public facilities that are included
in the capital facilities plan and are designed to provide service to
service areas within the community at large, in contrast to project
improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1,
2009, if specific funding or a funding source, for the purposes of
section 4 of this act, referencing section 4 of this act by bill or
chapter number and section number, or RCW number, is provided by June
30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, the capital appropriations
act, or legislation. If specific funding or a funding source for the
purposes of section 4 of this act, referencing section 4 of this act by
bill or chapter number and section number, or RCW number, is not
provided by June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, the
capital appropriations act, or legislation, section 4 of this act is
null and void.

--- END ---