BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW
to read as follows:
A port district is prohibited from exercising the power of eminent
domain for the acquisition of property or for any other purpose
authorized under the laws of this state. This section shall apply to
all port district activities initiated on or after January 1, 2007.

Sec. 2 RCW 53.08.010 and 1983 c 24 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A port district may acquire by purchase, for cash or on deferred
payments for a period not exceeding twenty years, ((or by condemnation,
or both,)) all lands, property, property rights, leases, or easements
necessary for its purposes ((and may exercise the right of eminent
domain in the acquirement or damaging of all such lands, property, and
property rights,)) and may levy and collect assessments upon property
for the payment of all damages and compensation in carrying out its
purposes, and such right shall be exercised in the same manner and by
the same procedure as provided for cities of the first class insofar as
consistent with this title, and in connection therewith the county
treasurer shall perform the duties of the treasurers of such cities.

Sec. 3 RCW 53.08.020 and 1963 c 147 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A port district may construct, ((condemn,)) purchase, acquire, add
to, maintain, conduct, and operate sea walls, jetties, piers, wharves,
docks, boat landings, and other harbor improvements, warehouses,
storehouses, elevators, grain-bins, cold storage plants, terminal icing
plants, bunkers, oil tanks, ferries, canals, locks, tidal basins,
bridges, subways, tramways, cableways, conveyors, administration
buildings, fishing terminals, together with modern appliances and
buildings for the economical handling, packaging, storing, and
transporting of freight and handling of passenger traffic, rail and
motor vehicle transfer and terminal facilities, water transfer and
terminal facilities, air transfer and terminal facilities, and any
combination of such transfer and terminal facilities, commercial
transportation, transfer, handling, storage and terminal facilities,
and improvements relating to industrial and manufacturing activities
within the district, and in connection with the operation of the
facilities and improvements of the district, it may perform all
customary services including the handling, weighing, measuring and
reconditioning of all commodities received. A port district may also
construct, ((condemn,)) purchase, acquire, add to, and maintain
facilities for the freezing or processing of goods, agricultural
products, meats, or perishable commodities. A port district may also
construct, purchase, and operate belt line railways((, but shall not
acquire the same by condemnation)).

Sec. 4 RCW 53.08.047 and 1972 ex.s. c 54 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except for the prohibition against the use of eminent domain under
section 1 of this act, neither this chapter nor anything herein
contained shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any
powers which a district might otherwise have under any laws of this
state, but shall be construed as cumulative.

Sec. 5 RCW 53.20.050 and 1985 c 469 s 52 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a petition signed by one hundred freeholders in the
district to be therein described, shall be filed with the port
commission, asking that any portion of the general plan adopted be
ordered, and defining the boundaries of a local improvement district to
be assessed in whole or in part to pay the cost thereof, it shall be
the duty of the port commission to fix a date for hearing on the
petition, after which it may alter the boundaries of the proposed
district and prepare and adopt detail plans of any such local
improvement, declare the estimated cost thereof, what proportion of the
cost shall be borne by the proposed local improvement district, and
what proportion of the cost, if any, but in any event not to exceed
fifty percent, shall be borne by the entire port district. At any time
within two years thereafter, upon petition of the owners of a majority
of the lands in the proposed local improvement district, fixed by the
port commission, as shown in the office of the auditor of the county,
asking that the improvement be ordered, the port commission shall
forthwith by resolution order the improvement, provide the general
funds of the port district to be applied thereto, acquire all lands
necessary therefor, pay all damages caused thereby, ((and commence in
the name of the port district such eminent domain proceedings and
supplemental assessment or reassessment proceedings to pay all eminent
domain awards as may be necessary to entitle the port district to
proceed with such work,)) and shall thereafter proceed with the work,
and shall make and file with the county treasurer its roll levying
special assessments in the amount to be paid by special assessment
against the property situated within the local improvement district in
proportion to the special benefits to be derived by the property in the
local improvement district from the improvement. Before the approval
of the roll a notice shall be published once a week for two consecutive
weeks in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the local
improvement district, stating that the roll is on file and open to
inspection in the office of the clerk of the port commission, and
fixing a time not less than fifteen nor more than thirty days from the
date of the first publication of the notice within which protests must
be filed with the clerk of the port commission against any assessments
shown thereon, and fixing a time when a hearing shall be held by the
commission on the protests. After the hearing the port commission may
alter any and all assessments shown on the roll and may then by
resolution approve the same, but in the event of any assessment being
raised a new notice similar to the first notice shall be given, after
which final approval of the roll may be made by the port commission.
Any person feeling aggrieved by any such assessments shall perfect an
appeal to the superior court of the county within ten days after the
approval in the manner now provided by law for appeals from assessments
levied by cities of the first class in this state. Engineering and
office expenses in all cases shall be borne by the general district.

Sec. 6 RCW 53.34.010 and 1984 c 7 s 365 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to all other powers granted to port districts, any such
district may, with the consent of the department of transportation,
acquire by ((condemnation,)) purchase, lease, or gift, and may
construct, reconstruct, maintain, operate, furnish, equip, improve,
better, add to, extend, and lease to others in whole or in part and
sell in whole or in part any one or more of the following port
projects, within or without or partially within and partially without
the corporate limits of the district whenever the commission of the
district determines that any one or more of such projects are necessary
for or convenient to the movement of commercial freight and passenger
traffic a part of which traffic moves to, from, or through the
territory of the district:
(1) Toll bridges;
(2) Tunnels under or upon the beds of any river, stream, or other
body of water, or through mountain ranges.
In connection with the acquisition or construction of any one or
more of such projects the port districts may, with the consent of the
state department of transportation, further acquire or construct,
maintain, operate, or improve limited or unlimited access highway
approaches of such length as the commission of such district deems
advisable to provide means of interconnection of the facilities with
public highways and of ingress and egress to any such project,
including plazas and toll booths, and to construct and maintain under,
along, over, or across any such project telephone, telegraph, or
electric transmission wires and cables, fuel lines, gas transmission
lines or mains, water transmission lines or mains, and other mechanical
equipment not inconsistent with the appropriate use of the project, all
for the purpose of obtaining revenues for the payment of the cost of
the project.

Sec. 7 RCW 53.34.170 and 1959 c 236 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement,
extension, or betterment of any project or projects authorized under
the provisions of this chapter any port district creating and
establishing any such project or projects may have and exercise all of
the powers heretofore or hereafter granted to port districts for
corporate purposes and, in addition thereto, may acquire by gift or
grant, lease, or purchase((, or condemnation)) any public and private
property, franchises, and property rights, including state, county, and
school lands and property, and littoral and water rights whether or not
any such property is then devoted to public or quasi public proprietary
or governmental use((: PROVIDED, That the court shall find that the
proposed condemnation of any property already devoted to a public use
is for a higher public use, and)). A port district may by appropriate
contracts with any city, county, or other political subdivision of the
state, with the state and any department of the government of the state
(hereinafter referred to collectively as public agencies), or with any
department, instrumentality or agency of the United States, acquire
title to or the use of existing roads, streets, parkways, avenues, or
highways or the closing of any roads, streets, parkways, avenues, or
highways as may be necessary or convenient to the acquisition,
construction, or operation of any such project or projects under such
terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon. All public
agencies are authorized to enter into contracts with port districts for
the aforesaid purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 53.25.010 (Marginal lands -- Declaration of policies and
purposes) and 1955 c 73 s 1;
(2) RCW 53.25.020 (Marginal lands -- Further declaration) and 1955 c
73 s 2;
(3) RCW 53.25.030 ("Marginal lands" defined) and 1955 c 73 s 3;
(4) RCW 53.25.040 (Industrial development districts authorized--Boundaries -- Deletion of land area) and 1989 c 167 s 1, 1985 c 469 s 53,
& 1955 c 73 s 4;
(5) RCW 53.25.050 (Tax title lands may be conveyed to district) and
1955 c 73 s 5;
(6) RCW 53.25.060 (Private lands may be conveyed to district--Cancellation of taxes) and 1955 c 73 s 6;
(7) RCW 53.25.070 (Discharge of trust) and 1955 c 73 s 7;
(8) RCW 53.25.080 (When lands revert to county) and 1955 c 73 s 8;
(9) RCW 53.25.090 (Conditions precedent to making improvements) and
1955 c 73 s 9;
(10) RCW 53.25.100 (Powers as to industrial development districts)
and 1991 c 363 s 132 & 1955 c 73 s 10;
(11) RCW 53.25.110 (Sale authorized in industrial development
district) and 1955 c 73 s 11;
(12) RCW 53.25.120 (Notice of hearing on sale -- Hearing -- Plans and
specifications -- Conditions -- Devotion of property to public use) and
1985 c 469 s 54, 1963 c 138 s 1, & 1955 c 73 s 12;
(13) RCW 53.25.130 (Findings and determination -- Record -- Appeal) and
1955 c 73 s 13;
(14) RCW 53.25.140 (Action on determination -- Sale by competitive
bid or negotiation) and 1984 c 195 s 1 & 1955 c 73 s 14;
(15) RCW 53.25.150 (Competitive bids -- Conditions -- Acceptance) and
1984 c 195 s 2 & 1955 c 73 s 15;
(16) RCW 53.25.160 (Devotion of property to intended use -- Remedy--Restraint on alienation) and 1955 c 73 s 16;
(17) RCW 53.25.170 (Covenant running with the land -- Forfeiture) and
1955 c 73 s 17;
(18) RCW 53.25.190 (Eminent domain) and 1955 c 73 s 19;
(19) RCW 53.25.200 (Advances of general fund moneys or credit) and
1955 c 73 s 20;
(20) RCW 53.25.210 (Determination that land sought by eminent
domain is marginal) and 1955 c 73 s 21;
(21) RCW 53.25.900 (Repeal and saving) and 1955 c 73 s 22; and
(22) RCW 53.25.910 (Severability -- 1955 c 73) and 1955 c 73 s 23.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---