BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The regular property tax levy for each taxing district, other than
the state or port districts, may be set at the amount which would be
allowed otherwise under this chapter if the regular property tax levy
for the district for taxes due in prior years beginning with 1986 had
been set at the full amount allowed under this chapter including any
levy authorized under RCW 52.16.160 that would have been imposed but
for the limitation in RCW 52.18.065, applicable upon imposition of the
benefit charge under chapter 52.18 RCW.
The purpose of this section is to remove the incentive for a taxing
district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum level permitted under
this chapter, and to protect the future levy capacity of a taxing
district that reduces its tax levy below the level that it otherwise
could impose under this chapter, by removing the adverse consequences
to future levy capacities resulting from such levy reductions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW
to read as follows:
The limitation under RCW 84.55.010 for port districts for taxes
levied for collection in calendar year 2008 and thereafter must be
determined without reference to taxes levied for collection in calendar
year 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2008 and thereafter.

--- END ---