BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics
upon work described in (a) of this subsection and under contracts
described in (b) of this subsection must be no less than the prevailing
rate of wage for an hour's work in the same trade or occupation in the
locality within the state where such labor is performed.
(a) Work subject to the prevailing wage requirement in this section
includes all work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement
that is performed on property owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by
a port district and that is executed at the cost of the port district
or by any other public or private entity.
(b) Contracts subject to the prevailing wage requirement in this
section include all contracts for maintenance of buildings located on
property owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by a port district that
are entered into by the port district or by any other public or private
entity.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, for a contract
in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor required to pay the
prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily visible to
workers at the job site:
(i) A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries under RCW 39.12.040; and
(ii) The address and telephone number of the industrial
statistician of the department of labor and industries where a
complaint or inquiry concerning prevailing wages may be made.
(b) On road construction, sewer line, pipeline, transmission line,
street, or alley improvement projects for which no field office is
needed or established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of
wage statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing,
concrete, or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a
copy of the wage statement to any employee on request.
(3) This chapter does not apply to workers or other persons
regularly employed by a port district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 53.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics
upon work described in (a) of this subsection and under contracts
described in (b) of this subsection must be no less than the prevailing
rate of wage for an hour's work in the same trade or occupation in the
locality within the state where such labor is performed.
(a) Work subject to the prevailing wage requirement in this section
includes all work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement
that is performed on property owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by
the Washington public ports association and that is executed at the
cost of the association or by any other public or private entity.
(b) Contracts subject to the prevailing wage requirement in this
section include all contracts for maintenance of buildings located on
property owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by the Washington
public ports association that are entered into by the association or by
any other public or private entity.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, for a contract
in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor required to pay the
prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily visible to
workers at the job site:
(i) A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries under RCW 39.12.040; and
(ii) The address and telephone number of the industrial
statistician of the department of labor and industries where a
complaint or inquiry concerning prevailing wages may be made.
(b) On road construction, sewer line, pipeline, transmission line,
street, or alley improvement projects for which no field office is
needed or established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of
wage statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing,
concrete, or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a
copy of the wage statement to any employee on request.
(3) This chapter does not apply to workers or other persons
regularly employed by the Washington public ports association.

--- END ---