BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.120 and 2006 c 184 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A taxing district, other than the state, that collects regular
levies shall hold a public hearing on revenue sources for the
district's following year's current expense budget. The hearing must
include consideration of possible increases in property tax revenues
and shall be held prior to the time the taxing district levies the
taxes or makes the request to have the taxes levied. The county
legislative authority, or the taxing district's governing body if the
district is a city, town, or other type of district, shall hold the
hearing. For purposes of this section, "current expense budget" means
that budget which is primarily funded by taxes and charges and reflects
the provision of ongoing services. It does not mean the capital,
enterprise, or special assessment budgets of cities, towns, counties,
or special purpose districts.
(2) If the taxing district is otherwise required to hold a public
hearing on its proposed regular tax levy, a single public hearing may
be held on this matter.
(3) Except as provided otherwise by this section, no increase in
property tax revenue, other than that resulting from the addition of
new construction, increases in assessed value due to construction of
electric generation wind turbine facilities classified as personal
property, and improvements to property and any increase in the value of
state-assessed property, may be authorized by a taxing district, other
than the state, except by adoption of a separate ordinance or
resolution, pursuant to notice, specifically authorizing the increase
in terms of both dollars and percentage. The ordinance or resolution
may cover a period of up to two years, but the ordinance shall
specifically state for each year the dollar increase and percentage
change in the levy from the previous year.
(4) No increase in property tax revenue may be authorized by a port
district except:
(a) By adoption of a separate ordinance or resolution, pursuant to
notice, specifically requesting the increase in terms of dollars and
percentage. The ordinance or resolution must specifically state the
requested dollar increase and percentage change in the levy from the
previous year; and
(b) When authorized to do so by the voters of the port district at
a special or general election held in accordance with the general
election laws of this state in the year in which the levy is made. The
proposal submitted to the voters must be consistent with the ordinance
or resolution adopted in (a) of this subsection. The authorization is
granted if at least three-fifths of the votes cast on the proposition
are in favor of the increase. This subsection (4)(b) applies only to
regular property tax levies and does not affect laws governing excess
property tax levies.

--- END ---