BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that school
mapping would:
(a) Protect all students in Washington;
(b) Help schools and emergency response teams in emergencies like
the recent Virginia polytechnic institute and state university
shootings;
(c) Help officers on the ground to know how an institution of
higher education is laid out in an emergency, since some institutions
are so complex that when an officer arrives at the school, the officer
may be unable to determine where a potential gunman is located; and
(d) Be used for any potential crisis situation.
(2) As used in this section, school mapping includes:
(a) Mapping out the physical structures of all public institutions
of higher education in case of an emergency;
(b) Taking aerial shots from the air to understand the physical
complexity of a higher education institution;
(c) Photographing the school from the air so the officers on the
ground will know how the school is laid out in case of an emergency;
(d) Giving an officer as much information about the school layout
as possible by creating a centralized database for school layouts; and
(e) Providing for information sharing between the schools and
emergency response teams.
(3) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and
the Washington association of fire chiefs shall study and determine the
feasibility and costs of:
(a) Completing a school map for all institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, within the state;
(b) Including all school maps on a computer disk;
(c) Providing all patrol cars and fire engines with a mounted
computer so that the officer can use the computer disk to view pictures
of the layout of each school, including a blueprint of the school, an
aerial photo, and a photo of each school room; and
(d) Providing for maintenance of the computer disks by the fire
chief and the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.
(4) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and
the Washington association of fire chiefs shall submit a report on the
study and recommendations to the legislature by January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---