BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.29.020 and 2002 c 145 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to all other powers granted to port districts, any such
district((, the Washington public ports association, or the federation
of Washington ports as described in RCW 53.06.070)) may acquire, as
provided for other port properties in RCW 53.08.010, construct,
develop, operate and maintain all land or other property interests,
buildings, structures or other improvements, and may participate in
transactions necessary to provide, electronically or otherwise,
facilities or to exercise powers or purposes of a trade center
including but not limited to the following electronic or physical
facilities:
(1) A facility consisting of one or more structures, improvements
and areas for the centralized accommodation of public and private
agencies, persons and facilities in order to afford improved service to
waterborne and airborne import and export trade and commerce;
(2) Facilities for the promotion of such import and export trade
and commerce, inspection, testing, display and appraisal facilities,
foreign trade zones, terminal and transportation facilities, office
meeting rooms, auditoriums, libraries, language translation services,
storage, warehouse, marketing and exhibition facilities, facilities for
federal, state, county and other municipal and governmental agencies
providing services relating to the foregoing and including, but not
being limited to, customs houses and customs stores, and other
incidental facilities and accommodations.

Sec. 2 RCW 53.29.030 and 2002 c 145 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In carrying out the powers authorized by this chapter ((and
chapter 53.06 RCW)), port districts ((and the Washington public ports
association)) are authorized to cooperate, act, and invest jointly with
other public and private agencies and persons, including, but not
limited to, the federal government, the state, other ports and
municipal corporations, other states and their political subdivisions,
and private nonprofit trade promotion groups and associate development
organizations.
(2) Port districts operating trade center buildings or operating
association or federation trade centers, shall pay an annual service
fee to the county treasurer wherein the center is located for municipal
services rendered to the trade center building. The measure of such
service fee shall be equal to three percent of the gross rentals
received from the nongovernmental tenants of such trade center
building. Such proceeds shall be distributed by the county treasurer
as follows: Forty percent to the school district, forty percent to the
city, and twenty percent to the county wherein the center is located:
PROVIDED, That if the center is located in an unincorporated area,
twenty percent shall be allocated to the fire district, forty percent
to the school district, and forty percent to the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 53.06.010 (Declaration of necessity) and 1961 c 31 s 1;
(2) RCW 53.06.020 (Actions required of commissions -- Joint reports
to governor and legislature) and 1994 c 75 s 1, 1989 c 425 s 3, & 1961
c 31 s 2;
(3) RCW 53.06.030 (Washington public ports association as
coordinating agency -- Purposes, powers, and duties) and 1989 c 425 s 4
& 1961 c 31 s 3;
(4) RCW 53.06.040 (Dues and assessments may be paid association
from district funds -- Limitation on amount) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s
55, 1970 ex.s. c 47 s 3, & 1961 c 31 s 4;
(5) RCW 53.06.050 (Further action by commissions authorized--Meetings) and 1961 c 31 s 5;
(6) RCW 53.06.060 (Financial records of association and any
nonprofit corporation utilized by port districts subject to audit by
state auditor) and 2000 c 198 s 4, 1995 c 301 s 74, & 1961 c 31 s 6;
(7) RCW 53.06.070 (Federation of Washington ports authorized--Purposes) and 1994 c 75 s 2 & 1989 c 425 s 2;
(8) RCW 53.06.080 (Implementation of economic development
programs -- Use of nonprofit corporations -- Transfer of funds) and 2000 c
198 s 1; and
(9) RCW 53.06.090 (Nonprofit corporations -- Legislative recognition)
and 2000 c 198 s 3.

--- END ---