BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the legislative
building originally included skylights above the house of
representatives and senate chambers. The skylights were removed and
the openings in-filled with wood tongue and groove roof decking and
metal roofing after the 1949 earthquake caused the glass to break.
The legislature further finds that safety glass has advanced
sufficiently to permit the safe replacement of the skylights, which
would allow natural light to reach the legislative chambers. Research
indicates that students perform better in classrooms with natural
daylight.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to provide an
incentive to adjourn early as the sunshine of spring lights the
chambers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of general administration
shall replace the materials covering the original skylight openings
that are located above the house of representatives and senate chambers
in the legislative building with safety glass. The replacement glass
must be of a quality that will provide for a reasonable assurance of
safety in the event of an earthquake.
(2) The skylights must provide for natural light to the chambers by
January 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the full
light of day act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---