BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public safety is
one of the paramount duties of the state and an essential function of
government. The legislature further finds that systemic problems exist
with the department of corrections that must be addressed expeditiously
and unequivocally in order to rebuild public confidence in the state's
ability to best protect them from criminal offenders who have been
released from full incarceration but are still serving their sentences
on community custody. Turnstile justice is not conducive to building
public safety, public confidence in and support for our criminal
justice system as a whole, and the morale of personnel working within
our department of corrections, law enforcement agencies, and
prosecutors' offices. Citizens expect and demand predictability,
proportionality, uniformity, transparency, and justice when dealing
with criminal offenders and due consideration for the severe and
detrimental impact of crime on victims and their families and friends
when dealing with such offenders. The legislature also recognizes the
need to ensure the safety of the public while offenders are released
into communities. To further the goal of ensuring public safety, the
legislature intends to improve the monitoring of offenders on
supervision and hold those who violate the conditions of supervision
accountable for their actions. The legislature intends to increase the
effectiveness of supervision of offenders on community custody through
methods such as providing community corrections officers increased
flexibility in determining sanctions for supervision violations and in
searches of offenders on community custody with the goal of enhancing
public safety and preventing future offenses and supervision
violations.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.631 and 1984 c 209 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
If an offender violates any condition or requirement of a sentence,
a community corrections officer may arrest or cause the arrest of the
offender without a warrant, pending a determination by the court. If
there is reasonable cause to believe that an offender has violated a
condition or requirement of the sentence, an offender may be required
to submit to a search and seizure of the offender's person, residence,
automobile, or other personal property. An offender may be required to
submit to a search without reasonable cause to believe that he or she
has violated a condition or requirement of the sentence if the search
is a condition of his or her community custody under section 3 of this
act. A community corrections officer may also arrest an offender for
any crime committed in his or her presence. The facts and
circumstances of the conduct of the offender shall be reported by the
community corrections officer, with recommendations, to the court.
If a community corrections officer arrests or causes the arrest of
an offender under this section, the offender shall be confined and
detained in the county jail of the county in which the offender was
taken into custody, and the sheriff of that county shall receive and
keep in the county jail, where room is available, all prisoners
delivered to the jail by the community corrections officer, and such
offenders shall not be released from custody on bail or personal
recognizance, except upon approval of the court, pursuant to a written
order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Offenders in total confinement may be subjected to random,
unannounced inspections without violating the constitutional
requirement that all searches be reasonable;
(b) Offenders on community custody, including escapees and
absconders, have the same expectation of privacy as offenders in total
confinement; and
(c) Requiring an offender on community custody, including escapees
and absconders, to submit to random, unannounced inspections is
therefore reasonable under the federal and state Constitutions.
(2) When a court sentences an offender to a term of community
custody under RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.545, 9.94A.650, or 9.94A.715,
for a crime committed on or after the effective date of this act, the
court shall require the offender, as a condition of community custody,
to submit to random, unannounced inspections of his or her person,
residence, automobile, or other personal property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall allow community corrections officers to
inspect the person, residence, automobile, or other personal property
of an offender, including escapees and absconders, under its
supervision in the community whenever the community corrections
officer, based on the officer's professional judgment and discretion,
has reasonable cause to believe that the offender has violated a
condition or requirement of his or her sentence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall allow community corrections officers,
based on the officer's professional judgment and discretion, to perform
random, unannounced inspections of the person, residence, automobile,
or other personal property of every offender, including escapees and
absconders, under the department's supervision pursuant to a term of
community custody imposed for a crime committed on or after the
effective date of this act.
(2) The community corrections officer shall document his or her
rationale for conducting an inspection under this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.720 and 2003 c 379 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.501, all offenders sentenced
to terms involving community supervision, community restitution,
community placement, or community custody shall be under the
supervision of the department and shall follow explicitly the
instructions and conditions of the department. The department may
require an offender to perform affirmative acts it deems appropriate to
monitor compliance with the conditions of the sentence imposed. The
department may only supervise the offender's compliance with payment of
legal financial obligations during any period in which the department
is authorized to supervise the offender in the community under RCW
9.94A.501.
(b) The instructions shall include, at a minimum, reporting as
directed to a community corrections officer, remaining within
prescribed geographical boundaries, notifying the community corrections
officer of any change in the offender's address or employment, and
paying the supervision fee assessment.
(c) For offenders sentenced to terms involving community custody
for crimes committed on or after June 6, 1996, the department may
include, in addition to the instructions in (b) of this subsection, any
appropriate conditions of supervision, including but not limited to,
prohibiting the offender from having contact with any other specified
individuals or specific class of individuals.
(d) For offenders sentenced to terms of community custody for
crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department may impose
conditions as specified in RCW 9.94A.715.
The conditions authorized under (c) of this subsection may be
imposed by the department prior to or during an offender's community
custody term. If a violation of conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.710 occurs during community custody,
it shall be deemed a violation of community placement for the purposes
of RCW 9.94A.740 and shall authorize the department to transfer an
offender to a more restrictive confinement status as provided in RCW
9.94A.737. At any time prior to the completion of an offender's term
of community custody, the department may recommend to the court that
any or all of the conditions imposed by the court or the department
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.710 or 9.94A.715 be continued beyond the
expiration of the offender's term of community custody as authorized in
RCW 9.94A.715 (3) or (5).
The department may require offenders to pay for special services
rendered on or after July 25, 1993, including electronic monitoring,
day reporting, and telephone reporting, dependent upon the offender's
ability to pay. The department may pay for these services for
offenders who are not able to pay.
(2) No offender sentenced to terms involving community supervision,
community restitution, community custody, or community placement under
the supervision of the department may own, use, or possess firearms or
ammunition. Offenders who own, use, or are found to be in actual or
constructive possession of firearms or ammunition shall be subject to
the violation process and sanctions under RCW 9.94A.634, 9.94A.737, and
9.94A.740. "Constructive possession" as used in this subsection means
the power and intent to control the firearm or ammunition. "Firearm"
as used in this subsection has the same definition as in RCW 9.41.010.
(3) A community corrections officer is not liable for civil damages
arising from an act or omission that occurs when the community
corrections officer provides assistance to a law enforcement officer so
long as the community corrections officer was acting at the request of
the law enforcement officer, unless the act or omission constitutes
gross negligence.
(4) A community corrections officer is not liable for civil damages
arising from an act or omission that occurs when the community
corrections officer interacts with a third party who is attempting to
intervene in a situation in which the community corrections officer is
contacting an offender on community custody or community supervision,
unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.94A.737 and 2005 c 435 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an offender violates any condition or requirement of
community custody, the department may transfer the offender to a more
restrictive confinement status to serve up to the remaining portion of
the sentence, less credit for any period actually spent in community
custody or in detention awaiting disposition of an alleged violation
and subject to the limitations of subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) For a sex offender sentenced to a term of community custody
under RCW 9.94A.670 who violates any condition of community custody,
the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty days' confinement
in a local correctional facility for each violation. If the department
imposes a sanction, the department shall submit within seventy-two
hours a report to the court and the prosecuting attorney outlining the
violation or violations and the sanctions imposed.
(b) For a sex offender sentenced to a term of community custody
under RCW 9.94A.710 who violates any condition of community custody
after having completed his or her maximum term of total confinement,
including time served on community custody in lieu of earned release,
the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty days in a local
correctional facility for each violation.
(c) For an offender sentenced to a term of community custody under
RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650, or 9.94A.715, or under RCW 9.94A.545,
for a crime committed on or after July 1, 2000, who violates any
condition of community custody after having completed his or her
maximum term of total confinement, including time served on community
custody in lieu of earned release, the department may impose a sanction
of up to sixty days in total confinement for each violation. The
department may impose sanctions such as work release, home detention
with electronic monitoring, work crew, community restitution, inpatient
treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling sessions,
supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any other
sanctions available in the community.
(d) For an offender sentenced to a term of community placement
under RCW 9.94A.705 who violates any condition of community placement
after having completed his or her maximum term of total confinement,
including time served on community custody in lieu of earned release,
the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty days in total
confinement for each violation. The department may impose sanctions
such as work release, home detention with electronic monitoring, work
crew, community restitution, inpatient treatment, daily reporting,
curfew, educational or counseling sessions, supervision enhanced
through electronic monitoring, or any other sanctions available in the
community.
(3) If an offender is accused of violating any condition or
requirement of community custody, he or she is entitled to a hearing
before the department prior to the imposition of sanctions. The
hearing shall be considered as offender disciplinary proceedings and
shall not be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The department shall
develop hearing procedures and a structure of graduated sanctions.
(4) The hearing procedures required under subsection (3) of this
section shall be developed by rule and include the following:
(a) Hearing officers shall report through a chain of command
separate from that of community corrections officers;
(b) The department shall provide the offender with written notice
of the violation, the evidence relied upon, and the reasons the
particular sanction was imposed. The notice shall include a statement
of the rights specified in this subsection, and the offender's right to
file a personal restraint petition under court rules after the final
decision of the department;
(c) The hearing shall be held unless waived by the offender, and
shall be electronically recorded. For offenders not in total
confinement, the hearing shall be held within fifteen working days, but
not less than twenty-four hours, after notice of the violation. For
offenders in total confinement, the hearing shall be held within five
working days, but not less than twenty-four hours, after notice of the
violation;
(d) The offender shall have the right to: (i) Be present at the
hearing; (ii) have the assistance of a person qualified to assist the
offender in the hearing, appointed by the hearing officer if the
offender has a language or communications barrier; (iii) testify or
remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary evidence;
and (v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and
(e) The sanction shall take effect if affirmed by the hearing
officer. Within seven days after the hearing officer's decision, the
offender may appeal the decision to a panel of three reviewing officers
designated by the secretary or by the secretary's designee. The
sanction shall be reversed or modified if a majority of the panel finds
that the sanction was not reasonably related to any of the following:
(i) The crime of conviction; (ii) the violation committed; (iii) the
offender's risk of reoffending; or (iv) the safety of the community.
(5) For purposes of this section, no finding of a violation of
conditions may be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(6) The department shall work with the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs to establish and operate an electronic
monitoring program for low-risk offenders who violate the terms of
their community custody. Between January 1, 2006, and December 31,
2006, the department shall endeavor to place at least one hundred low-risk community custody violators on the electronic monitoring program
per day if there are at least that many low-risk offenders who qualify
for the electronic monitoring program.
(7) Local governments, their subdivisions and employees, the
department and its employees, and the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs and its employees shall be immune from civil
liability for damages arising from incidents involving low-risk
offenders who are placed on electronic monitoring unless it is shown
that an employee acted with gross negligence or bad faith.
(8) When determining the sanction to be imposed on an offender who
violates any condition of community custody, a hearing officer shall
give due consideration to the community corrections officer's
recommendation and shall have the option, based on the hearing
officer's professional determination and discretion, to impose the
maximum sanction or sanctions allowed under law or the maximum response
option adopted by the department regardless of the response option
range or violation response score.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 72.04A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall develop a plan, using the existing staffing
matrix, to reduce the supervision caseload of community corrections
officers by December 1, 2009, and increase partnerships such as the
neighborhood corrections initiative. Prior to 2009, the department
shall hire additional community corrections officers to the extent
funding is provided in the operating budget.

--- END ---