BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there are an
increasing number of economic and financial pressures causing hardships
to many homeowners in the state of Washington. The legislature finds
that the current housing crisis is a key barometer of the insecure
economic situation facing working Washington families. The legislature
finds that, among those hardships, increases in property taxes lead to
undue stress on family budgets causing some homeowners to be at risk of
losing their homes. The legislature finds that financial practices
nationwide have led to an increasingly destabilized housing market
across the country with impacts now being felt here in Washington. The
legislature further finds that by establishing a property tax deferral
program homeowners will be able to remain in their homes. The
legislature further finds that acting now to stabilize the housing
market is an important public purpose.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to: (a) Provide a property
tax safe harbor for families in economic crisis; and (b) prevent
existing homeowners from being driven from their homes because of
overly burdensome property taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A claimant may defer payment of fifty
percent of special assessments or real property taxes, or both, in any
year in which all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The special assessments or property taxes must be imposed upon
a residence that was occupied by the claimant as a principal place of
residence as of January 1st of the year in which the assessments and
taxes are due, subject to the exceptions allowed under RCW
84.36.381(1);
(2) The claimant must have combined disposable income, as defined
in RCW 84.36.383, of fifty-seven thousand dollars or less in the
calendar year preceding the filing of the declaration;
(3) The claimant must have paid one-half of the total amount of
special assessments and property taxes listed on the tax statement for
the year in which the deferral claim is made;
(4) A deferral is not allowed for assessments or taxes levied in
the first five calendar years in which the person owns the residence;
(5) The claimant who defers payment of special assessments or real
property taxes, or both, under this section must also meet the
conditions of RCW 84.38.030 (4) and (5);
(6) The total amount deferred by a claimant under this chapter must
not exceed forty percent of the amount of the claimant's equity value
in the claimant's residence;
(7) The claimant may not defer taxes under both this chapter and
chapter 84.38 RCW; and
(8) In the case of deferred special assessments, the claimant must
have opted for payment of the assessments on the installment method if
this method was available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in RCW 84.38.020 apply to
this chapter. For purposes of this chapter, references to "this
chapter" in any of the definitions in RCW 84.38.020 shall be
interpreted to refer to chapter 84.-- RCW (this chapter), unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Each claimant electing to defer payment
of special assessments or real property tax obligations, or both, under
this chapter shall file with the county assessor, on forms prescribed
by the department and supplied by the assessor, a written declaration
thereof. The declaration to defer special assessments and/or real
property taxes for any year shall be filed no later than the first day
of September of the year for which the deferral is sought: PROVIDED,
That for good cause shown, the department may waive this requirement.
(2) The declaration shall designate the property to which the
deferral applies, and shall include a statement setting forth (a) a
list of all members of the claimant's household, (b) the claimant's
equity value in his or her residence, (c) facts establishing the
eligibility for the deferral under the provisions of this chapter, and
(d) any other relevant information required by the rules of the
department. Each copy shall be signed by the claimant subject to the
penalties as provided in chapter 9A.72 RCW for false swearing.
(3) The county assessor shall determine if each claimant shall be
granted a deferral for each year but the claimant shall have the right
to appeal this determination to the county board of equalization, in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038, whose decision shall
be final as to the deferral of that year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The provisions of RCW 84.38.050(1)(b)
apply to declarations to defer special assessments or property taxes,
or both, for all years following the first year.
(2) The provisions of RCW 84.38.070 apply to claimants ceasing to
reside permanently on the property for which the declaration to defer
is made between the date of filing the declaration and December 15th of
that year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A person's right to defer special
assessments or property tax obligations, or both, under this chapter
may not be reduced by contract or agreement.
(2) If any residence is under mortgage or purchase contract
requiring accumulation of reserves out of which the holder of the
mortgage or contract is required to pay real estate taxes, such holder
shall cosign the declaration of deferral either before a notary public,
the county assessor, or the county assessor's deputy in the county
where the real property is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Whenever a person's special assessment or
real property tax obligation, or both, is deferred under the provisions
of this chapter, the amount deferred and required to be paid pursuant
to RCW 84.38.120 shall become a lien in favor of the state upon his or
her property and shall have priority as provided in chapters 35.50 and
84.60 RCW: PROVIDED, That the interest of a mortgage or purchase
contract holder who is required to cosign a declaration of deferral
under section 6 of this act shall have priority to said deferred lien.
This lien may accumulate up to forty percent of the amount of the
claimant's equity value in said property and the rate of interest shall
be an average of the federal short-term rate as defined in 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 1274(d) plus two percentage points. The rate set for each new
year shall be computed by taking an arithmetical average to the nearest
percentage point of the federal short-term rate, compounded annually.
That average shall be calculated using the rates from four months:
January, April, and July of the calendar year immediately preceding the
new year, and October of the previous preceding year. The interest
shall be calculated from the time it could have been paid before
delinquency until said obligation is paid. In the case of a mobile
home, the department of licensing shall show the state's lien on the
certificate of ownership for the mobile home. In the case of all other
property, the department of revenue shall file a notice of the deferral
with the county recorder or auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Special assessments or real property tax
obligations, or both, deferred under this chapter shall become payable
together with interest as provided in section 7 of this act:
(1) Upon the sale of property which has a deferred special
assessment lien or real property tax lien, or both, upon it;
(2) Upon the death of the claimant with an outstanding deferred
special assessment lien or real property tax lien, or both, except a
surviving spouse who is qualified under this chapter may elect to incur
the special assessment lien or real property tax lien, or both, which
shall then be payable by that spouse as provided in this section;
(3) Upon the condemnation of property with a deferred special
assessment lien or real property tax lien, or both, upon it by a public
or private body exercising eminent domain power, except as otherwise
provided in RCW 84.60.070; or
(4) At such time as the claimant ceases to reside permanently in
the residence upon which the deferral has been granted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The provisions of RCW 84.38.110, 84.38.120,
84.38.140, 84.38.150, 84.38.160, 84.38.170, and 84.38.180 apply to this
chapter to the extent that they do not conflict with the provisions of
this chapter. For purposes of this chapter, references to "this
chapter" in any of the statutes listed in this section shall be
interpreted to refer to chapter 84.-- RCW (this chapter) unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 84 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act applies to taxes due and payable
after April 30, 2008, and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) During calendar year 2011, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall review the property tax
deferral program under chapter 84.-- RCW (sections 1 through 9 of this
act). The department of revenue and county assessors shall provide the
committee with any data within its purview that the committee considers
necessary to conduct the review. By December 1, 2011, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall report to the legislature
the results of its review.
(2) As part of its review under subsection (1) of this section, the
committee shall study and report on:
(a) The effectiveness of the property tax deferral program in
assisting families in economic distress in remaining in their homes;
(b) The effectiveness of the property tax deferral program in
decreasing the default rate on residential mortgages for the statewide
population within the income threshold of the program;
(c) The number of potential participants per thousand population by
geographic region;
(d) The ratio of actual deferral program participants to potential
deferral program participants by geographic region;
(e) The ratio of average annual household property taxes for
deferral program participants and average annual income of deferral
program participants by geographic region;
(f) Economic conditions in the housing and lending markets for the
prior three years and the forecasted economic conditions for the
current biennium and the next succeeding biennium;
(g) Annual costs specific to the administration of the deferral
program;
(h) Total annual costs of the deferral program;
(i) Recommended changes to the deferral program that would increase
program participation;
(j) Any other recommendations the committee may have to improve the
deferral program; and
(k) Any other factors that the committee considers necessary to
properly evaluate the deferral program.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---