BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The regular property tax levy for each taxing district other
than the state may be set at the amount which would be allowed
otherwise under this chapter if the regular property tax levy for the
district for taxes due in prior years beginning with 1986 had been set
at the full amount allowed under this chapter including any levy
authorized under RCW 52.16.160 that would have been imposed but for the
limitation in RCW 52.18.065, applicable upon imposition of the benefit
charge under chapter 52.18 RCW. To set a regular property tax levy at
an amount authorized under this section, a taxing district shall submit
an authorizing proposition to the voters for approval by a majority of
the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition. The
proposition shall be voted on at an election held not more than twelve
months prior to the date in which the proposed regular property tax is
to be levied.
(2) The purpose of this section is to remove the incentive for a
taxing district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum level permitted
under this chapter, and to protect the future levy capacity of a taxing
district that reduces its tax levy below the level that it otherwise
could impose under this chapter, by removing the adverse consequences
to future levy capacities resulting from such levy reductions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---