BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.69 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of revenue shall within twenty days of the
effective date of this act issue a refund check to all eligible real
property owners who paid state property taxes in 2007. The refund is
equal to four hundred dollars for each eligible real property owner.
The department may use information from the tax rolls of each county to
identify all eligible real property owners under this section. Any
such refunds shall be made by means of vouchers approved by the
department and by the issuance of state warrants drawn upon and payable
from such funds as the legislature may provide.
(2)(a) For the purposes of this section, "eligible real property
owner" means a person who paid state property taxes imposed upon a
residence owned and occupied by the person as a principal place of
residence in calendar year 2007.
(b) For the purposes of this section, the terms "residence,"
"owned," and "occupied" have meanings consistent with their meanings in
RCW 84.36.379 through 84.36.389.
(3) Any eligible real property owner may return the state property
tax rebate check to the department indicating that the owner wishes to
have the rebate check spent on any of the following state government
services:

Education □

Health Care □

Parks □

Transportation □

General Fund □

The department shall keep a record of all rebate checks returned
and prepare a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
by November 1, 2008, indicating the total number of rebate checks
returned, the total amount of rebates returned, and which state
government services were checked on the returned rebate check. The
department shall credit all returned rebate checks to the appropriate
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---