BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.93.030 and 2007 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Conveyance" means a boat, airplane, or vehicle.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(4) "Disposable package or container" means all packages or
containers defined as such by rules adopted by the department of
ecology.
(5) "Junk vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
46.55.010.
(6) "Litter" means all waste material including but not limited to
disposable packages or containers thrown or deposited as herein
prohibited and solid waste that is illegally dumped, but not including
the wastes of the primary processes of mining, logging, sawmilling,
farming, or manufacturing. "Litter" includes the material described in
subsection (((11))) (12) of this section as "potentially dangerous
litter."
(7) "Litter bag" means a bag, sack, or other container made of any
material which is large enough to serve as a receptacle for litter
inside the vehicle or watercraft of any person. It is not necessarily
limited to the state approved litter bag but must be similar in size
and capacity.
(8) "Litter receptacle" means those containers adopted by the
department of ecology and which may be standardized as to size, shape,
capacity, and color and which shall bear the state anti-litter symbol,
as well as any other receptacles suitable for the depositing of litter.
(9) "Official gathering" means an event where authorization to hold
the event is approved, recognized, or issued by a government, public
body, or authority, including but not limited to fairs, musical
concerts, athletic games, festivals, tournaments, or any other formal
or ceremonial event, during which beverages are sold by a vendor or
vendors in single-use aluminum, glass, or plastic bottles or cans.
(10) "Person" means any political subdivision, government agency,
municipality, industry, public or private corporation, copartnership,
association, firm, individual, or other entity whatsoever.
(11) "Petroleum-based water bottle" means a bottle made from a
petroleum-based plastic not intended by the manufacturer to be a
reusable container that is one liter in size or smaller and is marketed
to contain nonflavored, uncarbonated drinking water. The term
"petroleum-based water bottle" does not include plastic bottles derived
from corn or other biological materials.
(12) "Potentially dangerous litter" means litter that is likely to
injure a person or cause damage to a vehicle or other property.
"Potentially dangerous litter" means:
(a) Cigarettes, cigars, or other tobacco products that are capable
of starting a fire;
(b) Glass;
(c) A container or other product made predominantly or entirely of
glass;
(d) A hypodermic needle or other medical instrument designed to cut
or pierce;
(e) Raw human waste, including soiled baby diapers, regardless of
whether or not the waste is in a container of any sort; and
(f) Nails or tacks.
(((12))) (13) "Public place" means any area that is used or held
out for use by the public whether owned or operated by public or
private interests.
(((13))) (14) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing
waste materials into a finished product for use other than landfill
disposal or incineration.
(((14))) (15) "Recycling center" means a central collection point
for recyclable materials.
(((15))) (16) "Sports facility" means an outdoor recreational
sports facility, including but not limited to athletic fields and
ballparks, at which beverages are sold by a vendor or vendors in
single-use aluminum, glass, or plastic bottles or cans.
(((16))) (17) "To litter" means a single or cumulative act of
disposing of litter.
(((17))) (18) "Vehicle" includes every device capable of being
moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or
property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway,
excepting devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively
upon stationary rails or tracks.
(((18))) (19) "Waste reduction" means reducing the amount or
toxicity of waste generated or reusing materials.
(((19))) (20) "Watercraft" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or
other floating craft.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.93 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The sale of petroleum-based water bottles is prohibited by any
retail store, wholesale club, or vending machine provider.
(2) Any retail store, wholesale club, or vending machine provider
operating in violation of this section is subject to a class 1 civil
infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW. Each calendar day of operation in
violation of this section comprises a new violation.
(3) The department shall develop guidelines identifying the
specifications of water bottles allowed under this section. Retail
stores, wholesale clubs, or vending machine providers providing water
bottles consistent with the guidelines are deemed to be in compliance
with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.93 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, state agencies
are prohibited from purchasing petroleum-based water bottles.
(2)(a) The top administrative official of a state agency may waive
the provisions of this section on a case-by-case basis if the top
administrative official of the agency publishes a finding in the
Washington State Register explaining the details as to why the purchase
or use of petroleum-based water bottles was necessary.
(b) The Washington State Register publication requirements of this
section may be satisfied with one annual publication summarizing all
instances where the requirements of this section were waived by the top
administrative official in the preceding year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Local governments and school districts are
encouraged to review their purchasing and use of petroleum-based water
bottles and, when possible, limit the purchase of petroleum-based water
bottles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2010.

--- END ---