BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.93.030 and 2007 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Compostable packaging" means single-use food service packaging
made from a material that meets the applicable compostability standards
as adopted by ASTM international on the effective date of this section
and either of the following criteria:
(a) The single-use food service packaging is composed of a material
that is accepted in a residential curbside composting collection
program for at least sixty percent of the households in the state; or
(b) The single-use food service packaging is composed of a material
that is accepted in a residential curbside composting collection
program for at least sixty percent of the households in the city or
unincorporated county in which the take-out food provider distributes
the single-use food service packaging.
(2) "Conveyance" means a boat, airplane, or vehicle.
(((2))) (3) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(((3))) (4) "Director" means the director of the department of
ecology.
(((4))) (5) "Disposable package or container" means all packages or
containers defined as such by rules adopted by the department of
ecology.
(((5))) (6) "Junk vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
46.55.010.
(((6))) (7) "Litter" means all waste material including but not
limited to disposable packages or containers thrown or deposited as
herein prohibited and solid waste that is illegally dumped, but not
including the wastes of the primary processes of mining, logging,
sawmilling, farming, or manufacturing. "Litter" includes the material
described in subsection (((11))) (12) of this section as "potentially
dangerous litter."
(((7))) (8) "Litter bag" means a bag, sack, or other container made
of any material which is large enough to serve as a receptacle for
litter inside the vehicle or watercraft of any person. It is not
necessarily limited to the state approved litter bag but must be
similar in size and capacity.
(((8))) (9) "Litter receptacle" means those containers adopted by
the department of ecology and which may be standardized as to size,
shape, capacity, and color and which shall bear the state anti-litter
symbol, as well as any other receptacles suitable for the depositing of
litter.
(((9))) (10) "Official gathering" means an event where
authorization to hold the event is approved, recognized, or issued by
a government, public body, or authority, including but not limited to
fairs, musical concerts, athletic games, festivals, tournaments, or any
other formal or ceremonial event, during which beverages are sold by a
vendor or vendors in single-use aluminum, glass, or plastic bottles or
cans.
(((10))) (11) "Person" means any political subdivision, government
agency, municipality, industry, public or private corporation,
copartnership, association, firm, individual, or other entity
whatsoever.
(((11))) (12) "Potentially dangerous litter" means litter that is
likely to injure a person or cause damage to a vehicle or other
property. "Potentially dangerous litter" means:
(a) Cigarettes, cigars, or other tobacco products that are capable
of starting a fire;
(b) Glass;
(c) A container or other product made predominantly or entirely of
glass;
(d) A hypodermic needle or other medical instrument designed to cut
or pierce;
(e) Raw human waste, including soiled baby diapers, regardless of
whether or not the waste is in a container of any sort; and
(f) Nails or tacks.
(((12))) (13) "Public place" means any area that is used or held
out for use by the public whether owned or operated by public or
private interests.
(((13))) (14) "Recyclable packaging" means a single-use food
service packaging that is composed of a material that satisfies either
of the following criteria:
(a) The single-use food service packaging is composed of a material
that is accepted in a residential recycling curbside collection program
for at least sixty percent of the households in the state; or
(b) The single-use food service packaging is composed of a material
that is accepted in a residential recycling curbside collection program
for at least sixty percent of the households in the city or
unincorporated county in which the take-out food provider distributes
the single-use food service packaging.
(15) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing waste
materials into a finished product for use other than landfill disposal
or incineration.
(((14))) (16) "Recycling center" means a central collection point
for recyclable materials.
(((15))) (17) "Single-use food service packaging" means single-use
disposable products used in the restaurant and food service industry
for serving or transporting prepared, ready-to-consume food or
beverages, including but not limited to plates, bowls, cups, trays, and
hinged or lidded containers. "Single-use food service packaging" does
not include packaging for unprepared foods or single-use disposable
components of otherwise reusable products such as straws, cup lids, or
utensils.
(18) "Sports facility" means an outdoor recreational sports
facility, including but not limited to athletic fields and ballparks,
at which beverages are sold by a vendor or vendors in single-use
aluminum, glass, or plastic bottles or cans.
(((16))) (19) "Take-out food provider" means any establishment that
provides prepared food for public consumption on or off of its
premises, including but not limited to fast food restaurants and any
establishment that offers a drive-up window for providing prepared food
to the public.
(20) "To litter" means a single or cumulative act of disposing of
litter.
(((17))) (21) "Vehicle" includes every device capable of being
moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or
property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway,
excepting devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively
upon stationary rails or tracks.
(((18))) (22) "Waste reduction" means reducing the amount or
toxicity of waste generated or reusing materials.
(((19))) (23) "Watercraft" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or
other floating craft.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.93 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) After July 1, 2010, a take-out food provider may not distribute
single-use food service packaging to a consumer unless the single-use
food service packaging is either compostable packaging or recyclable
packaging.
(2) After July 1, 2012, a take-out food provider may not distribute
single-use food service packaging to a consumer unless the take-out
food provider satisfies one of the following criteria:
(a) Single-use food service packaging from the take-out provider is
recovered for composting at a rate of twenty-five percent or more
either statewide or in the city or unincorporated county in which the
take-out provider is located; or
(b) Single-use food service packaging from the take-out provider is
recovered for recycling at a rate of twenty-five percent or more either
statewide or in the city or unincorporated county in which the take-out
provider is located.
(3) Each calendar day of operation in violation of this section
comprises a new violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.93 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) After July 1, 2010, any take-out provider with a seating
capacity of greater than twenty persons shall provide appropriate
receptacles on the take-out provider's premises for the collection of
any compostable packaging or recyclable packaging distributed with food
to customers.
(2) Each calendar day of operation in violation of this section
comprises a new violation.

--- END ---