BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.93.030 and 2007 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Checkout bag" means a bag that is provided by a grocery store
to a customer at the point of sale. "Checkout bag" does not include a
bag used solely to contain the following:
(a) Fresh meat and fresh meat products, including pork, beef,
seafood, and poultry;
(b) Fruit or vegetables;
(c) Nuts or other bulk items;
(d) Dairy products;
(e) Ice; or
(f) Cooked foods.
(2) "Conveyance" means a boat, airplane, or vehicle.
(((2))) (3) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(((3))) (4) "Director" means the director of the department of
ecology.
(((4))) (5) "Disposable package or container" means all packages or
containers defined as such by rules adopted by the department of
ecology.
(((5))) (6) "Grocery store" means a retail business where the sale
of food and grocery products, as the terms "food" and "grocery
products" are defined in RCW 69.80.031, represents at least fifty
percent of all sales. The term "grocery store" does not apply to
restaurants or other organizations whose primary business is the
preparation and sale of prepared food, as the term "prepared food" is
defined in RCW 82.08.0293.
(7) "Junk vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
46.55.010.
(((6))) (8) "Litter" means all waste material including but not
limited to disposable packages or containers thrown or deposited as
herein prohibited and solid waste that is illegally dumped, but not
including the wastes of the primary processes of mining, logging,
sawmilling, farming, or manufacturing. "Litter" includes the material
described in subsection (((11))) (13) of this section as "potentially
dangerous litter."
(((7))) (9) "Litter bag" means a bag, sack, or other container made
of any material which is large enough to serve as a receptacle for
litter inside the vehicle or watercraft of any person. It is not
necessarily limited to the state approved litter bag but must be
similar in size and capacity.
(((8))) (10) "Litter receptacle" means those containers adopted by
the department of ecology and which may be standardized as to size,
shape, capacity, and color and which shall bear the state anti-litter
symbol, as well as any other receptacles suitable for the depositing of
litter.
(((9))) (11) "Official gathering" means an event where
authorization to hold the event is approved, recognized, or issued by
a government, public body, or authority, including but not limited to
fairs, musical concerts, athletic games, festivals, tournaments, or any
other formal or ceremonial event, during which beverages are sold by a
vendor or vendors in single-use aluminum, glass, or plastic bottles or
cans.
(((10))) (12) "Person" means any political subdivision, government
agency, municipality, industry, public or private corporation,
copartnership, association, firm, individual, or other entity
whatsoever.
(((11))) (13) "Potentially dangerous litter" means litter that is
likely to injure a person or cause damage to a vehicle or other
property. "Potentially dangerous litter" means:
(a) Cigarettes, cigars, or other tobacco products that are capable
of starting a fire;
(b) Glass;
(c) A container or other product made predominantly or entirely of
glass;
(d) A hypodermic needle or other medical instrument designed to cut
or pierce;
(e) Raw human waste, including soiled baby diapers, regardless of
whether or not the waste is in a container of any sort; and
(f) Nails or tacks.
(((12))) (14) "Public place" means any area that is used or held
out for use by the public whether owned or operated by public or
private interests.
(((13))) (15) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing
waste materials into a finished product for use other than landfill
disposal or incineration.
(((14))) (16) "Recycling center" means a central collection point
for recyclable materials.
(((15))) (17) "Sports facility" means an outdoor recreational
sports facility, including but not limited to athletic fields and
ballparks, at which beverages are sold by a vendor or vendors in
single-use aluminum, glass, or plastic bottles or cans.
(((16))) (18) "To litter" means a single or cumulative act of
disposing of litter.
(((17))) (19) "Vehicle" includes every device capable of being
moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or
property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway,
excepting devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively
upon stationary rails or tracks.
(((18))) (20) "Waste reduction" means reducing the amount or
toxicity of waste generated or reusing materials.
(((19))) (21) "Watercraft" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or
other floating craft.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.93 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Grocery stores may only provide checkout bags that are made of
either recyclable paper, compostable plastic, reusable machine-washable
textile materials, or reusable plastic that is at least 2.25 mils thick
and is specifically designed and manufactured for multiple reuse.
(2) Grocery stores operating in violation of this section are
subject to a class 1 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW. Each
calendar day of operation in violation of this section comprises a new
violation.
(3) The department shall develop guidelines identifying the
specifications of checkout bags allowed under this section. Grocery
stores providing checkout bags consistent with the guidelines are
deemed to be in compliance with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There may be credited against the tax imposed by this chapter:
(a) The actual cost incurred by a grocery store in a reporting
period in providing its customers with checkout bags made of reusable
machine-washable textile materials if the grocery store does not charge
the customer for the checkout bag; or
(b) The difference between the actual cost to a grocery store and
the revenues generated by the grocery store in a reporting period if
the grocery store charges customers for checkout bags made of reusable
machine-washable textile materials at a price that is less than the
cost incurred by the grocery store in providing the checkout bags made
of reusable machine-washable textile materials.
(2) The credit allowed under this section shall be limited to the
amount of tax imposed by this chapter. Any unused credit in a
reporting period may be carried forward to future reporting periods for
a maximum of one year.
(3) As used in this section, the terms "grocery store" and
"checkout bag" have the same meaning as provided in RCW 70.93.030.

Sec. 4 RCW 7.80.120 and 2003 c 365 s 3 and 2003 c 337 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a civil infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty.
(a) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 1 civil
infraction shall be two hundred fifty dollars, not including statutory
assessments, except for an infraction of state law involving
potentially dangerous litter as specified in RCW 70.93.060(4) ((and an
infraction of state law involving)), violent video or computer games
under RCW 9.91.180, and checkout bags under section 2 of this act, in
which case the maximum penalty and default amount is five hundred
dollars;
(b) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 2 civil
infraction shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars, not including
statutory assessments;
(c) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 3 civil
infraction shall be fifty dollars, not including statutory assessments;
and
(d) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 4 civil
infraction shall be twenty-five dollars, not including statutory
assessments.
(2) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule the conditions under
which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines for civil
infractions.
(3) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this
chapter it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at
that time the court may grant an extension of the period in which the
penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time
established for payment, the court may proceed to collect the penalty
in the same manner as other civil judgments and may notify the
prosecuting authority of the failure to pay.
(4) The court may also order a person found to have committed a
civil infraction to make restitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---