BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Consumer benefits" means a property of an item that is
advantageous to the consumer of the item. The term "consumer benefits"
includes, but is not limited to, reduced long-term costs of ownership,
enhanced safety, and benefits to the overall environment.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Shelf space" means the area of a retail store that is made
available to a potential customer and designed to display the items
offered for sale at the store. The term "shelf space" includes not
only items displayed on shelves, but also items displayed on the floor
of the store or in other areas on the store's premises.
(4) "Small-scale powered equipment" means a tool or other nonroad
or marine machine powered by a gasoline, diesel, or propane spark
ignition engine that has a standard manufacturer's listed horsepower
rating of fifty horsepower or fewer. Examples of the term "small-scale
powered equipment" include, but are not limited to, the following items
when the components of the definition are satisfied: Lawnmowers,
string trimmers, leaf blowers, air compressors, chainsaws, turf
equipment, lawn and garden tractors, and vehicles designed for off-road
use.
(5) "State agency" means any office, department, division, bureau,
board, commission, or other agency of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Any retailer that offers for sale an
item that satisfies the definition of small-scale powered equipment
must provide equal or greater shelf space to similar products that are
powered by an electrical cord or a rechargeable battery.
(2) In calculating equal or greater shelf space, electric versions
of individual equipment categories must be considered discreetly from
their small-scale powered equipment counterparts. Total aggregate
shelf space for small-scale powered equipment is not to be compared
with the total aggregate shelf space for similar products that are
powered by an electrical cord or a rechargeable battery.
(3)(a) This section does not apply to small-scale powered equipment
when there is not a similar product category available on the market
that is powered by an electrical cord or a rechargeable battery.
(b) If a retailer is unsure whether a similar product that is
powered by an electrical cord or a rechargeable battery exists for a
particular category of small-scale powered equipment, the retailer may
petition the department for a statement of exemption from this section
for the small-scale powered equipment in question.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Any retailer that offers for sale an
item that satisfies the definition of small-scale powered equipment
must dedicate a portion of its shelf space to adequate signs describing
the consumer benefits of choosing electric or battery-powered engines
over small-scale powered equipment. Retailers can either purchase
signs from the department or produce their own signs consistent with
the standards developed by the department under this section.
(2)(a) The department shall identify potential consumer benefits of
choosing electric or battery-powered engines over small-scale powered
equipment.
(b) The department shall:
(i) Incorporate the identified consumer benefits into a sign
template appropriate for display in a retail store that satisfies the
requirements of this section;
(ii) Produce copies of the signs made from the template that are to
be offered for sale to retailers; and
(iii) Develop minimum sign standards to guide retailers choosing to
produce their own signs in order to satisfy the requirements of this
section.
(c) Signs sold to a retailer by the department under this section
must be priced no higher than necessary to reimburse the department's
development and production costs. All proceeds from sign sales must be
deposited into the electrical equipment incentive account created in
section 7 of this act.
(3)(a) This section does not apply to small-scale powered equipment
when there is not a similar product category available on the market
that is powered by an electrical cord or a rechargeable battery.
(b) If a retailer is unsure whether a similar product that is
powered by an electrical cord or a rechargeable battery exists for a
particular category of small-scale powered equipment, the retailer may
petition the department for a statement of exemption from this section
for the small-scale powered equipment in question.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department shall offer electrical
equipment incentive grants on a competitive basis to city or county
governments. Grant funding may only be used by the city or county
government for programs designed to subsidize, or otherwise create an
incentive for, the purchase of alternatives to small-scale powered
equipment that are powered by an electrical cord or a rechargeable
battery.
(2) Competitive criteria for grant awards must be designed by the
department. However, competitive priority must be given to local
governments located in areas with the highest measurable air quality
degradation due to emissions commonly associated with small-scale
powered equipment.
(3) The amount provided in each grant, as well as the number of
grants available, must be determined by the department based on funding
available from the electrical equipment incentive account created in
section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this
section, state agencies are prohibited from purchasing small-scale
powered equipment if the market offers an alternative item that is
powered by an electrical cord or rechargeable battery.
(2) All state agencies shall phase out the use of small-scale
powered equipment that have alternative items available on the market
that are powered by an electrical cord or rechargeable battery on a
timeline that ensures that no such items are in use five years after
the effective date of this section.
(3)(a) The top administrative official of a state agency may waive
the provisions of this section on a case-by-case basis if the top
administrative official of the agency publishes a finding in the
Washington State Register explaining the details as to why the purchase
or use of the small-scale powered equipment was necessary and why the
use of an electric-based alternative would have been impractical.
(b) The Washington State Register publication requirements of this
section may be satisfied with one annual publication summarizing all
instances where the requirements of this section were waived by the top
administrative official in the preceding year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Local governments and school districts are
encouraged to review their purchasing and use of small-scale powered
equipment and select, when possible, alternative items that are powered
by an electrical cord or rechargeable battery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The electrical equipment incentive account
is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the electrical
equipment incentive tax created in section 9 of this act, along with
the sales of signs developed by the department under section 3 of this
act, must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be
used only by the department for local government electrical equipment
incentive grants provided in section 4 of this act, sign development
and manufacturing costs incurred by conformance with section 3 of this
act, and general expenses incurred through the implementation of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A retailer operating in violation of
this chapter is subject to a class 1 civil infraction under chapter
7.80 RCW. Each calendar day of operation in violation of this section
comprises a new violation.
(2) This chapter may be enforced by the department, the applicable
air pollution control authority created under RCW 70.94.053, the
applicable city or county government, or a general authority Washington
law enforcement agency, as that term is defined in RCW 10.93.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) In addition to any other taxes, there is
levied and there shall be collected by the department from every person
for the privilege of engaging within this state in business as a
wholesaler or as a retailer an electrical equipment incentive tax equal
to the gross proceeds of sales of all small-scale powered equipment, as
that term is defined in section 1 of this act, that are sold within
this state multiplied by six percent.
(2) The frequency and time of collection of the electrical
equipment incentive tax shall coincide with the reporting periods by
payers of their business and occupation tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Instead of requiring each business to
separately account for taxable and nontaxable products under this
chapter, the department may provide, by rule, that the tax imposed in
this chapter be reported and paid based on a percentage of total sales
for a particular type of business if the department determines that the
percentage reasonably approximates the taxable activity of the
particular type of business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 To the extent applicable, all of the
definitions of chapter 82.04 RCW and all of the provisions of chapter
82.32 RCW apply to the tax imposed in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Taxes collected under this chapter must be
allocated as follows:
(1) Fifty percent must be deposited into the electrical equipment
incentive account created in section 7 of this act;
(2) Twenty-five percent must be deposited into the air pollution
control account created in RCW 70.94.015;
(3) Twenty percent must be deposited into the general fund; and
(4) Five percent must be maintained by the department for the
administration and enforcement of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 As a demonstration to other state agencies
as to how the requirements of section 5 of this act may be achieved,
the department of general administration shall suspend the use of all
spark ignition lawnmowers, string trimmers, and weed blowers on the
capitol campus by October 1, 2008. The department of general
administration shall document their transition from small-scale powered
equipment to electrical or manual alternatives to aid other state
agencies in their implementation of section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 9 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---