BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.668 and 2001 c 214 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that the buildings, facilities,
equipment, and vehicles owned or leased by state government consume
significant amounts of energy and that energy conservation actions,
including energy management systems, to provide for efficient energy
use in these buildings, facilities, equipment, and vehicles will reduce
the costs of state government. In order for the operations of state
government to provide the citizens of this state an example of energy
use efficiency, the legislature further finds and declares that state
government should undertake an aggressive program designed to reduce
energy use in state buildings, facilities, equipment, and vehicles
within a reasonable period of time. The use of appropriate tree
plantings for energy conservation is encouraged as part of this
program. The use of high-efficiency lighting in facilities owned or
leased by state government is also strongly encouraged.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.19.670 and 2001 c 214 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in RCW 43.19.670 through 43.19.685, the following terms
have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Energy audit" means a determination of the energy consumption
characteristics of a facility which consists of the following elements:
(a) An energy consumption survey which identifies the type, amount,
and rate of energy consumption of the facility and its major energy
systems. This survey shall be made by the agency responsible for the
facility.
(b) A walk-through survey which determines appropriate energy
conservation maintenance and operating procedures and indicates the
need, if any, for the acquisition and installation of energy
conservation measures and energy management systems. This survey shall
be made by the agency responsible for the facility if it has
technically qualified personnel available. The director of general
administration shall provide technically qualified personnel to the
responsible agency if necessary.
(c) An investment grade audit, which is an intensive engineering
analysis of energy conservation and management measures for the
facility, net energy savings, and a cost-effectiveness determination.
This element is required only for those facilities designated in the
schedule adopted under RCW 43.19.680(2).
(2) "Cost-effective energy conservation measures" means energy
conservation measures that the investment grade audit concludes will
generate savings sufficient to finance project loans of not more than
ten years.
(3) "Energy conservation measure" means an installation or
modification of an installation in a facility which is primarily
intended to reduce energy consumption or allow the use of an
alternative energy source, including:
(a) Insulation of the facility structure and systems within the
facility;
(b) Storm windows and doors, multiglazed windows and doors, heat
absorbing or heat reflective glazed and coated windows and door
systems, additional glazing, reductions in glass area, and other window
and door system modifications;
(c) Automatic energy control systems;
(d) Equipment required to operate variable steam, hydraulic, and
ventilating systems adjusted by automatic energy control systems;
(e) Solar space heating or cooling systems, solar electric
generating systems, or any combination thereof;
(f) Solar water heating systems;
(g) Furnace or utility plant and distribution system modifications
including replacement burners, furnaces, and boilers which
substantially increase the energy efficiency of the heating system;
devices for modifying flue openings which will increase the energy
efficiency of the heating system; electrical or mechanical furnace
ignitions systems which replace standing gas pilot lights; and utility
plant system conversion measures including conversion of existing oil-and gas-fired boiler installations to alternative energy sources;
(h) Caulking and weatherstripping;
(i) Replacement or modification of lighting fixtures which increase
the energy efficiency of the lighting system;
(j) Energy recovery systems;
(k) Energy management systems; and
(l) Such other measures as the director finds will save a
substantial amount of energy.
(4) "Energy conservation maintenance and operating procedure" means
modification or modifications in the maintenance and operations of a
facility, and any installations within the facility, which are designed
to reduce energy consumption in the facility and which require no
significant expenditure of funds.
(5) "Energy management system" has the definition contained in RCW
39.35.030.
(6) "Energy savings performance contracting" means the process
authorized by chapter 39.35C RCW by which a company contracts with a
state agency to conduct no-cost energy audits, guarantee savings from
energy efficiency, provide financing for energy efficiency
improvements, install or implement energy efficiency improvements, and
agree to be paid for its investment solely from savings resulting from
the energy efficiency improvements installed or implemented.
(7) "Energy service company" means a company or contractor
providing energy savings performance contracting services.
(8) "Facility" means a building, a group of buildings served by a
central energy distribution system, or components of a central energy
distribution system.
(9) "Fluorescent lamp" means a gas-discharge lamp that uses a
magnetic, electronic, or other ballast and uses electricity to excite
mercury vapor in argon or neon gas resulting in a plasma that produces
short-wave ultraviolet light that causes a phosphor to fluoresce and
produce visible light. "Fluorescent lamp" includes without limitation
a compact fluorescent lamp.
(10) "High-efficiency lighting" means fluorescent lamp or solid-state lighting.
(11) "Implementation plan" means the annual tasks and budget
required to complete all acquisitions and installations necessary to
satisfy the recommendations of the energy audit.
(12) "Solid-state lighting" means a light device that uses light-emitting diodes, organic light-emitting diodes, or polymer light-emitting diodes as sources of illumination rather than electrical
filaments or gas.
(13) "Technically feasible" means the technology is compatible and
appropriate for the current appliance and use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever a state agency purchases or requires a bid for the
purchase of an indoor lamp, a preference for solid-state lighting shall
be exercised if the use of solid-state lighting is technically feasible
and the price is competitive with consideration given to the long-term
cost-effectiveness and savings of solid-state lighting. If solid-state
lighting is not technically feasible or cost-effective for a particular
application, then a preference for using a fluorescent lamp shall be
exercised if the use of a fluorescent lamp is technically feasible and
the price is competitive with consideration given to the long-term
cost-effectiveness and savings of fluorescent lamps.
(2) The goal of state agencies for the percentage of purchased
indoor lamps that are high-efficiency lighting shall be one hundred
percent by January 1, 2010.
(3) The department of general administration shall prepare an
annual report to the legislature on the state's progress in meeting the
goals for the purchase of high-efficiency lighting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---