BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of health shall convene
and chair a work group to study policies, strategies, and alternatives
related to the roadside application of pesticides. The work group
shall make recommendations to the legislature on practical and cost-effective opportunities to reduce or eliminate the roadside application
of pesticides in Washington.
(2) The work group shall be established by the secretary of the
department of health and include representatives from the state
department of health, the pesticide incident reporting and tracking
review panel, the state noxious weed control board, the department of
transportation, the department of ecology, the department of
agriculture, local government, industry, nongovernmental environmental
organizations, and other stakeholders as deemed appropriate by the
department.
(3) In carrying out its assignment, the work group shall include,
but not be limited to, the following considerations:
(a) The environmental health effects on communities and individuals
resulting from the roadside application of pesticides;
(b) Existing data and research including the report "Assessment of
Alternatives in Roadside Vegetative Management" prepared for the state
transportation commission, December 2005, and results of follow-on
field trials and pilots of alternative practices;
(c) Monitoring data showing soil, groundwater, and water body
contamination resulting from the roadside application of pesticides;
(d) Policies and strategies used in other states, regions, cities,
and countries that reduce or eliminate the roadside application of
pesticides;
(e) State laws, rules, fees, certification programs, incentives,
and policies that may enhance the ability to reduce or eliminate the
roadside application of pesticides and encourage the use of effective
alternatives;
(f) Cost comparisons for alternatives that reduce or eliminate the
roadside application of pesticides; and
(g) Potential financial incentives and sources of funding to help
reduce or eliminate the roadside application of pesticides.
(4) Recommendations shall include practical and cost-effective
policies, strategies, and alternatives to reduce or eliminate the
roadside application of pesticides in Washington and may include
statutory or regulatory changes, incentives, and other approaches.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Pesticide" includes, but is not limited to:
(i) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to prevent,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate any insect, rodent, nematode,
snail, slug, fungus, weed, and any other form of plant or animal life
or virus, except virus on or in living man or other animal, which is
normally considered to be a pest or which the director of agriculture
may declare to be a pest;
(ii) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as
a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant;
(iii) Any spray adjuvant, such as a wetting agent, spreading agent,
deposit builder, adhesive, emulsifying agent, deflocculating agent,
water modifier, or similar agent with or without toxic properties of
its own intended to be used with any other pesticide as an aid to the
application or effect thereof, and sold in a package or container
separate from that of the pesticide with which it is to be used; or
(iv) Any fungicide, rodenticide, herbicide, insecticide, and
nematocide.
(b) "Roadside pesticide application" means application of
pesticides by spraying or other methods to roadside shoulders, medians,
ditches; near canals and water bodies; and to other road-related
maintenance locations for the purpose of vegetative management
including noxious weed control.
(6) Recommendations shall be presented in a report to the governor
and to the legislature by December 1, 2008.

--- END ---