BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.60.140 and 2005 c 274 s 250 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Members of the county canvassing board are the county auditor,
who is the chair, the county prosecuting attorney, and the chair of the
county legislative body. If a member of the board is not available to
carry out the duties of the board, then the auditor may designate a
deputy auditor, the prosecutor may designate a deputy prosecuting
attorney, and the chair of the county legislative body may designate
another member of the county legislative body or, in a county with over
five hundred thousand registered voters, an employee of the legislative
body who reports directly to the chair. Any such designation may be
made on an election-by-election basis or may be on a permanent basis
until revoked by the designating authority. Any such designation must
be in writing, and if for a specific election, must be filed with the
county auditor not later than the day before the first day duties are
to be undertaken by the canvassing board. If the designation is
permanent until revoked by the designating authority, then the
designation must be on file in the county auditor's office no later
than the day before the first day the designee is to undertake the
duties of the canvassing board. Members of the county canvassing board
designated by the county auditor, county prosecuting attorney, or chair
of the county legislative body shall complete training as provided in
RCW 29A.04.540 and shall take an oath of office similar to that taken
by county auditors and deputy auditors in the performance of their
duties.
(2) The county canvassing board may adopt rules that delegate in
writing to the county auditor or the county auditor's staff the
performance of any task assigned by law to the canvassing board.
(3) The county canvassing board may not delegate the responsibility
of certifying the returns of a primary or election, of determining the
validity of challenged ballots, or of determining the validity of
provisional ballots referred to the board by the county auditor.
(4) The county canvassing board shall adopt administrative rules to
facilitate and govern the canvassing process in that jurisdiction.
(5) Meetings of the county canvassing board are public meetings
under chapter 42.30 RCW. All rules adopted by the county canvassing
board must be adopted in a public meeting under chapter 42.30 RCW, and
once adopted must be available to the public to review and copy under
chapter 42.56 RCW.

--- END ---