BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.48.060 and 2003 c 111 s 1206 are each amended to
read as follows:
All mail ballots authorized by RCW 29A.48.010, 29A.48.020, or
29A.48.030 must contain the same offices, names of nominees or
candidates, and propositions to be voted upon, including precinct
offices, as if the ballot had been voted in person at the polling
place. Except as otherwise provided by law, mail ballots must be
treated in the same manner as absentee ballots issued at the request of
the voter. If electronic vote tallying devices are used, political
party observers must be given the opportunity to be present, and a test
of the equipment must be performed as required by RCW 29A.12.130 before
tabulating ballots. ((Political party observers may select at random
ballots to be counted manually as provided by RCW 29A.60.170.))

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.60.110 and 2003 c 111 s 1511 are each amended to
read as follows:
Immediately after their tabulation, all ballots counted at a ballot
counting center must be sealed in containers that identify the primary
or election and be retained for at least sixty days or according to
federal law, whichever is longer. All ballots tallied by poll-site
ballot counting devices must be returned to the elections department in
sealed ballot containers on election day. Counties composed entirely
of islands or portions of counties composed of islands shall collect
the ballots within twenty-four hours of the close of the polls.
Ballots tabulated in poll-site ballot counting devices must be
sealed by two of the election precinct officers at the polling place,
and a log of the seal and the names of the people sealing the container
must be completed. One copy of this log must be retained by the
inspector, one copy must be placed in the ballot transfer case, and one
copy must be transported with the ballots to the elections department,
where the seal number must be verified by the county auditor or a
designated representative. Ballots may be transported by one election
employee if the container is sealed at the poll and then verified when
returned to the elections department. Auditors using poll-site ballot
counting devices may conduct early pickup of counted ballots on
election day.
In the presence of major party observers who are available, ballots
may be removed from the sealed containers at the elections department
and consolidated into one sealed container for storage purposes. The
containers may only be opened by the canvassing board as part of the
canvass, ((or)) to conduct recounts, ((or under)) to conduct a manual
count pursuant to RCW 29A.60.170(((3))), or by order of the superior
court in a contest or election dispute. If the canvassing board opens
a ballot container, it shall make a full record of the additional
tabulation or examination made of the ballots. This record must be
added to any other record of the canvassing process in that county.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.60.170 and 2007 c 373 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The counting center in a county using voting systems is under
the direction of the county auditor and must be observed by one
representative from each major political party, if representatives have
been appointed by the respective major political parties and these
representatives are present while the counting center is operating.
The proceedings must be open to the public, but no persons except those
employed and authorized by the county auditor may touch any ballot or
ballot container or operate a vote tallying system.
(2) ((In counties in which ballots are not counted at the polling
place, the official political party observers, upon mutual agreement,
may request that a precinct be selected at random on receipt of the
ballots from the polling place and that a manual count be made of the
number of ballots and of the votes cast on any office or issue. The
ballots for that precinct must then be counted by the vote tallying
system, and this result will be compared to the results of the manual
count. This may be done as many as three times during the tabulation
of ballots on the day of the primary or election.
(3) In counties using poll-site ballot counting devices, the
political party observers, upon mutual agreement, may choose as many as
three precincts and request that a manual count be made of the number
of ballots and the votes cast on any office or issue. The results of
this count will be compared to the count of the precinct made by the
poll-site ballot counting device. These selections must be made no
later than thirty minutes after the close of the polls. The manual
count must be completed within forty-eight hours after the close of the
polls. The process must take place at a location designated by the
county auditor for that purpose. The political party observers must
receive timely notice of the time and location, and have the right to
be present. However, the process must proceed as scheduled if the
observers are unable to attend.
(4) In counties voting entirely by mail,)) A random check of the
ballot counting equipment may be conducted upon mutual agreement of the
political party observers or at the discretion of the county auditor.
The random check procedures must be adopted by the county canvassing
board prior to the processing of ballots. ((The random check process
shall involve a comparison of a manual count to the machine count and
may involve up to either three precincts or six batches depending on
the ballot counting procedures in place in the county.)) The random
check ((will)) must be limited to one office or issue on ((the)) all
ballots ((in the precincts or batches)) that are selected for the
check. The ((selection of the)) method for selecting the precincts
((or)), batches, or ballots to be checked must be ((selected according
to procedures established by the)) established in county canvassing
board procedures, and the check must be completed no later than forty-eight hours after election day. The random check shall be a comparison
of the machine count to a manual count of either:
(a) Three precincts or six batches of ballots; or
(b) A sufficient number of ballots to satisfy a statistical
sampling formula established in administrative rule by the secretary of
state.

--- END ---