BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When the department notifies a victim under RCW 9.94A.612 of an
offender's placement in work release, the department shall also
instruct the victim on how to submit input regarding the offender's
work release placement.
(2) The department shall consider any input received from a victim
under subsection (1) of this section if the input is received at least
seven days prior to the offender's placement in work release. The
department may consider any input from a victim under subsection (1) of
this section if the input is received less than seven days prior to the
offender's placement in work release. The department may alter its
placement decision based on any input considered under this subsection.

--- END ---