BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the
following project loans recommended by the public works board are
authorized to be made with funds appropriated from the public works
assistance account:
(1) Arlington--sanitary sewer project--expand and upgrade the
wastewater treatment plant and biosolids composting facility to meet
new discharge limitations, produce a higher quality effluent, and
accommodate future growth . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(2) Auburn--street project--reconstruct approximately 0.3 miles of
roadway with four travel lanes to bring up to current arterial and
truck route standards and modify intersection to optimize efficiency
and level of service . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
(3) Blaine--sanitary sewer project--construct a new wastewater
treatment plant and section of outfall pipe to increase treatment
capacity, produce reuse quality water, and improve Puget Sound water
quality for shellfish . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(4) Bonney Lake--domestic water project--replace approximately
71,000 linear feet of leaky water mains to reduce current water loss by
ten percent . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,352,000
(5) Bonney Lake--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately
12,000 linear feet of failing interceptor sewer pipes . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,648,000
(6) Buckley--sanitary sewer project--rebuild the wastewater
treatment plant to provide nutrient removal and meet state and federal
discharge regulations and the construction of an interceptor . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(7) Camas--sanitary sewer project--construct improvements to the
wastewater treatment facilities to provide class A biosolids at the
main sewage pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(8) Clark county--road project--construct new road segments, widen
roadways, improve and redesign intersections, and install and modify
traffic signals necessary to improve a major interchange with two
freeways . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(9) Clark regional wastewater district--sanitary sewer project--modify existing and construct new wastewater facilities to process
approximately 4.65 million gallons more of wastewater per day and
ensure treatment processes continue to be in compliance with current
regulations . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
(10) Coal creek utility district--sanitary sewer project--construct
sewer lift station, approximately 1,250 lineal feet of gravity sewer
main, and 500 feet of force main to provide public sewer to
approximately 25 properties on a lake that have private septic systems
that have failed or are in prefailure status . . . . . . . . . . . . $898,875
(11) College Place--domestic water project--construct two steel
tanks, a booster station, approximately 6,000 feet of transmission
line, 3,400 feet of water mains, three pressure reducing valves, and
associated telemetry to rectify a deficiency in fire flow and standby
water storage protection . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,710,051
(12) Cowlitz county public utility district No. 1--domestic water
project--construction of approximately six new groundwater supply
wells, 2,100 feet of raw water piping a new water treatment plant
producing approximately 20 million gallons per day of potable water,
and approximately 4,350 feet of transmission main to connect to the
system to replace current water supply that is being impacted by
increasing water sediment . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,213,000
(13) Ephrata--domestic water project--replace approximately 68,000
feet of failing water mains, 50,000 feet of failing water service
pipes, and the resurfacing of 20 miles of overlaying roadway, including
approximately 100 fire hydrants, 400 catch basins, 15 storm sewer
drywells, 22,000 feet of curb and gutter, and 16,000 feet of storm
sewer pipe . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,605,727
(14) Freeland water district--domestic water project--connect a new
well and new reservoir to the existing system, rehabilitate the
existing well, and install new equipment to increase system
reliability, redundancy, and capacity. Install new chlorination
equipment to improve water quality . . . . . . . . . . . . $347,516
(15) Gig Harbor--sanitary sewer project--improvements to the
wastewater treatment plant including new equipment and electrical work,
add a third clarifier, install ultraviolet disinfection, and extend and
upsize the outfall . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(16) Highline water district--domestic water project--construction
of 11,350 feet of transmission main and looping of pipes to eliminate
low pressures and fire flows and improve water quality, and create a
new pressure zone to correct high pressures . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,390,418
(17) Karcher creek sewer district--sanitary sewer project--install
a new sewer system, including a lift station and approximately 3,600
lineal feet of sewer main, in conjunction with a road project to
service approximately 17 homes that will lose their septic systems due
to the road project . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,358,130
(18) Kennewick--sanitary sewer project--construct improvements to
critical wastewater treatment plant processes to enhance reliability,
improve energy efficiency and redundancy, as well as increase the
capacity of the sludge pumping station . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000
(19) Kent--street project--construct two bridges, one for the
roadway over a set of railroad tracks, and one for railroad tracks over
a lowered roadway. This will grade separate the tracks from the
roadway to provide safe and reliable operations twenty-four hours a day . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(20) King county--sanitary sewer project--construct 13,100 lineal
feet of pipe to convey approximately 9 million gallons per day of
reclaimed water to reduce withdrawals of 250-acre feet per year from
the Sammamish river . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(21) La Center--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater
treatment plant to reduce the levels of nitrogen discharged in the
effluent and approximately doubling the operation of the plant and
producing class A reuse water . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(22) Lake Forest Park water district--domestic water project--replace approximately 6,915 lineal feet of undersized and corroded
water pipes to improve safety and reliability of the system by reducing
pipe failures and increasing fire flow . . . . . . . . . . . . $917,935
(23) Lake Stevens--sanitary sewer project--construct a new
wastewater treatment plant, 9,500 feet of interceptor line, a pump
station, and an outfall pipe in partnership with Lake Stevens sewer
district . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(24) Lake Stevens sewer district--sanitary sewer project--construct
a new wastewater treatment plant, 9,500 feet of interceptor line, a
pump station, and an outfall pipe in partnership with the city of Lake
Stevens . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(25) Lakewood--sanitary sewer project--construct 3 pump stations,
approximately 17,200 linear feet of force mains, 13,500 linear feet of
gravity collector pipe line, and 320 side sewer stubs to service two
neighborhoods currently served exclusively by septic
systems . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,840,000
(26) LOTT alliance--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
7,400 feet of force main and replace existing pump station with new
1,000 gallon per minute pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,003,807
(27) Mansfield--sanitary sewer project--expand and rehabilitate
wastewater treatment lagoons and effluent spray irrigation system as
well as remove the discharge of groundwater from basement sump pumps to
the collection system . . . . . . . . . . . . $235,600
(28) Midway sewer district--sanitary sewer project--replace
approximately 16,500 lineal feet of sewer mains and 50 manholes to
reduce infiltration and inflow . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,782,500
(29) Mount Vernon--sanitary sewer project--upgrade existing
wastewater treatment plant, including a new pretreatment facility, 4
additional clarifiers, upgrade aeration basins, installation of an
ultraviolet disinfection system, and odor control system . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(30) Newcastle--road project--reconstruct, widen, and signalize
approximately 5,200 linear feet of road to 2 lanes in each direction,
add left turn lanes, sidewalks, bicycle lanes, install lighting
systems, replace two-lane bridge with a four-lane bridge, and install
new traffic signals . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(31) Olympia--sanitary sewer project--install approximately 6,500
linear feet of sewer mains and construct a lift station to serve 63
homes with failing on-site sewage systems . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,808,375
(32) Olympus Terrace sewer district--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate approximately 9,350 linear feet of sewer trunkline,
construct approximately 9,800 linear feet of high-flow storm water
bypass piping for excess flow, construct approximately 4,150 linear
feet of road access, and restore creek habitat . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
(33) Omak--sanitary sewer project--add 2 compost containers,
convert storage tank to sludge holding tank, and install a second
headworks screen to increase the wastewater treatment plant capacity by
35
percent . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
(34) Port Angeles--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
11,500 feet of sewer main, modify a storage tank, and modify the
wastewater treatment plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(35) Regional board of mayors--solid waste project--close landfill
site by capping and sealing with a soil cap . . . . . . . . . . . . $859,500
(36) Regional board of mayors--solid waste project--construct a new
solid waste transfer station, including structures and
equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,541,000
(37) Ronald wastewater district--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate 2 lift stations by replacing pumps, valves, fittings,
piping, odor control systems, and electrical equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . $955,400
(38) Seattle--domestic water project--replace floating pumps with
land-based pump station with a maximum capacity of approximately 250
million gallons per day, including 8 pumps, concrete structure, a
tunnel, approximately 4,000 feet of pipeline, and a standby
generator. . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(39) Sedro-Woolley--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate or replace
4 interceptor segments totaling approximately 29,700 linear feet,
install 2 pump stations, and upgrade the secondary clarifier in order
to lift a building moratorium . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,023,491
(40) Shelton--sanitary sewer project--construct a satellite
reclamation plant with a capacity of approximately 0.4 million gallons
per day to produce class A reclaimed water, approximately 22,000 linear
feet of sewer pipelines, and approximately 25,000 linear feet of
reclaimed water force main . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,079,360
(41) Shelton--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately 38,480
linear feet of mainline sewers to reduce inflow and
infiltration . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,737,500
(42) Skagit county sewer district No. 2--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater treatment plant to a water reclamation facility to
provide class A reclaimed water with a capacity of approximately 0.35
million gallons per day . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(43) Snohomish--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
1,900 feet of sewer pipe, a new pump station with a capacity of
approximately 8,000 gallons per minute, and approximately 4,300 feet of
force main to reduce overflows . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(44) Snohomish--sanitary sewer project--upgrade existing wastewater
treatment plant including a new influent flow structure, screens,
aerators, effluent filtration, ultraviolet disinfection, effluent pump
station, improvements to the existing lagoons, and electrical
improvements . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
(45) Snohomish county--road project--construct a new, approximately
two-mile, two-lane truck route around the city of Granite Falls,
including 3 roundabouts to improve safety and air quality in the
downtown
area . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(46) Southwest Suburban sewer district--sanitary sewer project--replace and/or slipline approximately 5,470 feet of trunk/interceptor
sewer main and construct a new lift station to reduce
overflows . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,268,250
(47) Tacoma--domestic water project--replace 3 open-topped concrete
reservoirs with 2 enclosed concrete reservoirs of approximately 33
million gallons each and related piping to comply with the safe
drinking water act and a bilateral compliance agreement . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(48) Tekoa--sanitary sewer system--reconstruct approximately 1,000
feet of failing sewer line and manholes to reduce significant
groundwater infiltration . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,115
(49) Three rivers regional wastewater authority--sanitary sewer
project--construct 2 clarifiers and associated piping to replace 2
failed clarifiers at the wastewater plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,630,750
(50) Washougal--sanitary sewer project--construct a new wastewater
treatment plant headworks, including a fine screen, grit removal, and
replace approximately 150 linear feet of gravity sewer, and make
improvements to the lagoons, including 450 linear feet of piping,
modify overflow structures, and a new pump . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
(51) Yakima--domestic water project--develop a new, approximately
3,000 gallon per minute, domestic water well, including drilling,
placement of casing, a new pump house, and connection to the existing
water distribution system in order to augment the water supply during
drought conditions . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,257,200
(52) Yakima--street project--construct 2 underpasses and
reconstruct 3 lanes on each roadway under a railroad mainline to
accommodate additional rail and reduce traffic and emergency response
delays and air pollution . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---