BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall determine the immigration status of every
felony sex offender serving a term of confinement on or after the
effective date of this section in an institution owned, or utilized
under contract, by the state. If the department determines that a sex
offender is unlawfully in the United States or is otherwise subject to
deportation, the department shall notify the appropriate federal
authorities. After the offender has served his or her term of
confinement, he or she shall be released into the custody of the
appropriate federal authorities.

Sec. 2 RCW 72.02.100 and 1988 c 143 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person serving a sentence for a term of confinement in a state
correctional facility for convicted felons, pursuant to court
commitment, who is thereafter released upon an order of parole of the
indeterminate ((sentencing)) sentence review board, or who is
discharged from custody upon expiration of sentence, or who is ordered
discharged from custody by a court of appropriate jurisdiction, shall
be entitled to retain his earnings from labor or employment while in
confinement and shall be supplied by the superintendent of the state
correctional facility with suitable and presentable clothing, the sum
of forty dollars for subsistence, and, except as provided in section 1
of this act, transportation by the least expensive method of public
transportation not to exceed the cost of one hundred dollars to his
place of residence or the place designated in his parole plan, or to
the place from which committed if such person is being discharged on
expiration of sentence, or discharged from custody by a court of
appropriate jurisdiction: PROVIDED, That up to sixty additional
dollars may be made available to the parolee for necessary personal and
living expenses upon application to and approval by such person's
community corrections officer. If in the opinion of the superintendent
suitable arrangements have been made to provide the person to be
released with suitable clothing and/or the expenses of transportation,
the superintendent may consent to such arrangement. If the
superintendent has reasonable cause to believe that the person to be
released has ample funds, with the exception of earnings from labor or
employment while in confinement, to assume the expenses of clothing,
transportation, or the expenses for which payments made pursuant to RCW
72.02.100 or 72.02.110 or any one or more of such expenses, the person
released shall be required to assume such expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The governing authority of a jail shall determine the immigration
status of every felony sex offender serving a term of confinement on or
after the effective date of this section in the jail. If the authority
determines that a sex offender is unlawfully in the United States or is
otherwise subject to deportation, the authority shall notify the
appropriate federal authorities. After the offender has served his or
her term of confinement, he or she shall be released into the custody
of the appropriate federal authorities.

--- END ---