BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall electronically monitor every offender
serving a term of community custody on or after the effective date of
this act who is required to register as a sex offender under RCW
9A.44.130 and:
(a) Has been classified as risk level III;
(b) Has registered as lacking a fixed residence; or
(c) Has a prior conviction for failure to register as a sex
offender under RCW 9A.44.130.
(2) All electronic monitoring under this section shall be carried
out using an active global positioning system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
Washington state patrol shall electronically monitor every offender who
is required to register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130 and:
(a) Has been classified as risk level III;
(b) Has registered as lacking a fixed residence; or
(c) Has a prior conviction for failure to register as a sex
offender under RCW 9A.44.130.
(2) This section does not apply to an offender being electronically
monitored by the department of corrections under section 1 of this act.
(3) All electronic monitoring under this section shall be carried
out using an active global positioning system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of . . . . dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of corrections
for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of . . . . dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the Washington state patrol for
the purposes of this act.

--- END ---