BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each general authority Washington law enforcement agency shall,
within one year of the effective date of this act, enter into an
agreement with the attorney general of the United States under 8 U.S.C.
Sec. 1357(g) that allows officers employed by the agency to perform the
function of an immigration officer in relation to the investigation,
apprehension, or detention of aliens in the United States who:
(a) Have been classified as a risk level III sex offender;
(b) Have been convicted of a sex offense against a minor victim; or
(c) Have been convicted of failure to register as a sex offender.
(2) For purposes of this section, "general authority Washington law
enforcement agency" has the same meaning as in RCW 10.93.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of . . . . dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of community,
trade, and economic development for the purposes of this act.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall distribute the funds appropriated in this section to each county
in the state based on the percentage of the total number of registered
sex offenders statewide that reside in the county.

--- END ---