BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.754 and 2002 c 289 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every adult or juvenile individual convicted of a felony,
stalking under RCW 9A.46.110, harassment under RCW 9A.46.020,
communicating with a minor for immoral purposes under RCW 9.68A.090, or
adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense, and every adult
or juvenile individual who is a registered sex offender on or after the
effective date of this section, must have a biological sample collected
for purposes of DNA identification analysis in the following manner:
(a) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement
in a department of corrections facility, and do serve a term of
confinement in a city or county jail facility, the city or county shall
be responsible for obtaining the biological samples either as part of
the intake process into the city or county jail or detention facility
for those persons convicted on or after July 1, 2002, or within a
reasonable time after July 1, 2002, for those persons incarcerated
before July 1, 2002, who have not yet had a biological sample
collected, beginning with those persons who will be released the
soonest.
(b) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement
in a department of corrections facility, and do not serve a term of
confinement in a city or county jail facility, the local police
department or sheriff's office is responsible for obtaining the
biological samples after sentencing on or after July 1, 2002.
(c) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense, who are serving or who are to serve a
term of confinement in a department of corrections facility or a
department of social and health services facility, the facility holding
the person shall be responsible for obtaining the biological samples
either as part of the intake process into such facility for those
persons convicted on or after July 1, 2002, or within a reasonable time
after July 1, 2002, for those persons incarcerated before July 1, 2002,
who have not yet had a biological sample collected, beginning with
those persons who will be released the soonest.
(d) For registered sex offenders who do not have a biological
sample collected under (a) through (c) of this subsection, the county
sheriff is responsible for collecting the sample.
(e) If a DNA sample from an individual is already included in the
DNA database, a subsequent biological sample from the same individual
is not required to be collected, submitted, or tested under this
section.
(2) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.752 through
43.43.758 may be retained by the forensic laboratory services bureau,
and shall be used solely for the purpose of providing DNA or other
tests for identification analysis and prosecution of a criminal offense
or for the identification of human remains or missing persons. Nothing
in this section prohibits the submission of results derived from the
biological samples to the federal bureau of investigation combined DNA
index system.
(3) The director of the forensic laboratory services bureau of the
Washington state patrol shall perform testing on all biological samples
collected under subsection (1) of this section, to the extent allowed
by funding available for this purpose. The director shall give
priority to testing on samples collected from those adults or juveniles
convicted of a felony or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense that is defined as a sex offense or a violent offense in RCW
9.94A.030.
(4) This section applies to all adults who are convicted of a sex
or violent offense after July 1, 1990; and to all adults who were
convicted of a sex or violent offense on or prior to July 1, 1990, and
who are still incarcerated on or after July 25, 1999. This section
applies to all juveniles who are adjudicated guilty of a sex or violent
offense after July 1, 1994; and to all juveniles who were adjudicated
guilty of a sex or violent offense on or prior to July 1, 1994, and who
are still incarcerated on or after July 25, 1999. This section applies
to all adults and juveniles who are convicted of a felony other than a
sex or violent offense, stalking under RCW 9A.46.110, harassment under
RCW 9A.46.020, or communicating with a minor for immoral purposes under
RCW 9.68A.090, or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense,
on or after July 1, 2002; and to all adults and juveniles who were
convicted or adjudicated guilty of such an offense before July 1, 2002,
and are still incarcerated on or after July 1, 2002.
(5) This section creates no rights in a third person. No cause of
action may be brought based upon the noncollection or nonanalysis or
the delayed collection or analysis of a biological sample authorized to
be taken under RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758.
(6) The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based upon a
database match or database information is not invalidated if it is
determined that the sample was obtained or placed in the database by
mistake, or if the conviction or juvenile adjudication that resulted in
the collection of the biological sample was subsequently vacated or
otherwise altered in any future proceeding including but not limited to
posttrial or postfact-finding motions, appeals, or collateral attacks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of . . . . . . dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the Washington state patrol for
the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sum of . . . . . . dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of
community, trade, and economic development for the purposes of this
act.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall distribute the funds appropriated in this section to each county
in the state based on the percentage of the total number of registered
sex offenders statewide that reside in the county.

--- END ---