BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.130 and 2006 c 215 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
No elective official nor any employee of his (([or her])) or her
office nor any person appointed to or employed by any public office or
agency may use or authorize the use of any of the facilities of a
public office or agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of
assisting a campaign for election of any person to any office or for
the promotion of or opposition to any ballot proposition. Facilities
of a public office or agency include, but are not limited to, use of
stationery or its likeness, regardless of who pays for the stationery,
postage, machines, and equipment, use of employees of the office or
agency during working hours, vehicles, office space, publications of
the office or agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the
office or agency. However, this does not apply to the following
activities:
(1) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body or by an elected board, council, or commission of a
special purpose district including, but not limited to, fire districts,
public hospital districts, library districts, park districts, port
districts, public utility districts, school districts, sewer districts,
and water districts, to express a collective decision, or to actually
vote upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to
support or oppose a ballot proposition so long as (a) any required
notice of the meeting includes the title and number of the ballot
proposition, and (b) members of the legislative body, members of the
board, council, or commission of the special purpose district, or
members of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity
for the expression of an opposing view;
(2) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry;
(3) Activities which are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.52.180 and 1995 c 397 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use
of facilities of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of
assisting a campaign for election of a person to an office or for the
promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition. Knowing
acquiescence by a person with authority to direct, control, or
influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using
public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation
of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited
to, use of stationery or its likeness, regardless of who pays for the
stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state employees of
the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space, publications
of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the agency.
(2) This section shall not apply to the following activities:
(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose a ballot proposition as long as (i) required notice of the
meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition, and
(ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public are
afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;
(b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes of this subsection,
it is not a violation of this section for an elected official to
respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to make
incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an
actual, measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards
shall adopt by rule a definition of measurable expenditure;
(c) Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency; and
(d) De minimis use of public facilities by statewide elected
officials and legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of
permissible communications, including written and verbal communications
initiated by them of their views on ballot propositions that
foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their constitutional
or statutory responsibilities.
(3) As to state officers and employees, this section operates to
the exclusion of RCW 42.17.130.

--- END ---