BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Wildlife rehabilitators provide the only hospital services in
Washington for injured, orphaned, and sick wild animals;
(2) Wildlife rehabilitators are in a unique position to notice and
identify emerging diseases in wildlife populations, and to share that
information with the department of fish and wildlife;
(3) Healthy wildlife populations are important to the quality of
life of the citizens of Washington. By saving the lives of thousands
of injured, orphaned, and sick wild animals each year, wildlife
rehabilitators directly improve the quality of life for Washington
citizens;
(4) Wildlife rehabilitators often work closely with local law
enforcement, animal control officers, department of fish and wildlife
enforcement officers, and wildlife biologists at the state and federal
levels to aid in the safe capture, disease testing, medical treatment,
rehabilitation, and release of wild animals;
(5) Wildlife rehabilitators improve the quality of life of
Washington citizens and assist in the protection of Washington's
environment by providing education programs to many thousands of people
annually; and
(6) Wildlife rehabilitators improve the quality of life of
Washington citizens by providing humane conflict resolution advice when
a person encounters a conflict with a wild animal at the person's home
or business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The director shall establish and maintain a wildlife
rehabilitation advisory committee to be composed of department
employees with expertise in wildlife rehabilitation and the
department's role in the licensing and regulation of wildlife
rehabilitation facilities and private individuals engaged in the
rehabilitation of wildlife.
(b) Unless deemed impractical by the director, at least six private
wildlife rehabilitation professionals must be represented on the
wildlife rehabilitation advisory committee, with no more than two
employed by a single wildlife rehabilitation facility. Of the private
wildlife rehabilitation professionals, if possible, no fewer than two
must be members of a statewide organization representing the interests
of wildlife rehabilitation facilities.
(2) The purposes of the wildlife rehabilitation advisory committee
is to:
(a) Facilitate communication and partnership between the department
and wildlife rehabilitation facilities;
(b) Improve the exchange of information, research, data, and
science between the department and wildlife rehabilitation facilities;
(c) Provide the department with recommendations as to how the
wildlife rehabilitation community can participate in the testing and
tracking of wildlife diseases;
(d) Provide advice and information to the department in the
implementation of its wildlife rehabilitation program established in
RCW 77.12.467;
(e) Provide advice and information to the department regarding
wildlife rehabilitation licensing and license renewal policies;
(f) Provide advice and information to the department regarding
rules for the rehabilitation of wildlife affected by oil spills under
RCW 90.56.110;
(g) Provide guidance to the director in the identification of
potential public investments in wildlife rehabilitation resources that
would benefit the department in the execution of its duties under this
title; and
(h) Provide any other advice and information to the department on
any matters deemed useful by the director.
(3) The director or the director's designee shall convene the
wildlife rehabilitation advisory committee as often as deemed necessary
by the director.
(4) Each nondepartmental member of the wildlife rehabilitation
advisory committee shall serve without compensation but may be
reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.12.467 and 2007 c 246 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall establish a wildlife rehabilitation program
to help support the critical role licensed wildlife rehabilitators play
in protecting the public by capturing, testing for disease, and caring
for sick, injured, and orphaned wildlife in Washington ((state)). The
director shall contract for wildlife rehabilitation services with up to
four people in each of the department's six administrative regions.
Applicants may submit only one request every two years and must reside
in the administrative region for which they have applied. The
contracts must be for a term of two years.
(2) In order to receive funding, the wildlife rehabilitator must:
(a) Be properly licensed in wildlife rehabilitation under state and
federal law; and (b) furnish information concerning his or her
identity, including fingerprints for submission to the Washington state
patrol to include a national criminal background check. The applicant
must pay for the cost of the criminal background check. If the
background check reveals that the applicant has been convicted of a
felony or gross misdemeanor, the applicant is ineligible to receive
funding.
(3) The department must require that contractors submit detailed
reports accounting for all expenditures of state funds. The reports
must be submitted to the department on a quarterly basis. The
department may require the contractor to submit to an inspection of the
rehabilitation facility to ensure compliance with department rules
governing wildlife rehabilitation.
(4) Expenditures that are permitted under this program as they
specifically relate to wildlife rehabilitation include:
(a) Reimbursement for diagnostic and lab support services;
(b) Purchase and maintenance of proper restraints and equipment
used in the capture, transportation, temporary housing, and release of
wildlife;
(c) Reimbursement of contracted veterinary services;
(d) Reimbursement of the cost of food, medication, and other
consumables; and
(e) Reimbursement of the cost of continuing education.
(5) The department shall give priority to applications submitted
that provide for the rehabilitation of endangered or threatened
species.
(6) Funds may not be used to rehabilitate either nonnative species
or nuisance animals, or both, including, but not limited to the
following: Eastern gray squirrels (Sciurus carolinensis); opossum
(Didelphis virginiana); raccoons (Procyon lotor); striped skunk
(Mephitis mephitis); spotted skunk (Spilogale putorius); Eastern
cottontail rabbit (Sylvilagus floridanus); domestic rabbit (Oryctolagus
cuniculus); European starling (Sturnus vulgaris); and house sparrow
(Passer domesticus).
(((4))) (7) The department shall, in implementing this section,
consider all recommendations that may be forwarded by the wildlife
rehabilitation advisory committee created in section 2 of this act and
may adopt any rules as are necessary to carry out this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.12.469 and 2007 c 246 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department must develop a process for renewing wildlife
rehabilitation licenses. All wildlife rehabilitation licenses issued
by the department prior to January 1, 2006, must be renewed by January
1, 2010. The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
section.
(2) The department shall, in implementing this section, consider
all recommendations that may be forwarded by the wildlife
rehabilitation advisory committee created in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.56.110 and 1994 c 264 s 95 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of fish and wildlife may adopt rules including,
but not limited to, the following:
(((1))) (a) Procedures and methods of handling and caring for
waterfowl or other wildlife affected by spills of oil and other
hazardous materials;
(((2))) (b) The certification of persons trained in the removal of
pollutants from waterfowl or other wildlife;
(((3))) (c) Development of procedures with respect to removal of
oil and other hazardous substances from waterfowl or other wildlife;
(((4))) (d) The establishment of training exercises, courses, and
other training procedures as necessary;
(((5))) (e) Such other rules as may be reasonably necessary to
carry out the intent of RCW 90.56.100.
(2) The department shall, in implementing this section, consider
all recommendations that may be forwarded by the wildlife
rehabilitation advisory committee created in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The initial priority for the wildlife
rehabilitation advisory committee created in section 2 of this act is
to assist the department of fish and wildlife in the development and
implementation of the wildlife rehabilitation program established in
RCW 77.12.467, including assistance in the development of a process and
criteria for evaluating grant proposals.

--- END ---