BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the forest
products industry is historically and currently a vital aspect of the
state's economy and quality of life. Working forest lands not only
create direct and indirect jobs and economic growth in rural
communities, but they maintain vast tracts of land in a forested and
undeveloped state that can provide sustenance to a wide variety of
biologic life. With the historic accord known as the forest and fish
law now in place, working forest lands have taken the next steps that
help ensure that the state will enjoy a richness in the health of its
aquatic habitat and provide endangered salmonid species with a
significant chance for survival.
(2) The legislature further finds that working forestry is not the
only legitimate use of rural land. Washington has experienced
intensive population growth, and the population will continue to grow
at unprecedented rates into the future. As the population grows, the
demands of the state's citizens will include land for housing. These
demands have already brought residential development into areas
traditionally used for forestry and has lead to a historic loss of
working lands across Washington's landscape.
(3) It is not the intent of this act to favor one land use over the
other, but to recognize legitimate competing interests for a finite
amount of land. The legislature finds that as working lands find
themselves as neighbors to more and more private residences, conflicts
between the two land uses will continue to escalate. If simple steps
are taken by these new neighbors, conflict can be reduced to a minimum,
working forests can continue to thrive and provide the myriad of
benefits it is known to produce, and residential owners can be ensured
the peaceful enjoyment of their home that is the right of every
property owner and inherent in the American dream.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.09.020 and 2003 c 311 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to
test the results of actions taken so that the management and related
policy can be changed promptly and appropriately.
(2) "Appeals board" means the forest practices appeals board
created by RCW 76.09.210.
(3) "Aquatic resources" includes water quality, salmon, other
species of the vertebrate classes Cephalaspidomorphi and Osteichthyes
identified in the forests and fish report, the Columbia torrent
salamander (Rhyacotriton kezeri), the Cascade torrent salamander
(Rhyacotriton cascadae), the Olympic torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton
olympian), the Dunn's salamander (Plethodon dunni), the Van Dyke's
salamander (Plethodon vandyke), the tailed frog (Ascaphus truei), and
their respective habitats.
(4) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(5) "Contiguous" means land adjoining or touching by common corner
or otherwise. Land having common ownership divided by a road or other
right-of-way shall be considered contiguous.
(6) "Conversion to a use other than commercial timber operation"
means a bona fide conversion to an active use which is incompatible
with timber growing and as may be defined by forest practices rules.
(7) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(8) "Fish passage barrier" means any artificial instream structure
that impedes the free passage of fish.
(9) "Forest land" means all land which is capable of supporting a
merchantable stand of timber and is not being actively used for a use
which is incompatible with timber growing. Forest land does not
include agricultural land that is or was enrolled in the conservation
reserve enhancement program by contract if such agricultural land was
historically used for agricultural purposes and the landowner intends
to continue to use the land for agricultural purposes in the future.
As it applies to the operation of the road maintenance and abandonment
plan element of the forest practices rules on small forest landowners,
the term "forest land" excludes:
(a) Residential home sites, which may include up to five acres; and
(b) Cropfields, orchards, vineyards, pastures, feedlots, fish pens,
and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the production,
preparation, or sale of crops, fruit, dairy products, fish, and
livestock exist.
(10) "Forest landowner" means any person in actual control of
forest land, whether such control is based either on legal or equitable
title, or on any other interest entitling the holder to sell or
otherwise dispose of any or all of the timber on such land in any
manner. However, any lessee or other person in possession of forest
land without legal or equitable title to such land shall be excluded
from the definition of "forest landowner" unless such lessee or other
person has the right to sell or otherwise dispose of any or all of the
timber located on such forest land.
(11) "Forest practice" means any activity conducted on or directly
pertaining to forest land and relating to growing, harvesting, or
processing timber, including but not limited to:
(a) Road and trail construction;
(b) Harvesting, final and intermediate;
(c) Precommercial thinning;
(d) Reforestation;
(e) Fertilization;
(f) Prevention and suppression of diseases and insects;
(g) Salvage of trees; and
(h) Brush control.
"Forest practice" shall not include preparatory work such as tree
marking, surveying and road flagging, and removal or harvesting of
incidental vegetation from forest lands such as berries, ferns,
greenery, mistletoe, herbs, mushrooms, and other products which cannot
normally be expected to result in damage to forest soils, timber, or
public resources.
(12) "Forest practices rules" means any rules adopted pursuant to
RCW 76.09.040.
(13) "Forest road," as it applies to the operation of the road
maintenance and abandonment plan element of the forest practices rules
on small forest landowners, means a road or road segment that crosses
land that meets the definition of forest land, but excludes residential
access roads.
(14) "Forest trees" does not include hardwood trees cultivated by
agricultural methods in growing cycles shorter than fifteen years if
the trees were planted on land that was not in forest use immediately
before the trees were planted and before the land was prepared for
planting the trees. "Forest trees" includes Christmas trees, but does
not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural
methods, as that term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(15) "Forests and fish report" means the forests and fish report to
the board dated April 29, 1999.
(16) "Application" means the application required pursuant to RCW
76.09.050.
(17) "Operator" means any person engaging in forest practices
except an employee with wages as his or her sole compensation.
(18) "Person" means any individual, partnership, private, public,
or municipal corporation, county, the department or other state or
local governmental entity, or association of individuals of whatever
nature.
(19) "Public resources" means water, fish and wildlife, and in
addition shall mean capital improvements of the state or its political
subdivisions.
(20) "Residential interface forestry zone" means forest land that,
at the time a forest practice is conducted, is located within five
hundred yards of a shared common border with an individual parcel of
land five acres in size or smaller that contains a residential
structure not owned by the same person who owns the adjacent forest
land.
(21) "Small forest landowner" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 76.09.450.
(((21))) (22) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, of a
commercial species, including Christmas trees. However, "timber" does
not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural
methods, as that term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(((22))) (23) "Timber owner" means any person having all or any
part of the legal interest in timber. Where such timber is subject to
a contract of sale, "timber owner" shall mean the contract purchaser.
(((23))) (24) "Board" means the forest practices board created in
RCW 76.09.030.
(((24))) (25) "Unconfined avulsing channel migration zone" means
the area within which the active channel of an unconfined avulsing
stream is prone to move and where the movement would result in a
potential near-term loss of riparian forest adjacent to the stream.
Sizeable islands with productive timber may exist within the zone.
(((25))) (26) "Unconfined avulsing stream" means generally fifth
order or larger waters that experience abrupt shifts in channel
location, creating a complex floodplain characterized by extensive
gravel bars, disturbance species of vegetation of variable age,
numerous side channels, wall-based channels, oxbow lakes, and wetland
complexes. Many of these streams have dikes and levees that may
temporarily or permanently restrict channel movement.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.09.050 and 2005 c 146 s 1003 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish by rule which forest practices shall
be included within each of the following classes:
Class I: Minimal or specific forest practices that have no direct
potential for damaging a public resource and that may be conducted
without submitting an application or a notification except that when
the regulating authority is transferred to a local governmental entity,
those Class I forest practices that involve timber harvesting or road
construction within "urban growth areas," designated pursuant to
chapter 36.70A RCW, are processed as Class IV forest practices, but are
not subject to environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW;
Class II: Forest practices which have a less than ordinary
potential for damaging a public resource that may be conducted without
submitting an application and may, except for forest land located in a
residential interface forestry zone, begin five calendar days, or such
lesser time as the department may determine, after written notification
by the operator, in the manner, content, and form as prescribed by the
department, is received by the department. ((However, the)) Class II
forest practices may not be conducted within a residential interface
forestry zone until thirty days have passed since the forest landowner
provided notification to the department and to all residential
landowners located adjacent to the residential interface forestry zone
via United States mail or hand delivery. Work inside or outside of a
residential interface forestry zone may not begin until all forest
practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065 have been received by the
department. Class II shall not include forest practices:
(a) On lands platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter
58.17 RCW or on lands that have or are being converted to another use;
(b) Which require approvals under the provisions of the hydraulics
act, RCW 77.55.021;
(c) Within "shorelines of the state" as defined in RCW 90.58.030;
(d) Excluded from Class II by the board; or
(e) Including timber harvesting or road construction within "urban
growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, which are
Class IV;
Class III: Forest practices other than those contained in Class I,
II, or IV. A Class III application must be approved or disapproved by
the department within thirty calendar days from the date the department
receives the application. However, the applicant may not begin work on
that forest practice until all forest practice fees required under RCW
76.09.065 have been received by the department, and for Class III
forest practices located within a residential interface forestry zone
only, until thirty days have passed since the forest landowner provided
notification of the department's approval to all residential landowners
located adjacent to the residential interface forestry zone via United
States mail or hand delivery;
Class IV: Forest practices other than those contained in Class I
or II: (a) On lands platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in
chapter 58.17 RCW, (b) on lands that have or are being converted to
another use, (c) on lands which, pursuant to RCW 76.09.070 as now or
hereafter amended, are not to be reforested because of the likelihood
of future conversion to urban development, (d) involving timber
harvesting or road construction on lands that are contained within
"urban growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, except
where the forest landowner provides: (i) A written statement of intent
signed by the forest landowner not to convert to a use other than
commercial forest product operations for ten years, accompanied by
either a written forest management plan acceptable to the department or
documentation that the land is enrolled under the provisions of chapter
84.33 RCW; or (ii) a conversion option harvest plan approved by the
local governmental entity and submitted to the department as part of
the application, and/or (e) which have a potential for a substantial
impact on the environment and therefore require an evaluation by the
department as to whether or not a detailed statement must be prepared
pursuant to the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW.
Such evaluation shall be made within ten days from the date the
department receives the application: PROVIDED, That nothing herein
shall be construed to prevent any local or regional governmental entity
from determining that a detailed statement must be prepared for an
action pursuant to a Class IV forest practice taken by that
governmental entity concerning the land on which forest practices will
be conducted. A Class IV application must be approved or disapproved
by the department within thirty calendar days from the date the
department receives the application, unless the department determines
that a detailed statement must be made, in which case the application
must be approved or disapproved by the department within sixty calendar
days from the date the department receives the application, unless the
commissioner of public lands, through the promulgation of a formal
order, determines that the process cannot be completed within such
period. However, the applicant may not begin work on that forest
practice until all forest practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065
have been received by the department, and for Class IV forest practices
located within a residential interface forestry zone only, until thirty
days have passed since the forest landowner provided notification of
the department's approval to all residential landowners located
adjacent to the residential interface forestry zone via United States
mail or hand delivery.
Forest practices under Classes I, II, and III are exempt from the
requirements for preparation of a detailed statement under the state
environmental policy act.
(2) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, no Class
II, Class III, or Class IV forest practice shall be commenced or
continued after January 1, 1975, unless the department has received a
notification with regard to a Class II forest practice or approved an
application with regard to a Class III or Class IV forest practice
containing all information required by RCW 76.09.060 as now or
hereafter amended. However, in the event forest practices regulations
necessary for the scheduled implementation of this chapter and RCW
90.48.420 have not been adopted in time to meet such schedules, the
department shall have the authority to regulate forest practices and
approve applications on such terms and conditions consistent with this
chapter and RCW 90.48.420 and the purposes and policies of RCW
76.09.010 until applicable forest practices regulations are in effect.
(3) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, if a
notification or application is delivered in person to the department by
the operator or the operator's agent, the department shall immediately
provide a dated receipt thereof and, for applications affecting a
residential interface forestry zone only, mail notification of the
application to all residential landowners located adjacent to the
residential interface forestry zone via United States mail or hand
delivery. In all other cases, the department shall immediately mail a
dated receipt to the operator and, for applications affecting a
residential interface forestry zone only, mail notification of the
application to all residential landowners located adjacent to the
residential interface forestry zone via United States mail or hand
delivery.
(4) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter or
occurring within a residential interface forestry zone, forest
practices shall be conducted in accordance with the forest practices
regulations, orders and directives as authorized by this chapter or the
forest practices regulations, and the terms and conditions of any
approved applications. For forest practices occurring within a
residential interface forestry zone, any regulations, orders, or
directives promulgated by the local government also apply to the forest
practice. Except when water quality will be affected, in instances
where the terms of this chapter are inconsistent with locally
promulgated regulations, the forest practice in question is governed by
the local regulation.
(5) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, the
department of natural resources shall notify the applicant in writing
of either its approval of the application or its disapproval of the
application and the specific manner in which the application fails to
comply with the provisions of this section or with the forest practices
regulations. Except as provided otherwise in this section, if the
department fails to either approve or disapprove an application or any
portion thereof within the applicable time limit, the application shall
be deemed approved and the operation may be commenced: PROVIDED, That
this provision shall not apply to applications which are neither
approved nor disapproved pursuant to the provisions of subsection (7)
of this section: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That if seasonal field conditions
prevent the department from being able to properly evaluate the
application, the department may issue an approval conditional upon
further review within sixty days: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
department shall have until April 1, 1975, to approve or disapprove an
application involving forest practices allowed to continue to April 1,
1975, under the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. Upon
receipt of any notification or any satisfactorily completed application
the department shall in any event no later than two business days after
such receipt transmit a copy to the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife, and to the county, city, or town in whose jurisdiction the
forest practice is to be commenced. Any comments by such agencies
shall be directed to the department of natural resources.
(6) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, if the county, city, or town believes that an application
is inconsistent with this chapter, the forest practices regulations, or
any local authority consistent with RCW 76.09.240 as now or hereafter
amended, it may so notify the department and the applicant, specifying
its objections.
(7) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, the department shall not approve portions of applications
to which a county, city, or town objects if:
(a) The department receives written notice from the county, city,
or town of such objections within fourteen business days from the time
of transmittal of the application to the county, city, or town, or one
day before the department acts on the application, whichever is later;
and
(b) The objections relate to lands either:
(i) Platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17
RCW; or
(ii) On lands that have or are being converted to another use.
The department shall either disapprove those portions of such
application or appeal the county, city, or town objections to the
appeals board. If the objections related to subparagraphs (b)(i) and
(ii) of this subsection are based on local authority consistent with
RCW 76.09.240 as now or hereafter amended, the department shall
disapprove the application until such time as the county, city, or town
consents to its approval or such disapproval is reversed on appeal.
The applicant shall be a party to all department appeals of county,
city, or town objections. Unless the county, city, or town either
consents or has waived its rights under this subsection, the department
shall not approve portions of an application affecting such lands until
the minimum time for county, city, or town objections has expired.
(8) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, in addition to any rights under the above paragraph, the
county, city, or town may appeal any department approval of an
application with respect to any lands within its jurisdiction. The
appeals board may suspend the department's approval in whole or in part
pending such appeal where there exists potential for immediate and
material damage to a public resource.
(9) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, appeals under this section shall be made to the appeals
board in the manner and time provided in RCW 76.09.220(8). In such
appeals there shall be no presumption of correctness of either the
county, city, or town or the department position.
(10) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, the department shall, within four business days notify the
county, city, or town of all notifications, approvals, and disapprovals
of an application affecting lands within the county, city, or town,
except to the extent the county, city, or town has waived its right to
such notice.
(11) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, a county, city, or town may waive in whole or in part its
rights under this section, and may withdraw or modify any such waiver,
at any time by written notice to the department.
(12) Notwithstanding subsections (2) through (5) of this section,
forest practices applications or notifications are not required for
exotic insect and disease control operations conducted in accordance
with RCW 76.09.060(8) where eradication can reasonably be expected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The intent of the residential interface forestry zone notification
requirements in RCW 76.09.050 is for residential landowners who are
potentially affected by a forest practice to have notice and time to
assess the impact of the forest practice on their land, notify all
affected parties of any potential hazards, and provide an opportunity
for the landowner to express his or her concerns. The department shall
provide a forum by which affected residential landowners may express
their concerns, and serve as an intermediary between the residential
landowner and the forest landowner in an attempt to ease the concerns
of both parties.

Sec. 5 RCW 76.09.070 and 2007 c 106 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After the completion of a logging operation, satisfactory
reforestation, as defined by the rules and regulations promulgated by
the board, shall be completed within three years except for land
located within a residential interface forestry zone, where
satisfactory reforestation must be completed within one year. However,
for land located either inside or outside of a residential interface
forestry zone:
(a) A longer period may be authorized if seed or seedlings are not
available;
(b) A period of up to five years may be allowed where a natural
regeneration plan is approved by the department; and
(c) The department may identify low-productivity lands on which it
may allow for a period of up to ten years for natural regeneration.
(2)(a) Upon the completion of a reforestation operation a report on
such operation shall be filed with the department of natural resources.
(b) Within twelve months of receipt of such a report the department
shall inspect the reforestation operation, and shall determine either
that the reforestation operation has been properly completed or that
further reforestation and inspection is necessary.
(3) Satisfactory reforestation is the obligation of the owner of
the land as defined by forest practices regulations, except the owner
of perpetual rights to cut timber owned separately from the land is
responsible for satisfactory reforestation. The reforestation
obligation shall become the obligation of a new owner if the land or
perpetual timber rights are sold or otherwise transferred.
(4)(a) Prior to the sale or transfer of land or perpetual timber
rights subject to a reforestation obligation or to a notice of
conversion to a nonforestry use issued under RCW 76.09.060, the seller
shall notify the buyer of the existence and nature of the obligation
and the buyer shall sign a notice indicating the buyer's knowledge of
all obligations.
(b) The notice shall be on a form prepared by the department and
shall be sent to the department by the seller at the time of sale or
transfer of the land or perpetual timber rights.
(c) If the seller fails to notify the buyer about the reforestation
obligation or the notice of conversion to a nonforestry use, the seller
shall pay the buyer's costs related to reforestation or mitigation
under RCW 76.09.470, including all legal costs which include reasonable
attorneys' fees, incurred by the buyer in enforcing the reforestation
obligation or mitigation requirements against the seller.
(d) Failure by the seller to send the required notice to the
department at the time of sale shall be prima facie evidence, in an
action by the buyer against the seller for costs related to
reforestation or mitigation, that the seller did not notify the buyer
of the reforestation obligation or potential mitigation requirements
prior to sale.
(5) The forest practices regulations may provide alternatives to or
limitations on the applicability of reforestation requirements with
respect to forest lands being converted in whole or in part to another
use which is compatible with timber growing. The forest practices
regulations may identify classifications and/or areas of forest land
that have the likelihood of future conversion to urban development
within a ten year period. The reforestation requirements may be
modified or eliminated on such lands. However, such identification
and/or such conversion to urban development must be consistent with any
local or regional land use plans or ordinances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, and in addition
to any other applicable requirements of this chapter, any forest
practices conducted within a residential interface forestry zone may
only be approved by the department or otherwise considered lawful if a
one hundred foot buffer of existing vegetation is maintained in the
residential interface forestry zone forest along any property lines
shared with an individual parcel of land five acres in size or smaller
that contains a residential structure not owned by the same person who
owns the adjacent forest land.
(2) The forest landowner must leave the first fifty feet from the
shared property line in an undisturbed state. The area of the buffer
located more than fifty feet, but less than seventy-five feet, from the
shared property line may only be harvested to fifty percent of the
preexisting forest density, and the area of the buffer located more
than seventy-five feet from the shared property line may only be
harvested to seventy-five percent of the preexisting forest density.
(3) The department may waive or modify the application of this
section for a particular forest landowner if the buffer distances
required by this section would affect more than twenty-five percent of
the forest landowner's contiguous ownership. All adjacent residential
landowners must be provided with notice and an opportunity to comment
before the department issues any waiver or modification of the
requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to any other applicable requirements of this chapter,
the following requirements apply to any forest practices conducted
within a residential interface forestry zone forest:
(1) All work envisioned on the forest practices notification or
application must be completed as quickly and efficiently as reasonably
possible. The application or notification must include a timeline on
which the work will be completed. A violation of the timeline
represents a violation of the forest practices application and this
chapter.
(2) Forestry operations may only occur between the times of 7:00
a.m. and 5:00 p.m. on weekdays, and 9:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. on
Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays recognized in RCW 1.16.050.
(3) If burn piles are to be used to clear the land, all burn piles
must be located on the farthest, safe part of the harvest area from the
shared property line, and must be preceded with notification via United
States mail or hand delivery of potential burn days and times to all
residential property owners within a one mile area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 84.33 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The appraised value of any timber required to be left standing
in a residential interface forestry zone buffer by section 6 of this
act, that would otherwise be eligible for harvest by the landowner, is
available as a credit against taxes due under this chapter for the
harvest triggering the provisions of section 6 of this act.
(2) The amount of credit allowed under this section may not exceed
the amount of taxes due under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The code reviser is directed to put the
defined terms in RCW 76.09.020 in alphabetical order.

--- END ---