BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state of Washington has set high
expectations for its public school students and its school districts.
Washington state currently ranks forty-seventh in the nation in its
student:teacher ratio. Washington cannot expect to be competitive with
other states and other nations with such low rankings. Meeting high
expectations will require additional investments in public schools.
The purpose of this act is to improve public education by enabling
learner-focused education through smaller class sizes in the early
grades. Studies show that smaller classes in the early grades can
significantly increase the amount of learning that takes place in the
classroom. Significant class size reductions will provide children
with more individualized instruction and the attention they need and
lead to better results.
The state's long-term goal is to reduce class size in grades
kindergarten through three to no more than seventeen students per
teacher in a class by the 2013-14 school year.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2006 c 263 s 322 are each amended to
read as follows:
The basic education allocation for each annual average full-time
equivalent student shall be determined in accordance with the following
procedures:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula based on a ratio of students
to staff for the distribution of a basic education allocation for each
annual average full-time equivalent student enrolled in a common
school. The distribution formula shall have the primary objective of
equalizing educational opportunities and shall provide appropriate
recognition of the following costs among the various districts within
the state:
(a) Certificated instructional staff and their related costs;
(b) Certificated administrative staff and their related costs;
(c) Classified staff and their related costs;
(d) Nonsalary costs;
(e) Extraordinary costs, including school facilities, of remote and
necessary schools as judged by the superintendent of public
instruction, with recommendations from the school facilities citizen
advisory panel under RCW 28A.525.025, and small high schools, including
costs of additional certificated and classified staff; and
(f) The attendance of students pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and
28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district.
(2)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall
be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature. The formula shall be for allocation
purposes only, except as provided in (c) of this subsection. While the
legislature intends that the allocations for additional instructional
staff be used to increase the ratio of such staff to students, nothing
in this section shall require districts to reduce the number of
administrative staff below existing levels.
(b) The formula adopted by the legislature shall reflect the
following ratios at a minimum: (i) Forty-nine certificated
instructional staff to one thousand annual average full-time equivalent
students enrolled in grades kindergarten through three; (ii) forty-six
certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average
full-time equivalent students in grades four through twelve; (iii) four
certificated administrative staff to one thousand annual average
full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through twelve;
and (iv) sixteen and sixty-seven one-hundredths classified personnel to
one thousand annual average full-time equivalent students enrolled in
grades kindergarten through twelve.
(c) In addition to the base allocation in (b)(i) of this
subsection, additional certificated instructional staff shall be
allocated only if the district documents an actual ratio in grades
kindergarten through three equal to or greater than the sum of the base
allocation in (b)(i) of this subsection and any allocation provided in
(c)(i) through (vi) of this subsection for the applicable year. The
additional funds allocated under this subsection (2)(c) may be used to
provide improvements or additions to facilities directly related to
class size reductions in grades kindergarten through three. The
allocation in this subsection (2)(c) per one thousand annual average
full-time equivalent students enrolled in grades kindergarten through
three shall be as follows: (i) For the 2008-09 school year, an
additional six and ninety-five one-hundredths certificated
instructional staff; (ii) for the 2009-10 school year, an additional
nine and seven-tenths certificated instructional staff; (iii) for the
2010-11 school year, an additional twelve and forty-five one-hundredths
certificated instructional staff; (iv) for the 2011-12 school year, an
additional fifteen and nineteen one-hundredths certificated
instructional staff; (v) for the 2012-13 school year, an additional
seventeen and ninety-three one-hundredths certificated instructional
staff; (vi) for the 2013-14 school year and thereafter, an additional
twenty and sixty-nine one-hundredths certificated instructional staff.
(d) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect: PROVIDED, That the distribution formula developed
pursuant to this section shall be for state apportionment and
equalization purposes only and shall not be construed as mandating
specific operational functions of local school districts other than
those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 and
28A.150.100. The enrollment of any district shall be the annual
average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students
as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of
each month and shall exclude full-time equivalent students with
disabilities recognized for the purposes of allocation of state funds
for programs under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100. The definition
of full-time equivalent student shall be determined by rules of the
superintendent of public instruction: PROVIDED, That the definition
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any revision of the present
definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the office of financial management shall make
a monthly review of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent
students in the common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.
(3)(a) Certificated instructional staff shall include those persons
employed by a school district who are nonsupervisory employees within
the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(8): PROVIDED, That in exceptional cases,
people of unusual competence but without certification may teach
students so long as a certificated person exercises general
supervision: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the hiring of such classified
people shall not occur during a labor dispute and such classified
people shall not be hired to replace certificated employees during a
labor dispute.
(b) Certificated administrative staff shall include all those
persons who are chief executive officers, chief administrative
officers, confidential employees, supervisors, principals, or assistant
principals within the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(4).

--- END ---