BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
uniform real property electronic recording act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Document" means information that is:
(a) Inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an
electronic or other medium, and is retrievable in perceivable form; and
(b) Eligible to be recorded in the land records maintained by the
recording officer.
(2) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical,
digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar
capabilities.
(3) "Electronic document" means a document that is received by the
recording officer in an electronic form.
(4) "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or
process attached to or logically associated with a document and
executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the document.
(5) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, public corporation, government, or governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
(6) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.
(7) "E-recording standards commission" means the body of
stakeholders appointed by the secretary of state to review electronic
recording standards and make recommendations to the secretary under
section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) If a law requires, as a condition for
recording, that a document be an original, be on paper or another
tangible medium, or be in writing, the requirement is satisfied by an
electronic document satisfying this chapter.
(2) If a law requires, as a condition for recording, that a
document be signed, the requirement is satisfied by an electronic
signature.
(3) A requirement that a document or a signature associated with a
document be notarized, acknowledged, verified, witnessed, or made under
oath is satisfied if the electronic signature of the person authorized
to perform that act, and all other information required to be included,
is attached to or logically associated with the document or signature.
A physical or electronic image of a stamp, impression, or seal need not
accompany an electronic signature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) In this section, "paper document" means
a document that is received by the recording officer in a form that is
not electronic.
(2) A recording officer:
(a) Who performs any of the functions listed in this section shall
do so in compliance with the rules adopted by the secretary of state
for the electronic recording of documents;
(b) May receive, index, store, archive, and transmit electronic
documents;
(c) May provide for access to, and for search and retrieval of,
documents and information by electronic means;
(d) Who accepts electronic documents for recording shall continue
to accept paper documents as authorized by state law and shall place
entries for both types of documents in the same index;
(e) May convert paper documents accepted for recording into
electronic form;
(f) May convert information previously recorded into electronic
form;
(g) May, after receiving approval pursuant to RCW 36.29.190, accept
electronically any fee or tax that the recording officer is authorized
to collect;
(h) May agree with other officials of a state, or a political
subdivision thereof, or of the United States, on procedures or
processes to facilitate the electronic satisfaction of prior approvals
and conditions precedent to recording and the electronic payment of
fees or taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The office of the secretary of state shall
create and appoint an e-recording standards commission. The e-recording standards commission shall review electronic recording
standards and make recommendations to the secretary of state for rules
necessary to implement this chapter. A majority of the commission must
be county recorders or auditors. The commission may include assessors,
treasurers, land title company representatives, escrow agents, and
mortgage brokers, the state archivist, and any other party the
secretary of state deems appropriate. The term of the commissioners
will be set by the secretary of state.
To keep the standards and practices of recording officers in this
state in harmony with the standards and practices of recording offices
in other jurisdictions that enact this chapter and to keep the
technology used by recording officers in this state compatible with
technology used by recording offices in other jurisdictions that enact
this chapter, the office of the secretary of state, so far as is
consistent with the purposes, policies, and provisions of this chapter,
in adopting, amending, and repealing standards shall consider:
(1) The standards and practices of other jurisdictions;
(2) The most recent standards adopted by national standard-setting
bodies, such as the property records industry association;
(3) The views of interested persons and governmental officials and
entities;
(4) The needs of counties of varying size, population, and
resources; and
(5) Standards requiring adequate information security protection to
ensure that electronic documents are accurate, authentic, adequately
preserved, and resistant to tampering.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 In applying and construing this chapter,
consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the
law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact a
uniform real property electronic recording act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This chapter modifies, limits, and
supersedes the federal electronic signatures in global and national
commerce act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001, et seq.) but does not modify, limit,
or supersede section 101(c) of that act or authorize electronic
delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 65 RCW.

--- END ---