BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the legislature's intent to ensure
that sex offenders receive accurate sentences that are based on their
actual, complete criminal history. Accurate sentences further the
sentencing reform act's goals of:
(1) Ensuring that the punishment for a criminal offense is
proportionate to the seriousness of the offense and the sex offender's
criminal history;
(2) Ensuring punishment that is just; and
(3) Ensuring that sentences are commensurate with the punishment
imposed on others for committing similar offenses.
Given the decisions in In re Cadwallader, 155 Wn.2d 867 (2005);
State v. Lopez, 147 Wn.2d 515 (2002); State v. Ford, 137 Wn.2d 472
(1999); and State v. McCorkle, 137 Wn.2d 490 (1999), the legislature
finds it is necessary to amend the provisions in RCW 9.94A.441,
9.94A.500, 9.94A.525, 9.94A.530, and 9.94A.585 in order to ensure that
sentences imposed accurately reflect the sex offender's actual,
complete criminal history, whether imposed at sentencing or upon
resentencing. These amendments are consistent with the United States
supreme court holding in Monge v. California, 524 U.S. 721 (1998), that
double jeopardy is not implicated at resentencing following an appeal
or collateral attack.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.441 and 1981 c 137 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The prosecuting attorney and the defendant shall each provide the
court with their understanding of what the defendant's criminal history
is prior to a plea of guilty pursuant to a plea agreement. If the
defendant charged with a sex offense fails to affirmatively set forth
his or her understanding of his or her criminal history, he or she
shall be deemed to have admitted that the prosecuting attorney's
statement of his or her criminal history is correct. All disputed
issues as to criminal history shall be decided at the sentencing
hearing.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.500 and 2006 c 339 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before imposing a sentence upon a defendant, the court shall
conduct a sentencing hearing. The sentencing hearing shall be held
within forty court days following conviction. Upon the motion of
either party for good cause shown, or on its own motion, the court may
extend the time period for conducting the sentencing hearing.
Except in cases where the defendant shall be sentenced to a term of
total confinement for life without the possibility of release or, when
authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for the crime of aggravated murder in the
first degree, sentenced to death, the court may order the department to
complete a risk assessment report. If available before sentencing, the
report shall be provided to the court.
Unless specifically waived by the court, the court shall order the
department to complete a chemical dependency screening report before
imposing a sentence upon a defendant who has been convicted of a
violation of the uniform controlled substances act under chapter 69.50
RCW, a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter
9A.28 RCW, or any felony where the court finds that the offender has a
chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense. In
addition, the court shall, at the time of plea or conviction, order the
department to complete a presentence report before imposing a sentence
upon a defendant who has been convicted of a felony sexual offense.
The department of corrections shall give priority to presentence
investigations for sexual offenders. If the court determines that the
defendant may be a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
although the defendant has not established that at the time of the
crime he or she lacked the capacity to commit the crime, was
incompetent to commit the crime, or was insane at the time of the
crime, the court shall order the department to complete a presentence
report before imposing a sentence.
The court shall consider the risk assessment report and presentence
reports, if any, including any victim impact statement and criminal
history, and allow arguments from the prosecutor, the defense counsel,
the offender, the victim, the survivor of the victim, or a
representative of the victim or survivor, and an investigative law
enforcement officer as to the sentence to be imposed.
A criminal history summary relating to a defendant charged with a
sex offense from the prosecuting authority or from a state, federal, or
foreign governmental agency shall be prima facie evidence of the
existence and validity of the convictions listed therein. The
defendant shall be allowed to rebut such proof with competent evidence.
If the court is satisfied by a preponderance of the evidence that the
defendant has a criminal history, the court shall specify the
convictions it has found to exist. All of this information shall be
part of the record. Copies of all risk assessment reports and
presentence reports presented to the sentencing court and all written
findings of facts and conclusions of law as to sentencing entered by
the court shall be sent to the department by the clerk of the court at
the conclusion of the sentencing and shall accompany the offender if
the offender is committed to the custody of the department. Court
clerks shall provide, without charge, certified copies of documents
relating to criminal convictions requested by prosecuting attorneys.
(2) To prevent wrongful disclosure of information related to mental
health services, as defined in RCW 71.05.445 and 71.34.345, a court may
take only those steps necessary during a sentencing hearing or any
hearing in which the department presents information related to mental
health services to the court. The steps may be taken on motion of the
defendant, the prosecuting attorney, or on the court's own motion. The
court may seal the portion of the record relating to information
relating to mental health services, exclude the public from the hearing
during presentation or discussion of information relating to mental
health services, or grant other relief to achieve the result intended
by this subsection, but nothing in this subsection shall be construed
to prevent the subsequent release of information related to mental
health services as authorized by RCW 71.05.445, 71.34.345, or
72.09.585. Any person who otherwise is permitted to attend any hearing
pursuant to chapter 7.69 or 7.69A RCW shall not be excluded from the
hearing solely because the department intends to disclose or discloses
information related to mental health services.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.525 and 2007 c 199 s 8 and 2007 c 116 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the
sentencing grid. The offender score rules are as follows:
The offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section
rounded down to the nearest whole number.
(1) A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date
of sentencing for the offense for which the offender score is being
computed. Convictions entered or sentenced on the same date as the
conviction for which the offender score is being computed shall be
deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.589.
(2)(a) Class A and sex prior felony convictions shall always be
included in the offender score.
(b) Class B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall
not be included in the offender score, if since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment)
pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and
sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(c) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, class C prior
felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the
offender score if, since the last date of release from confinement
(including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had
spent five consecutive years in the community without committing any
crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(d) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, serious traffic
convictions shall not be included in the offender score if, since the
last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of
judgment and sentence, the offender spent five years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(e) If the present conviction is felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)), prior convictions
of felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, felony physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, and serious traffic
offenses shall be included in the offender score if: (i) The prior
convictions were committed within five years since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment) or
entry of judgment and sentence; or (ii) the prior convictions would be
considered "prior offenses within ten years" as defined in RCW
46.61.5055.
(f) This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior
convictions.
(3) Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified
according to the comparable offense definitions and sentences provided
by Washington law. Federal convictions for offenses shall be
classified according to the comparable offense definitions and
sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no clearly
comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the
offense shall be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a
felony under the relevant federal statute.
(4) Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses
(attempts, criminal solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same
as if they were convictions for completed offenses.
(5)(a) In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose
of computing the offender score, count all convictions separately,
except:
(i) Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), to
encompass the same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense,
the offense that yields the highest offender score. The current
sentencing court shall determine with respect to other prior adult
offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or prior juvenile
offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether those
offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), and
if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The
current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses
were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate
dates, or in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate
complaints, indictments, or informations;
(ii) In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses
committed before July 1, 1986, for the purpose of computing the
offender score, count all adult convictions served concurrently as one
offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the same date as
one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.
(b) As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means
that: (i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to
the former; (ii) the concurrent relationship of the sentences was
judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent timing of the sentences
was not the result of a probation or parole revocation on the former
offense.
(6) If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses
of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior
conviction as if the present conviction were for a completed offense.
When these convictions are used as criminal history, score them the
same as a completed crime.
(7) If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not
covered by subsection (11), (12), or (13) of this section, count one
point for each adult prior felony conviction and one point for each
juvenile prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point for each
juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.
(8) If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not
covered in subsection (9), (10), (11), (12), or (13) of this section,
count two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent felony
conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent felony
conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony
conviction.
(9) If the present conviction is for a serious violent offense,
count three points for prior adult and juvenile convictions for crimes
in this category, two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent
conviction (not already counted), one point for each prior adult
nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.
(10) If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior
convictions as in subsection (8) of this section; however count two
points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or residential burglary
conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction.
(11) If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense
count two points for each adult or juvenile prior conviction for
Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each felony offense count
one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior
conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for
an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each
adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction; count one point
for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction for
operation of a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug.
(12) If the present conviction is for homicide by watercraft or
assault by watercraft count two points for each adult or juvenile prior
conviction for homicide by watercraft or assault by watercraft; for
each felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for
each juvenile prior conviction; count one point for each adult and 1/2
point for each juvenile prior conviction for driving under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, actual physical control
of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or operation of a vessel while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(13) If the present conviction is for manufacture of
methamphetamine count three points for each adult prior manufacture of
methamphetamine conviction and two points for each juvenile manufacture
of methamphetamine offense. If the present conviction is for a drug
offense and the offender has a criminal history that includes a sex
offense or serious violent offense, count three points for each adult
prior felony drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile
drug offense. All other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in
subsection (8) of this section if the current drug offense is violent,
or as in subsection (7) of this section if the current drug offense is
nonviolent.
(14) If the present conviction is for Escape from Community
Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions in the
offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one point and
juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.
(15) If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or
Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as one point and
juvenile prior convictions as 1/2 point.
(16) If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential
burglary, count priors as in subsection (7) of this section; however,
count two points for each adult and juvenile prior Burglary 1
conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary 2 or residential
burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior Burglary 2
or residential burglary conviction.
(17) If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count priors
as in subsections (7) through (11) and (13) through (16) of this
section; however count three points for each adult and juvenile prior
sex offense conviction.
(18) If the present conviction is for failure to register as a sex
offender under RCW 9A.44.130(((10))) (11), count priors as in
subsections (7) through (11) and (13) through (16) of this section;
however count three points for each adult and juvenile prior sex
offense conviction, excluding prior convictions for failure to register
as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130(((10))) (11), which shall count
as one point.
(19) If the present conviction is for an offense committed while
the offender was under community placement, add one point.
(20) If the present conviction is for Theft of a Motor Vehicle,
Possession of a Stolen Vehicle, Taking a Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2, count
priors as in subsections (7) through (18) of this section; however
count one point for prior convictions of Vehicle Prowling 2, and three
points for each adult and juvenile prior Theft 1 (of a motor vehicle),
Theft 2 (of a motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property 1 (of a
motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property 2 (of a motor vehicle),
Theft of a Motor Vehicle, Possession of a Stolen Vehicle, Taking a
Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 conviction.
(21) The fact that a prior conviction was not included in an
offender's offender score or criminal history at a previous sentencing
shall have no bearing on whether it is included in the criminal history
or offender score for the current offense. ((Accordingly,)) Prior
convictions that were not counted in the offender score or included in
criminal history under repealed or previous versions of the sentencing
reform act shall be included in criminal history and shall count in the
offender score if the current version of the sentencing reform act
requires including or counting those convictions. Prior convictions
that were not included in criminal history or in the offender score
shall be included upon resentencing for a sex offense to ensure
imposition of an accurate sentence.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.530 and 2005 c 68 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The intersection of the column defined by the offender score
and the row defined by the offense seriousness score determines the
standard sentence range (see RCW 9.94A.510, (Table 1) and RCW
9.94A.517, (Table 3)). The additional time for deadly weapon findings
or for other adjustments as specified in RCW 9.94A.533 shall be added
to the entire standard sentence range. The court may impose any
sentence within the range that it deems appropriate. All standard
sentence ranges are expressed in terms of total confinement.
(2) In determining any sentence other than a sentence above the
standard range, the trial court may rely on no more information than is
admitted by the plea agreement, or admitted, acknowledged, or proved in
a trial or at the time of sentencing, or proven pursuant to RCW
9.94A.537. Acknowledgment includes not objecting to information stated
in the presentence reports and, in the case of a defendant convicted of
a sex offense, not objecting to criminal history presented at the time
of sentencing. Where the defendant disputes material facts, the court
must either not consider the fact or grant an evidentiary hearing on
the point. The facts shall be deemed proved at the hearing by a
preponderance of the evidence, except as otherwise specified in RCW
9.94A.537. On remand for resentencing following appeal, or collateral
attack, on a conviction for a sex offense, the parties shall have the
opportunity to present and the court to consider all relevant evidence
regarding criminal history, including criminal history not previously
presented.
(3) In determining any sentence above the standard sentence range,
the court shall follow the procedures set forth in RCW 9.94A.537.
Facts that establish the elements of a more serious crime or additional
crimes may not be used to go outside the standard sentence range except
upon stipulation or when specifically provided for in RCW
9.94A.535(((2))) (3) (d), (e), (g), and (h).

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.585 and 2002 c 290 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sentence within the standard sentence range, under RCW
9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517, for an offense shall not be appealed. For
purposes of this section, a sentence imposed on a first-time offender
under RCW 9.94A.650 shall also be deemed to be within the standard
sentence range for the offense and shall not be appealed.
(2) A sentence outside the standard sentence range for the offense
is subject to appeal by the defendant or the state. In order to raise
any issue regarding sentencing for a sex offense on appeal, the issue
must first have been raised at the trial court level. The appeal shall
be to the court of appeals in accordance with rules adopted by the
supreme court.
(3) Pending review of the sentence, the sentencing court or the
court of appeals may order the defendant confined or placed on
conditional release, including bond.
(4) To reverse a sentence which is outside the standard sentence
range, the reviewing court must find: (a) Either that the reasons
supplied by the sentencing court are not supported by the record which
was before the judge or that those reasons do not justify a sentence
outside the standard sentence range for that offense; or (b) that the
sentence imposed was clearly excessive or clearly too lenient.
(5) A review under this section shall be made solely upon the
record that was before the sentencing court. Written briefs shall not
be required and the review and decision shall be made in an expedited
manner according to rules adopted by the supreme court.
(6) The court of appeals shall issue a written opinion in support
of its decision whenever the judgment of the sentencing court is
reversed and may issue written opinions in any other case where the
court believes that a written opinion would provide guidance to
sentencing courts and others in implementing this chapter and in
developing a common law of sentencing within the state.
(7) The department may petition for a review of a sentence
committing an offender to the custody or jurisdiction of the
department. The review shall be limited to errors of law. Such
petition shall be filed with the court of appeals no later than ninety
days after the department has actual knowledge of terms of the
sentence. The petition shall include a certification by the department
that all reasonable efforts to resolve the dispute at the superior
court level have been exhausted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 3 and 4 of this act apply to all
sentencings and resentencings for sex offenses commenced before, on, or
after the effective date of this section.

--- END ---