BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 When the legislature enacted chapter 471,
Laws of 1985, it intended to tax the business of making sales of
precious metal bullion the same as sales of other investment products.
The business and occupation tax was to be imposed on commissions, not
on the value of the investment product traded. Other activities
involving precious metal bullion, including reforming precious metal
bullion into smaller units, were not taxable.
However, the method of calculating business and occupation tax for
taxpayers engaged in both manufacturing and selling activities changed
after chapter 471, Laws of 1985 was enacted. In the judgment of the
department of revenue, this change caused the reforming of precious
metal bullion into smaller units in this state to be taxable under the
manufacturing business and occupation tax classification. It is the
intent of this act to reimplement the original intention of the
legislature and limit the business and occupation tax imposed on the
business of making sales of precious metal bullion to a tax on amounts
received as commissions and not to tax the activity of reforming
precious metal bullion into different shapes or sizes. It is also the
intent of the legislature that the business and occupation tax apply to
the markup on the sale of precious metal bullion, where the taxpayer is
selling its own precious metal bullion.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.062 and 1985 c 471 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter, "wholesale sale," "sale at
wholesale," "retail sale," and "sale at retail" do not include the sale
of precious metal bullion or monetized bullion.
(2) ((In computing tax under this chapter on the business of making
sales of precious metal bullion or monetized bullion, the tax shall be
imposed on the amounts received as commissions upon transactions for
the accounts of customers over and above the amount paid to other
dealers associated in such transactions, but no deduction or offset is
allowed on account of salaries or commissions paid to salesmen or other
employees.
(3))) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply to the melting
and reforming of precious metal bullion into different units.
(3) The sale of precious metal bullion or monetized bullion is
taxable under RCW 82.04.290(2) on amounts received:
(a) Over and above the market price for the bullion sold on the
date that the order for the bullion is received, regardless of whether
this markup is referred to as a commission, premium, spread, or some
other term. A deduction is allowed from the measure of tax for amounts
derived from charges to the buyer for shipping, handling, and
insurance, but only to the extent that the deduction does not exceed
the seller's actual expenditures to third parties for delivery of, and
insurance for, the bullion sold; and
(b) As commissions upon transactions for the accounts of customers
over and above the amount paid to other dealers or mints associated in
such transactions. No deduction or offset is allowed on account of
salaries or commissions paid to salespersons or other employees.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Market price" means the seller's highest publicly stated price
during a particular date for which the seller is willing to buy
precious metal bullion or monetized bullion. If no such publicly
stated price is available, current market price means the closing price
for the bullion on the New York mercantile exchange. For purposes of
this subsection (4)(a), "seller" means a person taxable under
subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(b) "Monetized bullion" means coins or other forms of money
manufactured from gold, silver, or other metals and that have been or
are used as a medium of exchange under the laws of this state, the
United States, or any foreign nation. "Monetized bullion" does not
include coins or money sold to be manufactured into jewelry or works of
art.
(c) "Precious metal bullion" means any precious metal ((which))
that: (i) Has been put through a process of smelting or refining,
including, but not limited to, gold, silver, platinum group metals,
((rhodium, and palladium,)) and rare earth metals; and ((which)) (ii)
is in such state or condition that its value depends upon its contents
and not upon its form. ((For purposes of this section, "monetized
bullion" means coins or other forms of money manufactured from gold,
silver, or other metals and heretofore, now, or hereafter used as a
medium of exchange under the laws of this state, the United States, or
any foreign nation, but does not include coins or money sold to be
manufactured into jewelry or works of art.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies both retroactively and
prospectively.

--- END ---