BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.48.030 and 1941 c 87 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the filing of such petition for an order of dissolution, the
superior court shall enter an order setting the same for hearing at a
date not less than thirty days from the date of filing, and the ((clerk
of the court of said county)) petitioner shall give notice of such
hearing by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county in which the district is located once a week for three
successive weeks, and by posting in three public places in the county
in which the district is located at least twenty-one days before said
hearing. At least one notice shall be posted in the district. The
notices shall set forth the filing of the petition, its purpose and the
date and place of the hearing thereon.

Sec. 2 RCW 53.48.070 and 1941 c 87 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((clerk)) petitioner shall give notice of the second hearing by
publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in
which the district is located once a week for three successive weeks,
and by posting in three public places in the county in which the
district is located at least twenty-one days before the hearing, and
shall give such other notice to creditors and other interested parties
as the court may deem necessary or advisable. At least one notice
shall be posted in the district. The notices shall set forth the
filing of the petition, its purpose, the finding of the court on the
petition, the date and place of the second hearing and the purpose of
the hearing as stated in RCW 53.48.060.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.34.080 and 2000 c 122 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court shall direct the ((clerk)) department of social and
health services to publish notice in a legal newspaper printed in the
county, qualified to publish summons, once a week for three consecutive
weeks, with the first publication of the notice to be at least twenty-five days prior to the date fixed for the hearing when it appears by
the petition or verified statement that:
(a)(i) The parent or guardian is a nonresident of this state; or
(ii) The name or place of residence or whereabouts of the parent or
guardian is unknown; and
(b) After due diligence, the person attempting service of the
summons or notice provided for in RCW 13.34.070 has been unable to make
service, and a copy of the notice has been deposited in the post
office, postage prepaid, directed to such person at his or her last
known place of residence. If the parent, guardian, or legal custodian
is believed to be a resident of another state or a county other than
the county in which the petition has been filed, notice also shall be
published in the county in which the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian is believed to reside.
(2) Publication may proceed simultaneously with efforts to provide
service in person or by mail, when the court determines there is reason
to believe that service in person or by mail will not be successful.
Notice shall be directed to the parent, parents, or other person
claiming the right to the custody of the child, if their names are
known. If their names are unknown, the phrase "To whom it may concern"
shall be used, apply to, and be binding upon, those persons whose names
are unknown. The name of the court, the name of the child (or children
if of one family), the date of the filing of the petition, the date of
hearing, and the object of the proceeding in general terms shall be set
forth. There shall be filed with the clerk an affidavit showing due
publication of the notice. The cost of publication shall be paid by
the ((county)) state at a rate not greater than the rate paid for other
legal notices. The publication of notice shall be deemed equivalent to
personal service upon all persons, known or unknown, who have been
designated as provided in this section.

--- END ---