BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.15.005 and 1991 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Trees and other woody vegetation are a necessary and important
part of community and urban environments. Community and urban forests
have many values and uses including promoting urban livability,
improving public health, sequestering carbon, conserving energy,
reducing air and water pollution and soil erosion, contributing to
property values, attracting business, reducing glare and noise,
providing aesthetic and historical values, providing wood products, and
affording comfort and protection for humans and wildlife.
(2) Well-managed and maintained community and urban forests
minimize catastrophic losses of life, property, and environmental
values due to floods, windstorms, ice storms, wildland fires, and other
natural disasters. Natural disasters, pest and disease infestations,
and lack of protection from human impacts pose significant threats to
the community and urban forests. Management and maintenance of
community and urban forests requires recognition of, and cooperation
with, public works and utilities department vegetation management
programs created to prevent vegetation from interfering with or
damaging public facilities and utilities. Urban forests provide
multiple benefits and their loss would result in major financial,
social, and environmental costs to Washington.
(3) As urban and community areas in Washington state grow, the need
to plan for and protect community and urban forests increases. Cities
and communities benefit from assistance in developing and maintaining
community and urban forestry programs that also address future growth.
(((3))) (4) Assistance and encouragement in establishment,
retention, and enhancement of these forests and trees by local
governments, citizens, organizations, and professionals are in the
interest of the state based on the contributions these forests make in
preserving and enhancing the quality of life of Washington's
municipalities and counties while providing opportunities for economic
development.
(5) An inventory and assessment of community and urban forest
conditions enables the department to identify and establish priorities
for actions necessary to preserve and enhance the public investment in
community and urban forest resources.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.15.020 and 1991 c 179 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((may)) shall establish and maintain a program
in community and urban forestry to accomplish the purpose stated in RCW
76.15.007. The department may assist municipalities and counties in
establishing and maintaining community and urban forestry programs and
encourage persons to engage in appropriate and improved tree management
and care.
(2) The department ((may)) shall advise, encourage, and assist
municipalities, counties, and other public and private entities: (a)
In the development and coordination of policies, programs, and
activities for the promotion of community and urban forestry; and (b)
in the recognition of, and for opportunities for cooperation with,
public works and utilities department vegetation management programs
created for the prevention of vegetation interfering with or damaging
public facilities and utilities.
(3) The department may appoint a committee or council, in addition
to the technical advisory committee created in section 3 of this act,
to advise the department in establishing and carrying out a program in
community and urban forestry.
(4) The department may assist municipal and county tree maintenance
programs by making surplus equipment available on loan where feasible
for community and urban forestry programs and cooperative projects.
(5)(a) The department shall, in collaboration with educational
institutions, municipalities, corporations, the technical advisory
committee created in section 3 of this act, state and national service
organizations, and environmental organizations, conduct a prioritized
statewide inventory of community and urban forests.
(b) For purposes of efficiency, existing data and current inventory
technologies must be utilized in the development of the inventory.
Statewide data must be maintained and periodically updated by the
department and made available to every municipality in the state.
(c) The criteria established for the statewide community and urban
forest inventory must support the planning needs of local governments.
(d) The criteria for the statewide community and urban forest
inventory may include but is not limited to: Tree size, species,
location, site appropriateness, condition and health, contribution to
canopy cover and volume, available planting spaces, and ecosystem,
economic, social, and monetary value.
(e) In developing the statewide community and urban forest
inventory, the department shall strive to enable Washington cities'
urban forest managers to access carbon markets by working to ensure the
inventory developed under this section is compatible with existing and
developing urban forest reporting protocols designed to facilitate
access to those carbon markets.
(6) The department shall, in collaboration with a statewide
organization representing urban and community forestry programs, and
with any statutorily required urban forestry stakeholder task force
managed by the department of community, trade, and economic
development, conduct an urban forest assessment and develop
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature to
improve community and urban forestry in Washington.
(7) The inventory and assessment required in this section must be
capable of supporting the adoption and implementation of urban forestry
management plans and ordinances that may be developed by local
governments.
(8) The department shall, in collaboration with municipalities, the
technical advisory committee created in section 3 of this act, and a
statewide organization representing urban and community forestry
programs, develop an implementation plan for the inventory and
assessment of the community and urban forests in Washington.
(9)(a) The criteria and implementation plan for the statewide
community and urban forest inventory and assessment required under this
section must be completed by December 1, 2008. Upon the completion of
the criteria and implementation plan's development, the department
shall report the final product to the appropriate committees of the
legislature. Subsequent annual reports must be submitted each December
until the statewide assessment required under this section is complete.
(b) An initial inventory and assessment, consisting of the
community and urban forests of the willing municipalities located in
one county located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and the
willing municipalities located in one county located west of the crest
of the Cascade mountains must be completed by June 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 76.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner of public lands shall appoint a technical
advisory committee to provide advice to the department during the
development of the criteria and implementation plan for the statewide
community and urban forest inventory and assessment required under RCW
76.15.020.
(2) The technical advisory committee must include, but not be
limited to, representatives from the following groups: Arborists;
municipal foresters; educators; consultants; researchers; public works
and utilities professionals; information technology specialists; and
other affiliated professionals.
(3) The technical advisory committee members shall serve without
compensation. Advisory committee members who are not state employees
may receive reimbursement for travel expenses as provided by RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Costs associated with the technical advisory
committee may be paid from the general fund appropriation made
available to the department for community and urban forestry.
(4) The technical advisory committee created in this section must
be disbanded by the commissioner of public lands upon the completion of
the criteria and implementation plan for the statewide community and
urban forest inventory and assessment required under RCW 76.15.020.

Sec. 4 RCW 76.15.010 and 2000 c 11 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Community and urban forest" is that land in and around human
settlements ranging from small communities to metropolitan areas,
occupied or potentially occupied by trees and associated vegetation.
Community and urban forest land may be planted or unplanted, used or
unused, and includes public and private lands, lands along
transportation and utility corridors, and forested watershed lands
within populated areas.
(2) "Community and urban forest assessment" means an analysis of
the community and urban forest inventory to establish the scope and
scale of forest-related benefits and services, the economic valuation
of such benefits, highlight trends and issues of concern, identify high
priority areas to be addressed, outline strategies for addressing the
critical issues and urban landscapes, and identify opportunities for
retaining trees, expanding forest canopy, and planting additional trees
to sustain Washington's urban and community forests.
(3) "Community and urban forest inventory" means a management tool
designed to gauge the condition, management status, health, and
diversity of a community and urban forest. A community and urban
forest inventory may evaluate individual trees or groups of trees or
canopy cover within community and urban forests, and must be
periodically updated by the department of natural resources.
(4) "Community and urban forestry" means the planning,
establishment, protection, care, and management of trees and associated
plants individually, in small groups, or under forest conditions within
municipalities and counties.
(((3))) (5) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(((4))) (6) "Municipality" means a city, town, port district,
public school district, community college district, irrigation
district, weed control district, park district, or other political
subdivision of the state.
(((5))) (7) "Person" means an individual, partnership, private or
public municipal corporation, Indian tribe, state entity, county or
local governmental entity, or association of individuals of whatever
nature.

Sec. 5 RCW 76.15.007 and 1991 c 179 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to:
(1) Encourage planting and maintenance and management of trees in
the state's municipalities and counties and maximize the potential of
tree and vegetative cover in improving the quality of the environment.
(2) Encourage the coordination of state and local agency activities
and maximize citizen participation in the development and
implementation of community and urban forestry-related programs.
(3) Foster healthy economic activity for the state's community and
urban forestry-related businesses through cooperative and supportive
contracts with the private business sector.
(4) Facilitate the creation of employment opportunities related to
community and urban forestry activities including opportunities for
inner city youth to learn teamwork, resource conservation,
environmental appreciation, and job skills.
(5) Provide meaningful voluntary opportunities for the state's
citizens and organizations interested in community and urban forestry
activities.
(6) Facilitate recognition of, and cooperation with, public works
and utilities department vegetation management programs created for the
prevention of vegetation interfering with or damaging public facilities
and utilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---