BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.120.040 and 2005 c 155 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the United States government ((has established pierhead lines
within a waterway created under the laws of this state at any distance
from the boundaries established by the state, structures may be
constructed in that strip of waterway between the waterway boundary and
the nearest pierhead line only with the consent of the department and
upon such plans, terms, and conditions and for such term as determined
by the department. However, no permit)), under its regulatory
authority over navigable waters, has authorized structures within
waterways, or has determined that no federal authorization is necessary
for the structures, those structures may be constructed only with the
consent of the department and upon those plans, terms, and conditions
and for such a term as determined by the department. However, no
permit shall extend for a period longer than thirty years.
The department may cancel any permit upon sixty days' notice for a
substantial breach by the permittee of any of the permit conditions, or
if the waterway is required for public highway purposes.
If a waterway is within the territorial limits of a port district,
the duties assigned by this section to the department may be exercised
by the port commission of the port district as provided in RCW
79.105.420.
Nothing in this section shall confer upon, create, or recognize in
any abutting owner any right or privilege in or to any strip of
waterway abutting any street and between prolongations of the lines of
the street, but the control of and the right to use the strip is
reserved to the state of Washington, except as authorized by RCW
79.105.420.

--- END ---