BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.92.010 and 2006 c 340 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a geological survey of the state, to be known as the
Washington geological survey, that shall be under the direction of the
commissioner of public lands who shall have general charge of the
survey, and shall appoint as supervisor of the survey a geologist of
established reputation, to be known as the state geologist.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.92.020 and 2006 c 340 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The geological survey shall have for its objects:
(((1))) (a) An examination of the economic products of the state,
including: Gold, silver, copper, lead, and iron ores, as well as
building stones, clays, coal, and all mineral substances of value;
(((2))) (b) An examination and classification of soils, and the
study of their adaptability to particular crops;
(((3))) (c) An investigation and report upon the water supplies,
artesian wells, the water power of the state, gauging the streams,
etc., with reference to their application for irrigation and other
purposes;
(((4))) (d) An examination and report upon the occurrence of
different road building material;
(((5))) (e) An examination of the physical features of the state
with reference to their practical bearing upon the occupations of the
people;
(((6))) (f) The preparation of special geological and economic maps
to illustrate the resources of the state;
(((7))) (g) The preparation of special reports with necessary
illustrations and maps, which shall embrace both the general and
detailed description of the geology and natural resources of the state;
and
(((8))) (h) The consideration of similar scientific and economic
questions that, in the judgment of the state geologist, is deemed of
value to the people of the state.
(2) The geological survey shall:
(a) Serve as a bureau of information and an advisory service
concerning geologic resources and hazards, including: Maintenance of
a library, public education program, and geologic database; review of
functions; expert advice to federal, state, and local government
agencies; and operation of a clearinghouse of posthazard event earth
science investigations. The geological survey shall provide technical
assistance to local governments on geological hazards, mineral
resources, and aggregate mining and reclamation during preparation and
amendment of comprehensive plans and land use regulations.
(b) Collect geotechnical and related reports prepared by applicants
in support of building construction and land use permits from local
government or state government for use in the development of a
statewide electronic database of subsurface geotechnical data. Copies
of the reports must be submitted to the geological survey by the
applicant at the time of submission to local government;
(c) Preserve information collected, developed, or obtained under
this section, RCW 43.92.025, and nonconfidential data collected under
chapters 78.44 and 78.52 RCW in a publicly accessible electronic data
system. The publicly accessible electronic data system must display
the surface and subsurface geological and geophysical data using an
interactive map interface for both two and three-dimensional display of
the available data;
(d) Establish and maintain a storage and examination facility for
physical samples, including drill cuttings and drill cores from all
types of drill holes, sidewall cores and other special samples from
earth science investigations, significant paper records of earth
science investigations, and other materials considered by the
department to be of long-term value to the state; and
(e) Promote outdoor recreation and education through the creation
and dissemination of interpretive materials, including but not limited
to field trip guides, road logs, interpretive displays, and field
excursions for teachers.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.92.040 and 2006 c 340 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Regular and special)) Reports, geological maps, geological hazard
assessment maps, mineral resource maps, and special reports of the
geological survey((, with proper illustrations and maps, shall)) must
be distributed as directed by the state geologist as the needs of the
state and science demand. The primary means of distribution must be
through a publicly accessible electronic data system with digital
documents, interactive web pages, and online databases. Reports and
maps may be printed as directed by the state geologist. ((All reports
shall be distributed or sold by the department of natural resources as
the interests of the state and of science demand.)) All money obtained
by the sale of reports under this section shall be paid into the state
treasury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---