BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that recreational
opportunities are instrumental in promoting human health and well-being
and are part of the heritage of Washington. State trust lands, aquatic
lands, and other state-owned lands managed by the department of natural
resources provide significant recreational opportunities, along with
other social, economic, and environmental benefits. Lands managed by
the department of natural resources provide, among other values:
(a) Renewable energy resources;
(b) Sustainable revenue for school construction, local governments,
and other state institutions;
(c) Recreational and educational opportunities;
(d) Habitat for fish and wildlife;
(e) Clean air and water; and
(f) Funding for restoration and public access to state-owned
aquatic lands.
(2) The legislature further finds that the state's population has
nearly doubled from three million four hundred thousand to six million
five hundred thousand since the multiple use concept was adopted under
chapter 79.10 RCW, and is projected to increase by another two million
two hundred thousand by 2030. Population growth has increased demand
for recreational access and presents current and future challenges that
must be addressed, such as: New forms of trail-based recreation that
compete with traditional uses; the rapid increase of motorized and
mechanized recreation; changes in ownership patterns of large land
holdings across the state; the incompatibility of certain human
activities with environmental protections for endangered species, clean
water, and habitat; and increased competition for funding.
(3) The legislature further finds that efforts by the department of
natural resources to consolidate state trust lands will provide more
opportunities for citizens to access larger blocks of state-owned
lands. Therefore, it is prudent to reexamine the policies for
recreational access on state-owned lands and establish a vision for the
future with recommended policy improvements that are:
(a) Environmentally responsible;
(b) Sustainably funded; and
(c) Compatible with trust land and state land management
obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A work group is established to make
recommendations to improve recreation on state trust lands, aquatic
lands, and other state-owned lands managed by the department of natural
resources. The work group shall examine relevant existing laws and
rules and recommend policy changes and funding alternatives for
consideration by the legislature to ensure safe, sustainable, and
enjoyable recreational access.
(2) Members of the work group must be appointed by the commissioner
of public lands. The work group is to be comprised of a balanced
representation, such as individuals, organization representatives, and
governmental entities with various recreational, environmental, and
sporting interests, knowledge, and perspectives regarding specific
regions of the state. In addition, representatives of the governor's
office, the legislature, and tribal government must be given the
opportunity to participate.
(3) The commissioner of public lands, or the commissioner's
designee, shall serve as chair, and the department of natural resources
shall provide technical and staff support for the work group created by
this section.
(4) Work group members shall be compensated as provided in RCW
43.03.250 and shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses as
provided by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Costs associated with the
work group must be paid by the department of natural resources from the
general fund appropriation made available to the department of natural
resources.
(5) The work group shall conduct a minimum of two open public
workshops to solicit input from key stakeholders, citizens, and local
jurisdictions.
(6) The work group shall hold meetings, at diverse locations
throughout the state, to gather input from key stakeholders, citizens,
and local jurisdictions regarding the group's proposed recommendations.
(7) The work group shall coordinate with any stakeholder
recreational advisory committees appointed or established by the
commissioner of public lands.
(8) The commissioner of public lands shall submit to the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature, no later than
December 1, 2008, its findings and recommendations for legislation that
is necessary to implement the work group's findings.

--- END ---