BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.225.090 and 2006 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue a license to any applicant who
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that the applicant
meets the following education and experience requirements for the
applicant's practice area.
(a) Licensed social work classifications:
(i) Licensed advanced social worker:
(A) Graduation from a master's or doctorate social work educational
program accredited by the council on social work education and approved
by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;
(B) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(C) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The supervised experience requirement consists of a minimum of three
thousand two hundred hours with supervision by an approved supervisor
who has been licensed for at least two years. Of those supervised
hours:
(I) At least ninety hours ((of supervision)) must include direct
supervision as specified in this subsection by a licensed independent
clinical social worker ((or)), a licensed advanced social worker ((who
has been licensed or certified for at least two years)), or an equally
qualified licensed mental health professional. Of those hours((,)) of
directly supervised experience:
(1) At least fifty hours must include ((direct)) supervision by a
licensed advanced social worker or licensed independent clinical social
worker; the other forty hours may be ((with)) supervised by an equally
qualified licensed mental health practitioner((.)); and
(2) At least forty hours must be in one-to-one supervision and
fifty hours may be in one-to-one supervision or group supervision((.));
(II) Distance supervision is limited to forty supervision
hours((.)); and
(III) Eight hundred hours must be in direct client contact; and
(D) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(ii) Licensed independent clinical social worker:
(A) Graduation from a master's or doctorate level social work
educational program accredited by the council on social work education
and approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized
standards;
(B) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(C) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The supervised experience requirement consists of a minimum of four
thousand hours of experience, ((of which)) over a three-year period,
with supervision by an approved supervisor who has been licensed for at
least two years and, as specified in this subsection, may be either a
licensed independent clinical social worker who has had at least one
year of experience in supervising the clinical social work of others or
an equally qualified licensed mental health practitioner. Of those
supervised hours:
(I) At least one thousand hours must be direct client contact((,
over a three-year period supervised by a licensed independent clinical
social worker who has been licensed or certified for at least five
years and who has had at least one year of experience in supervising
the clinical social work practice of others, with supervision of));
(II) Hours of direct supervision must include:
(1) At least one hundred thirty hours by a licensed mental health
practitioner((. Of the total supervision,));
(2) At least seventy hours ((must be)) of supervision with ((an))
a licensed independent clinical social worker meeting the
qualifications under this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(C); the other sixty
hours may be ((with)) supervised by an equally qualified licensed
mental health practitioner((.)); and
(3) At least sixty hours must be in one-to-one supervision and
seventy hours may be in one-to-one supervision or group
supervision((.)); and
(III) Distance supervision is limited to sixty supervision hours;
and
(D) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(b) Licensed mental health counselor:
(i) Graduation from a master's or doctoral level educational
program in mental health counseling or a related discipline from a
college or university approved by the secretary based upon nationally
recognized standards;
(ii) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(iii) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of thirty-six months
full-time counseling or three thousand hours of postgraduate mental
health counseling under the supervision of a qualified licensed mental
health counselor or equally qualified licensed mental health
practitioner, in an approved setting. The three thousand hours of
required experience includes a minimum of one hundred hours spent in
immediate supervision with the qualified licensed mental health
counselor, and includes a minimum of one thousand two hundred hours of
direct counseling with individuals, couples, families, or groups; and
(iv) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(c) Licensed marriage and family therapist:
(i) Graduation from a master's degree or doctoral degree
educational program in marriage and family therapy or graduation from
an educational program in an allied field equivalent to a master's
degree or doctoral degree in marriage and family therapy approved by
the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;
(ii) Successful passage of an approved examination;
(iii) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of two calendar years
of full-time marriage and family therapy. Of the total supervision,
one hundred hours must be with a licensed marriage and family therapist
with at least five years' clinical experience; the other one hundred
hours may be with an equally qualified licensed mental health
practitioner. Total experience requirements include:
(A) A minimum of three thousand hours of experience, one thousand
hours of which must be direct client contact; at least five hundred
hours must be gained in diagnosing and treating couples and families;
plus
(B) At least two hundred hours of qualified supervision with a
supervisor. At least one hundred of the two hundred hours must be one-on-one supervision, and the remaining hours may be in one-on-one or
group supervision.
Applicants who have completed a master's program accredited by the
commission on accreditation for marriage and family therapy education
of the American association for marriage and family therapy may be
credited with five hundred hours of direct client contact and one
hundred hours of formal meetings with an approved supervisor; and
(iv) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(2) The department shall establish by rule what constitutes
adequate proof of meeting the criteria.
(3) In addition, applicants shall be subject to the grounds for
denial of a license or issuance of a conditional license under chapter
18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is remedial and curative in nature
and applies retroactively to July 22, 2001.

--- END ---