BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.135.010 and 1984 c 281 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is in ((the)) this state's public interest that limited
authority to: (1) Administer skin tests and subcutaneous, intradermal,
intramuscular, and intravenous injections ((and to)); (2) perform minor
invasive procedures to withdraw blood ((in this state)); and (3)
administer vaccines in accordance with section 4 of this act be granted
to health care assistants who are not so authorized under existing
licensing statutes, subject to such regulations as will ((assure))
ensure the protection of the health and safety of the patient.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.135.020 and 2001 c 22 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(2) "Health care assistant" means an unlicensed person who assists
a licensed health care practitioner in providing health care to
patients pursuant to this chapter. However, persons trained by a
federally approved end-stage renal disease facility who perform end-stage renal dialysis in the home setting are exempt from certification
under this chapter.
(3) "Health care practitioner" means:
(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;
(b) An osteopathic physician or surgeon licensed under chapter
18.57 RCW; or
(c) Acting within the scope of their respective licensure, a
podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, a
registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, ((or)) a naturopath licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or
an osteopathic physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW.
(4) "Supervision" means supervision of procedures permitted
pursuant to this chapter by a health care practitioner who is
physically present and is immediately available in the facility during
the administration of injections or vaccines, as defined in this
chapter, but need not be present during procedures to withdraw blood.
(5) "Health care facility" means any hospital, hospice care center,
licensed or certified health care facility, health maintenance
organization regulated under chapter 48.46 RCW, federally qualified
health maintenance organization, renal dialysis center or facility
federally approved under 42 C.F.R. 405.2100, blood bank federally
licensed under 21 C.F.R. 607, or clinical laboratory certified under 20
C.F.R. 405.1301-16.
(6) "Delegation" means direct authorization granted by a licensed
health care practitioner to a health care assistant to perform the
functions authorized in this chapter which fall within the scope of
practice of the delegator and which are not within the scope of
practice of the delegatee.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.135.065 and 1991 c 3 s 276 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each delegator, as defined under RCW 18.135.020(6), shall
maintain a list of: (a) Specific medications((,)) and diagnostic
agents, and the route of administration of each, that he or she has
authorized for injection; and (b) the vaccines that he or she has
authorized for administration. Both the delegator and delegatee shall
sign the above list, indicating the date of each signature. The signed
list shall be forwarded to the secretary of the department of health
and shall be available for review.
(2) Delegatees are prohibited from administering any controlled
substance as defined in RCW 69.50.101(d), any experimental drug, and
any cancer chemotherapy agent unless a delegator is physically present
in the immediate area where the drug is administered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.135 RCW
to read as follows:
The administration of vaccines by a health care assistant is
restricted to vaccines that are administered by injection, orally, or
topically, including nasal administration, and that are licensed by the
United States food and drug administration.

--- END ---