BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "General authority Washington peace officer" means an officer
authorized to enforce the criminal and traffic laws of the state of
Washington generally.
(2) "Tribal police officer" means any person in the employ of one
of the federally recognized sovereign tribal governments, whose
traditional lands and territories lie within the borders of the state
of Washington, to enforce the criminal laws of that government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Tribal police officers under subsection
(2) of this section shall be recognized and authorized to act as
general authority Washington peace officers. A tribal police officer
recognized and authorized to act as a general authority Washington
peace officer under this section has the same powers as any other
general authority Washington peace officer to enforce state laws in
Washington, including the power to make arrests for violations of state
laws.
(2) A tribal police officer may exercise the powers of law
enforcement of a general authority Washington peace officer under this
section, subject to the following:
(a) The appropriate sovereign tribal nation shall submit to the
office of financial management proof of public liability and property
damage insurance for vehicles operated by the peace officers and police
professional liability insurance from a company licensed to sell
insurance in the state.
(i) Within the thirty days of receipt of written proof of insurance
from the sovereign tribal nation, the office of financial management
shall either approve or reject the adequacy of insurance. The adequacy
of insurance under this chapter shall be subject to annual review by
the state office of financial management.
(ii) Each policy of insurance issued under this chapter must
include a provision that the insurance shall be available to satisfy
settlements or judgments arising from the tortious conduct of tribal
police officers when acting in the capacity of a general authority
Washington peace officer, and that to the extent of policy coverage the
sovereign tribal nation will not raise a defense of sovereign immunity
to preclude an action for damages, the determination of fault in a
civil action, or the payment of a settlement or judgment arising from
the tortious conduct.
(b) The appropriate sovereign tribal nation shall submit to the
office of financial management proof of training requirements for each
tribal police officer. To be authorized as a general authority
Washington peace officer, a tribal police officer must successfully
complete the requirements set forth under RCW 43.101.157. Any
applicant not meeting the requirements for certification as a tribal
police officer may not act as a general authority Washington peace
officer under this chapter. The criminal justice training commission
shall notify the office of financial management if:
(i) A tribal police officer authorized under this act as a general
authority Washington state peace officer has been decertified pursuant
to RCW 43.101.157; or
(ii) An appropriate sovereign tribal government is otherwise in
noncompliance with RCW 43.101.157.
(3) A copy of any citation or notice of infraction issued, or any
incident report taken, by a tribal police officer acting in the
capacity of a general authority Washington peace officer as authorized
by this section must be submitted within three days to the police chief
or sheriff within whose jurisdiction the action was taken. Any
citation issued under this section shall be to a Washington court,
except that any citation issued to Indians within the exterior
boundaries of an Indian reservation may be cited to a tribal court.
Any arrest made or citation issued not in compliance with this section
is not enforceable.
(4) Any authorization granted under this section shall not in any
way expand the jurisdiction of any tribal court or other tribal
authority.
(5) The authority granted under this section shall be coextensive
with the exterior boundaries of the reservation, except that an officer
commissioned under this section may act as authorized under RCW
10.93.070 beyond the exterior boundaries of the reservation.
(6) For purposes of civil liability under this chapter, a tribal
police officer shall not be considered an employee of the state of
Washington. The state of Washington and its individual employees shall
not be liable for the authorization of tribal police officers under
this chapter, nor for the negligence or other misconduct of tribal
officers. The authorization of tribal police officers under this
chapter shall not be deemed to have been a nondelegable duty of the
state of Washington.
(7) Nothing in this section impairs or affects the existing status
and sovereignty of those sovereign tribal governments whose traditional
lands and territories lie within the borders of the state of Washington
as established under the laws of the United States.
(8) Nothing in this section limits, impairs, or nullifies the
authority of a county sheriff to appoint duly commissioned state or
federally certified tribal police officers as deputy sheriffs
authorized to enforce the criminal and traffic laws of the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 10 RCW.

--- END ---