BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the right to
privacy is a personal and fundamental right protected by Article I,
section 7 of the state Constitution. The legislature also finds that,
in the vast majority of cases, subscribers pay for both incoming and
outgoing calls, and that subscribers purchase cell phone service with
an expectation that their numbers will not be made public. Therefore,
the legislature recognizes that a subscriber's cell phone number should
be kept private, unless that subscriber knowingly provides their
express, opt-in consent to have that number made available in a public
directory.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.250 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Radio communications service company" has the same meaning as
in RCW 80.04.010.
(2) "Subscriber" means a person who subscribes to radio
communications services, radio paging, or cellular communications
service.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.250.010 and 2005 c 322 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A radio communications service company((, as defined in RCW
80.04.010,)) or any direct or indirect affiliate or agent of a
((provider)) radio communications service company, or any person in the
business of marketing, selling, and sharing the phone number of any
subscriber for commercial purposes, shall not include the phone number
of any subscriber for inclusion in any directory of any form, nor shall
it sell the contents of any directory database, without first obtaining
the express, opt-in consent of that subscriber. The subscriber's
consent must be obtained either in writing or electronically, and a
receipt must be provided to the subscriber. The consent shall be a
separate document or located on a separate screen or web page that has
the sole purpose of authorizing a radio communications service company,
person, or direct or indirect affiliate or agent of a radio
communications service company to include the subscriber's phone number
in a publicly available directory assistance database. In obtaining
the subscriber's consent, the ((provider)) radio communications service
company, person, or direct or indirect affiliate or agent of a radio
communications service company shall unambiguously disclose that, by
consenting, the subscriber agrees to have the subscriber's phone number
sold or licensed as part of a list of subscribers and that the phone
number may be included in a publicly available directory assistance
database. The ((provider)) radio communications service company,
person, or direct or indirect affiliate or agent of a radio
communications service company must also disclose that by consenting to
be included in the directory, the subscriber may incur additional
charges for receiving unsolicited calls or text messages. The radio
communications service company, person, or direct or indirect affiliate
or agent of a radio communications service company also must disclose
to the subscriber that the subscriber's express, opt-in consent will be
construed as consent for the subsequent publication of the phone number
to and by third parties in other directories or databases.
(2) A subscriber who provides express, opt-in consent pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section may opt out or revoke that consent at
any time. A radio communications service company, person, or direct or
indirect affiliate or agent of a radio communications service company
shall comply with the subscriber's request to opt out within a
reasonable period of time, not to exceed sixty days for printed
directories and not to exceed thirty days for online directories.
(3) A subscriber shall not be charged for opting not to be listed
in the directory.
(4) This section does not apply to the provision of telephone
numbers, for the purposes indicated, to:
(a) Any law enforcement agency, fire protection agency, public
health agency, public environmental health agency, city or county
emergency services planning agency, or private for-profit corporation
operating under contract with, and at the direction of, one or more of
these agencies, for the exclusive purpose of responding to a 911 call
or communicating an imminent threat to life or property. Information
or records provided to a private for-profit corporation pursuant to (b)
of this subsection shall be held in confidence by that corporation and
by any individual employed by or associated with that corporation.
Such information or records shall not be open to examination for any
purpose not directly connected with the administration of the services
specified in this subsection;
(b) A lawful process issued under state or federal law;
(c) A telecommunications company providing service between service
areas for the provision of telephone services to the subscriber between
service areas, or to third parties for the limited purpose of providing
billing services;
(d) A telecommunications company to effectuate a customer's request
to transfer the customer's assigned telephone number from the
customer's existing provider of telecommunications services to a new
provider of telecommunications services;
(e) The utilities and transportation commission pursuant to its
jurisdiction and control over telecommunications companies; ((and))
(f) A sales agent to provide the subscriber's ((cell)) phone
number((s)) to the ((cellular provider)) radio communications service
company for the limited purpose of billing and customer service;
(g) A person that publishes a subscriber's phone number in a
directory that is obtained directly from a radio communications service
company and that radio communications service company has obtained the
required express, opt-in consent for including in any directory the
subscriber's phone number as specified in RCW 19.250.010(1);
(h) A person that publishes a subscriber's phone number in a
directory, at the subscriber's request, where the subscriber pays a fee
to have the number published for commercial purposes; and
(i) A person that publishes a subscriber's phone number that was
ported from listed wireline service to wireless service within the
previous fifteen months.
(5) Every knowing violation of this section is punishable by a fine
of up to fifty thousand dollars for each violation.
(6) The attorney general may bring actions to enforce compliance
with this section. For the first violation by any company or
organization of this section, the attorney general may notify the
company with a letter of warning that the section has been violated.
(7) No telecommunications company, nor any official or employee of
a telecommunications company, shall be subject to criminal or civil
liability for the release of customer information as authorized by this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.250 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A radio communications service company, or any direct or
indirect affiliate or agent of a radio communications service company,
or any person in the business of marketing, selling, and sharing the
phone number of any subscriber for commercial purposes, who has
maintained a directory before the effective date of this section, must
within thirty days either:
(a) Secure the express, opt-in consent of each subscriber listed in
the directory as specified in RCW 19.250.010; or
(b) Remove the phone numbers of any subscribers who have not
provided their express, opt-in consent.
(2) This section does not apply to the following:
(a) A person that publishes a subscriber's phone number in a
directory that is obtained directly from a radio communications service
company and that radio communications service company has obtained the
required express, opt-in consent for including in any directory the
subscriber's phone number as specified in RCW 19.250.010(1);
(b) A person that publishes a subscriber's phone number in a
directory where the subscriber pays a fee to have the number published
for commercial purposes; and
(c) A person that publishes a subscriber's phone number that was
ported from listed wireline service to wireless service within the
previous fifteen months. A subscriber whose phone number was ported
from listed wireline service to wireless service can utilize the opt-out provisions set forth in RCW 19.250.010.

--- END ---