BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department shall establish a project
in a county west of the crest of the Cascade mountains with a
population of more than seven hundred fifty thousand people to improve
managing symptoms and reducing complications related to asthma among
medicaid-eligible children. The department shall contract with the
health department of the county in which the project is located to have
trained community health workers visit medicaid-eligible children in
their homes to identify and reduce exposure to asthma triggers, improve
their self-management skills, and coordinate their care with their
primary care and specialty providers. The contract shall include an
evaluation of the services provided under the contract, including their
impact on urgent physician's visits, emergency room utilization, and
inpatient hospitalization.
(2) The project must be completed by June 30, 2012.
(3) A report based upon the evaluation must be delivered to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of two hundred sixty-eight thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the
department of social and health services for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires December 31, 2012.

--- END ---