BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.58.055 and 1997 c 58 s 948 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To promote and maintain nationwide uniformity in the system of
vital statistics, the certificates required by this chapter or by the
rules adopted under this chapter shall include, as a minimum, the items
recommended by the federal agency responsible for national vital
statistics including social security numbers.
(2)(a) The state board of health by rule may require additional
pertinent information relative to the birth and manner of delivery as
it may deem necessary for statistical study. This information shall be
placed in a confidential section of the birth certificate form and
shall not be subject to the view of the public or for certification
purposes except ((upon order of the court)) as provided in (b) of this
subsection. The state board of health may eliminate from the forms
items that it determines are not necessary for statistical study.
(b) Information contained in the confidential section of the birth
certificate form may only be available for review by:
(i) A member of the public, or for certification purposes, upon
order of the court; or
(ii) The individual who is the subject of the confidential
information upon confirmation of the identity of the requestor in a
manner approved by the state board of health.
(3) Each certificate or other document required by this chapter
shall be on a form or in a format prescribed by the state registrar.
(4) All vital records shall contain the data required for
registration. No certificate may be held to be complete and correct
that does not supply all items of information called for or that does
not satisfactorily account for the omission of required items.
(5) Information required in certificates or documents authorized by
this chapter may be filed and registered by photographic, electronic,
or other means as prescribed by the state registrar.

--- END ---