BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.230 and 2005 c 274 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(3) Personal information about a commissioned peace officer, the
officer's family, or both; or information that could easily lead to the
discovery of the personal information; and that is not necessary for
the effective operation of a law enforcement agency.
(a) Such information includes, but is not limited to, residential
addresses, residential telephone numbers, property and tax records, and
commissioned peace officers' birth dates other than year of birth, as
otherwise provided in this section.
(b) The full name, year of birth, and photograph of individual
commissioned peace officers shall be disclosed pursuant to specific
requests for information about the individual officer, but the officer,
the officer's immediate supervisor, or both, must be notified of the
request and provided the name and city or county of the requester
before it may be disseminated;
(4) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would (a) be prohibited to such persons by
RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340 or (b) violate the
taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer; and
(((4))) (5) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic
check numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial
account numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or
governed by other law.

--- END ---