BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.09.030 and 2007 c 285 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as follows, the boundaries of counties, cities, and all
other taxing districts, for purposes of property taxation and the levy
of property taxes, shall be the established official boundaries of such
districts existing on the first day of August of the year in which the
property tax levy is made.
The official boundaries of a newly incorporated taxing district
shall be established at a different date in the year in which the
incorporation occurred as follows:
(1) Boundaries for a newly incorporated city shall be established
on the last day of March of the year in which the initial property tax
levy is made, and the boundaries of a road district, library district,
or fire protection district or districts, that include any portion of
the area that was incorporated within its boundaries shall be altered
as of this date to exclude this area, if the budget for the newly
incorporated city is filed pursuant to RCW 84.52.020 and the levy
request of the newly incorporated city is made pursuant to RCW
84.52.070. Whenever a proposed city incorporation is on the March
special election ballot, the county auditor shall submit the legal
description of the proposed city to the department of revenue on or
before the first day of March;
(2) Boundaries for a newly incorporated port district or regional
fire protection service authority shall be established on the first day
of October if the boundaries of the newly incorporated port district or
regional fire protection service authority are coterminous with the
boundaries of another taxing district or districts, as they existed on
the first day of March of that year;
(3) Boundaries of any other newly incorporated taxing district
shall be established on the first day of June of the year in which the
property tax levy is made if the taxing district has boundaries
coterminous with the boundaries of another taxing district, as they
existed on the first day of March of that year;
(4) Boundaries for a newly incorporated water-sewer district shall
be established on the fifteenth of June of the year in which the
proposition under RCW 57.04.050 authorizing a water district excess
levy is approved.
The boundaries of a taxing district shall be established on the
first day of June, or September in the case of a school district, if
territory has been added to, or removed from, the taxing district after
the first day of March of that year with boundaries coterminous with
the boundaries of another taxing district as they existed on the first
day of March of that year. However, the boundaries of a road district,
library district, or fire protection district or districts, that
include any portion of the area that was annexed to a city or town
within its boundaries shall be altered as of this date to exclude this
area. In any case where any instrument setting forth the official
boundaries of any newly established taxing district, or setting forth
any change in such boundaries, is required by law to be filed in the
office of the county auditor or other county official, said instrument
shall be filed in triplicate. The officer with whom such instrument is
filed shall transmit two copies to the county assessor.
No property tax levy shall be made for any taxing district whose
boundaries are not established as of the dates provided in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies retroactively to transfers
of school territory occurring on or after August 1, 2007, as well as
prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---