BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.480 and 2000 c 70 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of health shall adopt guidelines and protocols
for how emergency medical personnel shall respond when summoned to the
site of an injury or illness for the treatment of a person who has
signed a written directive ((or)), durable power of attorney, or
medical order form developed by the department pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section requesting that ((he or she not receive futile
emergency medical)) life-sustaining treatment, as defined by RCW
70.122.020(5) and emergency treatment including, but not limited to,
"resuscitate" or "do not resuscitate" orders, or related comfort care
be provided, withheld, or withdrawn under specified circumstances.
((The guidelines shall include development of)) (2) The department
shall develop a simple medical order form for documenting a person's
life-sustaining and emergency treatment preferences, which clearly
indicates "resuscitate" or "do not resuscitate" and other choices for
life-sustaining and emergency treatment or related comfort care that
shall be ((used statewide)) followed by emergency medical personnel
certified under chapters 18.71 and 18.73 RCW.
(3) The form must be signed by:
(a) An advanced registered nurse practitioner, naturopathic
physician, osteopathic physician, osteopathic physician assistant,
physician, or physician assistant; and
(b)(i) The person; or
(ii) The person's legal representative, as defined in RCW 7.70.065,
following the informed consent criteria in RCW 7.70.060.
(4) Emergency medical personnel who, in good faith, provide,
withhold, or withdraw treatment from a person in accordance with the
directions stated on a medical order form developed and endorsed by the
department of health under this section and executed in accordance with
subsection (3) of this section shall be immune from civil or criminal
liability, including professional conduct sanctions. The immunity
authorized by this subsection does not include immunity for failing to
exercise the standard of care required by RCW 7.70.040 when providing,
withholding, or withdrawing treatment.
(5) The form may also be followed by other providers as defined in
section 2 of this act, for the purposes of identifying and implementing
a person's requests regarding providing, withholding, or withdrawing
life-sustaining treatment, emergency treatment including "resuscitate"
or "do not resuscitate," or related comfort care. The provisions of
this section do not supersede other legal requirements applicable to
providers. Providers may not require any person to execute the form.
The provider must follow informed consent requirements under chapter
7.70 RCW. In addition, health care facilities, health facilities, and
adult family homes must comply with all licensing and certification
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "provider" means:
(a) An advanced registered nurse practitioner, naturopathic
physician, osteopathic physician, osteopathic physician assistant,
physician, or physician assistant;
(b) A health care provider acting within the provider's licensed
scope of practice and under the direction of an advanced registered
nurse practitioner, osteopathic physician, osteopathic physician
assistant, physician, or physician assistant;
(c) A kidney disease treatment center and its personnel; or
(d) A health facility as defined in chapter 70.122 RCW and its
personnel, health care facility as defined in chapter 71.32 RCW and its
personnel, or adult family home as defined in chapter 70.128 RCW and
its personnel.
(2) Nothing in this act shall be interpreted to permit providers or
personnel to act outside the scope of their practice.
(3) Any provider who, in good faith, provides, withholds, or
withdraws life-sustaining treatment, emergency treatment including
"resuscitate" or "do not resuscitate," or related comfort care from a
person in accordance with the directions stated on a medical order form
developed and endorsed by the department of health under RCW 43.70.480
and signed in accordance with RCW 43.70.480(3) shall be immune from
civil or criminal liability, including professional conduct sanctions.
The immunity authorized by this subsection does not include immunity
for failing to exercise the standard of care required by RCW 7.70.040
when providing, withholding, or withdrawing treatment.

--- END ---