BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds the multiple state
licensing and registering requirements for certified public accountants
to be cumbersome and an unnecessary constraint on the consumers of
professional certified public accountant services. In the majority of
United States jurisdictions, certified public accountants are licensed
based on substantially equivalent education, national exam, and
experience requirements. Yet in order to serve their various client
needs, certified public accountants must often delay service while they
first spend countless hours and dollars to register with regulators in
the jurisdictions of the client.
To clarify the legislative intent of chapter 294, Laws of 2001,
reduce the administrative licensing burden on certified public
accountants licensed in any substantially equivalent jurisdiction, and
facilitate consumer choice, the legislature intends to eliminate the
requirement for out-of-state certified public accountants to notify the
Washington state board of accountancy of intent to practice and pay a
fee; however, firms providing audit or opinion-type services would be
required to be licensed in this state. The requirement for
notification will be replaced with "consent to automatic jurisdiction,"
which clarifies the legal disciplinary authority of the Washington
state board of accountancy over out-of-state certified public
accountants practicing in Washington state. This allows the board to
more efficiently protect consumers while facilitating practice mobility
and consumer choice.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.04.025 and 2001 c 294 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the board of accountancy created by RCW
18.04.035.
(2) "Certificate holder" means the holder of a certificate as a
certified public accountant who has not become a licensee, has
maintained CPE requirements, and who does not practice public
accounting.
(3) "Certified public accountant" or "CPA" means a person holding
a certified public accountant license or certificate.
(4) "State" includes the states of the United States, the District
of Columbia, Puerto Rico, Guam, ((and)) the United States Virgin
Islands, and the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands at such
time as the board determines that the Commonwealth of the Northern
Mariana Islands is issuing licenses under the substantially equivalent
standards in RCW 18.04.350(2)(a).
(5) "Reports on financial statements" means any reports or opinions
prepared by licensees or persons holding practice privileges under
substantial equivalency, based on services performed in accordance with
generally accepted auditing standards, standards for attestation
engagements, or standards for accounting and review services as to
whether the presentation of information used for guidance in financial
transactions or for accounting for or assessing the status or
performance of commercial and noncommercial enterprises, whether
public, private, or governmental, conforms with generally accepted
accounting principles or ((other)) another comprehensive ((bases))
basis of accounting. "Reports on financial statements" does not
include services referenced in RCW 18.04.350(((6))) (10) provided by
persons not holding a license under this chapter.
(6) ((The)) "Practice of public accounting" means performing or
offering to perform by a person or firm holding itself out to the
public as a licensee, for a client or potential client, one or more
kinds of services involving the use of accounting or auditing skills,
including the issuance of "audit reports," "review reports," or
"compilation reports" on financial statements, or one or more kinds of
management advisory, or consulting services, or the preparation of tax
returns, or the furnishing of advice on tax matters. ((The)) "Practice
of public accounting" shall not include practices that are permitted
under the provisions of RCW 18.04.350(((6))) (10) by persons or firms
not required to be licensed under this chapter.
(7) "Firm" means a sole proprietorship, a corporation, or a
partnership. "Firm" also means a limited liability company formed
under chapter 25.15 RCW.
(8) "CPE" means continuing professional education.
(9) "Certificate" means a certificate as a certified public
accountant issued prior to July 1, 2001, as authorized under the
provisions of this chapter.
(10) "Licensee" means the holder of a license to practice public
accountancy issued under this chapter.
(11) "License" means a license to practice public accountancy
issued to an individual under this chapter, or a license issued to a
firm under this chapter.
(12) "Manager" means a manager of a limited liability company
licensed as a firm under this chapter.
(13) "NASBA" means the national association of state boards of
accountancy.
(14) "Quality assurance review" means a process established by and
conducted at the direction of the board of study, appraisal, or review
of one or more aspects of the attest or compilation work of a licensee
or licensed firm in the practice of public accountancy, by a person or
persons who hold licenses and who are not affiliated with the person or
firm being reviewed.
(15) "Peer review" means a study, appraisal, or review of one or
more aspects of the attest or compilation work of a licensee or
licensed firm in the practice of public accountancy, by a person or
persons who hold licenses and who are not affiliated with the person or
firm being reviewed, including a peer review, or any internal review or
inspection intended to comply with quality control policies and
procedures, but not including the "quality assurance review" under
subsection (14) of this section.
(16) "Review committee" means any person carrying out,
administering or overseeing a peer review authorized by the reviewee.
(17) "Rule" means any rule adopted by the board under authority of
this chapter.
(18) "Holding out" means any representation to the public by the
use of restricted titles as set forth in RCW 18.04.345 by a person or
firm that the person or firm holds a license under this chapter and
that the person or firm offers to perform any professional services to
the public as a licensee. "Holding out" shall not affect or limit a
person or firm not required to hold a license under this chapter from
engaging in practices identified in RCW 18.04.350.
(19) (("Natural person")) "Individual" means a living, human being.
(20) "Inactive" means the certificate is in an inactive status
because a person who held a valid certificate before July 1, 2001, has
not met the current requirements of licensure and has been granted
inactive certificate holder status through an approval process
established by the board.
(21) "Attest" means providing the following financial statement
services:
(a) Any audit or other engagement to be performed in accordance
with the statements on auditing standards;
(b) Any review of a financial statement to be provided in
accordance with the statements on standards for accounting and review
services;
(c) Any examination of prospective financial information to be
performed in accordance with the statements on standards for
attestation engagements; and
(d) Any engagement to be performed in accordance with the public
company accounting oversight board auditing standards.
(22) "Compilation" means providing a service to be performed in
accordance with statements on standards for accounting and review
services that is presenting in the form of financial statements,
information that is the representation of management (owners) without
undertaking to express any assurance on the statements.
(23) "Home office" is the location specified by the client as the
address to which a service is directed.
(24) "Person" means any individual, nongovernmental organization,
or business entity regardless of legal form, including a sole
proprietorship, firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability
company, association, or not-for-profit organization, and including the
sole proprietor, partners, members, and, as applied to corporations,
the officers.
(25) "Principal place of business" means the office location
designated by the licensee for purposes of substantial equivalency and
reciprocity.
(26) "Sole proprietorship" means a legal form of organization owned
by one person meeting the requirements of RCW 18.04.195.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.04.195 and 2003 c 290 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall grant or renew licenses to practice as a CPA
firm to applicants that demonstrate their qualifications therefore in
accordance with this section.
(a) The following must hold a license issued under this section:
(i) Any firm with an office in this state performing attest
services as defined in RCW 18.04.025(21) or compilations as defined in
RCW 18.04.025(22);
(ii) Any firm with an office in this state that uses the title
"CPA" or "CPA firm"; or
(iii) Any firm that does not have an office in this state but
performs attest services described in RCW 18.04.025(21) (a), (c), or
(d) for a client having its home office in this state.
(b) A firm that is not subject to the requirements of subsection
(1)(a)(iii) of this section may perform other professional services
while using the title "CPA" or "CPA firm" in this state without a
license issued under this section only if:
(i) The firm performs such services through an individual with
practice privileges under RCW 18.04.350(2);
(ii) The firm can lawfully do so in the state where said
individuals with practice privileges have their principal place of
business; and
(iii) A firm performing services described in RCW 18.04.025 (21)(b)
and (22) meets the board's quality assurance program requirements
authorized by RCW 18.04.055(9) and the rules implementing that section.
(2) A sole proprietorship ((engaged in business in this state and
offering to issue or issuing reports on financial statements or using
the title CPA or certified public accountant)) required to obtain a
license under subsection (1) of this section shall license, as a firm,
every three years with the board.
(a) The sole proprietor shall hold and renew a license to practice
under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or, in the case of a sole
proprietorship that must obtain a license pursuant to subsection
(1)(a)(iii) of this section, be a licensee of another state who meets
the requirements in RCW 18.04.350(2);
(b) Each resident ((person)) individual in charge of an office
located in this state shall hold and renew a license to practice under
RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215; and
(c) The licensed firm must meet competency requirements established
by rule by the board.
(((2))) (3) A partnership ((engaged in business in this state and
offering to issue or issuing reports on financial statements or using
the title CPA or certified public accountant)) required to obtain a
license under subsection (1) of this section shall license as a firm
every three years with the board, and shall meet the following
requirements:
(a) At least one general partner of the partnership shall hold and
renew a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or, in
the case of a partnership that must obtain a license pursuant to
subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section, be a licensee of another state
who meets the requirements in RCW 18.04.350(2);
(b) Each resident ((person)) individual in charge of an office in
this state shall hold and renew a license to practice under RCW
18.04.105 and 18.04.215;
(c) At least a simple majority of the ownership of the licensed
firm in terms of financial interests and voting rights of all partners
or owners shall be held by ((natural)) persons who are licensees or
holders of a valid license issued under this chapter or by another
state ((that entitles the holder to practice public accounting in this
state)). The principal partner of the partnership and any partner
having authority over issuing reports on financial statements shall
hold a license under this chapter or issued by another state ((that
entitles the holder to practice public accounting in this state)); and
(d) The licensed firm must meet competency requirements established
by rule by the board.
(((3))) (4) A corporation ((engaged in business in this state and
offering to issue or issuing reports on financial statements or using
the title CPA or certified public accountant)) required to obtain a
license under subsection (1) of this section shall license as a firm
every three years with the board and shall meet the following
requirements:
(a) At least a simple majority of the ownership of the licensed
firm in terms of financial interests and voting rights of all
shareholders or owners shall be held by ((natural)) persons who are
licensees or holders of a valid license issued under this chapter or by
another state ((that entitles the holder to practice public accounting
in this state)) and is principally employed by the corporation or
actively engaged in its business. The principal officer of the
corporation and any officer or director having authority over issuing
reports on financial statements shall hold a license under this chapter
or issued by another state ((that entitles the holder to practice
public accounting in this state));
(b) At least one shareholder of the corporation shall hold a
license under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or, in the case of a
corporation that must obtain a license pursuant to subsection
(1)(a)(iii) of this section, be a licensee of another state who meets
the requirements in RCW 18.04.350(2);
(c) Each resident ((person)) individual in charge of an office
located in this state shall hold and renew a license under RCW
18.04.105 and 18.04.215;
(d) A written agreement shall bind the corporation or its
shareholders to purchase any shares offered for sale by, or not under
the ownership or effective control of, a qualified shareholder, and
bind any holder not a qualified shareholder to sell the shares to the
corporation or its qualified shareholders. The agreement shall be
noted on each certificate of corporate stock. The corporation may
purchase any amount of its stock for this purpose, notwithstanding any
impairment of capital, as long as one share remains outstanding;
(e) The corporation shall comply with any other rules pertaining to
corporations practicing public accounting in this state as the board
may prescribe; and
(f) The licensed firm must meet competency requirements established
by rule by the board.
(((4))) (5) A limited liability company ((engaged in business in
this state and offering to issue or issuing reports on financial
statements or using the title CPA or certified public accountant))
required to obtain a license under subsection (1) of this section shall
license as a firm every three years with the board, and shall meet the
following requirements:
(a) At least one member of the limited liability company shall hold
a license under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or, in the case of a
limited liability company that must obtain a license pursuant to
subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section, be a licensee of another state
who meets the requirements in RCW 18.04.350(2);
(b) Each resident manager or member in charge of an office located
in this state shall hold and renew a license under RCW 18.04.105 and
18.04.215;
(c) At least a simple majority of the ownership of the licensed
firm in terms of financial interests and voting rights of all owners
shall be held by ((natural)) persons who are licensees or holders of a
valid license issued under this chapter or by another state ((that
entitles the holder to practice public accounting in this state)). The
principal member or manager of the limited liability company and any
member having authority over issuing reports on financial statements
shall hold a license under this chapter or issued by another state
((that entitles the holder to practice public accounting in this
state)); and
(d) The licensed firm must meet competency requirements established
by rule by the board.
(((5))) (6) Application for a license as a firm with an office in
this state shall be made upon the affidavit of the proprietor or
((person)) individual designated as managing partner, member, or
shareholder for Washington. This ((person)) individual shall hold a
license under RCW 18.04.215.
(7) In the case of a firm licensed in another state and required to
obtain a license under subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section, the
application for the firm license shall be made upon the affidavit of an
individual who qualifies for practice privileges in this state under
RCW 18.04.350(2) who has been authorized by the applicant firm to make
the application. The board shall determine in each case whether the
applicant is eligible for a license. ((A partnership, corporation, or
limited liability company which is licensed to practice under RCW
18.04.215 may use the designation "certified public accountants" or
"CPAs" in connection with its partnership, limited liability company,
or corporate name.))
(8) The board shall be given notification within ninety days after
the admission or withdrawal of a partner, shareholder, or member
engaged in this state in the practice of public accounting from any
partnership, corporation, or limited liability company so licensed.
(((6))) (9) Licensed firms ((which)) that fall out of compliance
with the provisions of this section due to changes in firm ownership
((or personnel)), after receiving or renewing a license, shall notify
the board in writing within ninety days of its falling out of
compliance and propose a time period in which they will come back into
compliance. The board may grant a reasonable period of time for a firm
to be in compliance with the provisions of this section. Failure to
bring the firm into compliance within a reasonable period of time, as
determined by the board, may result in suspension, revocation, or
imposition of conditions on the firm's license.
(((7))) (10) Fees for the license as a firm and for notification of
the board of the admission or withdrawal of a partner, shareholder, or
member shall be determined by the board. Fees shall be paid by the
firm at the time the license application form or notice of admission or
withdrawal of a partner, shareholder, or member is filed with the
board.
(((8))) (11) Nonlicensee owners of licensed firms are:
(a) Required to fully comply with the provisions of this chapter
and board rules;
(b) Required to be ((a natural person)) an individual;
(c) Required to be an active individual participant in the licensed
firm or affiliated entities as these terms are defined by board rule;
and
(d) Subject to discipline by the board for violation of this
chapter.
(((9))) (12) Resident nonlicensee owners of licensed firms are
required to meet:
(a) The ethics examination, registration, and fee requirements as
established by the board rules; and
(b) The ethics CPE requirements established by the board rules.
(((10))) (13)(a) Licensed firms must notify the board within thirty
days after:
(i) Sanction, suspension, revocation, or modification of their
professional license or practice rights by the securities exchange
commission, internal revenue service, or another state board of
accountancy;
(ii) Sanction or order against the licensee or nonlicensee firm
owner by any federal or other state agency related to the licensee's
practice of public accounting or violation of ethical or technical
standards established by board rule; or
(iii) The licensed firm is notified that it has been charged with
a violation of law that could result in the suspension or revocation of
the firm's license by a federal or other state agency, as identified by
board rule, related to the firm's professional license, practice
rights, or violation of ethical or technical standards established by
board rule.
(b) The board must adopt rules to implement this subsection and may
also adopt rules specifying requirements for licensees to report to the
board sanctions or orders relating to the licensee's practice of public
accounting or violation of ethical or technical standards entered
against the licensee by a nongovernmental professionally related
standard-setting entity.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.04.205 and 2001 c 294 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each office established or maintained in this state for the
purpose of offering to issue or issuing attest or compilation reports
((on financial statements)) in this state or that uses the title
"certified public accountant" or "CPA," shall register with the board
under this chapter every three years.
(2) Each office established or maintained in this state shall be
under the direct supervision of a resident licensee holding a license
under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215.
(3) The board shall by rule prescribe the procedure to be followed
to register and maintain offices established in this state for the
purpose of offering to issue or issuing attest or compilation reports
((on financial statements)) or that use the title "certified public
accountant" or "CPA."
(4) Fees for the registration of offices shall be determined by the
board. Fees shall be paid by the applicant at the time the
registration form is filed with the board.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.04.345 and 2001 c 294 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No ((person)) individual may assume or use the designation
"certified public accountant-inactive" or "CPA-inactive" or any other
title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device
tending to indicate that the ((person)) individual is a certified
public accountant-inactive or CPA-inactive unless the ((person))
individual holds a certificate. ((Persons)) Individuals holding only
a certificate may not practice public accounting.
(2) No ((person)) individual may hold himself or herself out to the
public or assume or use the designation "certified public accountant"
or "CPA" or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation,
sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the ((person))
individual is a certified public accountant or CPA unless the
((person)) individual qualifies for the privileges authorized by RCW
18.04.350(2) or holds a license under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215.
(3) No firm ((may hold itself out to the public as offering to
issue or issuing reports on financial statements,)) with an office in
this state may practice public accounting in this state or assume or
use the designation "certified public accountant" or "CPA" or any other
title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device
tending to indicate that the firm is composed of certified public
accountants or CPAs, unless the firm is licensed under RCW 18.04.195
and all offices of the firm in this state are maintained and registered
under RCW 18.04.205.
(4) No firm may perform the services defined in RCW 18.04.025(21)
(a), (c), or (d) for a client with its home office in this state unless
the firm is licensed under RCW 18.04.195, renews the firm license as
required under RCW 18.04.215, and all offices of the firm in this state
are maintained and registered under RCW 18.04.205.
(5) No ((person)) individual, partnership, limited liability
company, or corporation offering public accounting services to the
public may hold himself, herself, or itself out to the public, or
assume or use along, or in connection with his, hers, or its name, or
any other name the title or designation "certified accountant,"
"chartered accountant," "licensed accountant," "licensed public
accountant," "public accountant," or any other title or designation
likely to be confused with "certified public accountant" or any of the
abbreviations "CA," "LA," "LPA," or "PA," or similar abbreviations
likely to be confused with "CPA."
(((5))) (6) No licensed firm may operate under an alias, a firm
name, title, or "DBA" that differs from the firm name that is
registered with the board.
(((6))) (7) No ((person)) individual with an office in this state
may sign, affix, or associate his or her name or any trade or assumed
name used by the ((person)) individual in his or her business to any
report ((designated as an "audit," "review," or "compilation,"))
prescribed by professional standards unless the ((person)) individual
holds a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215 ((and)),
a firm holds a license under RCW 18.04.195, and all of the ((person's))
individual's offices in this state are ((licensed)) registered under
RCW 18.04.205.
(((7))) (8) No ((person)) individual licensed in another state may
sign, affix, or associate a firm name to any report ((designated as an
"audit," "review," or "compilation," unless the firm)) prescribed by
professional standards, or associate a firm name in conjunction with
the title certified public accountant, unless the individual:
(a) Qualifies for the practice privileges authorized by RCW
18.04.350(2); or
(b) Is licensed under RCW ((18.04.195)) 18.04.105 and 18.04.215,
and all of ((its)) the individual's offices in this state are
maintained and registered under RCW 18.04.205.
(((8))) (9) No ((person)) individual, partnership, limited
liability company, or corporation not holding a license to practice
under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or firm not licensed under RCW
18.04.195 or firm not registering all of the firm's offices in this
state under RCW 18.04.205, or not qualified for the practice privileges
authorized by RCW 18.04.350(2), may hold himself, herself, or itself
out to the public as an "auditor" with or without any other description
or designation by use of such word on any sign, card, letterhead, or in
any advertisement or directory.
(10) For purposes of this section, because individuals practicing
using practice privileges under RCW 18.04.350(2) are deemed
substantially equivalent to licensees under RCW 18.04.105 and
18.04.215, every word, term, or reference that includes the latter
shall be deemed to include the former, provided the conditions of such
practice privilege, as set forth in RCW 18.04.350 (4) and (5) are
maintained.
(11) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, it
is not a violation of this section for a firm that does not hold a
valid license under RCW 18.04.195 and that does not have an office in
this state to provide its professional services in this state so long
as it complies with the requirements of RCW 18.04.195(1)(b).

Sec. 6 RCW 18.04.350 and 2001 c 294 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any ((person)) individual not
holding a license and not qualified for the practice privileges
authorized by subsection (2) of this section from serving as an
employee of a firm licensed under RCW 18.04.195 and 18.04.215.
However, the employee ((or assistant)) shall not issue any
((accounting)) compilation, review, audit, or examination report on
financial ((statement)) or other information over his or her name.
(2)(((a))) An individual((,)) whose principal place of business is
not in this state((, who has a valid certificate or license as a
certified public accountant from another state, and (i) whose state of
licensure has education, examination, and experience requirements that
are deemed by the board to be substantially equivalent to this state's
requirements or (ii) who, as an individual, has education, examination,
and experience that are deemed by the board to be)) shall be presumed
to have qualifications substantially equivalent to this state's
requirements and shall have all the privileges of ((license holders))
licensees of this state without the need to obtain a license under RCW
18.04.105 ((or 18.04.195. However, such individuals shall notify the
board, under such circumstances and in such manner as the board
determines by rule, of their intent to enter the state under this
section. The board shall have the authority to establish a fee for the
practice privilege granted under this section by rule.)) if the
individual:
(a) Holds a valid license as a certified public accountant from any
state that requires, as a condition of licensure, that an individual:
(i) Have at least one hundred fifty semester hours of college or
university education including a baccalaureate or higher degree
conferred by a college or university;
(ii) Achieve a passing grade on the uniform certified public
accountant examination; and
(iii) Possess at least one year of experience including service or
advice involving the use of accounting, attest, compilation, management
advisory, financial advisory, tax, or consulting skills, all of which
was verified by a licensee; or
(b) ((An individual that enters the state under this section and is
granted this practice privilege shall abide by this chapter and the
rules adopted under this chapter and shall be subject to discipline for
violation of this chapter. However, such individual is exempt from the
continuing education requirements of this chapter provided the
individual has met the continuing education requirements of the state
in which the individual holds a valid certificate or license. The
board may accept NASBA's designation of the individual's state as
substantially equivalent to national standards, or NASBA's designation
of the applicant as substantially equivalent to national standards, as
meeting the requirement for a certified public accountant to be
substantially equivalent to this state's requirements)) Holds a valid
license as a certified public accountant from any state that does not
meet the requirements of (a) of this subsection, but such individual's
qualifications are substantially equivalent to those requirements. Any
individual who passed the uniform certified public accountant
examination and holds a valid license issued by any other state prior
to January 1, 2012, may be exempt from the education requirements in
(a)(i) of this subsection for purposes of this section.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual who
qualifies for the practice privilege under subsection (2) of this
section may offer or render professional services, whether in person or
by mail, telephone, or electronic means, and no notice, fee, or other
submission shall be provided by any such individual. Such an
individual shall be subject to the requirements of subsection (4) of
this section.
(((c))) (4) Any ((certificate or license holder)) individual
licensee of another state exercising the privilege afforded under
subsection (2) of this section and the firm that employs that licensee
simultaneously consent((s)), as a condition of ((the grant of))
exercising this privilege:
(((i))) (a) To the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and
disciplinary authority of the board;
(((ii))) (b) To comply with this chapter and the board's rules;
(c) That in the event the license from the state of the
individual's principal place of business is no longer valid, the
individual will cease offering or rendering professional services in
this state individually and on behalf of a firm; and
(d) To the appointment of the state board which issued the
certificate or license as their agent upon whom process may be served
in any action or proceeding by this state's board against the
certificate holder or licensee.
(((d))) (5) An individual who qualifies for practice privileges
under subsection (2) of this section may, for any entity with its home
office in this state, perform the following services only through a
firm that has obtained a license under RCW 18.04.195 and 18.04.215:
(a) Any financial statement audit or other engagement to be
performed in accordance with statements on auditing standards;
(b) Any examination of prospective financial information to be
performed in accordance with statements on standards for attestation
engagements; or
(c) Any engagement to be performed in accordance with public
company accounting oversight board auditing standards.
(6) A licensee of this state offering or rendering services or
using their ((certified public accountant)) CPA title in another state
shall be subject to disciplinary action in this state for an act
committed in another state for which the ((certificate or permit
holder)) licensee would be subject to discipline for an act committed
in the other state ((provided the board receives timely notification of
the act)). Notwithstanding RCW 18.04.295 and this section, the board
((may)) shall cooperate with and investigate any complaint made by the
board of accountancy of another state or jurisdiction.
(((3))) (7) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a licensee, a
licensed firm, ((or)) any of their employees, or persons qualifying for
practice privileges by this section from disclosing any data in
confidence to other certified public accountants, quality assurance or
peer review teams, partnerships, limited liability companies, or
corporations of certified public accountants or to the board or any of
its employees engaged in conducting quality assurance or peer reviews,
or any one of their employees in connection with quality or peer
reviews of that accountant's accounting and auditing practice conducted
under the auspices of recognized professional associations.
(((4))) (8) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a licensee, a
licensed firm, ((or)) any of their employees, or persons qualifying for
practice privileges by this section from disclosing any data in
confidence to any employee, representative, officer, or committee
member of a recognized professional association, or to the board, or
any of its employees or committees in connection with a professional
investigation held under the auspices of recognized professional
associations or the board.
(((5))) (9) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any officer,
employee, partner, or principal of any organization:
(a) From affixing his or her signature to any statement or report
in reference to the affairs of the organization with any wording
designating the position, title, or office which he or she holds in the
organization; or
(b) From describing himself or herself by the position, title, or
office he or she holds in such organization.
(((6))) (10) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person or firm
composed of persons not holding a license under ((RCW 18.04.215)) this
chapter from offering or rendering to the public bookkeeping,
accounting, tax services, the devising and installing of financial
information systems, management advisory, or consulting services, the
preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of advice on tax matters,
the preparation of financial statements, written statements describing
how such financial statements were prepared, or similar services,
provided that persons, partnerships, limited liability companies, or
corporations not holding a license ((under RCW 18.04.215)) who offer or
render these services do not designate any written statement as an
"audit report," "review report," or "compilation report," do not issue
any written statement which purports to express or disclaim an opinion
on financial statements which have been audited, and do not issue any
written statement which expresses assurance on financial statements
which have been reviewed.
(((7))) (11) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any act of or the
use of any words by a public official or a public employee in the
performance of his or her duties.
(((8))) (12) Nothing contained in this chapter prohibits any person
who holds only a valid certificate from assuming or using the
designation "certified public accountant-inactive" or "CPA-inactive" or
any other title, designation, words, letters, sign, card, or device
tending to indicate the person is a certificate holder, provided, that
such person does not perform or offer to perform for the public one or
more kinds of services involving the use of accounting or auditing
skills, including issuance of reports on financial statements or of one
or more kinds of management advisory, financial advisory, consulting
services, the preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of advice
on tax matters.
(((9))) (13) Nothing in this chapter prohibits the use of the title
"accountant" by any person regardless of whether the person has been
granted a certificate or holds a license under this chapter. Nothing
in this chapter prohibits the use of the title "enrolled agent" or the
designation "EA" by any person regardless of whether the person has
been granted a certificate or holds a license under this chapter if the
person is properly authorized at the time of use to use the title or
designation by the United States department of the treasury. The board
shall by rule allow the use of other titles by any person regardless of
whether the person has been granted a certificate or holds a license
under this chapter if the person using the titles or designations is
authorized at the time of use by a nationally recognized entity
sanctioning the use of board authorized titles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The code reviser shall alphabetize and
renumber the definitions in RCW 18.04.025 and correct any references.

--- END ---