BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 23B.01.410 and 2002 c 297 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Notice under this title must be provided in the form of a
record, except that oral notice of any meeting of the board of
directors may be given if expressly authorized by the articles of
incorporation or bylaws.
(2) Permissible means of transmission.
(a) Oral notice. Oral notice may be communicated in person, by
telephone, wire, or wireless equipment which does not transmit a
facsimile of the notice, or by any electronic means which does not
create a record. If these forms of oral notice are impracticable, oral
notice may be communicated by radio, television, or other form of
public broadcast communication.
(b) Notice provided in a tangible medium. Notice may be provided
in a tangible medium and be transmitted by mail, private carrier, or
personal delivery; telegraph or teletype; or telephone, wire, or
wireless equipment which transmits a facsimile of the notice. If these
forms of notice in a tangible medium are impracticable, notice in a
tangible medium may be transmitted by an advertisement in a newspaper
of general circulation in the area where published.
(c) Notice provided in an electronic transmission.
(i) Notice may be provided in an electronic transmission and be
electronically transmitted.
(ii) Notice to shareholders or directors in an electronic
transmission is effective only with respect to shareholders and
directors that have consented, in the form of a record, to receive
electronically transmitted notices under this title and designated in
the consent the address, location, or system to which these notices may
be electronically transmitted and with respect to a notice that
otherwise complies with any other requirements of this title and
applicable federal law.
(A) Notice to shareholders or directors for this purpose includes
material that this title requires ((or permits)) to accompany the
notice.
(B) A shareholder or director who has consented to receipt of
electronically transmitted notices may revoke this consent by
delivering a revocation to the corporation in the form of a record.
(C) The consent of any shareholder or director is revoked if (I)
the corporation is unable to electronically transmit two consecutive
notices given by the corporation in accordance with the consent, and
(II) this inability becomes known to the secretary of the corporation,
the transfer agent, or any other person responsible for giving the
notice. The inadvertent failure by the corporation to treat this
inability as a revocation does not invalidate any meeting or other
action.
(iii) Notice to shareholders or directors who have consented to
receipt of electronically transmitted notices may be provided by (A)
posting the notice on an electronic network and (B) delivering to the
shareholder or director a separate record of the posting, together with
comprehensible instructions regarding how to obtain access to the
posting on the electronic network.
(iv) Notice to a domestic or foreign corporation, authorized to
transact business in this state, in an electronic transmission is
effective only with respect to a corporation that has designated in a
record an address, location, or system to which the notices may be
electronically transmitted.
(d) Materials accompanying notice to shareholders of public
companies. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section or
any other section of this title, if this title requires that a notice
to shareholders be accompanied by certain material, a public company
may satisfy such a requirement, whether or not a shareholder has
consented to receive electronically transmitted notice, by (i) posting
the material on an electronic network (either separate from, or in
combination or as part of, any other materials the public company has
posted on the electronic network in compliance with applicable federal
law) at or prior to the time that the notice is delivered to the public
company's shareholders entitled to receive the notice, and (ii)
delivering to the public company's shareholders entitled to receive the
notice a separate record of the posting (which record may accompany, or
be contained in, the notice), together with comprehensible instructions
regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the electronic
network. In such a case, the material is deemed to have been delivered
to the public company's shareholders at the time the notice to the
shareholders is effective under this section. A public company that
elects pursuant to this section to post on an electronic network any
material required by this title to accompany a notice to shareholders
is required, at its expense, to provide a copy of the material in a
tangible medium (alone or in combination or as part of any other
materials the public company has posted on the electronic network in
compliance with federal law) to any shareholder entitled to such a
notice who so requests.
(3) Effective time and date of notice.
(a) Oral notice. Oral notice is effective when received.
(b) Notice provided in a tangible medium.
(i) Notice in a tangible medium, if in a comprehensible form, is
effective at the earliest of the following:
(A) If expressly authorized by the articles of incorporation or
bylaws, and if notice is sent to the person's address, telephone
number, or other number appearing on the records of the corporation,
when dispatched by telegraph, teletype, or facsimile equipment;
(B) When received;
(C) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, five days
after its deposit in the United States mail, as evidenced by the
postmark, if mailed with first-class postage, prepaid and correctly
addressed; or
(D) On the date shown on the return receipt, if sent by registered
or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the receipt is signed
by or on behalf of the addressee.
(ii) Notice in a tangible medium by a domestic or foreign
corporation to its shareholder, if in a comprehensible form and
correctly addressed to the shareholder's address shown in the
corporation's current record of shareholders, is effective:
(A) When mailed, if mailed with first-class postage prepaid; and
(B) When dispatched, if prepaid, by air courier.
(iii) Notice in a tangible medium to a domestic or foreign
corporation, authorized to transact business in this state, may be
addressed to the corporation's registered agent at its registered
office or to the corporation or its secretary at its principal office
shown in its most recent annual report, or in the case of a foreign
corporation that has not yet delivered its annual report in its
application for a certificate of authority.
(c) Notice provided in an electronic transmission. Notice provided
in an electronic transmission, if in comprehensible form, is effective
when it: (i) Is electronically transmitted to an address, location, or
system designated by the recipient for that purpose; or (ii) has been
posted on an electronic network and a separate record of the posting
has been delivered to the recipient together with comprehensible
instructions regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the
electronic network.
(4) If this title prescribes notice requirements for particular
circumstances, those requirements govern. If articles of incorporation
or bylaws prescribe notice requirements, not inconsistent with this
section or other provisions of this title, those requirements govern.

--- END ---