BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the arts can
teach much about every culture through its literature, visual arts,
music, dance, and drama. Throughout history people have recorded their
struggles, their dreams, and their lives in works of art. Many people
recognize that to be truly well-educated, one must not only learn to
appreciate the arts but must have rich opportunities to actively
participate in creative work.
The legislature further finds that the arts can bring every
academic subject to life and that the integration of the arts with the
fuller academic curriculum, including reading, mathematics, science,
and social studies, can enrich student experiences, enhance student
engagement, extend student learning, and deepen student understanding
of all the academic content areas. The legislature intends to provide
resources to help improve arts-infused curriculum and integration into
our schools and transform the teaching, learning, and school
environments in Washington through the use of the arts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2012-13 school year, the school arts
programs account committee shall establish an annual grant process to
institute and sustain arts-infused curriculum, programs, and projects
in public schools, which could include professional development for
classroom teachers, specialist teachers, and principals in order to
continue the curriculum, programs, and projects in the future.
Curriculum, programs, and projects funded through the school arts
programs account committee shall assist students to make connections
within and across the arts to other disciplines, to learn about other
cultures, and to strengthen communities through the use of the arts.
(2) Only cities, counties, nonprofit arts agencies and
organizations, artists, public schools, school districts, and
educational service districts in Washington may apply for school arts
programs account funds. Each application must involve at least one
arts agency, arts organization, or artist and at least one public
school.
(3) To the maximum extent possible, the school arts programs
account committee shall distribute grants based upon full-time
equivalent student populations in each of the nine educational service
districts and shall reserve no less than ten percent and no more than
twenty-five percent of total annual funds for proposals with a
statewide focus delivered regionally.
(4) The executive director of the Washington state arts commission
shall designate a school arts programs account committee. The
superintendent of public instruction shall appoint two members and the
executive director of the Washington state arts commission shall
appoint two members. A fifth at-large member shall be selected by the
four appointed members. Term lengths for school arts programs account
committee members shall be determined jointly by the superintendent of
public instruction and the executive director of the Washington state
arts commission.
(5) The Washington state arts commission shall spend no more than
three and one-half percent of annual state arts programs account funds
for administrative staffing and other expenses related to managing the
program. Members of the state arts programs account committee shall
serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses
as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6)(a) The executive director of the Washington state arts
commission, in conjunction with the state arts programs account
committee, shall acknowledge the Washington state lottery as the source
of state arts programs account funds for all grant programs and
projects in all state arts programs account committee and Washington
state arts commission publications including, but not limited to, grant
solicitations and brochures, advertising, and press releases.
(b) For each completed program and project funded by the state arts
programs account, the Washington state arts commission executive
director and the state arts programs account committee shall
acknowledge the Washington state lottery as the funding source through
enduring signage, including by film or written credit, or
acknowledgment approved by the Washington state lottery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The school arts programs account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Receipts from the state lottery, as provided in RCW
67.70.240(6) must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only to establish and sustain arts programs in
public schools in accordance with section 2 of this act. Only one of
the members of the school arts programs account committee created in
section 2 of this act appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction and one of the members appointed by the Washington state
arts commission may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 4 RCW 67.70.240 and 2001 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
The moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:
(1) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery
tickets or shares;
(2) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account
created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260;
(3) For purposes of making deposits into the education construction
fund and student achievement fund created in RCW 43.135.045. For the
transition period from July 1, 2001, until and including June 30, 2002,
fifty percent of the moneys not otherwise obligated under this section
shall be placed in the student achievement fund and fifty percent of
these moneys shall be placed in the education construction fund. On
and after July 1, 2002, until June 30, 2004, seventy-five percent of
these moneys shall be placed in the student achievement fund and
twenty-five percent shall be placed in the education construction fund.
On and after July 1, 2004, all deposits not otherwise obligated under
this section shall be placed in the education construction fund.
Moneys in the state lottery account deposited in the education
construction fund and the student achievement fund are included in
"general state revenues" under RCW 39.42.070;
(4) For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the
principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to
construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including
reasonably necessary preconstruction costs. Three million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during calendar year 1996.
During subsequent years, such distributions shall equal the prior
year's distributions increased by four percent. Distributions under
this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued for the construction
of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than twenty years
after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;
(5) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account,
created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW
43.99N.070, six million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent years,
such distribution shall equal the prior year's distributions increased
by four percent. No distribution may be made under this subsection
after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of the
bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this
subsection shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than
December 31, 2020;
(6) For distribution to the school arts programs account as created
in section 3 of this act. The distributions in subsection (4) of this
section, upon the earlier of retirement of the baseball stadium bonds
or twenty years after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed,
shall be distributed for the purposes of and subject to the conditions
of sections 2 and 3 of this act;
(7) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and
(((7))) (8) For the payment of agent compensation.
The office of financial management shall require the allotment of
all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes
in the allotments.

--- END ---