BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.320.125 and 2007 c 406 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature considers it to be a matter of public safety
for public schools and staff to have current safe school plans and
procedures in place, fully consistent with federal law. The
legislature further finds and intends, by requiring safe school plans
to be in place, that school districts will become eligible for federal
assistance. The legislature further finds that schools are in a
position to serve the community in the event of an emergency resulting
from natural disasters or man-made disasters.
(2) Schools and school districts shall coordinate its safe school
plan with their respective local emergency management agency and
consider the guidance provided by the superintendent of public
instruction, including the comprehensive school safety checklist and
the model comprehensive safe school plans that include prevention,
intervention, all hazard/crisis response, and postcrisis recovery, when
developing their own individual comprehensive safe school plans. Each
school district shall adopt, no later than September 1, 2008, and
implement a safe school plan consistent with the school mapping
information system pursuant to RCW 36.28A.060. The plan shall:
(a) Include required school safety policies and procedures;
(b) Address emergency mitigation, preparedness, response, and
recovery;
(c) Include provisions for assisting and communicating with
students and staff, including those with special needs or disabilities;
(d) Use the training guidance provided by the Washington emergency
management division of the state military department in collaboration
with the Washington state office of the superintendent of public
instruction school safety center and the school safety center advisory
committee;
(e) Require the building principal to be certified on the incident
command system;
(f) Take into account the manner in which the school facilities may
be used as a community asset in the event of a community-wide
emergency; and
(g) Set guidelines for requesting city or county law enforcement
agencies, local fire departments, emergency service providers, and
county emergency management agencies to meet with school districts and
participate in safety-related drills annually.
(3) School districts shall annually:
(a) Review and update safe school plans in collaboration with local
emergency response agencies;
(b) Conduct an inventory of all hazardous materials;
(c) Update information on the school mapping information system to
reflect current staffing and updated plans, including:
(i) Identifying all staff members who are trained on the national
incident management system, trained on the incident command system, or
are certified on the incident command system; and
(ii) Identifying school transportation procedures for evacuation,
to include bus staging areas, evacuation routes, communication systems,
parent-student reunification sites, and secondary transportation
agreements consistent with the school mapping information system; and
(d) Provide information to all staff on the use of emergency
supplies and notification and alert procedures.
(4) School districts are required to annually record and report on
the information and activities required in subsection (3) of this
section to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.
(5) School districts are encouraged to work with local emergency
management agencies and other emergency responders to conduct one
tabletop exercise, one functional exercise, and two full-scale
exercises within a four-year period.
(6) Schools shall conduct no less than one safety-related drill
each month that school is in session. Schools shall complete no less
than one drill using the school mapping information system, one drill
for lockdowns, one drill for shelter-in-place, and six drills for fire
evacuation in accordance with the state fire code. Schools should
consider drills for earthquakes, tsunamis, or other high-risk local
events. Schools shall document the date and time of such drills. This
subsection is intended to satisfy all federal requirements for
comprehensive school emergency drills and evacuations.
(7) Educational service districts are encouraged to apply for
federal emergency response and crisis management grants with the
assistance of the superintendent of public instruction and the
Washington emergency management division of the state military
department.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to
implement provisions of this section. These rules may include, but are
not limited to, provisions for evacuations, lockdowns, or other
components of a comprehensive safe school plan.

--- END ---