BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW
to read as follows:
When funded, the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs shall convene and facilitate a work group of sheriffs and
emergency managers from the counties of Island, Snohomish, Skagit,
Whatcom, San Juan, Clallam, and Jefferson, and other appropriate
individuals, to study and make recommendations regarding the
enhancement of current recreational boating enforcement programs to
include coastal defense duties. The Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs shall report the findings and recommendations of the
work group to the legislature by December 31, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---