BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
joint analytical center, otherwise known as WAJAC, is a conglomerate
group encompassing the Washington state patrol, the intelligence
subcommittee of the governor's committee on homeland security, and the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. These entities
work cooperatively with other federal, state, and local agencies in
order to promote intelligence-led policing as well as to gather,
analyze, and share intelligence information on terrorists and other
organized criminal groups that could compromise the public safety of
the citizens of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington joint analytical center is created. The
Washington state patrol shall provide administrative support for the
Washington joint analytical center.
(2) The Washington joint analytical center is responsible for:
(a) Serving as the state's central center for all terrorism-related
information;
(b) Working cooperatively with the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs in order to collect and analyze information
to develop actionable intelligence;
(c) Creating and maintaining seamless and ongoing partnerships with
federal, state, local, and tribal agencies, as well as private
entities; and
(d) Working cooperatively with the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs in order to increase better information
interchange between local, state, and federal law enforcement and
criminal justice agencies.
(3) The Washington joint analytical center shall be governed by a
board of law enforcement executives, appointed by the executive board
of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of four million six hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the
Washington state patrol for the purposes of section 2 of this act.

--- END ---