BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that coordinated
planning ensures preparation for all future crises. While it is
impossible to eliminate the threats posed to our higher education
campuses by crime or disaster, natural or person-caused, it is
necessary to mitigate impact through effective all hazard emergency
preparedness. The legislature also finds that notifying college and
university campus communities of an impending, ongoing, or diffused
emergency situation is one of the most critical capabilities that a
college or university must have. But how a higher education
institution achieves the ability to alert students, faculty, and staff
quickly, accurately, and dependably in an emergency situation is not a
one size fits all solution. While colleges and universities should
maintain their autonomy in choosing how to address safety and security
risks, certain consistent protocols are essential for making campuses
safer. The legislature further finds that higher education
institutions need to ensure that campus law enforcement or security
communications equipment, as well as communication systems used by
colleges and universities during an emergency, meet technical standards
and are compatible with other responding agencies' communication
systems. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to carefully
examine best safety practices at the state's institutions of higher
education, examine the use of technology to improve emergency
communications, and consider the financial implications of safety and
security enhancement plans, as well as the funding sources to support
them, in order to maximize limited resources and public benefit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Washington state patrol and the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, in consultation
with the state board for community and technical colleges, the council
of presidents, the independent colleges of Washington, and the
department of information services, shall conduct a needs analysis and
fiscal impact study of potential college and university campus security
enhancements, including the addition of two-year and four-year public
higher education institutions to the statewide first responder building
mapping information system as provided under RCW 36.28A.060.
(1) The study shall:
(a) Assess public and independent colleges and universities to
determine whether campus emergency and critical incident plans are
up-to-date, comprehensive, and regularly exercised;
(b) Evaluate the potential risks associated with individual types
of buildings on all campuses and recommend buildings that are a high
priority for adding to the statewide first responder building mapping
information system;
(c) Determine the costs and timelines associated with adding
priority campus buildings to the statewide first responder building
mapping information system;
(d) Assess campus emergency notification systems or devices,
including emergency radio systems, to determine functionality in the
campus environment, the adequacy of coverage throughout a campus, and
operational compatibility with the radio systems and frequencies
utilized by state and local responding agencies.
(2) The Washington state patrol and the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs shall report findings and recommendations to
the governor and the legislature by November 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus capital appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

--- END ---