BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.48.030 and 2007 c 218 s 72 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor is hereby authorized to enter on behalf of the
state into an agreement with the federal secretary of health((,
education, and welfare)) and human services consistent with the terms
and provisions of this chapter, for the purpose of extending the
benefits of the federal old-age and survivors insurance system to
employees of the state or any political subdivision not members of an
existing retirement system, or to members of a retirement system
established by the state or by a political subdivision thereof or by an
institution of higher learning with respect to services specified in
such agreement which constitute "employment" as defined in RCW
41.48.020. Such agreement may contain such provisions relating to
coverage, benefits, contributions, effective date, modification and
termination of the agreement, administration, and other appropriate
provisions as the governor and secretary of health((, education, and
welfare)) and human services shall agree upon, but, except as may be
otherwise required by or under the social security act as to the
services to be covered, such agreement shall provide in effect that((--
)):
(a) Benefits will be provided for employees whose services are
covered by the agreement (and their dependents and survivors) on the
same basis as though such services constituted employment within the
meaning of Title II of the social security act;
(b) The state will pay to the secretary of the treasury, at such
time or times as may be prescribed under the social security act,
contributions with respect to wages (as defined in RCW 41.48.020),
equal to the sum of the taxes which would be imposed by the federal
insurance contributions act if the services covered by the agreement
constituted employment within the meaning of that act;
(c) Such agreement shall be effective with respect to services in
employment covered by the agreement or modification thereof performed
after a date specified therein but in no event may it be effective with
respect to any such services performed prior to the first day of the
calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year in which such
agreement or modification of the agreement is accepted by the secretary
of health((, education and welfare)) and human services;
(d) All services which constitute employment as defined in RCW
41.48.020 and are performed in the employ of the state by employees of
the state, shall be covered by the agreement;
(e) All services which (i) constitute employment as defined in RCW
41.48.020, (ii) are performed in the employ of a political subdivision
of the state, and (iii) are covered by a plan which is in conformity
with the terms of the agreement and has been approved by the governor
under RCW 41.48.050, shall be covered by the agreement; ((and))
(f) As modified, the agreement shall include all services described
in either ((paragraph)) (d) or ((paragraph)) (e) of this subsection and
performed by individuals to whom section 218(c)(3)(C) of the social
security act is applicable, and shall provide that the service of any
such individual shall continue to be covered by the agreement in case
he or she thereafter becomes eligible to be a member of a retirement
system; ((and))
(g) As modified, the agreement shall include all services described
in either ((paragraph)) (d) or ((paragraph)) (e) of this subsection and
performed by individuals in positions covered by a retirement system
with respect to which the governor has issued a certificate to the
secretary of health((, education, and welfare)) and human services
pursuant to subsection (5) of this section; and
(h) Law enforcement officers and firefighters of each political
subdivision of this state who are covered by the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system act
(((chapter 209, Laws of 1969 ex. sess.) as now in existence or
hereafter amended)), chapter 41.26 RCW, shall constitute a separate
"coverage group" for purposes of the agreement entered into under this
section and for purposes of section 218 of the social security act.
((To the extent that the agreement between this state and the federal
secretary of health, education, and welfare in existence on the date of
adoption of this subsection is inconsistent with this subsection, the
governor shall seek to modify the inconsistency.))
(2) Any instrumentality jointly created by this state and any other
state or states is hereby authorized, upon the granting of like
authority by such other state or states, (a) to enter into an agreement
with the secretary of health((, education, and welfare)) and human
services whereby the benefits of the federal old-age and survivors
insurance system shall be extended to employees of such
instrumentality, (b) to require its employees to pay (and for that
purpose to deduct from their wages) contributions equal to the amounts
which they would be required to pay under RCW 41.48.040(1) if they were
covered by an agreement made pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, and (c) to make payments to the secretary of the treasury in
accordance with such agreement, including payments from its own funds,
and otherwise to comply with such agreements. Such agreement shall, to
the extent practicable, be consistent with the terms and provisions of
subsection (1) of this section and other provisions of this chapter.
(3) The governor is empowered to authorize a referendum, and to
designate an agency or individual to supervise its conduct, in
accordance with the requirements of section 218(d)(3) of the social
security act, and subsection (4) of this section on the question of
whether service in all positions covered by a retirement system
established by the state or by a political subdivision thereof should
be excluded from or included under an agreement under this chapter. If
a retirement system covers positions of employees of the state of
Washington, of the institutions of higher learning, and positions of
employees of one or more of the political subdivisions of the state,
then for the purpose of the referendum as provided ((herein)) in this
section, there may be deemed to be a separate retirement system with
respect to employees of the state, or any one or more of the political
subdivisions, or institutions of higher learning and the governor shall
authorize a referendum upon request of the subdivisions' or
institutions' of higher learning governing body: PROVIDED HOWEVER,
That if a referendum of state employees generally fails to produce a
favorable majority vote then the governor may authorize a referendum
covering positions of employees in any state department who are
compensated in whole or in part from grants made to this state under
Title III of the federal social security act: PROVIDED, That any city
or town affiliated with the statewide city employees retirement system
organized under chapter 41.44 RCW may at its option agree to a plan
submitted by the board of trustees of ((said)) that statewide city
employees retirement system for inclusion under an agreement under this
chapter if the referendum to be held as provided ((herein)) in this
section indicates a favorable result: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
teachers' retirement system be considered one system for the purpose of
the referendum except as applied to the several colleges of education.
The notice of referendum required by section 218(d)(3)(C) of the social
security act to be given to employees shall contain or shall be
accompanied by a statement, in such form and such detail as the agency
or individual designated to supervise the referendum shall deem
necessary and sufficient, to inform the employees of the rights which
will accrue to them and their dependents and survivors, and the
liabilities to which they will be subject, if their services are
included under an agreement under this chapter.
(4) The governor, before authorizing a referendum, shall require
the following conditions to be met:
(a) The referendum shall be by secret written ballot on the
question of whether service in positions covered by such retirement
system shall be excluded from or included under the agreement between
the governor and the secretary of health((, education, and welfare))
and human services provided for in ((RCW 41.48.030(1))) subsection (1)
of this section;
(b) An opportunity to vote in such referendum shall be given and
shall be limited to eligible employees;
(c) Not less than ninety days' notice of such referendum shall be
given to all such employees;
(d) Such referendum shall be conducted under the supervision
((())of the governor or(())) of an agency or individual designated by
the governor;
(e) The proposal for coverage shall be approved only if a majority
of the eligible employees vote in favor of including services in such
positions under the agreement. Coverage obtained through a divided
referendum process shall extend coverage to law enforcement officers,
firefighters, and employees of political subdivisions of this state,
who have membership in a qualified retirement system, allowing them to
obtain medicare coverage only (HI-only). In such a divided referendum
process, those members voting in favor of medicare coverage constitute
a separate coverage group;
(f) The state legislature, in the case of a referendum affecting
the rights and liabilities of state employees covered under the state
employees' retirement system and employees under the teachers'
retirement system, and in all other cases the local legislative
authority or governing body, shall have specifically approved the
proposed plan and approved any necessary structural adjustment to the
existing system to conform with the proposed plan;
(g) In the case of a referendum authorized under section 218(d)(6)
of the social security act, the retirement system will be divided into
two parts or divisions. One part or division of the retirement system
shall be composed of positions of those members of the system who
desire coverage under the agreement as permitted by this section. The
remaining part or division of the retirement system shall be composed
of positions of those members who do not desire coverage under such an
agreement. Each part or division is a separate retirement system for
the purposes of section 218(d) of the social security act. The
positions of individuals who become members of the system after the
coverage is extended shall be included in the part or division of the
system composed of members desiring the coverage, with the exception of
positions that are excluded in the agreement.
(5) Upon receiving satisfactory evidence that with respect to any
such referendum the conditions specified in subsection (4) of this
section and section 218(d)(3) of the social security act have been met,
the governor shall so certify to the secretary of health((, education,
and welfare)) and human services.
(6) If the legislative body of any political subdivision of this
state certifies to the governor that a referendum has been held under
the terms of RCW 41.48.050(1)(i) and gives notice to the governor of
termination of social security for any coverage group of the political
subdivision, the governor shall give two years advance notice in
writing to the federal department of health((, education, and welfare))
and human services of ((such)) the termination of the agreement entered
into under this section with respect to ((said)) that coverage group.

--- END ---