BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that consumers should
have access to a diversity of renewable fuels and fuel blends ranging
from fuels composed of no renewable content to completely renewable
fuels. It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that minimum
renewable fuel content and reporting requirements for biodiesel and
ethanol are enforced.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.112.110 and 2006 c 338 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each special fuel licensee((s)) under chapter 82.38 RCW, other
than international fuel tax agreement licensees, dyed special fuel
users, and special fuel distributors, shall provide evidence to the
department of licensing that at least two percent of ((the)) its total
annual diesel fuel ((sold)) sales in Washington ((is)) are biodiesel
fuel, following the earlier of: (a) November 30, 2008; or (b) when a
determination is made by the director, published in the Washington
State Register, that feedstock grown in Washington state can satisfy a
two-percent requirement.
(2) Each special fuel licensee((s)) under chapter 82.38 RCW, other
than international fuel tax agreement licensees, dyed special fuel
users, and special fuel distributors, shall provide evidence to the
department of licensing that at least five percent of its total annual
diesel fuel ((sold)) sales in Washington ((is)) are biodiesel fuel,
when the director determines, and publishes this determination in the
Washington State Register, that both in-state oil seed crushing
capacity and feedstock grown in Washington state can satisfy a
three-percent requirement.
(3) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section
shall take effect no sooner than one hundred eighty days after the
determination has been published in the Washington State Register.
(4) The director and the director of licensing shall each adopt
rules, in coordination with each other, for enforcing and carrying out
the purposes of this section.
(5) If the governor designates, as described under section 4(4)(b)
of this act, a state agency other than the department of licensing to
adopt rules to enforce the minimum renewable fuel content and reporting
requirements, that agency is responsible for the duties of the
department of licensing in this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.112.120 and 2007 c 309 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2008, each motor vehicle fuel licensee((s))
under chapter 82.36 RCW, other than motor vehicle fuel distributors,
shall provide evidence to the department of licensing that at least two
percent of its total gasoline ((sold)) sales in Washington, measured on
a quarterly basis, ((is)) are denatured ethanol.
(2) If the director of ecology determines that ethanol content
greater than two percent of the total gasoline sold in Washington will
not jeopardize continued attainment of the federal clean air act's
national ambient air quality standard for ozone pollution in Washington
and the director of agriculture determines and publishes this
determination in the Washington State Register that sufficient raw
materials are available within Washington to support economical
production of ethanol at higher levels, the director of agriculture may
require by rule that each licensee((s)) provide evidence to the
department of licensing that denatured ethanol comprises between two
percent and at least ten percent of its total gasoline ((sold)) sales
in Washington, measured on a quarterly basis.
(3) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section
shall take effect no sooner than one hundred eighty days after the
determination has been published in the Washington State Register.
(4) The director and the director of licensing shall each adopt
rules, in coordination with each other, for enforcing and carrying out
the purposes of this section.
(5) Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit the production,
sale, or use of motor fuel for use in federally designated flexibly
fueled vehicles capable of using E85 motor fuel. Nothing in this
section is intended to limit the use of high octane gasoline not
blended with ethanol for use in aircraft.
(6) If the governor designates, as described under section 4(4)(b)
of this act, a state agency other than the department of licensing to
adopt rules to enforce the minimum renewable fuel content and reporting
requirements, that agency is responsible for the duties of the
department of licensing in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 15, 2009, each special fuel licensee under RCW
19.112.110(1) and each motor vehicle fuel licensee under RCW
19.112.120(1) shall submit a quarterly renewable fuel content report
providing evidence of compliance to the energy policy division of the
department of community, trade, and economic development. The report
must contain the following:
(a) The number of gallons of biodiesel fuel and ethanol requested
quarterly from suppliers, blenders, or importers for distribution in
Washington;
(b) The number of gallons of biodiesel fuel and ethanol procured
quarterly from suppliers, blenders, or importers for distribution in
Washington;
(c) The number of gallons of diesel and gasoline procured quarterly
from suppliers, blenders, or importers for distribution in Washington;
and
(d) A brief description on efforts made by the licensee to comply
with the minimum renewable fuel content requirements under RCW
19.112.110 and 19.112.120.
(2)(a) The quarterly renewable fuel content report must be
submitted to the energy policy division of the department of community,
trade, and economic development within fifteen days after the end of
the quarter.
(b) The first quarterly report submitted by each licensee on
January 15, 2009, must be collected by the energy policy division of
the department of community, trade, and economic development for
informational purposes. The energy policy division of the department
of community, trade, and economic development shall notify licensees
failing to submit the first quarterly report and inform them of the
requirement to report under this section.
(c) Beginning April 15, 2009, the failure to submit a renewable
fuel content report by a licensee is deemed willful and results in a
penalty for disregarding the reporting requirements under RCW
19.112.110 and 19.112.120.
(d) The director of the energy policy division of the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall impose a penalty on a
licensee for failure to submit a quarterly renewable fuel content
report. The penalty must be equal to ten thousand dollars for each
renewable fuel content quarterly report not submitted to the energy
policy division of the department of community, trade, and economic
development. The penalty must be paid within fourteen days after
notification by the energy policy division of the department of
community, trade, and economic development of a failure to submit a
quarterly renewable fuel content report.
(3) The director of the energy policy division of the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall design the quarterly
renewable fuel content report as required under this section,
distribute the report to applicable licensees in a timely manner,
collect submitted reports, and submit an annual report to the
legislature detailing compliance with the renewable fuel content
requirements under RCW 19.112.110 and 19.112.120.
(4)(a) By December 1, 2009, the energy policy division of the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall report
to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature (i)
its recommendations on the lowest cost method for ensuring compliance
with the minimum renewable fuel content and reporting requirements
under RCW 19.112.110 and 19.112.120 and (ii) which state agency should
adopt rules to enforce the minimum renewable fuel content and reporting
requirements under RCW 19.112.110 and 19.112.120. The energy policy
division of the department of community, trade, and economic
development shall prepare its recommendations in consultation with the
department of licensing, the department of agriculture, and the
department of revenue in preparation of the report.
(b) By December 30, 2009, the governor shall determine the
appropriate agency to adopt rules to enforce the minimum renewable fuel
content and reporting requirements under RCW 19.112.110 and 19.112.120
and shall designate the state agency to develop rules to enforce the
minimum renewable fuel content and reporting requirements under RCW
19.112.110 and 19.112.120.
(5) All penalties paid under this section to the energy policy
division of the department of community, trade, and economic
development shall be deposited into the energy freedom account under
RCW 43.325.040.
(6) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall not publicly release, unless pursuant to an order of a court of
competent jurisdiction, information submitted under this section as
required by RCW 19.112.110 or 19.112.120, except information disclosed
in aggregate form that does not permit the identification of
information related to individual fuel licensees.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.21F.045 and 1996 c 186 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall supervise and administer energy-related
activities as specified in RCW 43.330.904 and shall advise the governor
and the legislature with respect to energy matters affecting the state.
(2) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the
department, the department shall have the following powers and duties:
(a) Prepare and update contingency plans for implementation in the
event of energy shortages or emergencies. The plans shall conform to
chapter 43.21G RCW and shall include procedures for determining when
these shortages or emergencies exist, the state officers and agencies
to participate in the determination, and actions to be taken by various
agencies and officers of state government in order to reduce hardship
and maintain the general welfare during these emergencies. The
department shall coordinate the activities undertaken pursuant to this
subsection with other persons. The components of plans that require
legislation for their implementation shall be presented to the
legislature in the form of proposed legislation at the earliest
practicable date. The department shall report to the governor and the
legislature on probable, imminent, and existing energy shortages, and
shall administer energy allocation and curtailment programs in
accordance with chapter 43.21G RCW.
(b) Establish and maintain a central repository in state government
for collection of existing data on energy resources, including:
(i) Supply, demand, costs, utilization technology, projections, and
forecasts;
(ii) Comparative costs of alternative energy sources, uses, and
applications; and
(iii) Inventory data on energy research projects in the state
conducted under public and/or private auspices, and the results
thereof.
(c) Coordinate federal energy programs appropriate for state-level
implementation, carry out such energy programs as are assigned to it by
the governor or the legislature, and monitor federally funded local
energy programs as required by federal or state regulations.
(d) Develop energy policy recommendations for consideration by the
governor and the legislature.
(e) Provide assistance, space, and other support as may be
necessary for the activities of the state's two representatives to the
Pacific northwest electric power and conservation planning council. To
the extent consistent with federal law, the director shall request that
Washington's council members request the administrator of the
Bonneville power administration to reimburse the state for the expenses
associated with the support as provided in the Pacific Northwest
Electric Power Planning and Conservation Act (P.L. 96-501).
(f) Cooperate with state agencies, other governmental units, and
private interests in the prioritization and implementation of the state
energy strategy elements and on other energy matters.
(g) Serve as the official state agency responsible for coordinating
implementation of the state energy strategy.
(h) No later than December 1, 1982, and by December 1st of each
even-numbered year thereafter, prepare and transmit to the governor and
the appropriate committees of the legislature a report on the
implementation of the state energy strategy and other important energy
issues, as appropriate.
(i) Provide support for increasing cost-effective energy
conservation, including assisting in the removal of impediments to
timely implementation.
(j) Provide support for the development of cost-effective energy
resources including assisting in the removal of impediments to timely
construction.
(k) Adopt rules, under chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to carry out
the powers and duties enumerated in this chapter.
(l) Provide administrative assistance, space, and other support as
may be necessary for the activities of the energy facility site
evaluation council, as provided for in RCW 80.50.030.
(m) Appoint staff as may be needed to administer energy policy
functions and manage energy facility site evaluation council
activities. These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter
41.06 RCW.
(n) Ensure compliance with the minimum renewable fuel content
reporting requirements under section 4 of this act.
(3) To the extent the powers and duties set out under this section
relate to energy education, applied research, and technology transfer
programs they are transferred to Washington State University.
(4) To the extent the powers and duties set out under this section
relate to energy efficiency in public buildings they are transferred to
the department of general administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The director of licensing shall adopt rules to enforce the
minimum renewable fuel content and reporting requirements under RCW
19.112.110 and 19.112.120.
(b) The director shall impose penalties to enforce the minimum
renewable fuel content and reporting requirements under RCW 19.112.110
and 19.112.120.
(2) This section applies only if the governor designates the
department of licensing as the agency to adopt rules to enforce the
minimum renewable fuel content and reporting requirements under RCW
19.112.110 and 19.112.120 under section 4(4)(b) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall adopt rules to enforce the minimum renewable
fuel content and reporting requirements under RCW 19.112.110 and
19.112.120.
(b) The director shall impose penalties to enforce the minimum
renewable fuel content and reporting requirements under RCW 19.112.110
and 19.112.120.
(2) This section applies only if the governor designates the
department of community, trade, and economic development as the agency
to adopt rules to enforce the minimum renewable fuel content and
reporting requirements under RCW 19.112.110 and 19.112.120 under
section 4(4)(b) of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.112.130 and 2006 c 338 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of ((licensing)) community, trade, and economic
development shall not publicly release, unless pursuant to an order of
a court of competent jurisdiction, information submitted as evidence as
required by RCW 19.112.110 or 19.112.120, except information disclosed
in aggregate form that does not permit the identification of
information related to individual fuel licensees.
(2) This section applies only if the governor designates the
department of community, trade, and economic development as the agency
to adopt rules to enforce the minimum renewable fuel content and
reporting requirements under RCW 19.112.110 and 19.112.120 under
section 4(4)(b) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The director shall adopt rules to enforce the minimum
renewable fuel content and reporting requirements under RCW 19.112.110
and 19.112.120.
(b) The director shall impose penalties to enforce the minimum
renewable fuel content and reporting requirements under RCW 19.112.110
and 19.112.120.
(2) This section applies only if the governor designates the
department as the agency to adopt rules to enforce the minimum
renewable fuel content and reporting requirements under RCW 19.112.110
and 19.112.120 under section 4(4)(b) of this act.

Sec. 10 RCW 19.112.130 and 2006 c 338 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of ((licensing)) revenue shall not publicly
release, unless pursuant to an order of a court of competent
jurisdiction, information submitted as evidence as required by RCW
19.112.110 or 19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate
form that does not permit the identification of information related to
individual fuel licensees.
(2) This section applies only if the governor designates the
department of revenue as the agency to adopt rules to enforce the
minimum renewable fuel content and reporting requirements under RCW
19.112.110 and 19.112.120 under section 4(4)(b) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.23 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The director of the department shall adopt rules to enforce
the minimum renewable fuel content and reporting requirements under RCW
19.112.110 and 19.112.120.
(b) The director of the department shall impose penalties to
enforce the minimum renewable fuel content and reporting requirements
under RCW 19.112.110 and 19.112.120.
(2) This section applies only if the governor designates the
department as the agency to adopt rules to enforce the minimum
renewable fuel content and reporting requirements under RCW 19.112.110
and 19.112.120 under section 4(4)(b) of this act.

Sec. 12 RCW 19.112.130 and 2006 c 338 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of ((licensing)) agriculture shall not publicly
release, unless pursuant to an order of a court of competent
jurisdiction, information submitted as evidence as required by RCW
19.112.110 or 19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate
form that does not permit the identification of information related to
individual fuel licensees.
(2) This section applies only if the governor designates the
department of agriculture as the agency to adopt rules to enforce the
minimum renewable fuel content and reporting requirements under RCW
19.112.110 and 19.112.120 under section 4(4)(b) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 4 and 5 of this act expire July 1,
2010.

--- END ---