BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.84.010 and 1991 c 222 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent and purpose of this chapter to protect the public
by the certification and registration of practitioners of radiological
technology. By promoting high standards of professional performance,
by requiring professional accountability, and by credentialing those
persons who seek to provide radiological technology under the title of
((radiological)) radiologic technologists, and by regulating all
persons utilizing ionizing radiation on human beings this chapter
identifies those practitioners who have achieved a particular level of
competency. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require that
individual or group policies or contracts of an insurance carrier,
health care service contractor, or health maintenance organization
provide benefits or coverage for services and supplies provided by a
person certified under this chapter.
The legislature finds and declares that this chapter conforms to
the guidelines, terms, and definitions for the credentialing of health
or health-related professions specified under chapter 18.120 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.84.020 and 2000 c 93 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(3) "Licensed practitioner" means any licensed health care
practitioner performing services within the person's authorized scope
of practice.
(4) "Radiologic technologist" means an individual certified under
this chapter, other than a licensed practitioner, who practices
radiologic technology as a:
(a) Diagnostic radiologic technologist, who is a person who
actually handles X-ray equipment in the process of applying radiation
on a human being for diagnostic purposes at the direction of a licensed
practitioner, this includes parenteral procedures related to radiologic
technology when performed under the direct supervision of a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW; ((or))
(b) Therapeutic radiologic technologist, who is a person who uses
radiation-generating equipment for therapeutic purposes on human
subjects at the direction of a licensed practitioner, this includes
parenteral procedures related to radiologic technology when performed
under the direct supervision of a physician licensed under chapter
18.71 or 18.57 RCW; ((or))
(c) Nuclear medicine technologist, who is a person who prepares
radiopharmaceuticals and administers them to human beings for
diagnostic and therapeutic purposes and who performs in vivo and in
vitro detection and measurement of radioactivity for medical purposes
at the direction of a licensed practitioner; or
(d) Radiologist assistant, who is an advanced-level certified
diagnostic radiologic technologist who practices under levels of
supervision defined by the secretary, and:
(i) Enhances patient care by assisting the radiologist in the
diagnostic imaging environment;
(ii) Performs advanced diagnostic procedures including injecting
agents that facilitate or enable diagnostic imaging, performs selected
diagnostic aspirations and needle localizations for biopsy under
radiologist direction and supervision, performs fluoroscopy, and
placing nasoenteric and oroenteric feeding tubes in uncomplicated
patients;
(iii) Monitors and tailors selected examinations;
(iv) Communicates preliminary observations to a radiologist and
communicates final radiologist reports to referring health care
providers when directed;
(v) Performs selected peripheral venous diagnostic procedures; and
(vi) Assists radiologists with invasive procedures and performs
additional procedures under radiologist direction and supervision.
(5) "Approved school of radiologic technology" means a school of
radiologic technology or radiologist assistant program approved by the
council on medical education of the American medical association or the
American registry of radiologic technologists or a school found to
maintain the equivalent of such a course of study as determined by the
department. Such school may be operated by a medical or educational
institution, and for the purpose of providing the requisite clinical
experience, shall be affiliated with one or more general hospitals.
(6) "Radiologic technology" means the use of ionizing radiation
upon a human being for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes.
(7) "Radiologist" means a physician certified by the American board
of radiology or the American osteopathic board of radiology.
(8) "Registered X-ray technician" means a person who is registered
with the department, and who applies ionizing radiation at the
direction of a licensed practitioner and who does not perform
parenteral procedures.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.84.030 and 1991 c 222 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person may practice radiologic technology without being
registered or certified under this chapter, unless that person is a
licensed practitioner as defined in RCW 18.84.020(3). A person
represents himself or herself to the public as a certified
((radiological)) radiologic technologist when that person adopts or
uses a title or description of services that incorporates one or more
of the following items or designations:
(1) Certified radiologic technologist or CRT, for persons so
certified under this chapter;
(2) Certified radiologic therapy technologist, CRTT, or CRT, for
persons certified in the therapeutic field;
(3) Certified radiologic diagnostic technologist, CRDT, or CRT, for
persons certified in the diagnostic field; ((or))
(4) Certified nuclear medicine technologist, CNMT, or CRT, for
persons certified as nuclear medicine technologists; or
(5) Certified radiologist assistant or CRA for persons certified as
radiologist assistants.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.84.040 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 506 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the
secretary may:
(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to
implement this chapter;
(b) Set all registration, certification, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250;
(c) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(d) Evaluate and designate those schools from which graduation will
be accepted as proof of an applicant's eligibility to receive a
certificate;
(e) Determine whether alternative methods of training are
equivalent to formal education, and to establish forms, procedures, and
criteria for evaluation of an applicant's alternative training to
determine the applicant's eligibility to receive a certificate;
(f) Prepare, grade, and administer, or determine the nature of, and
supervise the grading and administration of examinations for obtaining
a certificate;
(g) Issue a certificate to any applicant who has met the education,
training, examination, preceptorship, and conduct requirements for
certification; and
(((g))) (h) Issue a registration to an applicant who meets the
requirement for a registration.
(2) The secretary may hire clerical, administrative, and
investigative staff as needed to implement this chapter.
(3) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the
issuance and denial of registrations and certifications, unregistered
and uncertified practice, and the discipline of registrants and
certificants under this chapter. The secretary is the disciplining
authority under this chapter.
(4) The secretary may appoint ad hoc members of the profession to
serve in an ad hoc advisory capacity to the secretary in carrying out
this chapter. The members will serve for designated times and provide
advice on matters specifically identified and requested by the
secretary. The members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.220 and reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.040 and
43.03.060.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.84.080 and 1991 c 3 s 209 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue a certificate to any applicant who
demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction, that the following
requirements have been met to practice as:
(a) A diagnostic radiologic technologist, therapeutic radiologic
technologist, or nuclear medicine technologist:
(i) Graduation from an approved school or successful completion of
alternate training that meets the criteria established by the
secretary; and
(((b))) (ii) Good moral character; or
(b) A radiologist assistant:
(i) Satisfactory completion of a baccalaureate degree,
postbaccalaureate certificate, or master's degree encompassing a
radiologist assistant curriculum from an approved school of radiologic
technology;
(ii) Satisfactory completion of a radiologist-directed clinical
preceptorship; and
(iii) Satisfactory completion of a radiologist assistant
examination approved by the secretary.
(2) Applicants shall be subject to the grounds for denial or
issuance of a conditional license under chapter 18.130 RCW.
(3) The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate
proof of meeting the requirements for certification and for designation
of certification in a particular field of radiologic technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.84 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The date and location of radiologist assistant examinations
must be established by the secretary. Applicants who have been found
by the secretary to meet the other requirements for obtaining a
certificate must be scheduled for the next examination following the
filing of the application. The secretary shall establish by rule the
examination application deadline.
(2) The secretary or the secretary's designee shall examine each
applicant, by means determined most effective, on subjects appropriate
to the scope of practice, as applicable. The examinations must be
limited to the purpose of determining whether the applicant possesses
the minimum skill and knowledge necessary to practice competently.
(3) The examination papers, all grading of the papers, and the
grading of any practical work must be preserved for a period of not
less than one year after the secretary has made and published the
decisions. All examinations must be conducted under fair and wholly
impartial methods.
(4) Any applicant failing to make the required grade in the first
examination may take up to two subsequent examinations as the applicant
desires upon prepaying a fee determined by the secretary under RCW
43.70.250 for each subsequent examination. Upon failing four
examinations, the secretary may invalidate the original application and
require remedial education before the person may take future
examinations.
(5) The secretary may approve an examination prepared or
administered by a private testing agency or association of
credentialing agencies for use by an applicant in meeting the
credentialing requirements, including examinations prepared and
administered by the American registry of radiologic technologists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.84 RCW
to read as follows:
It is unprofessional conduct under chapter 18.130 RCW for any
person registered or certified under this chapter to interpret images,
make diagnoses, prescribe medications or therapies, or perform other
procedures that may be prohibited by rule.

--- END ---