BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW
to read as follows:
If a well authorized under the provisions of RCW 90.44.050 is
required to be metered, the department shall bear the full cost of
installation and periodic maintenance of the measuring device. The
department must work with the landowner to identify a mutually
agreeable time for the installation and maintenance work to be
completed, and unless agreed to by the landowner, the department must
provide no less than thirty days' notice to the owner of the well
before entering the property for installation and maintenance.

--- END ---