BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature, in the
interest of student confidentiality, that school districts minimize the
release of student telephone numbers and other directory information in
the absence of express parental consent. The legislature finds that
the nondisclosure of student telephone numbers and other directory
information protects and respects the privacy of students and their
families from organizations that received student information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) At the beginning of each school year, each school district
shall provide a separate written notice to every public high school
student and his or her parent or legal guardian that informs the
students, parents, and guardians:
(a) Of their right to request, pursuant to 20 U.S.C. Secs.
7908(a)(2) and 1232g(a)(5)(B), that the student's directory information
not be released without the prior written consent of the student's
parent or guardian or the student; and
(b) That if they do not request that the student's directory
information be withheld from some or all recruiters by the thirtieth
day of the new school year, the school may release the student's
directory information if requested to do so by a recruiter.
(2) The district shall provide the notice required by this section
in English and in any other languages the district provides other
districtwide written notice to students, parents, or guardians.
(3) The notice provided under this section shall clearly
distinguish among categories of recruiters and provide parents,
guardians, and students with the option of requesting that directory
information not be released to a particular category or categories of
recruiters. At a minimum, the categories of recruiters shall be
divided into (a) higher education and vocational education recruiters
and employers and (b) military recruiters. A request that a student's
information not be released to a particular category of recruiters
shall not prohibit a school from releasing information to recruiters in
any other category.
(4) A school district shall not release directory information to
any recruiter, except upon express written consent from the parent,
guardian, or student, after the last day of the school year or before
the forty-fifth day after the notice is sent.
(5) A student, parent, or guardian may request at any time that the
student's directory information not be released, and such a request
shall be honored by the school district.
(6) A school or school district that allows access to any recruiter
also must consider allowing access on the same basis and to the same
extent to students and student records by recruiters and
representatives of the job corps, the peace corps, and AmeriCorps.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and post
on its web site a model notice and request form for withholding
directory information that complies with the requirements of this
section. The model notice and request form must provide a brief
explanation of the federal requirement that student directory
information be shared unless the student, parent, or guardian requests
the information be withheld. School districts may adopt the model
notice and request form or may use a form developed by the school
district.
(8) School districts are encouraged to incorporate the request form
for withholding directory information as part of enrollment and student
information forms regularly distributed to and collected from parents
and guardians at the beginning of each school year.
(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Directory information" has the same meaning as in 20 U.S.C.
Sec. 1232g(a)(5)(A), which states that "the term . . . . . . relating
to a student includes the following: the student's name, address,
telephone listing, date and place of birth, major field of study,
participation in officially recognized activities and sports, weight
and height of members of athletic teams, dates of attendance, degrees
and awards received, and the most recent previous educational agency or
institution attended by the student."
(b) "Recruiter" means anyone who seeks to solicit a student to
attend or apply to a particular educational or vocational institution
or program, apply for employment with a private, public, or nonprofit
employer, volunteer with an organization, or enlist in the military.

--- END ---