BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.130.360 and 2006 c 72 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "emergency or disaster" has the same
meaning as in RCW 38.52.010.
(2) The secretary shall issue a retired volunteer medical worker
license to any applicant who:
(a) Has held an active license within ten years of applying for an
initial license under this section if the active license was issued by:
(i) A disciplining authority under RCW 18.130.040 ((no more than
ten years prior to applying for an initial license under this
section)); or
(ii) A licensing agency of another state or territory of the United
States, the District of Columbia, or Canada or any of its provinces if
that licensing agency has substantially similar licensing standards as
those of the disciplining authority under RCW 18.130.040 that governs
the applicant's profession in this state;
(b) Does not have any current restrictions on the ability to obtain
a license for violations of this chapter; and
(c) Submits proof of registration as a volunteer with a local
organization for emergency services or management as defined by chapter
38.52 RCW.
(3) License holders under this section must be supervised and may
practice only those duties that correspond to the scope of their
emergency worker assignment not to exceed their scope of practice prior
to retirement.
(4) The department shall adopt rules and policies to implement this
section.
(5) The department shall establish standards for the renewal of
licenses issued under this section, including continuing competency
requirements.
(6) License holders under this section are subject to the
provisions of this chapter as they may apply to the issuance and denial
of credentials, unauthorized practice, and discipline for acts of
unprofessional conduct.
(7) Nothing in this section precludes a health care professional
who holds an active license from providing medical services during an
emergency or disaster.
(8) The cost of regulatory activities for license holders under
this section must be borne in equal proportion by all health care
providers holding a license issued by a disciplining authority under
RCW 18.130.040.

--- END ---