BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who smokes a lighted pipe, cigar, or cigarette in a
moving or parked motor vehicle containing any passengers under the age
of eighteen years is guilty of a traffic infraction.
(2) Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be
accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an
equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.
(3) Infractions under this section shall not become part of the
driver's record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, a
finding that a person has committed a traffic infraction under this
section shall not be made available to insurance companies or
employers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For the first six months after the effective
date of this act, law enforcement officers may only issue verbal
warnings for violations of section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---