BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 2009, the department of social and health services
shall create a pilot program to place a full-time domestic violence
advocate in a minimum of one office of the division of children and
family services.
(2) The purpose of the program is to provide domestic violence
safety planning, advocacy, information, and support to adult victims of
domestic violence who are receiving services from the division of
children and family services offices, and to increase the capacity of
division of children and family services workers to identify and
respond effectively to domestic violence in their caseloads.
(3) The goals of the program are to:
(a) Increase the safety of children and adult victims of domestic
violence who are involved with the department's child protective
services division;
(b) Increase the adult domestic violence victim's understanding of
available domestic violence resources and supports;
(c) Increase the adult domestic violence victim's and the domestic
violence perpetrator's understanding of the effects of domestic
violence on children;
(d) Provide consultation and training to child protective services
social workers so that they may increase their knowledge of domestic
violence and practice skills for addressing domestic violence in their
caseloads, and provide safe, effective responses for children and their
families experiencing domestic violence;
(e) Decrease the rate at which victims of domestic violence are
referred back to the division of children and family services;
(f) Decrease the number of children of domestic violence victims
that are placed in protective custody;
(g) Strengthen collaborations between department staff and
community providers and resources; and
(h) Conduct an evaluation of the program by comparing the outcomes
of the program office to the outcomes of a comparison office that does
not have the domestic violence advocate, and to develop a report of the
findings and recommendations that may be used to replicate the program
statewide.
(4) The division of children and family services offices selected
for the pilot program will convene a quarterly meeting of interested
stakeholders to provide suggestions and technical assistance regarding
implementation of the pilot program. Stakeholders may include, but are
not limited to, a local domestic violence agency, public health,
domestic violence perpetrator's treatment program, protection order
programs, law enforcement, and others who are appropriate for the
advisory group.
(5) The department shall utilize a request for proposal process and
shall select the pilot site by September 2008. The request for
proposal shall require:
(a) The community-based domestic violence agency to have experience
providing domestic violence shelter or advocacy services under chapter
70.123 RCW, and experience working with families involved with child
protective services or child welfare services.
(b) The agency must be willing to commit to the following:
(i) Involvement in the program for the duration of the program;
(ii) Providing the employee who will be the domestic violence
victim advocate located at the department office;
(iii) Agree to supervise and support the advocate placed into the
department office;
(iv) Collaborate with the division of children and family services
program supervisor at the program site; and
(v) Participate in the evaluation of the pilot program.
(c) The domestic violence advocate shall provide the following
services while colocated at the department office:
(i) Provide on-site education, consultation, and support to
division of children and family services staff to meet the needs of the
children and families involved in domestic violence situations on
subjects including, but not limited to:
(A) Identifying indicators of domestic violence;
(B) Interviewing techniques that do not increase the risk of danger
to the adult victim of domestic violence or the child;
(C) Identifying protective behaviors that may reduce the risk of
harm to the adult victim or the child;
(D) Determining risks posed by an alleged domestic violence
perpetrator to the adult victim or the child; and
(E) How to refer victims to a domestic violence advocate;
(ii) Provide advocacy services to facilitate linkage to appropriate
community supports for families receiving services from division of
children and family services offices;
(iii) Participating in child protective services unit meetings,
case reviews, or child protection team meetings, for families with
identified domestic violence concerns; and
(iv)(A) Provide general information to department workers regarding
domestic violence issues such as battering tactics, resources, and
safety planning development. It is not the role of the advocate to
provide information or training to department workers on specialized
areas of child welfare practice such as risk assessments.
(B) Further, the domestic violence advocate shall not provide case
consultation services to any family to whom they are providing direct
advocacy. The domestic violence advocate may not provide direct
advocacy services to any family on whose case they have provided
consultation.
(6)(a) The department shall select a pilot program site where one
or more supervisors have:
(i) Received formal training and experience working with families
affected by domestic violence and child maltreatment; and
(ii) Participated in best practices work groups for domestic
violence issues; or
(iii) Have served on one or more work groups to develop protocols
or guidelines for coordinated responses by criminal justice and
community-based nonprofit agencies to cases involving child
maltreatment and domestic violence.
(b) The supervisor's duties include the following:
(i) Ensuring that the domestic violence advocate has the support
necessary to implement advocate-specific portions of the program;
(ii) Ensuring that children and family services social workers
receive ongoing training regarding domestic violence;
(iii) Convening case staffings which include the domestic violence
advocate; and
(iv) Providing consultation to the case workers regarding
appropriate interventions for the adult victim, the child, and the
alleged domestic violence perpetrator.
(7) Provision of services by a domestic violence advocate under
this section does not waive or diminish the confidential or privileged
nature of communications between a victim of domestic violence and
advocate pursuant to RCW 5.60.060, 70.123.075, or 70.123.076.
(8) The Washington state institute for public policy shall evaluate
the pilot program to determine the outcomes of the program.
(a) Beginning in October 2008, the institute shall conduct a
preprogram assessment. The preprogram assessment shall include a
comparison of the program site to a division of children and family
services office that does not contain a domestic violence advocate
colocated at the site.
(b) Following the preprogram assessment, the institute shall
conduct an evaluation of the pilot program, which includes a comparison
of the program and nonprogram sites to determine the following
outcomes:
(i) Changes to the rate of being referred back to child protective
services intake for domestic violence related concerns; and
(ii) Changes to the rate of children of adult domestic violence
victims placed into protective custody in the program office compared
to the comparison site at the end of the three-year pilot program
period.
(c) The evaluation shall include recommendations to the department
for improving domestic violence responses in other division of children
and family services community offices of Washington state.
(d) The institute shall report the findings of the program to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2011.
(9) This section expires January 1, 2012.

--- END ---