BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(1) Access to computers and the internet is becoming increasingly
important for full participation in our country's economic, political,
and social life;
(2) Affordable, high-speed internet access is a key competitive
factor for economic development and quality of life in Washington state
and in our increasingly global economy;
(3) Universal connectivity at affordable prices is a necessity for
business transactions, education and training, health care, information
exchange, government services, communication, artistic expression, and
the democratic process;
(4) Unequal access to computer technology and internet connectivity
by income, disabilities, education level, ethnic or racial group, or
geographic location could deepen and reinforce the divisions that
already exist in our society; and
(5) Other states are surveying their access to computer and
internet resources in order to better compete in the digital future.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to survey the
availability of public broadband resources in the state and determine
what steps may be taken to bridge the digital divide, increase access
to broadband services for all citizens in Washington state, and prepare
for a more competitive and digitally connected future.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.105.020 and 2003 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,
the following definitions shall apply:)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of information services((;)).
(2) "Board" means the information services board((;)).
(3) "Committee" means the state interoperability executive
committee((;)).
(4) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi municipal
corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such
corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately((;)).
(5) "Director" means the director of the department((;)).
(6) "Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. This term
includes, but is not limited to, services acquired for equipment
maintenance and repair, operation of a physical plant, security,
computer hardware and software installation and maintenance,
telecommunications installation and maintenance, data entry, keypunch
services, programming services, and computer time-sharing((;)).
(7) "Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of
the state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes
specially conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines,
multiplexors, switches associated with such communications lines, and
any equipment and software components necessary for management and
control of the backbone network((;)).
(8) "Telecommunications" means the transmission of information by
wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means((;)).
(9) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text,
voice, and video((;)).
(10) "Information processing" means the electronic capture,
collection, storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and
presentation of information in the form of data, text, voice, or image
and includes telecommunications and office automation functions((;)).
(11) "Information services" means data processing,
telecommunications, office automation, and computerized information
systems((;)).
(12) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission
facilities used in information processing, such as computers, word
processors, terminals, telephones, wireless communications system
facilities, cables, and any physical facility necessary for the
operation of such equipment((;)).
(13) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a
strategic management process documenting relationships between agency
missions and information technology and telecommunications
investments((;)).
(14) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and
management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology
resources and telecommunications((;)).
(15) "Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or
license((;)).
(16) "Video telecommunications" means the electronic
interconnection of two or more sites for the purpose of transmitting
and/or receiving visual and associated audio information. Video
telecommunications shall not include existing public television
broadcast stations as currently designated by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under chapter 43.330
RCW((;)).
(17) "K-20 educational network board" or "K-20 board" means the K-20 educational network board created in RCW 43.105.800((;)).
(18) "K-20 network technical steering committee" or "committee"
means the K-20 network technical steering committee created in RCW
43.105.810((;)).
(19) "K-20 network" means the network established in RCW
43.105.820((;)).
(20) "Educational sectors" means those institutions of higher
education, school districts, and educational service districts that use
the network for distance education, data transmission, and other uses
permitted by the K-20 board.
(21) "Broadband" means the transmission of information, between or
among points specified by the user, with or without change in the form
or content of the information as sent and received, at minimum rates of
transmission of one megabits per second downstream and five hundred
twelve kilobits per second upstream, or at those synchronous upstream
and downstream transmission rates as may be recommended by the
department by rule, or as defined by the federal communications
commission.
(22) "Commission" means the Washington utilities and transportation
commission.
(23) "Community action agency" means local community action
agencies or local community service agencies designated by the
department of community, trade, and economic development under chapter
43.63A RCW.
(24) "Community technology program," also known as a digital
inclusion program, means a program engaged in diffusing information and
communications technology in local communities, particularly in
underserved areas. These programs may include, but are not limited to,
programs that provide education and skill-building opportunities,
hardware and software, internet connectivity, and development of
locally relevant content and delivery of vital services through
technology.
(25) "Telecommunications infrastructure" includes conduits, ducts,
poles, wires, fiberoptic cable or lines, coaxial cable, copper twisted
pair telephone lines, receivers, transmitters, broadcast radio
frequency bandwidth, lasers and multiplexers, instruments, machines,
appliances and all devices, real estate, easements, apparatus,
property, and routes used or operated by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the
department, in consultation with the commission, must conduct a
detailed survey of the telecommunications infrastructure owned by the
state. The survey must be used to create a map of all broadband
resources owned by the state.
(2) In conducting the survey, the department must report, in
detail:
(a) The physical location of all telecommunications infrastructure
owned by the state; and
(b) The amount of excess capacity available.
(3) The survey must specifically set forth the areas for broadband
services by census tract and by block, lot, or other uniquely
identifiable administrative characteristic.
(4) State agencies shall respond to any requests for information
from the department in a reasonable and timely manner.
(5) The department, in consultation with the commission, must
identify the excess capacity and bandwidth owned by the state that
could be leased on a nondiscriminatory and commercially reasonable
basis by public entities, community technology programs, and community
action agencies.
(6) By December 1, 2008, the department shall provide a status
update to the appropriate committees of the legislature, which shall
include recommendations for moving forward towards full implementation
of a state broadband initiative.
(7) By December 1st of each year, the department must update this
survey to track the expansion and progress of broadband access and
submit a report to the legislature.
(8) This section does not apply to telecommunications
infrastructure owned, leased, or controlled by law enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2008, the department, in consultation with the
commission, must compile a database and web page listing all of the
major, free wireless internet services that are available to the public
in the state. The database and web page must describe the location for
each wireless access point, and may include any log-in information,
such as passwords, that may be required for gaining access. The
database must be updated dynamically on at least a semiannual basis.
(2) By December 1, 2008, the department, in consultation with the
commission, shall identify and make publicly available a web directory
of facilities providing community technology programs throughout the
state. This directory must be updated at least annually.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The code reviser is directed to put the
defined terms in RCW 43.105.020 in alphabetical order.

--- END ---