BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.118.130 and 2007 c 343 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A local health officer who is responsible for administering and
enforcing regulations regarding on-site sewage disposal systems is
authorized to issue civil penalties for violations of those regulations
((under the same limitations and requirements imposed on the department
under RCW 70.118B.050, except that the amount of a penalty shall not
exceed one thousand dollars per day for every violation, and judgments
shall be entered in the name of the local health jurisdiction and
penalties shall be placed into the general fund or funds of the entity
or entities operating the local health jurisdiction)).
(2) A person who violates a law or rule regulating on-site sewage
disposal systems administered by the local health jurisdiction is
subject to a penalty of not more than one thousand dollars per day for
every violation. Every violation is a separate and distinct offense.
In case of a continuing violation, each day's continuing violation is
a separate and distinct violation. The penalty assessed must reflect
the significance of the violation and the previous record of compliance
on the part of the person responsible for compliance with on-site
sewage disposal system requirements.
(3) Every person who, through an act of commission or omission,
procures, aids, or abets a violation is considered to have violated the
provisions of this section and is subject to the penalty provided in
this section.
(4) The penalty provided for in this section must be imposed by a
notice in writing to the person against whom the civil penalty is
assessed and must describe the violation. The notice must be
personally served in the manner of service of a summons in a civil
action or in a manner that shows proof of receipt. A penalty imposed
by this section is due twenty-eight days after receipt of notice unless
application for an appeal is filed as provided in subsection (5) of
this section.
(5) Within twenty-eight days after notice is received, the person
incurring the penalty has the right to appeal as governed by the local
health jurisdiction's administrative appeals process. Notice must be
provided by the local health jurisdiction consistent with its due
process requirements.
(6) A penalty imposed by a final administrative order is due upon
service of the final administrative order. A person who fails to pay
a penalty assessed by a final administrative order within thirty days
of service of the final administrative order shall pay, in addition to
the amount of the penalty, interest at the rate of one percent of the
unpaid balance of the assessed penalty for each month or part of a
month that the penalty remains unpaid, commencing with the month in
which the notice of penalty was served, and reasonable attorneys' fees
as are incurred if civil enforcement of the final administrative order
is required to collect the penalty.
(7) A person who institutes proceedings for judicial review of a
final administrative order assessing a civil penalty under this chapter
shall place the full amount of the penalty in an interest-bearing
account in the registry of the reviewing court. At the conclusion of
the proceeding the court shall, as appropriate, enter a judgment on
behalf of the local health jurisdiction and order that the judgment be
satisfied to the extent possible from moneys paid into the registry of
the court or shall enter a judgment in favor of the person appealing
the penalty assessment and order return of the moneys paid into the
registry of the court together with accrued interest to the person
appealing. The judgment may award reasonable attorneys' fees for the
cost of legal representation in representing the local health
jurisdiction.
(8) If no appeal is taken from a final administrative order
assessing a civil penalty under this chapter, the local health
jurisdiction may file a certified copy of the final administrative
order with the clerk of the superior court in which the on-site sewage
disposal system is located and the clerk shall enter judgment in the
name of the local health jurisdiction and in the amount of the penalty
assessed in the final administrative order.
(9) A judgment entered under subsection (7) or (8) of this section
has the same force and effect as, and is subject to all of the
provisions of law relating to, a judgment in a civil action, and may be
enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court in which
it is entered.
(10) All receipts from penalties imposed under this section shall
be deposited into the general fund or funds of the entity or entities
operating the local health jurisdiction.

--- END ---