BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington
state:
(a) Has many local jobs that are tied to the global economy in
aerospace, agriculture, and software industries;
(b) Benefits from a thriving tourist trade;
(c) Can leverage its local diversity to better compete in the
global economy through language programs in schools;
(d) Encourages cultural understanding and tolerance for its
citizens; and
(e) Seeks a world-class education system.
(2) The legislature further finds that there is a current lack of
leadership and commitment at the state level to improve world language
instruction so that our students can secure their part in the global
community and remain competitive in the world.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall assign at least
one full-time equivalent staff position within the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to serve as the world language
supervisor. The world language supervisor shall have the following
duties and responsibilities:
(a) Develop, conduct, and oversee professional development for
teachers on grade level expectations, state and national standards, and
best practices in instruction for world languages;
(b) Provide technical assistance to schools in designing elementary
and middle school language programs, selecting and designing high
quality curriculum, and providing professional development;
(c) Advise in the development of online world language courses;
(d) Secure and implement grants, including federal grants, to
enhance world language programs;
(e) Encourage and foster an articulated curriculum for world
languages through elementary, secondary, and postsecondary grades;
(f) Establish and maintain a state database for world language
course offerings in schools and school districts;
(g) Implement memoranda of understanding signed by the
superintendent of public instruction, assist with visa applications and
education position verifications, and provide orientation for visiting
teachers;
(h) Serve in an advisory capacity on committees or work groups
regarding teacher certification, advanced placement programs, and
textbook publishing and selection;
(i) Serve as an education liaison with the business, trade, and
economic development communities; and
(j) Coordinate with existing world language resources at the
institutions of higher education.
(2) Nothing in this section may be construed to relate to the first
peoples' languages or to otherwise affect RCW 28A.410.045.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---