BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.36.010 and 1996 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless otherwise specified, the following definitions apply
throughout this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Appurtenance" includes personal property, equipment, stored
livestock feed, or other possessions reasonably necessary or useful for
the production of crops or livestock or commonly used in crop
production. The term includes, but is not limited to, fencing and
bales of hay.
(2) "Crop" means a commercially raised horticultural and/or
agricultural product and includes growing or harvested product but does
not include livestock. For the purposes of this chapter all parts of
horticultural trees shall be considered a crop and shall be eligible
for claims.
(((2))) (3) "Emergency" means an unforeseen circumstance beyond the
control of the landowner or tenant that presents a real and immediate
threat to crops, domestic animals, or fowl.
(((3))) (4) "Immediate family member" means spouse, brother,
sister, grandparent, parent, child, or grandchild.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.36.030 and 1996 c 54 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the following limitations and conditions, the owner,
the owner's immediate family member, the owner's documented employee,
or a tenant of real property may trap or kill on that property, without
the licenses required under RCW 77.32.010 or authorization from the
director under RCW 77.12.240, wild animals or wild birds that are
damaging crops, appurtenances, domestic animals, or fowl:
(a) Threatened or endangered species shall not be hunted, trapped,
or killed;
(b) Except in an emergency situation, deer, elk, and protected
wildlife shall not be killed without a permit issued and conditioned by
the director or the director's designee. In an emergency, the
department may give verbal permission followed by written permission to
trap or kill any deer, elk, or protected wildlife that is damaging
crops, domestic animals, or fowl; and
(c) On privately owned cattle ranching lands, the land owner or
lessee may declare an emergency only when the department has not
responded within forty-eight hours after having been contacted by the
land owner or lessee regarding damage caused by wild animals or wild
birds. In such an emergency, the owner or lessee may trap or kill any
deer, elk, or other protected wildlife that is causing the damage but
deer and elk may only be killed if such lands were open to public
hunting during the previous hunting season, or the closure to public
hunting was coordinated with the department to protect property and
livestock.
(2) Except for coyotes and Columbian ground squirrels, wildlife
trapped or killed under this section remain the property of the state,
and the person trapping or killing the wildlife shall notify the
department immediately. The department shall dispose of wildlife so
taken within three days of receiving such a notification and in a
manner determined by the director to be in the best interest of the
state.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.36.040 and 1996 c 54 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Pursuant to this section, the director or the director's
designee may distribute money appropriated to pay claims for damages to
crops and appurtenances caused by wild deer or elk in an amount of up
to ten thousand dollars per claim. Damages payable under this section
are limited to the value of ((such commercially raised horticultural or
agricultural)) the crops or appurtenances, whether growing or
harvested, and shall be paid only to the owner of the crop or
appurtenance at the time of damage, without assignment. Damages shall
not include damage to other real or personal property including other
vegetation or animals, damages caused by animals other than wild deer
or elk, lost profits, consequential damages, or any other damages
whatsoever. These damages shall comprise the exclusive remedy for
claims against the state for damages caused by wildlife.
(2) The director may adopt rules for the form of affidavits or
proof to be provided in claims under this section. The director may
adopt rules to specify the time and method of assessing damage. The
burden of proving damages shall be on the claimant. Payment of claims
shall remain subject to the other conditions and limits of this
chapter.
(3) If funds are limited, payments of claims shall be prioritized
in the order that the claims are received. No claim may be processed
if:
(a) The claimant did not notify the department within ten days of
discovery of the damage. If the claimant intends to take steps that
prevent determination of damages, such as harvest of damaged crops,
then the claimant shall notify the department as soon as reasonably
possible after discovery so that the department has an opportunity to
document the damage and take steps to prevent additional damage; or
(b) The claimant did not present a complete, written claim within
sixty days after the damage, or the last day of damaging if the damage
was of a continuing nature.
(4) The director or the director's designee may examine and assess
the damage upon notice. The department and claimant may agree to an
assessment of damages by a neutral person or persons knowledgeable in
horticultural or agricultural practices. The department and claimant
shall share equally in the costs of such third party examination and
assessment of damage.
(5) There shall be no payment for damages if:
(a) The crops or appurtenances are on lands leased from any public
agency;
(b) The landowner or claimant failed to use or maintain applicable
damage prevention materials or methods furnished by the department, or
failed to comply with a wildlife damage prevention agreement under RCW
77.12.260;
(c) The director has expended all funds appropriated for payment of
such claims for the current fiscal year; or
(d) The damages are covered by insurance. The claimant shall
notify the department at the time of claim of insurance coverage in the
manner required by the director. Insurance coverage shall cover all
damages prior to any payment under this chapter.
(6) When there is a determination of claim by the director or the
director's designee pursuant to this section, the claimant has sixty
days to accept the claim or it is deemed rejected.

--- END ---