BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.12.190 and 1982 c 123 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The management and control of a library shall be vested in a
board of either five or seven trustees as hereinafter in this section
provided. In cities and towns five trustees shall be appointed by the
mayor with the consent of the legislative body. In counties, rural
county library districts, and island library districts, five trustees
shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners. In a regional
library district a board of either five or seven trustees shall be
appointed by the joint action of the legislative bodies concerned. In
intercounty rural library districts a board of either five or seven
trustees shall be appointed by the joint action of the boards of county
commissioners of each of the counties included in a district. The
first appointments for boards comprised of but five trustees shall be
for terms of one, two, three, four, and five years respectively, and
thereafter a trustee shall be appointed annually to serve for five
years. The first appointments for boards comprised of seven trustees
shall be for terms of one, two, three, four, five, six, and seven years
respectively, and thereafter a trustee shall be appointed annually to
serve for seven years. No person shall be appointed to any board of
trustees for more than two consecutive terms. Vacancies shall be
filled for unexpired terms as soon as possible in the manner in which
members of the board are regularly chosen.
(2)(a) The appointing authority of a library district, or the
legislative body of a city, town, or county in the case of a city,
town, or county library, may by ordinance or resolution, or the
citizens may by petition, provide for a ballot proposition to determine
whether the library trustees should be elected pursuant to section 2 of
this act.
(b) When proposed by citizen petition or by ordinance or resolution
of the appointing authority of a library district, or the legislative
body of a city, town, or county in the case of a city, town, or county
library, a ballot proposition authorizing election of the library
trustees shall be submitted to the voters residing in the district,
city, town, or county at any general election, or at any special
election which may be called for that purpose.
(c) The ballot proposition shall be submitted (i) if the appointing
authority of a library district, or the legislative body of a city,
town, or county in the case of a city, town, or county library enacts
an ordinance or resolution proposing the election; or (ii) if a
petition proposing the election of library trustees is submitted to the
county auditor of the county in which the district, city, town, or
county is located or the largest county in which a multicounty district
is located that is signed by registered voters within the district,
city, town, or county, numbering at least ten percent of the votes cast
in the last general election by registered voters within the district,
city, town, or county.
(d) Upon receipt of a citizen petition under (c)(ii) of this
subsection, the county auditor shall determine whether the petition is
signed by a sufficient number of registered voters, using the
registration records and returns of the preceding general election,
and, no later than forty-five days after receipt of the petition, shall
attach to the petition the auditor's certificate stating whether or not
sufficient signatures have been obtained. If the signatures are found
by the auditor to be insufficient, the petition shall be returned to
the person filing it.
(e) The ballot proposition authorizing election of library trustees
shall appear on the ballot of the next general election or at the next
special election date specified under RCW 29A.04.330 occurring sixty or
more days after the resolution proposing the election or the date the
county auditor certifies that the petition proposing such election
contains sufficient valid signatures.
(3) A library trustee shall not receive a salary or other
compensation for services as trustee, but necessary expenses actually
incurred shall be paid from the library funds.
(4) A library trustee in the case of a city or town may be removed
only by vote of the legislative body. A trustee of a county library,
a rural county library district library, or an island library district
library may be removed for just cause by the county commissioners after
a public hearing upon a written complaint stating the ground for
removal, which complaint, with a notice of the time and place of
hearing, shall have been served upon the trustee at least fifteen days
before the hearing. A trustee of an intercounty rural library district
may be removed by the joint action of the board of county commissioners
of the counties involved in the same manner as provided herein for the
removal of a trustee of a county library.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 27.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When election of library trustees is provided for under RCW
27.12.190, each member of a library board shall be elected by ballot by
the registered voters of the city, town, county, or library district
and shall hold office for a term of four years and until a successor is
elected and qualified. Terms of trustees shall be staggered, and
insofar as possible, not more than a majority of one shall be elected
to full terms at any regular election. In case a member or members of
a library board are to be elected to fill an unexpired term or terms,
the ballot shall specify the term for which each such member is to be
elected.
(2) Candidates for the position of library trustee shall file their
declarations of candidacy and elections for the positions of library
trustee shall be conducted as provided in Title 29A RCW.
(3) The positions of library trustee in each city, town, county, or
library district shall be dealt with as separate offices for all
election purposes, and where more than one position is to be filled,
each candidate shall file for one of the positions so designated.
(4) No person is eligible to the office of library trustee who is
not a citizen of the United States and the state of Washington and a
registered voter of the city, town, county, or library district, as the
case may be.

--- END ---