BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.160.020 and 2004 c 252 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board.
(2) "Bond" means any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate, or
other evidence of financial indebtedness issued by the board pursuant
to this chapter.
(3) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) "Financial institution" means any bank, savings and loan
association, credit union, development credit corporation, insurance
company, investment company, trust company, savings institution, or
other financial institution approved by the board and maintaining an
office in the state.
(5) "Industrial development facilities" means "industrial
development facilities" as defined in RCW 39.84.020.
(6) "Industrial development revenue bonds" means tax-exempt revenue
bonds used to fund industrial development facilities.
(7) "Local government" or "political subdivision" means any port
district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any other
municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state
providing for public facilities under this chapter.
(8) "Sponsor" means any of the following entities which customarily
provide service or otherwise aid in industrial or other financing and
are approved as a sponsor by the board: A bank, trust company, savings
bank, investment bank, national banking association, savings and loan
association, building and loan association, credit union, insurance
company, or any other financial institution, governmental agency, or
holding company of any entity specified in this subsection.
(9) "Umbrella bonds" means industrial development revenue bonds
from which the proceeds are loaned, transferred, or otherwise made
available to two or more users under this chapter.
(10) "User" means one or more persons acting as lessee, purchaser,
mortgagor, or borrower under a financing document and receiving or
applying to receive revenues from bonds issued under this chapter.
(11) "Public facilities" means a project of a local government or
a federally recognized Indian tribe for the planning, acquisition,
construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or
improvement of bridges, roads, domestic and industrial water, earth
stabilization, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity,
telecommunications, transportation, natural gas, buildings or
structures, and port facilities, all for the purpose of job creation,
job retention, or job expansion.
(12) "Rural county" means a county with a population density of
fewer than one hundred persons per square mile or a county smaller than
two hundred twenty-five square miles, as determined by the office of
financial management and published each year by the department for the
period of July 1st to June 30th.
(13) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:
(a) A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial
census, that meets three of the five criteria set forth in subsection
(14) of this section;
(b) A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty
thousand in the 1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five
criteria as set forth in subsection (14) of this section; or
(c) A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census,
that is located in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five
criteria set forth in subsection (14) of this section.
(14) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:
(a) A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(b) A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(c) Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses
of one hundred positions or more;
(d) Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses
of one hundred positions or more; and
(e) An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state
average. The counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by
the employment security department for the most recent year for which
data is available. For the purposes of administration of programs
under this chapter, the United States post office five-digit zip code
delivery areas will be used to determine residence status for
eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition, a zip code
delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an urbanized
area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by zip
codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also
considered nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make
available a zip code listing of the areas to all agencies and
organizations providing services under this chapter.

--- END ---