BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide faculty and college excellence for Washington citizens by
increasing the number of full-time, tenured academic employee positions
at community and technical colleges and by enabling academic employees
who hold part-time positions to have greater assurance of continuing
employment. Promoting faculty and college excellence will result in
better educational opportunities for our students, our communities, and
our economy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the goal of the legislature that by 2014 the community
and technical colleges increase the numbers of full-time tenured
positions on their campuses by adding three hundred fifty full-time
academic employee positions.
(2) By December 1, 2008, each community and technical college, in
close collaboration with the exclusive bargaining representative for
faculty, shall determine the number of full-time academic employees it
plans to create each year through 2014 and shall report its findings to
the state board for community and technical colleges, its board of
trustees, and the exclusive representatives of the faculty.
(3)(a) Those community and technical colleges that determine a need
to increase the percentage of courses taught by tenured or tenure-track
academic employees shall create a plan by the end of summer quarter
2009 to meet the goals in the plan by 2014, subject to collective
bargaining with the exclusive representatives of the faculty. In its
plan, the college shall state how it intends to meet its goal by, but
not limited to, creating new full-time tenure-track appointments,
creating opportunities for adjunct faculty to attain full-time
positions or by converting classes or assignments left vacant by
attrition, but not by discharging currently employed part-time or
nontenure-track faculty who have taught in the college for more than
two years. Special attention should be paid to increasing the number
of full-time faculty in departments of mathematics, science, adult
basic education, early childhood education, and English. The plan
shall also include projected costs to reach the goal.
(b) Each biennium, the governing boards of each community and
technical college shall submit in its biennial budget request an amount
of funds sufficient to cover the projected costs of implementing this
section.
(c) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
review the submitted plans and work with the college districts to
ensure consistency with the legislature's goal.
(d) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
report to the higher education committees of the legislature, by
December 1, 2008, and every two years thereafter until December 1,
2014, regarding the board's progress in increasing the percentage of
full-time, tenure or tenure-track academic employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the goal of the legislature that part-time and nontenured
faculty in community and technical colleges receive consideration for
continuing employment and for new tenure-track positions.
(2) Each community and technical college shall establish a process,
subject to collective bargaining, under which part-time and full-time
nontenured faculty members, after successful completion of an
evaluation period, receive timely notice of and priority consideration,
consistent with other institutional and state policies, for academic
employment assignments for which they are qualified in their discipline
in coming academic terms.
(3) Each community and technical college shall create, subject to
collective bargaining, a process for ensuring that qualified internal
applicants receive priority consideration for attaining a tenure-track
position when one becomes available such as, but not limited to, a job
interview for positions where minimum requirements have been met or
notification of job openings before they are posted outside of the
institution.
(4) The processes in this section shall be consistent with
institutional and state affirmative action and other personnel
policies.

--- END ---