BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature designates the South Park bridge, which crosses the
Duwamish waterway and is located in King county, as a highway of
statewide significance.

--- END ---