BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of fish and wildlife must
conduct a study as to the effectiveness of the existing hydraulic
project approval process under chapter 77.55 RCW in protecting fish
life.
(2) The study required by this section must consider the
effectiveness of legislative enactments, the actual implementation of
those enactments by the department of fish and wildlife, and the impact
that historic funding levels for the program have on the effectiveness
of the program. The study must focus on both the level of compliance
with chapter 77.55 RCW and on the final degree of fish life protection
that is achieved even in instances of full compliance.
(3) If the study required by this section results in
recommendations for change to the statutes, administration, or funding
levels, those recommendations should be included in the final report.
(4) Prior to the final release of the study required by this
section, a majority of the members of the fish and wildlife commission
must vote to affirm that the study has been fully completed.
(5) The requirements of this section must be completed as readily
as funds allow, while still allowing a full and complete study. To
satisfy this section, the department of fish and wildlife may use any
funds appropriated to it for this specific purpose, any available
nondesignated funds in control of the department of fish and wildlife,
and any private donations provided to the department of fish and
wildlife for the purposes of this section.
(6) This section expires January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---