BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.105 RCW
under the subchapter heading "general use, sale, and lease provisions"
to read as follows:
(1) Until the requirements of this section are completed, the
department may not, within the Maury Island aquatic reserve created by
order of the commissioner on November 8, 2004, enter into or renew any
aquatic land leases adjacent to, or in the vicinity of, an active or
proposed operation to remove sand, gravel, or other minerals.
(2) The department must conduct a full survey of all state-owned
lands managed by the agency to determine the extent and value of all
available sand and gravel resources. The survey must include
approximated amounts of available material, estimated monetary value of
the material, the identification of barriers to the material's removal,
and information related to the material's location in relation to
navigable waters.
(3) Prior to the final release of the survey required by this
section, a majority of the members of the board must vote to affirm
that the survey has been fully completed.
(4) The requirements of this section must be completed as readily
as funds allow, while still allowing a full and complete survey. To
satisfy this section, the department may use any funds appropriated to
it for this specific purpose, any available nondesignated funds in
control of the department, and any private donations provided to the
department for the purposes of this section.
(5) This section expires January 1, 2011.

--- END ---