BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other requirements of this chapter, any
public entity required by sections 2 through 8 of this act to prepare
an endangered marine species review prior to issuing a final permit,
lease, or other approval shall prepare and publish in the Washington
State Register the following prior to final issuance of the permit or
lease:
(a) An analysis of any potential impacts the permit, lease, or
other approval may have on endangered marine species;
(b) An analysis of any potential changes to the proposal requiring
a permit, lease, or other approval that may lessen the proposal's
impacts on endangered marine species; and
(c) Any other details required by rules adopted pursuant to RCW
43.21C.110.
(2) Any analysis conducted under this section must include all
direct impacts on endangered marine species and all reasonable and
foreseeable indirect impacts such as impacts on habitat, food sources,
and birthing areas.
(3)(a) The preparation of any analysis required by this section may
be either:
(i) Completed directly by the public entity responsible for issuing
the permit, lease, or other approval;
(ii) Contracted to a private third party by the public entity
responsible for issuing the permit, lease, or other approval; or
(iii) Completed by the entity requesting the permit, lease, or
other approval and subsequently approved by the appropriate public
entity.
(b) If the analysis is completed directly by a public entity, or
contracted to a third party by a public entity, the actual cost of
preparing and publishing the analysis under this section may be
collected by the public entity from the applicant for the permit,
lease, or other approval. Any reimbursement of cost under this section
is in addition to any applicable permit fees or lease rates.
(4) If the public entity required by this section to complete an
endangered marine species review determines that the review cannot be
completed prior to the issuance of the final permit, lease, or other
approval due to statutory deadlines or extenuating circumstances, then
an explanation of those circumstances must be published in the
Washington State Register prior to the final issuance of the permit,
lease, or other approval and the requirements of this section must be
completed in full no more than sixty days after the issuance of the
permit, lease, or other approval.
(5) If the endangered marine species review prepared under this
section finds a potential impact to endangered marine species, then the
public entity may, instead of publishing the entire endangered marine
species review in the Washington State Register, instead publish an
abbreviated finding along with directions as to how to access the full
endangered marine species review.
(6) As used in this section, the term "endangered marine species"
means all members of the following taxonomical genera that are
identified by the fish and wildlife commission as an endangered species
under RCW 77.12.020: Balaenoptera, Megaptera, Orcinus, Physeter,
Balaena.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to the final issuance of any permits, leases, or other
approvals under this title for projects or proposals to occur within or
adjacent to marine aquatic habitats, the department must conduct and
finalize an endangered marine species review under section 1 of this
act.
(2) This section does not apply to licenses issued under chapter
77.32 or 77.65 RCW or to emergency oral permits under RCW 77.55.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.10 RCW
under the subchapter heading "Part 1 General Provisions" to read as
follows:
Prior to the final issuance of any permits, leases, or other
approvals under this title for projects or proposals to occur within or
adjacent to marine aquatic habitats, including on state-owned aquatic
lands, the department must conduct and finalize an endangered marine
species review under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
Prior to the final issuance of any permits, leases, or other
approvals by the department for projects or proposals to occur within
or adjacent to marine aquatic habitats, the department must conduct and
finalize an endangered marine species review under section 1 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Prior to the final issuance of any permits, leases, or other
approvals by a city or town for projects or proposals to occur within
or adjacent to marine aquatic habitats, the city or town must conduct
and finalize an endangered marine species review under section 1 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Prior to the final issuance of any permits, leases, or other
approvals by a code city for projects or proposals to occur within or
adjacent to marine aquatic habitats, the code city must conduct and
finalize an endangered marine species review under section 1 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW
to read as follows:
Prior to the final issuance of any permits, leases, or other
approvals by a county for projects or proposals to occur within or
adjacent to marine aquatic habitats, the county must conduct and
finalize an endangered marine species review under section 1 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Prior to the final issuance of any permits, leases, or other
approvals by a port district for projects or proposals to occur within
or adjacent to marine aquatic habitats, the port district must conduct
and finalize an endangered marine species review under section 1 of
this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.21C.075 and 1997 c 429 s 49 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Because a major purpose of this chapter is to combine
environmental considerations with public decisions, any appeal brought
under this chapter shall be linked to a specific governmental action.
The state environmental policy act provides a basis for challenging
whether governmental action is in compliance with the substantive and
procedural provisions of this chapter. The state environmental policy
act is not intended to create a cause of action unrelated to a specific
governmental action.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by this section:
(a) Appeals under this chapter, including section 1 of this act,
shall be of the governmental action together with its accompanying
environmental determinations.
(b) Appeals of environmental determinations made (or lacking) under
this chapter, including section 1 of this act, shall be commenced
within the time required to appeal the governmental action which is
subject to environmental review.
(3) If an agency has a procedure for appeals of agency
environmental determinations made under this chapter, such procedure:
(a) Shall allow no more than one agency appeal proceeding on each
procedural determination (the adequacy of a determination of
significance/nonsignificance or of a final environmental impact
statement);
(b) Shall consolidate an appeal of procedural issues and of
substantive determinations made under this chapter (such as a decision
to require particular mitigation measures or to deny a proposal) with
a hearing or appeal on the underlying governmental action by providing
for a single simultaneous hearing before one hearing officer or body to
consider the agency decision or recommendation on a proposal and any
environmental determinations made under this chapter, with the
exception of:
(i) An appeal of a determination of significance;
(ii) An appeal of a procedural determination made by an agency when
the agency is a project proponent, or is funding a project, and chooses
to conduct its review under this chapter, including any appeals of its
procedural determinations, prior to submitting an application for a
project permit;
(iii) An appeal of a procedural determination made by an agency on
a nonproject action; or
(iv) An appeal to the local legislative authority under RCW
43.21C.060 or other applicable state statutes;
(c) Shall provide for the preparation of a record for use in any
subsequent appeal proceedings, and shall provide for any subsequent
appeal proceedings to be conducted on the record, consistent with other
applicable law. An adequate record consists of findings and
conclusions, testimony under oath, and taped or written transcript. An
electronically recorded transcript will suffice for purposes of review
under this subsection; and
(d) Shall provide that procedural determinations made by the
responsible official shall be entitled to substantial weight.
(4) If a person aggrieved by an agency action has the right to
judicial appeal and if an agency has an administrative appeal
procedure, such person shall, prior to seeking any judicial review, use
such agency procedure if any such procedure is available, unless
expressly provided otherwise by state statute.
(5) Some statutes and ordinances contain time periods for
challenging governmental actions which are subject to review under this
chapter, such as various local land use approvals (the "underlying
governmental action"). RCW 43.21C.080 establishes an optional "notice
of action" procedure which, if used, imposes a time period for
appealing decisions under this chapter. This subsection does not
modify any such time periods. In this subsection, the term "appeal"
refers to a judicial appeal only.
(a) If there is a time period for appealing the underlying
governmental action, appeals under this chapter shall be commenced
within such time period. The agency shall give official notice stating
the date and place for commencing an appeal.
(b) If there is no time period for appealing the underlying
governmental action, and a notice of action under RCW 43.21C.080 is
used, appeals shall be commenced within the time period specified by
RCW 43.21C.080.
(6)(a) Judicial review under subsection (5) of this section of an
appeal decision made by an agency under subsection (3) of this section
shall be on the record, consistent with other applicable law.
(b) A taped or written transcript may be used. If a taped
transcript is to be reviewed, a record shall identify the location on
the taped transcript of testimony and evidence to be reviewed. Parties
are encouraged to designate only those portions of the testimony
necessary to present the issues raised on review, but if a party
alleges that a finding of fact is not supported by evidence, the party
should include in the record all evidence relevant to the disputed
finding. Any other party may designate additional portions of the
taped transcript relating to issues raised on review. A party may
provide a written transcript of portions of the testimony at the
party's own expense or apply to that court for an order requiring the
party seeking review to pay for additional portions of the written
transcript.
(c) Judicial review under this chapter shall without exception be
of the governmental action together with its accompanying environmental
determinations.
(7) Jurisdiction over the review of determinations under this
chapter in an appeal before an agency or superior court shall upon
consent of the parties be transferred in whole or part to the
shorelines hearings board. The shorelines hearings board shall hear
the matter and sign the final order expeditiously. The superior court
shall certify the final order of the shorelines hearings board and the
certified final order may only be appealed to an appellate court. In
the case of an appeal under this chapter regarding a project or other
matter that is also the subject of an appeal to the shorelines hearings
board under chapter 90.58 RCW, the shorelines hearings board shall have
sole jurisdiction over both the appeal under this section and the
appeal under chapter 90.58 RCW, shall consider them together, and shall
issue a final order within one hundred eighty days as provided in RCW
90.58.180.
(8) For purposes of this section and RCW 43.21C.080, the words
"action", "decision", and "determination" mean substantive agency
action including any accompanying procedural determinations under this
chapter (except where the word "action" means "appeal" in RCW
43.21C.080(2)). The word "action" in this section and RCW 43.21C.080
does not mean a procedural determination by itself made under this
chapter. The word "determination" includes any environmental document
required by this chapter and state or local implementing rules. The
word "agency" refers to any state or local unit of government. Except
as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the word "appeal" refers
to administrative, legislative, or judicial appeals.
(9) The court in its discretion may award reasonable attorneys'
fees of up to one thousand dollars in the aggregate to the prevailing
party, including a governmental agency, on issues arising out of this
chapter if the court makes specific findings that the legal position of
a party is frivolous and without reasonable basis.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.21C.110 and 1997 c 429 s 47 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty and function of the department of ecology:
(1) To adopt and amend thereafter rules of interpretation and
implementation of this chapter, including section 1 of this act,
subject to the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW, for the purpose of
providing uniform rules and guidelines to all branches of government
including state agencies, political subdivisions, public and municipal
corporations, and counties. The proposed rules shall be subject to
full public hearings requirements associated with rule promulgation.
Suggestions for modifications of the proposed rules shall be considered
on their merits, and the department shall have the authority and
responsibility for full and appropriate independent promulgation and
adoption of rules, assuring consistency with this chapter as amended
and with the preservation of protections afforded by this chapter. The
rule-making powers authorized in this section shall include, but shall
not be limited to, the following phases of interpretation and
implementation of this chapter:
(a) Categories of governmental actions which are not to be
considered as potential major actions significantly affecting the
quality of the environment, including categories pertaining to
applications for water right permits pursuant to chapters 90.03 and
90.44 RCW. The types of actions included as categorical exemptions in
the rules shall be limited to those types which are not major actions
significantly affecting the quality of the environment. The rules
shall provide for certain circumstances where actions which potentially
are categorically exempt require environmental review. An action that
is categorically exempt under the rules adopted by the department may
not be conditioned or denied under this chapter.
(b) Rules for criteria and procedures applicable to the
determination of when an act of a branch of government is a major
action significantly affecting the quality of the environment for which
a detailed statement is required to be prepared pursuant to RCW
43.21C.030.
(c) Rules and procedures applicable to the preparation of detailed
statements, endangered marine species reviews, and other environmental
documents, including but not limited to rules for timing of
environmental review, obtaining comments, data and other information,
and providing for and determining areas of public participation which
shall include the scope and review of draft environmental impact
statements.
(d) Scope of coverage and contents of detailed statements and
endangered marine species reviews assuring that such statements and
reviews are simple, uniform, and as short as practicable; statements
are required to analyze only reasonable alternatives and probable
adverse environmental impacts which are significant, and may analyze
beneficial impacts.
(e) Rules and procedures for public notification of actions taken
and documents prepared.
(f) Definition of terms relevant to the implementation of this
chapter including the establishment of a list of elements of the
environment. Analysis of environmental considerations under RCW
43.21C.030(2) may be required only for those subjects listed as
elements of the environment (or portions thereof). The list of
elements of the environment shall consist of the "natural" and "built"
environment. The elements of the built environment shall consist of
public services and utilities (such as water, sewer, schools, fire and
police protection), transportation, environmental health (such as
explosive materials and toxic waste), and land and shoreline use
(including housing, and a description of the relationships with land
use and shoreline plans and designations, including population).
(g) Rules for determining the obligations and powers under this
chapter of two or more branches of government involved in the same
project significantly affecting the quality of the environment.
(h) Methods to assure adequate public awareness of the preparation
and issuance of detailed statements required by RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c)
and endangered marine species reviews required under section 1 of this
act.
(i) To prepare rules for projects setting forth the time limits
within which the governmental entity responsible for the action shall
comply with the provisions of this chapter.
(j) Rules for utilization of a detailed statement for more than one
action and rules improving environmental analysis of nonproject
proposals and encouraging better interagency coordination and
integration between this chapter and other environmental laws.
(k) Rules relating to actions which shall be exempt from the
provisions of this chapter in situations of emergency.
(l) Rules relating to the use of environmental documents in
planning and decision making and the implementation of the substantive
policies and requirements of this chapter, including procedures for
appeals under this chapter.
(m) Rules relating to the level of detail and other requirements of
endangered marine species reviews required under section 1 of this act.
(n) Rules and procedures that provide for the integration of
environmental review with project review as provided in RCW 43.21C.240.
The rules and procedures shall be jointly developed with the department
of community, trade, and economic development and shall be applicable
to the preparation of environmental documents for actions in counties,
cities, and towns planning under RCW 36.70A.040. The rules and
procedures shall also include procedures and criteria to analyze
planned actions under RCW 43.21C.031(2) and revisions to the rules
adopted under this section to ensure that they are compatible with the
requirements and authorizations of chapter 347, Laws of 1995, as
amended by chapter 429, Laws of 1997. Ordinances or procedures adopted
by a county, city, or town to implement the provisions of chapter 347,
Laws of 1995 prior to the effective date of rules adopted under this
subsection (1)(((m))) (n) shall continue to be effective until the
adoption of any new or revised ordinances or procedures that may be
required. If any revisions are required as a result of rules adopted
under this subsection (1)(((m))) (n), those revisions shall be made
within the time limits specified in RCW 43.21C.120.
(2) In exercising its powers, functions, and duties under this
section, the department may:
(a) Consult with the state agencies and with representatives of
science, industry, agriculture, labor, conservation organizations,
state and local governments, and other groups, as it deems advisable;
and
(b) Utilize, to the fullest extent possible, the services,
facilities, and information (including statistical information) of
public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals, in order
to avoid duplication of effort and expense, overlap, or conflict with
similar activities authorized by law and performed by established
agencies.
(3) Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall be subject to the
review procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---