BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the policy of the state to encourage
the joint use of utility poles and to promote competition for the
provision of telecommunications and information services. In order to
achieve these two objectives, the legislature intends to establish a
consistent formula for calculating pole attachment rates, which will
ensure greater predictability and consistency in pole attachment rates
statewide. The legislature further intends to continue working through
issues related to pole attachments with interested parties in an open
and collaborative process in order to minimize the potential for
disputes going forward.

Sec. 2 RCW 54.04.045 and 1996 c 32 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Attachment" means the affixation or installation of any wire,
cable, or other physical material capable of carrying electronic
impulses or light waves for the carrying of intelligence for
telecommunications or television, including, but not limited to cable,
and any related device, apparatus, or auxiliary equipment upon any pole
owned or controlled in whole or in part by one or more locally
regulated utilities where the installation has been made with the
necessary consent.
(b) "Licensee" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
company, association, joint stock association, or cooperatively
organized association, which is authorized to construct attachments
upon, along, under, or across public ways.
(c) "Locally regulated utility" means a public utility district not
subject to rate or service regulation by the utilities and
transportation commission.
(((c))) (d) "Nondiscriminatory" means that pole owners may not
arbitrarily differentiate among or between similar classes of
((persons)) licensees approved for attachments.
(2) All rates, terms, and conditions made, demanded, or received by
a locally regulated utility for attachments to its poles must be just,
reasonable, nondiscriminatory, and sufficient. A locally regulated
utility shall levy attachment space rental rates that are uniform for
the same class of service within the locally regulated utility service
area.
(3) A just and reasonable rate must be calculated as follows:
(a) One-half of the rate consists of the additional costs of
procuring and maintaining pole attachments, but may not exceed the
actual capital and operating expenses of the locally regulated utility
attributable to that portion of the pole, duct, or conduit used for the
pole attachment, including a share of the required support and
clearance space, in proportion to the space used for the pole
attachment, as compared to all other uses made of the subject
facilities and uses that remain available to the owner or owners of the
subject facilities; and
(b) One-half of the rate consists of the additional costs of
procuring and maintaining pole attachments, but may not exceed the
actual capital and operating expenses of the locally regulated utility
attributable to the share of the required support and clearance space,
divided equally among all attachers, which sum is divided by the height
of the pole.
(4) The locally regulated utility may establish a rate according to
the calculation outlined in subsection (3) of this section or it may
establish a rate according to the cable formula set forth by the
federal communications commission by rule as it existed on the
effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be
provided by the federal communications commission by rule, consistent
with the purposes of this section.
(5) Except in extraordinary circumstances, a locally regulated
utility must respond to a licensee's application to enter into a new
pole attachment contract or renew an existing pole attachment contract
within forty-five days of receipt, stating either:
(a) The application is complete; or
(b) The application is incomplete, including a statement of what
information is needed to make the application complete.
(6) Within sixty days of an application being deemed complete, the
locally regulated utility shall notify the applicant as to whether the
application has been accepted for licensing or rejected. If the
application is rejected, the locally regulated utility must provide
reasons for the rejection. A request to attach may only be denied on
a nondiscriminatory basis (a) where there is insufficient capacity; or
(b) for reasons of safety, reliability, and generally applicable
engineering purposes.
(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed or is intended to
confer upon the utilities and transportation commission any authority
to exercise jurisdiction over locally regulated utilities.

--- END ---