BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The increased use of ineffective and
inefficient exterior lighting in Washington has generated unnecessary
light pollution and wasteful energy consumption. With the application
of the best technology available, Washington will be able to reduce sky
glow, create substantial reductions in energy consumption, and protect
the nighttime environment.
Light pollution may be greatly reduced by using properly designed
light fixtures that direct light downward, are mounted at the proper
height to do their job, and avoid glare and light trespass. This
lighting is known as fully shielded lamps. Modern fully shielded lamps
deliver the same amount of light to the ground as older wasteful
designs but use less power, thus reducing the amount of energy used,
which saves money and reduces the quantity of greenhouse gases released
into the environment.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to require the best
technology available in all exterior lighting in order to reduce energy
consumption and protect our night sky.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Fully shielded" means an outdoor lighting fixture that is
installed and shielded in such a manner that all light rays emitted by
the fixture, either directly from the lamp or indirectly from the
fixture, are projected below a horizontal plane running through the
lowest point on the fixture where light is emitted.
(2) "Lamp" means the component of a luminaire that produces actual
light.
(3) "LED" means light emitting diodes.
(4) "Luminaire" means a complete lighting system, which includes a
lamp or lamps and a fixture.
(5) "Outdoor lighting" means nighttime illumination of an outside
area or object by any human-made device located outdoors that produces
light by any means.
(6) "Outdoor lighting fixture" means outdoor electrically powered
illuminating devices, outdoor lighting or reflective surfaces, lamps,
and similar devices that are permanently installed or portable and used
for illumination, decoration, or advertisement. These devices include
search, spot, and floodlights at or on the following:
(a) Buildings and structures;
(b) Recreational areas;
(c) Parking lot lighting;
(d) Landscape lighting;
(e) Billboards and other signs;
(f) Street lighting;
(g) Product display area lighting; and
(h) Building overhangs and open canopies.
(7) "Person" means an individual, a tenant, a lessee, an owner, or
any commercial entity, including a firm, business, partnership, joint
venture, government entity, or corporation.
(8) "Temporary outdoor lighting" means the specific illumination of
an outside area of objects by any human-made device located outdoors
that produces light by any means for a period of less than thirty days,
with at least one hundred eighty days passing before it is used again.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All new public and private outdoor
lighting installed after July 1, 2008, in Washington must conform to
the requirements of this chapter. All other public and private outdoor
lighting must conform to the requirements of this chapter by July 1,
2012.
(2) Nothing in this chapter prevents the application or adoption of
local regulations restricting light pollution that are equal to or more
stringent than the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The provisions of this chapter do not apply
to:
(1) Temporary lighting required for construction projects and
related to road construction and repair, installation of sewer and
water facilities, and other public infrastructure;
(2) Temporary emergency lighting used by police, fire departments,
or other emergency services;
(3) Hazard warning luminaires required by federal law and federal
regulatory agencies, if the luminaires are red and as close as possible
to the minimum required lumen output for the task under federal law;
(4) Seasonal and decorative lighting displays that use multiple low
wattage bulbs, including LED lights;
(5) Navigational lighting systems at airports.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Any new or replacement outdoor lighting
fixture must be a fully shielded luminaire if the rated output of the
outdoor lighting fixture is greater than one thousand eight hundred
lumens.
(2) Where practicable, lighting must include timers, dimmers, and
sensors to reduce overall energy consumption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 In addition to the restrictions under RCW
47.42.062(4), an outdoor lighting fixture used to illuminate outdoor
advertising signs, including street signs and directive signs, must be
fully shielded and mounted on top of the sign structure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Outdoor lighting may not be used for
public or private outdoor recreational facilities, including but not
limited to football fields, soccer fields, baseball fields, softball
fields, tennis courts, race tracks, ski slopes, or show areas unless
the following conditions are met:
(a) Lighting for parking lots and other areas surrounding the
recreational facility comply with this chapter;
(b) The fixtures used for event lighting are fully shielded; and
(c) The event is scheduled to complete all activity before or as
near to 10:00 p.m. as practical.
(2) A person may not illuminate a playing field, court, slope, or
track after 11:00 p.m. except to conclude a scheduled event that was in
progress before 11:00 p.m. and if circumstances prevented the event
from concluding before 11:00 p.m.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Outdoor lighting may not be used for
lighting outdoor display lots, including automobile sales or rentals,
recreational vehicle sales, or building material sales unless the
following conditions are met:
(a) Lighting of parking lots and other areas surrounding the
display lot comply with this chapter;
(b) Fixtures used for display lighting are fully shielded; and
(c) Display lot lighting is turned off within thirty minutes after
closing the business.
(2) A person may not fully illuminate a display lot after 10:00
p.m., but security lighting may be used after 10:00 p.m.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 70.95M RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may not install, sell, offer to sell, lease, or
purchase a mercury vapor fixture, lamp, or other device for outdoor
lighting use.
(2) Mercury vapor lamps or fixtures used for outdoor lighting must
be removed by July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---