BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Local governments may adopt moratoria or other interim official
controls as necessary and appropriate to implement this chapter.
(2)(a) A local government adopting a moratorium or control under
this section must:
(i) Hold a public hearing on the moratorium or control;
(ii) Adopt detailed findings of fact that include, but are not
limited to justifications for the proposed or adopted actions and
explanations of the desired and likely outcomes;
(iii) Notify the department of the moratorium or control
immediately after its adoption. The notification must specify the
time, place, and date of any public hearing required by this
subsection.
(b) The public hearing required by this section must be held within
sixty days of the adoption of the moratorium or control.
(3) A moratorium or control adopted under this section may be
effective for up to six months if a detailed work plan for remedying
the issues and circumstances necessitating the moratorium or control is
developed and made available for public review. A moratorium or
control may be renewed for one or more six-month period if the local
government complies with subsection (2)(a) of this section before each
renewal.
(4) Nothing in this section may be construed to modify county and
city moratoria powers conferred outside this chapter.

--- END ---