BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) In the past two decades, Washington state has implemented
legislative initiatives to improve access to quality, affordable health
care in the state. These initiatives, which placed Washington in the
forefront of states addressing their residents' health care needs,
include:
(a) The basic health plan providing affordable coverage to over one
hundred thousand individuals and families below two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level;
(b) The "cover all children" initiative, expanding publicly funded
coverage to children in families under three hundred percent of the
federal poverty level and promising to cover all children by 2010;
(c) The blue ribbon commission on health care costs and access
resulting in the passage of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5930, that, among other actions, directed state agencies to integrate
prevention, chronic care management, and the medical home concept into
state purchased health care programs;
(d) The movement toward evidence-based health care purchasing for
state health care programs, including the prescription drug program and
its preferred drug list, the health technology assessment program, the
use of medical evidence to evaluate medical necessity under state
medical assistance programs and the direction provided in Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 relating to aligning payment
with evidence-based care; and
(e) The development of patient safety initiatives, including health
care facility reporting of adverse medical events and hospital-acquired
infection reporting.
(2) Despite these initiatives, the cost of health care has
continued to increase at a disproportionately high rate.
(3) Affordability is key to accessing health care, as evidenced by
the fact that more than half of the uninsured people in Washington
state are in low-income families, and low-wage workers are far more
likely to be uninsured than those with higher incomes. These
increasing costs are placing quality care beyond the reach of a growing
number of Washington citizens and contributing to health care
expenditures that strain the resources of individuals, businesses, and
public programs.
(4) Efforts by public and private purchasers to control
expenditures, and the stress these efforts place on the stability of
the health care workforce and viability of health care facilities,
threaten to reduce access to quality care for all residents of the
state.
(5) Prompt action is crucial to prevent further deterioration of
the health and well-being of Washingtonians.
(6) Addressing an issue of this importance and magnitude demands
the full engagement of concerned Washingtonians in a reasoned
examination of options to improve access to quality, affordable health
care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Washington citizens' work group on
health care is established.
(1) By April 1, 2008, the governor, in consultation with the chairs
of the health care policy committees of the senate and house of
representatives, shall appoint nine citizen members who may include,
but are not limited to, representatives from business, labor, health
care providers and consumer groups, and persons with expertise in
health care financing and health care ethics. The citizen members
shall be selected from individuals recognized for their independent
judgment. The majority leader and minority leader of the senate and
the speaker and minority leader of the house shall each appoint one
member from their respective caucuses to serve on the work group. The
work group shall actively engage Washingtonians in a public process to
examine options for improving access to quality, affordable health care
and direct the economic analysis of several health care reform
proposals, as provided in section 3 of this act.
(2) To engage Washingtonians in a process to examine options for
improving access to quality, affordable health care, the work group
shall:
(a) Seek to maximize participation of Washingtonians from all walks
of life and all parts of the state by conducting meetings in all
congressional districts of the state and providing other venues for
participation;
(b) Provide information to Washingtonians on the state's health
care achievements to date and ongoing trends or issues that negatively
affect affordability, access, quality, and efficiency;
(c) Present information and seek public input about the health care
proposals described in section 3 of this act, including any findings
from the economic analysis of the proposals;
(d) Communicate its efforts through a variety of methods,
including:
(i) A concise guide describing underlying health care issues, the
health care proposals under review, and principles guiding the
evaluation of those proposals;
(ii) A web site that announces meeting times and locations,
provides detailed information on the health care proposals under
review, and provides opportunities for public input; and
(iii) Public service announcements.
(3) The economic analysis of health care reform proposals provided
in section 3 of this act shall be conducted by an independent entity.
Each evaluation shall address the impact of implementation of the
proposal on:
(a) The number of Washingtonians covered and number remaining
uninsured;
(b) The scope of coverage available to persons covered under the
proposal;
(c) The impact on the cost and affordability of health care to
individuals, businesses, and government;
(d) The impact on employment;
(e) The impact on consumer choice;
(f) The redistribution of amounts currently spent by individuals,
businesses, and government on health, as well as any savings;
(g) Administrative efficiencies and resulting savings;
(h) The impact on hospital charity care; and
(i) The extent to which each proposal promotes:
(i) Improved health outcomes;
(ii) Prevention and early intervention;
(iii) Chronic care management;
(iv) Services based on empirical evidence;
(v) Incentives to use effective and necessary services;
(vi) Disincentives to discourage use of marginally effective or
inappropriate services; and
(vii) A medical home.
(4) By December 1, 2008, the work group shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the work group's findings,
including:
(a) A summary of the work group's activities, including meetings
held, number of people in attendance, and number of contacts from the
public;
(b) A summary of public input;
(c) The results of the work group's review of the proposals. In
reviewing the proposals, the work group shall evaluate the extent to
which each proposal:
(i) Provides a medical home for every family;
(ii) Provides health care that Washington families can afford;
(iii) Promotes improved health outcomes, in part through a more
efficient delivery system;
(iv) Requires that individuals, employers, and government share in
financing the proposal; and
(v) Enables Washington families to choose their provider and health
network, and have the option of retaining their current provider;
(d) A summary of the work group's conclusions; and
(e) Recommendations related to the work group's review of the
proposals, including suggestions for the adoption of any health care
proposal during the 2009 session of the legislature.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The work group shall present information
and seek public input about, direct the economic analysis of, and
review the following health care proposals:
(a) Health care reform legislation recently enacted or proposed in
Massachusetts, Wisconsin, and California;
(b) A proposal to provide a guaranteed benefit plan for all
Washingtonians covering annual catastrophic health expenses of
medically necessary care in excess of ten thousand dollars and basic
preventive care including annual examinations, cancer screenings,
immunizations, and at least one dental care visit;
(c) A proposal to establish a single payer health care system, in
which residents of Washington state receive a guaranteed package of
health care services from health care providers that contract directly
with and are paid by the state.
(2) In addition to the proposals described in subsection (1) of
this section, the work group may develop its own proposal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Consistent with funds appropriated
specifically for this purpose, the senate and house of representatives
shall provide staff support and administrative services to the work
group including:
(1) Contracting with a consultant to schedule and locate work group
and community meetings, and facilitate meetings and other activities to
enable the work group to complete its responsibilities in a timely and
effective manner; and
(2) Contracting with an independent consultant with expertise in
health economics and actuarial science to evaluate the health care
reform proposals under consideration. The office of the insurance
commissioner may contract with a consultant already providing similar
services to a state agency if doing so will expedite the work without
compromising quality or increasing cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---