BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47A.020 and 2007 c 260 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the Washington state
health care authority, established under chapter 41.05 RCW.
(2) "Board" means the health insurance partnership board
established in RCW 70.47A.100.
(3) "Eligible partnership participant" means ((an individual)) a
partnership participant who:
(a) Is a resident of the state of Washington; and
(b) Has family income that does not exceed two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level, as determined annually by the federal
department of health and human services((; and
(c) Is employed by a participating small employer or is a former
employee of a participating small employer who chooses to continue
receiving coverage through the partnership following separation from
employment)).
(4) "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005.
(5) "Participating small employer" means a small employer that
((employs at least one eligible partnership participant and)) has
entered into an agreement with the partnership ((for the partnership to
offer and administer the small employer's group health benefit plan, as
defined in federal law, Sec. 706 of ERISA (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1167), for
enrollees in the plan)) to purchase health benefits through the
partnership.
(6) "Partnership" means the health insurance partnership
established in RCW 70.47A.030.
(7) "Partnership participant" means ((an employee)) a participating
small employer and employees of a participating small employer, ((or))
and, except to the extent provided otherwise in RCW 70.47A.110(1)(e),
a former employee of a participating small employer who chooses to
continue receiving coverage through the partnership following
separation from employment.
(8) "Small employer" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005.
(9) "Subsidy" or "premium subsidy" means payment or reimbursement
to an eligible partnership participant toward the purchase of a health
benefit plan, and may include a net billing arrangement with insurance
carriers or a prospective or retrospective payment for health benefit
plan premiums.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.47A.030 and 2007 c 259 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To the extent funding is appropriated in the operating budget
for this purpose, the health insurance partnership is established. The
administrator shall be responsible for the implementation and operation
of the health insurance partnership, directly or by contract. The
administrator shall offer premium subsidies to eligible partnership
participants under RCW 70.47A.040. The partnership shall begin to
offer coverage no later than March 1, 2009.
(2) Consistent with policies adopted by the board under ((section
59 of this act)) RCW 70.47A.110, the administrator shall, directly or
by contract:
(a) Establish and administer procedures for enrolling small
employers in the partnership, including publicizing the existence of
the partnership and disseminating information on enrollment, and
establishing rules related to minimum participation of employees in
small groups purchasing health insurance through the partnership.
Opportunities to publicize the program for outreach and education of
small employers on the value of insurance shall explore the use of
online employer guides. As a condition of participating in the
partnership, a small employer must agree to establish a cafeteria plan
under section 125 of the federal internal revenue code that will enable
employees to use pretax dollars to pay their share of their health
benefit plan premium. The partnership shall provide technical
assistance to small employers for this purpose;
(b) Establish and administer procedures for health benefit plan
enrollment by employees of small employers during open enrollment
periods and outside of open enrollment periods upon the occurrence of
any qualifying event specified in the federal health insurance
portability and accountability act of 1996 or applicable state law.
((Neither)) Except to the extent authorized in RCW 70.47A.110(1)(e),
neither the employer nor the partnership shall limit an employee's
choice of coverage from among ((all)) the health benefit plans offered
through the partnership;
(c) ((Establish and manage a system for the partnership to be
designated as the sponsor or administrator of a participating small
employer health benefit plan and to undertake the obligations required
of a plan administrator under federal law;
(d))) Establish and manage a system of collecting and transmitting
to the applicable carriers all premium payments or contributions made
by or on behalf of partnership participants, including employer
contributions, automatic payroll deductions for partnership
participants, premium subsidy payments, and contributions from
philanthropies;
(((e))) (d) Establish and manage a system for determining
eligibility for and making premium subsidy payments under chapter 259,
Laws of 2007;
(((f))) (e) Establish a mechanism to apply a surcharge to ((all))
each health benefit plan((s)) purchased through the partnership, which
shall be used only to pay for administrative and operational expenses
of the partnership. The surcharge must be applied uniformly to all
health benefit plans ((offered)) purchased through the partnership
((and must be included in the premium for each health benefit plan)).
Any surcharge amount may be added to the premium, but shall not be
considered part of the small group community rate, and shall be applied
only to the coverage purchased through the partnership. Surcharges may
not be used to pay any premium assistance payments under this chapter.
The surcharge shall reflect administrative and operational expenses
remaining after any appropriation provided by the legislature to
support administrative or operational expenses of the partnership
during the year the surcharge is assessed;
(((g))) (f) Design a schedule of premium subsidies that is based
upon gross family income, giving appropriate consideration to family
size and the ages of all family members based on a benchmark health
benefit plan designated by the board. The amount of an eligible
partnership participant's premium subsidy shall be determined by
applying a sliding scale subsidy schedule with the percentage of
premium similar to that developed for subsidized basic health plan
enrollees under RCW 70.47.060. The subsidy shall be applied to the
employee's premium obligation for his or her health benefit plan, so
that employees benefit financially from any employer contribution to
the cost of their coverage through the partnership.
(3) The administrator may enter into interdepartmental agreements
with the office of the insurance commissioner, the department of social
and health services, and any other state agencies necessary to
implement this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.47A.040 and 2007 c 260 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning ((September 1, 2008)) January 1, 2009, the administrator
shall accept applications from eligible partnership participants, on
behalf of themselves, their spouses, and their dependent children, to
receive premium subsidies through the health insurance partnership.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.47A.070 and 2006 c 255 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator shall report biennially, beginning November 1,
2010, to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature
on the effectiveness and efficiency of the ((small employer)) health
insurance partnership program, including enrollment trends, the
services and benefits covered under the purchased health benefit plans,
consumer satisfaction, and other program operational issues.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.47A.110 and 2007 c 260 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The health insurance partnership board shall:
(a) Develop policies for enrollment of small employers in the
partnership, including minimum participation rules for small employer
groups. The small employer shall determine the criteria for
eligibility and enrollment in his or her plan and the terms and amounts
of the employer's contributions to that plan, consistent with any
minimum employer premium contribution level established by the board
under (d) of this subsection;
(b) Designate health benefit plans that are currently offered in
the small group market that will be offered to participating small
employers through the health insurance partnership and those plans that
will qualify for premium subsidy payments. At least four health
benefit plans shall be chosen, with multiple deductible and
point-of-service cost-sharing options. The health benefit plans shall
range from catastrophic to comprehensive coverage, and one health
benefit plan shall be a high deductible health plan. Every effort
shall be made to include health benefit plans that include components
to maximize the quality of care provided and result in improved health
outcomes, such as preventive care, wellness incentives, chronic care
management services, and provider network development and payment
policies related to quality of care;
(c) Approve a mid-range benefit plan from those selected to be used
as a benchmark plan for calculating premium subsidies;
(d) Determine whether there should be a minimum employer premium
contribution on behalf of employees, and if so, how much;
(e) Develop policies related to partnership participant enrollment
in health benefit plans. The board may focus its initial efforts on
access to coverage and affordability of coverage for participating
small employers and their employees. To the extent necessary for
successful implementation of the partnership, during a start-up phase
of partnership operation, the board may:
(i) Limit partnership participant health benefit plan choice; and
(ii) Offer former employees of participating small employers the
opportunity to continue coverage after separation from employment to
the extent that a former employee is eligible for continuation coverage
under 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1161 et seq.
The start-up phase may not exceed two years from the date the
partnership begins to offer coverage;
(f) Determine appropriate health benefit plan rating methodologies.
The methodologies shall be based on the small group adjusted community
rate as defined in Title 48 RCW. The board shall evaluate the impact
of applying the small group adjusted community rating ((with))
methodology to health benefit plans purchased through the partnership
on the ((partnership)) principle of allowing each ((employee))
partnership participant to choose ((their)) his or her health benefit
plan, and ((consider options)) may implement one or more risk
adjustment or reinsurance mechanisms to reduce uncertainty for carriers
and provide for efficient risk management of high-cost enrollees
((through risk adjustment, reinsurance, or other mechanisms));
(((f))) (g) Determine whether the partnership should be designated
as the administrator of a participating small employer health benefit
plan and undertake the obligations required of a plan administrator
under federal law in order to minimize administrative burdens on
participating small employers;
(h) Conduct analyses and provide recommendations as requested by
the legislature and the governor, with the assistance of staff from the
health care authority and the office of the insurance commissioner.
(2) The board may authorize one or more limited health care service
plans for dental care services to be offered by limited health care
service contractors under RCW 48.44.035. However, such plan shall not
qualify for subsidy payments.
(3) In fulfilling the requirements of this section, the board shall
consult with small employers, the office of the insurance commissioner,
members in good standing of the American academy of actuaries, health
carriers, agents and brokers, and employees of small business.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.21.045 and 2007 c 260 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An insurer offering any health benefit plan to a small
employer, either directly or through an association or member-governed
group formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing health care,
may offer and actively market to the small employer a health benefit
plan featuring a limited schedule of covered health care services.
Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an insurer from offering, or
a small employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may
have more comprehensive benefits than those included in the product
offered under this subsection. An insurer offering a health benefit
plan under this subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits
to the small employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140, 48.21.141, 48.21.142,
48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197, 48.21.200,
48.21.220, 48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235, ((48.21.240,)) 48.21.244,
48.21.250, 48.21.300, 48.21.310, or 48.21.320.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from
offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit plans with
benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under subsection
(1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be
submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan
offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to the
benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all small groups purchasing coverage,
including the small group participants in the health insurance
partnership established in RCW 70.47A.030. However, annual rate
adjustments for each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to
plus or minus four percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty days shall
be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier a
detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty days of
the denial.
(j) For health benefit plans purchased through the health insurance
partnership established in chapter 70.47A RCW:
(i) Any surcharge established pursuant to RCW 70.47A.030(2)(e)
shall be applied only to health benefit plans purchased through the
health insurance partnership; and
(ii) Risk adjustment or reinsurance mechanisms may be used by the
health insurance partnership program to redistribute funds to carriers
participating in the health insurance partnership based on differences
in risk attributable to individual choice of health plans or other
factors unique to health insurance partnership participation. Use of
such mechanisms shall be limited to the partnership program and will
not affect small group health plans offered outside the partnership.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
an insurer in determining whether to provide coverage to a small
employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) An insurer shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) An insurer may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(e) Minimum participation requirements and employer premium
contribution requirements adopted by the health insurance partnership
board under RCW 70.47A.110 shall apply only to the employers and
employees who purchase health benefit plans through the health
insurance partnership.
(6) An insurer must offer coverage to all eligible employees of a
small employer and their dependents. An insurer may not offer coverage
to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer group or
to only part of the group. An insurer may not modify a health plan
with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or dependent,
through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or exclude
coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or
services otherwise covered by the plan.
(7) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," "adjusted community rate," and "wellness activities" mean
the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.44.023 and 2007 c 260 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health care services contractor offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer a health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of
covered health care services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a contractor from offering, or a small employer from
purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more comprehensive
benefits than those included in the product offered under this
subsection. A contractor offering a health benefit plan under this
subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits to the small
employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, 48.44.290,
48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330, 48.44.335,
((48.44.340,)) 48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450,
and 48.44.460.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care service
contractor from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all groups purchasing coverage,
including the small group participants in the health insurance
partnership established in RCW 70.47A.030. However, annual rate
adjustments for each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to
plus or minus four percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty days shall
be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier a
detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty days of
the denial.
(j) For health benefit plans purchased through the health insurance
partnership established in chapter 70.47A RCW:
(i) Any surcharge established pursuant to RCW 70.47A.030(2)(e)
shall be applied only to health benefit plans purchased through the
health insurance partnership; and
(ii) Risk adjustment or reinsurance mechanisms may be used by the
health insurance partnership program to redistribute funds to carriers
participating in the health insurance partnership based on differences
in risk attributable to individual choice of health plans or other
factors unique to health insurance partnership participation. Use of
such mechanisms shall be limited to the partnership program and will
not affect small group health plans offered outside the partnership.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
a contractor in determining whether to provide coverage to a small
employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A contractor shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A contractor may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(e) Minimum participation requirements and employer premium
contribution requirements adopted by the health insurance partnership
board under RCW 70.47A.110 shall apply only to the employers and
employees who purchase health benefit plans through the health
insurance partnership.
(6) A contractor must offer coverage to all eligible employees of
a small employer and their dependents. A contractor may not offer
coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer
group or to only part of the group. A contractor may not modify a
health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee
or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.46.066 and 2007 c 260 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health maintenance organization offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer a health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of
covered health care services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a health maintenance organization from offering, or a small
employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more
comprehensive benefits than those included in the product offered under
this subsection. A health maintenance organization offering a health
benefit plan under this subsection shall clearly disclose all the
covered benefits to the small employer in a brochure filed with the
commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.46.275, 48.46.280, 48.46.285,
((48.46.290,)) 48.46.350, 48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480,
48.46.510, 48.46.520, and 48.46.530.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health maintenance
organization from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all groups purchasing coverage,
including the small group participants in the health insurance
partnership established in RCW 70.47A.030. However, annual rate
adjustments for each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to
plus or minus four percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty days shall
be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier a
detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty days of
the denial.
(j) For health benefit plans purchased through the health insurance
partnership established in chapter 70.47A RCW:
(i) Any surcharge established pursuant to RCW 70.47A.030(2)(e)
shall be applied only to health benefit plans purchased through the
health insurance partnership; and
(ii) Risk adjustment or reinsurance mechanisms may be used by the
health insurance partnership program to redistribute funds to carriers
participating in the health insurance partnership based on differences
in risk attributable to individual choice of health plans or other
factors unique to health insurance partnership participation. Use of
such mechanisms shall be limited to the partnership program and will
not affect small group health plans offered outside the partnership.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
a health maintenance organization in determining whether to provide
coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small
employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A health maintenance organization shall not require a minimum
participation level greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A health maintenance organization may not increase any
requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small
employer at any time after the small employer has been accepted for
coverage.
(e) Minimum participation requirements and employer premium
contribution requirements adopted by the health insurance partnership
board under RCW 70.47A.110 shall apply only to the employers and
employees who purchase health benefit plans through the health
insurance partnership.
(6) A health maintenance organization must offer coverage to all
eligible employees of a small employer and their dependents. A health
maintenance organization may not offer coverage to only certain
individuals or dependents in a small employer group or to only part of
the group. A health maintenance organization may not modify a health
plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or
dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---