BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the global
energy economy is undergoing significant changes creating a situation
where energy prices are increasingly more expensive and the sources of
energy increasingly less secure. Additionally, the legislature finds
that there is growing concern about the consequences associated with
greenhouse gas emissions from conventional sources of energy and the
need for action to address the threats of climate change. The
legislature finds ocean and tidal resources, as well as other forms of
hydrokinetic energy, will play an important role in providing clean,
carbon-free, reliable, and affordable energy to the citizens of
Washington. The legislature finds that the development of wave and
tidal energy technologies in Washington will create more highly valued
green jobs in the state.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to facilitate the
development of clean, carbon-free, reliable, and affordable power
sources for the energy needs of Washington's growing economy. Also, it
is the intent of the legislature to help catalyze the emergence of a
new water-power industry that is able to export technology and
expertise to the rest of the country and the world. To achieve these
goals, the legislature intends to establish a public-private
organization that will support a sustainable approach to hydrokinetic
energy development aimed at economic development, environmental
protection, and community stability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 3 through 5 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Center" means the Washington state center for excellence in
hydrokinetic energy.
(2) "Hydrokinetic energy" means hydroelectric generation from ocean
waves, tides, and currents, from free-flowing rivers and streams, and
from water discharges.
(3) "Water discharges" means water discharges from agricultural,
industrial, and commercial operations, wastewater treatment plants, or
residential properties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall convene and staff a work group to develop
the Washington state center for excellence in hydrokinetic energy.
(2) In developing the center, the work group shall ensure that the
center is a public-private entity; and the center supports a
sustainable approach to hydrokinetic energy development aimed at
economic development, environmental protection, and community
stability.
(3) The work group shall make recommendations to the legislature to
include, but not be limited to, the following:
(a) How the center will conduct and support research and
demonstrations of wave and tidal energy technologies in order to
facilitate the deployment and commercialization of these technologies
in Washington;
(b) How the center will establish and operate wave and tidal energy
test ranges that allow developers to demonstrate their wave and tidal
energy technologies;
(c) How the center will maintain processes to assist developers in
permitting their wave and tidal energy technologies;
(d) How the center will collect, manage, and disseminate data
necessary to assess statewide wave and tidal resources;
(e) How the center will promote Washington as the optimal location
for the development of and deployment of wave and tidal energy
technologies;
(f) What the public-private governance structure of the center will
be, considering as a model the life sciences discovery fund;
(g) How the center will coordinate with other governmental wave and
tidal institutions and initiatives in the Pacific Northwest economic
region;
(h) How the center will be funded through either state, federal, or
private sources of funding, or a combination of these funding sources;
(i) How the center will assist the state and various other entities
in reducing greenhouse gas emissions; and
(j) How the center will assist other forms of hydrokinetic energy
technologies in addition to wave and tidal energy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The work group created in section 3 of this
act shall consist of, but not be limited to, representatives from:
(1) The energy facility site evaluation council;
(2) The department of natural resources;
(3) The department of ecology;
(4) The department of fish and wildlife;
(5) The utilities and transportation commission;
(6) A wave energy company or tidal energy company, or both;
(7) A wave energy industry association or tidal energy industry
association, or both;
(8) Either a state or private university researching wave energy or
a state or private university researching tidal energy, or both;
(9) The Northwest Indian fisheries commission;
(10) An electrical utility; and
(11) A local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The work group created in section 3 of this
act must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature containing its recommendations, as well as draft
legislation implementing its recommendations, by December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---