BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall accept applications for grants from local
law enforcement agencies, local jurisdictions, and community
organizations.
(2) Any applicant that seeks a state grant to fund a
methamphetamine task force or methamphetamine prevention program must
first match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated for
methamphetamine task forces with local cash resources or in-kind funds.
Moneys allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant,
other federal, state, local, or in-kind funds or resources used for
methamphetamine task force operations and associated services.
(3) Grants awarded to local law enforcement agencies shall be used
solely for the operating costs of methamphetamine task forces.
(4) Applicants may not receive more than one grant per biennium
under this chapter.
(5) To facilitate widespread distribution of funds and services, no
individual grant awarded shall exceed one hundred thousand dollars.
(6) This section applies to local law enforcement agencies, local
jurisdictions, and community organizations in any county with a
population of less than four hundred thousand.
(7) Local law enforcement agencies, local jurisdictions, and
community organizations are encouraged to consider regional agreements
for the efficient delivery of funds distributed under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of one million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of community,
trade, and economic development for the purposes of section 1 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2009.

--- END ---