BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.04.150 and 2005 c 149 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission must appoint an advisory committee to generally
represent the interests of ((disabled)) hunters and fishers with
disabilities on matters including, but not limited to, special hunts,
modified sporting equipment, access to public land, and hunting and
fishing opportunities. The advisory committee is composed of seven
members, each being ((a person)) an individual with a disability. The
advisory committee members must represent the entire state. The
members must be appointed so that each of the six department
administrative regions, as they existed on January 1, ((2001)) 2007,
are represented with one resident on the advisory committee. One
additional member must be appointed at large. The chair of the
advisory committee must be a member of the advisory committee and shall
be selected by the members of the advisory committee.
(2) For the purposes of this section, ((a person)) an individual
with a disability includes but is not limited to:
(a) ((A permanently disabled person)) An individual with a
permanent disability who is not ambulatory over natural terrain without
a prosthesis or assistive device;
(b) ((A permanently disabled person)) An individual with a
permanent disability who is unable to walk without the use of
assistance from a brace, cane, crutch, wheelchair, scooter, walker, or
other assistive device;
(c) ((A person)) An individual who has a cardiac condition to the
extent that the ((person's)) individual's functional limitations are
severe;
(d) ((A person)) An individual who is restricted by lung disease to
the extent that the ((person's)) individual's functional limitations
are severe;
(e) ((A person)) An individual who is totally blind or visually
impaired; or
(f) ((A permanently disabled person)) An individual with a
permanent disability with upper or lower extremity impairments who does
not have the use of one or both upper or lower extremities.
(3) The members of the advisory committee are appointed for a four-year term. If a vacancy occurs on the advisory committee prior to the
expiration of a term, the commission must appoint a replacement within
sixty days to complete the term.
(4) The advisory committee must meet at least semiannually, and may
meet at other times as requested by a majority of the advisory
committee members for any express purpose that directly relates to the
duties set forth in subsection (1) of this section. A majority of
members currently serving on the advisory committee constitutes a
quorum. The department must provide staff support for all official
advisory committee meetings.
(5) Each member of the advisory committee shall serve without
compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The members of the advisory committee, or individuals acting on
their behalf, are immune from civil liability for official acts
performed in the course of their duties.
(7) ((The provisions of this section constitute a pilot program
that expires July 1, 2008. On)) Beginning December 1, ((2007)) 2011,
and again at least once every four years, the commission shall present
a report to the appropriate legislative committees detailing the
effectiveness of the advisory committee((,)) including, but not limited
to, the participation levels, general interest, quality of advice, and
recommendations as to the advisory committee's continuance or
modification.

--- END ---