BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.431 and 1986 c 261 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 82.04.4297, 82.04.4311, 82.08.02915,
82.12.02915, and section 2 of this act, the term "health or social
welfare organization" means an organization, including any community
action council, which renders health or social welfare services as
defined in subsection (2) of this section, which is a not-for-profit
corporation under chapter 24.03 RCW and which is managed by a governing
board of not less than eight individuals none of whom is a paid
employee of the organization or which is a corporation sole under
chapter 24.12 RCW. Health or social welfare organization does not
include a corporation providing professional services as authorized in
chapter 18.100 RCW. In addition a corporation in order to be exempt
under RCW 82.04.4297 shall satisfy the following conditions:
(a) No part of its income may be paid directly or indirectly to its
members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees except in the
form of services rendered by the corporation in accordance with its
purposes and bylaws;
(b) Salary or compensation paid to its officers and executives must
be only for actual services rendered, and at levels comparable to the
salary or compensation of like positions within the public service of
the state;
(c) Assets of the corporation must be irrevocably dedicated to the
activities for which the exemption is granted and, on the liquidation,
dissolution, or abandonment by the corporation, may not inure directly
or indirectly to the benefit of any member or individual except a
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation which also would be
entitled to the exemption;
(d) The corporation must be duly licensed or certified where
licensing or certification is required by law or regulation;
(e) The amounts received qualifying for exemption must be used for
the activities for which the exemption is granted;
(f) Services must be available regardless of race, color, national
origin, or ancestry; and
(g) The director of revenue shall have access to its books in order
to determine whether the corporation is exempt from taxes within the
intent of RCW 82.04.4297 and this section.
(2) The term "health or social welfare services" includes and is
limited to:
(a) Mental health, drug, or alcoholism counseling or treatment;
(b) Family counseling;
(c) Health care services;
(d) Therapeutic, diagnostic, rehabilitative, or restorative
services for the care of the sick, aged, or physically,
developmentally, or emotionally-disabled individuals;
(e) Activities which are for the purpose of preventing or
ameliorating juvenile delinquency or child abuse, including
recreational activities for those purposes;
(f) Care of orphans or foster children;
(g) Day care of children;
(h) Employment development, training, and placement;
(i) Legal services to the indigent;
(j) Weatherization assistance or minor home repair for low-income
homeowners or renters;
(k) Assistance to low-income homeowners and renters to offset the
cost of home heating energy, through direct benefits to eligible
households or to fuel vendors on behalf of eligible households; ((and))
(l) Community services to low-income individuals, families, and
groups, which are designed to have a measurable and potentially major
impact on causes of poverty in communities of the state; and
(m) Temporary medical housing, as defined in section 2 of this act,
if the housing is provided only:
(i) While the patient is receiving medical treatment at a hospital
required to be licensed under RCW 70.41.090 or at an outpatient clinic
associated with such hospital, including any period of recuperation or
observation immediately following such medical treatment; and
(ii) By a person that does not furnish lodging or related services
to the general public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
temporary medical housing by a health or social welfare organization,
if the following conditions are met:
(a) The temporary medical housing is provided only:
(i) While the patient is receiving medical treatment at: (A) A
hospital required to be licensed under RCW 70.41.090; or (B) an
outpatient clinic associated with such hospital; or
(ii) During any period of recuperation or observation immediately
following medical treatment received by a patient at a facility in
(a)(i)(A) or (B) of this subsection; and
(b) The health or social welfare organization does not furnish
lodging or related services to the general public.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Health or social welfare organization" has the meaning
provided in RCW 82.04.431; and
(b) "Temporary medical housing" means transient lodging and related
services provided to a patient or the patient's immediate family, legal
guardian, or other persons necessary to the patient's mental or
physical well-being.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 67.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The taxes on lodging authorized under this chapter do not apply to
sales of temporary medical housing exempt under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 67.40 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax imposed in RCW 67.40.090 and the tax authorized under RCW
67.40.130 do not apply to sales of temporary medical housing exempt
under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.100.040 and 2002 c 178 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public facilities district may impose an excise tax on the
sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is subject to
tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be levied on
any premises having fewer than forty lodging units. However, if a
public facilities district has not imposed such an excise tax prior to
December 31, 1995, the public facilities district may only impose the
excise tax if a ballot proposition authorizing the imposition of the
tax has been approved by a simple majority vote of voters of the public
facilities district voting on the proposition.
(2) The rate of the tax shall not exceed two percent and the
proceeds of the tax shall only be used for the acquisition, design,
construction, remodeling, maintenance, equipping, reequipping,
repairing, and operation of its public facilities. This excise tax
shall not be imposed until the district has approved the proposal to
acquire, design, and construct the public facilities.
(3) A public facilities district may not impose the tax authorized
in this section if, after the tax authorized in this section was
imposed, the effective combined rate of state and local excise taxes,
including sales and use taxes and excise taxes on lodging, imposed on
the sale of or charge made for furnishing of lodging in any
jurisdiction in the public facilities district exceeds eleven and one-half percent.
(4) The tax imposed in this section does not apply to sales of
temporary medical housing exempt under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35.101 RCW
to read as follows:
The lodging charge authorized in RCW 35.101.050 does not apply to
temporary medical housing exempt under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---