BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.050 and 2007 c 380 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate
limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing
district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this
chapter if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a
majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition
at a general election held within the district or at a special election
within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of
submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held pursuant
to this section shall be held not more than twelve months prior to the
date on which the proposed levy is to be made, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section. The ballot of the proposition shall
state the dollar rate proposed and shall clearly state the conditions,
if any, which are applicable under subsection (4) of this section.
(2) Subject to statutory dollar limitations, a proposition placed
before the voters under this section may authorize annual increases in
levies for multiple consecutive years, up to six consecutive years,
during which period each year's authorized maximum legal levy shall be
used as the base upon which an increased levy limit for the succeeding
year is computed, but the ballot proposition must state the dollar rate
proposed only for the first year of the consecutive years and must
state the limit factor, or a specified index to be used for determining
a limit factor, such as the consumer price index, which need not be the
same for all years, by which the regular tax levy for the district may
be increased in each of the subsequent consecutive years. Elections
for this purpose must be held at a primary or general election. The
title of each ballot measure must state the specific purposes for which
the proposed annual increases during the specified period of up to six
consecutive years shall be used, and funds raised under the levy shall
not supplant existing funds used for these purposes. For purposes of
this subsection, existing funds means the actual operating expenditures
for the calendar year in which the ballot measure is approved by
voters. Actual operating expenditures excludes lost federal funds,
lost or expired state grants or loans, extraordinary events not likely
to reoccur, changes in contract provisions beyond the control of the
taxing district receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital
expenditures.
(3)(a) After a levy authorized pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section is made, the dollar amount of such levy shall be used for the
purpose of computing the limitations for subsequent levies provided for
in this chapter, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (4)(d) of this section, after
the final levy under subsection (2) of this section is made or after
the expiration of a limited period or the satisfaction of a limited
purpose, under subsection (4)(a) or (b) of this section, whichever is
later, subsequent levies shall be computed in the manner provided in
subsection (5) of this section.
(4) If expressly stated, a proposition placed before the voters
under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may:
(a) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made;
(b) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made,
but if the limited purpose includes making redemption payments on
bonds, the period for which the increased levies are made shall not
exceed nine years;
(c) Set the levy at a rate less than the maximum rate allowed for
the district; ((or))
(d) Provide, in the case of a proposition placed before the voters
under subsection (2) of this section, that the maximum allowable dollar
amount of the final annual levy of the period specified in the measure
shall be used to compute the limitations provided for in this chapter
on levy increases occurring after the expiration of the period; or
(e) Include any combination of the conditions in this subsection.
(5) ((Except as otherwise provided in an approved ballot measure
under this section,)) After the expiration of a limited period under
subsection (4)(a) of this section or the satisfaction of a limited
purpose under subsection (4)(b) of this section, whichever comes first,
subsequent levies shall be computed as if:
(a) The ((limited)) proposition under ((subsection (4) of)) this
section had not been approved; and
(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates
((which)) that would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter
during the years levies were made under the ((limited)) proposition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies prospectively only to levy
lid lift ballot propositions under RCW 84.55.050 that receive voter
approval on or after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---