BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.04.140 and 1979 ex.s. c 170 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature declares that the potential economic and
environmental benefits of solar energy use are considered to be in the
public interest; therefore, local governments are authorized to
encourage and protect access to direct sunlight for solar energy
systems. The legislature further declares that solar easements
appropriate to assuring continued access to direct sunlight for solar
energy systems may be created and may be privately negotiated, but that
property owners with solar energy systems erected and operating on
their property on or after January 1, 2009, have an implied solar
easement.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.04.150 and 1979 ex.s. c 170 s 12 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter:
(a) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements which rely upon direct sunlight as an energy
source, including but not limited to any substance or device which
collects sunlight for use in:
(i) The heating or cooling of a structure or building;
(ii) The heating or pumping of water;
(iii) Industrial, commercial, or agricultural processes; or
(iv) The generation of electricity.
A solar energy system may be used for purposes in addition to the
collection of solar energy. These uses include, but are not limited
to, serving as a structural member or part of a roof of a building or
structure and serving as a window or wall; and
(b) "Solar easement" means a right, expressed as an easement,
restriction, covenant, or condition contained in any deed, contract, or
other written instrument executed by or on behalf of any landowner for
the purpose of assuring adequate access to direct sunlight for solar
energy systems. Solar easements for solar energy systems erected and
operating on or after January 1, 2009, are implied and need not be
written instruments.
(2) Except as provided otherwise in this chapter, a solar easement
is an interest in real property, and shall be created in writing and
shall be subject to the same conveyancing and instrument recording
requirements as other easements. Solar easements for solar energy
systems erected and operating on or after January 1, 2009, are implied
and are not subject to conveyance and instrument recording requirements
applying to other easements.
(3) A solar easement shall be appurtenant and run with the land or
lands benefited and burdened, unless otherwise provided in the
easement.
(4) Any instrument creating a solar easement shall include but not
be limited to:
(a) A description of the real property subject to the solar
easement and a description of the real property benefiting from the
solar easement; and
(b) A description of the extent of the solar easement which is
sufficiently certain to allow the owner of the real property subject to
the easement to ascertain the extent of the easement. Such description
may be made by describing the vertical and horizontal angles, expressed
in degrees, at which the solar easement extends over the real property
subject to the easement and the points from which those angles are to
be measured, or the height over the property above which the solar
easement extends, or a prohibited shadow pattern, or any other
reasonably certain description.
(5) Any instrument creating a solar easement may include:
(a) The terms or conditions or both under which the solar easement
is granted or will be terminated; and
(b) Any provisions for compensation to the owner of property
benefiting from the solar easement in the event of interference with
the enjoyment of the solar easement, or compensation to the owner of
the property subject to the solar easement for maintaining the solar
easement.

Sec. 3 RCW 64.04.160 and 1979 ex.s. c 170 s 14 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in this chapter, a solar easement
created under this chapter may only be created by written agreement.
((Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to create or authorize the
creation of an implied easement or a prescriptive easement.))
(2) Solar easements for solar energy systems erected and operating
on or after January 1, 2009, are implied and need not be written
instruments.

Sec. 4 RCW 64.04.170 and 1979 ex.s. c 170 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) In any action for interference with a solar easement, if the
instrument creating the easement does not specify any appropriate and
applicable remedies, the court may choose one or more remedies
including but not limited to the following:
(((1))) (a) Actual damages as measured by increased charges for
supplemental energy, the capital cost of the solar energy system,
and/or the cost of additional equipment necessary to supply sufficient
energy:
(((a))) (i) From the time the interference began until the actual
or expected cessation of the interference; or
(((b))) (ii) If the interference is not expected to cease, in a
lump sum which represents the present value of the damages from the
time the interference began until the normally expected end of the
useful life of the equipment which was interfered with;
(((2))) (b) Reasonable and necessary attorney's fees as fixed by
the court; and
(((3))) (c) An injunction against the interference.
(2)(a) An action for interference with an implied solar easement
for a solar energy system erected and operating on or after January 1,
2009, may be commenced only if the owner of the property upon which the
solar energy system is located has documented the existence and
operation of the system through a recorded instrument filed with the
appropriate county auditor or recording officer.
(b) If the action is for interference with an implied solar
easement, the court may grant the interferee up to one hundred eighty
days to remedy the interference.

--- END ---