BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.240 and 1998 c 190 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of dogs if the person:
(a) Negligently fails to prevent a dog under the person's control
from pursuing or injuring deer, elk, or an animal classified as
endangered under this title;
(b) Uses the dog to hunt deer or elk; ((or))
(c) During the closed season for a species of game animal or game
bird, negligently fails to prevent the dog from pursuing such animal or
destroying the nest of a game bird; or
(d) Commands or directs the dog in his or her control to injure or
kill a canine for exhibition or entertainment.
(2) Unlawful use of dogs is a misdemeanor. A dog that is the basis
for a violation of this section may be declared a public nuisance.
(3) For the purpose of this section, "canine" means the members of
the taxonomical family Canidae that are coyotes, foxes, and wolves.

--- END ---