BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.45.010 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the benefits of higher education should
be more widely available to the citizens of the state of Washington.
The legislature also finds that a citizen's place of residence can
restrict that citizen's access to educational opportunity at the upper
division and graduate level.
Because most of the state-supported baccalaureate universities are
located in areas removed from major metropolitan areas, the legislature
finds that many of the state's citizens, especially those citizens
residing in the central Puget Sound area, the Snohomish, Island, and
Skagit county region, the Tri-Cities, Spokane, Vancouver, and Yakima,
have insufficient and inequitable access to upper-division
baccalaureate and graduate education.
This lack of sufficient educational opportunities in urban areas
makes it difficult or impossible for place-bound individuals, who are
unable to relocate, to complete a baccalaureate or graduate degree. It
also exacerbates the difficulty financially needy students have in
attending school, since many of those students need to work, and work
is not always readily available in some communities where the
baccalaureate institutions of higher education are located.
The lack of sufficient educational opportunities in metropolitan
areas also affects the economy of the underserved communities.
Businesses benefit from access to the research and teaching
capabilities of institutions of higher education. The absence of these
institutions from some of the state's major urban centers prevents
beneficial interaction between businesses in these communities and the
state's universities.
The Washington state master plan for higher education, adopted by
the higher education coordinating board, recognizes the need to expand
upper-division and graduate educational opportunities in the state's
large urban centers. The board has also attempted to provide a means
for helping to meet future educational demand through a system of
branch campuses in the state's major urban areas.
The legislature endorses the assignment of responsibility to serve
these urban centers that the board has made to various institutions of
higher education. The legislature also endorses the creation of branch
campuses for the University of Washington and Washington State
University.
The legislature recognizes that, among their other
responsibilities, the state's comprehensive community colleges share
with the four-year universities and colleges the responsibility of
providing the first two years of a baccalaureate education. It is the
intent of the legislature that the four-year institutions and the
community colleges work as cooperative partners to ensure the
successful and efficient operation of the state's system of higher
education. The legislature further intends that the four-year
institutions work cooperatively with the community colleges to ensure
that branch campuses are operated as models of a two plus two
educational system.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.45.012 and 2004 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In 1989, the legislature created five branch campuses to be
operated by the state's two public research universities. Located in
growing urban areas, the branch campuses were charged with two
missions:
(a) Increasing access to higher education by focusing on upper
division and graduate programs, targeting placebound students, and
operating as models of a two plus two educational system in cooperation
with the community colleges; and
(b) Promoting regional economic development by responding to demand
for degrees from local businesses and supporting regional economies
through research activities.
(2) Fifteen years later, the legislature finds that branch campuses
are responding to their original mission:
(a) Branch campuses accounted for half of statewide upper division
and graduate public enrollment growth since 1990;
(b) Branch campuses have grown steadily and enroll increasing
numbers of transfer students each year;
(c) Branch campuses enroll proportionately more older and part-time
students than their main campuses and attract increasing proportions of
students from nearby counties;
(d) Although the extent of their impact has not been measured,
branch campuses positively affect local economies and offer degree
programs that roughly correspond with regional occupational
projections; and
(e) The capital investments made by the state to support branch
campuses represent a significant benefit to regional economic
development.
(3) However, the legislature also finds the policy landscape in
higher education has changed since the original creation of the branch
campuses. Demand for access to baccalaureate and graduate education is
increasing rapidly. Economic development efforts increasingly
recognize the importance of focusing on local and regional economic
clusters and improving collaboration among communities, businesses, and
colleges and universities. Each branch campus has evolved into a
unique institution, and it is appropriate to assess the nature of this
evolution to ensure the role and mission of each campus is aligned with
the state's higher education goals and the needs of the region where
the campus is located.
(4) Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to recognize the
unique nature of Washington's higher education branch campuses,
reaffirm the role and mission of each, and set the course for their
continued future development.
(5) It is the further intent of the legislature that the campuses
be identified by the following names: University of Washington
Bothell, University of Washington Tacoma, University of Washington
North Sound, Washington State University Tri-Cities, and Washington
State University Vancouver.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.45.020 and 2005 c 258 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The University of Washington is responsible for ensuring the
expansion of baccalaureate and graduate educational programs in the
((central)) Puget Sound area under rules or guidelines adopted by the
higher education coordinating board and in accordance with
proportionality agreements emphasizing access for transfer students
developed with the state board for community and technical colleges.
The University of Washington shall meet that responsibility through the
operation of at least ((two)) three branch campuses. One branch campus
shall be located in the Tacoma area. Another branch campus shall be
collocated with Cascadia Community College in the Bothell-Woodinville
area. A third branch campus, the University of Washington North Sound,
shall be located in Everett.
(2) At the University of Washington Tacoma, a top priority is
expansion of upper division capacity for transfer students and graduate
capacity and programs. Beginning in the fall of 2006, the campus may
offer lower division courses linked to specific majors in fields not
addressed at local community colleges. The campus shall admit lower
division students through coadmission or coenrollment agreements with
a community college, or through direct transfer for students who have
accumulated approximately one year of transferable college credits. In
addition to offering lower division courses linked to specific majors
as addressed above, the campus may also directly admit freshmen and
sophomores gradually and deliberately in accordance with the campus
plan submitted to the higher education coordinating board in 2004.
(3) At the University of Washington Bothell, a top priority is
expansion of upper division capacity for transfer students and graduate
capacity and programs. The campus shall also seek additional
opportunities to collaborate with and maximize its ((collocation
[colocation])) colocation with Cascadia Community College. Beginning
in the fall of 2006, the campus may offer lower division courses linked
to specific majors in fields not addressed at local community colleges.
The campus may admit lower division students through coadmission or
coenrollment agreements with a community college, or through direct
transfer for students who have accumulated approximately one year of
transferable college credits. In addition to offering lower division
courses linked to specific majors as addressed above, the campus may
also directly admit freshmen and sophomores gradually and deliberately
in accordance with the campus plan submitted to the higher education
coordinating board in 2004.
(4) At the University of Washington North Sound, a top priority is
expansion of upper division capacity for transfer students and graduate
capacity and programs in high demand programs with a particular focus
on science, technology, and engineering. The campus may offer lower
division courses linked to specific majors in fields not addressed at
local community colleges. In addition to offering lower division
courses linked to specific majors as provided in this subsection, the
campus may also directly admit freshmen and sophomores gradually and
deliberately in accordance with the campus plan to be submitted to the
higher education coordinating board. The campus shall admit students
through coadmission or coenrollment agreements with a community college
emphasizing access for transfer students codeveloped by the University
of Washington and the state board for community and technical colleges.

--- END ---