BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that our primary care
system is severely faltering and the number of people choosing primary
care as a profession is decreasing dramatically. Primary care
providers include family medicine and general internal medicine
physicians, pediatricians, naturopathic physicians, advanced registered
nurse practitioners, and physician assistants. A strong primary care
system has been shown to improve health outcomes and quality and to
reduce overall health system costs. To improve the health and
well-being of the people in the state of Washington; enhance the
recruitment, retention, performance, and satisfaction of primary
providers; and control costs, our statewide system of primary care
providers needs to be rapidly expanded, improved, and supported, in
line with current research and professional innovations.
The legislature further finds that a medical home can best deliver
the patient-centered approach that can manage chronic diseases, address
acute illnesses, and provide effective prevention. A medical home is
a place where health care is accessible and compassionate. It is built
on evidence-based strategies with a team approach. Each patient
receives medically necessary acute, chronic, prevention, and wellness
services, as well as other medically appropriate dental and behavioral
services, and community support services, all which are tailored to the
individual needs of the patient. Development and maintenance of
medical homes require changes in the reimbursement of primary care
providers in medical home practices. There is a critical need to
identify reimbursement strategies to appropriately finance this model
of delivering medical care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Within funds appropriated for this
purpose, and with the goal of catalyzing and providing financial
incentives for the rapid expansion of primary care practices that use
the medical home model, the department of health shall offer primary
care practices an opportunity to participate in a medical home
collaborative program, as authorized under RCW 43.70.533. Qualifying
primary care practices must be willing and able to adopt and maintain
medical home models, as defined by the department of social and health
services in its November 2007 report to the legislature concerning
implementation of chapter 5, Laws of 2007.
(2) The collaborative program shall be structured to promote
adoption of medical homes in a variety of primary care practice
settings throughout the state and consider different populations,
geographic locations, including at least one location that would agree
to operate extended hours, which could include nights or weekends, and
other factors to allow a broad application of medical home adoption,
including rural communities and areas that are medically underserved.
The collaborative program shall assist primary care practices to
implement the medical home requirements and provide the full complement
of primary care services as established by the medical home definition
in this section. Key goals of the collaborative program are to:
(a) Develop common and minimal core components to promote a
reasonable level of consistency among medical homes in the state;
(b) Allow for standard measurement of outcomes; and
(c) Promote adoption, and use of the latest techniques in effective
and cost-efficient patient-centered integrated health care.
Medical home collaborative participants must agree to provide data
on patients' experience with the program and health outcome measures.
The department of health shall consult with the Puget Sound health
alliance and other interested organizations when selecting specific
measures to be used by primary care providers participating in the
medical home collaborative.
(3) The medical home collaborative shall be coordinated with the
Washington health information collaborative, the health information
infrastructure advisory board, and other efforts directed by RCW
41.05.035. If the health care authority makes grants to primary care
practices for implementation of health information technology during
state fiscal year 2009, it shall make an effort to make these grants to
primary care providers participating in the medical home collaborative.
(4) The department of health shall issue an annual report to the
health care committees of the legislature on the progress and outcome
of the medical home collaborative. The reports shall include:
(a) Effectiveness of the collaborative in promoting medical homes
and associated health information technology, including an assessment
of the rate at which the medical home model is being adopted throughout
the state;
(b) Identification of best practices; an assessment of how the
collaborative participants have affected health outcomes, quality of
care, utilization of services, cost-efficiencies, and patient
satisfaction;
(c) An assessment of how the pilots improve primary care provider
satisfaction and retention; and
(d) Any additional legislative action that would promote further
medical home adoption in primary care settings.
The first annual report shall be submitted to the legislature by
January 1, 2009, with the final report due to the legislature by
December 31, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 As part of the five-year plan to change
reimbursement required under section 1, chapter 259, Laws of 2007, the
health care authority and department of social and health services must
expand their assessment on changing reimbursement for primary care to
support adoption of medical homes to include medicare, other federal
and state payors, and third-party payors, including health carriers
under Title 48 RCW and other self-funded payors. The health care
authority shall also collaborate with the Puget Sound health alliance,
if that organization pursues a project on medical home reimbursement.
The goal of the collaboration is to identify appropriate medical home
reimbursement strategies and provider performance measurements for all
payors, and to garner support among payors to adopt payment strategies
that support medical home adoption and use. The health care authority
and the department of social and health services shall report their
findings to the health care committees of the legislature by January 1,
2009, with a recommended timeline for adoption of payment and provider
performance strategies and recommended legislative changes should
legislative action be necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The governor is strongly encouraged to
submit a proposal to academy health and the commonwealth fund to
participate in the 2008 state quality improvement institute sponsored
by those organizations. The state's proposal should be directed toward
implementation of patient-centered medical homes among primary care
providers practicing in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires December 31, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---