BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of general administration, in consultation with
a representative of the emergency management division of the military
department and at least two vendors of emergency preparedness kits from
the private sector, shall establish purchasing and procurement policies
and safety standards that establish a preference for emergency
preparedness kits that are purchased or acquired by a state or local
agency.
At a minimum, the procurement policies and safety standards shall
include the following:
(a) How expiration dates shall be displayed on each kit
representing the shelf life of each kit and the contents therein;
(b) How each emergency preparedness kit, pouch, or container
containing the basic essentials are in compliance with the federal
environmental protection agency standards;
(c) How each emergency preparedness kit purchased or procured meets
or exceeds any federal regulations or procurement standards governing
emergency preparedness kits purchased on the federal level;
(d) What state agency shall have oversight responsibility for
selecting the vendor or vendors from whom any state or local agency may
purchase or acquire emergency preparedness kits and ensuring that such
kits meet the safety standards established in (a) through (c) of this
subsection.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "emergency preparedness kit"
means a supply of basic essentials for one person that includes, but is
not limited to, water, food, a first-aid kit, and special items for
infants and elder care.
(3) The department of general administration shall submit a report
to the legislature by December 1, 2008, on: (a) The emergency
preparedness kit safety standards established in subsection (1) of this
section; and (b) what state agencies currently purchase or acquire
emergency preparedness kits for public distribution.

--- END ---