BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.34.020 and 2006 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a
physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in
child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical
Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board
eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.
(2) "Children's mental health specialist" means:
(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one
hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized
training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of
children; and
(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year
of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the
supervision of a children's mental health specialist.
(3) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court
commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in
need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor
is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.
(4) "Designated mental health professional" means a mental health
professional designated by one or more counties to perform the
functions of a designated mental health professional described in this
chapter.
(5) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(6) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private
facility or unit that is certified by the department to provide
emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health
evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate
and separately-operated portion of a state hospital may be designated
as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which
is part of or operated by the department or federal agency does not
require certification. No correctional institution or facility,
juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and
treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.
(7) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of
services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or
combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors
under this chapter.
(8) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a
mental disorder, is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from
a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or
safety, or manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning
evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional
control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is
essential for his or her health or safety.
(9) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental
health care, including medication and medication supervision, provided
within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, or residential
treatment facility certified by the department as an evaluation and
treatment facility for minors.
(10) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting"
means outpatient treatment provided to a minor who is not residing in
a facility providing inpatient treatment as defined in this chapter.
(11) "Likelihood of serious harm" means either: (a) A substantial
risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon his or
her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide
or inflict physical harm on oneself; (b) a substantial risk that
physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as
evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places
another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm;
or (c) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an
individual upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which
has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others.
(12) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested
service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct,
cure, or alleviate a mental disorder; or (b) prevent the worsening of
mental conditions that endanger life or cause suffering and pain, or
result in illness or infirmity or threaten to cause or aggravate a
handicap, or cause physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no
adequate less restrictive alternative available.
(13) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional
impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's
cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug
abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or mental
retardation alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental
disorder" within the meaning of this section.
(14) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other
mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary under this chapter.
(15) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.
(16) "Outpatient treatment" means ((any of the nonresidential
services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed
services providers as identified by RCW 71.24.025)) mental health
services provided in a nonresidential setting that include, but are not
limited to, assessment, diagnosis, psychiatric treatment, medication,
medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy, and assuring
transfer of relevant patient information between service providers.
(17) "Parent" means:
(a) A biological or adoptive parent who has legal custody of the
child, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint
custody agreement; or
(b) A person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or
custodian of the child.
(18) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means
a physician or other mental health professional empowered by an
evaluation and treatment facility with authority to make admission and
discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.
(19) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has a
bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university, and who has
had, in addition, at least two years' experience in the direct
treatment of mentally ill or emotionally disturbed persons, such
experience gained under the supervision of a mental health
professional. "Psychiatric nurse" shall also mean any other registered
nurse who has three years of such experience.
(20) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician
in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a
program approved by the American Medical Association or the American
Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in
psychiatry.
(21) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under
chapter 18.83 RCW.
(22) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or
estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the
minor.
(23) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or
secretary's designee.
(24) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the
minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility offering inpatient
treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time.
With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means
the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the
provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.34.530 and 2006 c 93 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any minor thirteen years or older may request and receive
outpatient treatment without the consent of the minor's parent.
Parental authorization, or authorization from a person who may consent
on behalf of the minor pursuant to RCW 7.70.065, is required for
outpatient treatment of a minor under the age of thirteen.
(2)(a) The parent or legal guardian of a minor may consent to
voluntary outpatient treatment on behalf of the minor on the
recommendation of a psychiatrist, psychologist, or other licensed
mental health professional, as defined in RCW 71.34.020, who has
significant experience in the treatment of children with mental
disorders and has examined the minor. The minor's consent is not
necessary.
(b) At the beginning of outpatient treatment under (a) of this
subsection, the treatment provider or the treatment provider's designee
shall provide the minor with an explanation of the nature of the mental
health treatment in which the minor may be involved together with a
statement of the minor's rights, including the right to object to
treatment by filing a petition with the superior court of the county in
which the treatment provider is located.
(c) Within twenty-four hours of initiating outpatient treatment of
the minor under (a) of this subsection, the treatment provider or the
treatment provider's designee shall notify the superior court of the
county in which the treatment provider's office is located that
treatment has been initiated under this section. The county superior
court shall provide the treatment provider or his or her designee with
the name and telephone number of an attorney who is employed by or
under contract with the county to represent individuals subject to
involuntary commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW. The treatment provider
or his or her designee shall immediately contact that attorney on
behalf of the minor. Within three business days of being contacted by
the treatment provider or his or her designee, the attorney must meet
with the minor to determine whether he or she wants to exercise his or
her right to object to the outpatient treatment. If the minor wants to
object to the treatment, the attorney must file a petition challenging
the treatment with the superior court within two business days of the
meeting. The superior court shall waive any filing fee associated with
a petition filed under this subsection.
(d) Prior to initiating outpatient treatment of a minor under this
subsection (2), a psychiatrist or psychologist with significant
experience in the treatment of minors with mental disorders must
conduct a complete assessment of the minor and the minor's family,
which shall become a part of the minor's treatment record and be made
available to the court if the minor petitions for withdrawal or
modification of treatment under (e) of this subsection. The assessment
shall include an assessment of whether the minor has a mental disorder
for which outpatient treatment is a medical necessity, the relationship
between the minor and his or her parents, and any other factors
relevant to the ability to meet the minor's need for treatment.
(e) Upon receipt of a petition filed under (c) of this subsection,
the court shall schedule a hearing to be held within seventy-two hours
following the filing of the petition, unless continued upon the request
of the attorney for the minor. The hearing shall be conducted by a
judicial officer who shall determine whether or not the outpatient
mental health treatment is a medical necessity. For outpatient
treatment to continue against the minor's wishes, the court must find
all of the following by a preponderance of the evidence:
(i) That the minor has a diagnosed mental disorder or is in need of
an evaluation to determine whether the minor has a mental disorder;
(ii) That it is a medical necessity that the minor receive
outpatient mental health treatment; and
(iii) That the disorder can be adequately treated by the proposed
treatment provider.
(f) A minor ordered to undergo treatment due to a determination
under (e) of this subsection shall receive outpatient treatment at the
treatment setting designated by the court for a period of up to three
months. The minor shall be discharged from treatment whenever the
minor's treatment provider determines that the minor no longer is in
need of outpatient treatment, consent to treatment has been revoked
under subsection (4)(a) of this section, or at the end of the time
period of the order, whichever occurs first. If the minor's treatment
provider determines continued outpatient treatment will be necessary at
the end of the time period of the order and the minor does not consent
to continued outpatient treatment prior to the end of the time period
of the order, the court shall conduct a review hearing in accordance
with this subsection to determine whether to:
(i) Release the minor; or
(ii) Make a subsequent order for outpatient mental health treatment
for a period not to exceed three months subject to discharge of the
minor whenever the minor's treatment provider determines that the minor
no longer is in need of treatment, or if consent has been revoked under
subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(g) The total period of outpatient treatment ordered under this
section may not exceed six months from the date outpatient treatment
was initiated.
(h) A person who has legal custody or court-ordered residential
time with a minor may object to the consent for outpatient treatment of
the minor given by a parent who does not have legal custody by filing
a petition with the court. However, a parent may not file a petition
objecting to the consent for outpatient treatment of the minor under
this section if the person consenting to the outpatient treatment has
been given sole authority to consent to all medical decisions for the
minor under a court order.
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed as restricting or
altering a minor's existing rights to consent to voluntary outpatient
mental health treatment on his or her own behalf at thirteen years of
age or older, or a parent's ability to consent to outpatient mental
health treatment on behalf of a minor who is younger than thirteen
years of age.
(3) A minor may not abrogate consent provided by a parent or legal
guardian on the minor's behalf, nor may a parent or legal guardian
abrogate consent given by the minor on his or her own behalf.
(4)(a) A parent or legal guardian who has provided consent to
outpatient treatment under subsection (2) of this section may revoke
that consent. The parental revocation shall be effective unless the
minor who is thirteen years of age or older has provided consent for
continued outpatient treatment.
(b) A minor who is thirteen years of age or older who has provided
consent to outpatient treatment may revoke that consent. The minor's
revocation shall be effective unless the parent or legal guardian to
the minor has provided for continued treatment under subsection (2) of
this section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "parent" does not include the
department or other supervision agency when a minor has been placed in
out-of-home care under chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.34.500 and 2006 c 93 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A minor thirteen years or older may admit himself or herself
to an evaluation and treatment facility for inpatient mental treatment,
without parental consent. The admission shall occur only if the
professional person in charge of the facility concurs with the need for
inpatient treatment. Parental authorization, or authorization from a
person who may consent on behalf of the minor pursuant to RCW 7.70.065,
is required for inpatient treatment of a minor under the age of
thirteen.
(((2))) (b) When, in the judgment of the professional person in
charge of an evaluation and treatment facility, there is reason to
believe that a minor is in need of inpatient treatment because of a
mental disorder, and the facility provides the type of evaluation and
treatment needed by the minor, and it is not feasible to treat the
minor in any less restrictive setting or the minor's home, the minor
may be admitted to an evaluation and treatment facility.
(((3))) (c) Written renewal of voluntary consent must be obtained
from the applicant no less than once every twelve months. The minor's
need for continued inpatient treatments shall be reviewed and
documented no less than every one hundred eighty days.
(2)(a) The parent or legal guardian of a minor who is thirteen
years of age or older may consent to voluntary inpatient treatment on
behalf of the minor on the recommendation of a psychiatrist,
psychologist, or other licensed mental health professional, as defined
in RCW 71.34.020, who has significant experience in the treatment of
children with mental disorders and has examined the minor. The minor's
consent is not necessary.
(b) At the time of admission under (a) of this subsection, the
professional person in charge of the facility or the professional
person's designee shall provide the minor with an explanation of the
nature of the mental health treatment in which the minor may be
involved together with a statement of the minor's rights, including the
right to object to treatment by filing a petition with the superior
court of the county in which the facility is located.
(c) Within twenty-four hours of admission of the minor under (a) of
this subsection, the professional person in charge of the facility or
the professional person's designee shall notify the superior court of
the county in which the facility is located that a youth has been
admitted for treatment under this section. The county superior court
shall provide the professional person or his or her designee with the
name and telephone number of an attorney who is employed by or under
contract with the county to represent individuals subject to
involuntary commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW. The professional
person or his or her designee shall immediately contact that attorney
on behalf of the minor. Within twenty-four hours of being contacted by
the professional person or his or her designee, the attorney must meet
with the minor to determine whether he or she wants to exercise his or
her right to object to the inpatient treatment. If the minor wants to
object to the treatment, the attorney must file a petition challenging
the treatment with the superior court within two business days of the
meeting. The superior court shall waive any filing fee associated with
a petition filed under this subsection.
(d) Within forty-eight hours of admission of a minor under this
subsection (2), a psychiatrist or psychologist with significant
experience in the treatment of minors with mental disorders must
conduct a complete assessment of the minor and the minor's family,
which shall become a part of the minor's treatment record and be made
available to the court if the minor petitions for withdrawal or
modification of treatment under (e) of this subsection. The assessment
shall include an assessment of whether the minor has a mental disorder
for which inpatient treatment is a medical necessity, whether treatment
can be appropriately provided in a less restrictive outpatient
environment, the relationship between the minor and his or her parents,
and any other factors relevant to the ability to meet the minor's need
for treatment.
(e) Upon receipt of a petition filed under (c) of this subsection,
the court shall schedule a hearing to be held within seventy-two hours
following the filing of the petition, unless continued upon the request
of the attorney for the minor. A request for a continuance by the
minor's attorney may not exceed an additional seventy-two hours. The
hearing shall be conducted by a judicial officer who shall determine
whether or not the inpatient mental health treatment is a medical
necessity. For inpatient treatment to continue against the minor's
wishes, the court must find all of the following by a preponderance of
the evidence:
(i) That the minor has a diagnosed mental disorder or is in need of
an evaluation to determine whether the minor has a mental disorder;
(ii) That it is a medical necessity that the minor receive
inpatient mental health treatment; and
(iii) That the disorder can be treated in the particular facility
where the treatment is taking place.
(f) A minor ordered to undergo treatment due to a determination
under (e) of this subsection shall remain and receive inpatient
treatment at the treatment setting designated by the court for a period
of up to thirty days. The minor shall be discharged whenever the
attending physician determines that the minor no longer is in need of
inpatient treatment, consent to treatment has been revoked under
subsection (4)(a) of this section, or at the end of the time period of
the order, whichever occurs first. If the attending physician
determines continued inpatient treatment will be necessary at the end
of the time period of the order and the minor does not consent to
continued inpatient treatment prior to the end of the time period of
the order, the court shall conduct a review hearing in accordance with
this subsection to determine whether to:
(i) Release the minor; or
(ii) Make a subsequent order for inpatient mental health treatment
for a period not to exceed sixty days subject to discharge of the minor
whenever the attending physician determines that the minor no longer is
in need of treatment, or if consent has been revoked under subsection
(4)(a) of this section.
(g) The total period of inpatient treatment ordered under this
section shall not exceed ninety days from the date of the minor's
admission to the facility. The professional person in charge or his or
her designee shall ensure that a discharge plan is provided for each
minor discharged from the facility. The discharge plan shall address
the minor's continued need for treatment, referrals to appropriate
services for the minor and his or her parents, and services needed to
facilitate the minor's successful transition back into school, family
life, and other activities.
(h) A person who has legal custody or court-ordered residential
time with a minor may object to the consent for inpatient treatment of
the minor given by a parent who does not have legal custody by filing
a petition with the court. However, a parent may not file a petition
objecting to the consent for inpatient treatment of the minor under
this section if the person consenting to the inpatient treatment has
been given sole authority to consent to all medical decisions for the
child under a court order.
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed as restricting or
altering a minor's existing rights to consent to voluntary inpatient
mental health treatment on his or her own behalf at thirteen years of
age or older, or a parent's ability to consent to inpatient mental
health treatment on behalf of a minor who is younger than thirteen
years of age.
(3) A minor may not abrogate consent provided by a parent or legal
guardian on the minor's behalf, nor may a parent or legal guardian
abrogate consent given by the minor on his or her own behalf.
(4)(a) A parent or legal guardian who has provided consent to
inpatient treatment under subsection (2) of this section may revoke
that consent. The parental revocation shall be effective unless the
minor who is thirteen years of age or older has provided consent for
continued inpatient treatment.
(b) A minor who is thirteen years of age or older who has provided
consent to inpatient treatment may revoke that consent. The minor's
revocation shall be effective unless the parent or legal guardian to
the minor has provided for continued treatment under subsection (2) of
this section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "parent" does not include the
department or other supervision agency when a minor has been placed in
out-of-home care under chapter 13.34 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 71.34 RCW
to read as follows:
Attorneys appointed for persons pursuant to this chapter shall be
compensated for their services as follows: (1) The person for whom an
attorney is appointed shall, if he or she is financially able pursuant
to standards as to financial capability and indigency set by the
superior court of the county in which the proceeding is held, bear the
costs of such legal services; (2) if such person is indigent pursuant
to such standards, the costs of such services shall be borne by the
county in which the proceeding is held.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The administrative office of the courts, in
consultation with the department of social and health services and
other interested organizations, shall develop standard forms for the
statement of the minor's rights and the petition to request withdrawal
from or modification of mental health treatment provided to minors
under RCW 71.34.530 and 71.34.500. The statement and forms shall be
designed to be readily understood and completed by a minor thirteen to
seventeen years of age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 71.34.600 (Parent may request determination whether minor
has mental disorder requiring inpatient treatment -- Minor consent not
required -- Duties and obligations of professional person and facility)
and 2007 c 375 s 11, 2005 c 371 s 4, & 1998 c 296 s 17;
(2) RCW 71.34.610 (Review of admission and inpatient treatment of
minors -- Determination of medical necessity -- Department review -- Minor
declines necessary treatment -- At-risk youth petition -- Costs -- Public
funds) and 1998 c 296 s 9 & 1995 c 312 s 56;
(3) RCW 71.34.620 (Minor may petition court for release from
facility) and 1998 c 296 s 19;
(4) RCW 71.34.630 (Minor not released by petition under RCW
71.34.620 -- Release within thirty days -- Professional may initiate
proceedings to stop release) and 1998 c 296 s 20;
(5) RCW 71.34.640 (Evaluation of treatment of minors) and 1996 c
133 s 36 & 1995 c 312 s 58;
(6) RCW 71.34.650 (Parent may request determination whether minor
has mental disorder requiring outpatient treatment -- Consent of minor
not required -- Discharge of minor) and 1998 c 296 s 18; and
(7) RCW 71.34.660 (Limitation on liability for admitting or
accepting minor child) and 2005 c 371 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The code reviser shall replace the
subheading of "Minor-Initiated Treatment" with "Voluntary Treatment" in
chapter 71.34 RCW and shall remove the subheading "Parent-Initiated
Treatment" in chapter 71.34 RCW.

--- END ---