BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of ecology shall, as part
of its participation in the previously scheduled annual review of the
dredged material management program, initiate a stakeholder discussion
to review and consider changes to the existing dredge management
program as it relates to polychlorinated biphenyls.
(2) The stakeholder discussion must include an initial review of
the existing sampling and management protocol for polychlorinated
biphenyls in dredge materials, including an examination of the current
chronic sublethal sediment bioassay and other protocols to determine
the chronic effects of contaminates on marine life, and develop a time
frame for updating the management protocol to reflect the most recent
advancements in technology and science.
(3) The department of ecology shall present a summary of the
discussion, the anticipated next steps forward, and the identified time
frame to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1,
2008.
(4) This section expires July 30, 2009.

--- END ---