BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature for
state agencies to develop a programmatic permit that expedites the
siting of wave and tidal power projects through a streamlining approach
to environmental permit decision making.
To optimize the development and siting process for wave and tidal
power systems and to provide environmental protection, state regulatory
and natural resource agencies, public and private sector interests,
tribes, local and regional governments, and applicable federal agencies
must work cooperatively to establish common goals, minimize project
siting delays, develop consistency in the application of environmental
standards, and eliminate duplicative processes through assigned
responsibilities of selected permit drafting and compliance activities
between state and federal agencies.
Therefore, the wave and tidal power permit streamlining work group
is created. The work group shall integrate current environmental
standards into a one-stop permitting process. The energy facility site
evaluation council shall convene and staff the work group, and manage
the processes of establishing a streamlined wave and tidal power
permitting program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) The wave and tidal power permit
streamlining work group created in section 1 of this act shall develop
unique one-stop permit processes for both wave power and tidal power
projects. The one-stop permit process must use interagency review of
wave and tidal power projects to streamline and expedite permit
decision making. The work group shall develop a process that allows
for concurrent public review, concurrent public hearings, and a unified
appeals process of various state regulatory requirements. The work
group shall collaborate with appropriate governmental agencies and
stakeholders to identify existing environmental standards, to assess
the application of those standards, and to develop an integrated
permitting process based upon environmental standards and best
management practices for wave and tidal power projects that may be
applied with certainty, consistency, and assurance of swift permit
action, while taking into account varying environmental conditions.
(b) By November 15, 2008, the work group shall develop a detailed
work plan of the process to develop the one-stop programmatic
permitting for wave and tidal projects for review by the legislature.
The work plan must be updated every six months and provided to the
legislature. If the work group determines that additional time is
required to develop the one-stop programmatic permitting process for
wave and tidal power projects, the work group shall report to the
legislature on the need for additional time and update the work plan
accordingly.
(c) In creating one-stop programmatic permitting processes for wave
and tidal power projects, the work group shall:
(i) Develop and prioritize a list of permit streamlining
opportunities, specifically identifying substantive and procedural
duplications and recommendations for resolving those duplications;
(ii) Evaluate flexible approaches that promote wave and tidal power
development and protect environmental interests;
(iii) Make recommendations regarding where those approaches should
be implemented;
(iv) Identify whether legislative measures are required to
implement the one-stop programmatic permitting process for wave and
tidal power projects; and
(v) Determine how to maximize possible use of programmatic
approaches to simplify issuance of federally required permits and
project approvals.
(d) By December 30, 2009, the work group shall provide a final
report to the legislature on the one-stop programmatic permitting
process proposed by the work group as required by this act.
(2)(a) The work group consists of, but is not limited to,
representatives from the following entities:
(i) The energy facility site evaluation council;
(ii) The department of natural resources;
(iii) The department of ecology;
(iv) The department of fish and wildlife;
(v) The utilities and transportation commission;
(vi) The department of community, trade, and economic development;
(vii) The office of regulatory assistance;
(viii) A wave power company or tidal power company, or both;
(ix) A wave power industry association or tidal power industry
association, or both;
(x) Either a state university researching wave power or a state
university researching tidal power, or both;
(xi) The Northwest Indian fisheries commission;
(xii) An electrical utility; and
(xiii) A local government.
(b) State agencies under (a) of this subsection that are members of
the energy facility site evaluation council under RCW 80.50.030 shall
provide their existing designee members to serve on the work group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires June 30, 2010.

--- END ---