BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that the revised
threshold adopted in 2005 for the department of ecology's construction
storm water general permit should not increase the scope of projects
subject to state environmental policy act review. The department of
ecology should pursue rule making to achieve the intent of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21C.0383 and 1996 c 322 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following waste discharge permit actions are not subject to the
requirements of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c):
(1) For existing discharges, the issuance, reissuance, or
modification of a waste discharge permit that contains conditions no
less stringent than federal effluent limitations and state rules ((is
not subject to the requirements of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c). This
exemption applies to existing discharges only and does not apply to new
source discharges));
(2) The issuance of a construction storm water general permit under
chapter 90.48 RCW for a proposal disturbing less than five acres. The
exemption in this subsection does not apply if, under rules adopted by
the department of ecology, the proposal would otherwise be subject to
the requirements of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).

--- END ---