BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the deployment
and adoption of telecommunications services and information technology
has resulted in enhanced economic development and public safety for the
state's communities, improved health care and educational
opportunities, and a better quality of life for the state's residents.
Further, continued progress in the deployment and adoption of high-speed internet and other advanced telecommunications services, both
land-based and wireless, is vital to ensuring Washington remains
competitive and continues to create business and job growth. The
legislature finds that the state must encourage and support strategic
partnerships of public, private, and nonprofit sectors in the continued
growth and development of telecommunications and information technology
for state residents and businesses, and do so through formalized and
structured arrangements like the highly successful K-20 network
established in chapter 43.105 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department, as the state agency responsible for
coordinating with the education sectors on the K-20 network, shall work
in a similar partnership with the department of community, trade, and
economic development and the state utilities and transportation
commission to lead a comprehensive, statewide high-speed internet
deployment and adoption initiative to:
(a) Ensure all residents and businesses of the state have access to
affordable and reliable high-speed internet services;
(b) Achieve improved technology literacy, increased computer
ownership, and increased high-speed internet use among state residents,
nonprofit organizations, and businesses;
(c) Establish and empower local technology planning teams and
partnerships to plan for improved technology use across multiple
community sectors; and
(d) Establish and sustain an environment ripe for
telecommunications and technology investment statewide, including
solicitation and receipt of grants, loans, and other financial
mechanisms.
(2) The partnership set forth in subsection (1) of this section
shall include input and cooperation among public, private, and
nonprofit agencies and organizations representing economic development,
local community development, technology planning, education, health
care, and other relevant entities. The partnership shall additionally
collaborate with telecommunications providers, technology companies,
telecommunications unions, community-based organizations, and relevant
private sector entities to achieve the purposes set forth in subsection
(1) of this section.
(3) The high-speed internet deployment and adoption initiative set
forth in subsection (1) of this section must include, but is not
limited to:
(a) Creating and regularly updating a geographic statewide
inventory of high-speed internet service and other relevant
telecommunications and information technology services. The inventory
must:
(i) Identify geographic gaps in high-speed internet service through
a method of GIS mapping of service availability and GIS analysis at the
census block level;
(ii) Provide a baseline assessment of statewide high-speed internet
deployment in terms of percentage of households and businesses with
high-speed internet availability;
(iii) Provide updates to these data every six months; and
(iv) Build upon the initial utilities and transportation
commission's broadband disparity study authorized by the legislature in
2007;
(b) Tracking statewide residential and business adoption of high-speed internet, computers, and related information technology,
identifying barriers to adoption, and measuring progress on these data
annually;
(c) Building and facilitating local technology planning teams and
partnerships with members representing cross-sections of the community,
including but not limited to representatives of business,
telecommunications unions, K-12 education, health care, libraries,
higher education, community-based organizations, local government,
tourism, parks and recreation, and agriculture. Local technology
planning teams shall benchmark technology use across relevant community
sectors, set goals for improving technology use within each sector, and
develop tactical business plans for achieving identified goals, with
specific recommendations for online application development and demand
creation;
(d) Working collaboratively with high-speed internet providers and
technology companies across the state to encourage deployment and use,
especially in underserved areas, through use of local demand
aggregation, mapping analysis, and creation of market intelligence to
improve the investment rationale and business case; and
(e) Establishing programs to improve computer ownership, technology
literacy, and internet access for unserved and underserved populations
across the state.
(4) The partnership set forth in subsection (1) of this section may
contract with other organizations to accomplish the objectives set
forth in this section. Such an organization must have an established
competency in working with public and private sectors to accomplish
wide-scale deployment and adoption of telecommunications and
information technology.
(5) The partnership set forth in subsection (1) of this section
shall provide a report on the partnership's activities to the fiscal
and telecommunications committees in the senate and house of
representatives, together with any recommendations for strengthening
the program. The report must be provided annually not later than
December 1st, beginning in 2009, and cover the preceding fiscal year.

--- END ---