BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.070 and 2005 c 418 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Applicants for a license, permit, tag, or stamp shall furnish
the information required by the director. However, the director may
not require the purchaser of a razor clam license under RCW 77.32.520
to provide any personal information except for proof of residency. The
commission may adopt rules requiring licensees or permittees to keep
records and make reports concerning the taking of or effort to harvest
fish, shellfish, and wildlife. The reporting requirement may be waived
where, for any reason, the department is not able to receive the
report. The department must provide reasonable options for a licensee
to submit information to a live operator prior to the reporting
deadline.
(2) The commission may, by rule, set an administrative penalty for
failure to comply with rules requiring the reporting of taking or
effort to harvest wildlife. The commission may also adopt rules
requiring hunters who have not reported for the previous license year
to complete a report and pay the assessed administrative penalty before
a new hunting license is issued.
(a) The total administrative penalty per hunter set by the
commission must not exceed ten dollars.
(b) By December 31st of each year, the department shall report the
rate of hunter compliance with the harvest reporting requirement, the
administrative penalty imposed for failing to report, and the amount of
administrative penalties collected during that year to the appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the senate and house of
representatives.
(3) The commission may, by rule, set an administrative penalty for
failure to comply with rules requiring the reporting of data from catch
record cards officially endorsed for Puget Sound Dungeness crab. The
commission may also adopt rules requiring fishers who possessed a catch
record card officially endorsed for Puget Sound Dungeness crab and who
have not reported for the previous license year to complete a report
and pay the assessed administrative penalty before a new catch record
card officially endorsed for Puget Sound Dungeness crab is issued.
(a) The total administrative penalty per fisher set by the
commission must not exceed twenty-five dollars.
(b) By December 31st of each year, the department shall report the
rate of fisher compliance with the Puget Sound Dungeness crab catch
record card reporting requirement, the administrative penalty imposed
for failing to report, and the amount of administrative penalties
collected during that year to the appropriate fiscal and policy
committees of the senate and house of representatives.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.280 and 2005 c 418 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of violating rules requiring reporting of
fish or wildlife harvest if the person:
(a) Fails to make a harvest log report of a commercial fish or
shellfish catch in violation of any rule of the commission or the
director;
(b) Fails to maintain a trapper's report or taxidermist ledger in
violation of any rule of the commission or the director;
(c) Fails to submit any portion of a big game animal for a required
inspection required by rule of the commission or the director; or
(d) Fails to return a catch record card to the department as
required by rule of the commission or director, except for catch record
cards officially endorsed for Puget Sound Dungeness crab.
(2) Violating rules requiring reporting of fish or wildlife harvest
is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---