BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who knowingly views over the internet any visual
depiction or copy thereof of a minor engaged in sexually explicit
conduct is guilty of a class C felony.
(2) In a prosecution under this section, the trier of fact shall
consider the title, text, and content of the visual depiction, as well
as the internet history, search terms, thumbnail images, downloading
activity, expert computer forensic testimony, the number of depictions
of minors engaged in sexually explicit conduct, the defendant's access
to and control over the electronic device and its contents upon which
the depictions were found, and any other relevant evidence, in
determining whether a person knowingly viewed the material.
(3) It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge under this
section that the defendant promptly and in good faith, and without
retaining or allowing any person, other than a law enforcement agency,
to access any visual depiction or copy thereof, reported the matter to
a law enforcement agency and afforded that agency access to each such
visual depiction.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.68A.110 and 2007 c 368 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.040, it is not a defense that
the defendant was involved in activities of law enforcement and
prosecution agencies in the investigation and prosecution of criminal
offenses. Law enforcement and prosecution agencies shall not employ
minors to aid in the investigation of a violation of RCW 9.68A.090 or
9.68A.100. This chapter does not apply to lawful conduct between
spouses.
(2) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, 9.68A.070,
((or)) 9.68A.080, or section 1 of this act, it is not a defense that
the defendant did not know the age of the child depicted in the visual
or printed matter: PROVIDED, That it is a defense, which the defendant
must prove by a preponderance of the evidence, that at the time of the
offense the defendant was not in possession of any facts on the basis
of which he or she should reasonably have known that the person
depicted was a minor.
(3) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.040, 9.68A.090, 9.68A.101, or
9.68A.102, it is not a defense that the defendant did not know the
alleged victim's age: PROVIDED, That it is a defense, which the
defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence, that at the
time of the offense, the defendant made a reasonable bona fide attempt
to ascertain the true age of the minor by requiring production of a
driver's license, marriage license, birth certificate, or other
governmental or educational identification card or paper and did not
rely solely on the oral allegations or apparent age of the minor.
(4) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, ((or))
9.68A.070, or section 1 of this act, it shall be an affirmative defense
that the defendant was a law enforcement officer in the process of
conducting an official investigation of a sex-related crime against a
minor, or that the defendant was providing individual case treatment as
a recognized medical facility or as a psychiatrist or psychologist
licensed under Title 18 RCW.
(5) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, ((or))
9.68A.070, or section 1 of this act, the state is not required to
establish the identity of the alleged victim.

--- END ---