BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.120 and 1985 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each member of the governing body who attends a meeting of such
governing body where action is taken in violation of any provision of
this chapter applicable to him or her, with knowledge of the fact that
the meeting is in violation thereof, shall be subject to personal
liability in the form of a civil penalty in ((the amount of one
hundred)) an amount ranging from two hundred fifty to one thousand
dollars. The civil penalty shall be assessed by a judge of the
superior court and an action to enforce this penalty may be brought by
any person. A violation of this chapter does not constitute a crime
and assessment of the civil penalty by a judge shall not give rise to
any disability or legal disadvantage based on conviction of a criminal
offense.
(2) Any person who prevails against a public agency in any action
in the courts for a violation of this chapter shall be awarded all
costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred in connection
with such legal action. Pursuant to RCW 4.84.185, any public agency
((who)) that prevails in any action in the courts for a violation of
this chapter may be awarded reasonable expenses and attorneys' fees
upon final judgment and written findings by the trial judge that the
action was frivolous and advanced without reasonable cause.

--- END ---