BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state sex and
kidnapping offender registration system is an indispensable tool for
increasing community safety. Local law enforcement agencies play a
particularly important role in this system because it is their
responsibility to verify the addresses and residency of registered sex
and kidnapping offenders and to provide notification to the community
of registered sex and kidnapping offenders within their jurisdictions.
The legislature recognizes that these duties have placed enormous
strain on the already limited resources of local governments throughout
the state. It is therefore the intent of the legislature, in the
interests of public safety, to provide a permanent state funding source
to help local law enforcement agencies verify the addresses and
residency of registered sex and kidnapping offenders and notify the
community of registered sex and kidnapping offenders within their
jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of five million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2009, from the public safety and education account to
the criminal justice training commission for the purposes of assisting
local law enforcement to verify the addresses and residency of
registered sex and kidnapping offenders and notify the community of
registered sex and kidnapping offenders within their jurisdiction.
(2) The funds appropriated in this section shall be distributed to
local law enforcement agencies by the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs.

--- END ---