BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.30920 and 2005 c 216 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that the armed forces license plate
collection has been reviewed and approved by the special license plate
review board.
(2) The department shall issue a special license plate collection,
approved by the special license plate review board and the legislature,
recognizing the contribution of veterans, active duty military
personnel, reservists, and members of the ((Washington)) national
guard. The collection includes six separate designs, each containing
a symbol representing a different branch of the armed forces to include
army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard, and ((Washington))
national guard.
(3) Armed forces special license plates may be used in lieu of
regular or personalized license plates for vehicles required to display
one and two vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles registered under
chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the
department.
(4) Upon request, the department must make available to the
purchaser, at no additional cost, a decal indicating the purchaser's
military status. The department must work with the department of
veterans affairs to establish a list of the decals to be made
available. The list of available decals must include, but is not
limited to, "veteran," "disabled veteran," "reservist," "retiree," or
"active duty." The department may specify where the decal may be
placed on the license plate. Decals are required to be made available
only for standard six-inch by twelve-inch license plates.
(5) Armed forces license plates and decals are available only to
veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.007, active duty military personnel,
reservists, members of the ((Washington)) national guard, and the
((spouses)) families of ((deceased)) veterans and service members.
Upon initial application, any purchaser requesting an armed forces
license plate and decal will be required to show proof of eligibility
by providing: A DD-214 or discharge papers if a veteran; a military
identification or retired military identification card; or a
declaration of fact attesting to the purchaser's eligibility as
required under this section. "Family" or "families" means an
individual's spouse, child, parent, sibling, aunt, uncle, or cousin.
A child includes stepchild, adopted child, foster child, grandchild,
and son or daughter-in-law. A parent includes stepparent, grandparent,
and in-laws. A sibling includes brother, half brother, stepbrother,
sister, half sister, stepsister, and brother or sister-in-law.
(6) The department of veterans affairs must enter into an agreement
with the department to reimburse the department for the costs
associated with providing military status decals described in
subsection (4) of this section.
(7) Armed forces license plates are not available free of charge to
disabled veterans, former prisoners of war, or spouses of deceased
former prisoners of war under the privileges defined in RCW 73.04.110
and 73.04.115.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.30921 and 2005 c 216 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) "Armed forces license plate collection" means the collection of
six separate license plate designs issued under RCW 46.16.30920. Each
license plate design displays a symbol representing one of the five
branches of the armed forces, and one representing the ((Washington))
national guard.
(2) Armed forces license plates are not available free of charge to
disabled veterans, former prisoners of war, or spouses of deceased
former prisoners of war under the privileges defined in RCW 73.04.110
and 73.04.115.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.60A.140 and 2005 c 216 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The veterans stewardship account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. Disbursements of funds must be on the
authorization of the director or the director's designee, and only for
the purposes stated in subsection (4) of this section. In order to
maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, funds are
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required to permit expenditure of the funds.
(2) The department may request and accept nondedicated
contributions, grants, or gifts in cash or otherwise, including funds
generated by the issuance of the armed forces license plate collection
under chapter 46.16 RCW.
(3) All receipts, except as provided in RCW 46.16.313(20) (a) and
(b), from the sale of armed forces license plates must be deposited
into the veterans stewardship account.
(4) All moneys deposited into the veterans stewardship account must
be used by the department for activities that benefit veterans or their
families, including but not limited to, providing programs and services
for homeless veterans; establishing memorials honoring veterans; and
maintaining a future state veterans' cemetery. Funds from the account
may not be used to supplant existing funds received by the department.

Sec. 4 RCW 73.04.110 and 2005 c 216 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who is a veteran as defined in RCW 41.04.007 who
submits to the department of licensing satisfactory proof of a service-
connected disability rating from the veterans administration or the
military service from which the veteran was discharged and:
(a) Has lost the use of both hands or one foot;
(b) Was captured and incarcerated ((for more than twenty-nine
days)) by an enemy of the United States during a period of war with the
United States and received a prisoner of war medal;
(c) Has become blind in both eyes as the result of military
service; or
(d) Is rated by the veterans administration or the military service
from which the veteran was discharged and is receiving service-connected compensation at the one hundred percent rate that is expected
to exist for more than one year;
is entitled to regular or special license plates issued by the
department of licensing. The special license plates shall bear
distinguishing marks, letters, or numerals indicating that the motor
vehicle is owned by a disabled veteran or former prisoner of war. This
license shall be issued annually for one personal use vehicle without
payment of any license fees or excise tax thereon. Whenever any person
who has been issued license plates under the provisions of this section
applies to the department for transfer of the plates to a subsequently
acquired motor vehicle, a transfer fee of ten dollars shall be charged
in addition to all other appropriate fees. The department may
periodically verify the one hundred percent rate as provided in
subsection (1)(d) of this section.
(2) Any person who has been issued free motor vehicle license
plates under this section prior to July 1, 1983, shall continue to be
eligible for the annual free license plates.
(3) For the purposes of this section: (a) "Blind" means the
definition of "blind" used by the state of Washington in determining
eligibility for financial assistance to the blind under Title 74 RCW;
and (b) "special license plates" does not include any plate from the
armed forces license plate collection established in RCW 46.16.30920.
Any unauthorized use of a special plate is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---