BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.255 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person or business that conducts business in this state
must use encryption to secure personal information if the person or
business is transmitting or storing personal information on a computer
server primarily accessed through either a direct connection to the
internet, or a computer network that is primarily accessed over the
internet.
(2) A person or business is in compliance with this section if the
person or business uses encryption practices that are generally
accepted by the industry.
(3) Any waiver of the provisions of this section is contrary to
public policy, and is void and unenforceable.
(4) This section does not apply to personal information transmitted
or stored on a closed network or a virtual private network.
(5) The department of information services shall adopt rules to
implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.255 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter
are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation
of this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or
commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.255 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Breach of the security of the system" means unauthorized
acquisition of computerized data that compromises the security,
confidentiality, or integrity of personal information maintained by the
person or business. Good faith acquisition of personal information by
an employee or agent of the person or business for the purposes of the
person or business is not a breach of the security of the system when
the personal information is not used or subject to further unauthorized
disclosure.
(2) "Encryption" means use of an algorithmic process to transform
data into a form in which the data is rendered unreadable or unusable
without use of a confidential process or key.
(3)(a) "Personal information" means an individual's first name or
first initial and last name in combination with any one or more of the
following data elements, when either the name or the data elements are
not encrypted:
(i) Social security number;
(ii) Driver's license number or Washington identification card
number; or
(iii) Account number or credit or debit card number, in combination
with any required security code, access code, or password that would
permit access to an individual's financial account.
(b) "Personal information" does not include publicly available
information that is lawfully made available to the general public from
federal, state, or local government records.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.255.010 and 2005 c 368 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person or business that conducts business in this state and
that owns or licenses computerized data that includes personal
information shall disclose any breach of the security of the system
following discovery or notification of the breach in the security of
the data to any resident of this state whose unencrypted personal
information was, or is reasonably believed to have been, acquired by an
unauthorized person. The disclosure shall be made in the most
expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay, consistent with
the legitimate needs of law enforcement, as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, or any measures necessary to determine the scope of
the breach and restore the reasonable integrity of the data system.
(2) Any person or business that maintains computerized data that
includes personal information that the person or business does not own
shall notify the owner or licensee of the information of any breach of
the security of the data immediately following discovery, if the
personal information was, or is reasonably believed to have been,
acquired by an unauthorized person.
(3) The notification required by this section may be delayed if a
law enforcement agency determines that the notification will impede a
criminal investigation. The notification required by this section
shall be made after the law enforcement agency determines that it will
not compromise the investigation.
(4) ((For purposes of this section, "breach of the security of the
system" means unauthorized acquisition of computerized data that
compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of personal
information maintained by the person or business. Good faith
acquisition of personal information by an employee or agent of the
person or business for the purposes of the person or business is not a
breach of the security of the system when the personal information is
not used or subject to further unauthorized disclosure.
(5) For purposes of this section, "personal information" means an
individual's first name or first initial and last name in combination
with any one or more of the following data elements, when either the
name or the data elements are not encrypted:
(a) Social security number;
(b) Driver's license number or Washington identification card
number; or
(c) Account number or credit or debit card number, in combination
with any required security code, access code, or password that would
permit access to an individual's financial account.
(6) For purposes of this section, "personal information" does not
include publicly available information that is lawfully made available
to the general public from federal, state, or local government records.
(7))) For purposes of this section and except under subsection
(((8))) (5) of this section, "notice" may be provided by one of the
following methods:
(a) Written notice;
(b) Electronic notice, if the notice provided is consistent with
the provisions regarding electronic records and signatures set forth in
15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001; or
(c) Substitute notice, if the person or business demonstrates that
the cost of providing notice would exceed two hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or that the affected class of subject persons to be notified
exceeds five hundred thousand, or the person or business does not have
sufficient contact information. Substitute notice shall consist of all
of the following:
(i) E-mail notice when the person or business has an e-mail address
for the subject persons;
(ii) Conspicuous posting of the notice on the web site page of the
person or business, if the person or business maintains one; and
(iii) Notification to major statewide media.
(((8))) (5) A person or business that maintains its own
notification procedures as part of an information security policy for
the treatment of personal information and is otherwise consistent with
the timing requirements of this section is in compliance with the
notification requirements of this section if the person or business
notifies subject persons in accordance with its policies in the event
of a breach of security of the system.
(((9))) (6) Any waiver of the provisions of this section is
contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.
(((10))) (7)(a) Any customer injured by a violation of this section
may institute a civil action to recover damages.
(b) Any business that violates, proposes to violate, or has
violated this section may be enjoined.
(c) The rights and remedies available under this section are
cumulative to each other and to any other rights and remedies available
under law.
(d) A person or business under this section shall not be required
to disclose a technical breach of the security system that does not
seem reasonably likely to subject customers to a risk of criminal
activity.

--- END ---