BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that fire
sprinkler systems in private residences can prevent catastrophic loses
of life and property, but that financial, technical, and other issues
often discourage property owners from installing these protective
systems.
In response to these recognized benefits and circumstances, the
legislature intends the state building code council to convene a
technical advisory group to examine issues, barriers, and incentives
pertaining to private residential fire sprinkler systems. The
legislature further intends the council to develop recommendations for
eradicating barriers that prevent the voluntary installation of
sprinkler systems in private residences and to report the findings of
the advisory group. The legislature expects the efforts of the council
and the advisory group to prove beneficial in developing new and
successful approaches to protecting the lives and property of
Washingtonians by promoting the installation of sprinkler systems in
private residences.
The legislature does not intend to establish an actual or implied
mandate for the installation of private residential fire sprinkler
systems, nor does the legislature intend to diminish or otherwise
affect the regulatory authority of local governments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The state building code council must
convene a technical advisory group on private residential fire
sprinkler systems. The advisory group must research and review
policies and procedures pertaining to private residential fire
sprinkler systems, including technical, statutory, and liability
issues, that promote or discourage the installation of sprinkler
systems in private residences.
(2)(a) The advisory group must consist of representatives from:
(i) A city association;
(ii) A county association;
(iii) A building officials association;
(iv) A special purpose water-sewer district association;
(v) A public utility district association;
(vi) A mutual water company;
(vii) The department of health;
(viii) The department of ecology; and
(ix) The insurance industry.
(b) The advisory group must also consist of:
(i) The state director of fire protection or his or her designee;
(ii) A local fire marshal;
(iii) A licensed residential sprinkler fitter;
(iv) A licensed residential fire sprinkler contractor;
(v) An architect;
(vi) A residential builder; and
(vii) Other representatives deemed necessary by the council to
fulfill the requirements of this section.
(3) The state building code council must: (a) Develop
recommendations for eradicating barriers that prevent the voluntary
installation of sprinkler systems in private residences.
Recommendations under this subsection (3) must consider the work of the
advisory group; and (b) report the findings of the advisory group to
the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the
senate by January 15, 2009.

--- END ---