BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.16.010 and 2004 c 56 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, all state officers and employees shall be paid for services
rendered from the first day of the month through the fifteenth day of
the month and for services rendered from the sixteenth day of the month
through the last calendar day of the month. Paydates for these two pay
periods shall be established by the director of financial management
through the administrative hearing process and the official paydates
shall be established six months prior to the beginning of each
subsequent calendar year. Under no circumstance shall the paydate be
established more than ten days after the pay period in which the wages
are earned except when the designated paydate falls on Sunday, in which
case the paydate shall not be later than the following Monday. Payment
shall be deemed to have been made by the established paydates if: (a)
The salary warrant is available at the geographic work location at
which the warrant is normally available to the employee; or (b) the
salary has been electronically transferred into the employee's account
at the employee's designated financial institution; or (c) the salary
warrants are mailed at least two days before the established paydate
for those employees engaged in work in remote or varying locations from
the geographic location at which the payroll is prepared, provided that
the employee has requested payment by mail.
The office of financial management shall develop the necessary
policies and operating procedures to assure that all remuneration for
services rendered including basic salary, shift differential, standby
pay, overtime, penalty pay, salary due based on contractual agreements,
and special pay provisions, as provided for by law, Washington
personnel resources board rules, agency policy or rule, or contract,
shall be available to the employee on the designated paydate.
Overtime, penalty pay, and special pay provisions may be paid by the
next following paydate if the postponement of payment is attributable
to: The employee's not making a timely or accurate report of the facts
which are the basis for the payment, or the employer's lack of
reasonable opportunity to verify the claim.
Compensable benefits payable because of separation from state
service shall be paid with the earnings for the final period worked
unless the employee separating has not provided the agency with the
proper notification of intent to terminate.
One-half of the employee's basic monthly salary shall be paid in
each pay period. Employees paid on an hourly basis or employees who
work less than a full pay period shall be paid for actual salary
earned.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply in instances
where it would conflict with contractual rights or, with the approval
of the office of financial management, to short-term, intermittent,
noncareer state employees, to student employees of institutions of
higher education, to national or state guard members participating in
state active duty, and to liquor control agency managers who are paid
a percentage of monthly liquor sales.
(3) When a national or state guard member is called to participate
in state active duty, the paydate shall be no more than seven days
following completion of duty or the end of the pay period, whichever is
first. When the seventh day falls on Sunday, the paydate shall not be
later than the following Monday. This subsection shall apply only to
the pay a national or state guard member receives from the military
department for state active duty.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a
bargained contract at an institution of higher education may include a
provision for paying part-time academic employees on a pay schedule
that coincides with all the paydays used for full-time academic
employees.

--- END ---