BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that under RCW
70.98.050, the department of health must develop a statewide
radiological baseline beginning with the establishment of a baseline
for the Hanford reservation.
(2) The legislature finds that establishing a statewide
radiological baseline is of great importance due to heightened concerns
of radiological terrorism. In particular, it is important to establish
radiological baselines for the more populated cities in Washington.
(3) The legislature further finds the department of health has
already begun development of a statewide radiological baseline but
requires funding to complete testing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of health shall continue
development of a statewide radiological baseline. At a minimum, the
department of health must establish radiological baselines for
Bellingham, Ellensburg, Olympia, Port Angeles, Seattle, Spokane,
Tacoma, Vancouver, Wenatchee, and Yakima. The baselines must include
taking at least thirty radiological measurements per city. The
department of health must prepare a report and place the report online
for public availability by January 1, 2009. The report must include an
analysis of the data obtained, a summary of the findings, and an
interpretation of the findings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---