BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.41 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter prohibits a pharmacy from providing a
person with a refill of a drug prior to any time restriction for the
prescription of that drug if:
(1) There are authorized refills remaining;
(2) The person seeking the refill resides in a county that:
(a) Is under a flood warning issued by the national weather
service;
(b) Is declared to be under a state of emergency as proclaimed by
the governor; or
(c) Has activated its emergency operations center and its emergency
management plan; and
(3) The refill is requested within thirty days after the
origination date of the conditions described in subsection (2) of this
section or until those conditions are terminated by the issuing
authority or no longer exist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every health carrier that provides prescription medication
coverage as part of a health plan shall waive time restrictions on
prescription medication refills to enable an enrollee to refill
prescriptions prior to the time restriction, if there are authorized
refills remaining, and shall authorize payments to pharmacies for at
least a thirty-day supply of any prescription medication, regardless of
the date that the prescription had most recently been refilled by a
pharmacy if the conditions in section 1 of this act have been met.
(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section excuses or exempts an
enrollee from compliance with all other terms of the health plan.

--- END ---