BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.214 and 1994 c 22 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Newspaper" means:
(a) A publication issued regularly at stated intervals at least
twice a month and printed on newsprint in tabloid or broadsheet format
folded loosely together without stapling, glue, or any other binding of
any kind, including any supplement of a printed newspaper; and
(b) An electronic version of a printed newspaper that:
(i) Shares content with the printed newspaper; and
(ii) Is prominently identified by the same name as the printed
newspaper or otherwise conspicuously indicates that it is a complement
to the printed newspaper.
(2) For purposes of this section, "supplement" means a printed
publication, including a magazine or advertising section, that is:
(a) Labeled and identified as part of the printed newspaper; and
(b) Circulated or distributed:
(i) As an insert or attachment to the printed newspaper; or
(ii) Separate and apart from the printed newspaper so long as the
distribution is within the general circulation area of the newspaper.

--- END ---