BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.12.121 and 1993 c 294 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department may at any time inquire into wages, hours,
and conditions of labor of minors employed in any trade, business, or
occupation in the state of Washington and may adopt special rules for
the protection of the safety, health, and welfare of minor employees.
However, the rules may not limit the hours per day or per week, or
other specified work period, that may be worked by minors who are
emancipated by court order.
(b) During the school year, minors sixteen and seventeen years old
may work a maximum of twenty-eight hours per week.
(2) The department shall issue work permits to employers for the
employment of minors, after being assured the proposed employment of a
minor meets the standards for the health, safety, and welfare of minors
as set forth in the rules adopted by the department. No minor person
shall be employed in any occupation, trade, or industry subject to
chapter 16, Laws of 1973 2nd ex. sess., unless a work permit has been
properly issued, with the consent of the parent, guardian, or other
person having legal custody of the minor and with the approval of the
school which such minor may then be attending. However, the consent of
a parent, guardian, or other person, or the approval of the school
which the minor may then be attending, is unnecessary if the minor is
emancipated by court order.
(3) The minimum wage for minors shall be as prescribed in RCW
49.46.020.

--- END ---