BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the office of
public defense:
(a) Operates in an efficient and economical manner, with adequate
cost controls in place;
(b) Meets established goals and targets; and
(c) Does not substantially duplicate services offered by other
agencies or the private sector.
(2) Termination of the office of public defense would have
substantial and wide-reaching ramifications on the court system in
Washington state. The right to counsel is a constitutional right, and
provision of counsel for indigent defendants is a government
responsibility.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.70.005 and 1996 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to implement the constitutional and statutory guarantees
of counsel and to ensure ((the)) effective and efficient delivery of
((the)) indigent ((appellate)) defense services funded by the state of
Washington, an office of public defense is established as an
independent agency of the judicial branch.

Sec. 3 RCW 2.70.010 and 1996 c 221 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The supreme court shall appoint the director of the office of
public defense from a list of three names submitted by the advisory
committee created under RCW 2.70.030. Qualifications shall include
admission to the practice of law in this state for at least five years,
experience in ((the representation of persons accused of a crime))
providing indigent defense services, and proven managerial or
supervisory experience. The director shall serve at the pleasure of
the supreme court and receive a salary to be fixed by the advisory
committee.

Sec. 4 RCW 2.70.020 and 1996 c 221 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director((, under the supervision and direction of the advisory
committee,)) shall:
(1) Administer all ((criminal appellate indigent defense)) state-funded services in the following program areas:
(a) Trial court criminal indigent defense, as provided in chapter
10.101 RCW;
(b) Appellate indigent defense, as provided in this chapter;
(c) Representation of indigent parents qualified for appointed
counsel in dependency and termination cases, as provided in RCW
13.34.090 and 13.34.092;
(d) Extraordinary criminal justice cost petitions, as provided in
RCW 43.330.190;
(e) Compilation of copies of DNA test requests by persons convicted
of felonies, as provided in RCW 10.73.170;
(2) Submit a biennial budget for all costs related to ((state
appellate indigent defense)) the office's program areas;
(3) Establish administrative procedures, standards, and guidelines
for the office's program areas, including ((a)) cost-efficient systems
that provide((s)) for authorized recovery of costs;
(4) Provide oversight and technical assistance to ensure the
effective and efficient delivery of services in the office's program
areas;
(5) Recommend criteria and standards for determining and verifying
indigency. In recommending criteria for determining indigency, the
director shall compile and review the indigency standards used by other
state agencies and shall periodically submit the compilation and report
to the legislature on the appropriateness and consistency of such
standards;
(((5))) (6) Collect information regarding ((indigency cases))
indigent defense services funded by the state and report annually to
the advisory committee, the legislature, and the supreme court;
(((6))) (7) Coordinate with the supreme court and the judges of
each division of the court of appeals to determine how appellate
attorney services should be provided.
The office of public defense shall not provide direct
representation of clients.

Sec. 5 RCW 2.70.030 and 2005 c 111 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created an advisory committee consisting of the
following members:
(a) Three persons appointed by the chief justice of the supreme
court, ((including the chair of the appellate indigent defense
commission identified in subsection (3) of this section)) who shall
also appoint the chair of the committee;
(b) Two nonattorneys appointed by the governor;
(c) Two senators, one from each of the two largest caucuses,
appointed by the president of the senate; and two members of the house
of representatives, one from each of the two largest caucuses,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(d) One person appointed by the court of appeals executive
committee;
(e) One person appointed by the Washington state bar association;
(f) One person appointed by the Washington state association of
counties;
(g) One person appointed by the association of Washington cities;
(h) One person appointed by the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys with significant prosecution experience,
including assigning criminal caseloads and supervising deputy
prosecuting attorneys; and
(i) One person appointed jointly by the Washington defender
association and the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers
with significant public defense experience.
(2) During the term of his or her appointment, no appointee may:
(a) Provide indigent defense services funded by a city, a county, or
the state, except on a pro bono basis; (b) serve as ((an appellate)) a
judge except on a pro tem basis or as ((an appellate)) a court
employee; or (c) serve as a prosecutor or prosecutor employee.
(3) ((The initial advisory committee shall be comprised of the
current members of the appellate indigent defense commission, as
established by Supreme Court Order No. 25700-B, dated March 9, 1995,
plus two additional legislator members appointed under subsection
(1)(c) of this section. Members shall serve until the termination of
their current terms, and may be reappointed. The two additional
legislator members, who are not on the appellate indigent defense
commission, shall each serve three-year terms.)) Members of the
advisory committee shall receive no compensation for their services as
members of the ((commission)) committee, but may be reimbursed for
travel and other expenses in accordance with ((rules adopted by the
office of financial management)) state law.
(4) The advisory committee shall:
(a) Meet at least quarterly;
(b) Review at least biennially the performance of the director, and
submit each review to the chief justice of the supreme court;
(c) Receive reports from the director;
(d) Make policy recommendations, as appropriate, to the legislature
and the supreme court;
(e) Approve the office's budget requests;
(f) Advise the director regarding administration and oversight of
the office's program areas; and
(g) Carry out other duties as authorized or required by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.131.389 (Office of public defense -- Termination) and 1998
c 108 s 2 & 1996 c 221 s 7;
(2) RCW 43.131.390 (Office of public defense -- Repeal) and 1998 c
108 s 3 & 1996 c 221 s 8; and
(3) RCW 2.70.050 (Transfer to office of appellate indigent defense
powers, duties, functions, information, property, appropriations,
employees, rules, and pending business -- Apportionment -- Effect on
collective bargaining) and 2005 c 282 s 12 & 1996 c 221 s 6.

--- END ---