BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 27.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state historical society shall establish a
competitive grant program and process to solicit proposals for a
maritime historic vessel restoration and preservation program for
funding from the maritime historic restoration and preservation account
established in RCW 88.02.053.
(2) The Washington state historical society shall adopt policies
governing project eligibility and evaluation criteria.
(3) Application for funding of specific projects may be made to the
Washington state historical society by local governments, public
development authorities, nonprofit corporations, tribal governments,
and other entities, as determined by the Washington state historical
society.
(4) The Washington state historical society must evaluate and rank
applications in consultation with a citizen advisory committee using
objective criteria, and shall establish and submit a prioritized list
of maritime historic vessel restoration and preservation projects to
the governor and the legislature in the society's biennial budget
request. The list must include a description of each project, the
amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate
funds to be used for the project.
(5) The Washington state historical society shall not sign
contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section
until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects. In
contracts for grants authorized under this section, the Washington
state historical society shall include provisions requiring that
capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of
time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used
for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be
out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall
repay to the maritime historic restoration and preservation account the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.
(6) The amount of state funding may not exceed fifty percent of the
total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total project
cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely
for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(7) The total amount of recommended state funding for projects on
a biennial project list may not exceed the biennial balance of the
maritime historic restoration and preservation account.

Sec. 2 RCW 88.02.050 and 2007 c 342 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for a vessel registration shall be made to the
department or its authorized agent in the manner and upon forms
prescribed by the department. The application shall state the name and
address of each owner of the vessel and such other information as may
be required by the department, shall be signed by at least one owner,
and shall be accompanied by a vessel registration fee of ten dollars
and fifty cents per year and the excise tax imposed under chapter 82.49
RCW. One dollar of this vessel registration fee must be deposited into
the maritime historic restoration and preservation account created in
RCW 88.02.053.
(2) Five additional dollars must be collected annually from every
vessel registration application. These moneys must be distributed in
the following manner:
(a) Two dollars must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal
account established in RCW 79.100.100. If the department of natural
resources indicates that the balance of the derelict vessel removal
account, not including any transfer or appropriation of funds into the
account or funds deposited into the account collected under RCW
88.02.270, reaches one million dollars as of March 1st of any year, the
collection of the two-dollar fee must be suspended for the following
fiscal year.
(b) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic
invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879.
(c) One dollar must be deposited into the freshwater aquatic algae
control account created in RCW 43.21A.667.
(d) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive species
enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400.
(3) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.01.140
shall be in addition to the ten dollar and fifty cent annual
registration fee and the five-dollar fee created in subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) Upon receipt of the application and the registration fee, the
department shall assign a registration number and issue a decal for
each vessel. The registration number and decal shall be issued and
affixed to the vessel in a manner prescribed by the department
consistent with the standard numbering system for vessels set forth in
volume 33, part 174, of the code of federal regulations. A valid decal
affixed as prescribed shall indicate compliance with the annual
registration requirements of this chapter.
(5) The vessel registrations and decals are valid for a period of
one year, except that the director of licensing may extend or diminish
vessel registration periods, and the decals therefor, for the purpose
of staggered renewal periods. For registration periods of more or less
than one year, the department may collect prorated annual registration
fees and excise taxes based upon the number of months in the
registration period. Vessel registrations are renewable every year in
a manner prescribed by the department upon payment of the vessel
registration fee, excise tax, and the derelict vessel fee. Upon
renewing a vessel registration, the department shall issue a new decal
to be affixed as prescribed by the department.
(6) When the department issues either a notice to renew a vessel
registration or a decal for a new or renewed vessel registration, it
shall also provide information on the location of marine oil recycling
tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations. This information will
be provided to the department by the state parks and recreation
commission in a form ready for distribution. The form will be
developed and prepared by the state parks and recreation commission
with the cooperation of the department of ecology. The department, the
state parks and recreation commission, and the department of ecology
shall enter into a memorandum of agreement to implement this process.
(7) A person acquiring a vessel from a dealer or a vessel already
validly registered under this chapter shall, within fifteen days of the
acquisition or purchase of the vessel, apply to the department or its
authorized agent for transfer of the vessel registration, and the
application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of one dollar.

Sec. 3 RCW 88.02.050 and 2007 c 342 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Application for a vessel registration shall be made to the
department or its authorized agent in the manner and upon forms
prescribed by the department. The application shall state the name and
address of each owner of the vessel and such other information as may
be required by the department, shall be signed by at least one owner,
and shall be accompanied by a vessel registration fee of ten dollars
and fifty cents per year and the excise tax imposed under chapter 82.49
RCW. One dollar of this vessel registration fee must be deposited into
the maritime historic restoration and preservation account created in
RCW 88.02.053. In addition, two additional dollars must be collected
annually from every vessel registration application. These moneys must
be deposited into the derelict vessel removal account established in
RCW 79.100.100. If the department of natural resources indicates that
the balance of the derelict vessel removal account, not including any
transfer or appropriation of funds into the account or funds deposited
into the account collected under RCW 88.02.270, reaches one million
dollars as of March 1st of any year, the collection of the two-dollar
fee must be suspended for the following fiscal year. Any fees required
for licensing agents under RCW 46.01.140 shall be in addition to the
ten dollar and fifty cent annual registration fee and the two-dollar
derelict vessel fee.
Upon receipt of the application and the registration fee, the
department shall assign a registration number and issue a decal for
each vessel. The registration number and decal shall be issued and
affixed to the vessel in a manner prescribed by the department
consistent with the standard numbering system for vessels set forth in
volume 33, part 174, of the code of federal regulations. A valid decal
affixed as prescribed shall indicate compliance with the annual
registration requirements of this chapter.
The vessel registrations and decals are valid for a period of one
year, except that the director of licensing may extend or diminish
vessel registration periods, and the decals therefor, for the purpose
of staggered renewal periods. For registration periods of more or less
than one year, the department may collect prorated annual registration
fees and excise taxes based upon the number of months in the
registration period. Vessel registrations are renewable every year in
a manner prescribed by the department upon payment of the vessel
registration fee, excise tax, and the derelict vessel fee. Upon
renewing a vessel registration, the department shall issue a new decal
to be affixed as prescribed by the department.
When the department issues either a notice to renew a vessel
registration or a decal for a new or renewed vessel registration, it
shall also provide information on the location of marine oil recycling
tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations. This information will
be provided to the department by the state parks and recreation
commission in a form ready for distribution. The form will be
developed and prepared by the state parks and recreation commission
with the cooperation of the department of ecology. The department, the
state parks and recreation commission, and the department of ecology
shall enter into a memorandum of agreement to implement this process.
A person acquiring a vessel from a dealer or a vessel already
validly registered under this chapter shall, within fifteen days of the
acquisition or purchase of the vessel, apply to the department or its
authorized agent for transfer of the vessel registration, and the
application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of one dollar.

Sec. 4 RCW 88.02.053 and 1996 c 3 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The maritime historic restoration and preservation account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. ((All receipts from the
voluntary donations made simultaneously with the registration of
vessels under chapter 88.02 RCW shall be deposited into this account.
These deposits are not public funds and are not subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.)) Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation and only for the purposes of the Grays
Harbor historical seaport or its corporate successor, the Steamer
Virginia V foundation or its corporate successor, or the maritime
historic vessel restoration and preservation program created in section
1 of this act.
(2) At the end of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall pay
from this account to the department of licensing an amount equal to the
reasonable administrative expenses of that agency for that fiscal year
for collecting the voluntary donations and transmitting them to the
state treasurer and shall pay to the state treasurer an amount equal to
the reasonable administrative expenses of that agency for that fiscal
year for maintaining the account and disbursing funds from the account.
(3) At the end of each fiscal year, the Washington state
((treasurer)) historical society shall pay one-half of the balance of
the funds in the account ((after payment of the administrative costs
provided in subsection (2) of this section,)) from donations made
pursuant to RCW 88.02.052 to the Grays Harbor historical seaport or its
corporate successor and the remainder of the funds in the account from
the donations made pursuant to RCW 88.02.050 to the Steamer Virginia V
foundation or its corporate successor. The funds transferred into the
account pursuant to RCW 88.02.050 shall be available to the Washington
state historical society for the purposes of section 1 of this act.
(4) If either the Grays Harbor historical seaport and its corporate
successors or the Steamer Virginia V foundation and its corporate
successors legally ceases to exist, the ((state treasurer shall, at the
end of each fiscal year, pay the balance of the funds in the account to
the remaining organization)) Washington state historical society shall
retain those funds that would have been transferred.
(5) If both the Grays Harbor historical seaport and its corporate
successors and the Steamer Virginia V foundation and its corporate
successors legally cease to exist, the ((department of licensing shall
discontinue the collection of the voluntary donations in conjunction
with the registration of vessels under RCW 88.02.052, and the balance
of the funds in the account escheat to the state. If funds in the
account escheat to the state, one-half of the fund balance shall be
provided to the office of archaeology and historic preservation and the
remainder shall be deposited into the parks renewal and stewardship
account.
(6) The secretary of state, the directors of the state historical
societies, the director of the office of archaeology and historic
preservation within the department of community, trade, and economic
development, and two members representing the recreational boating
community appointed by the secretary of state, shall review the success
of the voluntary donation program for maritime historic restoration and
preservation established under RCW 88.02.052 and report their findings
to the appropriate legislative committees by January 31, 1998. The
findings must include the progress of the program and the potential to
expand the voluntary funding to other historic vessels)) entire account
balance will be available for the maritime historic vessel preservation
and restoration program established in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 3 of this act takes effect June 30,
2012.

--- END ---