BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.76.290 and 1993 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall coordinate educational activities among all
segments of higher education taking into account the educational
programs, facilities, and other resources of both public and
independent two and four-year colleges and universities. The four-year
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall coordinate information and activities with the board. The board
shall have the following additional responsibilities:
(1) Promote interinstitutional cooperation;
(2) Establish minimum admission standards for four-year
institutions, including a requirement that coursework in American sign
language or an American Indian language shall satisfy any requirement
for instruction in a language other than English that the board or the
institutions may establish as a general undergraduate admissions
requirement;
(3) Establish transfer policies;
(4) Adopt rules implementing statutory residency requirements;
(5) Develop and administer reciprocity agreements with bordering
states and the province of British Columbia;
(6) Review and recommend compensation practices and levels for
administrative employees, exempt under chapter 28B.16 RCW, and faculty
using comparative data from peer institutions;
(7) Monitor higher education activities for compliance with all
relevant state policies for higher education;
(8) Arbitrate disputes between and among four-year institutions or
between and among four-year institutions and community colleges at the
request of one or more of the institutions involved, or at the request
of the governor, or from a resolution adopted by the legislature. The
decision of the board shall be binding on the participants in the
dispute;
(9) Establish and implement a state system for collecting,
analyzing, and distributing information;
(10) In partnership with the education data center and the state
board for community and technical colleges, by December 1, 2008,
display the following measures in the dashboard template format, as
developed in this section, on the education data center's web site. To
the extent possible, all measures in this subsection (10) shall be able
to be viewed by race and ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin,
and age:
(a) Student enrollment that may include measures such as state and
county of residence, student level, and full or part-time;
(b) Total degrees and certificates awarded;
(c) Financial aid awards for each institution that may include
measures such as funding source, for example, state or federal, and
program, such as opportunity grant, state need grant, or Pell grant;
(d) Remedial education courses attempted and completed;
(e) English as a second language (ESL) courses attempted and
completed; and
(f) High school dual credit programs;
(11) In partnership with the education data center, jointly convene
a work group that includes representatives from the public institutions
of higher education, the state board for community and technical
colleges, the workforce training education and coordinating board, the
council of presidents, the government management accountability and
performance program, the higher education policy committees of the
legislature, and the employment security department, to develop the
following:
(a) A uniform dashboard template, to be displayed on the web site
of the education data center, that organizes and presents data
including, but not limited to, measures identified in this subsection
(11) and subsection (10) of this section. The template may be tailored
in visual presentation to meet the needs of specific constituent
groups, for example students, researchers and analysts, or the general
public. The template must be completed, populated with data, and
displayed on the education data center's home page by December 1, 2008;
(b) By June 1, 2009, a common set of workforce measures;
(c) By June 1, 2009, a common set of data definitions shared among
institutions of higher education for the following measures:
(i) Transfer rate;
(ii) Admission rate that may include measures such as admission for
running start students and for transfer students;
(iii) Retention rate;
(iv) Measures of faculty engagement;
(v) Student survey data, that may include an inventory of the types
of surveys administered; and
(vi) Financial cost measures including cost of attendance and cost
of instruction; and
(d) By July 1, 2009, an updated dashboard template that includes
and is populated with the measures developed in this section;
(12) Annually report total enrollment numbers for all postsecondary
institutions, to the extent that the numbers are reported to the board
by the institutions;
(13) Recommend to the governor and the legislature ways to remove
any economic incentives to use off-campus program funds for on-campus
activities; and
(((11))) (14) Make recommendations to increase minority
participation, and monitor and report on the progress of minority
participation in higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Annually, on a schedule to be determined jointly by the board,
the state board for community and technical colleges, and the education
data center, each institution of higher education shall complete and
update the data displayed on the dashboard template developed under RCW
28B.76.290.
(2) Each institution of higher education, as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, shall prominently post on its home page a uniform, visible
link to the education data center's home page in order to facilitate
access to the dashboards of the other institutions of higher education.
(3) The board shall prominently post on its home page a uniform,
visible link to the education data center's home page to facilitate
access to the dashboards of all institutions of higher education.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.76.020 and 1985 c 370 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For the purposes of)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter((:)) unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board((; and)).
(2) "Dashboard" means a visual display of information consolidated
and arranged on a computer screen in an easy to read fashion so that
the information can be seen at a glance.
(3) "Four-year institutions" means the University of Washington,
Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern
Washington University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen
State College.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---