BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds compelling evidence
from research and from the efforts of innovative school districts in
Washington that when students enter the K-12 public schools ready to
learn, their progress and achievement is greatly enhanced. The
legislature further finds that the foundational skills for kindergarten
success can be assessed using a variety of assessment tools. Many
school districts are using a kindergarten entry assessment and are
working closely with early learning providers and parents in their
communities. However, because there is no common kindergarten entry
assessment, there is no statewide baseline for students' readiness to
learn. Such a baseline is critical for developing new early
interventions with struggling students and for measuring the impact of
such initiatives as full-day kindergarten. A common kindergarten entry
assessment could also serve as an accountability and quality measure
for early learning programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, jointly and in collaboration with thrive by five
Washington, shall study and make recommendations to the governor and
the legislature regarding implementation of a statewide kindergarten
entry assessment. The study and development of recommendations shall
include consultation with the following:
(a) The Washington early learning advisory council;
(b) The Washington association for the education of young children;
(c) The foundation for early learning;
(d) Washington Indian tribes including, but not limited to, the
confederated tribes of the Yakama nation and the Colville confederated
tribes;
(e) Early childhood educators;
(f) Kindergarten teachers; and
(g) Specialists in early childhood assessments.
(2) In conducting the study and developing the recommendations, the
department shall examine:
(a) Research on the critical knowledge and skills, including social
skills, for successful entry and progress in kindergarten; and
(b) Examples of assessments used by schools and early learning
providers in Washington state and in other states;
(3) The study and recommendations shall:
(a) Identify a preferred kindergarten entry assessment that
addresses the following knowledge and skills, at a minimum:
(i) Letter and sound recognition;
(ii) Numbers and number concepts; and
(iii) Social skills for the school environment;
(b) Specify a plan for use of the assessment in a pilot phase and
a voluntary use phase, and a time certain when school districts must
offer the assessment;
(c) Describe a recommended methodology for conducting the
assessments, including a plan for training or professional development
of individuals who will administer the assessment to ensure reliable
and comparable results;
(d) Describe a process for reporting results of the assessment to
parents, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and
the department of early learning in a common format; and
(e) Propose a plan for communicating with early learning providers
and parents about the knowledge and skills covered by the assessment.
(4) In collaboration with thrive by five Washington and in
consultation with others, the department and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall: Analyze how the assessment
can be used to improve instruction to be responsive to the needs and
strengths of individual students entering kindergarten; whether and how
the assessment results can be used to improve the early learning and
K-12 systems, as well as the transition between systems; and the costs
of the assessment, including the time required to administer the
assessment.
(5) The kindergarten entry assessment selected must be sensitive to
cultural and socioeconomic differences influencing the development of
young children. The assessment shall not be used to screen or
otherwise preclude children from entering kindergarten if they are
otherwise eligible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of early learning and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction jointly shall submit
a report with recommendations for implementing the kindergarten entry
assessment to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by October 15, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
department of early learning, jointly and in collaboration with thrive
by five Washington, shall study and make recommendations to the
governor and the legislature regarding implementation of a statewide
kindergarten entry assessment, in accordance with section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---