BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop and issue a request for proposals for private
vendors or nonprofit organizations to adapt an existing mathematics
curriculum to be aligned with Washington's essential academic learning
requirements and grade level expectations and make the curriculum
available online at no cost to school districts. At a minimum, the
proposed curriculum shall cover course content in grades kindergarten
through ten. Proposals are encouraged to cover content in grades
eleven and twelve that aligns with the state's college readiness
standards. Proposals shall address cost and timelines for adaptation
and implementation of the curriculum. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall review the responses, including an analysis
of the qualifications of the respondents, and report the results of the
request for proposals under this section to the governor and the
education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.305.215 and 2007 c 396 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The activities in this section revise and strengthen the state
learning standards that implement the goals of RCW 28A.150.210, known
as the essential academic learning requirements, and improve alignment
of school district curriculum to the standards.
(2) The state board of education shall be assisted in its work
under subsections (3) and (5) of this section by: (a) An expert
national consultant in each of mathematics and science retained by the
state board; and (b) the mathematics and science advisory panels
created under RCW 28A.305.219, as appropriate, which shall provide
review and formal comment on proposed recommendations to the
superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education
on new revised standards and curricula.
(3) By September 30, 2007, the state board of education shall
recommend to the superintendent of public instruction revised essential
academic learning requirements and grade level expectations in
mathematics. The recommendations shall be based on:
(a) Considerations of clarity, rigor, content, depth, coherence
from grade to grade, specificity, accessibility, and measurability;
(b) Study of:
(i) Standards used in countries whose students demonstrate high
performance on the trends in international mathematics and science
study and the programme for international student assessment;
(ii) College readiness standards;
(iii) The national council of teachers of mathematics focal points
and the national assessment of educational progress content frameworks;
and
(iv) Standards used by three to five other states, including
California, and the nation of Singapore; and
(c) Consideration of information presented during public comment
periods.
(4) By January 31, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction
shall revise the essential academic learning requirements and the grade
level expectations for mathematics and present the revised standards to
the state board of education and the education committees of the senate
and the house of representatives as required by RCW 28A.655.070(4).
The superintendent shall adopt the revised essential academic learning
requirements and grade level expectations unless otherwise directed by
the legislature during the 2008 legislative session.
(5) By June 30, 2008, the state board of education shall recommend
to the superintendent of public instruction revised essential academic
learning requirements and grade level expectations in science. The
recommendations shall be based on:
(a) Considerations of clarity, rigor, content, depth, coherence
from grade to grade, specificity, accessibility, and measurability;
(b) Study of standards used by three to five other states and in
countries whose students demonstrate high performance on the trends in
international mathematics and science study and the programme for
international student assessment; and
(c) Consideration of information presented during public comment
periods.
(6) By December 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction
shall revise the essential academic learning requirements and the grade
level expectations for science and present the revised standards to the
state board of education and the education committees of the senate and
the house of representatives as required by RCW 28A.655.070(4). The
superintendent shall adopt the revised essential academic learning
requirements and grade level expectations unless otherwise directed by
the legislature during the 2009 legislative session.
(7)(a) ((By May 15, 2008)) Within six months after the standards
under subsection (4) of this section are adopted, the superintendent of
public instruction shall present to the state board of education
recommendations for no more than three basic mathematics curricula each
for elementary, middle, and high school grade spans, one of which shall
be the online mathematics curriculum under section 1 of this act.
(b) ((By June 30, 2008)) Within two months after the presentation
of the recommended curricula, the state board of education shall
provide official comment and recommendations to the superintendent of
public instruction regarding the recommended mathematics curricula.
The superintendent of public instruction shall make any changes based
on the comment and recommendations from the state board of education
and adopt the recommended curricula.
(c) By May 15, 2009, the superintendent of public instruction shall
present to the state board of education recommendations for no more
than three basic science curricula each for elementary, middle, and
high school grade spans.
(d) By June 30, 2009, the state board of education shall provide
official comment and recommendations to the superintendent of public
instruction regarding the recommended science curricula. The
superintendent of public instruction shall make any changes based on
the comment and recommendations from the state board of education and
adopt the recommended curricula.
(e) In selecting the recommended curricula under this subsection
(7), the superintendent of public instruction shall provide information
to the mathematics and science advisory panels created under RCW
28A.305.219, as appropriate, and seek the advice of the appropriate
panel regarding the curricula that shall be included in the
recommendations.
(f) The recommended curricula under this subsection (7) shall align
with the revised essential academic learning requirements and grade
level expectations. In addition to the recommended basic curricula,
appropriate diagnostic and supplemental materials shall be identified
as necessary to support each curricula.
(g) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose and availability
of the curricula, at least one of the curricula in each grade span and
in each of mathematics and science shall be available to schools and
parents online at no cost to the school or parent.
(8) By December 1, 2007, the state board of education shall revise
the high school graduation requirements under RCW 28A.230.090 to
include a minimum of three credits of mathematics, one of which may be
a career and technical course equivalent in mathematics, and prescribe
the mathematics content in the three required credits.
(9) Nothing in this section requires a school district to use one
of the recommended curricula under subsection (7) of this section.
However, the statewide accountability plan adopted by the state board
of education under RCW 28A.305.130 shall recommend conditions under
which school districts should be required to use one of the recommended
curricula. The plan shall also describe the conditions for exception
to the curriculum requirement, such as the use of integrated academic
and career and technical education curriculum. Required use of the
recommended curricula as an intervention strategy must be authorized by
the legislature as required by RCW 28A.305.130(4)(e) before
implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---