BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
disability history month act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that annually
recognizing disability history throughout our entire public educational
system, from kindergarten through grade twelve and at our colleges and
universities, during the month of October will help to increase
awareness and understanding of the contributions that people with
disabilities in our state, nation, and the world have made to our
society. The legislature further finds that recognizing disability
history will increase respect and promote acceptance and inclusion of
people with disabilities. The legislature further finds that
recognizing disability history will inspire students with disabilities
to feel a greater sense of pride, reduce harassment and bullying, and
help keep students with disabilities in school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
Annually, during the month of October, each public school shall
conduct or promote educational activities that provide instruction,
awareness, and understanding of disability history and people with
disabilities. The activities may include, but not be limited to,
school assemblies or guest speaker presentations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
Annually, during the month of October, each of the public
institutions of higher education shall conduct or promote educational
activities that provide instruction, awareness, and understanding of
disability history and people with disabilities. The activities may
include, but not be limited to, guest speaker presentations.

--- END ---