BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is in the public interest to reduce
domestic violence, sexual assault, and stalking by enabling victims to
maintain the financial independence necessary to leave abusive
situations, achieve safety, and minimize physical and emotional
injuries, and to reduce the devastating economic consequences of
domestic violence, sexual assault, and stalking to employers and
employees. Victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, and stalking
should be able to recover from and cope with the effects of such
violence and participate in criminal and civil justice processes
without fear of adverse economic consequences.
(2) One of the best predictors of whether a victim of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking will be able to stay away from an
abuser is his or her degree of economic independence. However,
domestic violence, sexual assault, and stalking often negatively impact
victims' ability to maintain employment.
(3) An employee who is a victim of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking, or an employee whose family member is a victim,
must often take leave from work due to injuries, court proceedings, or
safety concerns requiring legal protection.
(4) Thus, it is in the public interest to provide reasonable leave
from employment for employees who are victims of domestic violence,
sexual assault, or stalking, or for employees whose family members are
victims, to participate in legal proceedings, receive medical
treatment, or obtain other necessary services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Child," "spouse," "parent," "parent-in-law," "grandparent,"
and "sick leave and other paid time off" have the same meanings as in
RCW 49.12.265.
(2) "Dating relationship" has the same meaning as in RCW 26.50.010.
(3) "Department," "director," "employer," and "employee" have the
same meanings as in RCW 49.12.005.
(4) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as in RCW 26.50.010.
(5) "Family member" means any individual whose relationship to the
employee can be classified as a child, spouse, parent, parent-in-law,
grandparent, or person with whom the employee has a dating
relationship.
(6) "Intermittent leave" and "reduced leave schedule" have the same
meanings as in RCW 49.78.020.
(7) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.125.030.
(8) "Stalking" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.46.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 An employee may take reasonable leave from
work, intermittent leave, or leave on a reduced leave schedule, with
or without pay, to:
(1) Seek legal or law enforcement assistance or remedies to ensure
the health and safety of the employee or employee's family members
including, but not limited to, preparing for, or participating in, any
civil or criminal legal proceeding related to or derived from domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking;
(2) Seek treatment by a health care provider for physical or mental
injuries caused by domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or
to attend to health care treatment for a victim who is the employee's
family member;
(3) Obtain, or assist a family member in obtaining, services from
a domestic violence shelter, rape crisis center, or other social
services program for relief from domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking;
(4) Obtain, or assist a family member in obtaining, mental health
counseling related to an incident of domestic violence, sexual assault,
or stalking, in which the employee or the employee's family member was
a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking; or
(5) Participate in safety planning, temporarily or permanently
relocate, or take other actions to increase the safety of the employee
or employee's family members from future domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) As a condition of taking leave for any
purpose described in section 3 of this act, an employee shall give an
employer advance notice of the employee's intention to take leave. The
timing of the notice shall be consistent with the employer's stated
policy for requesting such leave, if the employer has such a policy.
When advance notice cannot be given because of an emergency or
unforeseen circumstances due to domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking, the employee or his or her designee must give notice to the
employer no later than the end of the first day that the employee takes
such leave.
(2) When an employee requests leave under section 3 of this act the
employer may require that the request be supported by verification
that:
(a) The employee or employee's family member is a victim of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking; and
(b) The leave taken was for one of the purposes described in
section 3 of this act.
(3) If an employer requires verification, verification must be
provided in a timely manner. In the event that advance notice of the
leave cannot be given because of an emergency or unforeseen
circumstances due to domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking,
and the employer requires verification, verification must be provided
to the employer within a reasonable time period during or after the
leave.
(4) An employee may satisfy the verification requirement of this
section by providing the employer with one or more of the following:
(a) A police report indicating that the employee or employee's
family member was a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking;
(b) A court order protecting or separating the employee or
employee's family member from the perpetrator of the act of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or other evidence from the court
or the prosecuting attorney that the employee or employee's family
member appeared, or is scheduled to appear, in court in connection with
an incident of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking;
(c) Documentation that the employee or the employee's family member
is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, from any
of the following persons from whom the employee or employee's family
member sought assistance in addressing the domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking: An advocate for victims of domestic violence,
sexual assault, or stalking; an attorney; a member of the clergy; or a
medical or other professional. The provision of documentation under
this section does not waive or diminish the confidential or privileged
nature of communications between a victim of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking with one or more of the individuals named in this
subsection (4)(c) pursuant to RCW 5.60.060, 70.123.075, 70.123.076, or
70.125.065; or
(d) An employee's written statement that the employee or the
employee's family member is a victim of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking and that the leave taken was for one of the
purposes described in section 3 of this act.
(5) If the victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking
is the employee's family member, verification of the familial
relationship between the employee and the victim may include, but is
not limited to, a statement from the employee, a birth certificate, a
court document, or other similar documentation.
(6) An employee who is absent from work pursuant to section 3 of
this act may elect to use the employee's sick leave and other paid time
off, compensatory time, or unpaid leave time.
(7) An employee is required to provide only the information
enumerated in subsection (2) of this section to establish that the
employee's leave is protected under this chapter. An employee is not
required to produce or discuss any information with the employer that
is beyond the scope of subsection (2) of this section, or that would
compromise the employee's safety or the safety of the employee's family
member in any way, and an employer is prohibited from requiring any
such disclosure.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, an employer
shall maintain the confidentiality of all information provided by the
employee under this section, including the fact that the employee or
employee's family member is a victim of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking, that the employee has requested or obtained leave
under this chapter, and any written or oral statement, documentation,
record, or corroborating evidence provided by the employee.
(b) Information given by an employee may be disclosed by an
employer only if:
(i) Requested or consented to by the employee;
(ii) Ordered by a court or administrative agency; or
(iii) Otherwise required by applicable federal or state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The taking of leave under section 3 of
this act may not result in the loss of any pay or benefits to the
employee that accrued before the date on which the leave commenced.
(2) Upon an employee's return, an employer shall either:
(a) Restore the employee to the position of employment held by the
employee when the leave commenced; or
(b) Restore the employee to an equivalent position with equivalent
employment benefits, pay, and other terms and conditions of employment.
(3) To the extent allowed by law, an employer shall maintain
coverage under any health insurance plan for an employee who takes
leave under section 3 of this act. The coverage must be maintained for
the duration of the leave at the level and under the conditions
coverage would have been provided if the employee had not taken the
leave.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The rights provided in this act are in
addition to any other rights provided by state and federal law.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to discourage
employers from adopting policies that provide greater leave rights to
employees who are victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking than those required by this act.
(3) Nothing in this act shall be construed to diminish an
employer's obligation to comply with any collective bargaining
agreement, or any employment benefit program or plan, that provides
greater leave rights to employees than the rights provided by this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Upon complaint by an employee, the director
shall investigate to determine if there has been compliance with this
chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter. If the investigation
indicates that a violation has occurred, the director shall issue a
notice of infraction. Appeal from the director's decision is governed
by chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Any finding, determination, conclusion,
declaration, or notice of infraction made for the purposes of enforcing
this chapter by the director or by an appeal tribunal, administrative
law judge, or reviewing officer is neither conclusive nor binding in
any civil action filed pursuant to section 12 of this act or in any
other common law or civil action, regardless of whether the prior
action was between the same or related parties or involved the same
facts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) If an employer is found to have
committed an infraction under section 7 of this act, the director may
impose upon the employer a fine of up to five hundred dollars for the
first infraction and a fine of up to one thousand dollars for each
subsequent infraction committed within three years of a previous
infraction.
(2) The director may also order an employer found to have committed
an infraction under section 7 of this act to comply with section 5(2)
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, information contained in the department's complaint files
and records of employees under this chapter is confidential and shall
not be open to public inspection.
(2) Except as limited by state or federal statute or regulations:
(a) The information in subsection (1) of this section may be
provided to public employees in the performance of their official
duties; and
(b) A complainant or a representative of a complainant, be it an
individual or an organization, may review a complaint file or receive
specific information therefrom upon the presentation of the signed
authorization of the complainant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 No employer may discharge, threaten to
discharge, demote, deny a promotion to, sanction, discipline, retaliate
against, harass, or otherwise discriminate against an employee with
respect to compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment
because the employee:
(1) Exercised rights under section 3 of this act;
(2) Filed or communicated to the employer an intent to file a
complaint under section 7 or 12 of this act; or
(3) Participated or assisted, as a witness or otherwise, in another
employee's attempt to exercise rights under section 3, 7, or 12 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) Any employee deeming herself or himself
injured by any act in violation of this chapter shall have a civil
action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin further
violations, or to recover the actual damages sustained by the person,
or both, together with the cost of suit including reasonable attorneys'
fees.
(2) The remedy provided by this section is in addition to any
common law remedy or other remedy that may be available to an employee.
(3) An employee is not required to exhaust administrative remedies
before filing a civil action to enforce this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The department shall include notice of the
provisions of this chapter in the next reprinting of employment posters
printed under RCW 49.78.340. Employers shall post this notice as
required in RCW 49.78.340.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Prosecuting attorney and victim/witness
offices are encouraged to make information regarding this chapter
available for distribution at their offices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The director shall adopt rules as necessary
to implement this chapter.

Sec. 16 RCW 7.69.030 and 2004 c 120 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a reasonable effort made to ensure that victims,
survivors of victims, and witnesses of crimes have the following
rights, which apply to any criminal court and/or juvenile court
proceeding:
(1) With respect to victims of violent or sex crimes, to receive,
at the time of reporting the crime to law enforcement officials, a
written statement of the rights of crime victims as provided in this
chapter. The written statement shall include the name, address, and
telephone number of a county or local crime victim/witness program, if
such a crime victim/witness program exists in the county;
(2) To be informed by local law enforcement agencies or the
prosecuting attorney of the final disposition of the case in which the
victim, survivor, or witness is involved;
(3) To be notified by the party who issued the subpoena that a
court proceeding to which they have been subpoenaed will not occur as
scheduled, in order to save the person an unnecessary trip to court;
(4) To receive protection from harm and threats of harm arising out
of cooperation with law enforcement and prosecution efforts, and to be
provided with information as to the level of protection available;
(5) To be informed of the procedure to be followed to apply for and
receive any witness fees to which they are entitled;
(6) To be provided, whenever practical, a secure waiting area
during court proceedings that does not require them to be in close
proximity to defendants and families or friends of defendants;
(7) To have any stolen or other personal property expeditiously
returned by law enforcement agencies or the superior court when no
longer needed as evidence. When feasible, all such property, except
weapons, currency, contraband, property subject to evidentiary
analysis, and property of which ownership is disputed, shall be
photographed and returned to the owner within ten days of being taken;
(8) To be provided with appropriate employer intercession services
to ensure that employers of victims, survivors of victims, and
witnesses of crime will cooperate with the criminal justice process in
order to minimize an employee's loss of pay and other benefits
resulting from court appearance;
(9) To access to immediate medical assistance and not to be
detained for an unreasonable length of time by a law enforcement agency
before having such assistance administered. However, an employee of
the law enforcement agency may, if necessary, accompany the person to
a medical facility to question the person about the criminal incident
if the questioning does not hinder the administration of medical
assistance. Victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking,
as defined in section 2 of this act, shall be notified of their right
to reasonable leave from employment under chapter 49. . . . RCW
(sections 1 through 15 of this act);
(10) With respect to victims of violent and sex crimes, to have a
crime victim advocate from a crime victim/witness program, or any other
support person of the victim's choosing, present at any prosecutorial
or defense interviews with the victim, and at any judicial proceedings
related to criminal acts committed against the victim. This subsection
applies if practical and if the presence of the crime victim advocate
or support person does not cause any unnecessary delay in the
investigation or prosecution of the case. The role of the crime victim
advocate is to provide emotional support to the crime victim;
(11) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to be
physically present in court during trial, or if subpoenaed to testify,
to be scheduled as early as practical in the proceedings in order to be
physically present during trial after testifying and not to be excluded
solely because they have testified;
(12) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to be
informed by the prosecuting attorney of the date, time, and place of
the trial and of the sentencing hearing for felony convictions upon
request by a victim or survivor;
(13) To submit a victim impact statement or report to the court,
with the assistance of the prosecuting attorney if requested, which
shall be included in all presentence reports and permanently included
in the files and records accompanying the offender committed to the
custody of a state agency or institution;
(14) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to present
a statement personally or by representation, at the sentencing hearing
for felony convictions;
(15) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to entry of
an order of restitution by the court in all felony cases, even when the
offender is sentenced to confinement, unless extraordinary
circumstances exist which make restitution inappropriate in the court's
judgment; and
(16) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to present
a statement in person, via audio or videotape, in writing or by
representation at any hearing conducted regarding an application for
pardon or commutation of sentence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 1 through 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---