BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
securities and exchange commission has determined that business
activities in foreign states such as Iran sponsoring terrorism and that
are subject to sanctions by the United States may materially harm the
share value of foreign companies. Shares in these foreign companies
may be held in the portfolio of public retirement systems in this
state.
(2) The legislature finds that publicly traded companies in the
United States are substantially restricted in doing business in or with
foreign states such as Iran that the United States department of state
has identified as sponsoring terrorism.
(3) The legislature further finds that public retirement system
funds in this state currently invest on behalf of retirement system
members and the citizens of Washington in publicly traded foreign
companies that may be at risk due to business ties with foreign states
such as Iran that sponsor terrorism and are involved in the
proliferation of weapons of mass destruction, including the supplying
of improvised explosive devices and other weapons to militants in Iraq
for use against coalition troops.
(4) The legislature further finds that investments in publicly
traded foreign companies that have business operations in or with
foreign states such as Iran are liable for sanctions under United
States law and risk the pensions of the public employees of this state.
The legislature finds that Public Law 104-172, as renewed and amended
in 2001 and 2006, provides for sanctions to be imposed on any entity
that has invested at least twenty million dollars in any year since
1996 to develop petroleum or natural resources of Iran.
(5) The legislature therefore declares that excluding companies
with business activities in foreign states such as Iran that sponsor
terrorism and divesting from public portfolios will help protect the
public retirement systems in this state from investment losses related
to these business activities and may improve the investment performance
of the public retirement systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 1 through 8 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the state investment board established in this
chapter.
(2) "Business operations" means maintaining, selling, or leasing
equipment, facilities, personnel, or any other apparatus of business or
commerce in Iran, including the ownership or possession of real or
personal property located in Iran.
(3) "Company" means a sole proprietorship, organization,
association, corporation, partnership, or other entity, its subsidiary
or affiliate that exists for profit-making purposes or to otherwise
secure economic advantage. "Company" also means a company owned or
controlled, either directly or indirectly, by the government of Iran,
that is established or organized under the laws of or has its principal
place of business in the Islamic Republic of Iran.
(4) "Government of Iran" means the government of Iran or its
instrumentalities or political subdivisions. "Government of Iran" also
means an individual, company, or public agency located in Iran that
provides material or financial support to the Islam Republic of Iran.
(5) "Invest" or "investment" means the purchase, ownership, or
control of stock of a company, association, or corporation, the capital
stock of a mutual water company or corporation, bonds issued by the
government or a political subdivision of Iran, corporate bonds or other
debt instruments issued by a company, or the commitment of funds or
other assets to a company, including a loan or extension of credit to
that company.
(6) "Iran" means the Islamic Republic of Iran or a territory under
the administration or control of Iran.
(7) "Military equipment" means weapons, arms, or military defense
supplies.
(8) "Public employee retirement funds" means funds administered by
the department of retirement systems and the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' plan 2 board.
(9) "Substantial action" means a refusal to do business with the
government of Iran, curtailing business in Iran, or selling company
assets, equipment, or real and personal property located in Iran.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The board shall not invest public
employee retirement funds in a company that has business operations in
Iran as identified by the board through, as the board deems
appropriate, publicly available information, including but not limited
to information provided by government entities and nongovernmental
organizations, that meets either of the following criteria:
(a) The company is invested in or engaged in business operations
with entities in the defense or nuclear sectors of Iran, or is invested
in or engaged in business operations with entities involved in the
development of petroleum or natural gas resources of Iran, and that
company is subject to sanctions under Public Law 104-172, as renewed
and amended in 2001 and 2006.
(b) The company has demonstrated complicity with an Iranian
organization that has been named as a terrorist organization by the
United States government before the effective date of this act.
(2) On or before January 1, 2009, the board shall determine which
companies are subject to divestment.
(3) After the determination described in subsection (2) of this
section, the board shall determine, by the next applicable board
meeting, if a company meets the criteria described in subsection (1) of
this section. If the board plans to invest or has investments in a
company that meets the criteria described in subsection (1) of this
section, that planned or existing investment shall be subject to
section 4 (1) and (2) of this act.
(4) Investments of the board in a company that does not meet the
criteria described in subsection (1) of this section are not subject to
section 4 of this act if the company does not subsequently meet the
criteria described in subsection (1) of this section. The board shall
identify the reasons why that company does not satisfy the criteria
described in subsection (1) of this section in the report to the
legislature required by section 5 of this act.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (3) and (4) of this section, if the
board's investment in a company described in subsection (1) of this
section is limited to investment via an externally and actively managed
commingled fund, the board shall contact the fund manager in writing
and request that the fund remove the company from the fund as described
in section 4 of this act. On or before January 1, 2009, if the fund
manager creates a fund or account devoid of companies described in
subsection (1) of this section, the transfer of board investments from
the prior fund or account to the fund or account devoid of companies
with business operations in Iran shall be deemed to satisfy subsection
(1) of this section.
(6) If the board's investment in a company described in subsection
(1) of this section is limited to an alternative fund or account, the
alternative fund or account manager creates an actively managed,
commingled fund that excludes companies described in subsection (1) of
this section, and the new fund or account is deemed to be financially
equivalent to the existing fund or account, the transfer of board
investments from the existing fund or account to the new fund or
account shall be deemed to satisfy section 4 of this act. If the board
determines that the new fund or account is not financially equivalent
to the existing fund, the board shall include the reasons for that
determination in the report required in section 5 of this act.
(7) The board shall make a good faith effort to identify any
private equity investments that involve companies described in
subsection (1) of this section, or are linked to the government of
Iran. If the board determines that a private equity investment clearly
involves a company described in subsection (1) of this section, or is
linked to the government of Iran, the board shall consider, at its
discretion, if those private equity investments shall be subject to
section 4 of this act. If the board determines that a private equity
investment clearly involves a company described in subsection (1) of
this section, or is linked to the government of Iran and the board does
not take action as described in section 4 of this act, the board shall
include the reasons for its decision in the report required in section
5 of this act.
(8) Except as described in subsections (4) and (5) of this section,
the board, in its capacity as shareholder or investor, shall notify any
company described in subsection (3) of this section that the company is
subject to subsection (1) of this section and permit the company to
respond to the board. The board shall request that the company take
substantial action no later than ninety days from the date the board
notified the company under this subsection. If the board determines
that a company has taken substantial action or has made sufficient
progress toward substantial action before the expiration of that
ninety-day period, that company shall not be subject to section 4 of
this act. The board shall, at intervals not to exceed ninety days,
continue to monitor and review the progress of the company until that
company has taken substantial action in Iran. A company that fails to
complete substantial action within one year from the date of the
initial notice by the board is subject to section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If a company described in section 3(3) of
this act fails to complete substantial action by the time described in
section 3(8) of this act, the board shall take the following actions:
(1) The board shall not make additional or new investments or renew
existing investments in that company.
(2) The board shall liquidate the investments of the board in that
company no later than eighteen months after this section applies to
that company. The board shall liquidate those investments in a manner
to address the need for companies to take substantial action in Iran
and consistent with the board's fiduciary responsibilities as described
in RCW 43.33A.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 On or before July 1, 2009, and every year
thereafter, the board shall submit a report to the governor and
legislature. The report shall include the following:
(1) A list of investments the board has in companies with business
operations that satisfy the criteria in section 3(1) of this act,
including, but not limited to, the issuer, by name, of the stock,
bonds, securities, and other evidence of indebtedness;
(2) A detailed summary of the business operations a company
described in subsection (1) of this section has in Iran;
(3) Whether the board has reduced its investments in a company that
satisfies the criteria in section 3(1) of this act;
(4) If the board has not completely reduced its investments in a
company that satisfies the criteria in section 3(1) of this act, when
the board anticipates that it will reduce all investments in that
company or the reasons why a sale or transfer of investments is
inconsistent with the fiduciary responsibilities of the board as
described in RCW 43.33A.140;
(5) Any information described in section 3 (3) and (4) of this act;
(6) A detailed summary of investments that were transferred to
funds or accounts devoid of companies with business operations in Iran
as described in section 3(5) of this act; and
(7) An annual calculation of any costs or investment losses or
other financial results incurred in compliance with the provisions of
section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Nothing in sections 3 through 5, 7, and 8 of
this act shall require the board to take action described in sections
3 through 5, 7, and 8 of this act unless the board determines, in good
faith, that the actions described in sections 3 through 5, 7, and 8 of
this act are consistent with the fiduciary responsibilities of the
board as described in RCW 43.33A.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 5 of this act shall not apply to any
of the following:
(1) Investments in a company that is primarily engaged in supplying
goods or services intended to relieve human suffering in Iran;
(2) Investments in a company with a principal purpose of promoting
health, education, or journalistic, religious, or welfare activities in
Iran; and
(3) Investments in a company that is authorized by the federal
government to have business operations in Iran.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Present, future, and former members of the
board, jointly and individually, state officers and employees, and
research firms and investment managers under contract with the board
shall be indemnified from the state general fund and held harmless by
the state of Washington from all claims, demands, suits, actions,
damages, judgments, costs, charges and expenses, including court costs
and attorneys' fees, and against all liability, losses, and damages of
any nature whatsoever that those present, future, or former board
members, officers, employees, research firms, or investment managers
shall or may at any time sustain by reason of any decision to restrict,
reduce, or eliminate investments under sections 3 through 7 of this
act.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.33A.110 and 1994 c 154 s 310 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state investment board may make appropriate rules and
regulations for the performance of its duties. The board shall,
consistent with sections 2 through 8 of this act, establish investment
policies and procedures designed exclusively to maximize return at a
prudent level of risk. However, in the case of the department of labor
and industries' accident, medical aid, and reserve funds, the board
shall establish investment policies and procedures designed to attempt
to limit fluctuations in industrial insurance premiums and, subject to
this purpose, to maximize return at a prudent level of risk. The board
shall adopt rules to ensure that its members perform their functions in
compliance with chapter 42.52 RCW. Rules adopted by the board shall be
adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 2 through 8 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.33A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---