BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.02.060 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 44 are each
amended to read as follows:
The local ordinance by which impact fees are imposed:
(1) Shall include a schedule of impact fees which shall be adopted
for each type of development activity that is subject to impact fees,
specifying the amount of the impact fee to be imposed for each type of
system improvement. The schedule shall be based upon a formula or
other method of calculating such impact fees. In determining
proportionate share, the formula or other method of calculating impact
fees shall incorporate, among other things, the following:
(a) The cost of public facilities necessitated by new development;
(b) An adjustment to the cost of the public facilities for past or
future payments made or reasonably anticipated to be made by new
development to pay for particular system improvements in the form of
user fees, debt service payments, taxes, or other payments earmarked
for or proratable to the particular system improvement;
(c) The availability of other means of funding public facility
improvements;
(d) The cost of existing public facilities improvements; and
(e) The methods by which public facilities improvements were
financed;
(2) May provide an exemption for low-income housing((,)) and other
development activities with broad public purposes((, from these impact
fees, provided that the impact fees for such development activity shall
be paid from public funds other than impact fee accounts)). An
exemption granted under this subsection (2) must be conditioned upon
requiring the developer to record a covenant that, except as provided
otherwise by this subsection, prohibits using the property for any
purpose other than for low-income housing or broad public purposes.
The covenant must provide that if the property is converted to a use
other than for low-income housing or broad public purposes, the
property owner must pay the applicable impact fees in effect at the
time of conversion. Covenants required by this subsection must be
recorded with the applicable county auditor or recording officer. As
used in this subsection, "development activities with broad public
purposes" include, but are not limited to, the construction or
modification of facilities for a high-capacity transportation service
authorized under chapter 81.104 RCW. A local government granting an
exemption under this subsection may not impose a fee under RCW
43.21C.060 for the system improvements for which the exemption applies;
(3) Shall provide a credit for the value of any dedication of land
for, improvement to, or new construction of any system improvements
provided by the developer, to facilities that are identified in the
capital facilities plan and that are required by the county, city, or
town as a condition of approving the development activity;
(4) Shall allow the county, city, or town imposing the impact fees
to adjust the standard impact fee at the time the fee is imposed to
consider unusual circumstances in specific cases to ensure that impact
fees are imposed fairly;
(5) Shall include a provision for calculating the amount of the fee
to be imposed on a particular development that permits consideration of
studies and data submitted by the developer to adjust the amount of the
fee;
(6) Shall establish one or more reasonable service areas within
which it shall calculate and impose impact fees for various land use
categories per unit of development; and
(7) May provide for the imposition of an impact fee for system
improvement costs previously incurred by a county, city, or town to the
extent that new growth and development will be served by the previously
constructed improvements provided such fee shall not be imposed to make
up for any system improvement deficiencies.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21C.065 and 1992 c 219 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person required to pay an impact fee for system improvements
pursuant to RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 shall not be required to
pay a fee pursuant to RCW 43.21C.060 for those same system
improvements.
(2) A local government granting an exemption under RCW 82.02.060(2)
shall not impose a fee pursuant to RCW 43.21C.060 for the system
improvements for which the exemption applies.

--- END ---