BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a county with a population under two hundred thousand, the
governing body of a city public facilities district, which was created
before July 31, 2002, under chapter 35.57 RCW in which the total
population in the public facilities district as of the effective date
of this act is greater than forty-five thousand that commences
construction of a regional center before July 1, 2009, may impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the public facilities district. The rate of tax for a public
facilities district created before July 31, 2002, under chapter 35.57
RCW, may not exceed 0.025 percent of the selling price in the case of
a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The
department shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the
county at no cost to the public facilities district.
(3) The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds
issued for the construction of the regional center and related parking
facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years after the
tax is first collected.
(4) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the
purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount
from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three percent of
the amount collected under this section, provided that amounts
generated from nonvoter-approved taxes authorized under chapter 35.57
RCW may not constitute a public or private source. For the purpose of
this section, public or private sources include, but are not limited
to, cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development
or improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used
for the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions
from public or private foundations, or amounts attributed to private
sector partners as part of a public and private partnership agreement
negotiated by the public facilities district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---