BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that an increasing
proportion of K-12 students are English language learners.
Furthermore, a significant number of English language learner students
are struggling to meet the state's academic learning standards.
Specific strategies are necessary to improve the achievement and
progress of these students. Instruction for English language learner
students should be integrated with English-fluent students. Classroom
teachers should collaborate with specialist teachers to provide high
quality instruction. All teachers should demonstrate a high level of
cultural competence and understanding of second language acquisition.
(2) However, the legislature further finds that current standards
for preparing teachers to meet the learning needs of English language
learner students are inadequate. Therefore, the legislature intends to
task the professional educator standards board to work with colleges of
education and school districts to identify specific ways to better
prepare teachers to teach English language learner students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The professional educator standards
board shall convene a work group to develop recommendations for
increasing teacher knowledge, skills, and competencies to address the
needs of English language learner students. The work group shall
include representatives from the Washington association of colleges for
teacher education, school districts with significant populations of
English language learner students who speak a single language, school
districts with significant populations of English language learner
students who speak multiple languages, classroom teachers, English as
a second language teachers, bilingual education teachers, principals,
the migrant and bilingual education office in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, and the higher education
coordinating board. The professional educator standards board shall
invite participation by the northwest regional educational laboratory.
(2) The work group shall identify gaps and weaknesses in the
current knowledge and skills standards for teacher preparation and
teacher competencies regarding understanding how students acquire
language, how to teach academic content in English to non-English
speakers, and demonstrating cultural competence. The work group shall
be informed by the English as a second language demonstration projects
under RCW 28A.630.058 and the accompanying research and evaluation by
the northwest regional educational laboratory.
(3) The work group shall submit a report by December 1, 2008, to
the governor and the education and higher education committees of the
legislature with findings and specific recommendations to improve the
teacher preparation knowledge and skills standards and teacher
competencies in the areas identified under subsection (2) of this
section.

--- END ---