BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.175 and 1994 c 124 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of making the assessment of real property, the
assessor shall enter each description of property exempt under the
provisions of chapter 84.36 RCW((, and value)) and list the same ((in
the manner and subject to the same rule as the assessor is required to
assess all other property)), designating in each case to whom such
property belongs. ((However,)) Except as otherwise provided in law,
the assessor is not required to value property exempt under chapter
84.36 RCW; however, the assessor may value such property at their
discretion, or if required for the purposes of special or
administrative assessments.
(2) With respect to publicly owned property exempt from taxation
under provisions of RCW 84.36.010, the assessor shall value only such
property as is leased to or occupied by a private person under an
agreement allowing such person to occupy or use such property for a
private purpose when a request for such valuation is received from the
department of revenue or the lessee of such property for use in
determining the taxable rent as provided for in chapter 82.29A RCW:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section shall not prohibit any assessor
from valuing any public property leased to or occupied by a private
person for private purposes.

--- END ---