BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.045 and 2001 c 187 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
The assessor shall give notice of any change in the true and fair
value of real property for the tract or lot of land and any
improvements thereon no later than thirty days after appraisal:
PROVIDED, That no such notice shall be mailed during the period from
January 15 to February 15 of each year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no
notice need be sent with respect to changes in valuation of forest land
made pursuant to chapter 84.33 RCW.
The notice shall contain a statement of both the prior and the new
true and fair value((, stating separately land and improvement
values,)) and a brief statement of the procedure for appeal to the
board of equalization and the time, date, and place of the meetings of
the board.
The notice shall be mailed by the assessor to the taxpayer.
If any taxpayer, as shown by the tax rolls, holds solely a security
interest in the real property which is the subject of the notice,
pursuant to a mortgage, contract of sale, or deed of trust, such
taxpayer shall, upon written request of the assessor, supply, within
thirty days of receipt of such request, to the assessor the name and
address of the person making payments pursuant to the mortgage,
contract of sale, or deed of trust, and thereafter such person shall
also receive a copy of the notice provided for in this section.
Willful failure to comply with such request within the time limitation
provided for herein shall make such taxpayer subject to a maximum civil
penalty of five thousand dollars. The penalties provided for herein
shall be recoverable in an action by the county prosecutor, and when
recovered shall be deposited in the county current expense fund. The
assessor shall make the request provided for by this section during the
month of January.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.41.041 and 2001 c 187 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county assessor shall cause taxable real property to be
physically inspected and valued at least once every six years in
accordance with RCW 84.41.030, and in accordance with a plan filed with
and approved by the department of revenue. Such revaluation plan shall
provide that a reasonable portion of all taxable real property within
a county shall be revalued and these newly-determined values placed on
the assessment rolls each year. The department may approve a plan that
provides that all property in the county be revalued every two years.
If the revaluation plan provides for physical inspection at least once
each four years, during the intervals between each physical inspection
of real property, the valuation of such property may be adjusted to its
current true and fair value, such adjustments to be based upon
appropriate statistical data. If the revaluation plan provides for
physical inspection less frequently than once each four years, during
the intervals between each physical inspection of real property, the
valuation of such property shall be adjusted to its current true and
fair value, such adjustments to be made once each year and to be based
upon appropriate statistical data.
(2) The assessor may require property owners to submit pertinent
data respecting taxable property in their control including data
respecting any sale or purchase of said property within the past five
years, the cost and characteristics of any improvement on the property
and other facts necessary for appraisal of the property.
(3) As part of a revaluation plan approved by the department,
county assessors may employ the use of digital image technology for
physical inspections. The department shall adopt rules for the use of
such technology consistent with standards developed by a recognized
industry source for property appraisal, assessment administration, and
property tax policy.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.40.175 and 1994 c 124 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of making the assessment of real property, the
assessor shall enter each description of property exempt under the
provisions of chapter 84.36 RCW((, and value)) and list the same ((in
the manner and subject to the same rule as the assessor is required to
assess all other property)), designating in each case to whom such
property belongs. ((However,)) Except as otherwise provided in law,
the assessor is not required to value property exempt under chapter
84.36 RCW.
(2) With respect to publicly owned property exempt from taxation
under provisions of RCW 84.36.010, the assessor shall value only such
property as is leased to or occupied by a private person under an
agreement allowing such person to occupy or use such property for a
private purpose when a request for such valuation is received from the
department of revenue or the lessee of such property for use in
determining the taxable rent as provided for in chapter 82.29A RCW:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section shall not prohibit any assessor
from valuing any public property leased to or occupied by a private
person for private purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2010 and thereafter.

--- END ---