BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that cleaning products
are necessary for creating and maintaining sanitary conditions in state
facilities and workplaces. However, chemicals contained in cleaning
products can be released to the environment during normal use by
evaporation of volatile components or by leaving residue on cleaned
surfaces. Choosing less hazardous cleaning products for use in our
workplaces and our facilities and taking steps to reduce exposure can
minimize harmful impacts to office and custodial workers, improve
indoor air quality, and reduce water and ambient air pollution.
Purchasing and appropriate use of products that perform well and that
have positive environmental attributes such as biodegradability, low
toxicity, low volatile organic compound content, reduced packaging, and
low life cycle energy use can reduce the environmental impact of
routine cleaning activities while also ensuring cleaning effectiveness.
Therefore, the legislature finds that the adoption of practices to
select, procure, and use environmentally preferred products will
benefit the environment and the health and safety of workers and
visitors to state facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) All state agencies that purchase
cleaning products or services must ensure that cleaning products have
properties that minimize potential impacts to human health and the
environment consistent with maintenance of the effectiveness of these
products for the protection of public health and safety. For purposes
of this chapter, "state agency" means any office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other agency of the state of Washington
or of any subdivision thereof.
(2) The department of general administration, in consultation with
the department of health and the department of ecology, shall recognize
environmentally preferred products' accrediting information from
multiple sources including, but not limited to, the United States
environmental protection agency design for the environment program and
greenseal, and provide consultation and guidance to state agencies to:
(a) Select and procure products and use practices that reduce or
minimize the risks of harmful effects to employees, custodial workers,
visitors, and other building occupants and to the environment;
(b) Promote adoption of practices endorsed by this chapter;
(c) Recognize state agencies that adopt and implement
environmentally beneficial facility and workplace management policies
and practices;
(d) Encourage contractors supplying goods and services to state
agencies to select and procure such products; and
(e) Encourage lessors and building managers who provide leased
space to state agencies to select and procure such products.
(3) The department of general administration, upon renewal of a
lease and for all new leases, must require lessors and building
managers who provide leased space to state agencies to use
environmentally preferred products and practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) When procuring cleaning products, state
agencies shall purchase environmentally preferred products or document
the reasons for selecting nonpreferred products. The products must
conform to guidance for environmentally preferred purchasing of
cleaning products that may be provided under section 2 of this act, or
must be products that have been identified by the department of general
administration as compliant with this chapter.
(2) The use of nonpreferred products must be in accordance with
responsible cleaning procedure requirements, including:
(a) Controlled and efficient use;
(b) Proper dilution, mixing, and handling;
(c) Following label instructions;
(d) Monitoring of chemical quantities used; and
(e) Compliance with chemical hazard communication and personal
protective equipment use requirements under chapter 296-800 WAC.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Local governments and school districts are
encouraged to review their purchasing and use of cleaning products and
select those having properties that minimize potential impacts to human
health and the environment consistent with section 2 of this act. The
department of general administration shall encourage local governments
and school districts that are members of the department of general
administration's state purchasing cooperative to achieve the goals of
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 State agencies shall transition to cleaning
products having properties that minimize potential impacts to human
health and the environment within six months of the effective date of
this section in a manner that avoids waste of existing inventories,
accommodates establishment of supply chains for new products, enables
the training of personnel in appropriate work practices, and allows the
phase out of products and practices inconsistent with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Nothing in this chapter prohibits the use of
disinfectants, disinfecting cleaners, sanitizers, or any other
antimicrobial product regulated by the federal insecticide, fungicide,
and rodenticide act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.), provided that the use
of these products is in accordance with responsible cleaning procedure
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---