BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.68.041 and 2004 c 95 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
the department shall forward all funds accruing under the provisions of
chapter 46.20 RCW together with a proper identifying, detailed report
to the state treasurer who shall deposit such moneys to the credit of
the highway safety fund.
(2) Sixty-three percent of each fee collected by the department
under RCW 46.20.311 (1)(e)(ii), (2)(b)(ii), and (3)(b) shall be
deposited in the impaired driving safety account.
(3) Ten percent of fees collected by the department under RCW
46.20.161 shall be deposited in the special safety corridor account
created in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The special safety corridor account is created in the motor
vehicle fund. Ten percent of the fees collected under RCW 46.20.161
must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used
for special safety corridor projects. Special safety corridor projects
are projects that may require bond financing to complete construction
and safety improvements. The following criteria shall be used in
determining which special safety corridor projects have the highest
priority:
(a) Fatal accident experience;
(b) Historic underfunding of safety improvements;
(c) Ability to leverage additional nonstate revenue sources;
(d) Contribute to the economic development of the corridor; and
(e) Provide additional capacity to move people and goods safely.
(2) The following projects, listed in order of priority, are
eligible for special safety corridor account funding:
(a) State route number 2 beginning near the junction with state
route number 9 at milepost 5 to the King county line at Stevens Pass
near milepost 64;
(b) State route number 97 beginning at milepost 0 to milepost 63;
and
(c) State route number 20 beginning near Sedro Woolley at milepost
64 to near Newport at milepost 436.
Moneys deposited in the special safety corridor account may be used
for payment of debt service on bonds, the proceeds of which are used to
finance special safety corridor projects under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---