BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 35.13A.010 (Definitions) and 1998 c 326 s 1 & 1971 ex.s. c
95 s 1;
(2) RCW 35.13A.020 (Assumption authorized -- Disposition of
properties and rights -- Outstanding indebtedness -- Management and
control) and 1999 c 153 s 28, 1998 c 326 s 2, & 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 2;
(3) RCW 35.13A.030 (Assumption of control if sixty percent or more
of area or valuation within city) and 1999 c 153 s 29 & 1971 ex.s. c 95
s 3;
(4) RCW 35.13A.0301 (Assumption of water-sewer district before July
1, 1999 -- Limitations) and 1998 c 326 s 3;
(5) RCW 35.13A.040 (Assumption of control if less than sixty
percent of area or valuation within city) and 1999 c 153 s 30 & 1971
ex.s. c 95 s 4;
(6) RCW 35.13A.050 (Territory containing facilities within or
without city -- Duties of city or district -- Rates and charges -- Assumption
of responsibility -- Outstanding indebtedness -- Properties and rights) and
1971 ex.s. c 95 s 5;
(7) RCW 35.13A.060 (District in more than one city -- Assumption of
responsibilities -- Duties of cities) and 1999 c 153 s 31 & 1971 ex.s. c
95 s 6;
(8) RCW 35.13A.070 (Contracts) and 1997 c 426 s 2 & 1971 ex.s. c 95
s 7;
(9) RCW 35.13A.080 (Dissolution of water district or sewer
district) and 1997 c 426 s 3 & 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 8;
(10) RCW 35.13A.090 (Employment and rights of district employees)
and 1999 c 153 s 32 & 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 9;
(11) RCW 35.13A.100 (Assumption of substandard water system--Limited immunity from liability) and 1994 c 292 s 5;
(12) RCW 35.13A.111 (Assumption of water-sewer district with fewer
than two hundred fifty customers) and 2005 c 43 s 1;
(13) RCW 35.13A.900 (Severability -- 1971 ex.s. c 95) and 1971 ex.s.
c 95 s 12;
(14) RCW 36.94.180 (Transfer of system upon annexation or
incorporation of area) and 1986 c 234 s 34, 1983 c 3 s 82, 1971 ex.s.
c 96 s 8, & 1967 c 72 s 18; and
(15) RCW 70.116.090 (Assumption of jurisdiction or control of
public water system by city, town, or code city) and 1977 ex.s. c 142
s 9.

--- END ---