BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.200.010 and 2000 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that credit ((is an)) and debit cards are
important tools for consumers in today's economy((, particularly the
use of credit cards)). The legislature also finds that unscrupulous
persons often fraudulently use the ((credit)) card accounts of others
by stealing the ((credit)) card itself or by obtaining the necessary
information to fraudulently charge the purchase of goods and services
to another person's ((credit card)) account. The legislature intends
to provide some protection for consumers from the latter by limiting
the information that can appear on a ((credit)) card receipt.
(2) No person that accepts credit or debit cards for the
transaction of business shall print more than the last five digits of
the ((credit)) card account number or print the ((credit)) card
expiration date on a credit or debit card receipt. This includes all
receipts kept by the person or provided to the cardholder.
(3) This section shall apply only to receipts that are
electronically printed and shall not apply to transactions in which the
sole means of recording the ((credit)) card number is by handwriting or
by an imprint or copy of the credit or debit card.
(4) ((For purposes of chapter 163, Laws of 2000,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Credit card" means a card or device existing for the purpose
of obtaining money, property, labor, or services on credit.
(((5) This section applies on July 1, 2001, to any cash register or
other machine or device that electronically prints receipts on credit
card transactions and is placed into service on or after July 1, 2001,
and on July 1, 2004, to any cash register or other machine or device
that electronically prints receipts on credit card transactions and is
placed into service prior to July 1, 2001.)) (b) "Debit card" means a
card or device used to obtain money, property, labor, or services by a
transaction that debits a cardholder's account, rather than extending
credit.

Sec. 2 RCW 63.14.123 and 2000 c 163 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A retailer shall not print more than the last five digits of
the ((credit)) card account number or print the ((credit)) card
expiration date on a credit or debit card receipt. This includes all
receipts kept by the person or provided to the cardholder.
(2) This section shall apply only to receipts that are
electronically printed and shall not apply to transactions in which
the:
(a) Sole means of recording the ((credit)) card number is by
handwriting or by an imprint or copy of the credit or debit card; or
(b) Retailer processes the transaction electronically but also
takes additional manual measures for the purpose of ensuring that the
card is not being used fraudulently.
(3) ((This section applies on July 1, 2001, to any cash register or
other machine or device that electronically prints receipts on credit
card transactions and is placed into service on or after July 1, 2001,
and on July 1, 2004, to any cash register or other machine or device
that electronically prints receipts on credit card transactions and is
placed into service prior to July 1, 2001)) For the purposes of this
section:
(a) "Credit card" means a card or device existing for the purpose
of obtaining money, property, labor, or services on credit.
(b) "Debit card means a card or device used to obtain money,
property, labor, or services by a transaction that debits a
cardholder's account, rather than extending credit.

--- END ---