BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.589 and 2002 c 175 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a)(i) Except as provided in (b) or (c) of this subsection,
whenever a person is to be sentenced for two or more current offenses,
the sentence range for each current offense shall be determined by
using all other current and prior convictions as if they were prior
convictions for the purpose of the offender score: PROVIDED, That if
the court enters a finding that some or all of the current offenses
encompass the same criminal conduct then those current offenses shall
be counted as one crime. Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this
subsection, sentences imposed under this subsection shall be served
concurrently. ((Consecutive sentences may only be imposed under the
exceptional sentence provisions of RCW 9.94A.535.)) "Same criminal
conduct," as used in this subsection, means two or more crimes that
require the same criminal intent, are committed at the same time and
place, and involve the same victim. This definition applies in cases
involving vehicular assault or vehicular homicide even if the victims
occupied the same vehicle.
(ii) Consecutive sentences may be imposed under the exceptional
sentence provisions of RCW 9.94A.535. Consecutive sentences shall be
imposed for more than one conviction for vehicular assault by being
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, more than one
conviction of vehicular homicide by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a combination of convictions for
vehicular assault by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug and vehicular homicide by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, unless the court finds by a
preponderance of the evidence that the imposition of consecutive
sentences would be inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter as
articulated in RCW 9.94A.010.
(b) Whenever a person is convicted of two or more serious violent
offenses arising from separate and distinct criminal conduct, the
standard sentence range for the offense with the highest seriousness
level under RCW 9.94A.515 shall be determined using the offender's
prior convictions and other current convictions that are not serious
violent offenses in the offender score and the standard sentence range
for other serious violent offenses shall be determined by using an
offender score of zero. The standard sentence range for any offenses
that are not serious violent offenses shall be determined according to
(a) of this subsection. All sentences imposed under (b) of this
subsection shall be served consecutively to each other and concurrently
with sentences imposed under (a) of this subsection.
(c) If an offender is convicted under RCW 9.41.040 for unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first or second degree and for the
felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of a stolen firearm,
or both, the standard sentence range for each of these current offenses
shall be determined by using all other current and prior convictions,
except other current convictions for the felony crimes listed in this
subsection (1)(c), as if they were prior convictions. The offender
shall serve consecutive sentences for each conviction of the felony
crimes listed in this subsection (1)(c), and for each firearm
unlawfully possessed.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, whenever a
person while under sentence for conviction of a felony commits another
felony and is sentenced to another term of confinement, the latter term
shall not begin until expiration of all prior terms.
(b) Whenever a second or later felony conviction results in
community supervision with conditions not currently in effect, under
the prior sentence or sentences of community supervision the court may
require that the conditions of community supervision contained in the
second or later sentence begin during the immediate term of community
supervision and continue throughout the duration of the consecutive
term of community supervision.
(3) Subject to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, whenever a
person is sentenced for a felony that was committed while the person
was not under sentence for conviction of a felony, the sentence shall
run concurrently with any felony sentence which has been imposed by any
court in this or another state or by a federal court subsequent to the
commission of the crime being sentenced unless the court pronouncing
the current sentence expressly orders that they be served
consecutively.
(4) Whenever any person granted probation under RCW 9.95.210 or
9.92.060, or both, has the probationary sentence revoked and a prison
sentence imposed, that sentence shall run consecutively to any sentence
imposed pursuant to this chapter, unless the court pronouncing the
subsequent sentence expressly orders that they be served concurrently.
(5) In the case of consecutive sentences, all periods of total
confinement shall be served before any partial confinement, community
restitution, community supervision, or any other requirement or
conditions of any of the sentences. Except for exceptional sentences
as authorized under RCW 9.94A.535, if two or more sentences that run
consecutively include periods of community supervision, the aggregate
of the community supervision period shall not exceed twenty-four
months.

--- END ---