BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
recognize that working farmland contributes to aquifer recharge and
that, as such, agricultural lands should not be penalized for
contributing to a problem that they help solve. Furthermore, it is the
intent of the legislature to keep lands in agricultural production and
protect the environment. Therefore, removing the authority to collect
the fees and charges as reflected in this act will assist citizens in
keeping productive farmland.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.89.080 and 2003 c 394 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, any county
legislative authority may provide by resolution for revenues by fixing
rates and charges for the furnishing of service to those served or
receiving benefits or to be served or to receive benefits from any
storm water control facility or contributing to an increase of surface
water runoff. In fixing rates and charges, the county legislative
authority may in its discretion consider:
(a) Services furnished or to be furnished;
(b) Benefits received or to be received;
(c) The character and use of land or its water runoff
characteristics;
(d) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW
24.03.490, of the land user;
(e) Income level of persons served or provided benefits under this
chapter, including senior citizens and ((disabled persons)) individuals
with disabilities; or
(f) Any other matters which present a reasonable difference as a
ground for distinction.
(2) The rate a county may charge under this section for storm water
control facilities shall be reduced by a minimum of ten percent for any
new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes a permissive
rainwater harvesting system. Rainwater harvesting systems shall be
properly sized to utilize the available roof surface of the building.
The jurisdiction shall consider rate reductions in excess of ten
percent dependent upon the amount of rainwater harvested.
(3) Rates and charges authorized under this section may not be
imposed on lands taxed as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW ((or)),
as timber land under chapter 84.34 RCW, or property that is at least
twenty-five percent operating farmland as defined in RCW 7.48.310.
(4) The service charges and rates collected shall be deposited in
a special fund or funds in the county treasury to be used only for the
purpose of paying all or any part of the cost and expense of
maintaining and operating storm water control facilities, all or any
part of the cost and expense of planning, designing, establishing,
acquiring, developing, constructing and improving any of such
facilities, or to pay or secure the payment of all or any portion of
any issue of general obligation or revenue bonds issued for such
purpose.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.94.140 and 2005 c 324 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every county, in the operation of a system of sewerage and/or
water, shall have full jurisdiction and authority to manage, regulate,
and control it. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
every county shall have full jurisdiction and authority to fix, alter,
regulate, and control the rates and charges for the service and
facilities to those to whom such service and facilities are available,
and to levy charges for connection to the system.
(2) The rates for availability of service and facilities, and
connection charges so charged must be uniform for the same class of
customers or service and facility. In classifying customers served,
service furnished or made available by such system of sewerage and/or
water, or the connection charges, the county legislative authority may
consider any or all of the following factors:
(a) The difference in cost of service to the various customers
within or without the area;
(b) The difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair and
replacement of the various parts of the systems;
(c) The different character of the service and facilities furnished
various customers;
(d) The quantity and quality of the sewage and/or water delivered
and the time of its delivery;
(e) Capital contributions made to the system or systems, including,
but not limited to, assessments;
(f) The cost of acquiring the system or portions of the system in
making system improvements necessary for the public health and safety;
(g) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW
24.03.490, of the land user; and
(h) Any other matters which present a reasonable difference as a
ground for distinction.
(3) The rate a county may charge under this section for storm or
surface water sewer systems or the portion of the rate allocable to the
storm or surface water sewer system of combined sanitary sewage and
storm or surface water sewer systems shall be reduced by a minimum of
ten percent for any new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes
a permissive rainwater harvesting system. Rainwater harvesting systems
shall be properly sized to utilize the available roof surface of the
building. The jurisdiction shall consider rate reductions in excess of
ten percent dependent upon the amount of rainwater harvested. A county
may not charge any fee relating to storm water control to landowners
with at least twenty-five percent of their land operating as farmland,
as defined in RCW 7.48.310.
(4) A county may provide assistance to aid low-income persons in
connection with services provided under this chapter.
(5) The service charges and rates shall produce revenues sufficient
to take care of the costs of maintenance and operation, revenue bond
and warrant interest and principal amortization requirements, and all
other charges necessary for the efficient and proper operation of the
system.
(6) A connection charge under this section for service to a
manufactured housing community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, applies to
an individual lot within that community only if the system of water or
sewerage provides and maintains the connection.

Sec. 4 RCW 86.15.160 and 2003 c 394 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter the supervisors may authorize:
(1) An annual excess ad valorem tax levy within any zone or
participating zones when authorized by the voters of the zone or
participating zones under RCW 84.52.052 and 84.52.054;
(2) An assessment upon property, including state property,
specially benefited by flood control improvements or storm water
control improvements imposed under chapter 86.09 RCW;
(3) Within any zone or participating zones an annual ad valorem
property tax levy of not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value when the levy will not take dollar rates that other
taxing districts may lawfully claim and that will not cause the
combined levies to exceed the constitutional and/or statutory
limitations, and the additional levy, or any portion thereof, may also
be made when dollar rates of other taxing units is released therefor by
agreement with the other taxing units from their authorized levies;
(4) A charge, under RCW 36.89.080, for the furnishing of service to
those who are receiving or will receive benefits from storm water
control facilities and who are contributing to an increase in surface
water runoff. Property that is at least twenty-five percent operating
farmland, as defined in RCW 7.48.310, is exempt from county storm water
charges. The rate or charge imposed under this section shall be
reduced by a minimum of ten percent for any new or remodeled commercial
building that utilizes a permissive rainwater harvesting system.
Rainwater harvesting systems shall be properly sized to utilize the
available roof surface of the building. The jurisdiction shall
consider rate reductions in excess of ten percent dependent upon the
amount of rainwater harvested;
(5) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 90.03.525, any public
entity and public property, including the state and state property,
shall be liable for the charges to the same extent a private person and
privately owned property is liable for the charges, and in setting
these rates and charges, consideration may be made of in-kind services,
such as stream improvements or donation of property;
(6) The creation of local improvement districts and utility local
improvement districts, the issuance of improvement district bonds and
warrants, and the imposition, collection, and enforcement of special
assessments on all property, including any state-owned or other
publicly-owned property, specially benefited from improvements in the
same manner as provided for counties by chapter 36.94 RCW.

--- END ---