BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Household incomes have not kept pace with rising housing costs
in many areas of the state and this imbalance creates a potential
competitive disadvantage for Washington state employers.
(2) Employers have an interest in assisting their employees obtain
and retain safe, decent, and affordable housing.
(3) It is in the public interest, and is consistent with the state
policies and goals of the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, to
offer a tax incentive to promote employer-assisted housing that enables
employees to obtain appropriate housing close to jobs and services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, a twenty-five
percent credit is allowed against the tax imposed under this chapter
for contributions made by a person ("employer") to the Washington state
housing finance commission employer-assisted housing program (the
"program"), as described in section 3 of this act.
(2) The employer must make the contribution to the Washington state
housing finance commission employer-assisted housing program before
claiming a credit authorized under this section. Credits earned under
this section may be claimed against taxes due for the calendar year in
which the contribution is made. The amount of credit claimed for a
reporting period may not exceed the tax otherwise due under this
chapter for that reporting period. No refunds may be granted for any
unused credits.
(3)(a) Only employers located in local jurisdictions with plans,
policies, or programs in place that promote and support affordable
housing are eligible to participate in the program and claim the credit
created in subsection (1) of this section. The Washington state
housing finance commission must certify that the local jurisdiction in
which an employer is located has such affordable housing plans,
policies, or programs, which could include:
(i) Specific affordable housing or homeless housing plans;
(ii) Incentive programs intended to encourage or facilitate
affordable housing development; or
(iii) Programs for the distribution of funds for affordable housing
development or preservation.
(b) The Washington state housing finance commission shall retain
records of such certifications for a minimum of ten years and provide
the records to the department upon request.
(4) If the primary business location of the employer is in a city
or town that imposes a business and occupation tax, as defined in RCW
35.102.030, an employer may claim a credit under this section only if
the city or town provides a twenty-five percent business and occupation
tax credit for contributions to the Washington state housing finance
commission employer-assisted housing program. The department must
certify that the city or town imposes a business and occupation tax and
provides the credit.
(5) An amount of credit otherwise allowable under this section not
claimed by the employer in any calendar year may be carried over and
claimed against the employer's tax liability for the next succeeding
calendar year; and any credit not used in that second succeeding
calendar year may be carried over and claimed against the employer's
tax liability for the third succeeding calendar year, but may not be
carried over for any calendar year thereafter.
(6) Credits are available on a first in-time basis. The department
must disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the
total amount of credits claimed statewide under this section during any
calendar year to exceed one million dollars. If the one million dollar
limitation is reached, the department must notify the commission and
all employers having claimed tax credits under this section to date
that the annual statewide limit has been met. In addition, the
department must provide written notice to any employer that has claimed
tax credits after the one million dollar limitation in this subsection
has been met. The notice must indicate the amount of tax due and must
provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from the date of such
notice. The department may not assess penalties and interest as
provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the initial notice
if the amount due is paid by the due date specified in the notice, or
any extension thereof.
(7) To claim a credit under this section, an employer must
electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any
other information required by the department, in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(8) The Washington state housing finance commission must provide to
the department, upon request, such information needed to verify
eligibility for credit under this section, including information
regarding contributions received by the commission for the program,
certifications as described in subsection (3) of this section, and
qualified housing benefits distributed by the commission.
(9) Credit may not be claimed under this section for contributions
to the program, if such contribution occurred before the effective date
of this act.
(10) Credit may not be claimed under this section for any
contributions to the program that occur on or after July 1, 2015.
(11) The department must issue an annual report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the amount of credits claimed by
employers under this section with the first report due December 31,
2008. The annual report must be issued in collaboration and
conjunction with the commission's report required in section 3 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.180 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is created within the Washington state housing finance
commission (the "commission") the employer-assisted housing program
(the "program"), through which the commission will assist Washington
employers in providing a qualified housing benefit to qualified
employees. An employer making a financial contribution to the
employer-assisted housing program may specifically designate that
qualified housing benefits be distributed to its own qualified
employees, to qualified employees of qualified beneficiary entities, or
to a combination of the two options, except as provided in subsection
(4) of this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Qualified employee" means an individual employed by an
employer contributing to the employer-assisted housing program or
employed by a designated qualified beneficiary entity, who has an
income of no more than one hundred twenty percent, or one hundred fifty
percent for high cost areas as defined by RCW 84.14.010, of either:
(i) The median family income, adjusted for household size, for the
county where the employee resides; or
(ii) The state median income.
(b) "Qualified beneficiary entity" means a nonprofit corporation
recognized by the Washington secretary of state, a school district,
city, town, county, fire district, public hospital, or state
university.
(c) "Qualified housing benefit" means specific services or forms of
financial assistance, which must be determined by each employer
contributing to the employer-assisted housing program in collaboration
with the commission, that are designed to assist qualified employees to
obtain and retain housing including:
(i) Home buyer education and counseling services;
(ii) Down payment assistance;
(iii) Closing cost assistance; and
(iv) Rental assistance, which is limited to one-time assistance.
(3) Qualified employees that apply to the commission for qualified
housing benefits are entitled to receive such benefits on a first in-time basis. The commission must verify that applicants are qualified
and thus eligible to receive benefits and must distribute housing
benefits to qualified employees.
(4) Moneys contributed by employers must be distributed as
qualified housing benefits to qualified employees within thirty-six
months. Each participating employer must designate, or by default
allow the commission to designate, at least one qualified beneficiary
entity whose employees shall receive qualified housing benefits should
employer contributions exceed the amount of qualified housing benefits
the commission is able to distribute to qualified employees of the
employer within a thirty-six-month period.
(5) The commission must maintain records of program activities for
a minimum of ten years and must report on program activities, outcomes,
and performance measures, as determined by the commission in
collaboration with the department of revenue and the joint legislative
audit and review committee, to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 31st of each year. Performance measures must
include measures to gauge program effectiveness, program efficiency,
and customer satisfaction. Other information to be reported upon by
the commission shall include:
(a) The number of employers and employees participating in the
program;
(b) The geographic distribution of program participants;
(c) The types of housing benefits distributed to employees; and
(d) The outcomes of housing benefit assistance received.
(6) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct
an evaluation of the employer-assisted housing program after thirty-six
months using performance measurement data as well as other information
supplied by the commission as well as information provided by the
employers and employees participating in the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The excise tax credit program for contributions to the employer-assisted housing program created in section 3 of this act shall be
terminated on July 1, 2015, as provided in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2016:
(1) RCW 82.04.--- and 2008 c . . . s 1 (section 1 of this act);
(2) RCW 82.04.--- and 2008 c . . . s 2 (section 2 of this act);
(3) RCW 43.180.--- and 2008 c . . . s 3 (section 3 of this act);
and
(4) Section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The Washington state housing finance
commission and the department of revenue shall provide the information
necessary for the joint legislative audit and review committee to
provide the required review. The Washington state housing finance
commission shall be the designated lead entity in regards to the sunset
termination.

--- END ---