BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The employment security department shall
conduct a study of options for suspending the waiting period
requirement for individuals who are unemployed because of an emergency
or disaster, and shall examine ways to mitigate the impacts, if any, of
these options on the unemployment compensation system. The employment
security department shall also forward information provided by the
military department about other means of providing assistance to
individuals impacted by an emergency or disaster. The employment
security department shall report on its study to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.

--- END ---