BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall provide technical assistance, including
the provision of conceptual designs and general engineering criteria,
in the assessment and selection of appropriate bank protection
techniques from the integrated streambank protection guidelines
developed by the department.
(2) The department shall identify appropriate bank protection
technologies from the integrated streambank protection guidelines among
which riparian landowners may choose from in order to protect their
property from flood damage. Each model bank stabilization method must
provide for adequate protection of fish life while providing for the
protection of riparian property from flood water.
(3) Each bank protection technique identified by the department
must include general engineering and design criteria as to its proper
use. This criteria may include information as to the project's
dimensions in relation to appropriate design flows, up to but not
exceeding a one hundred year flood level, how far before and after a
river bend the project must extend, the proper bank toe treatment, and
other criteria identified by the department as necessary for the
application of a particular model method.
(4) Of the bank protection techniques identified by the department
under this section, at least one must utilize only rock products, one
must utilize only woody debris or other organic material, and one must
utilize a combination of rock and woody material.
(5) In addition to the engineering details about the bank
protection techniques, the department must also provide comparative
information relating to the estimated materials and engineering cost to
the landowner for each technique.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes a landowner from engineering
a bank stabilization project not identified by the department under
this section as long as the project is completed in a manner consistent
with the requirements of this chapter.
(7) The integrated streambank protection guidelines are intended to
be an evolving document based on best available science and must be
updated on a regular basis, no less than once every five years, to
provide a source of best available science to aid landowners in the
selection and design of bank protection projects.

--- END ---