BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the education of
children who are deaf presents unique challenges because deafness is a
low-incidence disability significantly impacting the child's ability to
access communication at home, at school, and in the community. The
legislature further finds that over the past fifty years, there have
been numerous advances in technology as well as a growing awareness
about the importance of delivering services to children in a variety of
communication modalities to support their early and continued access to
communication. The legislature intends to enhance the coordination of
regionally delivered educational services and supports for children who
are deaf or hearing impaired and to promote the development of
communication-rich learning environments for these children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is established at Vancouver, Clark county, the Washington
state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss which shall be
housed at and shall include the school and related facilities formerly
known as the state school for the deaf. The center shall be under the
direction of the director and the board of trustees. The
superintendent and board of trustees of the state school for the deaf
as of the effective date of this section shall be the director and
board of trustees of the center.
(2) The center's primary functions shall be:
(a) Managing and supervising the state school for the deaf;
(b) Providing statewide leadership and support for the coordination
of regionally delivered educational services in the full range of
communication modalities, for children who are deaf or hearing
impaired; and
(c) Collaborating with appropriate public and private partners to
develop an applied research center for the training and professional
development of educators serving children who are deaf or hearing
impaired.

Sec. 3 RCW 72.40.010 and 2002 c 209 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There ((are)) is established at Vancouver, Clark county, a school
which shall be known as the state school for the blind((, and a
separate school which shall be known as the state school for the
deaf)). The primary purpose of the state school for the blind ((and
the state school for the deaf)) is to educate and train ((hearing and))
visually impaired children.
The school for the blind shall be under the direction of the
superintendent with the advice of the board of trustees. ((The school
for the deaf shall be under the direction of the superintendent and the
board of trustees.))

Sec. 4 RCW 72.40.019 and 1985 c 378 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The governor shall appoint a ((superintendent)) director for the
((state school for the deaf)) Washington state center for childhood
deafness and hearing loss. The ((superintendent)) director shall have
a masters or higher degree from an accredited college or university in
school administration or deaf education, five or more years of
experience teaching or providing habilitative services to deaf or hard
of hearing students ((in the classroom)), and three or more years
administrative or supervisory experience in programs for deaf or hard
of hearing students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 72.42 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties prescribed by law, the
director of the Washington state center for childhood deafness and
hearing loss:
(1) Shall be responsible for the supervision and management of the
center, including the state school for the deaf, and the property of
various kinds;
(2) Shall employ members of the faculty, administrative officers,
and other employees, who shall all be subject to chapter 41.06 RCW, the
state civil service law, unless specifically exempted by other
provisions of law;
(3) Shall provide technical assistance and support as appropriate
to local and regional efforts to build critical mass and
communication-rich networking opportunities for children who are deaf
or hearing impaired and their families;
(4) Shall establish the course of study including vocational
training and shall, in collaboration with the department of social and
health services, provide post-high school transition planning and
programming services to students who are deaf or hearing impaired, with
the assistance of the faculty and the approval of the board of
trustees;
(5) Shall, as approved by the board of trustees, control and
authorize the use of the facilities for night school, summer school,
public meetings, applied research and training for the instruction of
students who are deaf or hearing impaired, outreach and support to
families of children who are deaf or hearing impaired, or other
purposes consistent with the purposes of the center;
(6) Shall purchase all supplies and lease or purchase equipment and
other personal property needed for the operation or maintenance of the
center;
(7) Shall prepare, submit to the board of trustees for approval,
and administer the budget consistent with RCW 43.88.160 and the budget
and accounting act, chapter 43.88 RCW generally, as applicable;
(8) Shall provide technical assistance and support to educational
service districts for the regional delivery of a full range of
educational services to students who are deaf or hearing impaired,
including but not limited to services relying on American sign
language, auditory oral education, total communication, and signed
exact English;
(9) As requested by educational service districts, shall recruit,
employ, and deploy itinerant teachers to provide in-district services
to children who are deaf or hearing impaired;
(10) May establish criteria, in addition to state certification,
for the teachers at the school and employees of the center;
(11) May establish, with the approval of the board of trustees, new
facilities as needs demand;
(12) May adopt rules, under chapter 34.05 RCW, as approved by the
board of trustees and as deemed necessary for the governance,
management, and operation of the center;
(13) May adopt rules, as approved by the board of trustees, for
pedestrian and vehicular traffic on property owned, operated, and
maintained by the center;
(14) Except as otherwise provided by law, may enter into contracts
as the director deems essential to the purpose of the center;
(15) May receive gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests
of real or personal property from whatever source, as may be made from
time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and conditions
will aid in carrying out the programs of the center; sell, lease, or
exchange, invest, or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits,
and income thereof except as limited by the terms and conditions
thereof; and adopt rules to govern the receipt and expenditure of the
proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof;
(16) May adopt rules, as approved by the board of trustees,
providing for the transferability of employees between the center and
the school for the blind consistent with collective bargaining
agreements in effect; and
(17) May adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW, as approved by the
board of trustees, and perform all other acts not forbidden by law as
the director deems necessary or appropriate to the administration of
the center.

Sec. 6 RCW 72.40.024 and 2002 c 209 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the powers and duties under RCW 72.40.022 ((and
72.40.023)) and section 5 of this act, the superintendent of ((each))
the school for the blind and the director of the Washington state
center for childhood deafness and hearing loss shall:
(1) Monitor the location and educational placement of each student
reported to the superintendent((s)) and the director by the educational
service district superintendents;
(2) Provide information about educational programs, instructional
techniques, materials, equipment, and resources available to students
with visual or auditory impairments to the parent or guardian,
educational service district superintendent, and the superintendent of
the school district where the student resides; and
(3) Serve as a consultant to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, provide instructional leadership, and assist school
districts in improving their instructional programs for students with
visual or hearing impairments.

Sec. 7 RCW 72.40.028 and 2006 c 263 s 829 are each amended to
read as follows:
All teachers ((at the state school for the deaf)) employed by the
Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss and the
state school for the blind shall meet all certification requirements
and the programs shall meet all accreditation requirements and conform
to the standards defined by law or by rule of the Washington
professional educator standards board or the office of the state
superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent((s)) and the
director, by rule, may adopt additional educational standards for their
respective ((schools)) facilities. Salaries of all certificated
employees shall be set so as to conform to and be contemporary with
salaries paid to other certificated employees of similar background and
experience in the school district in which the program or facility is
located. The superintendent((s)) and the director may provide for
provisional certification for teachers in their respective ((schools))
facilities including certification for emergency, temporary,
substitute, or provisional duty.

Sec. 8 RCW 72.40.120 and 1991 c 65 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any appropriation for the ((school for the deaf)) Washington state
center for childhood deafness and hearing loss or the school for the
blind shall be made directly to the ((school for the deaf)) center or
the school for the blind.

Sec. 9 RCW 72.40.200 and 2000 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((state school for the deaf)) Washington state center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss and the state school for the blind
shall promote the personal safety of students and protect the children
who attend from child abuse and neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020.

Sec. 10 RCW 72.40.210 and 2000 c 125 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((superintendents)) director of the ((state school for the
deaf)) Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss
and the superintendent of the state school for the blind or their
designees shall immediately report to the persons indicated the
following events:
(1) To the child's parent, custodian, or guardian:
(a) The death of the child;
(b) Hospitalization of a child in attendance or residence at the
((school)) facility;
(c) Allegations of child abuse or neglect in which the parent's
child in attendance or residence at the ((school)) facility is the
alleged victim;
(d) Allegations of physical or sexual abuse in which the parent's
child in attendance or residence at the ((school)) facility is the
alleged perpetrator;
(e) Life-threatening illness;
(f) The attendance at the ((school)) facility of any child who is
a registered sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130 as permitted by RCW
4.24.550.
(2) Notification to the parent shall be made by the means most
likely to be received by the parent. If initial notification is made
by telephone, such notification shall be followed by notification in
writing within forty-eight hours after the initial ((oral)) verbal
contact is made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The state school for the deaf is hereby
abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred
to the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss.
All references to the superintendent or the state school for the deaf
in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the
director or the Washington state center for childhood deafness and
hearing loss.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the state school for
the deaf shall be delivered to the custody of the Washington state
center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. All cabinets,
furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the state school for the deaf shall be made
available to the Washington state center for childhood deafness and
hearing loss. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the state
school for the deaf shall be assigned to the Washington state center
for childhood deafness and hearing loss.
(b) Any appropriations made to the state school for the deaf shall,
on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to
the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the state school for the deaf are transferred
to the jurisdiction of the Washington state center for childhood
deafness and hearing loss. All employees classified under chapter
41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the Washington
state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss to perform their
usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the state school for
the deaf shall be continued and acted upon by the Washington state
center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. All existing contracts
and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by
the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the state school for the deaf shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

Sec. 12 RCW 72.40.031 and 1985 c 378 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
The school year for the state school for the blind and the
((state)) school ((for the deaf)) located at the Washington state
center for childhood deafness and hearing loss shall commence on the
first day of July of each year and shall terminate on the 30th day of
June of the succeeding year. The regular school term shall be for a
period of nine months and shall commence as near as reasonably
practical at the time of the commencement of regular terms in ((the))
other public schools, with the equivalent number of days as are now
required by law, and the regulations of the superintendent of public
instruction as now or hereafter amended, during the school year in
((the)) other public schools. The school and the center shall observe
all legal holidays, in the same manner as other agencies of state
government, and ((the schools)) will not be in session on such days and
such other days as may be approved by the ((respective))
superintendent((s)) or the director. During the period when the
school((s)) and the center are not in session during the regular school
term, the school((s)) and the center may be operated, subject to the
approval of the ((respective)) superintendent((s)) or the director, for
the instruction of students or for such other reasons which are in
furtherance of the objects and purposes of ((such schools)) the
respective facilities.

Sec. 13 RCW 72.42.010 and 2002 c 209 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intention of the legislature, in creating a board of
trustees for the ((state school for the deaf)) Washington state center
for childhood deafness and hearing loss to perform the duties set forth
in this chapter, that the board of trustees perform needed oversight
services to the governor and the legislature of the ((Washington state
school for the deaf)) center in the development of programs for the
hearing impaired, and in the operation of the ((Washington state))
center, including the school ((for the deaf)) located at the center.

Sec. 14 RCW 72.42.015 and 1985 c 378 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise as used in this
chapter "((superintendent)) director" means ((superintendent)) the
director of the Washington state ((school for the deaf)) center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss.

Sec. 15 RCW 72.42.016 and 2002 c 209 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this
chapter:
(1) "Center" means the Washington state center for childhood
deafness and hearing loss; and
(2) "School" means the ((Washington)) state school for the deaf
located at the center.

Sec. 16 RCW 72.42.021 and 2002 c 209 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of the center and the school shall be vested in
a board of trustees. The board shall consist of nine members appointed
by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The board shall be
composed of a resident from each of the state's congressional districts
and may include:
(a) One member who is deaf or hearing impaired;
(b) Two members who are experienced educational professionals;
(c) One member who is experienced in providing residential services
to youth; and
(d) One member who is the parent of a child who is deaf or hearing
impaired and who is receiving or has received educational services
related to deafness or hearing impairment from a public educational
institution.
(2) No voting trustee may be an employee of the school or the
center, a member of the board of directors of any school district, a
member of the governing board of any public or private educational
institution((, a school district or educational service district
administrator appointed after July 1, 1986,)) or an elected officer or
member of the legislative authority of any municipal corporation. No
more than two voting trustees may be school district or educational
service district administrators appointed after July 1, 1986.
(3) Trustees shall be appointed by the governor to serve a term of
five years, except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy
occurring prior to the expiration of a term shall be appointed within
sixty days of the vacancy and appointed only for the remainder of the
term. Of the initial members, three must be appointed for two-year
terms, three must be appointed for three-year terms, and the remainder
must be appointed for five-year terms.
(4) The board shall not be deemed unlawfully constituted and a
trustee shall not be deemed ineligible to serve the remainder of the
trustee's unexpired term on the board solely by reason of the
establishment of new or revised boundaries for congressional districts.
In such an event, each trustee may continue to serve in office for the
balance of the term for which he or she was appointed so long as the
trustee continues to reside within the boundaries of the congressional
district as they existed at the time of his or her appointment.
Vacancies which occur in a trustee position during the balance of any
term shall be filled pursuant to subsection (3) of this section by a
successor who resides within the boundaries of the congressional
district from which the member whose office was vacated was appointed
as they existed at the time of his or her appointment. At the
completion of such term, and thereafter, a successor shall be appointed
from the congressional district which corresponds in number with the
congressional district from which the incumbent was appointed.

Sec. 17 RCW 72.42.041 and 2002 c 209 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of trustees of the ((school)) center:
(1) Shall adopt rules and regulations for its own governance;
(2) Shall direct the development of, approve, and monitor the
enforcement of policies, rules, and regulations pertaining to the
((school)) center, including but not limited to:
(a) The use of classrooms and other facilities for summer or night
schools or for public meetings and any other uses consistent with the
mission of the center;
(b) Pedestrian and vehicular traffic on property owned, operated,
or maintained by the ((school)) center;
(c) Governance, management, and operation of the residential
facilities;
(d) Transferability of employees between the ((school for the
deaf)) center and the school for the blind consistent with collective
bargaining agreements in effect; and
(e) Compliance with state and federal education civil rights laws
at the school;
(3) Shall develop a process for recommending candidates for the
position of ((superintendent)) director and upon a vacancy shall submit
a list of three qualified candidates for ((superintendent)) director to
the governor;
(4) Shall submit an evaluation of the ((superintendent)) director
to the governor by July 1st of each odd-numbered year that includes a
recommendation regarding the retention of the ((superintendent))
director;
(5) May recommend to the governor at any time that the
((superintendent)) director be removed for conduct deemed by the board
to be detrimental to the interests of the ((school)) center;
(6) Shall prepare and submit by July 1st of each even-numbered year
a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature which contains a detailed summary of the ((school's))
center's progress on performance objectives and the ((school's))
center's work, facility conditions, and revenues and costs of the
((school)) center for the previous year and which contains those
recommendations it deems necessary and advisable for the governor and
the legislature to act on;
(7) Shall approve the ((school's)) center's budget and all funding
requests, both operating and capital, submitted to the governor;
(8) Shall direct and approve the development and implementation of
comprehensive programs of education, training, and as needed
residential living, such that students served by the ((school)) center
receive a challenging and quality education in a safe school
environment;
(9) Shall direct, monitor, and approve the implementation of a
comprehensive continuous quality improvement system for the ((school))
center;
(10) Shall monitor and inspect all existing facilities of the
((school)) center and report its findings in its biennial report to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature; and
(11) May grant to every student of the school located at the
center, upon graduation or completion of a program or course of study,
a suitable diploma, nonbaccalaureate degree, or certificate.

Sec. 18 RCW 72.40.022 and 2002 c 209 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties prescribed by law, the
superintendent of the state school for the blind:
(1) Shall have full control of the school and the property of
various kinds.
(2) May establish criteria, in addition to state certification, for
teachers at the school.
(3) Shall employ members of the faculty, administrative officers,
and other employees, who shall all be subject to chapter 41.06 RCW, the
state civil service law, unless specifically exempted by other
provisions of law.
(4) Shall establish the course of study including vocational
training, with the assistance of the faculty and the advice of the
board of trustees.
(5) May establish new facilities as needs demand.
(6) May adopt rules, under chapter 34.05 RCW, as deemed necessary
for the government, management, and operation of the housing
facilities.
(7) Shall control the use of the facilities and authorize the use
of the facilities for night school, summer school, public meetings, or
other purposes consistent with the purposes of the school.
(8) May adopt rules for pedestrian and vehicular traffic on
property owned, operated, and maintained by the school.
(9) Shall purchase all supplies and lease or purchase equipment and
other personal property needed for the operation or maintenance of the
school.
(10) Except as otherwise provided by law, may enter into contracts
as the superintendent deems essential to the purpose of the school.
(11) May receive gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests
of real or personal property from whatever source, as may be made from
time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and conditions
will aid in carrying out the programs of the school; sell, lease or
exchange, invest, or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits,
and income thereof except as limited by the terms and conditions
thereof; and adopt rules to govern the receipt and expenditure of the
proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof.
(12) May, except as otherwise provided by law, enter into contracts
the superintendent deems essential for the operation of the school.
(13) May adopt rules providing for the transferability of employees
between the ((school for the deaf)) Washington state center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss and the school for the blind
consistent with collective bargaining agreements in effect.
(14) Shall prepare and administer the school's budget consistent
with RCW 43.88.160 and the budget and accounting act, chapter 43.88 RCW
generally, as applicable.
(15) May adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other
acts not forbidden by law as the superintendent deems necessary or
appropriate to the administration of the school.

Sec. 19 RCW 72.40.070 and 1985 c 378 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty of each educational service district to make
a full and specific report of visually or hearing impaired youth to the
superintendent of the school for the blind or the ((school for the
deaf)) director of the Washington state center for childhood deafness
and hearing loss, as the case may be and the superintendent of public
instruction, annually. The superintendent of public instruction shall
report about the hearing or visually impaired youth to the school for
the blind and the ((school for the deaf)) Washington state center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss, as the case may be, annually.

Sec. 20 RCW 72.40.090 and 1993 c 147 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state school for
the blind and the ((school for the deaf)) Washington state center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss may arrange and provide for weekend
transportation to and from ((schools)) their respective facilities.
This transportation shall be at no cost to students and parents, as
allowed within the appropriations allocated to the ((schools))
facilities.

Sec. 21 RCW 72.40.220 and 2000 c 125 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((superintendents)) director of the ((state school for the
deaf)) Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss
and the superintendent of the state school for the blind shall maintain
in writing and implement behavior management policies and procedures
that accomplish the following:
(a) Support the child's appropriate social behavior, self-control,
and the rights of others;
(b) Foster dignity and self-respect for the child;
(c) Reflect the ages and developmental levels of children in care.
(2) The ((state school for the deaf)) Washington state center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss and the state school for the blind
shall use proactive, positive behavior support techniques to manage
potential child behavior problems. These techniques shall include but
not be limited to:
(a) Organization of the physical environment and staffing patterns
to reduce factors leading to behavior incidents;
(b) Intervention before behavior becomes disruptive, in the least
invasive and least restrictive manner available;
(c) Emphasis on verbal deescalation to calm the upset child;
(d) Redirection strategies to present the child with alternative
resolution choices.

Sec. 22 RCW 72.40.230 and 2000 c 125 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((state school for the deaf)) Washington state center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss and the state school for the blind
shall ensure that all staff, within two months of beginning employment,
complete a minimum of fifteen hours of job orientation which shall
include, but is not limited to, presentation of the standard operating
procedures manual for each ((school)) facility, describing all policies
and procedures specific to the ((school)) facility.
(2) The ((state school for the deaf)) Washington state center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss and the state school for the blind
shall ensure that all new staff receive thirty-two hours of job
specific training within ninety days of employment which shall include,
but is not limited to, promoting and protecting student personal
safety. All staff shall receive thirty-two hours of ongoing training
in these areas every two years.

Sec. 23 RCW 72.40.240 and 2000 c 125 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The residential program at the ((state school for the deaf))
Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss and the
state school for the blind shall employ residential staff in sufficient
numbers to ensure the physical and emotional needs of the residents are
met. Residential staff shall be on duty in sufficient numbers to
ensure the safety of the children residing there.
For purposes of this section, "residential staff" means staff in
charge of supervising the day-to-day living situation of the children
in the residential portion of the ((schools)) facilities.

Sec. 24 RCW 72.40.250 and 2000 c 125 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the powers and duties under RCW 72.40.022 and
72.40.024, the ((superintendents)) director of the ((state school for
the deaf)) Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing
loss and the superintendent of the state school for the blind shall:
(1) Develop written procedures for the supervision of employees and
volunteers who have the potential for contact with students. Such
procedures shall be designed to prevent child abuse and neglect by
providing for adequate supervision of such employees and volunteers,
taking into consideration such factors as the student population
served, architectural factors, and the size of the facility. Such
procedures shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:
(a) Staffing patterns and the rationale for such;
(b) Responsibilities of supervisors;
(c) The method by which staff and volunteers are made aware of the
identity of all supervisors, including designated on-site supervisors;
(d) Provision of written supervisory guidelines to employees and
volunteers;
(e) Periodic supervisory conferences for employees and volunteers;
and
(f) Written performance evaluations of staff to be conducted by
supervisors in a manner consistent with applicable provisions of the
civil service law.
(2) Develop written procedures for the protection of students when
there is reason to believe an incident has occurred which would render
a ((child)) minor student an abused or neglected child within the
meaning of RCW 26.44.020. Such procedures shall include, but need not
be limited to, the following:
(a) Investigation. Immediately upon notification that a report of
child abuse or neglect has been made to the department of social and
health services or a law enforcement agency, the superintendent or the
director shall:
(i) Preserve any potential evidence through such actions as
securing the area where suspected abuse or neglect occurred;
(ii) Obtain proper and prompt medical evaluation and treatment, as
needed, with documentation of any evidence of abuse or neglect; and
(iii) Provide necessary assistance to the department of social and
health services and local law enforcement in their investigations;
(b) Safety. Upon notification that a report of suspected child
abuse or neglect has been made to the department of social and health
services or a law enforcement agency, the superintendent or the
director or his or her designee, with consideration for causing as
little disruption as possible to the daily routines of the students,
shall evaluate the situation and immediately take appropriate action to
assure the health and safety of the students involved in the report and
of any other students similarly situated, and take such additional
action as is necessary to prevent future acts of abuse or neglect.
Such action may include:
(i) Consistent with federal and state law:
(A) Removing the alleged perpetrator from the school;
(B) Increasing the degree of supervision of the alleged
perpetrator; and
(C) Initiating appropriate disciplinary action against the alleged
perpetrator;
(ii) Provision of increased training and increased supervision to
volunteers and staff pertinent to the prevention and remediation of
abuse and neglect;
(iii) Temporary removal of the students from a program and
reassignment of the students within the school, as an emergency
measure, if it is determined that there is a risk to the health or
safety of such students in remaining in that program. Whenever a
student is removed, pursuant to this subsection (2)(b)(iii), from a
special education program or service specified in his or her
individualized education program, the action shall be reviewed in an
individualized education program meeting; and
(iv) Provision of counseling to the students involved in the report
or any other students, as appropriate;
(c) Corrective action plans. Upon receipt of the results of an
investigation by the department of social and health services pursuant
to a report of suspected child abuse or neglect, the superintendent or
the director, after consideration of any recommendations by the
department of social and health services for preventive and remedial
action, shall implement a written plan of action designed to assure the
continued health and safety of students and to provide for the
prevention of future acts of abuse or neglect.

Sec. 25 RCW 72.40.260 and 2000 c 125 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
In consideration of the needs and circumstances of the program, the
((state school for the deaf)) Washington state center for childhood
deafness and hearing loss and the state school for the blind shall
provide instruction to all students in techniques and procedures which
will enable the students to protect themselves from abuse and neglect.
Such instruction shall be described in a written plan to be submitted
to the board of trustees for review and approval, and shall be:
(1) Appropriate for the age, individual needs, and particular
circumstances of students, including the existence of mental, physical,
emotional, or sensory disabilities;
(2) Provided at different times throughout the year in a manner
which will ensure that all students receive such instruction; and
(3) Provided by individuals who possess appropriate knowledge and
training, documentation of which shall be maintained by the school.

Sec. 26 RCW 72.40.280 and 2002 c 208 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services must periodically
monitor the residential program at the ((state school for the deaf))
Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss,
including but not limited to examining the residential-related policies
and procedures as well as the residential facilities. The department
of social and health services must make recommendations to the
((school's superintendent)) center's director and the board of trustees
or its successor board on health and safety improvements related to
child safety and well-being. The department of social and health
services must conduct the monitoring reviews at least ((quarterly until
December 1, 2006)) annually. The center may from time to time request
technical assistance from the department of social and health services.
(2) The department of social and health services must conduct a
comprehensive child health and safety review, as defined in rule, of
the residential program at the ((state school for the deaf)) Washington
state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss every three years.
The department of social and health services must deliver the first
health and safety review to the governor, the legislature, the
((school's superintendent)) center's director, and the ((school's))
center's board of trustees or successor board by December 1, 2004.
(3) The ((state school for the deaf)) Washington state center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss must provide the department of
social and health services' staff with full and complete access to all
records and documents that the department staff may request to carry
out the requirements of this section. The department of social and
health services must have full and complete access to all students and
staff of the ((state school for the deaf)) Washington state center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss to conduct interviews to carry out
the requirements of this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the department of social and
health services must use the safety standards established in this
chapter when conducting the reviews.

Sec. 27 RCW 72.42.060 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 168 are each
amended to read as follows:
Each member of the board of trustees shall receive travel expenses
as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter
amended, and such payments shall be a proper charge to any funds
appropriated or allocated for the support of the ((state school for the
deaf)) Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss.

Sec. 28 RCW 26.44.210 and 2002 c 208 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department must investigate referrals of alleged child
abuse or neglect occurring at the ((state school for the deaf))
Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss,
including alleged incidents involving students abusing other students;
determine whether there is a finding of abuse or neglect; and determine
whether a referral to law enforcement is appropriate under this
chapter.
(2) The department must send a copy of the investigation report,
including the finding, regarding any incidents of alleged child abuse
or neglect at the ((state school for the deaf)) Washington state center
for childhood deafness and hearing loss to the ((school's
superintendent)) center's director. The department may include
recommendations to the ((superintendent)) director and the board of
trustees or its successor board for increasing the safety of the
school's students.

Sec. 29 RCW 28A.155.160 and 2007 c 115 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the department of early learning,
the Washington state ((school for the deaf)) center for childhood
deafness and hearing loss, the Washington state school for the blind,
school districts, educational service districts, and all other state
and local government educational agencies and the department of
services for the blind, the department of social and health services,
and all other state and local government agencies concerned with the
care, education, or habilitation or rehabilitation of children with
disabilities may enter into interagency cooperative agreements for the
purpose of providing assistive technology devices and services to
children with disabilities. Such arrangements may include but are not
limited to interagency agreements for the acquisition, including joint
funding, maintenance, loan, sale, lease, or transfer of assistive
technology devices and for the provision of assistive technology
services including but not limited to assistive technology assessments
and training.
For the purposes of this section, "assistive device" means any
item, piece of equipment, or product system, whether acquired
commercially off-the-shelf, modified, or customized, that is used to
increase, maintain, or improve functional capabilities of children with
disabilities. The term "assistive technology service" means any
service that directly assists a child with a disability in the
selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology device.
Assistive technology service includes:
(1) The evaluation of the needs of a child with a disability,
including a functional evaluation of the child in the child's customary
environment;
(2) Purchasing, leasing, or otherwise providing for the acquisition
of assistive technology devices by children with disabilities;
(3) Selecting, designing, fitting, customizing, adapting, applying,
retaining, repairing, or replacing of assistive technology devices;
(4) Coordinating and using other therapies, interventions, or
services with assistive technology devices, such as those associated
with existing education and rehabilitation plans and programs;
(5) Training or technical assistance for a child with a disability
or if appropriate, the child's family; and
(6) Training or technical assistance for professionals, including
individuals providing education and rehabilitation services, employers,
or other individuals who provide services to, employ, or are otherwise
substantially involved in the major life functions of children with
disabilities.

Sec. 30 RCW 28A.310.010 and 1988 c 65 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the intent and purpose of this chapter to establish
educational service districts as regional agencies which are intended
to:
(1) Provide cooperative and informational services to local school
districts;
(2) Assist the superintendent of public instruction and the state
board of education in the performance of their respective statutory or
constitutional duties; and
(3) Provide services to school districts and to the ((school for
the deaf)) Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing
loss and the school for the blind to assure equal educational
opportunities.

Sec. 31 RCW 28A.310.180 and 1990 c 33 s 276 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, every
educational service district board shall:
(1) Comply with rules or regulations of the state board of
education and the superintendent of public instruction.
(2) If the district board deems necessary, establish and operate
for the schools within the boundaries of the educational service
district a depository and distribution center for films, tapes, charts,
maps, and other instructional material as recommended by the school
district superintendents within the service area of the educational
service district: PROVIDED, That the district may also provide the
services of the depository and distribution center to private schools
within the district so long as such private schools pay such fees that
reflect actual costs for services and the use of instructional
materials as may be established by the educational service district
board.
(3) Establish cooperative service programs for school districts
within the educational service district and joint purchasing programs
for schools within the educational service district pursuant to RCW
28A.320.080(3): PROVIDED, That on matters relating to cooperative
service programs the board and superintendent of the educational
service district shall seek the prior advice of the superintendents of
local school districts within the educational service district.
(4) Establish direct student service programs for school districts
within the educational service district including pupil transportation.
However, for the provision of state-funded pupil transportation for
special education cooperatives programs for special education conducted
under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100, the educational service
district, with the consent of the participating school districts, shall
be entitled to receive directly state apportionment funds for that
purpose: PROVIDED, That the board of directors and superintendent of
a local school district request the educational service district to
perform said service or services: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
educational service district board of directors and superintendents
agree to provide the requested services: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
provisions of chapter 39.34 RCW are strictly adhered to: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the educational service district board of directors may
contract with the ((school for the deaf)) Washington state center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss and the school for the blind to
provide transportation services or other services necessary for the
regional delivery of educational services for children who are deaf or
hearing impaired.

Sec. 32 RCW 28A.310.200 and 2006 c 263 s 610 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, every
educational service district board shall:
(1) Approve the budgets of the educational service district in
accordance with the procedures provided for in this chapter;
(2) Meet regularly according to the schedule adopted at the
organization meeting and in special session upon the call of the chair
or a majority of the board;
(3) Approve the selection of educational service district personnel
and clerical staff as provided in RCW 28A.310.230;
(4) Fix the amount of and approve the bonds for those educational
service district employees designated by the board as being in need of
bonding;
(5) Keep in the educational service district office a full and
correct transcript of the boundaries of each school district within the
educational service district;
(6) Acquire by borrowing funds or by purchase, lease, devise,
bequest, and gift and otherwise contract for real and personal property
necessary for the operation of the educational service district and to
the execution of the duties of the board and superintendent thereof and
sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of that property not necessary for
district purposes. No real property shall be acquired or alienated
without the prior approval of the superintendent of public instruction
and the acquisition or alienation of all such property shall be subject
to such provisions as the superintendent may establish. When borrowing
funds for the purpose of acquiring property, the educational service
district board shall pledge as collateral the property to be acquired.
Borrowing shall be evidenced by a note or other instrument between the
district and the lender;
(7) Under RCW 28A.310.010, upon the written request of the board of
directors of a local school district or districts served by the
educational service district, the educational service district board of
directors may provide cooperative and informational services not in
conflict with other law that provide for the development and
implementation of programs, activities, services, or practices that
support the education of preschool through twelfth grade students in
the public schools or that support the effective, efficient, or safe
management and operation of the school district or districts served by
the educational service district;
(8) Adopt such bylaws and rules for its own operation as it deems
necessary or appropriate; and
(9) Enter into contracts, including contracts with common and
educational service districts and the ((school for the deaf))
Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss and the
school for the blind for the joint financing of cooperative service
programs conducted pursuant to RCW 28A.310.180(3), and employ
consultants and legal counsel relating to any of the duties, functions,
and powers of the educational service districts.

Sec. 33 RCW 28A.335.205 and 1997 c 104 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the Washington state school for
the blind, the Washington state ((school for the deaf)) center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss, school districts, educational
service districts, and all other state or local governmental agencies
concerned with education may loan, lease, sell, or transfer assistive
devices for the use and benefit of children with disabilities to
children with disabilities or their parents or to any other public or
private nonprofit agency providing services to or on behalf of
individuals with disabilities including but not limited to any agency
providing educational, health, or rehabilitation services. The notice
requirement in RCW 28A.335.180 does not apply to the loan, lease, sale,
or transfer of such assistive devices. The sale or transfer of such
devices is authorized under this section regardless of whether or not
the devices have been declared surplus. The sale or transfer shall be
recorded in an agreement between the parties and based upon the item's
depreciated value.
For the purposes of this section, "assistive device" means any
item, piece of equipment, or product system, whether acquired
commercially off-the-shelf, modified, or customized, that is used to
increase, maintain, or improve functional capabilities of children with
disabilities.
For the purpose of implementing this section, each educational
agency shall establish and maintain an inventory of assistive
technology devices in its possession that exceed one hundred dollars
and, for each such device, shall establish a value, which shall be
adjusted annually to reflect depreciation.
This section shall not enhance or diminish the obligation of school
districts to provide assistive technology to children with disabilities
where needed to achieve a free and appropriate public education and
equal opportunity in accessing academic and extracurricular activities.

Sec. 34 RCW 28A.400.303 and 2007 c 35 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School districts, educational service districts, the ((state
school for the deaf)) Washington state center for childhood deafness
and hearing loss, the state school for the blind, and their contractors
hiring employees who will have regularly scheduled unsupervised access
to children shall require a record check through the Washington state
patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through
43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050 and through the federal bureau of
investigation before hiring an employee. The record check shall
include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal
identification fingerprint card. The requesting entity shall provide
a copy of the record report to the applicant. When necessary,
applicants may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion of
the investigation. If the applicant has had a record check within the
previous two years, the district, the ((state school for the deaf))
Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the
state school for the blind, or contractor may waive the requirement.
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the district,
pursuant to chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW, the ((state school for the
deaf)) Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss,
the state school for the blind, or contractor hiring the employee shall
determine who shall pay costs associated with the record check.
(2) Federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools may use the
process in subsection (1) of this section to perform record checks for
their employees and applicants for employment.

Sec. 35 RCW 28A.400.305 and 2007 c 35 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules as
necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW on record check information. The
rules shall include, but not be limited to the following:
(1) Written procedures providing a school district, ((state school
for the deaf)) Washington state center for childhood deafness and
hearing loss, state school for the blind, or federal bureau of Indian
affairs-funded school employee or applicant for certification or
employment access to and review of information obtained based on the
record check required under RCW 28A.400.303; and
(2) Written procedures limiting access to the superintendent of
public instruction record check database to only those individuals
processing record check information at the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, the appropriate school district or districts,
the ((state school for the deaf)) Washington state center for childhood
deafness and hearing loss, the state school for the blind, the
appropriate educational service district or districts, and the
appropriate federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools.

Sec. 36 RCW 28A.600.420 and 1997 c 265 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any elementary or secondary school student who is determined to
have carried a firearm onto, or to have possessed a firearm on, public
elementary or secondary school premises, public school-provided
transportation, or areas of facilities while being used exclusively by
public schools, shall be expelled from school for not less than one
year under RCW 28A.600.010. The superintendent of the school district,
educational service district, ((state school for the deaf)) or state
school for the blind, or the director of the Washington state center
for childhood deafness and hearing loss, may modify the expulsion of a
student on a case-by-case basis.
(2) For purposes of this section, "firearm" means a firearm as
defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921, and a "firearm" as defined in RCW
9.41.010.
(3) This section shall be construed in a manner consistent with the
individuals with disabilities education act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1401 et
seq.
(4) Nothing in this section prevents a public school district,
educational service district, the ((state school for the deaf))
Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, or the
state school for the blind if it has expelled a student from such
student's regular school setting from providing educational services to
the student in an alternative setting.
(5) This section does not apply to:
(a) Any student while engaged in military education authorized by
school authorities in which rifles are used but not other firearms; or
(b) Any student while involved in a convention, showing,
demonstration, lecture, or firearms safety course authorized by school
authorities in which the rifles of collectors or instructors are
handled or displayed but not other firearms; or
(c) Any student while participating in a rifle competition
authorized by school authorities.
(6) A school district may suspend or expel a student for up to one
year subject to subsections (1), (3), (4), and (5) of this section, if
the student acts with malice as defined under RCW 9A.04.110 and
displays an instrument that appeared [appears] to be a firearm, on
public elementary or secondary school premises, public school-provided
transportation, or areas of facilities while being used exclusively by
public schools.

Sec. 37 RCW 41.40.088 and 2000 c 247 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A plan 1 member who is employed by a school district or
districts, an educational service district, the ((state school for the
deaf)) Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss,
the state school for the blind, institutions of higher education, or
community colleges:
(a) Shall receive a service credit month for each month of the
period from September through August of the following year if he or she
is employed in an eligible position, earns compensation earnable for
six hundred thirty hours or more during that period, and is employed
during nine months of that period, except that a member may not receive
credit for any period prior to the member's employment in an eligible
position;
(b) If a member in an eligible position does not meet the
requirements of (a) of this subsection, the member is entitled to a
service credit month for each month of the period he or she earns
earnable compensation for seventy or more hours; and the member is
entitled to a one-quarter service credit month for those calendar
months during which he or she earned compensation for less than seventy
hours.
(2) Except for any period prior to the member's employment in an
eligible position, a plan 2 or plan 3 member who is employed by a
school district or districts, an educational service district, the
state school for the blind, the ((state school for the deaf))
Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss,
institutions of higher education, or community colleges:
(a) Shall receive a service credit month for each month of the
period from September through August of the following year if he or she
is employed in an eligible position, earns compensation earnable for
eight hundred ten hours or more during that period, and is employed
during nine months of that period;
(b) If a member in an eligible position for each month of the
period from September through August of the following year does not
meet the hours requirements of (a) of this subsection, the member is
entitled to one-half service credit month for each month of the period
if he or she earns earnable compensation for at least six hundred
thirty hours but less than eight hundred ten hours during that period,
and is employed nine months of that period;
(c) In all other instances, a member in an eligible position is
entitled to service credit months as follows:
(i) One service credit month for each month in which compensation
is earned for ninety or more hours;
(ii) One-half service credit month for each month in which
compensation is earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety
hours; and
(iii) One-quarter service credit month for each month in which
compensation is earned for less than seventy hours;
(d) After August 31, 2000, school districts and educational service
districts will no longer be employers for the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 or plan 3.
(3) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

Sec. 38 RCW 70.198.020 and 2004 c 47 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established an advisory council in the department of
social and health services for the purpose of advancing the development
of a comprehensive and effective statewide system to provide prompt and
effective early interventions for children in the state who are deaf or
hard of hearing and their families.
(2) Members of the advisory council shall have training,
experience, or interest in hearing loss in children. Membership shall
include, but not be limited to, the following: Pediatricians;
audiologists; teachers of the deaf and hard of hearing; parents of
children who are deaf or hard of hearing; a representative from the
Washington state ((school for the deaf)) center for childhood deafness
and hearing loss; and representatives of the infant toddler early
intervention program in the department of social and health services,
the department of health, and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 (1) The director of the Washington state
center for childhood deafness and hearing loss shall convene an
advisory panel for the purpose of implementing in two educational
service districts a structured program for delivering education
services to children who are deaf and hearing impaired. The advisory
panel shall consist of the following persons:
(a) A representative from the Washington sensory disabilities
services program to be selected by the superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) A representative from the office of deaf and hard of hearing
services to be selected by the secretary of the department of social
and health services;
(c) One person representing educational service district
superintendents and one representing school district superintendents,
both of whom shall be selected by the Washington association of school
administrators;
(d) Four representatives selected by the governor, one from the
department of health, one from the department of early learning, and
two from nongovernmental entities providing educational services to
children who are deaf or hearing impaired, including at least one
provider of auditory oral educational services and at least one
provider of total educational services;
(e) Two parents of school-age children who are deaf or hearing
impaired, one of whom shall be selected by an organization representing
the educational interests of all children who are deaf or hearing
impaired without regard to any specific communication modality, and one
of whom shall be selected by the governor; and
(f) In addition to the director, one representative from the
Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss to be
selected by the board of trustees of the center.
(2) Selection of advisory panel members shall be completed not
later than May 1, 2008. The panel shall collectively establish a
meeting schedule to support completion of its work.
(3) The panel shall develop a structure and plan for implementing
regional education programs at two demonstration sites that:
(a) Are established within an educational service district and
managed through shared governance by the school districts within the
educational service districts;
(b) Collaborate and partner with, enhance, and avoid duplication of
existing and available services and programs, both public and private;
(c) Provide services at one or more central locations in the
educational service districts;
(d) Provide services to students in their resident districts,
including students with hearing impairments who may not qualify for
special education services;
(e) Include educational and transportation services for children,
consultation for teachers and staff, and outreach to families; and
(f) Support communication-rich learning environments and
instruction of students in the full spectrum of communication
modalities by qualified professionals, including American sign
language, auditory oral education, total communication, and signed
exact English.
(4) The panel shall jointly select and consult with two educational
service districts as the demonstration sites, one of which shall be in
eastern Washington. Not later than November 1, 2008, the panel shall
brief the legislature on its work and identify the resources and policy
changes essential for the implementation and operation of the
demonstration sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 RCW 72.40.023 (Superintendent of the state
school for the deaf -- Powers and duties) and 2002 c 209 s 3 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 Section 39 of this act expires January 1,
2009.

--- END ---