BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.42.005 and 2007 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The legislature finds that the health and safety of its
citizens, natural resources, and the environment are vital interests of
the state that must be protected to preserve the state's quality of
life. The legislature also finds that the state's economic well-being
is a vital interest that depends upon the development of fair,
accessible, and coordinated permitting and regulatory requirements that
ensure that the state not only protects public health and safety and
natural resources but also encourages appropriate activities that
stimulate growth and development. The legislature further finds that
Washington's permitting and regulatory programs have established strict
standards to protect public health and safety and the environment.
(2) The legislature also finds that, as the number of environmental
and land use laws and requirements have grown in Washington, so have
the number of permits required of business and government. The
increasing number of permits and permitting agencies has generated the
potential for conflict, overlap, and duplication among state, local,
and federal permitting and regulatory requirements.
(3) The legislature further finds that not all project proponents
require the same type of assistance. Proponents with small projects
may merely need information and assistance in starting the permitting
and application process, while intermediate-sized projects may require
more of a facilitated and periodically assisted permitting process, and
large complex projects may need extensive and more continuous
coordination among local, state, and federal agencies and tribal
governments.
(4) The legislature further finds that persons doing business in
Washington state should have access to clear and appropriate
information regarding regulations, permit requirements, and agency
rule-making processes.
(5) The legislature, therefore, finds that a range of assistance
and coordination options should be available to project proponents from
a state office independent of any local, state, or federal permit
agency. The legislature finds that citizens, businesses, and project
proponents should be provided with:
(a) A reliable and consolidated source of information concerning
federal, state, and local environmental and land use laws and
procedures that may apply to any given project;
(b) Facilitated interagency forums for discussion of significant
issues related to the multiple permitting processes if needed for some
project proponents; and
(c) Active coordination of all applicable regulatory and land use
permitting procedures if needed for some project proponents.
(6) The legislature declares that the purpose of this chapter is
to:
(a) Assure that citizens, businesses, and project proponents will
continue to be provided with vital information regarding environmental
and land use laws and with assistance in complying with environmental
and land use laws to promote understanding of these laws and to protect
public health and safety and the environment;
(b) Ensure that facilitation of project permit decisions by permit
agencies promotes both process efficiency and environmental protection;
(c) Allow for coordination of permit processing for large projects
upon project proponents' request and at project proponents' expense to
promote efficiency, ensure certainty, and avoid conflicts among permit
agencies; and
(d) Provide these services through an office independent of any
permit agency to ensure that any potential or perceived conflicts of
interest related to providing these services or making permit decisions
can be avoided.
(7) The legislature also declares that the purpose of this chapter
is to provide citizens of the state with access to information
regarding state regulations, permit requirements, and agency rule-making processes in Washington state.
(8))) The legislature finds that the health and safety of its
citizens and environment are of vital interest to the state's long-term
quality of life. The legislature also finds that Washington state is
a national leader in protecting its environment. Further, the
legislature finds that Washington has a vibrant and diverse economy
that is dependent on the state maintaining high environmental
standards. Further, the legislature finds that a complex and confusing
network of environmental and land use laws and business regulations can
create a burden on business.
(2) Therefore, the legislature finds that to best promote
accountability, timeliness, and predictability for citizens, business,
and state and local permitting agencies, it is necessary to provide
information and assistance on the regulatory process through the
creation of the office of regulatory assistance in the governor's
office.
(3) The office of regulatory assistance is created to work to
continually improve the function of environmental and business
regulatory processes by identifying conflicts and overlap in the
state's rules, statutes, and operational practices. The office of
regulatory assistance is also created to provide businesses with active
assistance for all permitting, licensing, and other regulatory
procedures required for completion of specific projects. Further, the
office of regulatory assistance is created to ensure that citizens,
businesses, and local governments have access to, and clear information
regarding, regulatory processes for permitting and business regulation,
including state rules, permit and license requirements, and agency
rule-making processes.
(4) The legislature declares that the purpose of this chapter is to
provide direction and practical resources for improving the regulatory
process and for assistance through regulatory processes on individual
projects in furtherance of the state's goals of governmental
transparency and accountability.
(5) The legislature intends that establishing an office of
regulatory assistance will provide these services without abrogating or
limiting the authority of any agency to make decisions on permits,
licenses, and regulatory requirements ((that it requires)) or ((any
rule-making)) agency ((to make decisions on regulations)) rule making.
The legislature therefore declares that the office of regulatory
assistance shall have authority to provide ((these)) services but shall
not have any authority to make decisions on permits.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.42.020 and 2007 c 94 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office shall operate on ((the principle that citizens of
the state of Washington should receive)) principles of accountability
and transparency with a goal of providing the following information
regarding permits to citizens and business:
(a) ((A date and time for a decision on a permit or regulatory
requirement)) The current average turnaround times from the date of
application to date of decision for the required permit, licenses, or
other necessary regulatory decisions, or the most relevant information
the agency can provide, for projects of a comparable size and
complexity;
(b) The information required for an agency to make a decision on a
permit or regulatory requirement, recognizing that changes in the
project or other circumstances may change the information required,
including the agency's best estimate of the number of times projects of
a similar size and complexity have been asked to clarify, improve, or
provide supplemental information before a decision, and the expected
agency response time; and
(c) An estimate of the maximum amount of costs in fees((,)) to be
paid to state agencies, the type of any necessary studies, ((or)) and
the timing of any expected public processes ((that will be incurred
by)) for the project ((proponent)).
(2) This section does not create an independent cause of action,
affect any existing cause of action, or establish time limits for
purposes of RCW 64.40.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.42.030 and 2007 c 94 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Director" means the director of the office of regulatory
assistance.
(2) "Office" means the office of regulatory assistance ((in the
office of financial management)) established in RCW 43.42.010.
(((2))) (3) "Permit" means any permit, certificate, use
authorization, or other form of governmental review or approval
required in order to construct, expand, or operate a project in the
state of Washington.
(((3))) (4) "Permit agency" means any state, local, or federal
agency authorized by law to issue permits.
(((4))) (5) "Project" means any activity, the conduct of which
requires a permit or permits from one or more permit agencies.
(((5))) (6) "Project proponent" means a citizen, business, or any
entity applying for or seeking a permit or permits in the state of
Washington.
(7) "Qualifying coordinated permit process project" means a
qualifying project as designated by the director that is not required
to use cost-reimbursement.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.42.010 and 2007 c 231 s 5 and 2007 c 94 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The office of regulatory assistance is created in the office of
financial management and shall be administered by the office of the
governor to help improve the regulatory system and assist citizens,
businesses, and project proponents.
(2) The governor shall appoint a director. The director may employ
a deputy director and a confidential secretary and such staff as are
necessary, or contract with another state agency pursuant to chapter
39.34 RCW for support in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.
(3) The office shall provide the following services:
(a) ((Maintain and furnish information as provided in RCW
43.42.040;
(b) Furnish facilitation as provided in RCW 43.42.050;
(c) Furnish coordination as provided in RCW 43.42.060;
(d) Coordinate cost reimbursement as provided in RCW 43.42.070;
(e) Work with governmental agencies to continue to develop a range
of permitting and regulatory assistance options for project proponents;
(f) Help)) Preapplication project scoping as provided in RCW
43.42.050;
(b) Facilitation as provided in RCW 43.42.060;
(c) Coordinated permit process as provided in section 7 of this
act;
(d) Helping local jurisdictions comply with the requirements of RCW
36.70B.080 by:
(i) Providing information about best practices and compliance with
the requirements of RCW 36.70B.080; and
(ii) Providing technical assistance in reducing the turnaround time
between submittal of an application for a development permit and the
issuance of the permit; and
(((g) Work to develop informal processes for dispute resolution
between agencies and permit proponents;
(h) Conduct customer surveys to evaluate its effectiveness; and
(i))) (e) Maintaining and furnishing information as provided in RCW
43.42.040.
(4) The office shall provide the following reports by ((June))
September 1, 2008, and biennially thereafter, to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature for public hearing:
(((i))) (a) A performance report((, based on the customer surveys
required in (h) of this subsection)) including:
(i) Information regarding use of the office's voluntary cost-reimbursement services as provided in RCW 43.42.070;
(ii) The number and type of projects where the office provided
services; and
(iii) The agencies involved on specific projects; and
(((ii))) (b) A report ((on)) with recommendations on system
improvements including recommendations regarding measurement of overall
system performance, any conflicts ((identified by the office in the
course of its duties)), overlaps, and inconsistencies arising from
differing statutory or regulatory authorities, roles and missions of
agencies, timing and sequencing of permitting and procedural
requirements, or otherwise, as identified by the office in the course
of its duties and how these were or could be resolved((; and
(iii) A report regarding negotiation and implementation of
voluntary cost-reimbursement agreements and use of outside independent
consultants under RCW 43.42.070, including the nature and amount of
work performed and implementation of requirements relating to costs)).
(((3))) (5) The office shall ensure the equitable delivery and
provision of assistance services, regardless of project type, scale,
fund source, or assistance request.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.42.050 and 2007 c 94 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((At the request of a project proponent, the office shall assist
the project proponent in determining what regulatory requirements,
processes, and permits apply to the project, as provided in this
section.
(1) The office shall assign a project facilitator who shall discuss
applicable regulatory requirements, permits, and processes with the
project proponent and explain the available options for obtaining
required permits and regulatory review.))
(1) Upon request of a project proponent, the office shall determine
the level of project scoping needed by the project proponent, taking
into consideration the complexity of the project.
(2) ((If the project proponent and the project facilitator agree
that the project would benefit from a project scoping, the project
facilitator shall conduct a project scoping with the project proponent
and the relevant permitting and regulatory agencies. The project
facilitator shall invite the participation of the relevant federal
agencies and tribal governments.))
(a) The purpose of the project scoping is to identify ((the))
relevant issues and information needs of the project proponent and
((the participating permit agencies regarding the project, share
perspectives, and jointly develop a strategy for the processing of
required permits by each participating permit agency)) permitting
agencies and to reach a common understanding regarding the process,
timing, and sequencing for obtaining applicable permits.
(b) The ((scoping)) extent of preapplication project scoping shall
consider the complexity, size, and needs for assistance of the project
and shall address as appropriate:
(i) The permits that are required for the project;
(ii) The permit application forms and other application
requirements of the participating permit agencies;
(iii) The specific information needs and issues of concern of each
participant and their significance;
(iv) Any statutory or regulatory conflicts that might arise from
the differing authorities and roles of the permit agencies;
(v) Any natural resources, including federal or state listed
species, that might be adversely affected by the project and might
cause an alteration of the project or require mitigation; and
(vi) The anticipated time required for permit decisions by each
participating permit agency, including the time required to determine
if the permit application is complete, to conduct environmental review,
and to review and process the application. In determining the
estimated time required, full consideration must be given to achieving
the greatest possible efficiencies through any concurrent studies and
any consolidated applications, hearings, and comment periods.
(c) The outcome of the project scoping shall be documented in
writing, furnished to the project proponent, and be made available to
the public.
(d) The project scoping shall be completed within sixty days of the
project proponent's request for a project scoping.
(e) Upon completion of the project scoping, the participating
permit agencies shall proceed under their respective authority. The
agencies are encouraged to remain in communication for purposes of
coordination until their final permit decisions are made.
(3) This section does not create an independent cause of action,
affect any existing cause of action, or establish time limits for
purposes of RCW 64.40.020.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.42.060 and 2007 c 94 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office may ((coordinate the processing by participating
permit agencies of permits required for a project,)) provide
facilitation services at the request of ((the)) a project proponent
regarding interjurisdictional permitting issues, project-related
conflict and dispute resolution, and as part of the coordinated permit
process. Facilitation may be provided through a cost-reimbursement
agreement as provided in ((subsection (3) of this section or with the
agreement of the project proponent as provided in subsection (4) of
this section)) RCW 43.42.070 or in section 7(10) of this act.
Facilitation may also be provided without cost-reimbursement as
determined by the director.
(2) The office shall assign a project ((coordinator)) facilitator
to perform any or all of the following functions, as specified by the
terms of a cost-reimbursement agreement under ((subsection (3) of this
section or an agreement under subsection (4) of this section)) RCW
43.42.070 or as designated by the director:
(a) Serve as the main point of contact for the project proponent;
(b) Conduct a project scoping as provided in RCW 43.42.050(2);
(c) Verify that the project proponent has all the information
needed to complete applications;
(d) ((Coordinate the permit processes of the permit agencies))
Provide facilitation services as a stand-alone event or as an element
of broader project facilitation for project assistance, interagency
coordination, or planning teams;
(e) ((Manage the)) Coordinate applicable administrative procedures
among participating agencies;
(f) Work to assure that timely permit decisions are made by the
permit agencies and maintain contact with the project proponent and the
permit agencies to help ensure adherence to schedules;
(g) Assist in resolving any conflict or inconsistency among permit
requirements and conditions; and
(h) Coordinate with relevant federal permit agencies and tribal
governments to the extent possible.
(((3) At the request of a project proponent and as provided in RCW
43.42.070, the project coordinator shall coordinate negotiations among
the project proponent, the office, and participating permit agencies to
enter into a cost reimbursement agreement and shall coordinate
implementation of the agreement, which shall govern coordination of
permit processing by the participating permit agencies.
(4) For industrial projects of statewide significance or if the
office determines that it is in the public interest to coordinate the
processing of permits for certain projects that are complex in scope,
require multiple permits, involve multiple jurisdictions, or involve a
significant number of affected parties, the office shall, upon the
proponent's request, enter into an agreement with the project proponent
and the participating permit agencies to coordinate the processing of
permits for the project. The office may limit the number of such
agreements according to the resources available to the office and the
permit agencies at the time.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At the request of a project proponent, the office shall assist
the project proponent in coordinating the permit process by determining
what regulatory requirements, processes, and permits may be required
for development and operation of the proposed project.
(2) A project proponent who requests the designation of a
coordinated permit process project through a cost-reimbursement
agreement or is designated as a qualifying coordinated permit process
project must provide the office with a description of the project. The
office may request any information from the project proponent that is
necessary to make the designation under this section, and may convene
a scoping meeting of the likely participating permit agencies.
(3) The office shall serve as the main point of contact for the
project proponent and participating permitting agencies with regard to
the coordinated permit process for the project and shall keep an
up-to-date project management log and schedule illustrating required
procedural steps in the permitting process, and highlighting
substantive issues as appropriate that must be resolved in order for
the project to move forward. In carrying out these responsibilities,
the office shall ensure that the project proponent has all the
information needed to apply for all the component permits that are
incorporated in the coordinated permit process for the project,
coordinate the review of those permits by the respective participating
permit agencies, facilitate so that timely permit decisions are made by
the participating permit agencies, and assist in resolving any conflict
or inconsistency among the permit requirements and conditions that are
to be imposed by the participating permit agencies with regard to the
project. The office shall keep in contact with the project proponent
as well as with other permit agencies in order to assist the process in
progressing as scheduled. The office shall also make contact, at least
once, with any local, tribal, or federal jurisdiction that is
responsible for issuing a permit for the project and may invite them to
participate in the coordinated permit process or to receive periodic
updates in the project.
(4) Within thirty days, or longer with agreement of the project
proponent, of the date that the office designates a qualifying
coordinated permit process project or enters into a cost-reimbursement
agreement for a coordinated permit process project, it shall convene a
meeting with the project proponent for the project and the
participating permit agencies. Additional meetings for updates,
debriefings, or revisions of the coordinated permit process schedule
must be convened within twenty-one days of a permit decision or at
least once every nine months unless the meetings are waived by the
project proponent. The meeting agenda shall include at least the
development of a coordinated permit process schedule to address the
following:
(a) Review of the permits that are required for the project;
(b) A review of the permit application forms and other application
requirements of the agencies that are participating in the coordinated
permit process;
(c)(i) An estimation of the timelines that will be used by the
office and each participating permit agency to make permit decisions,
including the estimated time periods required to determine if the
permit applications are complete; and to review or respond to each
application or submittal of new information, including the estimated
number of revision cycles. In the development of this timeline, full
attention shall be given to achieving the maximum efficiencies possible
through concurrent studies and consolidated applications, hearings, and
comment periods. Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, the
timelines established under this subsection, with the assent of the
office and each participating permit agency, shall commit the office
and each participating permit agency to act on the component permit
within time periods that are different than those required by other
applicable provisions of law;
(ii) An accelerated time period for the consideration of a permit
application may not be set if that accelerated time period would be
inconsistent with, or in conflict with, any time period or series of
time periods set by statute for that consideration, or with any
statute, rule, or regulation, or adopted state policy, standard, or
guideline that requires any of the following:
(A) Other agencies, interested persons, federally recognized Indian
tribes, or the public to be given adequate notice of the application;
(B) Other agencies to be given a role in, or be allowed to
participate in, the decision to approve or disapprove the application;
or
(C) Interested persons or the public to be provided the opportunity
to challenge, comment on, or otherwise voice their concerns regarding
the application;
(d) Available information regarding the timing of any public
hearings that are required to issue permits for the project and a
determination of the feasibility of coordinating or consolidating any
of those required public hearings; and
(e) A discussion of fee arrangements for the coordinated permit
process, including an estimate of the costs allowed by statute, any
reimbursable agency costs, and the billing schedule.
(5) Each agency shall send at least one representative qualified to
discuss the applicability and timelines associated with all permits
administered by that agency or jurisdiction. At the request of the
project proponent, the office shall notify any relevant local or
federal agency or federally recognized Indian tribe of the date of the
meeting and invite that agency's participation in the process.
(6) If a permit agency or the project proponent foresees, at any
time, that it will be unable to meet the estimated timelines or other
obligations under the agreement, it shall notify the office of the
reasons for the problem and offer potential solutions or an amended
timeline for resolving the problem. The office shall notify the
participating permit agencies and the project proponent and, upon
agreement of all parties, adjust the schedule, or, if necessary,
schedule another work plan meeting.
(7) The office may request any information from the project
proponent that is necessary to comply with its obligations under this
section, consistent with the timelines set under this section.
(8) A summary of the decisions made under this section shall be
made available for public review upon the filing of the coordinated
permit process application or permit applications.
(9) The project proponent may withdraw from the coordinated permit
process by submitting to the office a written request that the process
be terminated. Upon receipt of the request, the office shall notify
each participating permit agency that a coordinated permit process is
no longer applicable to the project.
(10) For industrial projects of statewide significance, essential
public facilities as provided in chapter 36.70A RCW, or if the director
determines that it is in the public interest to coordinate and
facilitate the processing of permits for certain projects, the office
shall, upon the proponent's request, enter into an agreement with the
project proponent to provide such services according to the resources
available to the office and the permit agencies at the time.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.42.070 and 2007 c 94 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office may ((coordinate negotiation and implementation of
a written agreement among the)) enter into cost-reimbursement
agreements with a project proponent((, the office, and participating
permit agencies)) to recover from the project proponent the reasonable
costs incurred by the office in carrying out the provisions of RCW
43.42.050(2) and 43.42.060(2) ((and by participating)). The agreement
shall include the permit agencies ((in)) that are participating in the
cost-reimbursement project and carrying out permit processing tasks
specified in the agreement.
(2) ((The office may coordinate negotiation and implementation of
a written agreement among the project proponent, the office, and
participating permit agencies to recover from the project proponent the
reasonable costs incurred by outside independent consultants selected
by the office and participating permit agencies to perform permit
processing tasks.
(3) Outside independent consultants may only bill for the costs of
performing those permit processing tasks that are specified in a cost-
reimbursement agreement under this section. The billing process shall
provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing
cycle that provides for progress payments.
(4))) The office shall adopt a policy to coordinate cost-reimbursement agreements with outside independent consultants.
((Cost-reimbursement agreements coordinated)) The office shall develop
guidelines to ensure that, in developing cost-reimbursement agreements,
conflicts of interest are eliminated. Contracts with independent
consultants hired by the office under this section must be based on
competitive bids that are awarded for each agreement from a
prequalified consultant roster.
(((5) Independent consultants hired under a cost-reimbursement
agreement shall report directly to the permit agency. The office shall
assure that final decisions are made by the permit agency and not by
the consultant.
(6) The office shall develop procedures for determining,
collecting, and distributing cost reimbursement for carrying out the
provisions of this chapter.
(7) For a cost-reimbursement agreement, the office and
participating permit agencies shall negotiate a work plan and schedule
for reimbursement. Prior to distributing scheduled reimbursement to
the agencies, the office shall verify that the agencies have met the
obligations contained in their work plan.
(8) Prior to commencing negotiations with the project proponent for
a cost-reimbursement agreement, the office shall request work load
analyses from each participating permitting agency. These analyses
shall be available to the public. The work load of a participating
permit agency may only be modified with the concurrence of the agency
and if there is both good cause to do so and no significant impact on
environmental review.
(9) The office shall develop guidance to ensure that, in developing
cost-reimbursement agreements, conflicts of interest are eliminated.
(10))) (3) For project permit processes that it coordinates, the
office shall coordinate the negotiation of all cost-reimbursement
agreements executed under RCW 43.21A.690, 43.30.490, 43.70.630,
43.300.080, and 70.94.085. The office, proponent, and the permit
agencies shall be signatories to the agreements. Each permit agency
shall manage performance of its portion of the agreement. Independent
consultants hired under a cost-reimbursement agreement shall report
directly to the permit agency. The office shall assure that final
decisions are made by the permit agency and not by the consultant.
(((11))) (4) For a coordinated cost-reimbursement agreement, the
office and participating permit agencies shall negotiate a work plan
and schedule for reimbursement. Before distributing scheduled
reimbursement to the agencies, the office shall verify that the
agencies have met the obligations contained in their work plan. The
cost-reimbursement agreement shall identify the specific tasks of each
agency and costs for work conducted under the agreement. The agreement
must include a schedule that states:
(a) The estimated number of weeks for initial review of the permit
application for comparable projects;
(b) The anticipated number of revision cycles;
(c) The estimated number of weeks for review of subsequent revision
submittals;
(d) The estimated number of billable hours of employee time;
(e) The rate per hour; and
(f) A date for revision of the agreement if necessary.
(5) If a permit agency or the project proponent foresees, at any
time, that it will be unable to meet its obligations under the cost-reimbursement agreement, it shall notify the office and state the
reasons, along with proposals for resolving the problems and
potentially amending the timelines. The office shall notify the
participating permit agencies and the project proponent and, upon
agreement of all parties, adjust the schedule, or, if necessary,
coordinate revision of the work plan.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.21A.690 and 2007 c 94 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant or project proponent to recover from
the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred by the
department in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as
the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing.
(2) The cost-reimbursement agreement shall identify the specific
tasks((,)) and costs((, and schedule)) for work to be conducted under
the agreement. The agreement must include a schedule that states:
(a) The estimated number of weeks for initial review of the permit
application;
(b) The estimated number of revision cycles;
(c) The estimated number of weeks for review of subsequent revision
submittals;
(d) The estimated number of billable hours of employee time;
(e) The rate per hour; and
(f) A date for revision of the agreement if necessary.
(((2))) (3) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be
negotiated with the permit applicant or project proponent. Under the
provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant
shall be used by the department to contract with an independent
consultant to carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement
agreement. The department may also use funds provided under a cost-reimbursement agreement to hire temporary employees, to assign current
staff to review the work of the consultant, to provide necessary
technical assistance when an independent consultant with comparable
technical skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable and
necessary direct and indirect costs that arise from processing the
permit. The department shall, in developing the agreement, ensure that
final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the agency and
not by the consultant. The department shall make an estimate of the
number of permanent staff hours to process the permits, and shall
contract with consultants or hire temporary employees to replace the
time and functions committed by these permanent staff to the project.
The billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting
and may include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments.
((Use of cost-reimbursement agreements shall not reduce the current
level of staff available to work on permits not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The department may not use any funds under
a cost-reimbursement agreement to replace or supplant existing
funding.))
(4) The cost-reimbursement agreement must not negatively impact the
processing of other permit applications. In order to maintain permit
processing capacity, the agency may hire outside consultants, temporary
employees, or make internal administrative changes. Consultants or
temporary employees hired as part of a cost-reimbursement agreement or
to maintain agency capacity are hired as agents of the state not of the
permit applicant. The restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any
cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a
cost-reimbursement agreement.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.30.490 and 2007 c 188 s 1 and 2007 c 94 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit or lease applicant or project proponent to
recover from the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred
by the department in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as
well as the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to
permit coordination, environmental review, application review,
technical studies, establishment of development units and approval or
establishment of pooling agreements under chapter 78.52 RCW, including
necessary technical studies, permit or lease processing, and monitoring
for permit compliance.
(2) The cost-reimbursement agreement shall identify the specific
tasks((,)) and costs((, and schedule)) for work to be conducted under
the agreement. The agreement must include a schedule that states:
(a) The estimated number of weeks for initial review of the permit
application;
(b) The estimated number of revision cycles;
(c) The estimated number of weeks for review of subsequent revision
submittals;
(d) The estimated number of billable hours of employee time;
(e) The rate per hour; and
(f) A date for revision of the agreement if necessary.
(((2))) (3) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be
negotiated with the permit or lease applicant or project proponent.
Under the provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the
applicant or proponent shall be used by the department to contract with
an independent consultant to carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The department may also use funds provided
under a cost-reimbursement agreement to hire temporary employees, to
assign current staff to review the work of the consultant, to provide
necessary technical assistance when an independent consultant with
comparable technical skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable
and necessary direct and indirect costs that arise from processing the
permit or lease. The department shall, in developing the agreement,
ensure that final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the
agency and not by the consultant. The department shall make an
estimate of the number of permanent staff hours to process the permits
or leases, and shall contract with consultants or hire temporary
employees to replace the time and functions committed by these
permanent staff to the project. The billing process shall provide for
accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing cycle that
provides for progress payments. ((Use of cost-reimbursement agreements
shall not reduce the current level of staff available to work on
permits or leases not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The
department may not use any funds under a cost-reimbursement agreement
to replace or supplant existing funding.))
(4) The cost-reimbursement agreement must not negatively impact the
processing of other permit applications. In order to maintain permit
processing capacity, the agency may hire outside consultants, temporary
employees, or make internal administrative changes. Consultants or
temporary employees hired as part of a cost-reimbursement agreement or
to maintain agency capacity are hired as agents of the state not of the
permit applicant. The restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any
cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a
cost-reimbursement agreement.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.70.630 and 2007 c 94 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant or project proponent to recover from
the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred by the
department in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as
the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing.
(2) The cost-reimbursement agreement shall identify the specific
tasks((,)) and costs((, and schedule)) for work to be conducted under
the agreement. The agreement must include a schedule that states:
(a) The estimated number of weeks for initial review of the permit
application;
(b) The estimated number of revision cycles;
(c) The estimated number of weeks for review of subsequent revision
submittals;
(d) The estimated number of billable hours of employee time;
(e) The rate per hour; and
(f) A date for revision of the agreement if necessary.
(((2))) (3) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be
negotiated with the permit applicant or project proponent. Under the
provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant
or proponent shall be used by the department to contract with an
independent consultant to carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The department may also use funds provided
under a cost-reimbursement agreement to hire temporary employees, to
assign current staff to review the work of the consultant, to provide
necessary technical assistance when an independent consultant with
comparable technical skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable
and necessary direct and indirect costs that arise from processing the
permit. The department shall, in developing the agreement, ensure that
final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the agency and
not by the consultant. The department shall make an estimate of the
number of permanent staff hours to process the permits, and shall
contract with consultants or hire temporary employees to replace the
time and functions committed by these permanent staff to the project.
The billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting
and may include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments.
((Use of cost-reimbursement agreements shall not reduce the current
level of staff available to work on permits not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The department may not use any funds under
a cost-reimbursement agreement to replace or supplant existing
funding.))
(4) The cost-reimbursement agreement must not negatively impact the
processing of other permit applications. In order to maintain permit
processing capacity, the agency may hire outside consultants, temporary
employees, or make internal administrative changes. Consultants or
temporary employees hired as part of a cost-reimbursement agreement or
to maintain agency capacity are hired as agents of the state not of the
permit applicant. The restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any
cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a
cost-reimbursement agreement.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.300.080 and 2007 c 94 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant or project proponent to recover from
the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred by the
department in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as
the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing.
(2) The cost-reimbursement agreement shall identify the specific
tasks((,)) and costs((, and schedule)) for work to be conducted under
the agreement. The agreement must include a schedule that states:
(a) The estimated number of weeks for initial review of the permit
application;
(b) The estimated number of revision cycles;
(c) The estimated number of weeks for review of subsequent revision
submittals;
(d) The estimated number of billable hours of employee time;
(e) The rate per hour; and
(f) A date for revision of the agreement if necessary.
(((2))) (3) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be
negotiated with the permit applicant or project proponent. Under the
provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant
shall be used by the department to contract with an independent
consultant to carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement
agreement. The department may also use funds provided under a cost-reimbursement agreement to hire temporary employees, to assign current
staff to review the work of the consultant, to provide necessary
technical assistance when an independent consultant with comparable
technical skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable and
necessary direct and indirect costs that arise from processing the
permit. The department shall, in developing the agreement, ensure that
final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the agency and
not by the consultant. The department shall make an estimate of the
number of permanent staff hours to process the permits, and shall
contract with consultants or hire temporary employees to replace the
time and functions committed by these permanent staff to the project.
The billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting
and may include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments.
((Use of cost-reimbursement agreements shall not reduce the current
level of staff available to work on permits not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The department may not use any funds under
a cost-reimbursement agreement to replace or supplant existing
funding.))
(4) The cost-reimbursement agreement must not negatively impact the
processing of other permit applications. In order to maintain permit
processing capacity, the agency may hire outside consultants, temporary
employees, or make internal administrative changes. Consultants or
temporary employees hired as part of a cost-reimbursement agreement or
to maintain agency capacity are hired as agents of the state not of the
permit applicant. The restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any
cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a
cost-reimbursement agreement.

Sec. 13 RCW 70.94.085 and 2007 c 94 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An authority may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant or project proponent to recover from
the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred by the
authority in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as
the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing.
(2) The cost-reimbursement agreement shall identify the specific
tasks((,)) and costs((, and schedule)) for work to be conducted under
the agreement. The agreement must include a schedule that states:
(a) The estimated number of weeks for initial review of the permit
application;
(b) The estimated number of revision cycles;
(c) The estimated number of weeks for review of subsequent revision
submittals;
(d) The estimated number of billable hours of employee time;
(e) The rate per hour; and
(f) A date for revision of the agreement if necessary.
(((2))) (3) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be
negotiated with the permit applicant or project proponent. Under the
provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant
or proponent shall be used by the air pollution control authority to
contract with an independent consultant to carry out the work covered
by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The air pollution control
authority may also use funds provided under a cost-reimbursement
agreement to hire temporary employees, to assign current staff to
review the work of the consultant, to provide necessary technical
assistance when an independent consultant with comparable technical
skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable and necessary direct
and indirect costs that arise from processing the permit. The air
pollution control authority shall, in developing the agreement, ensure
that final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the agency
and not by the consultant. The air pollution control authority shall
make an estimate of the number of permanent staff hours to process the
permits, and shall contract with consultants or hire temporary
employees to replace the time and functions committed by these
permanent staff to the project. The billing process shall provide for
accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing cycle that
provides for progress payments. ((Use of cost-reimbursement agreements
shall not reduce the current level of staff available to work on
permits not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The air
pollution control authority may not use any funds under a cost-reimbursement agreement to replace or supplant existing funding.))
(4) The cost-reimbursement agreement must not negatively impact the
processing of other permit applications. In order to maintain permit
processing capacity, the agency may hire outside consultants, temporary
employees, or make internal administrative changes. Consultants or
temporary employees hired as part of a cost-reimbursement agreement or
to maintain agency capacity are hired as agents of the state not of the
permit applicant. The provisions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any
cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a
cost-reimbursement agreement. Members of the air pollution control
authority's board of directors shall be considered as state officers,
and employees of the air pollution control authority shall be
considered as state employees, for the sole purpose of applying the
restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 43.42 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter shall not be construed to limit or abridge the powers
and duties granted to a participating permit agency under the law that
authorizes or requires the agency to issue a permit for a project.
Each participating permit agency shall retain its authority to make all
decisions on all nonprocedural matters with regard to the respective
component permit that is within its scope of its responsibility
including, but not limited to, the determination of permit application
completeness, permit approval or approval with conditions, or permit
denial. The office may not substitute its judgment for that of a
participating permit agency on any such nonprocedural matters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---