BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds a particular
challenge for English language learner students who enter Washington
public schools at the middle and high school levels. More than eighty-five percent of high school students in the transitional bilingual
program have language scores showing no or very limited English
proficiency. When the Washington assessment of student learning was
initiated in 1998, only seven percent of English language learner
students could meet the tenth grade standard. In 2007, thirty-eight
percent of tenth grade English language learner students met the
standard in reading and writing. This improvement indicates that
schools are making progress in providing these students with academic
instruction to meet the state's reading and writing standards.
However, it remains unrealistic to expect that sufficient numbers of
high school English language learner students will meet the state's
reading and writing standards over the next five years to warrant
imposing the same graduation requirement on them as for native English
speakers. The state's middle and high school teachers need additional
time to identify and implement additional instructional strategies that
enable older English language learners to acquire language skills
quickly.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to acknowledge that high
school English language learner students enter school from a different
starting point academically than native English speakers. Until the
public schools have implemented strategies to make up the academic gap
for these students while they are in high school, different high school
graduation requirements should apply.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.0611 and 2007 c 354 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008 and through no
later than the graduating class of 2012, students may graduate from
high school without earning a certificate of academic achievement or a
certificate of individual achievement if they:
(a) Have not successfully met the mathematics standard on the high
school Washington assessment of student learning, an approved objective
alternative assessment, or an alternate assessment developed for
eligible special education students;
(b) Have successfully met the state standard in the other content
areas required for a certificate under RCW 28A.655.061 or 28A.155.045;
(c) Have met all other state and school district graduation
requirements; and
(d)(i) For the graduating class of 2008, successfully earn one
additional high school mathematics credit or career and technical
course equivalent, including courses offered at skill centers, after
the student's eleventh grade year intended to increase the student's
mathematics proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the mathematics
standards assessed on the high school Washington assessment of student
learning and continue to take the appropriate mathematics assessment at
least once annually until graduation; and
(ii) For the remaining graduating classes under this section,
successfully earn two additional mathematics credits or career and
technical course equivalent, including courses offered at skill
centers, after the student's tenth grade year intended to increase the
student's mathematics proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the
mathematics standards assessed on the high school Washington assessment
of student learning and continue to take the appropriate mathematics
assessment at least once annually until graduation.
(2) The state board of education may adopt a rule that ends the
application of subsection (1) of this section with a graduating class
before the graduating class of 2012, if the state board of education
adopts the rule by September 1st of the freshman school year of the
graduating class to which the provisions of this section no longer
apply. The state board of education's authority under this section
does not alter the requirement that any change in performance standards
for the tenth grade assessment must comply with RCW 28A.305.130.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008 and through the
graduating class of 2012, English language learner students may
graduate from high school without earning a certificate of academic
achievement or a certificate of individual achievement if they:
(a) Have not achieved a sufficient score on the Washington language
proficiency test to exit the transitional bilingual program;
(b) Have not successfully met the reading or writing standard on
the high school Washington assessment of student learning, an approved
objective alternative assessment, or an alternate assessment developed
for eligible special education students;
(c) Have met all other state and school district graduation
requirements, including the requirements under subsection (1) of this
section if applicable; and
(d)(i) For the graduating class of 2009, successfully earn one
additional high school English language arts credit or career and
technical course equivalent, including courses offered at skill
centers, after the student's eleventh grade year intended to increase
the student's proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the reading and
writing standards assessed on the high school Washington assessment of
student learning and continue to take the appropriate assessment at
least once annually until graduation; and
(ii) For the graduating classes of 2010 through 2012, successfully
earn two additional English language arts credits or career and
technical course equivalent, including courses offered at skill
centers, after the student's tenth grade year intended to increase the
student's proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the reading and
writing standards assessed on the high school Washington assessment of
student learning and continue to take the appropriate assessment at
least once annually until graduation.
(4) This section expires August 31, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---