BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.315.195 and 2006 c 263 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A proposed change in school district organization by transfer
of territory from one school district to another may be initiated by a
petition in writing presented to the educational service district
superintendent:
(a) Signed by at least fifty percent plus one of the active
registered voters residing in the territory proposed to be transferred;
or
(b) Signed by a majority of the members of the board of directors
of one of the districts affected by a proposed transfer of territory
and providing documentation that, before signing the petition, the
board of directors took the following actions:
(i) Communicated the proposed transfer to the board of directors of
the affected district or districts and provided an opportunity for the
board of the affected district or districts to respond;
(ii) Communicated the proposed transfer to the registered voters
residing in the territory proposed to be transferred, provided notice
of a public hearing regarding the proposal, and provided the voters an
opportunity to comment on the proposal at the public hearing; and
(iii) Consulted with the statewide chair of regional committees
designated under RCW 28A.315.085.
(2) The petition shall state the name and number of each district
affected, describe the boundaries of the territory proposed to be
transferred, and state the reasons for desiring the change and the
number of children of school age, if any, residing in the territory.
(3) The educational service district superintendent shall not
complete any transfer of territory under this section that involves ten
percent or more of the common school student population of the entire
district from which the transfer is proposed, unless the educational
service district superintendent has first called and held a special
election of the voters of the entire school district from which the
transfer of territory is proposed. The purpose of the election is to
afford those voters an opportunity to approve or reject the proposed
transfer. A simple majority shall determine approval or rejection.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction may establish rules
limiting the frequency of petitions that may be filed pertaining to
territory included in whole or in part in a previous petition.
(5) Upon receipt of the petition, the educational service district
superintendent shall notify in writing the affected districts that:
(a) Each school district board of directors, whether or not
initiating a proposed transfer of territory, is required to enter into
negotiations with the affected district or districts;
(b) In the case of a citizen-initiated petition, the affected
districts must negotiate on the entire proposed transfer of territory;
(c) The districts have ninety calendar days in which to agree to
the proposed transfer of territory;
(d) The districts may request and shall be granted by the
educational service district superintendent one thirty-day extension to
try to reach agreement; and
(e) Any district involved in the negotiations may at any time
during the ninety-day period notify the educational service district
superintendent in writing that agreement will not be possible.
(6) If the negotiating school boards cannot come to agreement about
the proposed transfer of territory, the educational service district
superintendent, if requested by the affected districts, shall appoint
a mediator. The mediator has thirty days to work with the affected
school districts to see if an agreement can be reached on the proposed
transfer of territory.
(7) If the affected school districts cannot come to agreement about
the proposed transfer of territory, and the districts do not request
the services of a mediator or the mediator was unable to bring the
districts to agreement, either district may file with the educational
service district superintendent a written request for a hearing by the
regional committee.
(8) If the affected school districts cannot come to agreement about
the proposed transfer of territory initiated by citizen petition, and
the districts do not request the services of a mediator or the mediator
was unable to bring the districts to agreement, the district in which
the citizens who filed the petition reside shall file with the
educational service district superintendent a written request for a
hearing by the regional committee, unless a majority of the citizen
petitioners request otherwise.
(9) Upon receipt of a notice under subsection (7) or (8) of this
section, the educational service district superintendent shall notify
the chair of the regional committee in writing within ten days.
(10) Costs incurred by school districts under this section shall be
reimbursed by the state from such funds as are appropriated for this
purpose.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.315.205 and 2006 c 263 s 503 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The chair of the regional committee shall schedule a hearing on
the proposed transfer of territory at a location in the educational
service district within sixty calendar days of being notified under RCW
28A.315.195 (7) or (8).
(2) Within thirty calendar days of the hearing under subsection (1)
of this section, or final hearing if more than one is held by the
committee, the committee shall issue its written findings and decision
to approve or disapprove the proposed transfer of territory. The
educational service district superintendent shall transmit a copy of
the committee's decision to the superintendents of the affected school
districts within ten calendar days.
(3) In carrying out the purposes of RCW 28A.315.015 and in making
decisions as authorized under RCW 28A.315.095(1), the regional
committee shall base its judgment upon whether and to the extent the
proposed change in school district organization complies with RCW
28A.315.015(2) and rules adopted by the superintendent of public
instruction under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) The rules under subsection (3) of this section shall provide
for giving consideration to all of the following:
(a) Student educational opportunities as measured by the percentage
of students performing at each level of the statewide mandated
assessments and data regarding student attendance, graduation, and
dropout rates;
(b) The safety and welfare of pupils. For the purposes of this
subsection, "safety" means freedom or protection from danger, injury,
or damage and "welfare" means a positive condition or influence
regarding health, character, and well-being;
(c) The history and relationship of the property affected to the
students and communities affected, including, for example, ((inclusion
within a single school district, for school attendance and
corresponding tax support purposes, of entire master planned
communities that were or are to be developed pursuant to an integrated
commercial and residential development plan with over one thousand
dwelling units)) the impact of the growth management act and current or
proposed urban growth areas, city boundaries, and master planned
communities;
(d) Whether or not geographic accessibility warrants a favorable
consideration of a recommended change in school district organization,
including remoteness or isolation of places of residence and time
required to travel to and from school; and
(e) All funding sources of the affected districts, equalization
among school districts of the tax burden for general fund and capital
purposes through a reduction in disparities in per pupil valuation when
all funding sources are considered, improvement in the economies in the
administration and operation of schools, and the extent the proposed
change would potentially reduce or increase the individual and
aggregate transportation costs of the affected school districts.
(5)(a)(i) A petitioner or school district may appeal a decision by
the regional committee to the superintendent of public instruction
based on the claim that the regional committee failed to follow the
applicable statutory and regulatory procedures or acted in an arbitrary
and capricious manner. Any such appeal shall be based on the record
and the appeal must be filed within thirty days of the final decision
of the regional committee. The appeal shall be heard and determined by
an administrative law judge in the office of administrative hearings,
based on the standards in (a)(ii) of this subsection.
(ii) If the administrative law judge finds that all applicable
procedures were not followed or that the regional committee acted in an
arbitrary and capricious manner, the administrative law judge shall
refer the matter back to the regional committee with an explanation of
his or her findings. The regional committee shall rehear the proposal.
(iii) If the administrative law judge finds that all applicable
procedures were followed or that the regional committee did not act in
an arbitrary and capricious manner, depending on the appeal, the
educational service district shall be notified and directed to
implement the changes.
(b) Any school district or citizen petitioner affected by a final
decision of the regional committee may seek judicial review of the
committee's decision in accordance with RCW 34.05.570.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.315.085 and 2006 c 263 s 507 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall furnish to
regional committees the services of employed personnel and the
materials and supplies necessary to enable them to perform the duties
imposed upon them by this chapter. ((Members shall be reimbursed for
expenses necessarily incurred by them in the performance of their
duties in accordance with RCW 28A.315.155.)) In addition, the
superintendent shall designate an individual to serve as the statewide
chair and be a nonvoting member of each regional committee created
under RCW 28A.315.015. The statewide chair designated under this
section shall be an employee or a contractor of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. The purpose of designating a
statewide chair is to ensure conformity of the regional committees to
legal procedures and rules regarding the committees' consideration of
petitions; provide consistency in the application of laws, rules,
criteria, and procedures across the state; offer expertise in issues
related to school district organization; and provide expertise in
managing meetings and conducting public hearings to enhance the
deliberation of regional committees. The statewide chair shall also
provide training for members of regional committees, including
coordinating any training offered under RCW 28A.315.185, and provide
assistance to educational service district superintendents in carrying
out the responsibilities assigned under this chapter.
(2) Costs that may be incurred by an educational service district
in association with school district negotiations under RCW 28A.315.195
and supporting the regional committee under RCW 28A.315.205 shall be
reimbursed by the state from such funds as are appropriated for these
purposes.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.315.105 and 1985 c 385 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created in each educational service district a
committee which shall be known as the regional committee on school
district organization, which committee shall be composed of the
statewide chair designated under RCW 28A.315.085 and not less than
seven nor more than nine registered voters of the educational service
district, the number to correspond with the number of board member
districts established for the governance of the educational service
district in which the regional committee is located. The statewide
chair shall be a nonvoting member of each regional committee.
(2) Except for the statewide chair, members of each regional
committee shall be appointed to serve a four-year term by the
educational service district board of the district in which the
regional committee is located. One member of the regional committee
shall be ((elected from the registered voters of)) appointed from each
such educational service district board member district. Appointed
members of regional committees must be registered voters and reside in
the educational service district board member district from which they
are appointed. Members of regional committees who were elected before
the effective date of this section may serve the remainder of their
four-year terms. Vacancies occurring for any reason, including at the
end of the term of any member of a regional committee who was elected
before the effective date of this section, shall be filled by
appointment by the educational service district board of directors as
provided in this section.
(3) In the event of a change in the number of educational service
districts or in the number of educational service district board
members pursuant to chapter 28A.310 RCW, a new regional committee shall
be appointed for each affected educational service district at the
expiration of the terms of the majority of the members of the regional
committee. Those persons who were serving on a regional committee
within an educational service district affected by a change in the
number of districts or board members shall continue to constitute the
regional committee for the educational service district within which
they are registered to vote until the majority of a new board has been
appointed.
(4) No appointed member of a regional committee may continue to
serve on the committee if he or she ceases to be a registered voter of
the educational service district board member district or if he or she
is absent from three consecutive meetings of the committee without an
excuse acceptable to the committee.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.315.165 and 1990 c 33 s 297 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each regional committee shall ((organize by electing)) elect from
its membership ((a chair and)) a vice chair who shall chair committee
meetings in the event of the temporary absence of the statewide chair
designated under RCW 28A.315.085. The educational service district
superintendent shall be the secretary of the committee. Meetings of
the committee shall be held upon call of the statewide chair ((or of a
majority of the members thereof)). A majority of the voting members of
the committee shall constitute a quorum.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.315.125 (Regional committees -- Election of members--Qualifications) and 2006 c 263 s 508, 1993 c 416 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 295,
1985 c 385 s 4, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 1;
(2) RCW 28A.315.135 (Regional committees -- Vacancies) and 1985 c 385
s 5, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 81, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 117, & 1969 ex.s. c
223 s 28A.57.033; and
(3) RCW 28A.315.145 (Regional committees -- Terms of members) and
1993 c 416 s 3, 1990 c 33 s 296, 1985 c 385 s 6, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.57.034.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.323.020 and 2006 c 263 s 612 are each amended to
read as follows:
The duties in this chapter imposed upon and required to be
performed by a regional committee and by an educational service
district superintendent in connection with a change in the organization
and extent of school districts and/or with the adjustment of the assets
and liabilities of school districts and with all matters related to
such change or adjustment whenever territory lying in ((a single)) more
than one educational service district is involved shall be performed
((jointly)) by the regional committee((s)) and by the
superintendent((s)) of the ((several)) educational service district((s
as required whenever territory lying in more than one educational
service district is involved in a proposed change in the organization
and extent of school districts: PROVIDED, That a regional committee
may designate three of its members, or two of its members and the
educational service district superintendent, as a subcommittee to serve
in lieu of the whole committee, but action by a subcommittee shall not
be binding unless approved by a majority of the regional committee)) in
which is located the part of the proposed or enlarged school district
having the largest number of common school pupils residing therein.
Proposals for changes in the organization and extent of school
districts and proposed terms of adjustment of assets and liabilities
thus prepared and approved shall be submitted to the superintendent of
public instruction ((by the regional committee of the educational
service district in which is located the part of the proposed or
enlarged district having the largest number of common school pupils
residing therein)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 28A.323.030 (School districts in two or
more educational service districts -- Proposed change or adjustment--Procedure when one committee does not approve or fails to act--Temporary committee) and 1990 c 33 s 310, 1985 c 385 s 26, 1975 1st
ex.s. c 275 s 96, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 132, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.57.245 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 28A.323.020 is recodified as a new
section in chapter 28A.315 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.343.070 and 1990 c 33 s 324 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each educational service district superintendent shall prepare and
keep in his or her office (((1))) a map showing the boundaries of the
directors' districts of all school districts in or belonging to his or
her educational service district that are so divided((, and (2) a
record of the action taken by the regional committee in establishing
such boundaries)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---