BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature enacts this act to expressly
reject the interpretation of State v. Leyda, 157 Wn.2d 335, 138 P.3d
610 (2006), which holds that the unit of prosecution in identity theft
is any one act of either knowingly obtaining, possessing, using, or
transferring a single piece of another's identification or financial
information, including all subsequent proscribed conduct with that
single piece of identification or financial information, when the acts
are taken with the requisite intent. The legislature finds that
proportionality of punishment requires the need for charging and
punishing for obtaining, using, possessing, or transferring any
individual person's identification or financial information, with the
requisite intent. The legislature specifically intends that each
individual who obtains, possesses, uses, or transfers any individual
person's identification or financial information, with the requisite
intent, be classified separately and punished separately as provided in
chapter 9.94A RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.35.001 and 1999 c 368 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that means of identification and financial
information ((is)) are personal and sensitive information such that if
unlawfully obtained, possessed, used, or transferred by others may
((do)) result in significant harm to a person's privacy, financial
security, and other interests. The legislature finds that unscrupulous
persons find ever more clever ways, including identity theft, to
improperly obtain ((and)), possess, use, and transfer another person's
means of identification or financial information. The legislature
intends to penalize ((unscrupulous people)) for each unlawful act of
improperly obtaining, possessing, using, or transferring means of
identification or financial information of an individual person. The
unit of prosecution for identity theft by use of a means of
identification or financial information is each individual unlawful use
of any one person's means of identification or financial information.
Unlawfully obtaining, possessing, or transferring each means of
identification or financial information of any individual person, with
the requisite intent, is a separate unit of prosecution for each victim
and for each act of obtaining, possessing, or transferring of the
individual person's means of identification or financial information.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.35.020 and 2004 c 273 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may knowingly obtain, possess, use, or transfer a
means of identification or financial information of another person,
living or dead, with the intent to commit, or to aid or abet, any
crime.
(2) Violation of this section when the accused or an accomplice
((uses the victim's means of identification or financial information))
violates subsection (1) of this section and obtains ((an aggregate
total of)) credit, money, goods, services, or anything else of value in
excess of one thousand five hundred dollars in value shall constitute
identity theft in the first degree. Identity theft in the first degree
is a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) ((Violation of this section when the accused or an accomplice
uses the victim's means of identification or financial information and
obtains an aggregate total of credit, money, goods, services, or
anything else of value that is less than one thousand five hundred
dollars in value, or when no credit, money, goods, services, or
anything of value is obtained shall constitute identity theft in the
second degree.)) A person is guilty of identity theft in the second
degree when he or she violates subsection (1) of this section under
circumstances not amounting to identity theft in the first degree.
Identity theft in the second degree is a class C felony punishable
according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(4) Each crime prosecuted under this section shall be punished
separately under chapter 9.94A RCW, unless it is the same criminal
conduct as any other crime, under RCW 9.94A.589.
(5) Whenever any series of transactions involving a single person's
means of identification or financial information which constitute
identity theft would, when considered separately, constitute identity
theft in the second degree because of value, and the series of
transactions are a part of a common scheme or plan, then the
transactions may be aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of
all of the transactions shall be the value considered in determining
the degree of identity theft involved.
(6) Every person who, in the commission of identity theft, shall
commit any other crime may be punished therefor as well as for the
identity theft, and may be prosecuted for each crime separately.
(7) A person who violates this section is liable for civil damages
of one thousand dollars or actual damages, whichever is greater,
including costs to repair the victim's credit record, and reasonable
attorneys' fees as determined by the court.
(((5))) (8) In a proceeding under this section, the crime will be
considered to have been committed in any locality where the person
whose means of identification or financial information was appropriated
resides, or in which any part of the offense took place, regardless of
whether the defendant was ever actually in that locality.
(((6))) (9) The provisions of this section do not apply to any
person who obtains another person's driver's license or other form of
identification for the sole purpose of misrepresenting his or her age.
(((7))) (10) In a proceeding under this section in which a person's
means of identification or financial information was used without that
person's authorization, and when there has been a conviction, the
sentencing court may issue such orders as are necessary to correct a
public record that contains false information resulting from a
violation of this section.

--- END ---