BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.34.030 and 2004 c 190 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any power or powers, privileges or authority exercised or
capable of exercise by a public agency of this state may be exercised
and enjoyed jointly with any other public agency of this state having
the power or powers, privilege or authority, and jointly with any
public agency of any other state or of the United States to the extent
that laws of such other state or of the United States permit such joint
exercise or enjoyment. Any agency of the state government when acting
jointly with any public agency may exercise and enjoy all of the
powers, privileges and authority conferred by this chapter upon a
public agency.
(2) Any two or more public agencies may enter into agreements with
one another for joint or cooperative action pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter: PROVIDED, That any such joint or cooperative action
by public agencies which are educational service districts and/or
school districts shall comply with the provisions of RCW 28A.320.080.
Appropriate action by ordinance, resolution or otherwise pursuant to
law of the governing bodies of the participating public agencies shall
be necessary before any such agreement may enter into force.
(3) Any such agreement shall specify the following:
(a) Its duration;
(b) The precise organization, composition and nature of any
separate legal or administrative entity created thereby together with
the powers delegated thereto, provided such entity may be legally
created. Such entity may include a nonprofit corporation organized
pursuant to chapter 24.03 or 24.06 RCW whose membership is limited
solely to the participating public agencies or a partnership organized
pursuant to chapter 25.04 or 25.05 RCW whose partners are limited
solely to participating public agencies, or a limited liability company
organized under chapter 25.15 RCW whose membership is limited solely to
participating public agencies, and the funds of any such corporation
((or)), partnership, or limited liability company shall be subject to
audit in the manner provided by law for the auditing of public funds;
(c) Its purpose or purposes;
(d) The manner of financing the joint or cooperative undertaking
and of establishing and maintaining a budget therefor;
(e) The permissible method or methods to be employed in
accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and
for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination;
(f) Any other necessary and proper matters.
(4) In the event that the agreement does not establish a separate
legal entity to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking, the
agreement shall, in addition to items (a), (c), (d), (e) and (f)
enumerated in subdivision (3) hereof, contain the following:
(a) Provision for an administrator or a joint board responsible for
administering the joint or cooperative undertaking. In the case of a
joint board, public agencies party to the agreement shall be
represented;
(b) The manner of acquiring, holding and disposing of real and
personal property used in the joint or cooperative undertaking. Any
joint board is authorized to establish a special fund with a state,
county, city, or district treasurer servicing an involved public agency
designated "Operating fund of . . . . . . joint board".
(5) No agreement made pursuant to this chapter relieves any public
agency of any obligation or responsibility imposed upon it by law
except that:
(a) To the extent of actual and timely performance thereof by a
joint board or other legal or administrative entity created by an
agreement made hereunder, the performance may be offered in
satisfaction of the obligation or responsibility; and
(b) With respect to one or more public agencies purchasing or
otherwise contracting through a bid, proposal, or contract awarded by
another public agency or by a group of public agencies, any statutory
obligation to provide notice for bids or proposals that applies to the
public agencies involved is satisfied if the public agency or group of
public agencies that awarded the bid, proposal, or contract complied
with its own statutory requirements and either (i) posted the bid or
solicitation notice on a web site established and maintained by a
public agency, purchasing cooperative, or similar service provider, for
purposes of posting public notice of bid or proposal solicitations, or
(ii) provided an access link on the state's web portal to the notice.
(6) Financing of joint projects by agreement shall be as provided
by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 54.44.020 and 1997 c 230 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
cities of the first class, public utility districts organized under
chapter 54.08 RCW, and joint operating agencies organized under chapter
43.52 RCW, any such cities and public utility districts which operate
electric generating facilities or distribution systems and any joint
operating agency shall have power and authority to participate and
enter into agreements with each other and with electrical companies
which are subject to the jurisdiction of the Washington utilities and
transportation commission or the public utility commissioner of Oregon,
hereinafter called "regulated utilities", and with rural electric
cooperatives, including generation and transmission cooperatives for
the undivided ownership of any type of electric generating plants and
facilities, including, but not limited to nuclear and other thermal
power generating plants and facilities and transmission facilities
including, but not limited to, related transmission facilities,
hereinafter called "common facilities", and for the planning,
financing, acquisition, construction, operation and maintenance
thereof. It shall be provided in such agreements that each city,
public utility district, or joint operating agency shall own a
percentage of any common facility equal to the percentage of the money
furnished or the value of property supplied by it for the acquisition
and construction thereof and shall own and control a like percentage of
the electrical output thereof.
(2) Cities of the first class, public utility districts organized
under chapter 54.08 RCW, and joint operating agencies organized under
chapter 43.52 RCW, shall have the power and authority to participate
and enter into agreements for the undivided ownership of a coal-fired
thermal electric generating plant and facility placed in operation
before July 1, 1975, including related common facilities, and for the
planning, financing, acquisition, construction, operation, and
maintenance of the plant and facility. It shall be provided in such
agreements that each city, public utility district, or joint operating
agency shall own a percentage of any common facility equal to the
percentage of the money furnished or the value of property supplied by
the city, district, or agency, for the acquisition and construction of
the facility and shall own and control a like percentage of the
electrical output thereof. Cities of the first class, public utility
districts, and joint operating agencies may enter into agreements under
this subsection with each other, with regulated utilities, with rural
electric cooperatives, with electric companies subject to the
jurisdiction of the regulatory commission of any other state, and with
any power marketer subject to the jurisdiction of the federal energy
regulatory commission.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
cities of the first class, public utility districts organized under
chapter 54.08 RCW, any cities that operate electric generating
facilities or distribution systems, any joint operating agency, or any
separate legal entity comprising two or more thereof organized under
chapter 39.34 RCW shall, either directly or as co-owners of a separate
legal entity, have power and authority to participate and enter into
agreements with each other, and with any of the following, either
directly or as co-owners of a separate legal entity: Any public
agency, as that term is defined in RCW 39.34.020, with electrical
companies that are subject to the jurisdiction of the Washington
utilities and transportation commission or the regulatory commission of
any state, hereinafter called "regulated utilities," and with rural
electric cooperatives and generation and transmission cooperatives or
any wholly owned subsidiaries of either rural electric cooperatives or
generation and transmission cooperatives, for the undivided ownership,
or indirect ownership in the case of a separate legal entity, of any
type of electric generating plants powered by an eligible renewable
resource as defined in RCW 19.285.030 and transmission facilities
including, but not limited to, related transmission facilities,
hereinafter called "common facilities," and for the planning,
financing, acquisition, construction, operation, and maintenance
thereof. Such an agreement must provide that each city, public utility
district, or joint operating agency must own a percentage of any common
facility or a percentage of any separate legal entity equal to the
percentage of the money furnished or the value of property supplied by
it for the acquisition and construction thereof and must own and
control, or have a right to own and control in the case of a separate
legal entity, a like percentage of the electrical output thereof.
(4) Each participant shall defray its own interest and other
payments required to be made or deposited in connection with any
financing undertaken by it to pay its percentage of the money furnished
or value of property supplied by it for the planning, acquisition and
construction of any common facility, or any additions or betterments
thereto. The agreement shall provide a uniform method of determining
and allocating operation and maintenance expenses of the common
facility.
(((4))) (5) Each city, public utility district, joint operating
agency, regulated utility, and cooperatives participating in the direct
or indirect ownership or operation of a common facility as described in
subsections (1) through (3) of this section shall pay all taxes
chargeable to its share of the common facility and the electric energy
generated thereby under applicable statutes as now or hereafter in
effect, and may make payments during preliminary work and construction
for any increased financial burden suffered by any county or other
existing taxing district in the county in which the common facility is
located, pursuant to agreement with such county or taxing district.

Sec. 3 RCW 25.15.005 and 2002 c 296 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:))
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Certificate of formation" means the certificate referred to in
RCW 25.15.070, and the certificate as amended.
(2) "Event of dissociation" means an event that causes a person to
cease to be a member as provided in RCW 25.15.130.
(3) "Foreign limited liability company" means an entity that is
formed under:
(a) The limited liability company laws of any state other than this
state; or
(b) The laws of any foreign country that is: (i) An unincorporated
association, (ii) formed under a statute pursuant to which an
association may be formed that affords to each of its members limited
liability with respect to the liabilities of the entity, and (iii) not
required, in order to transact business or conduct affairs in this
state, to be registered or qualified under Title 23B or 24 RCW, or any
other chapter of the Revised Code of Washington authorizing the
formation of a domestic entity and the registration or qualification in
this state of similar entities formed under the laws of a jurisdiction
other than this state.
(4) "Limited liability company" and "domestic limited liability
company" means a limited liability company having one or more members
that is organized and existing under this chapter.
(5) "Limited liability company agreement" means any written
agreement of the members, or any written statement of the sole member,
as to the affairs of a limited liability company and the conduct of its
business which is binding upon the member or members.
(6) "Limited liability company interest" means a member's share of
the profits and losses of a limited liability company and a member's
right to receive distributions of the limited liability company's
assets.
(7) "Manager" or "managers" means, with respect to a limited
liability company that has set forth in its certificate of formation
that it is to be managed by managers, the person, or persons designated
in accordance with RCW 25.15.150(2).
(8) "Member" means a person who has been admitted to a limited
liability company as a member as provided in RCW 25.15.115 and who has
not been dissociated from the limited liability company.
(9) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality, or a separate legal entity comprised of two or more of
these entities, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(10) "Professional limited liability company" means a limited
liability company which is organized for the purpose of rendering
professional service and whose certificate of formation sets forth that
it is a professional limited liability company subject to RCW
25.15.045.
(11) "Professional service" means the same as defined under RCW
18.100.030.
(12) "State" means the District of Columbia or the Commonwealth of
Puerto Rico or any state, territory, possession, or other jurisdiction
of the United States other than the state of Washington.

Sec. 4 RCW 54.16.180 and 1999 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A district may sell and convey, lease, or otherwise dispose of all
or any part of its works, plants, systems, utilities and properties,
after proceedings and approval by the voters of the district, as
provided for the lease or disposition of like properties and facilities
owned by cities and towns: PROVIDED, That the affirmative vote of
three-fifths of the voters voting at an election on the question of
approval of a proposed sale, shall be necessary to authorize such sale:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That a district may sell, convey, lease or otherwise
dispose of all or any part of the property owned by it, located outside
its boundaries, to another public utility district, city, town or other
municipal corporation without the approval of the voters; or may sell,
convey, lease, or otherwise dispose of to any person or public body,
any part, either within or without its boundaries, which has become
unserviceable, inadequate, obsolete, worn out or unfit to be used in
the operations of the system and which is no longer necessary, material
to, and useful in such operations, without the approval of the voters:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That a district may sell, convey, lease or otherwise
dispose of items of equipment or materials to any other district, to
any cooperative, mutual, consumer-owned or investor-owned utility, to
any federal, state, or local government agency, to any contractor
employed by the district or any other district, utility, or agency, or
any customer of the district or of any other district or utility, from
the district's stores without voter approval or resolution of the
district's board, if such items of equipment or materials cannot
practicably be obtained on a timely basis from any other source, and
the amount received by the district in consideration for any such sale,
conveyance, lease, or other disposal of such items of equipment or
materials is not less than the district's cost to purchase such items
or the reasonable market value of equipment or materials: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That a public utility district located within a county with a
population of from one hundred twenty-five thousand to less than two
hundred ten thousand may sell and convey to a city of the first class,
which owns its own water system, all or any part of a water system
owned by said public utility district where a portion of it is located
within the boundaries of such city, without approval of the voters upon
such terms and conditions as the district shall determine: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That a public utility district located in a county with a
population of from twelve thousand to less than eighteen thousand and
bordered by the Columbia river may, separately or in connection with
the operation of a water system, or as part of a plan for acquiring or
constructing and operating a water system, or in connection with the
creation of another or subsidiary local utility district, may provide
for the acquisition or construction, additions or improvements to, or
extensions of, and operation of a sewage system within the same service
area as in the judgment of the district commission is necessary or
advisable in order to eliminate or avoid any existing or potential
danger to the public health by reason of the lack of sewerage
facilities or by reason of the inadequacy of existing facilities: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That a public utility district located within a
county with a population of from one hundred twenty-five thousand to
less than two hundred ten thousand bordering on Puget Sound may sell
and convey to any city or town with a population of less than ten
thousand all or any part of a water system owned by said public utility
district without approval of the voters upon such terms and conditions
as the district shall determine: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That a public
utility district may sell and convey, lease, or otherwise dispose of,
to any person or entity without approval of the voters and upon such
terms and conditions as the public utility district determines, all or
any part of an electric generating project owned directly or indirectly
by the public utility district, regardless of whether the project is
completed, operable, or operating, as long as such a project is or
would be powered by an eligible renewable resource as that term is
defined in RCW 19.285.030, and as long as the public utility district,
or the separate legal entity in which the district has an interest in
the case of indirect ownership: (1) Has the right to purchase all or
any part of the energy from such a project during the period it does
not have a direct or indirect ownership interest in the project; and
(2) has an option to repurchase the project or part thereof sold,
conveyed, leased, or otherwise disposed of at or below fair market
value within twenty-two years from the date of sale, conveyance, lease,
or other disposition. Public utility districts are municipal
corporations for the purposes of this section and the commission shall
be held to be the legislative body and the president and secretary
shall have the same powers and perform the same duties as the mayor and
city clerk and the resolutions of the districts shall be held to be
ordinances within the meaning of the statutes governing the sale,
lease, or other disposal of public utilities owned by cities and towns.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.24.080 and 1995 c 301 s 72 are each amended to read
as follows:
All claims presented against any county, city, district or other
municipal corporation or political subdivision by persons furnishing
materials, rendering services or performing labor, or for any other
contractual purpose, shall be audited, before payment, by an auditing
officer elected or appointed pursuant to statute or, in the absence of
statute, an appropriate charter provision, ordinance or resolution of
the municipal corporation or political subdivision. Such claims shall
be prepared for audit and payment on a form and in the manner
prescribed by the state auditor. The form shall provide for the
authentication and certification by such auditing officer that the
materials have been furnished, the services rendered ((or)), the labor
performed as described, or that any advance payment is due and payable
pursuant to a contract, or is available as an option for full or
partial fulfillment of an obligation pursuant to a contract, and that
the claim is a just, due and unpaid obligation against the municipal
corporation or political subdivision; and no claim shall be paid
without such authentication and certification: PROVIDED, That the
certificates as to claims of officers and employees of a county, city,
district or other municipal corporation or political subdivision, for
services rendered, shall be made by the person charged with the duty of
preparing and submitting vouchers for the payment of services, and he
or she shall certify that the claim is just, true and unpaid, which
certificate shall be part of the voucher.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 19.285 RCW
to read as follows:
A public utility district, any public or private entity, or group
of such entities operating in a joint or cooperative capacity,
participating in the construction or development of an electric
generation facility powered by an eligible renewable resource or
transmission facility, as authorized under this act, shall comply with
the provisions of chapter 39.12 RCW.

--- END ---