BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that in the last
ten years, significant progress has been made to identify and monitor
accountability and performance measures in higher education, both
internally in institutions and externally in the legislative and state
policymaking environment.
(2) However, the legislature further finds that opportunities exist
to promote greater visibility of performance measures among
policymakers and among the public consumers of higher education.
Policy decisions, including decisions about resource allocation, should
be made with greater knowledge and a shared understanding about the
tradeoffs between resources, flexibility, and desired outcomes. A
forum should be created to allow discussion among policymakers and
institution leaders about setting outcome-oriented priorities,
targeting of investments, linking operating and capital planning, and
creating a longer-term view than the biennial budget cycle typically
permits.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to implement a process for
such discussions, agreements, and planning to occur. The process of
crafting higher education performance agreements will be pilot-tested
over a six-year period with the public four-year institutions of higher
education beginning in 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section and sections 3 and 4 of this act, a
performance agreement is an agreement reached between the state and the
governing board of an institution of higher education and approved by
the legislature using the process provided in section 4 of this act.
(2) The purpose of a performance agreement is to develop and
communicate a six-year plan developed jointly by state policymakers and
an institution of higher education that aligns goals, priorities,
desired outcomes, flexibility, institutional mission, accountability,
and levels of resources.
(3) Beginning in 2008, performance agreements shall be pilot-tested
with the public four-year institutions of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Performance agreements shall address but not be limited to the
following issues:
(a) Indicators that measure outcomes concerning cost, quality,
timeliness of student progress toward degrees and certifications, and
articulation between and within the K-12 and higher education systems;
(b) Benchmarks and goals for long-term degree production, including
discrete benchmarks and goals in particular fields of study;
(c) The level of resources necessary to meet the performance
outcomes, benchmarks, and goals, subject to legislative appropriation;
and
(d) The prioritization of four-year institution capital budget
projects by the office of financial management.
(2) The goals and outcomes identified in a performance agreement
shall be linked to the role, mission, and strategic plan of the
institution of higher education and aligned with the statewide
strategic master plan for higher education.
(3) Performance agreements may also include grants to an
institution, under the terms of the agreement, of flexibility or
waivers from state controls or rules. The agreement may identify areas
where statutory change is necessary to grant an institution flexibility
or waivers of state agency rules.
(4) The following areas may not be included in a performance
agreement:
(a) Flexibility or waivers of requirements in a collective
bargaining agreement negotiated under chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 41.59,
41.76, or 41.80 RCW;
(b) Flexibility or waivers of administrative rules or processes
governed by chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 41.59, 41.76, or 41.80 RCW;
(c) Rules, processes, duties, rights, and responsibilities of the
academic faculty as contained in the faculty codes of the four-year
institution;
(d) Flexibility or waivers of requirements under chapter 39.12 RCW;
(e) Flexibility or waivers of administrative rules or other
regulations that address health and safety, civil rights, and
nondiscrimination laws that apply to institutions of higher education;
and
(f) State laws covering terms and conditions of employment,
including but not limited to salaries, job security, and health,
retirement, unemployment, or any other employment benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A state performance agreement committee is created to represent
the state in developing performance agreements under this section and
sections 2 and 3 of this act. The committee is composed of
representatives from the governor's office, the office of financial
management, the higher education coordinating board, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, two members of the senate
appointed by the secretary of the senate, and two members of the house
of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives. The state performance agreement committee shall be
staffed by personnel from the higher education coordinating board. The
governing boards of the public four-year institutions of higher
education shall designate performance agreement representatives for
each institution respectively that shall include two faculty members at
those institutions bargaining under chapter 41.76 RCW, at least one of
whom shall be appointed by the exclusive collective bargaining agent.
If the participating pilot institution does not bargain under chapter
41.76 RCW, then two faculty members shall be appointed by the faculty
senate of that institution.
(2) Each of the participating institutions shall develop a
preliminary draft of a performance agreement with input from students
and faculty. Starting with the preliminary drafts, the state
performance agreement committee and representatives of each institution
shall develop revised draft performance agreements for each institution
and submit the revised drafts to the governor and the fiscal and higher
education committees of the legislature no later than September 1,
2008.
(3) After receiving informal input on the revised draft performance
agreements, particularly regarding the levels of resources assumed in
the agreements, the state committee and institution representatives
shall develop final proposed performance agreements and submit the
agreements to the governor and the office of financial management by
November 1, 2008, for consideration in development of the governor's
2009-2011 operating and capital budget recommendations.
(4) The state committee shall submit any legislation necessary to
implement a performance agreement to the higher education committees of
the senate and house of representatives.
(5) All cost items contained within a performance agreement are
subject to legislative appropriation.
(6) If the legislature affirms, through a proviso in the 2009-2011
omnibus appropriations act, that the omnibus appropriations act and the
2009 capital budget act enacted by the legislature align with the
proposed performance agreements, the performance agreements shall take
effect beginning July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2015. If the
legislature affirms, through a proviso in the 2009-2011 omnibus
appropriations act or through inaction, that the omnibus appropriations
act and/or the 2009 capital budget act are not aligned with the
proposed performance agreements, the state committee and institution
representatives shall redraft the agreements to align with the enacted
budgets, and the redrafted agreements shall take effect beginning
September 1, 2009, through June 30, 2015.
(7) The legislature, the state committee, and the institution
representatives shall repeat the process described in subsection (6) of
this section for each subsequent omnibus appropriations and capital
budget act enacted between the 2010 and 2014 legislative sessions to
ensure that the performance agreements are updated as necessary to
align with enacted omnibus appropriations and capital budget acts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The joint committee shall conduct an evaluation of the higher
education performance agreement pilot test under sections 2 through 4
of this act and make recommendations regarding changes to the substance
or process of creating the agreements, including whether the
performance agreement process should be continued and expanded to
include additional higher education institutions. The evaluation shall
be submitted to the governor and the higher education committees of the
senate and house of representatives by November 1, 2014.

--- END ---