BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Bereavement leave, not to exceed five days with pay, shall be
allowed all academic, administrative, classified, and exempt employees
for each death in the immediate family. As used in this section,
"immediate family" means the mother, mother substitute, mother-in-law,
father, father substitute, father-in-law, daughter, son, daughter-in-law, son-in-law, spouse, brother, sister, or grandchildren, of the
employee, or any relative living in the immediate household of the
employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.30 RCW
to read as follows:
Bereavement leave, not to exceed five days with pay, shall be
allowed all academic, administrative, classified, and exempt employees
for each death in the immediate family. As used in this section,
"immediate family" means the mother, mother substitute, mother-in-law,
father, father substitute, father-in-law, daughter, son, daughter-in-law, son-in-law, spouse, brother, sister, or grandchildren, of the
employee, or any relative living in the immediate household of the
employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW
to read as follows:
Bereavement leave, not to exceed five days with pay, shall be
allowed all academic, administrative, classified, and exempt employees
for each death in the immediate family. As used in this section,
"immediate family" means the mother, mother substitute, mother-in-law,
father, father substitute, father-in-law, daughter, son, daughter-in-law, son-in-law, spouse, brother, sister, or grandchildren, of the
employee, or any relative living in the immediate household of the
employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.40 RCW
to read as follows:
Bereavement leave, not to exceed five days with pay, shall be
allowed all academic, administrative, classified, and exempt employees
for each death in the immediate family. As used in this section,
"immediate family" means the mother, mother substitute, mother-in-law,
father, father substitute, father-in-law, daughter, son, daughter-in-law, son-in-law, spouse, brother, sister, or grandchildren, of the
employee, or any relative living in the immediate household of the
employee.

--- END ---