BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.569 and 1990 c 288 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each institution of higher education with a commissioned police
force shall report to the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs or its successor agency, on a monthly basis, crime statistics
for the Washington state uniform crime report, in the format required
by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, or its
successor agency. Institutions of higher education which do not have
commissioned police forces shall report crime statistics through
appropriate local law enforcement agencies.
(2) Each institution of higher education shall publish and
distribute a report which shall be updated annually and which shall
include the crime statistics as reported under subsection (1) of this
section for the most recent three-year period. Upon request, the
institution shall provide the report to every person who submits an
application for admission to either a main or branch campus, and to
each new employee at the time of employment. In its acknowledgment of
receipt of the formal application for admission, the institution shall
notify the applicant of the availability of such information. The
information also shall be provided on an annual basis to all students
and employees. Institutions with more than one campus shall provide
the required information on a campus-by-campus basis.
(3)(a) Within existing resources, each institution of higher
education shall ((provide to every new student and new employee)) make
available to all students, faculty, and staff, and upon request to
other interested persons, ((information which follows the general
categories for safety policies and procedures outlined in this section.
Such categories shall, at a minimum, include)) an emergency management
and response plan that includes, at a minimum, the following:
(i) Data Regarding:
(A) Campus enrollments((,));
(B) Campus nonstudent workforce profile((,)); and
(C) The number ((and duties)) of campus security personnel((,));
(ii) Policies, procedures, and programs:
(A) For preventing and responding to violence and other campus
emergencies;
(B) Governing weapons on campus, including their storage;
(C) Applying to controlled substances as defined in RCW 64.44.010;
and
(D) Governing and related to student privacy;
(iii) Information about:
(A) Sexual assault, domestic violence, and stalking, including
contact information for campus and community victim advocates,
information on where to view campus policies on complaints, and the
name and contact information of the individual or office to whom
students and employees may direct complaints of sexual assault,
stalking, or domestic violence; and
(B) Sexual harassment, including contact information for campus and
community victim advocates, information on where to view campus
policies on complaints, and the name and contact information of the
individual or office to whom students and employees may direct
complaints of sexual harassment;
(iv) Descriptions of:
(A) The duties of campus security personnel;
(B) Security and mutual assistance arrangements with state and
local police((, sexual assault and domestic violence and policies on
controlled substances));
(C) Methods and options that persons with disabilities or special
needs have to access services and programs;
(D) Escort and transportation services that provide for individual
security;
(E) Mental health and counseling services available to students,
faculty, and staff;
(F) Emergency management plans, including procedures for
communicating with students, faculty, staff, the public, and the media,
following natural and man-made emergencies.
((Information)) (b) The emergency management and response plan
shall include, for the most recent academic year ((also shall
include)):
(i) A description of ((any)) programs and services offered by ((an
institution's student affairs or services department, and by student
government organizations regarding)) the institution and
student-sponsored organizations that provide for crime prevention and
counseling((, including a directory)). The description must include a
listing of the available services ((and appropriate telephone numbers
and physical locations of these services. In addition)), the service
locations, and how the services may be contacted; and
(ii) For institutions maintaining student housing facilities
((shall include)), information detailing security policies and programs
for those facilities.
(c)(i) Institutions with a main campus and one or more branch
campuses shall provide the information on a campus-by-campus basis.
((In the case of)) (ii) Community and technical colleges((,
colleges)) shall provide such information ((to)) for the main campuses
only, and shall provide reasonable alternative information ((at)) for
any off-campus centers and ((other)) affiliated college sites enrolling
less than one hundred students.
(4)(a) Each institution shall enter into memoranda of understanding
that set forth responsibilities for the various local jurisdictions in
the event of a campus emergency.
(b) Each institution shall enter into mutual aid agreements with
local jurisdictions regarding the shared use of equipment and
technology in the event of a campus emergency.
(c) Memoranda of understanding and mutual aid agreements shall be
updated and included in emergency management and response plans.
(5)(a) Each institution shall establish a task force ((which shall
annually)) that examines campus security and safety issues at least
annually. ((The task force shall review the report published and
distributed pursuant to this section in order to ensure the accuracy
and effectiveness of the report, and make any suggestions for
improvement. This)) Each task force shall include representation from
the institution's administration, faculty, staff, recognized student
organization, and police or security organization.
(b) Each task force shall review the emergency management and
response plan published and distributed under this section for its
respective institution, in order to ensure its accuracy and
effectiveness and to make any suggestions for improvement.
(6) The president of each institution shall designate a specific
individual responsible for monitoring and coordinating the
institution's compliance with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each institution of higher education shall take the following
actions:
(a) By September 30, 2008, submit a self-study assessing its
ability to facilitate the safety of students, faculty, staff,
administration, and visitors on each campus, including an evaluation of
the effectiveness of these measures. Four-year institutions shall
submit their studies to the higher education coordinating board.
Community and technical colleges shall submit their studies to the
state board for community and technical colleges.
(b) By November 30, 2008, each institution shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board an action plan and timelines
describing plans to maximize program effectiveness for the next two
biennia.
(c) By October 30th of each even-numbered year, beginning in 2010,
each institution shall submit an update to its plan, including an
assessment of the results of activities undertaken under any previous
year's plan to address unmet safety and security issues, and additional
activities, or modifications of current activities, to be undertaken to
address remaining safety and security issues at the institution.
(2) The higher education coordinating board and the state board for
community and technical colleges shall report biennially, beginning
December 31, 2010, to the governor and the higher education committees
of the house of representatives and the senate on:
(a) The efforts of each institution and the extent to which it has
complied with RCW 28B.10.569 and subsection (1)(c) of this section; and
(b) Recommendations on measures to assist institutions to ensure
and enhance campus safety and security.

--- END ---