BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that entering into a cigarette tax
agreement with the Yakama Nation is a positive step and that such an
agreement will support a stable and orderly environment on the Yakima
Reservation for regulation of cigarette sales. The legislature further
finds that the very special circumstances of the Yakama Nation pursuant
to the Treaty with the Yakamas of 1855 (12 Stat. 951) support a
cigarette tax agreement that reflects those circumstances. The
legislature also finds that the provisions of the agreement with the
Yakama Nation authorized by this act are reasonably necessary to
prevent fraudulent transactions and place a minimal burden on the
Yakama Nation, pursuant to the United States supreme court's decision
in Washington v. Confederated Tribes of the Colville Indian
Reservation, 447 U.S. 134 (1980).
It is the intent of the legislature that the cigarette tax
agreement with the Yakama Nation reflects the uniqueness of the Yakama
Nation's Treaty through specific terms that govern pricing of
cigarettes, tribal cigarette tax revenue, information sharing, and
administration of the agreement.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in chapter 82.24 RCW; and
(b) "Tribal retailer" means a cigarette retailer as that term is
defined in RCW 82.24.010 that is licensed by and located within the
jurisdiction of the Yakama Nation and is wholly owned by the Yakama
Nation or any of its enrolled members.
(3) The governor may enter into a cigarette tax agreement with the
Yakama Nation, a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the
geographical boundaries of the state of Washington, concerning the sale
of cigarettes, subject to the provisions of this section. The governor
may delegate the authority to negotiate the agreement to the department
of revenue.
(4) The agreement must be for a renewable period of no more than
eight years.
(5) All cigarettes possessed or sold by tribal retailers must be
subject to the agreement, except cigarettes manufactured within the
jurisdiction of the Yakama Nation by the Yakama Nation or its enrolled
members.
(6) The agreement must allow the Yakama Nation to exempt its
enrolled members from the tribal cigarette tax imposed under subsection
(7) of this section.
(a) Sales of cigarettes exempt under this subsection must be
subject to the requirements of subsection (9) of this section.
(b) The exemption must be provided only at the point of sale and
reimbursement provided to the tribal retailer by the Yakama Nation.
(7) The agreement must require the Yakama Nation to impose and
maintain in effect on the sale of cigarettes by tribal retailers a tax
as provided in this subsection.
(a) The rate of tax will be expressed in dollars and cents and must
be the percentage of tax imposed by the state under chapter 82.24 RCW
for the period of the agreement as stated here:
(i) Eighty percent during the first six years;
(ii) Eighty-four percent during the seventh year; and
(iii) Eighty-seven and six-tenths percent during the eighth year.
(b) The tax must be imposed on each carton, or portion of a carton,
of cigarettes, with ten packs per carton and twenty cigarettes per pack
being the industry standard, and prorated for cartons and packs that
are not standard.
(c) The tax must be in lieu of the combined state and local sales
and use taxes, and state cigarette taxes, and, as provided in sections
2 through 4 of this act, the taxes imposed by chapters 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.24 RCW do not apply during the term of the agreement on any
transaction governed by the agreement.
(d) Throughout the term of the agreement and any renewal of the
agreement, the tax must increase or decrease in correspondence with the
state cigarette tax by applying the percentages in (a) of this
subsection.
(8) The revenue generated by the tax imposed under subsection (7)
of this section must be used by the Yakama Nation for essential
government services, as that term is defined in RCW 43.06.455.
(9) All cigarettes possessed or sold by a tribal retailer must bear
a tribal cigarette tax stamp as provided in this subsection.
(a) The Yakama Nation may act as its own stamp vendor, subject to
meeting reasonable requirements for internal controls.
(b) The stamps must have serial numbers or other discrete
identification that allow stamps to be traced to their source.
(10) The price paid by the tribal retailer to the wholesaler must
not be less than the total of the price paid by the Yakama Nation or
other wholesaler and the tax imposed under subsection (7) of this
section.
(11) The retail selling price of cigarettes sold by tribal
retailers must not be less than the price paid by them under subsection
(10) of this section.
(12) Tribal retailers must not sell or give, or permit to be sold
or given, cigarettes to any person under the age of eighteen years.
(13) The authority and the individual and joint responsibility of
the Yakama Nation, the department of revenue, and the liquor control
board for administration and enforcement must be specified in the
agreement including, but not limited to, requirements regarding
transport of cigarettes, keeping of records, reporting, notice,
inspection, audit, and mutual exchange of information.
(a) Requirements must provide for sharing of information regarding
transport of cigarettes in the state of Washington by the Yakama Nation
or its enrolled members, reporting of information on sales to customers
located outside the jurisdiction of the Yakama Nation, and authority
for unannounced inspection by the state of tribal retailers to verify
compliance with stamping and pricing provisions.
(b) Information received by the state or open to state review under
the terms of the agreement is subject to RCW 82.32.330.
(14) The agreement must provide for resolution of disputes using a
nonjudicial process, such as mediation, and establish a dispute
resolution protocol that includes the following elements:
(a) A procedure for notifying the other party that a violation has
occurred;
(b) A procedure for establishing whether a violation has in fact
occurred;
(c) An opportunity to correct the violation;
(d) A procedure for terminating the agreement in the event of a
failure to correct the violation, such termination subject to mediation
should the terms of the agreement so allow; and
(e) Termination of the agreement for cause.
(15) The agreement may not include any provisions that impact the
state's share of the master settlement agreement or concern
redistribution of the state's proceeds under the master settlement
agreement.
(16) The department of revenue may share with the Yakama Nation tax
information under RCW 82.32.330 that is necessary for the Yakama
Nation's compliance with the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The taxes imposed by this chapter do not apply to the sale, use,
consumption, handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes by a
tribal retailer during the effective period of a cigarette tax
agreement under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.0316 and 2005 c 11 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
cigarettes by an Indian retailer during the effective period of a
cigarette tax contract subject to RCW 43.06.455 or a cigarette tax
agreement under RCW 43.06.465 or section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.0316 and 2005 c 11 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of cigarettes sold by an Indian retailer during the effective
period of a cigarette tax contract subject to RCW 43.06.455 or a
cigarette tax agreement under RCW 43.06.465 or section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In December 2007 it was announced that a
cigarette tax agreement between the state of Washington and the Yakama
Nation had been reached in principle. The legislature must provide
authorization to the governor to sign such an agreement. Because the
parties have reached an agreement in principle, time for implementation
is of the essence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---