BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of
retirement systems pertaining to the dependent care assistance program
are transferred to the health care authority.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
retirement systems pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the health care
authority. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with
the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the
health care authority.
(b) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds,
books, documents, records, papers, files, or other tangible property
used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the
duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management
shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the
same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the department of
retirement systems pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the health care
authority. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full
force and shall be performed by the health care authority.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the
department of retirement systems shall not affect the validity of any
act performed before the effective date of this section.
(5) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.011 and 2007 c 488 s 2 and 2007 c 114 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.
(2) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(6) "Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees
of the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and
appointed officials of the executive branch of government, including
full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees; and includes
any or all part-time and temporary employees under the terms and
conditions established under this chapter by the authority; justices of
the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and the superior
courts; and members of the state legislature or of the legislative
authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office after
February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees of a
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if
the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of
the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with
the authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205 and 41.05.021(1)(g); (b)
employees of employee organizations representing state civil service
employees, at the option of each such employee organization, and,
effective October 1, 1995, employees of employee organizations
currently pooled with employees of school districts for the purpose of
purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such employee
organization; (c) employees of a school district if the authority
agrees to provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by
contract with the authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350; and (d)
employees of a tribal government, if the governing body of the tribal
government seeks and receives the approval of the authority to provide
any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as
provided in RCW 41.05.021(1) (f) and (g).
(7) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(8) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(9) "((Benefits contribution)) Premium payment plan" means a
((premium only contribution plan, a medical flexible spending
arrangement, or a cafeteria)) benefit plan whereby state and public
employees may ((agree to a contribution to benefit costs which will
allow the employee to participate in benefits offered)) pay their share
of group health plan premiums with pretax dollars as provided in the
salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125
or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(10) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(11) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the ((benefits contribution)) salary
reduction plan.
(12) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(13) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(40), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(14) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
members of the Washington state patrol retirement fund as defined in
RCW 43.43.120, and reserve officers and firefighters as defined in RCW
41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of
employment as determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department
of labor and industries.
(15) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(16) "Employing agency" means a division, department, or separate
agency of state government; a county, municipality, school district,
educational service district, or other political subdivision; and a
tribal government covered by this chapter.
(17) "Tribal government" means an Indian tribal government as
defined in section 3(32) of the employee retirement income security act
of 1974, as amended, or an agency or instrumentality of the tribal
government, that has government offices principally located in this
state.
(18) "Dependent care assistance program" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may pay for certain employment
related dependent care with pretax dollars as provided in the salary
reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 129 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.
(19) "Salary reduction plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may agree to a reduction of salary on a pretax basis
to participate in the dependent care assistance program, medical
flexible spending arrangement, or premium payment plan offered pursuant
to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(20) "Medical flexible spending arrangement" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may reduce their salary before taxes
to pay for medical expenses not reimbursed by insurance as provided in
the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec.
125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.05.300 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 11 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state of Washington may enter into ((benefits contribution
plans)) salary reduction agreements with employees of the state
pursuant to the internal revenue code, ((26 U.S.C. Sec. 125,)) for the
purpose of making it possible for employees of the state to select on
a "before-tax basis" certain taxable and nontaxable benefits ((pursuant
to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125)). The purpose of the ((benefits contribution))
salary reduction plan established in this chapter is to attract and
retain individuals in governmental service by permitting them to enter
into agreements with the state to provide for benefits pursuant to 26
U.S.C. Sec. 125, 26 U.S.C. Sec. 129, and other applicable sections of
the internal revenue code.
(2) Nothing in the ((benefits contribution)) salary reduction plan
constitutes an employment agreement between the participant and the
state, and nothing contained in the participant's ((benefits
contribution)) salary reduction agreement, the plan, this section, or
RCW 41.05.123, 41.05.310 through 41.05.360, and section 1 of this act
gives a participant any right to be retained in state employment.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.05.310 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 12 are each amended
to read as follows:
The authority shall have responsibility for the formulation and
adoption of a plan, policies, and procedures designed to guide, direct,
and administer the ((benefits contribution)) salary reduction plan.
For the plan year beginning January 1, 1996, the administrator may
establish a premium only ((contribution)) plan. Expansion of the
((benefits contribution)) salary reduction plan ((to a medical flexible
spending arrangement)) or cafeteria plan during subsequent plan years
shall be subject to approval by the director of the office of financial
management.
(1) A plan document describing the benefits ((contribution))
offered under the salary reduction plan shall be adopted and
administered by the authority. The authority shall represent the state
in all matters concerning the administration of the plan. The state,
through the authority, may engage the services of a professional
consultant or administrator on a contractual basis to serve as an agent
to assist the authority or perform the administrative functions
necessary in carrying out the purposes of RCW 41.05.123, 41.05.300
through 41.05.350, and section 1 of this act.
(2) The authority shall formulate and establish policies and
procedures for the administration of the ((benefits contribution))
salary reduction plan that are consistent with existing state law, the
internal revenue code, and the regulations adopted by the internal
revenue service as they may apply to the benefits offered to
participants under the plan.
(3) Every action taken by the authority in administering RCW
41.05.123, 41.05.300 through 41.05.350, and section 1 of this act shall
be presumed to be a fair and reasonable exercise of the authority
vested in or the duties imposed upon it. The authority shall be
presumed to have exercised reasonable care, diligence, and prudence and
to have acted impartially as to all persons interested unless the
contrary be proved by clear and convincing affirmative evidence.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.05.320 and 2007 c 492 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Elected officials and ((all)) permanent employees of the state
are eligible to participate in the ((benefits contribution)) salary
reduction plan and ((contribute amount(s))) reduce their salary by
agreement with the authority. The authority may adopt rules to: (a)
Limit the participation of employing agencies and their employees in
the plan; and (b) permit participation in the plan by temporary
employees of the state.
(2) Persons eligible under subsection (1) of this section may enter
into ((benefits contribution)) salary reduction agreements with the
state.
(3)(a) ((In the initial year of the medical flexible spending
arrangement or cafeteria plan, if authorized, an eligible person may
become a participant after the adoption of the plan and before its
effective date by agreeing to have a portion of his or her gross salary
contributed and deposited into a health care and other benefits account
to be used for reimbursement of expenses covered by the plan.
(b) After the initial year of the medical flexible spending
arrangement or cafeteria plan, if authorized,)) An eligible person may
become a participant of the salary reduction plan for a full plan
year((,)) with annual benefit plan selection for each new plan year
made before the beginning of the plan year, as determined by the
authority, or upon becoming eligible.
(((c))) (b) Once an eligible person elects to participate in the
salary reduction plan and determines the amount ((of)) his or her gross
salary ((that he or she)) shall ((contribute)) be reduced and the
benefit plan for which the funds are to be used during the plan year
((is determined)), the agreement shall be irrevocable and may not be
amended during the plan year except as provided in (((d))) (c) of this
subsection. Prior to making an election to participate in the
((benefits contribution)) salary reduction plan, the eligible person
shall be informed in writing of all the benefits and ((contributions))
reductions that will occur as a result of such election.
(((d))) (c) The authority shall provide in the ((benefits
contribution)) salary reduction plan that a participant may enroll,
terminate, or change his or her election after the plan year has begun
if there is a significant change in a participant's status, as provided
by 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 and the regulations adopted under that section
and defined by the authority.
(4) The authority shall establish as part of the ((benefits
contribution)) salary reduction plan the procedures for and effect of
withdrawal from the plan by reason of retirement, death, leave of
absence, or termination of employment. To the extent possible under
federal law, the authority shall protect participants from forfeiture
of rights under the plan.
(5) Any ((contribution)) reduction of salary under the ((benefits
contribution)) salary reduction plan shall ((continue to be included
as)) not reduce the reportable compensation for the purpose of
computing the state retirement and pension benefits earned by the
employee pursuant to chapters 41.26, 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, and
43.43 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.05.123 and 2005 c 143 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((medical)) flexible spending administrative account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the
following must be deposited in the account: (a) Revenues from
employing agencies for costs associated with operating the medical
flexible spending arrangement program and the dependent care assistance
program provided through the salary reduction plan authorized under
this chapter; (b) funds transferred from the dependent care
administrative account; and (((b))) (c) unclaimed moneys at the end of
the plan year after all timely submitted claims for that plan year have
been processed. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
administrative and other expenses related to operating the medical
flexible spending ((account)) arrangement program and the dependent
care assistance program provided through the salary reduction plan
authorized under this chapter. Only the administrator or the
administrator's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) The salary reduction account is established in the state
treasury. Employee salary reductions paid to reimburse participants or
service providers for benefits provided by the medical flexible
spending arrangement program and the dependent care assistance program
provided through the salary reduction plan authorized under this
chapter shall be paid from the salary reduction account. The funds
held by the state to pay for benefits provided by the medical flexible
spending arrangement program and the dependent care assistance program
provided through the salary reduction plan authorized under this
chapter shall be deposited in the salary reduction account. Unclaimed
moneys remaining in the salary reduction account at the end of a plan
year after all timely submitted claims for that plan year have been
processed shall become a part of the flexible spending administrative
account. Only the administrator or the administrator's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is not subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW and an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.
(3) Program claims reserves and money necessary for start-up costs
transferred from the public employees' and retirees' insurance account
established in RCW 41.05.120 may be deposited in the flexible spending
administrative account. Moneys in excess of the amount necessary for
administrative and operating expenses of the medical flexible spending
((account)) arrangement program may be transferred to the public
employees' and retirees' insurance account.
(((3))) (4) The authority may periodically bill employing agencies
for costs associated with operating the medical flexible spending
((account)) arrangement program and the dependent care assistance
program provided through the salary reduction plan authorized under
this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.05.330 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 14 are each amended
to read as follows:
The authority shall keep or cause to be kept full and adequate
accounts and records of the assets, obligations, transactions, and
affairs of a ((benefits contribution)) salary reduction plan created
under RCW 41.05.300.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.05.340 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 15 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state may terminate the ((benefits contribution)) salary
reduction plan at the end of the plan year or upon notification of
federal action affecting the status of the plan.
(2) The authority may amend the ((benefits contribution)) salary
reduction plan at any time if the amendment does not affect the rights
of the participants to receive eligible reimbursement from the
participants' ((benefits contribution)) accounts.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.05.350 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
The authority shall adopt rules necessary to implement RCW
41.05.123, 41.05.300 through 41.05.340, and section 1 of this act.

Sec. 10 RCW 41.05.360 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
RCW 41.05.123, 41.05.300 through 41.05.350, and section 1 of this
act shall be construed to effectuate the purposes of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125
and other applicable sections of the internal revenue code as required.

Sec. 11 RCW 28B.50.874 and 1998 c 116 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the state system of community and technical colleges assumes
administrative control of the vocational-technical institutes,
personnel employed by the vocational-technical institutes shall:
(1) Suffer no reduction in compensation, benefits, seniority, or
employment status. After September 1, 1991, classified employees shall
continue to be covered by chapter 41.56 RCW and faculty members and
administrators shall be covered by chapter 28B.50 RCW;
(2) To the extent applicable to faculty members, any faculty
currently employed on a "continuing contract" basis under RCW
28A.405.210 be awarded tenure pursuant to RCW 28B.50.851 through
28B.50.873, except for any faculty members who are provisional
employees under RCW 28A.405.220;
(3) Be eligible to participate in the health care and other
insurance plans provided by the health care authority and the ((state))
public employees' benefits board pursuant to chapter 41.05 RCW;
(4) Be eligible to participate in old age annuities or retirement
income plans under the rules of the state board for community and
technical colleges pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400 or the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 for personnel employed before July 1, 1977, or
plan 2 for personnel employed after July 1, 1977, under chapter 41.32
RCW; however, no affected vocational-technical institute employee shall
be required to choose from among any available retirement plan options
prior to six months after September 1, 1991;
(5) Have transferred to their new administrative college district
all accrued sick and vacation leave and thereafter shall earn and use
all such leave under the rule established pursuant to RCW 28B.50.551;
(6) Be eligible to participate in the deferred compensation plan
and ((the dependent care)) programs pursuant to RCW ((41.04.600))
41.05.123, 41.05.300 through 41.05.360, and section 1 of this act under
the applicable rules.
An exclusive bargaining representative certified to represent a
bargaining unit covering employees of a vocational technical institute
on September 1, 1991, shall remain the exclusive representative of such
employees thereafter until and unless such representative is replaced
or decertified in accordance with state law.
Any collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 30, 1991,
shall remain in effect as it applies to employees of vocational
technical institutes until its expiration or renewal date or until
renegotiated or renewed in accordance with chapter 28B.52 or 41.56 RCW.
After the expiration date of a collective bargaining agreement, all of
the terms and conditions specified in the collective bargaining
agreement, as it applies to employees of vocational-technical
institutes, shall remain in effect until the effective date of a
subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from the termination date
stated in the agreement. The board of trustees and the employees may
mutually agree to continue the terms and conditions of the agreement
beyond the one year extension. However, nothing in this section shall
be construed to deny any employee right granted under chapter 28B.52 or
41.56 RCW. Labor relations processes and agreements covering faculty
members of vocational technical institutes after September 1, 1991,
shall be governed by chapter 28B.52 RCW. Labor relations processes and
agreements covering classified employees of vocational technical
institutes after September 1, 1991, shall continue to be governed by
chapter 41.56 RCW.

Sec. 12 RCW 41.50.780 and 2001 c 181 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The deferred compensation principal account is hereby created
in the state treasury.
(2) The amount of compensation deferred by employees under
agreements entered into under the authority contained in RCW 41.50.770
shall be paid into the deferred compensation principal account and
shall be sufficient to cover costs of administration and staffing in
addition to such other amounts as determined by the department. The
deferred compensation principal account shall be used to carry out the
purposes of RCW 41.50.770. All eligible state employees shall be given
the opportunity to participate in agreements entered into by the
department under RCW 41.50.770. State agencies shall cooperate with
the department in providing employees with the opportunity to
participate.
(3) Any county, municipality, or other subdivision of the state may
elect to participate in any agreements entered into by the department
under RCW 41.50.770, including the making of payments therefrom to the
employees participating in a deferred compensation plan upon their
separation from state or other qualifying service. Accordingly, the
deferred compensation principal account shall be considered to be a
public pension or retirement fund within the meaning of Article XXIX,
section 1 of the state Constitution, for the purpose of determining
eligible investments and deposits of the moneys therein.
(4) All moneys in the state deferred compensation principal account
and the state deferred compensation administrative account, all
property and rights purchased therewith, and all income attributable
thereto, shall be held in trust by the state investment board, as set
forth under RCW 43.33A.030, for the exclusive benefit of the state
deferred compensation plan's participants and their beneficiaries.
Neither the participant, nor the participant's beneficiary or
beneficiaries, nor any other designee, has any right to commute, sell,
assign, transfer, or otherwise convey the right to receive any payments
under the plan. These payments and right thereto are nonassignable and
nontransferable. Unpaid accumulated deferrals are not subject to
attachment, garnishment, or execution and are not transferable by
operation of law in event of bankruptcy or insolvency, except to the
extent otherwise required by law.
(5) The state investment board has the full power to invest moneys
in the state deferred compensation principal account and the state
deferred compensation administrative account in accordance with RCW
43.84.150, 43.33A.140, and 41.50.770, and cumulative investment
directions received pursuant to RCW 41.50.770. All investment and
operating costs of the state investment board associated with the
investment of the deferred compensation plan assets shall be paid
pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of these
expenses, one hundred percent of all earnings from these investments
shall accrue directly to the deferred compensation principal account.
(6)(a) No state board or commission, agency, or any officer,
employee, or member thereof is liable for any loss or deficiency
resulting from participant investments selected pursuant to RCW
41.50.770(3).
(b) Neither the employee retirement benefits board nor the state
investment board, nor any officer, employee, or member thereof is
liable for any loss or deficiency resulting from reasonable efforts to
implement investment directions pursuant to RCW 41.50.770(3).
(7) The deferred compensation administrative account is hereby
created in the state treasury. All expenses of the department
pertaining to the deferred compensation plan including staffing and
administrative expenses shall be paid out of the deferred compensation
administrative account. Any excess balances credited to this account
over administrative expenses disbursed from this account shall be
transferred to the deferred compensation principal account at such time
and in such amounts as may be determined by the department with the
approval of the office of financial management. Any deficiency in the
deferred compensation administrative account caused by an excess of
administrative expenses disbursed from this account shall be
transferred to this account from the deferred compensation principal
account.
(8) ((In addition to the duties specified in this section and RCW
41.50.770, the department shall administer the salary reduction plan
established in RCW 41.04.600 through 41.04.645.
(9)))(a)(i) The department shall keep or cause to be kept full and
adequate accounts and records of the assets of each individual
participant, obligations, transactions, and affairs of any deferred
compensation plans created under RCW 41.50.770 and this section. The
department shall account for and report on the investment of state
deferred compensation plan assets or may enter into an agreement with
the state investment board for such accounting and reporting.
(ii) The department's duties related to individual participant
accounts include conducting the activities of trade instruction,
settlement activities, and direction of cash movement and related wire
transfers with the custodian bank and outside investment firms.
(iii) The department has sole responsibility for contracting with
any recordkeepers for individual participant accounts and shall manage
the performance of recordkeepers under those contracts.
(b)(i) The department's duties under (a)(ii) of this subsection do
not limit the authority of the state investment board to conduct its
responsibilities for asset management and balancing of the deferred
compensation funds.
(ii) The state investment board has sole responsibility for
contracting with outside investment firms to provide investment
management for the deferred compensation funds and shall manage the
performance of investment managers under those contracts.
(c) The state treasurer shall designate and define the terms of
engagement for the custodial banks.
(((10))) (9) The department may adopt rules necessary to carry out
its responsibilities under RCW 41.50.770 and this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 On the effective date of this section, the
treasurer shall transfer all funds in the dependent care administrative
account into the flexible spending administrative account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed:
(1) RCW 41.04.600 (Dependent care -- Salary reduction plan -- Purpose)
and 1987 c 475 s 1;
(2) RCW 41.04.605 (Dependent care -- Salary reduction plan--Definitions) and 1998 c 116 s 3 & 1987 c 475 s 2;
(3) RCW 41.04.610 (Dependent care -- Salary reduction plan -- Powers
and duties of department) and 1998 c 116 s 4 & 1987 c 475 s 3;
(4) RCW 41.04.615 (Dependent care -- Salary reduction plan document--Funds, fees, and appropriations -- Dependent care administrative account
created -- Presumptions) and 1998 c 116 s 5, 1993 c 34 s 1, & 1987 c 475
s 4;
(5) RCW 41.04.620 (Dependent care -- Salary reduction plan--Participation by eligible persons -- Enrollment, termination, or
modification) and 1998 c 116 s 6 & 1987 c 475 s 5;
(6) RCW 41.04.625 (Dependent care -- Salary reduction account) and
1987 c 475 s 6;
(7) RCW 41.04.630 (Dependent care -- Salary reduction plan -- Records
and reports) and 1998 c 245 s 36, 1998 c 116 s 7, & 1987 c 475 s 7;
(8) RCW 41.04.635 (Dependent care -- Salary reduction plan--Termination or amendment of plan) and 1998 c 116 s 8 & 1987 c 475 s 8;
(9) RCW 41.04.640 (Dependent care -- Salary reduction plan -- Adoption
of rules) and 1998 c 116 s 9 & 1987 c 475 s 9; and
(10) RCW 41.04.645 (Dependent care -- Salary reduction plan--Construction of statutes) and 1987 c 475 s 10.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---