BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.32 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the powers and duties enumerated in RCW 74.32.130,
the governor's advisory committee on vendor rates shall conduct an
extensive examination of rates paid to licensed health care providers
to determine whether the rates paid by the department of social and
health services are reasonable and necessary to ensure that medical
program participants have access to accessible, quality services. The
examination shall include an evaluation of whether current vendor rates
result in a cost shift from public purchasers to private purchasers of
health care. If expansions of public medical programs are proposed or
enacted, the governor's committee on vendor rates shall determine
whether a cost shift from public purchasers to private purchasers of
health care will occur, and the extent of the cost shift.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.20A.405 and 1971 ex.s. c 309 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
After obtaining the review and advice of the governor's advisory
committee on vendor rates, the secretary shall establish rates of
payment for services which are to be purchased: PROVIDED, That the
secretary shall afford all interested persons reasonable opportunity to
submit data, views, or arguments, and shall consider fully all
submissions respecting the proposed rates. Prior to the establishment
of such rates, the secretary shall give at least twenty days notice of
such intended action by mail to such persons or agencies as have made
timely request of the secretary for advance notice of establishment of
such vendor rates. Such rates shall not exceed the amounts reasonable
and necessary to assure quality services and shall not exceed the costs
reasonably assignable to such services pursuant to cost finding and
monitoring procedures to be established by the secretary. Vendor rates
for medical services purchased by the department shall include amounts
reasonable and necessary to ensure access to licensed health care
providers by all medical program participants by eliminating any cost
shifting due to inadequate vendor rates. Information to support such
rates of payment shall be maintained in a form accessible to the
public.

--- END ---