BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of social and health
services shall prepare a report on strategies for developing consumer
and family run services. The report shall include the following:
(a) A plan for implementation of consumer and family run services
in Washington;
(b) Amendment of the mental health waiver and state plan related to
utilization of medicaid for financing of services provided by community
service agencies;
(c) Identification of funding and resources needed for
implementation of these services;
(d) Recommendations related to licensing or certification
requirements that should be applied to community service agencies;
(e) Recommendations related to assuring the services provided by
community service agencies are integrated with other treatment
services; and
(f) Technical assistance needed to assist community service
agencies to organize and become licensed or certified and eligible for
receipt of medicaid funding.
(2) The department shall develop the report, including the
amendment of the medicaid waiver and mental health state plan, in
cooperation with a group of mental health consumers and family members.
The report shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the
senate and house of representatives by January 1, 2009.

--- END ---