BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.210 and 2005 c 246 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application
providing the following information concerning his or her
qualifications as a voter in this state:
(1) The address of the last former registration of the applicant as
a voter in the state;
(2) The applicant's full name;
(3) The applicant's date of birth;
(4) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes;
(5) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the
same as the address in subsection (4) of this section;
(6) The sex of the applicant;
(7) The applicant's Washington state driver's license number or
Washington state identification card number, or the last four digits of
the applicant's Social Security number if he or she does not have a
Washington state driver's license or Washington state identification
card;
(8) A check box for the applicant to indicate that he or she does
not have a Washington state driver's license, Washington state
identification card, or Social Security number;
(9) A check box allowing the applicant to indicate that he or she
is a member of the armed forces, national guard, or reserves, or that
he or she is an overseas voter;
(10) A check box allowing the applicant to confirm that he or she
is at least ((eighteen)) sixteen years of age;
(11) Clear and conspicuous language, designed to draw the
applicant's attention, stating that the applicant must be a United
States citizen in order to register to vote;
(12) A check box and declaration confirming that the applicant is
a citizen of the United States;
(13) The following warning:
"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter
registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your
qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class
C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, a
fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both."
(14) The following affirmation by the applicant:
"By signing this document, I hereby assert, under penalty of
perjury, that I am legally eligible to vote. If I am found to have
voted illegally, I may be prosecuted and/or fined for this illegal act.
In addition, I hereby acknowledge that my name and last known address
will be forwarded to the appropriate state and/or federal authorities
if I am found to have voted illegally."
(15) The oath required by RCW 29A.08.230 and a space for the
applicant's signature; and
(16) Any other information that the secretary of state determines
is necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and prevent
duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.
This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to
be prescribed by the secretary of state.
If the applicant fails to provide the information required for
voter registration, the auditor shall send the applicant a verification
notice. The applicant may not be registered until the required
information is provided. If a verification notice is returned as
undeliverable or the applicant fails to respond to the notice within
forty-five days, the applicant shall not be registered to vote.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.08.230 and 2003 c 111 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
For all voter registrations, the registrant shall sign the
following oath:

"I declare that the facts on this voter registration form are true.
I am a citizen of the United States, I am not presently denied my civil
rights as a result of being convicted of a felony, I will have lived in
Washington at this address for thirty days immediately before the next
election at which I vote, and I will be at least ((eighteen)) sixteen
years old when I vote."

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.330 and 2005 c 246 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall prescribe the method of voter
registration for each designated agency. The agency shall use either
the state voter registration by mail form with a separate declination
form for the applicant to indicate that he or she declines to register
at this time, or the agency may use a separate form approved for use by
the secretary of state.
(2) The person providing service at the agency shall offer voter
registration services to every client whenever he or she applies for
service or assistance and with each renewal, recertification, or change
of address. The person providing service shall give the applicant the
same level of assistance with the voter registration application as is
offered to fill out the agency's forms and documents, including
information about age and citizenship requirements for voter
registration.
(3) The person providing service at the agency shall determine if
the prospective applicant wants to register to vote or transfer his or
her voter registration by asking the following question:

"Do you want to register to vote or transfer your voter
registration?"

If the applicant chooses to register or transfer a registration,
the service agent shall ask the following:

(a) "Are you a United States citizen?"
(b) "Are you or will you be ((eighteen)) sixteen years of age on or
before the next election?"

If the applicant answers in the affirmative to both questions, the
agent shall then provide the applicant with a voter registration form
and instructions and shall record that the applicant has requested to
register to vote or transfer a voter registration. If the applicant
answers in the negative to either question, the agent shall not provide
the applicant with a voter registration form.
(4) If an agency uses a computerized application process, it may,
in consultation with the secretary of state, develop methods to capture
simultaneously the information required for voter registration during
a person's computerized application process.
(5) Each designated agency shall provide for the voter registration
application forms to be collected from each agency office at least once
each week. The agency shall then forward the application forms to the
secretary of state each week. The secretary of state shall forward the
forms to the county in which the applicant has registered to vote no
later than ten days after the date on which the forms were received by
the secretary of state.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.08.810 and 2006 c 320 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Registration of a person as a voter is presumptive evidence of
his or her right to vote. A challenge to the person's right to vote
must be based on personal knowledge of one of the following:
(a) The challenged voter has been convicted of a felony and the
voter's civil rights have not been restored;
(b) The challenged voter has been judicially declared ineligible to
vote due to mental incompetency;
(c) The challenged voter does not live at the residential address
provided, in which case the challenger must either:
(i) Provide the challenged voter's actual residence on the
challenge form; or
(ii) Submit evidence that he or she exercised due diligence to
verify that the challenged voter does not reside at the address
provided and to attempt to contact the challenged voter to learn the
challenged voter's actual residence, including that the challenger
personally:
(A) Sent a letter with return service requested to the challenged
voter's residential address provided, and to the challenged voter's
mailing address, if provided;
(B) Visited the residential address provided and contacted persons
at the address to determine whether the voter resides at the address
and, if not, obtained and submitted with the challenge form a signed
affidavit subject to the penalties of perjury from a person who owns or
manages property, resides, or is employed at the address provided, that
to his or her personal knowledge the challenged voter does not reside
at the address as provided on the voter registration;
(C) Searched local telephone directories, including online
directories, to determine whether the voter maintains a telephone
listing at any address in the county;
(D) Searched county auditor property records to determine whether
the challenged voter owns any property in the county; and
(E) Searched the statewide voter registration database to determine
if the voter is registered at any other address in the state;
(d) The challenged voter will not be ((eighteen)) sixteen years of
age by the next election; or
(e) The challenged voter is not a citizen of the United States.
(2) A person's right to vote may be challenged: By another
registered voter or the county prosecuting attorney at any time, or by
the poll site judge or inspector if the challenge is filed on election
day regarding a voter who presents himself or herself to vote at the
poll site.
(3) The challenger must file a signed affidavit subject to the
penalties of perjury swearing that, to his or her personal knowledge
and belief, having exercised due diligence to personally verify the
evidence presented, the challenged voter either is not qualified to
vote or does not reside at the address given on his or her voter
registration record based on one of the reasons allowed in subsection
(1) of this section. The challenger must provide the factual basis for
the challenge, including any information required by subsection (1)(c)
of this section, in the signed affidavit. The challenge may not be
based on unsupported allegations or allegations by anonymous third
parties. All documents pertaining to the challenge are public records.
(4) Challenges based on a felony conviction under RCW 29A.08.520
must be heard according to RCW 29A.08.520 and rules adopted by the
secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect if the proposed
amendment to Article VI, section 1 of the state Constitution is validly
submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next
general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and
ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---