BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of this chapter is to promote the
public interest, support the availability of long-term care coverage,
establish standards for long-term care coverage, facilitate public
understanding and comparison of long-term care contract benefits,
protect persons insured under long-term care insurance policies and
certificates, protect applicants for long-term care policies from
unfair or deceptive sales or enrollment practices, and provide for
flexibility and innovation in the development of long-term care
insurance coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This chapter applies to all long-term care
insurance policies, contracts, or riders delivered or issued for
delivery in this state on or after January 1, 2009. This chapter does
not supersede the obligations of entities subject to this chapter to
comply with other applicable laws to the extent that they do not
conflict with this chapter, except that laws and regulations designed
and intended to apply to medicare supplement insurance policies shall
not be applied to long-term care insurance.
(1) Coverage advertised, marketed, or offered as long-term care
insurance shall comply with the provisions of this chapter. Any
coverage, policy, or rider advertised, marketed, or offered as long-term care or nursing home insurance shall comply with the provisions of
this chapter.
(2) Individual and group long-term care contracts issued prior to
January 1, 2009, remain governed by chapter 48.84 RCW and rules adopted
thereunder.
(3) This chapter is not intended to prohibit approval of long-term
care funded through life insurance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means: (a) In the case of an individual long-term
care insurance policy, the person who seeks to contract for benefits;
and (b) in the case of a group long-term care insurance policy, the
proposed certificate holder.
(2) "Certificate" includes any certificate issued under a group
long-term care insurance policy that has been delivered or issued for
delivery in this state.
(3) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of Washington
state.
(4) "Issuer" includes insurance companies, fraternal benefit
societies, health care service contractors, health maintenance
organizations, or other entity delivering or issuing for delivery any
long-term care insurance policy, contract, or rider.
(5) "Long-term care insurance" means an insurance policy, contract,
or rider that is advertised, marketed, offered, or designed to provide
coverage for at least twelve consecutive months for a covered person.
Long-term care insurance maybe on an expense incurred, indemnity,
prepaid, or other basis, for one or more necessary or medically
necessary diagnostic, preventive, therapeutic, rehabilitative,
maintenance, or personal care services, provided in a setting other
than an acute care unit of a hospital. Long-term care insurance
includes any policy, contract, or rider that provides for payment of
benefits based upon cognitive impairment or the loss of functional
capacity.
(a) Long-term care insurance includes group and individual
annuities and life insurance policies or riders that provide directly
or supplement long-term care insurance. However, long-term care
insurance does not include life insurance policies that: (i)
Accelerate the death benefit specifically for one or more of the
qualifying events of terminal illness, medical conditions requiring
extraordinary medical intervention, or permanent institutional
confinement; (ii) provide the option of a lump-sum payment for those
benefits; and (iii) do not condition the benefits or the eligibility
for the benefits upon the receipt of long-term care.
(b) Long-term care insurance also includes qualified long-term care
insurance contracts.
(c) Long-term care insurance does not include any insurance policy,
contract, or rider that is offered primarily to provide coverage for
basic medicare supplement, basic hospital expense, basic medical-surgical expense, hospital confinement indemnity, major medical
expense, disability income, related income, asset protection, accident
only, specified disease, specified accident, or limited benefit health.
(6) "Group long-term care insurance" means a long-term care
insurance policy or contract that is delivered or issued for delivery
in this state and is issued to:
(a) One or more employers; one or more labor organizations; or a
trust or the trustees of a fund established by one or more employers or
labor organizations for current or former employees, current or former
members of the labor organizations, or a combination of current and
former employees or members, or a combination of such employers, labor
organizations, trusts, or trustees; or
(b) A professional, trade, or occupational association for its
members or former or retired members, if the association:
(i) Is composed of persons who are or were all actively engaged in
the same profession, trade, or occupation; and
(ii) Has been maintained in good faith for purposes other than
obtaining insurance; or
(c)(i) An association, trust, or the trustees of a fund
established, created, or maintained for the benefit of members of one
or more associations. Before advertising, marketing, or offering long-term care coverage in this state, the association or associations, or
the insurer of the association or associations, must file evidence with
the commissioner that the association or associations have at the time
of such filing at least one hundred persons who are members and that
the association or associations have been organized and maintained in
good faith for purposes other than that of obtaining insurance; have
been in active existence for at least one year; and have a constitution
and bylaws that provide that:
(A) The association or associations hold regular meetings at least
annually to further the purposes of the members;
(B) Except for credit unions, the association or associations
collect dues or solicit contributions from members; and
(C) The members have voting privileges and representation on the
governing board and committees of the association.
(ii) Thirty days after filing the evidence in accordance with this
section, the association or associations will be deemed to have
satisfied the organizational requirements, unless the commissioner
makes a finding that the association or associations do not satisfy
those organizational requirements.
(d) A group other than as described in (a), (b), or (c) of this
subsection subject to a finding by the commissioner that:
(i) The issuance of the group policy is not contrary to the best
interest of the public;
(ii) The issuance of the group policy would result in economies of
acquisition or administration; and
(iii) The benefits are reasonable in relation to the premiums
charged.
(7) "Policy" includes a document such as an insurance policy,
contract, subscriber agreement, rider, or endorsement delivered or
issued for delivery in this state by an insurer, fraternal benefit
society, health care service contractor, health maintenance
organization, or any similar entity authorized by the insurance
commissioner to transact the business of long-term care insurance.
(8) "Qualified long-term care insurance contract" or "federally
tax-qualified long-term care insurance contract" means:
(a) An individual or group insurance contract that meets the
requirements of section 7702B(b) of the internal revenue code of 1986,
as amended; or
(b) The portion of a life insurance contract that provides long-term care insurance coverage by rider or as part of the contract and
that satisfies the requirements of sections 7702B(b) and (e) of the
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A group long-term care insurance policy may
not be offered to a resident of this state under a group policy issued
in another state to a group described in section 3(6)(d) of this act,
unless this state or another state having statutory and regulatory
long-term care insurance requirements substantially similar to those
adopted in this state has made a determination that such requirements
have been met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A long-term care insurance policy or
certificate may not define "preexisting condition" more restrictively
than as a condition for which medical advice or treatment was
recommended by or received from a provider of health care services,
within six months preceding the effective date of coverage of an
insured person, unless the policy or certificate applies to group long-term care insurance under section 3(6) (a), (b), or (c) of this act.
(2) A long-term care insurance policy or certificate may not
exclude coverage for a loss or confinement that is the result of a
preexisting condition unless the loss or confinement begins within six
months following the effective date of coverage of an insured person,
unless the policy or certificate applies to a group as defined in
section 3(6)(a) of this act.
(3) The commissioner may extend the limitation periods for specific
age group categories in specific policy forms upon finding that the
extension is in the best interest of the public.
(4) An issuer may use an application form designed to elicit the
complete health history of an applicant and underwrite in accordance
with that issuer's established underwriting standards, based on the
answers on that application. Unless otherwise provided in the policy
or certificate and regardless of whether it is disclosed on the
application, a preexisting condition need not be covered until the
waiting period expires.
(5) A long-term care insurance policy or certificate may not
exclude or use waivers or riders to exclude, limit, or reduce coverage
or benefits for specifically named or described preexisting diseases or
physical conditions beyond the waiting period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 No long-term care insurance policy may:
(1) Be canceled, nonrenewed, or otherwise terminated on the grounds
of the age or the deterioration of the mental or physical health of the
insured individual or certificate holder;
(2) Contain a provision establishing a new waiting period in the
event existing coverage is converted to or replaced by a new or other
form within the same company, except with respect to an increase in
benefits voluntarily selected by the insured individual or group
policyholder;
(3) Provide coverage for skilled nursing care only or provide
significantly more coverage for skilled care in a facility than
coverage for lower levels of care;
(4) Condition eligibility for any benefits on a prior
hospitalization requirement;
(5) Condition eligibility for benefits provided in an institutional
care setting on the receipt of a higher level of institutional care;
(6) Condition eligibility for any benefits other than waiver of
premium, postconfinement, postacute care, or recuperative benefits on
a prior institutionalization requirement;
(7) Include a postconfinement, postacute care, or recuperative
benefit unless:
(a) Such requirement is clearly labeled in a separate paragraph of
the policy or certificate entitled "Limitations or Conditions on
Eligibility for Benefits;" and
(b) Such limitations or conditions specify any required number of
days of preconfinement or postconfinement;
(8) Condition eligibility for noninstitutional benefits on the
prior receipt of institutional care;
(9) A long-term care insurance policy or certificate may be field-issued if the compensation to the field issuer is not based on the
number of policies or certificates issued. For purposes of this
section, "field-issued" means a policy or certificate issued by a
producer or a third-party administrator of the policy pursuant to the
underwriting authority by an issuer and using the issuer's underwriting
guidelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Long-term care insurance applicants may
return a policy or certificate for any reason within thirty days after
its delivery and to have the premium refunded.
(2) All long-term care insurance policies and certificates shall
have a notice prominently printed on or attached to the first page of
the policy stating that the applicant may return the policy or
certificate within thirty days after its delivery and to have the
premium refunded.
(3) Refunds or denials of applications must be made within thirty
days of the return or denial.
(4) This section shall not apply to certificates issued pursuant to
a policy issued to a group defined in section 3(6)(a) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) An outline of coverage must be delivered
to a prospective applicant for long-term care insurance at the time of
initial solicitation through means that prominently direct the
attention of the recipient to the document and its purpose.
(a) The commissioner must prescribe a standard format, including
style, arrangement, overall appearance, and the content of an outline
of coverage.
(b) When an insurance producer makes a solicitation in person, he
or she must deliver an outline of coverage before presenting an
application or enrollment form.
(c) In a direct response solicitation, the outline of coverage must
be presented with an application or enrollment form.
(d) If a policy is issued to a group as defined in section 3(6)(a)
of this act, an outline of coverage is not required to be delivered, if
the information that the commissioner requires to be included in the
outline of coverage is in other materials relating to enrollment. Upon
request, any such materials must be made available to the commissioner.
(2) If an issuer approves an application for a long-term care
insurance contract or certificate, the issuer must deliver the contract
or certificate of insurance to the applicant within thirty days after
the date of approval. A policy summary must be delivered with an
individual life insurance policy that provides long-term care benefits
within the policy or by rider. In a direct response solicitation, the
issuer must deliver the policy summary, upon request, before delivery
of the policy, if the applicant requests a summary.
(a) The policy summary shall include:
(i) An explanation of how the long-term care benefit interacts with
other components of the policy, including deductions from any
applicable death benefits;
(ii) An illustration of the amount of benefits, the length of
benefits, and the guaranteed lifetime benefits if any, for each covered
person;
(iii) Any exclusions, reductions, and limitations on benefits of
long-term care;
(iv) A statement that any long-term care inflation protection
option required by section 12 of this act is not available under this
policy; and
(v) If applicable to the policy type, the summary must also
include:
(A) A disclosure of the effects of exercising other rights under
the policy;
(B) A disclosure of guarantees related to long-term care costs of
insurance charges; and
(C) Current and projected maximum lifetime benefits.
(b) The provisions of the policy summary may be incorporated into
a basic illustration required under chapter 48.23A RCW, or into the
policy summary which is required under rules adopted by the
commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If a long-term care benefit funded through
a life insurance policy by the acceleration of the death benefit is in
benefit payment status, a monthly report must be provided to the
policyholder. The report must include:
(1) A record of all long-term care benefits paid out during the
month;
(2) An explanation of any changes in the policy resulting from
paying the long-term care benefits, such as a change in the death
benefit or cash values; and
(3) The amount of long-term care benefits that remain to be paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 All long-term care denials must be made
within sixty days after receipt of a written request made by a
policyholder or certificate holder, or his or her representative. All
denials of long-term care claims by the issuer must provide a written
explanation of the reasons for the denial and make available to the
policyholder or certificate holder all information directly related to
the denial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) An issuer may rescind a long-term care
insurance policy or certificate or deny an otherwise valid long-term
care insurance claim if:
(a) A policy or certificate has been in force for less than six
months and upon a showing of misrepresentation that is material to the
acceptance for coverage; or
(b) A policy or certificate that has been in force for at least six
months but less than two years, upon a showing of misrepresentation
that is both material to the acceptance for coverage and that pertains
to the condition for which benefits are sought.
(2) After a policy or certificate has been in force for two years
it is not contestable upon the grounds of misrepresentation alone.
Such a policy or certificate may be contested only upon a showing that
the insured knowingly and intentionally misrepresented relevant facts
relating to the insured's health.
(3) An issuer's payments for benefits under a long-term care
insurance policy or certificate may not be recovered by the issuer if
the policy or certificate is rescinded.
(4) This section does not apply to the remaining death benefit of
a life insurance policy that accelerates benefits for long-term care
that are governed by RCW 48.23.050 the state's life insurance
incontestability clause. In all other situations, this section shall
apply to life insurance policies that accelerate benefits for long-term
care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The commissioner must establish minimum
standards for inflation protection features.
(2) An issuer must comply with the rules adopted by the
commissioner that establish minimum standards for inflation protection
features.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) Except as provided by this section, a
long-term care insurance policy may not be delivered or issued for
delivery in this state unless the policyholder or certificate holder
has been offered the option of purchasing a policy or certificate that
includes a nonforfeiture benefit. The offer of a nonforfeiture benefit
may be in the form of a rider that is attached to the policy. If a
policyholder or certificate holder declines the nonforfeiture benefit,
the issuer must provide a contingent benefit upon lapse that is
available for a specified period of time following a substantial
increase in premium rates.
(2) If a group long-term care insurance policy is issued, the offer
required in subsection (1) of this section must be made to the group
policyholder. However, if the policy is issued as group long-term care
insurance as defined in section 3(6)(d) of this act other than to a
continuing care retirement community or other similar entity, the
offering shall be made to each proposed certificate holder.
(3) The commissioner must adopt rules specifying the type or types
of nonforfeiture benefits to be offered as part of long-term care
insurance policies and certificates, the standards for nonforfeiture
benefits, and the rules regarding contingent benefit upon lapse,
including a determination of the specified period of time during which
a contingent benefit upon lapse will be available and the substantial
premium rate increase that triggers a contingent benefit upon lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) A person may not sell, solicit, or
negotiate long-term care insurance unless he or she is licensed as an
insurance producer and has successfully completed a one-time training
course by or before July 1, 2009, and successfully completes ongoing
training every twenty-four months thereafter. The training
requirements may be approved as continuing education courses under
chapter 48.17 RCW.
(2)(a) The one-time training required by this section shall consist
of no fewer than eight hours of education and the ongoing training
required by this section shall consist of no fewer than four hours.
(b) The one-time training required shall consist of topics related
to long-term care insurance, long-term care services, and, if
applicable, qualified state long-term care insurance partnership
programs, including, but not limited to the following:
(i) State and federal regulations and requirements and the
relationship between qualified state long-term care insurance
partnership programs and other public and private coverage of long-term
care services, including medicaid;
(ii) Available long-term services and providers;
(iii) Changes or improvements in long-term care services or
providers;
(iv) Alternatives to the purchase of private long-term care
insurance;
(v) The effect of inflation on benefits and the importance of
inflation protection; chapters 48.84 and 48.85 RCW; and
(vi) Consumer suitability standards and guidelines.
(3) The training required by this section shall not include
training that is issuer or company product-specific or that includes
any sales or marketing information, materials, or training, other than
those required by state or federal law.
(4) Issuers shall obtain verification that an insurance producer
receives training required by subsection (1) of this section before
that producer is permitted to sell, solicit, or otherwise negotiate the
issuer's long-term care insurance products.
(5) Issuers shall maintain records subject to the state's record
retention requirements and shall make evidence of that verification
available to the commissioner upon request.
(6)(a) Issuers shall maintain records with respect to the training
of its producers concerning the distribution of its long-term care
partnership policies that will allow the commissioner to provide
assurance to the state department of social and health services,
medicaid division, that insurance producers engaged in the sale of
long-term care insurance contracts have received the training required
by this section and any rules adopted by the commissioner, and that
producers have demonstrated an understanding of the partnership
policies and their relationship to public and private coverage of long-term care, including medicaid, in this state.
(b) These records shall be maintained in accordance with the
state's record retention requirements and shall be made available to
the commissioner upon request.
(7) The satisfaction of these training requirements for any state
shall be deemed to satisfy the training requirements of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Issuers and their agents, if any, must
determine whether issuing long-term care insurance coverage to a
particular person is appropriate, except in the case of a life
insurance policy that accelerates benefits for long-term care.
(1) An issuer must:
(a) Develop and use suitability standards to determine whether the
purchase or replacement of long-term care coverage is appropriate for
the needs of the applicant or insured;
(b) Train its agents in the use of the issuer's suitability
standards; and
(c) Maintain a copy of its suitability standards and make the
standards available for inspection, upon request.
(2) The following must be considered when determining whether the
applicant meets the issuer's suitability standards:
(a) The ability of the applicant to pay for the proposed coverage
and any other relevant financial information related to the purchase of
or payment for coverage;
(b) The applicant's goals and needs with respect to long-term care
and the advantages and disadvantages of long-term care coverage to meet
those goals or needs; and
(c) The values, benefits, and costs of the applicant's existing
health or long-term care coverage, if any, when compared to the values,
benefits, and costs of the recommended purchase or replacement.
(3) The sale or transfer of any suitability information provided to
the issuer or agent by the applicant to any other person or business
entity is prohibited.
(4)(a) The commissioner shall adopt, by rule, forms of consumer-friendly personal worksheets that issuers and their agents must use for
applications for long-term care coverage.
(b) The commissioner may require each issuer to file its current
forms of suitability standards and personal worksheets with the
commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A person engaged in the issuance or
solicitation of long-term care coverage shall not engage in unfair
methods of competition or unfair or deceptive acts or practices, as
such methods, acts, or practices are defined in chapter 48.30 RCW, or
as defined by the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 An issuer or an insurance producer who
violates a law or rule relating to the regulation of long-term care
insurance or its marketing shall be subject to a fine of up to three
times the amount of the commission paid for each policy involved in the
violation or up to ten thousand dollars, whichever is greater.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) The commissioner must adopt rules that
include standards for full and fair disclosure setting forth the
manner, content, and required disclosures for the sale of long-term
care insurance policies, terms of renewability, initial and subsequent
conditions of eligibility, nonduplication of coverage provisions,
coverage of dependents, preexisting conditions, termination of
insurance, continuation or conversion, probationary periods,
limitations, exceptions, reductions, elimination periods, requirements
for replacement, recurrent conditions, and definitions of terms. The
commissioner must adopt rules establishing loss ratio standards for
long-term care insurance policies. The commissioner must adopt rules
to promote premium adequacy and to protect policyholders in the event
of proposed substantial rate increases, and to establish minimum
standards for producer education, marketing practices, producer
compensation, producer testing, penalties, and reporting practices for
long-term care insurance.
(2) The commissioner shall adopt rules establishing standards
protecting patient privacy rights, rights to receive confidential
health care services, and standards for an issuer's timely review of a
claim denial upon request of a covered person.
(3) The commissioner may adopt reasonable rules to effectuate any
provision of this chapter in accordance with the requirements of
chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 19 RCW 48.84.010 and 1986 c 170 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter may be known and cited as the "long-term care
insurance act" and is intended to govern the content and sale of long-term care insurance and long-term care benefit contracts issued before
January 1, 2009, as defined in this chapter. This chapter shall be
liberally construed to promote the public interest in protecting
purchasers of long-term care insurance from unfair or deceptive sales,
marketing, and advertising practices. The provisions of this chapter
shall apply in addition to other requirements of Title 48 RCW.

Sec. 20 RCW 48.43.005 and 2007 c 296 s 1 and 2007 c 259 s 32 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless otherwise specifically provided, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adjusted community rate" means the rating method used to
establish the premium for health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially
demonstrated differences in utilization or cost attributable to
geographic region, age, family size, and use of wellness activities.
(2) "Basic health plan" means the plan described under chapter
70.47 RCW, as revised from time to time.
(3) "Basic health plan model plan" means a health plan as required
in RCW 70.47.060(2)(e).
(4) "Basic health plan services" means that schedule of covered
health services, including the description of how those benefits are to
be administered, that are required to be delivered to an enrollee under
the basic health plan, as revised from time to time.
(5) "Catastrophic health plan" means:
(a) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering a
single enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars
and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan
(other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least three
thousand five hundred dollars, both amounts to be adjusted annually by
the insurance commissioner; and
(b) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering more
than one enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, three thousand five hundred dollars and an
annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other
than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least six thousand
dollars, both amounts to be adjusted annually by the insurance
commissioner; or
(c) Any health benefit plan that provides benefits for hospital
inpatient and outpatient services, professional and prescription drugs
provided in conjunction with such hospital inpatient and outpatient
services, and excludes or substantially limits outpatient physician
services and those services usually provided in an office setting.
In July 2008, and in each July thereafter, the insurance
commissioner shall adjust the minimum deductible and out-of-pocket
expense required for a plan to qualify as a catastrophic plan to
reflect the percentage change in the consumer price index for medical
care for a preceding twelve months, as determined by the United States
department of labor. The adjusted amount shall apply on the following
January 1st.
(6) "Certification" means a determination by a review organization
that an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or
procedure has been reviewed and, based on the information provided,
meets the clinical requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness,
level of care, or effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable
health benefit plan.
(7) "Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted during
a patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.
(8) "Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a
health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder,
beneficiary of a group plan, or individual covered by any other health
plan.
(9) "Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse
and unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the
enrollee's health benefit plan.
(10) "Eligible employee" means an employee who works on a full-time
basis with a normal work week of thirty or more hours. The term
includes a self-employed individual, including a sole proprietor, a
partner of a partnership, and may include an independent contractor, if
the self-employed individual, sole proprietor, partner, or independent
contractor is included as an employee under a health benefit plan of a
small employer, but does not work less than thirty hours per week and
derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her income from a trade
or business through which he or she has attempted to earn taxable
income and for which he or she has filed the appropriate internal
revenue service form. Persons covered under a health benefit plan
pursuant to the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1986
shall not be considered eligible employees for purposes of minimum
participation requirements of chapter 265, Laws of 1995.
(11) "Emergency medical condition" means the emergent and acute
onset of a symptom or symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead
a prudent layperson acting reasonably to believe that a health
condition exists that requires immediate medical attention, if failure
to provide medical attention would result in serious impairment to
bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a bodily organ or part, or
would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.
(12) "Emergency services" means otherwise covered health care
services medically necessary to evaluate and treat an emergency medical
condition, provided in a hospital emergency department.
(13) "Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means amounts paid to
health carriers directly providing services, health care providers, or
health care facilities by enrollees and may include copayments,
coinsurance, or deductibles.
(14) "Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or on
behalf of a covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services included in the
covered person's health benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues
other than denial of payment for medical services or nonprovision of
medical services, including dissatisfaction with medical care, waiting
time for medical services, provider or staff attitude or demeanor, or
dissatisfaction with service provided by the health carrier.
(15) "Health care facility" or "facility" means hospices licensed
under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW,
rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric
hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers licensed under
chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical
facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and alcohol treatment
facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A RCW, and home health agencies
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and includes such facilities if
owned and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the
state and such other facilities as required by federal law and
implementing regulations.
(16) "Health care provider" or "provider" means:
(a) A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to
practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing
health care services in this state consistent with state law; or
(b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this
subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her employment.
(17) "Health care service" means that service offered or provided
by health care facilities and health care providers relating to the
prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.
(18) "Health carrier" or "carrier" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service
contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.
(19) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means any policy,
contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide, arrange,
reimburse, or pay for health care services except the following:
(a) Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 ((RCW)) or
48.-- RCW (sections 1 through 18 of this act);
(b) Medicare supplemental health insurance governed by chapter
48.66 RCW;
(c) Coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under chapter
55, Title 10, United States Code;
(d) Limited health care services offered by limited health care
service contractors in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;
(e) Disability income;
(f) Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability insurance
policy such as automobile personal injury protection coverage and
homeowner guest medical;
(g) Workers' compensation coverage;
(h) Accident only coverage;
(i) Specified disease or illness-triggered fixed payment insurance,
hospital confinement fixed payment insurance, or other fixed payment
insurance offered as an independent, noncoordinated benefit;
(j) Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;
(k) Dental only and vision only coverage; and
(l) Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to have a short-term
limited purpose or duration, or to be a student-only plan that is
guaranteed renewable while the covered person is enrolled as a regular
full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an accredited higher
education institution, after a written request for such classification
by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.
(20) "Material modification" means a change in the actuarial value
of the health plan as modified of more than five percent but less than
fifteen percent.
(21) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition, illness,
or injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of
coverage.
(22) "Premium" means all sums charged, received, or deposited by a
health carrier as consideration for a health plan or the continuance of
a health plan. Any assessment or any "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a health
carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing.
(23) "Review organization" means a disability insurer regulated
under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service contractor as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health maintenance organization as defined
in RCW 48.46.020, and entities affiliated with, under contract with, or
acting on behalf of a health carrier to perform a utilization review.
(24) "Small employer" or "small group" means any person, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision, sole
proprietor, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged in
business that, on at least fifty percent of its working days during the
preceding calendar quarter, employed at least two but no more than
fifty eligible employees, with a normal work week of thirty or more
hours, the majority of whom were employed within this state, and is not
formed primarily for purposes of buying health insurance and in which
a bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining the
number of eligible employees, companies that are affiliated companies,
or that are eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of
taxation by this state, shall be considered an employer. Subsequent to
the issuance of a health plan to a small employer and for the purpose
of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer shall be
determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically provided, a
small employer shall continue to be considered a small employer until
the plan anniversary following the date the small employer no longer
meets the requirements of this definition. A self-employed individual
or sole proprietor must derive at least seventy-five percent of his or
her income from a trade or business through which the individual or
sole proprietor has attempted to earn taxable income and for which he
or she has filed the appropriate internal revenue service form 1040,
schedule C or F, for the previous taxable year except for a self-employed individual or sole proprietor in an agricultural trade or
business, who must derive at least fifty-one percent of his or her
income from the trade or business through which the individual or sole
proprietor has attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she
has filed the appropriate internal revenue service form 1040, for the
previous taxable year. A self-employed individual or sole proprietor
who is covered as a group of one on the day prior to June 10, 2004,
shall also be considered a "small employer" to the extent that
individual or group of one is entitled to have his or her coverage
renewed as provided in RCW 48.43.035(6).
(25) "Utilization review" means the prospective, concurrent, or
retrospective assessment of the necessity and appropriateness of the
allocation of health care resources and services of a provider or
facility, given or proposed to be given to an enrollee or group of
enrollees.
(26) "Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an activity
consistent with department of health guidelines, such as, smoking
cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse,
appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle
safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education for the
purpose of improving enrollee health status and reducing health service
costs.

Sec. 21 RCW 48.85.010 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 76 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall, in conjunction
with the office of the insurance commissioner, coordinate a long-term
care insurance program entitled the Washington long-term care
partnership, whereby private insurance and medicaid funds shall be used
to finance long-term care. For individuals purchasing a long-term care
insurance policy or contract governed by chapter 48.84 ((RCW)) or 48.--RCW (sections 1 through 18 of this act) and meeting the criteria
prescribed in this chapter, and any other terms as specified by the
office of the insurance commissioner and the department of social and
health services, this program shall allow for the exclusion of some or
all of the individual's assets in determination of medicaid eligibility
as approved by the federal health care financing administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Sections 1 through 18 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---