BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington
state has developed a strong community-based long-term care system in
an effort to honor the desire of elderly persons and persons with
disabilities to live in their own home or other home-like settings and
to provide long-term care services in a cost-effective manner. The
legislature further finds that more than fifteen percent of adults over
age sixty-five in Washington state have diabetes. Current nurse
delegation statutes limit the ability of elderly and disabled persons
with diabetes to remain in their own homes or in other home-like long-term care settings.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to modify nurse delegation
statutes to the extent needed to enable elderly persons and persons
with disabilities who have diabetes to continue to reside in their own
home or other home-like settings. While blood glucose testing is
already a task that can be delegated, the legislature intends to
authorize nurse delegation of administration of insulin injections as
provided in this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.79.260 and 2003 c 140 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A registered nurse under his or her license may perform for
compensation nursing care, as that term is usually understood, to
individuals with illnesses, injuries, or disabilities.
(2) A registered nurse may, at or under the general direction of a
licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, osteopathic physician and
surgeon, naturopathic physician, podiatric physician and surgeon,
physician assistant, osteopathic physician assistant, or advanced
registered nurse practitioner acting within the scope of his or her
license, administer medications, treatments, tests, and inoculations,
whether or not the severing or penetrating of tissues is involved and
whether or not a degree of independent judgment and skill is required.
Such direction must be for acts which are within the scope of
registered nursing practice.
(3) A registered nurse may delegate tasks of nursing care to other
individuals where the registered nurse determines that it is in the
best interest of the patient.
(a) The delegating nurse shall:
(i) Determine the competency of the individual to perform the
tasks;
(ii) Evaluate the appropriateness of the delegation;
(iii) Supervise the actions of the person performing the delegated
task; and
(iv) Delegate only those tasks that are within the registered
nurse's scope of practice.
(b) A registered nurse, working for a home health or hospice agency
regulated under chapter 70.127 RCW, may delegate the application,
instillation, or insertion of medications to a registered or certified
nursing assistant under a plan of care.
(c) Except as authorized in (b) or (e) of this subsection, a
registered nurse may not delegate the administration of medications.
Except as authorized in (e) of this subsection, a registered nurse may
not delegate acts requiring substantial skill, ((and may not delegate))
piercing or severing of tissues. Acts that require nursing judgment
shall not be delegated.
(d) No person may coerce a nurse into compromising patient safety
by requiring the nurse to delegate if the nurse determines that it is
inappropriate to do so. Nurses shall not be subject to any employer
reprisal or disciplinary action by the nursing care quality assurance
commission for refusing to delegate tasks or refusing to provide the
required training for delegation if the nurse determines delegation may
compromise patient safety.
(e) For delegation in community-based care settings or in-home care
settings, a registered nurse may delegate nursing care tasks only to
registered or certified nursing assistants. Simple care tasks such as
blood pressure monitoring, personal care service, diabetic insulin
device set up, verbal verification of insulin dosage for sight-impaired
individuals, or other tasks as defined by the nursing care quality
assurance commission are exempted from this requirement.
(i) "Community-based care settings" includes: Community
residential programs for ((the developmentally disabled)) people with
developmental disabilities, certified by the department of social and
health services under chapter 71A.12 RCW; adult family homes licensed
under chapter 70.128 RCW; and boarding homes licensed under chapter
18.20 RCW. Community-based care settings do not include acute care or
skilled nursing facilities.
(ii) "In-home care settings" include an individual's place of
temporary or permanent residence, but does not include acute care or
skilled nursing facilities, and does not include community-based care
settings as defined in (e)(i) of this subsection.
(iii) Delegation of nursing care tasks in community-based care
settings and in-home care settings is only allowed for individuals who
have a stable and predictable condition. "Stable and predictable
condition" means a situation in which the individual's clinical and
behavioral status is known and does not require the frequent presence
and evaluation of a registered nurse.
(iv) The determination of the appropriateness of delegation of a
nursing task is at the discretion of the registered nurse. ((However))
Other than delegation of the administration of insulin by injection for
the purpose of caring for individuals with diabetes, the administration
of medications by injection, sterile procedures, and central line
maintenance may never be delegated.
(v) When delegating insulin injections under this subsection
(3)(e), the registered nurse delegator must instruct the individual
regarding proper injection procedures and the use of insulin,
demonstrate proper injection procedures, and supervise and evaluate the
individual performing the delegated task weekly during the first four
weeks of delegation of insulin injections. If the registered nurse
delegator determines that the individual is competent to perform the
injection properly and safely, supervision and evaluation shall occur
at least every ninety days thereafter.
(vi) The registered nurse shall verify that the nursing assistant
has completed the required core nurse delegation training required in
chapter 18.88A RCW prior to authorizing delegation.
(((vi))) (vii) The nurse is accountable for his or her own
individual actions in the delegation process. Nurses acting within the
protocols of their delegation authority are immune from liability for
any action performed in the course of their delegation duties.
(((vii))) (viii) Nursing task delegation protocols are not intended
to regulate the settings in which delegation may occur, but are
intended to ensure that nursing care services have a consistent
standard of practice upon which the public and the profession may rely,
and to safeguard the authority of the nurse to make independent
professional decisions regarding the delegation of a task.
(f) The nursing care quality assurance commission may adopt rules
to implement this section.
(4) Only a person licensed as a registered nurse may instruct
nurses in technical subjects pertaining to nursing.
(5) Only a person licensed as a registered nurse may hold herself
or himself out to the public or designate herself or himself as a
registered nurse.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.88A.210 and 2003 c 140 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A nursing assistant meeting the requirements of this section
who provides care to individuals in community-based care settings or
in-home care settings, as defined in RCW 18.79.260(3), may accept
delegation of nursing care tasks by a registered nurse as provided in
RCW 18.79.260(3).
(2) For the purposes of this section, "nursing assistant" means a
nursing assistant-registered or a nursing assistant-certified. Nothing
in this section may be construed to affect the authority of nurses to
delegate nursing tasks to other persons, including licensed practical
nurses, as authorized by law.
(3)(a) Before commencing any specific nursing care tasks authorized
under this chapter, the nursing assistant must (((a))) (i) provide to
the delegating nurse a certificate of completion issued by the
department of social and health services indicating the completion of
basic core nurse delegation training, (((b))) (ii) be regulated by the
department of health pursuant to this chapter, subject to the uniform
disciplinary act under chapter 18.130 RCW, and (((c))) (iii) meet any
additional training requirements identified by the nursing care quality
assurance commission. Exceptions to these training requirements must
adhere to RCW 18.79.260(3)(e)(((v))) (vi).
(b) In addition to meeting the requirements of (a) of this
subsection, before commencing the care of individuals with diabetes
that involves administration of insulin by injection, the nursing
assistant must provide to the delegating nurse a certificate of
completion issued by the department of social and health services
indicating completion of specialized diabetes nurse delegation
training. The training must include, but is not limited to,
instruction regarding diabetes, insulin, sliding scale insulin orders,
and proper injection procedures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The commission, in cooperation with the
department of social and health services, shall develop a monitoring
system for insulin administered by injection by nursing assistants
pursuant to a delegation from a registered nurse made in accordance
with RCW 18.79.260(3)(e). The monitoring system shall include
information reported by delegating nurses on the number of nursing
assistants who administer insulin by injection; the number of patients
those nursing assistants serve; the number of injections that have been
administered; the number, type, and outcome of any inappropriately
administered insulin injections; and other relevant information.
(2) The commission shall report to the governor and the legislature
on the findings of the monitoring system and any recommendations for
continuing or discontinuing to permit registered nurses to delegate the
administration of insulin by injection to nursing assistants in
accordance with RCW 18.79.260(3)(e). The report shall be submitted to
the governor and the legislature by November 15, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires on June 1, 2013.

--- END ---