BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washingtonians
sixty-five years of age and older will nearly double in the next twenty
years, from eleven percent of our population today to almost twenty
percent of our population in 2025. Younger people with disabilities
will also require supportive long-term care services. Nationally,
young people with a disability account for thirty seven percent of the
total number of people who need long-term care.
The legislature further finds that to address this increasing need,
the long-term care system should support autonomy and self-determination, and support the role of informal caregivers and
families. It should promote personal planning and savings combined
with public support, when needed. It should also include culturally
appropriate, high quality information, services, and supports delivered
in a cost-effective and efficient manner.
The legislature further finds that the long-term care system should
utilize evidence-based practices for the prevention and management of
chronic disease to improve the general health of Washingtonians over
their lifetime and reduce health care and long-term care costs related
to ineffective chronic care management.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.41.040 and 1987 c 409 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall administer this chapter and shall establish
such rules and standards as the department deems necessary in carrying
out this chapter. The department shall not require the development of
plans of care or discharge plans by nursing homes or adult family homes
providing respite care service under this chapter. Boarding homes
providing respite care services shall comply with the assessment and
plan of care provisions of RCW 18.20.350.
The department shall develop standards for the respite program in
conjunction with the selected area agencies on aging. The program
standards shall serve as the basis for soliciting bids, entering into
subcontracts, and developing sliding fee scales to be used in
determining the ability of eligible participants to participate in
paying for respite care.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.20.350 and 2004 c 142 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The boarding home licensee shall conduct a preadmission
assessment for each resident applicant. The preadmission assessment
shall include the following information, unless unavailable despite the
best efforts of the licensee:
(a) Medical history;
(b) Necessary and contraindicated medications;
(c) A licensed medical or health professional's diagnosis, unless
the individual objects for religious reasons;
(d) Significant known behaviors or symptoms that may cause concern
or require special care;
(e) Mental illness diagnosis, except where protected by
confidentiality laws;
(f) Level of personal care needs;
(g) Activities and service preferences; and
(h) Preferences regarding other issues important to the resident
applicant, such as food and daily routine.
(2) The boarding home licensee shall complete the preadmission
assessment before admission unless there is an emergency. If there is
an emergency admission, the preadmission assessment shall be completed
within five days of the date of admission. For purposes of this
section, "emergency" includes, but is not limited to: Evening,
weekend, or Friday afternoon admissions if the resident applicant would
otherwise need to remain in an unsafe setting or be without adequate
and safe housing.
(3) The boarding home licensee shall complete an initial resident
service plan upon move-in to identify the resident's immediate needs
and to provide direction to staff and caregivers relating to the
resident's immediate needs. The initial resident service plan shall
include as much information as can be obtained, under subsection (1) of
this section.
(4) When a facility provides respite care, before or at the time of
admission, the facility must obtain sufficient information to meet the
individual's anticipated needs. At a minimum, such information must
include:
(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the individual's
attending physician, and alternate physician if any;
(b) Medical and social history, which may be obtained from a
respite care assessment and service plan performed by a case manager
designated by an area agency on aging under contract with the
department, and mental and physical assessment data;
(c) Physician's orders for diet, medication, and routine care
consistent with the individual's status on admission;
(d) Ensure the individuals have assessments performed, where
needed, and where the assessment of the individual reveals symptoms of
tuberculosis, follow required tuberculosis testing requirements; and
(e) With the participation of the individual and, where
appropriate, their representative, develop a plan of care to maintain
or improve their health and functional status during their stay in the
facility.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.41.050 and 2000 c 207 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall contract with area agencies on aging or other
appropriate agencies to conduct family caregiver long-term care
information and support services to the extent of available funding.
The responsibilities of the agencies shall include but not be limited
to: (1) Administering a program of family caregiver long-term care
information and support services; ((and)) (2) negotiating rates of
payment, administering sliding-fee scales to enable eligible
participants to participate in paying for respite care, and arranging
for respite care information, training, and other support services; and
(3) developing an evidence-based tailored caregiver assessment and
referral tool. In evaluating the need for respite services,
consideration shall be given to the mental and physical ability of the
caregiver to perform necessary caregiver functions.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.38.030 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 131 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The program of community based services authorized under this
chapter shall be administered by the department. Such services may be
provided by the department or through purchase of service contracts,
vendor payments or direct client grants.
The department shall, under stipend or grant programs provided
under RCW 74.38.060, utilize, to the maximum staffing level possible,
eligible persons in its administration, supervision, and operation.
(2) The department shall be responsible for planning, coordination,
monitoring and evaluation of services provided under this chapter but
shall avoid duplication of services.
(3) The department may designate area agencies in cities of not
less than twenty thousand population or in regional areas within the
state. These agencies shall submit area plans, as required by the
department. For area plans prepared for submission in 2009, and
thereafter, the area agencies may include the findings and
recommendations of area-wide planning initiatives that they may
undertake with appropriate local and regional partners regarding the
changing age demographics of their area and the implications of this
demographic change for public policies and public services. They shall
also submit, in the manner prescribed by the department, such other
program or fiscal data as may be required.
(4) The department shall develop an annual state plan pursuant to
the Older Americans Act of 1965, as now or hereafter amended. This
plan shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Area agencies' programs and services approved by the
department;
(b) Other programs and services authorized by the department; and
(c) Coordination of all programs and services.
(5) The department shall establish rules and regulations for the
determination of low income eligible persons. Such determination shall
be related to need based on the initial resources and subsequent income
of the person entering into a program or service. This determination
shall not prevent the eligible person from utilizing a program or
service provided by the department or area agency. However, if the
determination is that such eligible person is nonlow income, the
provision of RCW 74.38.050 shall be applied as of the date of such
determination.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.38.040 and 1983 c 290 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The community based services for low-income eligible persons
provided by the department or the respective area agencies may include:
(1) Access services designed to provide identification of eligible
persons, assessment of individual needs, reference to the appropriate
service, and follow-up service where required. These services shall
include information and referral, outreach, transportation and
counseling. They shall also include long-term care planning and
options counseling, information and crisis intervention, and
streamlined assistance to access a wide array of public and private
community-based services. Services would be available to individuals,
concerned families or friends, or professionals working with issues
related to aging, disabilities, and caregivers;
(2) Day care offered on a regular, recurrent basis. General
nursing, rehabilitation, personal care, nutritional services, social
casework, mental health as provided pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW
and/or limited transportation services may be made available within
this program;
(3) In-home care for persons, including basic health care;
performance of various household tasks and other necessary chores, or,
a combination of these services;
(4) Counseling on death for the terminally ill and care and
attendance at the time of death; except, that this is not to include
reimbursement for the use of life-sustaining mechanisms;
(5) Health services which will identify health needs and which are
designed to avoid institutionalization; assist in securing admission to
medical institutions or other health related facilities when required;
and, assist in obtaining health services from public or private
agencies or providers of health services. These services shall include
health screening and evaluation, in-home services, health education,
and such health appliances which will further the independence and
well-being of the person;
(6) The provision of low cost, nutritionally sound meals in central
locations or in the person's home in the instance of incapacity. Also,
supportive services may be provided in nutritional education, shopping
assistance, diet counseling and other services to sustain the
nutritional well-being of these persons;
(7) The provisions of services to maintain a person's home in a
state of adequate repair, insofar as is possible, for their safety and
comfort. These services shall be limited, but may include housing
counseling, minor repair and maintenance, and moving assistance when
such repair will not attain standards of health and safety, as
determined by the department;
(8) Civil legal services, as limited by RCW 2.50.100, for
counseling and representation in the areas of housing, consumer
protection, public entitlements, property, and related fields of law;
(9) Long-term care ombudsman programs for residents of all long-term care facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
Within funds appropriated for this purpose, the department shall
develop a statewide fall prevention program. The program shall include
networking community services, identifying service gaps, making
affordable senior-based, evaluated exercise programs more available,
providing consumer education to older adults, their adult children, and
the community at large, and conducting professional education on fall
risk identification and reduction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
Within funds appropriated for this purpose, the department shall
provide additional support for residents in community settings who
exhibit challenging behaviors that put them at risk for institutional
placement. The residents must be receiving services under the
community options program entry system waiver or the medically needy
residential facility waiver under section 1905(c) of the federal social
security act and must have been evaluated under the individual
comprehensive assessment reporting and evaluation process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 74.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may conduct a vulnerable adult fatality review
in the event of a death of a vulnerable adult when the department has
reason to believe that the death of the vulnerable adult may be related
to the abuse, abandonment, exploitation, or neglect of the vulnerable
adult, or may be related to the vulnerable adult's self-neglect, and
the vulnerable adult was:
(a) Receiving home and community-based services in his or her own
home, described under chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW, within sixty days
preceding his or her death; or
(b) Living in his or her own home and was the subject of a report
under this chapter received by the department within twelve months
preceding his or her death.
(2) When conducting a vulnerable adult fatality review of a person
who had been receiving hospice care services before the person's death,
the review shall provide particular consideration to the similarities
between the signs and symptoms of abuse and those of many patients
receiving hospice care services.
(3) All files, reports, records, communications, and working papers
used or developed for purposes of a fatality review are confidential
and not subject to disclosure pursuant to RCW 74.34.095.
(4) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If specific funding for the purposes of
sections 4, 6, 7, and 8 of this act, referencing the section by section
number and by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2008,
in the omnibus appropriations act, each section not referenced is null
and void.

--- END ---