BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
tangible personal property or labor and services to a limited liability
company, or other company, for the constructing of housing if the
company has received a commitment of funding to pay for the property,
services, or homeowner purchase assistance in whole or in part, from:
(a) A federal or state housing program administered by the
department of community, trade, and economic development; or
(b) A federal, state, or local housing program administered by a
city, town, county, other political subdivision, tribe, or housing
authority.
(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files. The buyer shall keep records necessary for the
department to verify eligibility.
(3) A city, county, or other political subdivision of the state may
require a company exempt from tax under this section or section 2 of
this act to make payments to the city, county, or other political
subdivision for improvements, services, and facilities furnished by the
city, county, or political subdivision for the benefit of housing for
which the construction of the housing is subject to the exemption under
this section or section 2 of this act. However, these payments may not
exceed the amount that would have otherwise been distributed to the
city, county, or political subdivision if not for the tax exemption
under this section or section 2 of this act.
(4) For the purposes of this section and section 2 of this act,
"constructing" includes improvements associated with the acquisition of
existing buildings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of tangible
personal property or labor and services by a limited liability company,
or other company, for the constructing of housing if the company meets
any of the conditions under section 1(1) of this act.

--- END ---