BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
support a vibrant economy through a well-trained, highly skilled
workforce. It is also the intent of the legislature to ensure that
individuals who receive high level training in Washington remain in the
state upon graduation. Further, in order for Washington businesses to
prosper in a highly competitive global economy, businesses must have
the necessary tools and talent, and it is the intent of the legislature
to help businesses meet these needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed to qualified employers for student loan payments made on behalf
of qualified employees.
(2) The credit is equal to the amount of federal or Washington
state student loan payments, which came due and were paid by a
qualified employer on behalf of a qualified employee in a calendar
year. The maximum credit that may be earned is:
(a) Two thousand dollars for each qualified employee to whom the
qualified employer pays annual wages and benefits of forty thousand
dollars or less; or
(b) Four thousand dollars for each qualified employee to whom the
qualified employer pays annual wages and benefits of more than forty
thousand dollars.
(3) The credit under this section may be used against taxes due
under this chapter and a credit earned during one calendar year may be
carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent
calendar year. A person is not eligible to receive a credit under this
section if the person is receiving a "tax preference," as defined in
RCW 43.136.021, under any other provision of law for the same
employment position. No refunds may be granted for credits under this
section.
(4)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources, the
legislature needs information to evaluate whether the stated goals of
legislation were achieved. A person taking a credit under this section
must make an annual survey to the department as provided in section 3
of this act.
(b) The goals of the tax credit authorized under this section are
to support a vibrant economy through a well-trained, highly skilled
workforce and ensure that individuals who receive high level training
in Washington remain in the state upon graduation.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Qualified employee" means an employee who:
(i) Resides and is employed in Washington;
(ii) Has been employed by the qualified employer for at least
twelve consecutive months and, during that time, has worked at least
thirty-five hours per week or four hundred fifty-five hours per quarter
or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours per year, exclusive of
overtime;
(iii) Attended for at least two years and, within the past five
years, earned a bachelor or a graduate degree from one of Washington's
state universities, regional universities, or the state college, as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016;
(iv) Was a resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 during the
entire period of attendance at the Washington university, regional
university, or state college; and
(v) Has federal, Washington state, or a combination of federal and
Washington state, student loan debt with a total loan principal amount
of ten thousand dollars or more.
(b) "Qualified employer" means a person, as defined in RCW
82.04.030, employing fifty or fewer employees.
(6) Transfer of ownership of the qualified employer does not affect
credit eligibility. However, the credit is available to the successor
only if the successor is a qualified employer and the other eligibility
conditions of this section are met.
(7) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section.
(8) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed are immediately due. The department
must assess interest, but not penalties, on the tax credit for which
the person is not eligible. The interest must be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, must be assessed
retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken, and must accrue
until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(9) This section expires January 1, 2011. A credit may be claimed
under this section on or after January 1, 2011, for any credit earned
during a reporting period ending before January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each person claiming a tax preference that requires a survey
under this section must report information to the department by filing
a complete annual survey. The survey is due by March 31st of the year
following any calendar year in which the tax preference is taken. The
department may extend the due date for timely filing of annual surveys
under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey must
include the amount of the tax preference taken. The survey must also
include the following information for employment positions in
Washington:
(a) The number of total employment positions;
(b) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(c) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(d) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(2) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of, or determine eligibility for, the tax
preference, to be submitted at the same time as the survey.
(3) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax preference taken, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW
82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax preference taken is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330. If the
amount of the tax preference taken as reported on the survey is
different than the amount actually taken or otherwise allowed by the
department based on the taxpayer's excise tax returns or other
information known to the department, the amount actually taken or
allowed may be disclosed.
(4) If a person fails to submit an annual survey under this section
by the due date of the report or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the
department must declare the amount of the tax preference taken for the
previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable. The
department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the amounts due
under this section. The interest must be assessed at the rate provided
for delinquent taxes under this chapter, retroactively to the date the
credit was claimed, and must accrue until the taxes for which the
credit was claimed are repaid. This information is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330.
(5) The department must use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers must be included in any category. The department must
report these statistics to the legislature each year by September 1st.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "tax preference" has the
meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and includes only the tax
preferences requiring a survey under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.32.590 and 2006 c 354 s 17, 2006 c 300 s 10, 2006
c 177 s 8, 2006 c 112 s 7, and 2006 c 84 s 7 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey or annual report under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.5351,
82.32.650, 82.32.635, 82.32.640, 82.32.630, 82.32.610, section 3 of
this act, or 82.74.040 by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall extend the
time for filing the survey or report. Such extension shall be for a
period of thirty days from the date the department issues its written
notification to the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under
this section. The department may grant additional extensions as it
deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey or annual report by the due date was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department
shall be guided by rules adopted by the department for the waiver or
cancellation of penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of
any tax was due to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.32.600 and 2007 c 54 s 23 and 2007 c 54 s 22 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file annual surveys or annual reports under
RCW 82.04.4452 or 82.32.5351, 82.32.610, 82.32.630, 82.32.635,
82.32.640, section 3 of this act, or 82.74.040 must electronically file
with the department all surveys, reports, returns, and any other forms
or information the department requires in an electronic format as
provided or approved by the department. As used in this section,
"returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) Any survey, report, return, or any other form or information
required to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of
this section is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

--- END ---