BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.19.020 and 2001 c 251 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means an agency or facility operated, licensed, or
certified by the state of Washington.
(2) "Agency affiliated counselor" means a person registered under
this chapter who is engaged in counseling and employed by an agency.
(3) "Limited professional counselor" means a person certified under
this chapter who is engaged in private practice counseling.
(4) "Client" means an individual who receives or participates in
counseling or group counseling.
(((2))) (5) "Counseling" means employing any therapeutic
techniques, including but not limited to social work, mental health
counseling, marriage and family therapy, and hypnotherapy, for a fee
that offer, assist or attempt to assist an individual or individuals in
the amelioration or adjustment of mental, emotional, or behavioral
problems, and includes therapeutic techniques to achieve sensitivity
and awareness of self and others and the development of human
potential. For the purposes of this chapter, nothing may be construed
to imply that the practice of hypnotherapy is necessarily limited to
counseling.
(((3))) (6) "Counselor" means an individual, practitioner,
therapist, or analyst who engages in the practice of counseling to the
public for a fee, including for the purposes of this chapter,
hypnotherapists.
(((4))) (7) "Department" means the department of health.
(((5))) (8) "Hypnotherapist" means a person registered under this
chapter who is practicing hypnosis as a modality.
(9) "Private practice counseling" means the practice of counseling
by a limited professional counselor as specified in section 4 of this
act.
(10) "Psychotherapy" means the practice of counseling using
diagnosis of serious mental disorders according to the fourth edition
of the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, published
in 1994, and the development of treatment plans for counseling based on
diagnosis of serious mental disorders in accordance with established
practice standards.
(11) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or the
secretary's designee.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.19.030 and 2001 c 251 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
((No)) A person may not, ((for a fee or)) as a part of his or her
position as an employee of a state agency, practice counseling without
being registered to practice as an agency affiliated counselor by the
department under this chapter unless exempt under RCW 18.19.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.19 RCW
to read as follows:
A person may not, for a fee or as a part of his or her position as
an employee of a state agency, practice hypnotherapy without being
registered to practice as a hypnotherapist by the department under this
chapter unless exempt under RCW 18.19.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The scope of practice of limited professional counselors consists
exclusively of the following:
(1) Appropriate screening of the client's level of functional
impairment using the global assessment of functioning as described in
the fourth edition of the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental
disorders, published in 1994. Recognition of a mental or physical
disorder or a global assessment of functioning score of sixty or less
requires that the limited professional counselor refer the client to a
physician, osteopathic physician, or licensed mental health
practitioner, as defined by the secretary, for diagnosis and treatment;
(2)(a) Counseling and guiding clients who have a global assessment
of functioning score greater than sixty in adjusting to life
situations, developing new skills, and making desired changes, in
accordance with the theories and techniques of a specific counseling
method and established practice standards.
(b) A limited professional counselor shall not provide counseling
or guidance services under (a) of this subsection to a client with a
global assessment of functioning score of sixty or less, except as part
of a plan of care developed by a physician, osteopathic physician, or
licensed mental health practitioner, as defined by the secretary, who
is actively treating the client. The limited professional counselor
must adhere to any conditions related to the limited professional
counselor's role as specified in the plan of care.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.19.040 and 2001 c 251 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice of a profession by a person who is either
registered, certified, licensed, or similarly regulated under the laws
of this state and who is performing services within the person's
authorized scope of practice, including any attorney admitted to
practice law in this state when providing counseling incidental to and
in the course of providing legal counsel;
(2) The practice of counseling by an employee or trainee of any
federal agency, or the practice of counseling by a student of a college
or university, if the employee, trainee, or student is practicing
solely under the supervision of and accountable to the agency, college,
or university, through which he or she performs such functions as part
of his or her position for no additional fee other than ordinary
compensation;
(3) The practice of counseling by a person ((without a mandatory
charge)) for no compensation;
(4) The practice of counseling by persons offering services for
public and private nonprofit organizations or charities not primarily
engaged in counseling for a fee when approved by the organizations or
agencies for whom they render their services;
(5) Evaluation, consultation, planning, policy-making, research, or
related services conducted by social scientists for private
corporations or public agencies;
(6) The practice of counseling by a person under the auspices of a
religious denomination, church, or organization, or the practice of
religion itself;
(7) The practice of counseling by peer counselors who use their own
experience to encourage and support people with similar conditions or
activities related to the training of peer counselors;
(8) Counselors ((whose residency is not)) who reside outside
Washington state from providing up to ten days per quarter of training
or workshops in the state, as long as they ((don't)) do not hold
themselves out to be registered or certified in Washington state.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.19.050 and 2001 c 251 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the
secretary has the following authority:
(a) To adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary
to implement this chapter;
(b) To set all registration, certification, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and to collect and deposit all such fees
in the health professions account established under RCW 43.70.320;
(c) To establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(d) To hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement this chapter;
(e) To issue a registration or certification to any applicant who
has met the requirements for registration or certification; and
(f) To ((develop a dictionary of recognized professions and
occupations providing counseling services to the public included under
this chapter)) establish education equivalency, examination,
supervisory, consultation, and continuing education requirements for
limited professional counselors.
(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the
issuance and denial of registrations and certifications and the
discipline of registrants under this chapter. The secretary shall be
the disciplining authority under this chapter. ((The absence of
educational or training requirements for counselors registered under
this chapter or the counselor's use of nontraditional nonabusive
therapeutic techniques shall not, in and of itself, give the secretary
authority to unilaterally determine the training and competence or to
define or restrict the scope of practice of such individuals.))
(3) The department shall publish and disseminate information ((in
order)) to educate the public about the responsibilities of counselors,
the types of counselors, and the rights and responsibilities of clients
established under this chapter. ((Solely for the purposes of
administering this education requirement,)) The secretary ((shall)) may
assess an additional fee for each application and renewal((, equal to
five percent of the fee. The revenue collected from the assessment fee
may be appropriated by the legislature for the department's use in
educating consumers pursuant to this section. The authority to charge
the assessment fee shall terminate on June 30, 1994)) to fund public
education efforts under this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.19.060 and 2001 c 251 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Persons registered under this chapter)) Limited professional
counselors shall provide clients at the commencement of any program of
treatment with accurate disclosure information concerning their
practice, in accordance with guidelines developed by the department,
that will inform clients of the purposes of and resources available
under this chapter, including the right of clients to refuse treatment,
the responsibility of clients for choosing the provider and treatment
modality which best suits their needs, and the extent of
confidentiality provided by this chapter, the department, another
agency, or other jurisdiction. The disclosure statement must inform
the client of the limited professional counselor's consultation
arrangement as defined in rules adopted by the secretary. The
disclosure information provided by the limited professional counselor,
the receipt of which shall be acknowledged in writing by the limited
professional counselor and client, shall include any relevant education
and training, the therapeutic orientation of the practice, the proposed
course of treatment where known, any financial requirements, referral
resources, and such other information as the department may require by
rule. The disclosure information shall also include a statement that
((registration)) the certification of an individual under this chapter
does not include a recognition of any practice standards, nor
necessarily imply the effectiveness of any treatment. Limited
professional counselors must also disclose that they are not
credentialed to diagnose or treat mental disorders or to conduct
psychotherapy as defined by the secretary by rule. The client is not
liable for any fees or charges for services rendered prior to receipt
of the disclosure statement.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.19.090 and 1991 c 3 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The secretary shall issue a registration to any applicant who
submits, on forms provided by the secretary, the applicant's name,
address, occupational title, name and location of business, and other
information as determined by the secretary, including information
necessary to determine whether there are grounds for denial of
registration or issuance of a conditional registration under this
chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW. Applicants for registration shall
register as counselors or may register as hypnotherapists if employing
hypnosis as a modality. Applicants shall, in addition, provide in
their titles a description of their therapeutic orientation,
discipline, theory, or technique.)) (1) Application for agency
affiliated counselor, limited professional counselor, or hypnotherapist
must be made on forms approved by the secretary. The secretary may
require information necessary to determine whether applicants meet the
qualifications for the credential and whether there are any grounds for
denial of the credential, or for issuance of a conditional credential,
under this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW. The application for agency
affiliated counselor or limited professional counselor must include a
description of the applicant's orientation, discipline, theory, or
technique. Each applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary
as provided in RCW 43.70.250, which shall accompany the application.
(2) Applicants for agency affiliated counselor must provide
satisfactory documentation that they are employed by an agency or have
an offer of employment from an agency.
(3) Applicants for limited professional counselor are required to:
(a) Have been registered for no less than five years at the time of
application for an initial certification;
(b) Have held a valid, active registration that is in good standing
and be in compliance with any disciplinary process and orders at the
time of application for an initial certification;
(c) Show evidence of having completed course work in risk
assessment, ethics, appropriate screening and referral, and Washington
state law and other subjects identified by the secretary;
(d) Pass an examination in risk assessment, ethics, appropriate
screening and referral, and Washington state law, and other subjects as
determined by the secretary; and
(e) Have a written consultation agreement with a credential holder
who meets the qualifications established by the secretary.
(4) Each applicant shall include payment of the fee determined by
the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 18.19 RCW
to read as follows:
Agency affiliated counselors shall notify the department if they
are either no longer employed by the agency identified on their
application or are now employed with another agency, or both. Agency
affiliated counselors may not engage in the practice of counseling
unless they are currently affiliated with an agency.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.19.100 and 1996 c 191 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall establish administrative procedures,
administrative requirements, continuing education, and fees for renewal
of ((registrations)) credentials as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and
43.70.280. When establishing continuing education requirements for
agency affiliated counselors, the secretary shall consult with the
appropriate state agency director responsible for licensing,
certifying, or operating the relevant agency practice setting.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.225.010 and 2001 c 251 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced social work" means the application of social work
theory and methods including emotional and biopsychosocial assessment,
psychotherapy under the supervision of a licensed independent clinical
social worker, case management, consultation, advocacy, counseling, and
community organization.
(2) "Applicant" means a person who completes the required
application, pays the required fee, is at least eighteen years of age,
and meets any background check requirements and uniform disciplinary
act requirements.
(3) "Associate" means a prelicensure candidate who has a graduate
degree in a mental health field under RCW 18.225.090 and is gaining the
supervision and supervised experience necessary to become a licensed
independent clinical social worker, a licensed advanced social worker,
a licensed mental health counselor, or a licensed marriage and family
therapist.
(4) "Committee" means the Washington state mental health
counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers advisory
committee.
(((4))) (5) "Department" means the department of health.
(((5))) (6) "Disciplining authority" means the department.
(((6))) (7) "Independent clinical social work" means the diagnosis
and treatment of emotional and mental disorders based on knowledge of
human development, the causation and treatment of psychopathology,
psychotherapeutic treatment practices, and social work practice as
defined in advanced social work. Treatment modalities include but are
not limited to diagnosis and treatment of individuals, couples,
families, groups, or organizations.
(((7))) (8) "Marriage and family therapy" means the diagnosis and
treatment of mental and emotional disorders, whether cognitive,
affective, or behavioral, within the context of relationships,
including marriage and family systems. Marriage and family therapy
involves the professional application of psychotherapeutic and family
systems theories and techniques in the delivery of services to
individuals, couples, and families for the purpose of treating such
diagnosed nervous and mental disorders. The practice of marriage and
family therapy means the rendering of professional marriage and family
therapy services to individuals, couples, and families, singly or in
groups, whether such services are offered directly to the general
public or through organizations, either public or private, for a fee,
monetary or otherwise.
(((8))) (9) "Mental health counseling" means the application of
principles of human development, learning theory, psychotherapy, group
dynamics, and etiology of mental illness and dysfunctional behavior to
individuals, couples, families, groups, and organizations, for the
purpose of treatment of mental disorders and promoting optimal mental
health and functionality. Mental health counseling also includes, but
is not limited to, the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of mental
and emotional disorders, as well as the application of a wellness model
of mental health.
(((9))) (10) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.225.020 and 2001 c 251 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person must not represent himself or herself as a licensed
advanced social worker, a licensed independent clinical social worker,
a licensed mental health counselor, ((or)) a licensed marriage and
family therapist, a licensed social work associate--advanced, a
licensed social work associate--independent clinical, a licensed mental
health counselor associate, or a licensed marriage and family therapist
associate, without being licensed by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 18.225
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue an associate license to any applicant
who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that the
applicant meets the following requirements for the applicant's practice
area and submits a declaration that the applicant is working toward
full licensure in that category:
(a) Licensed social worker associate--advanced or licensed social
worker associate--independent clinical: Graduation from a master's
degree or doctoral degree educational program in social work accredited
by the council on social work education and approved by the secretary
based upon nationally recognized standards.
(b) Licensed mental health counselor associate: Graduation from a
master's degree or doctoral degree educational program in mental health
counseling or a related discipline from a college or university
approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards.
(c) Licensed marriage and family therapist associate: Graduation
from a master's degree or doctoral degree educational program in
marriage and family therapy or graduation from an educational program
in an allied field equivalent to a master's degree or doctoral degree
in marriage and family therapy approved by the secretary based upon
nationally recognized standards.
(2) Associates may not provide independent social work, mental
health counseling, or marriage and family therapy for a fee, monetary
or otherwise. Associates must work under the supervision of an
approved supervisor.
(3) Associates shall provide each client or patient, during the
first professional contact, with a disclosure form according to RCW
18.225.100, disclosing that he or she is an associate under the
supervision of an approved supervisor.
(4) The department shall adopt by rule what constitutes adequate
proof of compliance with the requirements of this section.
(5) Applicants are subject to the denial of a license or issuance
of a conditional license for the reasons set forth in chapter 18.130
RCW.
(6) An associate license may be renewed no more than four times.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.225.150 and 2001 c 251 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary shall establish by rule the procedural requirements
and fees for renewal of a license or associate license. Failure to
renew shall invalidate the license or associate license and all
privileges granted by the license. If an associate license has lapsed,
the person shall submit an updated declaration, in accordance with
rules adopted by the department, that the person is working toward full
licensure. If a license has lapsed for a period longer than three
years, the person shall demonstrate competence to the satisfaction of
the secretary by taking continuing education courses, or meeting other
standards determined by the secretary. If an associate license has
lapsed, the person shall submit an updated declaration, in accordance
with rules adopted by the department, that the person is working toward
full licensure.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.205.020 and 1998 c 243 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Certification" means a voluntary process recognizing an
individual who qualifies by examination and meets established
educational prerequisites, and which protects the title of practice.
(2) "Certified chemical dependency professional" means an
individual certified in chemical dependency counseling, under this
chapter.
(3) "Certified chemical dependency professional trainee" means an
individual working toward the education and experience requirements for
certification as a chemical dependency professional.
(4) "Chemical dependency counseling" means employing the core
competencies of chemical dependency counseling to assist or attempt to
assist an alcohol or drug addicted person to develop and maintain
abstinence from alcohol and other mood-altering drugs.
(((4))) (5) "Committee" means the chemical dependency certification
advisory committee established under this chapter.
(((5))) (6) "Core competencies of chemical dependency counseling"
means competency in the nationally recognized knowledge, skills, and
attitudes of professional practice, including assessment and diagnosis
of chemical dependency, chemical dependency treatment planning and
referral, patient and family education in the disease of chemical
dependency, individual and group counseling with alcoholic and drug
addicted individuals, relapse prevention counseling, and case
management, all oriented to assist alcoholic and drug addicted patients
to achieve and maintain abstinence from mood-altering substances and
develop independent support systems.
(((6))) (7) "Department" means the department of health.
(((7))) (8) "Health profession" means a profession providing health
services regulated under the laws of this state.
(((8))) (9) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.

Sec. 16 RCW 18.205.030 and 2000 c 171 s 41 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person may represent oneself as a certified chemical dependency
professional or certified chemical dependency professional trainee or
use any title or description of services of a certified chemical
dependency professional or certified chemical dependency professional
trainee without applying for certification, meeting the required
qualifications, and being certified by the department of health, unless
otherwise exempted by this chapter.

Sec. 17 RCW 18.205.040 and 1998 c 243 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the use of
the title "certified chemical dependency professional" or "certified
chemical dependency professional trainee" when treating patients in
settings other than programs approved under chapter 70.96A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 18.205
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue a trainee certificate to any
applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that he
or she is working toward the education and experience requirements in
RCW 18.205.090.
(2) A trainee certified under this section shall submit to the
secretary for approval a declaration, in accordance with rules adopted
by the department, that he or she is enrolled in an approved education
program and actively pursuing the experience requirements in RCW
18.205.090. This declaration must be updated with the trainee's annual
renewal.
(3) A trainee certified under this section may practice only under
the supervision of a certified chemical dependency professional. The
first fifty hours of any face-to-face client contact must be under
direct observation. All remaining experience must be under supervision
in accordance with rules adopted by the department.
(4) A certified chemical dependency professional trainee provides
chemical dependency assessments, counseling, and case management with
a state regulated agency and can provide clinical services to patients
consistent with his or her education, training, and experience as
approved by his or her supervisor.
(5) A trainee certification may only be renewed four times.
(6) Applicants are subject to denial of a certificate or issuance
of a conditional certificate for the reasons set forth in chapter
18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 18.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state limited professional counselors and
hypnotherapist advisory committee is established.
(1) The committee is comprised of seven members. Two committee
members must be limited professional counselors. Two committee members
must be hypnotherapists. Three committee members must be consumers and
represent the public at large and may not hold any mental health care
provider license, certification, or registration.
(2) Two committee members must be appointed for a term of one year,
two committee members must be appointed for a term of two years, and
three committee members must be appointed for a term of three years.
Subsequent committee members must be appointed for terms of three
years. A person may not serve as a committee member for more than two
consecutive terms.
(3)(a) Each committee member must be a resident of the state of
Washington.
(b) A committee member may not hold an office in a professional
association for their profession.
(c) Advisory committee members may not be employed by the state of
Washington.
(d) Each professional committee member must have been actively
engaged in their profession for five years immediately preceding
appointment.
(e) The consumer committee members must represent the general
public and be unaffiliated directly or indirectly with the professions
credentialed under this chapter.
(4) The secretary shall appoint the committee members.
(5) Committee members are immune from suit in an action, civil or
criminal, based on the department's disciplinary proceedings or other
official acts performed in good faith.
(6) Committee members must be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.240, including travel expenses in carrying out his or her
authorized duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) The committee shall elect a chair and vice-chair.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 To practice counseling, all registered
counselors must obtain another health profession credential by July 1,
2010. The registered counselor credential is abolished July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 1, 2, 7 through 9, and 11 through
19 of this act take effect July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The department of health may not issue any
new registered counselor credentials after July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The department of health may not issue any
initial limited professional counselor credentials after July 1, 2010.
After July 1, 2010, the department of health may only issue limited
professional counselor credential renewals to individuals who held a
limited professional counselor credential on or before July 1, 2010,
without interruption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---