BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The real and personal property owned by a community or
neighborhood nonprofit organization providing charitable low and
moderate-income housing programs is exempt from taxation if the
property is used primarily as an administrative office by the
organization. The department of revenue shall provide rules regarding
administrative offices exempt under this section, consistent with the
purposes of this section. The benefit of the exemption must inure to
the user.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "community or neighborhood
nonprofit organization" means:
(a) An organization exempt under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the
internal revenue code of 1986; and
(b) A community-based development organization or a community
housing development organization, as defined by the United States
department of housing and urban development, certified by a state or
local jurisdiction.

--- END ---