BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this chapter is to provide
for the adoption of minimum standards related to pharmaceutical
manufacturer marketing activities within the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that:
(1) The state of Washington has an interest in maximizing the
well-being of its residents and containing health care costs;
(2) There is a strong link between pharmaceutical marketing
activities, health care spending, and the health of Washingtonians;
(3) It is estimated that the pharmaceutical industry spends between
thirty billion and fifty-four billion dollars annually on marketing
pharmaceuticals in the United States. Over eighty-five percent of
these marketing expenditures are directed at the small percentage of
the population that practice medicine. Pharmaceutical manufacturers
spend twice as much on marketing as on research and development;
(4) There is considerable evidence that pharmaceutical marketing
campaigns lead doctors to prescribe drugs based on incomplete and
biased information, particularly for prescribers who lack the time to
perform substantive research assessing whether the messages they are
receiving from pharmaceutical representatives are full and accurate;
(5) A significant portion of prescriber time is spent meeting with
pharmaceutical representatives. According to a survey published in the
New England Journal of Medicine, family practitioners reported the
highest frequency of meetings with representatives, an average of
sixteen times per month. To the extent that this meeting time comes at
the expense of time spent with patients, quality of care is negatively
affected;
(6) The federal food and drug administration requires marketing and
advertising to be fair and balanced; however, the federal food and drug
administration has limited legal ability to enforce this requirement;
(7) Newer drugs on the market do not necessarily provide
evidence-based benefits over older drugs but do add costs and as yet
unknown side effects;
(8) Between 1975 and 2000, fifty percent of all drug withdrawals
from the market and "black box warnings" were within the first two
years of the release of the drug. One-fifth of all drugs are subject
to "black box warnings" or withdrawal from the market because of
serious public health concerns. Marketing that results in prescribers
using the newest drugs also results in prescribing drugs that are more
likely to be subject to these warnings and withdrawal;
(9) Nearly one third of the five-fold increase in spending in the
United States on drugs over the last decade can be attributed to
marketing-induced shifts in doctors' prescribing from existing,
effective, and lower cost, often generic, therapies to new and more
expensive treatments, which often have little or no evidence-based
therapeutic value;
(10) Several studies suggest that drug samples clearly affect
prescribing behavior in favor of the sample, and that the presence of
drug samples may influence physicians to dispense or prescribe drugs
that differ from their preferred drug source;
(11) The pharmaceutical industry increased its spending on direct
marketing to doctors by over two hundred seventy-five percent and
doubled its sales force to over ninety thousand drug representatives.
It is estimated that there is a pharmaceutical sales representative for
every five office-based physicians.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the board of pharmacy.
(2)(a) "Marketing" means any of the following activities undertaken
or materials or products made available to prescribers or to their
employees or agents by any person, agent, or representative employed by
or under contract to represent a pharmaceutical manufacturer that is
related to the transfer of prescription drugs from the producer or
seller to the consumer or buyer:
(i) Advertising, publicizing, promoting, or selling a prescription
drug;
(ii) Activities undertaken for the purpose of influencing the
market share of a prescription drug or the prescribing patterns of a
prescriber, a detailing visit, or a personal appearance;
(iii) Activities undertaken to evaluate or improve the
effectiveness of a professional detailing sales force; or
(iv) A brochure, media advertisement or announcement, poster, or
free sample of a prescription drug.
(b) "Marketing" does not include pharmacy reimbursement, formulary
compliance, pharmacy file transfers in response to a patient request or
as a result of the sale or purchase of a pharmacy, patient care
management, utilization review by a health care provider or agent of a
health care provider or the patient's health plan or an agent of the
patient's health plan, and health care research.
(3)(a) "Pharmaceutical manufacturer" or "manufacturer" means an
entity that is engaged in the production, preparation, propagation,
compounding, conversion, or processing of prescription drugs, either
directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin,
or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis, or any entity engaged in the
packaging, repackaging, labeling, relabeling, or distribution of
prescription drugs, biologics, or medical devices. For purposes of
this act, "pharmaceutical manufacturer" includes any person, agent, or
representative employed by or under contract to represent a
pharmaceutical manufacturer or engage in activities to market
prescription drugs sold by a manufacturer.
(b) "Pharmaceutical manufacturer" does not include pharmacists or
pharmacies licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW or pharmacy operations of
any integrated delivery system undertaken for the benefit of patients
obtaining care through that system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Starting January 1, 2010, and annually
thereafter, every pharmaceutical manufacturer shall submit an
attestation with a written report documenting that the manufacturer,
for purposes of its operations in the state of Washington, has:
(1) Adopted a comprehensive compliance program that is at least as
stringent as the April 2003 publication "compliance program guidance
for pharmaceutical manufacturers," which was developed by the United
States department of health and human services office of inspector
general. A pharmaceutical manufacturer shall make conforming changes
to its comprehensive compliance program within six months of any update
or revision to the "compliance program guidance for pharmaceutical
manufacturers," to the extent that making a conforming change would not
have the effect of weakening the guidelines related to marketing
activities provided in the April 2003 version of the compliance program
guidance;
(2) Included in its comprehensive compliance program policies that
are at least as stringent as the pharmaceutical research and
manufacturers of America "code on interactions with health care
professionals," dated July 1, 2002. The pharmaceutical manufacturer
shall make conforming changes to its comprehensive compliance program
within six months of any update or revision of the "code on
interactions with health care professionals," to the extent that making
a conforming change would not have the effect of expanding the scope of
allowable marketing activities beyond those provided in the July 2002
version of the code;
(3)Included in its comprehensive compliance program limits on gifts
or incentives provided to medical or health professionals, in
accordance with this section.
(a) Each pharmaceutical manufacturer shall establish explicitly in
its comprehensive compliance program a specific annual dollar limit on
gifts, promotional materials, or items or activities that the
manufacturer may give or otherwise provide to an individual medical or
health care professional in accordance with the "compliance program
guidance for pharmaceutical manufacturers" and with the "code on
interactions with health care professionals." Drug samples given to
physicians and health care professionals intended for free distribution
to patients, financial support for continuing medical education forums
sponsored by entities other than the manufacturer, and financial
support for health educational scholarships are exempt from any limits
if that support is provided in a manner that conforms to the
"compliance program guidance for pharmaceutical manufacturers" and the
"code on interactions with health care professionals."
(b) Payments made for legitimate professional services provided by
a health care or medical professional including, but not limited to,
consulting are exempt from any limits, provided that the payment does
not exceed the fair market value of the services rendered, and those
payments are provided in a manner that conforms to the "compliance
program guidance for pharmaceutical manufacturers" and with the "code
on interactions with health care professionals."
The attestation must include the name and contact information for
the manufacturer's compliance officer responsible for developing,
operating, and monitoring the compliance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The board shall report annually, on or
before March 1st of each year, to the legislature and the governor on
attestations and reports made under this chapter. The report shall
include a list of manufacturers who have filed attestations, and any
enforcement actions taken by the attorney general related to the
attestations. The report must be posted on the board's public internet
site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The attorney general may bring an action in
Thurston county superior court for injunctive relief, costs, and
attorneys' fees, and to impose on a pharmaceutical manufacturing
company that fails to comply with this chapter a civil penalty of not
more than ten thousand dollars per violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The board may adopt rules to implement the
provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This chapter may be known and cited as the
prescription drug marketing integrity act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.

--- END ---