BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.167 and 2004 c 276 s 718 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) There is created the homeless families services program and
in the custody of the state treasurer an account to be known as the
homeless families services fund. Revenues to the fund consist of ((a
one-time)) appropriations by the legislature, private contributions,
and all other sources deposited in the fund.
(b) Expenditures from the fund may only be used for the purposes of
the program established in this section, including administrative
expenses. Only the director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development, or the director's designee, may authorize
expenditures.
(c) Expenditures from the fund are exempt from appropriations and
the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW. However, money used for
program administration by the department is subject to the allotment
and budgetary controls of chapter 43.88 RCW, and an appropriation is
required for these expenditures.
(2) The department may expend moneys from the fund to provide state
matching funds for housing-based supportive services for homeless
families over a period of at least ((ten)) five years.
(3) Activities eligible for funding through the fund include, but
are not limited to, the following:
(a) Case management;
(b) Counseling;
(c) Referrals to employment support and job training services and
direct employment support and job training services;
(d) Domestic violence services and programs;
(e) Mental health treatment, services, and programs;
(f) Substance abuse treatment, services, and programs;
(g) Parenting skills education and training;
(h) Transportation assistance;
(i) Child care; and
(j) Other supportive services identified by the department to be an
important link for housing stability.
(4) Organizations that may receive funds from the fund include
local housing authorities, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organizations, public development authorities, federally recognized
Indian tribes in the state, and regional or statewide nonprofit housing
assistance organizations. Priority for funding must be given to
organizations that demonstrate quality management practices and
appropriate organizational capacity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must establish goals with yearly targets for the
homeless families services program. Goals must include preventing
homelessness and moving families to self-sufficiency.
(2) The department must establish performance measures to evaluate
and improve the overall effectiveness of the program, which at a
minimum must measure:
(a) Increases in housing stability for assisted homeless families;
(b) Increases in economic self-sufficiency of assisted homeless
families; and
(c) The efficiency and effectiveness of the program in using best
practices to meet stated goals and objectives.
(3) The department shall report on program performance, using the
goals and performance measures established under this section, annually
by January 15th to the appropriate committees of the legislature. The
report must include information from organizations participating in the
program consisting of, at a minimum:
(a) Program activities, outcomes, and performance; and
(b) Recommendations for changes to state policy to assist the state
in reaching its goal of ending homelessness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of six million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the homeless families services
fund for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---