BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Employees of health care facilities shall be allowed scheduled
meal and rest periods as specified in rules adopted by the department
of labor and industries under this chapter. Employees of health care
facilities are not engaged in the type of work that allows employees to
take intermittent rest periods in place of scheduled meal and rest
periods.
(2) The definitions in RCW 49.28.130 apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.28 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the restrictions of RCW 49.28.140, no employer shall
permit any employee of any health care facility to work in excess of
twelve hours in any twenty-four hour period. This section does not
apply to unforeseeable emergent circumstances.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.28.130 and 2002 c 112 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
RCW 49.28.140 ((and)), 49.28.150, and section 2 of this act unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Employee" means a licensed practical nurse or a registered
nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW employed by a health care
facility who is involved in direct patient care activities or clinical
services and receives an hourly wage.
(2) "Employer" means an individual, partnership, association,
corporation, the state ((institution)), a political subdivision of the
state, or person or group of persons, acting directly or indirectly in
the interest of a health care facility.
(3)(a) "Health care facility" means the following facilities, or
any part of the facility, including such facilities if owned and
operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the state,
that operate((s)) on a twenty-four hours per day, seven days per week
basis:
(i) Hospices licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW((,));
(ii) Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW((,));
(iii) Rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020((,
and));
(iv) Psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW((, and
includes such facilities if owned and operated by a political
subdivision or instrumentality of the state));
(v) State hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010;
(vi) State veterans' homes as defined in RCW 72.36.035;
(vii) Residential habilitation centers listed in RCW 71A.20.020,
71A.20.030, and 71A.20.040;
(viii) Facilities owned and operated by the department of
corrections or by a governing unit as defined in RCW 70.48.020 in a
correctional institution as defined in RCW 9.94.049(1) that provide
health care services to inmates as defined in RCW 72.09.015; and
(ix) Facilities in an institution as defined in RCW 13.40.020(12)
or a detention facility as defined in RCW 13.40.020(9) that provide
health care services to juveniles committed to the custody of the
department of social and health services under RCW 13.40.185 or
confined in a detention facility.
(b) If a nursing home regulated under chapter 18.51 RCW ((or a
home health agency regulated under chapter 70.127 RCW)) is operating
under the license of a health care facility, the nursing home ((or home
health agency)) is considered part of the health care facility for the
purposes of this subsection.
(4) "Overtime" means the hours worked in excess of an agreed upon,
predetermined, regularly scheduled shift within a twenty-four hour
period not to exceed twelve hours in a twenty-four hour period or
eighty hours in a consecutive fourteen-day period.
(5) "On-call time" means time spent by an employee who is not
working on the premises of the place of employment but who is
compensated for availability or who, as a condition of employment, has
agreed to be available to return to the premises of the place of
employment on short notice if the need arises.
(6) "Reasonable efforts" means that the employer, to the extent
reasonably possible, does all of the following but is unable to obtain
staffing coverage:
(a) Seeks individuals to volunteer to work extra time from all
available qualified staff who are working;
(b) Contacts qualified employees who have made themselves available
to work extra time;
(c) Seeks the use of per diem staff; and
(d) Seeks personnel from a contracted temporary agency when such
staffing is permitted by law or an applicable collective bargaining
agreement, and when the employer regularly uses a contracted temporary
agency.
(7) "Unforeseeable emergent circumstance" means (a) any unforeseen
declared national, state, or municipal emergency; (b) when a health
care facility disaster plan is activated; or (c) any unforeseen
disaster or other catastrophic event which substantially affects or
increases the need for health care services.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.28.140 and 2002 c 112 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No employee of a health care facility may be required to work
overtime. Attempts to compel or force employees to work overtime are
contrary to public policy, and any such requirement contained in a
contract, agreement, or understanding is void.
(2) The acceptance by any employee of overtime is strictly
voluntary, and the refusal of an employee to accept such overtime work
is not grounds for discrimination, dismissal, discharge, or any other
penalty, threat of reports for discipline, or employment decision
adverse to the employee.
(3) This section does not apply to overtime work that occurs:
(a) Because of any unforeseeable emergent circumstance;
(b) Because of prescheduled on-call time unless such on-call time
is used to fill vacancies resulting from chronic staff shortages;
(c) When the employer documents that the employer has used
reasonable efforts to obtain staffing. An employer has not used
reasonable efforts if overtime work is used to fill vacancies resulting
from chronic staff shortages; or
(d) When an employee is required to work overtime to complete a
patient care procedure already in progress where the absence of the
employee could have an adverse effect on the patient, as long as the
health care facility made a good faith effort to schedule such patient
care procedures so that overtime would not be required.

Sec. 5 RCW 49.28.150 and 2002 c 112 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of labor and industries shall investigate complaints
of violations of RCW 49.28.140 and sections 1 and 2 of this act. A
violation of RCW 49.28.140 or sections 1 and 2 of this act is a class
1 civil infraction in accordance with chapter 7.80 RCW, except that the
maximum penalty is one thousand dollars for each infraction up to three
infractions. If there are four or more violations of RCW 49.28.140,
sections 1 and 2 of this act, or any combination thereof for a health
care facility, the employer is subject to a fine of two thousand five
hundred dollars for the fourth violation, and five thousand dollars for
each subsequent violation. The department of labor and industries is
authorized to issue and enforce civil infractions according to chapter
7.80 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 72.01.042 and 1981 c 136 s 67 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The hours of labor for each full time employee shall be a
maximum of eight hours in any work day and forty hours in any work
week.
(b) Employees required to work in excess of the eight-hour maximum
per day or the forty-hour maximum per week shall be compensated by not
less than equal hours of compensatory time off or, in lieu thereof, a
premium rate of pay per hour equal to not less than one-one hundred and
seventy-sixth of the employee's gross monthly salary: PROVIDED, That
in the event that an employee is granted compensatory time off, such
time off should be given within the calendar year and in the event that
such an arrangement is not possible the employee shall be given a
premium rate of pay: PROVIDED FURTHER, That compensatory time and/or
payment thereof shall be allowed only for overtime as is duly
authorized and accounted for under rules and regulations established by
the secretary.
(2) Overtime requirements for an employee under this section who is
also an employee of a health care facility under chapter 49.28 RCW are
subject to RCW 49.28.130 through 49.28.150 and sections 1 and 2 of this
act.

--- END ---